label	text0	text1
1	histochemical and autoradiographic studies on the effects of aging on the mucopolysacharides of the periosteum	Histochemical and autoradiographic studies of aging effects on periosteal mucopolysaccharides.
1	the relationship to age and cerebral vascular accidents of fibrin and fibrinolytic activity	Age and stroke of the brain; fibrinolytic and fibrinolytic activity.
1	effects of perceptual training at three age levels	In addition, there are a number of factors that affect the quality of life of Canadians.
1	sociocultural aspects of aging medical points of view	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	the cellular complement of the skeletal system studied autoradiographically with tritiated thymidine h3tdr during growth and aging	The cellular complement of the skeletal system was autoradiographically studied with tritiated h3tdr thymidine during growth and aging.
1	biochemistry of aging	Ageing biochemistry.
1	age changes in adenine nucleotides in flight muscle of male house fly	Changes in apo; apo nucleotide age; adenine in male housefly flight muscle.
1	following response initiation in ducklings age and sensory stimulation	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	analysis of the experimental lesion of connective tissue produced by a complex of c polysaccharide from group a streptococci ii influence of age and hypersensitivity	Analysis of experimental connective tissue lesion produced by a c-polysaccharide complex of the streptococcal group ii influences age and age; hypersensitivity.
1	age and susceptibility of mice to coxsackie a viruses	Age and sensitivity to Coxsackie a.
1	experimental transmission of influenza virus infection in mice ii some factors affecting the incidence of transmitted infection	Infection with the flu virus in the mouse; infection with the flu virus in the mouse; transmission of the flu virus in the mouse; transmission of the flu virus.
1	galactose metabolism by rat liver tissue influence of age	It is not possible to determine the age of the individual.
1	the microscopical appearances of human peripheral arteries during growth and aging	The microscopic appearance of the human peripheral arteries during the course of growth and aging.
1	the controversial and dynamic ovary	L' controversial, dynamic ovary.
1	the fate of mitochondria during aging in tetrahymena pyriformis	In tetrahymena pyriformis.
1	age of weaning in two subspecies of deer mice	L' Weaning Age in Two under-Species of Deer mice.
1	compact bone in chinese and japanese	Compact Chinese and Japanese bone.
1	skeletal age in subjects with mental retardation	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of mental illness.
1	enzyme changes in flight muscle correlated with aging and flight ability in the male housefly	Enzymatic changes in flight muscle are related to aging and the ability to fly in male houseflies.
1	mitotic rates of rat epidermis during growth maturity senility and regeneration	Rat epidermis during senescence and regeneration at maturity.
1	an electron microscope study of mature and differentiating paneth cells in the rat especially of their endoplasmic reticulum and lysosomes	An electron microscopic study of mature, differentiating, rat paneth cells, particularly endoplasmic reticulum and lysosomes.
1	the pathogenesis of herpes virus encephalitis ii a cellular basis for the development of resistance with age	Apos disease pathogenesis; viral encephalitis; herpes ii a cell base for resistance development with apos; age.
1	aromatic induced prevention of fetal toxicity of 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene	Aromatic Induction of Prevention of Fetal Toxicity of 712 Dimethylbenz Alpha Anthracene.
1	communication in illness the relationship of national origin to symptoms and diagnosis	In addition, the National Population Health Survey (NPHS) collects data on the health status of Canadians.
1	redundancy and biological aging	Duplication and Biological Aging.
1	the effect of age on normal values of the westergen sedimentation rate	It is important to note, however, that there are no data on sedimentation rates in western Canada.
1	peptic ulcer in assam	Assumed gastric ulcer.
1	induced protection of adrenal cortex against 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene influence of ethionine induction of menadione reductase incorporation of thymidine h3	Induced protection of the adrenal cortex against 712 anthracene alpha-dimethylbenz influences on apos; induction by apos; apos ethionine; incorporation of h3 thymidine menadione reductase.
1	nutrition onset of disease and longevity in the rat	Nutrition Disease onset and rat longevity.
1	colonization of the mouse intestine with escherichia coli	Mouse colonization by escherichia coli.
1	surgical treatment of tumours of the eyelids	Eyelid tumor surgical treatment.
1	age variations in cortical membranes of rotifers	Age in rotifer cortical membranes.
1	changes in sphingosine and fatty acid components of the gangliosides in developing rat and human brain	Alterations of sphingosine and ganglioside fatty acids in the brain of developing rats and humans.
1	activity of peptidase in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence	L' peptidase activity in leaf tissue of tobacco related to senescence.
1	blood viscosity in healthy subjects and patients with coronary heart disease	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk factors.
1	the influence of endotoxin administration on the nutritional requirements of mice	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of food.
1	weaning of young rats effect of time on behavior	Time effect on weaning behaviour of young rats is time dependent.
1	free ranging rhesus monkeys age and sex differences in individual activity patterns	Depending on age and sex, free rhesus monkeys differ in their individual activity profiles.
1	some characteristics of persons hospitalized in saskatchewan because of heart disease involving the coronary arteries	In addition, there are a number of factors that affect the quality of life of individuals who are hospitalized in Saskatchewan.
1	the geographic pathology of coronary atherosclerosis	Coronary atherosclerosis.
1	relationship of donor age to in vitro production of foot and mouth disease virus by mouse kidney cells	Relationship between donor age and mouse renal cell production of FMD virus in vitro.
1	estimation of the low density beta lipoproteins of serum in health and disease using large molecular weight dextran sulphate	Estimation of healthy low-density serum beta lipoproteins and liver disease; aid from dextran sulphate of high molecular weight.
1	visually evoked potentials amplitude changes with age	It is not possible to determine the magnitude of the changes in the visual evoked potentials.
1	lentigo maligna and malignant melanoma	Maligna lengo and malignant melanoma.
1	electroretinogram in newborn human infants	New-in human-born electroreetinogram.
1	host parasite relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in iran 1 effect of the age of b truncatus on the development of s haematobium	The parasitic relationship-host of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in Iran 1 influences b truncatus age and l&apos development; hematobium s.
1	rash associated with coxsackie a9 infection	Coxsackie A9 infection-associated rash.
1	clinical management of acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction.
1	ontogeny of the immune response ii correlations between the development of the afferent and efferent limbs	The immune response ontogeny ii correlations between afferent and efferent limb development ii.
1	metabolism of propionate by sheep liver interrelations of propionate and glutamate in aged mitochondria	Propionate metabolism in the liver of mature mitochondrial sheep, propionate and glutamate interrelationships.
1	incidence and origin of non systemic microdeposits of amyloid	In addition, there is a small amount of microcystins that can be found in the microorganism of the microorganism.
1	possibility of normokalaemic primary aldosteronism as reflected in the frequency of adrenal cortical adenomas	Adrenal cortical adenoma frequency reflects the possibility of normokalaemic primary aldosteronism.
1	age personality and somatosensory cerebral evoked responses	It is important to remember that this is the only way to understand what is going on.
1	the relationship of diabetes mellitus and body weight to osteoporosis in elderly females	The Relationship Between Diabetes Mellitus and Body Weight and Osteoporosis in Senior Women.
1	decreased susceptibility to the mammary tumour agent in mice with advancing age	Mammalian tumours are more common in women than in men, and are more common in women.
1	surgical timing in biliary tract disease	Surgical chronology of diseases of the bile tract.
1	studies of male survivors of myocardial infarction ix mortality experience and insurability	For example, a person who has been diagnosed as having a severe heart attack may not be eligible for OHIP coverage.
1	perforated peptic ulcer	Perforated peptic ulcer, please.
1	epidemiology of head injuries in children a pilot study	Childhood Head Trauma Epidemiology, pilot study.
1	activity of aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases in tobacco leaf tissue in relation to senescence and to the action of 6 furfurylaminopurine	Ribonucleic synthetase activity in tobacco leaf tissue; aminoacyl activity in tobacco leaf tissue related to senescence and l' action of 6 furfurylaminopurine.
1	development of immune tolerance in the chick embryo to borrelia hispanica	It's the only thing that makes you feel good about yourself.
1	gonadotrophin releasing activity of the median eminence at different ages	L' activity of release of gonadotropin from l' eminence median at various ages.
1	oxygen consumption during pouch development of the macropod marsupial setonix brachyurus	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used to improve the quality of life.
1	dealkylation and loss of capacity for reactivation of cholinesterase inhibited by sarin	Dealkylation and loss of ability to reactivate sarin-inhibited cholinesterase.
1	fat metabolism in higher plants xxxiv development of fatty acid synthetase as a function of protein synthesis in aging potato tuber slices	Fat Metabolism in Higher Plants xxxiv fatty acid synthetase development as a function of protein synthesis in aging tuber slices.
1	noncollagenous nature of the proteins of shark enamel	Non-collagenic nature of proteins; enamel shark.
1	effect of hypophysectomy and replacement therapy on fatty acid metabolism in the rat testis	Effect of Apos; Hypophysectomy and Replacement Therapy on Fatty Acid Metabolism in Rat Testes.
1	changes in hepatic lipigenesis during development of the rat	Liver lipigenesis changes during rat development.
1	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate enzymes in the mosquito during growth and aging	Nicotinamide dinucleotide adenine phosphate enzymes in mosquitoes during growth and aging.
1	serum triglyceride method of estimation and levels in normal humans	This method is based on the following criteria: a. b. c. d.
1	modern concepts in the management of emphysema in the aged and infirm	Modern management concepts for the elderly and disabled; emphysema.
1	patterns of water ash and organic matter changes in senescence	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the survival of the species.
1	high level health for the elderly	High-level senior health.
1	metabolism of propionate by sheep liver pathway of propionate metabolism in aged homogenate and mitochondria	Hepatic Sheep Propionate Metabolism Propionate Metabolism in the aged etapos; homogenate and mitochondria.
1	the effect of platelet age on platelet adherence to collagen	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	the phospholipid composition of embryonic chick liver microsomes	Phospholipid composition of liver microsomes of chick embryos.
1	phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase and pyruvate carboxylase in developing rat liver	Phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase and pyruvate carboxylase from developing rat liver.
1	development of uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase activity in cultures of chick embryo liver	Lapos development; lacidase activity; uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase in chicken liver cultures; chick embryos.
1	lipid composition of the vascular system during infancy childhood and young adulthood	Lipid composition of vascular system during childhood and early adulthood.
1	the release of a bradykinin like pulmonary vasodilator substance in foetal and new born lambs	The release of apos; bradykinin as a pulmonary vasodilator in fetal lambs and new born @-@.
1	changes in the fatty acid composition of cerebrosides and sulfatides of human nervous tissue with age	Changes in human nervous tissue cerebroside and sulfatid fatty acid composition with age.
1	oxygen poisoning in drosophila	Drosophila aerosol poisoning; Drosophila oxygen.
1	mice fighting by neonatally androgenized females	Mice fighting with androgenized in vitro females.
1	shift with age in steady state concentrations of androstenedione and testosterone in incubations of guinea pig testis	In guinea-pig testis incubations, androstenedione and testosterone levels change with apos; age at apos; state of apos; equilibrium.
1	hypnotic age regression and magnitudes of the ponzo and poggendorff illusions	It's a good way to get a sense of what's going on in the world.
1	diurnal variation of oral glucose tolerance a possible pointer to the evolution of diabetes mellitus	The diurnal variation in glucose tolerance by the oral route may be an indicator of the development of the disease.
1	structure and significance of metaplastic nodules in the rectal mucosa	Metaplastic nodule structure and importance in rectal mucosa.
1	osteoporosis of lumbar vertebrae and calcification of abdominal aorta in women living in durban	Lumbar vertebrae osteoporosis and abdominal aortic calcification in durban women.
1	ontogeny of soluble and mitochondrial tyrosine aminotransferases	Mitochondrial and soluble tyrosine aminotransferases ontogeny.
1	release of free fatty acids and loss of hill activity by aging spinach chloroplasts	Dapos release; free fatty acids and free fatty acid loss; activity on the hills by chloroplasts; aging spinach.
1	effect of oestradiol 3 benzoate on the concentrations of retinal and lipids in cod plasma	Effect of d*apos benzoate; estradiol 3 on retinal and lipid plasma cod concentrations.
1	the lipid composition of rat brain myelin and subcellular fractions during development	Lipid composition of subcellular fractions and rat cerebral myelin during development.
1	the localization of proteolytic activity in rat liver mitochondria and its relation to mitochondrial swelling and aging	The localization of l' proteolytic activity in the mitochondria of rat liver and its relation to swelling and aging of mitochondria.
1	aging and cancerogenesis iv interrelationships among age immune response and tumor incidence in several strains of mice	Ageing and Cancer iv interrelationships between age and age of immune response; tumour incidence in several mouse strains.
1	neoplasms occurring in aged fischer rats with special reference to testicular uterine and thyroid tumors	Neoplasms occurring in older Fischer rats, especially in the rat testis and thyroid.
1	effect of ovariectomy at different ages on development of mammary tumors in c3h x r3 f1 mice	The effect of ovarian cancer on the development of breast tumours in mice is unknown.
1	studies on the chromatin of barley leaves during senescence	Chromatin studies of senescent barley leaves.
1	the cryptic nature of hepatic microsomal sulphite oxidase	Hepatic microsomal sulfite oxidase is cryptic in nature.
1	effect of second leaf removal or kinetin treatment on the nucleic acid metabolism of senescing first seedling leaf of barley	Effect of apos; removal of second leaf or kinetin treatment on first senescent seedling leaf nucleic acid metabolism; barley.
1	lipofuscin aging pigment granules of the newborn human liver	Lipofuscin pigment granules aging human liver new-born.
1	a maturity time representation for cell populations	Representation of maturity date of cellular populations.
1	heterogeneity of rough surfaced liver microsomal membranes of adult phenobarbital treated and newborn rats	Rough hepatic microsomal membrane heterogeneity in phenobarbital-treated and newborn-adult rats.
1	properties of heparan sulphate and chondroitin sulphate from young and old human aortae	Properties of Dapos Sulfate; Heparan and Chondroitin Sulfate in Young and Old Human Aortas.
1	bone matrix turnover and balance in vitro ii the effects of aging	Bone-matrix rotation and in vitro-balance ii effects of aging.
1	calcium transport by skeletal muscle sarcoplasmic reticulum in the hypothyroid rat	Calcium transport by sarcoplasmic reticulum of skeletal muscle in hypothyroid rat.
1	gastric antigens in health and disease behaviour in early development senescence metaplasia and cancer	Antigenic gastrics in the health and behaviour of the disease in the early onset of metastatic senescence and cancer.
1	mammary cancer induction by 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene relation to age	Induction of breast cancer by 712 dimethylbenz, an anthracene-like relationship with age.
1	aging of alpha crystallins during development of the lens	Ageing of alpha-crystals during lens development.
1	the effect of age on protein synthesis in mouse liver	L' effect of l' age on the synthesis of proteins in mouse liver.
1	clinical trial of emepronium bromide in nocturnal frequency of old age	Clinical Trial of Dapos Bromide; Omeponium at the Night Frequency of Old Age.
1	changes in certain kinetic properties of hepatic microsomal aniline hydroxylase and ethylmorphine demethylase associated with postnatal development and maturation in male rats	Changes in certain hepatic microsomal aniline hydroxylase and etapos; ethylmorphine demethylase kinetics associated with postnatal development and maturation in male rats.
1	phospholipases in arterial tissue iv the role of phosphatide acyl hydrolase lysophosphatide acyl hydrolase and sphingomyelin choline phosphohydrolase in the regulation of phospholipid composition in the normal human aorta with age	Phospholipases in arterial tissue iv phosphatide acyl hydrolase lysophosphatide acyl hydrolase and sphingomyelin choline phosphohydrolase are involved in the regulation of phospholipid composition in the apos; human aorta normal with the apos; age.
1	alteration in microsomal protein synthesis during early development of mouse brain	L' alteration of synthesis of microsomal proteins in early mouse brain development.
1	inhibition of humab brain pyruvate kinase and hexokinase by phenylalanine and phenylpyruvate possible relevance to phenylketonuric brain damage	Phenylalanine and phenylpyruvate could be related to the phenylketonuric brain lesions; inhibition of pyruvate kinase and apos; brain hexokinase of apos; humab by phenylalanine and phenylpyruvate.
1	inhibition of hydroid aging in campanularia flexuosa	L' inhibition of aging of hydroids in campanularia flexuosa.
1	ontogeny of adrenergic arousal and cholinergic inhibitory mechanisms in the rat	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	ozone and vitamin e	Ozone and vitamin-e.
1	soluble sulfatase in growing bone of rats	Rat Soluble Sulfatase; Growing Bone.
1	the ribosomes of pear fruit their synthesis during the climacteric and the age related compensatory response to ionizing radiation	Pear ribosomes are synthesized during climacterial and compensatory reactions related to the apos; age of ionizing radiation.
1	glycolytic control of respiration during aging of carrot root tissue	Glycolytic respiration control during aging core root tissue.
1	energy linked reactions in photosynthetic bacteria v relation of the light induced proton uptake to photophosphorylation in r rubrum chromatophores	Photosynthetic-bacterial energy reactions, photophosphorylation, and light-induced proton absorption in rubrum chromatophores.
1	the prevalence of carbon 13 in respiratory carbon dioxide as an indicator of the types of endogenous substrate the change from lipid to carbohydrate during the respiratory rise in potato slices	Prevalence of Carbon-13 in Respiratory Carbon Dioxide as an indicator of endogenous substrate types, lipid to carbohydrate shift during potato slices; respiratory increase.
1	hyperphenylalaninemia disaggregation of brain polyribosomes in young rats	A study of the effects of chlorinated phenylalaninemia on the metabolism of polyribosomes.
1	hormonal effects on ontogeny of swimming ability in the rat assessment of central nervous system development	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the development of the nervous system in the rat.
1	cataracts produced in rats by yogurt	Yogurt produced cataracts in rats.
1	decrease in ventilatory capacity between ages of 50 and 54 in representative sample of swedish men	The results of the study are summarized in the following sections.
1	the influence of age on the xylose absorption test	In addition, the test should be performed at the same time as the test.
1	improvement of learning in the aged by modification of autonomic nervous system activity	In addition to the above, there are a number of activities that can be carried out to improve the quality of life.
1	sensitivity of synchronized chinese hamster cells to ultraviolet light	The sensitivity of the synchronized Chinese hamster cell line to ultraviolet light.
1	in vitro protein synthesis and aging in rhizoctania solani	Protein synthesis in Rhizoctania solani and aging in vitro.
1	association of inorganic pyrophosphatase activity with normal calcification of rat costal cartilage in vivo	L' association of apos; activity of inorganic pyrophosphatase with normal calcification of the rat costal cartilage in vivo.
1	developmental variation in the isoenzymes of human liver and gastric alchhol dehydrogenase	Variation in human liver and liver isoenzyme development; alchhol dehydrogenase.
1	repression of interferon action induced dedifferentiation of embryonic cells	It is also important to remember that it is not possible to distinguish between stem cells and stem cells.
1	eye lens color formation and function	Eye lens function and color.
1	dihydrotestosterone in prostatic hypertrophy i the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic prostate of man	Dihydrotestosterone in apos; prostatic hypertrophy i dihydrotestosterone formation and content in the apos hypertrophic prostate; man.
1	dihydrotestosterone in prostatic hypertrophy ii the formation and content of dihydrotestosterone in the hypertrophic canine prostate and the effect of dihydrotestosterone on prostate growth in the dog	Dihydrotestosterone in apos; prostatic hypertrophy ii, formation and dihydrotestosterone content in hypertrophic canine prostate and l' effect of dihydrotestosterone on dog prostate growth.
1	changes in the concentration of high affinity oestradiol receptor in rat uterine supernatant preparations during the oestrous ycle pseudopregnancy pregnancy maturation and after ovariectomy	Changes in the concentration of the high affinity estradiol receptor in supernatant uterine preparations of rats during maturation of the pregnancy of pseudo @-@estrale pregnancy and after ovariectomy.
1	age associated changes in the dna of mouse tissue	It is important to note that there are no data available to support this conclusion.
1	neuronal perikarya and astroglia of rat brain chemical composition during myelination	Pericarya and rat chemical neural astroglies during myelination.
1	effects of long term administration of estrogen on the occurrence of mammary cancer in women	The Canadian Breast Cancer Screening Program (CBCS) is a multi-year, multi-year, multi-year, multi-year initiative.
1	control of ribonuclease and acid phosphatase by auxin and abscisic acid during senescence of rhoeo leaf sections	Ribonuclease and acid phosphatase control by auxin, auxin and apos; abscisic acid during leaf section senescence of rhoeo.
1	composition of cellular membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig 3 enzymatic activities	Cell membrane composition in the pancreatic of guinea pig enzyme 3 activities.
1	further studies on the effect of ageing on beta adrenoceptor activity of rat aorta	D' other apo studies; aging effect on apo; beta activity-apoceptors; rat aorta.
1	residues of total mercury and methylmercuric salts in lake trout as a function of age	Lake trout total mercury and methylmercury salt residues as a function of age.
1	intelligence and blood pressure in the aged	Seniors are also more likely to have high blood pressure.
1	heart rate and haemodynamics after autonomic blockade in infants and children	Cardiac and hemodynamic frequencies following self-limiting in infants and children.
1	regression of valvular pulmonary stenosis	He's regressing his pulmonary valve stenosis.
1	cytomorphometry of developing rat liver and its application to enzymic differentiation	Developing rat liver cytomorphometry and its application to enzyme differentiation.
1	degenerative changes in the mitochondria of flight muscle from aging blowflies	Degenerative changes in aging fly fly fly flight muscle mitochondria.
1	chemical change and energy output during muscular contraction	It's the same thing, but it's not the same thing.
1	age changes in cross striated muscle of the rat	Age in rat crossed striated muscle.
1	selective loss of adipose cell responsiveness to glucagon with growth in the rat	Selective loss of glucagon-growth reactivity of fat cells in rats.
1	three forms of cytochrome b 559 and their relation to the photosynthetic activity of chloroplasts	Three cytochrome b 559 forms and their relationship to chloroplast photosynthetic activity.
1	the toxicity of organophosphorus compounds to mammals	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
1	granular cell myoblastoma an electron microscopic and cytochemical study illustrating the genesis of granules and aging of myoblastoma cells	Granular cell myoblastoma: cytochemical and electron microscopic studies illustrating granule genesis and myoblastoma cell aging.
1	physiological fatty liver and hyperlipemia in the fetal guinea pig chemical and ultrastructural characterization	Extrastructural and chemical characterization of foie gras and lidos; hyperlipidemia of the fetal guinea pig.
1	hmg coa reductase of intestinal mucosa and liver of the rat	Hmg gut mucosal and rat liver coa reductase.
1	decreased rna polymerase activity in mammalian zinc deficiency	Acute toxicity of zinc to rats and rabbits in rats and mice.
1	the dynamics of life aging	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	a method for estimating the number of motor units in thenar muscles and the changes in motor unit count with ageing	Abstract method; Estimation of number of Thenarian muscle motor units and changes in number of motor units with aging.
1	physiological changes in ageing muscles	Ageing muscle physiological changes.
1	some properties of the uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase activity synthesizing thio beta d glucuronides	Some properties of uridine diphosphate glucuronyltransferase, which synthesizes glucuronide beta thioses.
1	uptake of orotate and thymidine by normal and regenerating rat livers	In vitro fertilization is the process of fertilization or fertilization.
1	increased liver l serine pyruvate aminotransferase activity under gluconeogenic conditions	Hepatic serine aminotransferase activity in the liver under gluconeogenic conditions.
1	age changes in the neuronal microenvironment	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	regular decline in physical working capacity with age	In the case of children, the age of the child is the same as the age of the child.
1	reversed development and cellular aging in an insect	Reversing insect cell development and aging.
1	inheritance of plasma cholesterol levels in mice	High blood pressure, high blood pressure, low blood pressure, low blood pressure.
1	interrelationship of glutathione cystine transhydrogenase and glutathione reductase in developing rat intestine	L' glutathione cystine transhydrogenase – glutathione reductase interaction in developing rat intestine.
1	acetoacetate and brain lipogenesis developmental pattern of acetoacetyl coenzyme a synthetase in the soluble fraction of rat brain	In addition, it is not possible to predict the effects of the enzyme on the brain, but it is important to determine the effects of the enzyme on the brain.
1	contrasting patterns of memory span decrement in ageing and aphasia	It's not the same as the rest of the body, but it's the same thing.
1	studies of nuclei separated by zonal centrifugation from liver of rats treated with thioacetamide	Zonal centrifugation of liver nuclei from thioacetamide-treated rats.
1	the crisis of middle age	The age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the crisis; the age of the age; the age of the crisis; the age of the age; the age of the crisis; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age of the crisis; the age; the age of the age of the age; the age of the age of the crisis; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age; the age of the age of the age of the crisis; the age; the age; the age of the age of the crisis; the age; the age of the age; the age of the age of the age
1	intestinal transport of antibodies in the newborn rat	Antibody intestinal transport in the novel rat-born.
1	role of the pituitary and thyroid glands in the decline of minimal o2 consumption with age	The role of pituitary and thyroid glands in the decline in the minimal consumption of apos; oxygen with apos; age.
1	age associated changes in fecal excretion patterns of strain 93 chick embryo lethal orphan virus in chicks	Changes associated with apo placentae; age in chick profiles; fecal shedding of the lethal orphan chick embryo virus of strain 93.
1	presbyopia and the changes with age in the human crystalline lens	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the age of the human lens.
1	changes in the uptake of tritiated estradiol in the hypothalamus and adenohypophysis of old female rats	Modifications to the uptake of estradiol tritiated in the apos; hypothalamus and the apos; adenohypophysis of aged female rats.
1	inactive enzyme molecules in aging mice liver aldolase	Enzymatic molecules inactive in the hepatic aldolase of aged mice.
1	functional and morphologic maturation of the superficial nephrons relationship to total kidney function	Functional and morphological maturity of superficial nephron–total renal function relationship.
1	the collagenous nature of amianthoid degeneration of human costal cartilage	The collagenic nature of the amianthoid degeneration of the human costal cartilage.
1	a quantitative study of synapses on motor neuron dendritic growth cones in developing mouse spinal cord	A quantitative study of the synapses on the dendritic growth cones of motor neurons in the spinal cord of a developing mouse.
1	aging increases susceptibility of mouse skin to dmba carcinogenesis independent of general immune status	It is important to note that the skin of mice is more susceptible to the carcinogenesis of dmba, regardless of its immune status.
1	altered heat lability of a fraction of glutathione reductase in aging human lens	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	a regional survey of myelin development some compositional and metabolic aspects	A Regional Study of Myelin Development on Certain Compositional and Metabolic Aspects.
1	alterations in biliary lipids of mice during dehydrocholic acid feeding	Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes.
1	the effect of age on adrenoceptor activity in tracheal smooth muscle	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the vascular system.
1	tolerance to the hypothermic effects of 9 tetrahydrocannabinol as a function of age in the chicken	Tolerance to 9 tetrahydrocannabinol hypothermic effects as a function of age in chicken.
1	release phenomena and iterative activities in psychiatric geriatric patients	Release Effects and Iterative Activities in Geriatric Psychiatric Patients.
1	aging in hiroshima and nagasaki atomic bomb survivors speculations based upon the age specific mortality of persons with malignant neoplasms	The age of the survivors of the nagasaki and hiroshima atomic bombs is based on mortality according to age of those with malignant neoplasms.
1	role of phosphodiesterase in glucagon resistance of large adipocytes	The Role of Phosphodiesterase in the Glucagon Resistance (GLA) of Large Adipocytes.
1	microtubule protein during ciliogenesis in the mouse oviduct	Microtubular protein during ciliogenesis in mouse oysters.
1	presbyopia and the water content of the human crystalline lens	Human crystalline lens presbytivity and moisture content.
1	the activity of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in nuclei from brain fractionated by zonal centrifugation	L' deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase activity; deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid in zonal centrifugation brain nuclei.
1	rna synthesis in the mouse oocyte	Synthesis in mouse oocyte.
1	attenuation of the ventilatory and heart rate responses to hypoxia and hypercapnia with aging in normal men	Mitigation of respiratory and heart rate responses in normal men; hypoxia and apo; hypercapnia with apo; age.
1	myelinated fibres in the human paravertebral sympathetic chain quantitative studies on white rami communicantes	Myelinated fibers in the quantitative studies of the human parvertebral sympathetic chain on the white, communicative branchlets.
1	correlation between deoxyribonucleic acid excision repair and life span in a number of mammalian species	It is important to note that there are a number of species of mammals that have a long-term relationship to deoxyribonucleic acid excision.
1	a serum component related to nonimmunoglobulin amyloid protein as a possible precursor of the fibrils	A serum component related to the amyloid, non-immune globulinic protein (NIGP) as a possible precursor to fibrils.
1	glucose metabolism in the newborn rat temporal studies in vivo	Glucose Metabolism in Temporal Studies in Newborn-rats born in vivo.
1	inhibition of 3 phosphoglycerate dehydrogenase from pisum sativum by purine nucleotides	Purine nucleotide inhibition of pisum sativum 3 phosphoglycerate dehydrogenase.
1	studies on a murine form of spontaneous lower motor neuron degeneration the wobbler wa mouse	Studies on a spontaneously degenerating murine form of lower motor neurons, the Wobbler Wa mouse.
1	changes with age in the valvular apparatus of the superficial and deep veins of the leg	The leg's deep superficial vein valvular apparatus changes with age.
1	amyloid in normal and pathological parathyroid glands	Amyloid in both the normal and the normal parathyroid glands.
1	the effect of age on the fibrinolytic enzyme system	L' effect of aging on fibrinolytic enzyme system.
1	electron probe analysis of calcium transport by small intestine	Calcium transport by the apos; small intestine by electron probe.
1	age related changes in the thermoregulatory capacity of tryptophan deficient rats	Changes related to apo; age of tryptophan-deficient rat thermoregulatory capacity.
1	pituitary inhibitor of thyroxine	Pituitary inhibitor, thyroxine.
1	runwheel activity patterns of mature young and senescent mice the effect of constant lighting conditions	Canadian Journal of Fisheries and Aquatic Sciences, 35(5): 359-470.
1	composition of liver histones in aging rat and mouse	Hepatic histone composition in aging rats and mice.
1	accumulation of lipofuscin age pigment in aging skeletal connective tissues as revealed by electron microscopy	Lapos; lipofuscin pigment accumulation; age of lipofuscin in aging connective skeletal tissue was revealed by electron microscopy.
1	aging and the passage of l tyrosine l dopa and inulin into mouse brain slices in vitro	Ageing and passage of tyrosine dopa and in vivo in vivo in mice brain slices.
1	fluid and crystallized intelligence in young adulthood and old age	In addition, it is important to keep in mind that it is not always easy to use.
1	an autopsy study of human axillary lymph node histology	The results of this study are summarized below.
1	breast cancer in women as a paradigm for ageing as a hidden syncarcinogenic factor	Breast Cancer in Women as a Paradigm of Aging as a Hidden Syncarcinogen.
1	fate of linoleic arachidonic and docosa 7 10 13 16 tetraenoic acids in rat testicles	Destination of l' arachidonic linoleum and docosa 7101316 tetraenoic acids in the testes of rats.
1	dependence of rates of lipolysis esterification and free fatty acid release in isolated fat cells on age cell size and nutritional state	The rates of esterification of lipolysis and release of free fatty acids in isolated fat cells depend on cell size; age and age; nutritional status.
1	studies on the compartmentation of lipid in adipose cells ii cholesterol accumulation and distribution in adipose tissue components	Lipid compartmentalization studies in fat cells ii Accumulation and distribution of cholesterol in fat tissue components.
1	glycosaminoglycans of brain during development	Brain developmental glycosaminoglycans.
1	a developmental study of the relationship between the protein components of rat cns myelin	A study of the development of the relationship between rat cortical myelin proteinaceous components.
1	age dependent utilization of phenylalanine for the synthesis of neuronal and glial proteins	Phenylalanine utilization vs. apos; age for glial and neuronal protein synthesis.
1	the occurrence of two types of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase activity in the main classes of nuclei obtained from the brains of infant and adult rats	The presence of two types of apos; apos activity; deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase in major nuclei from the brain of newborn and adult rats.
1	sequential patterns of circulating lh and fsh in female sheep during the early postnatal period effect of gonadectomy	Sequence patterns of lh and fsh circulating in female ewes in the early postnatal period of gonadectomy.
1	ultrastructural changes in human prepubertal prostatic epithelium grown in vitro	Ultrastructural changes in the prostatic prepubertal human epithelium, cultured in vitro.
1	effects of nicotine given into the brain of fowls	Nicotine effects in poultry brain.
1	effects of cholinomimetic agents given into the brain of fowls	Effects of cholinomimetic agents in poultry brain.
1	the effect of prostaglandin e2 on the arterial blood pressure of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	L' prostaglandin e2 effect on blood pressure in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
1	age related changes in isocitrate lyase from the free living nematode turbatrix aceti	Changes associated with turbotomatous free-living nematode isocitrate lyase; age.
1	aging isometric strength and endurance and cardiovascular responses to static effort	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of cardiovascular disease.
1	evolution of sleep spindles in childhood	It's the first time I've had the pleasure of being with you.
1	plasma lipid values and lipoprotein patterns during adolescence in boys	In addition, there is a need for additional data on the prevalence of the disease.
1	skeletal muscle lipids ii changes in phospholipid composition in man from fetal to middle age	Lipids from skeletal muscle ii modify the phospholipid composition of men from fetuses to adults; mean age.
1	skeletal muscle lipids 3 changes in fatty acid composition of individual phosphoglycerides in man from fetal to middle age	Skeletal muscle lipids 3 modify the individual phosphoglyceride fatty acid composition in the male fetus to fetus, at mid-age.
1	synthesis and turnover of cerebroside sulfate of myelin in adult and developing rat brain	Synthesis and renewal of myelin cerebroside sulfate in developing and adult rat brain.
1	age dependent changes on the state of aggregation of cartilage matrix	It is not possible to determine the age of the individual, but it is important to determine the age of the individual.
1	the effect of age upon the coagulation system	It is also important to note that there is no evidence that this is the case.
1	plasma testosterone and dihydrotestosterone in male rats during sexual maturation and following orchidectomy and experimental bilateral cryptorchidism	Plasma dihydrotestosterone and testosterone in male rats during sexual maturation and after orchidectomy and bilateral cryptorchidism.
1	human muscle fiber fine structure morphometric data on controls	Morphometric data on fine structure of human muscle fibers were obtained from control muscle fibers.
1	renal glutaminase in postnatal and adult rats	Glutaminase in adult and postnatal rats.
1	surgical sterilization by vasectomy and its effects on the structure and function of the testis in man	Vasectomy surgical sterilization and its effects on testicular structure and function in men.
1	effect of development and aging on the response of canine lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	Effect of Development and Aging on the Canine Lymphocyte Response to Phytohemagglutinin.
1	identity of maleate stimulated glutaminase with gamma glutamyl transpeptidase in rat kidney	L' maleate identity stimulated glutaminase with rat kidney gamma glutamyl transpeptidase.
1	the shape of the dental arch	Dental arches.
1	comparison of physiological responses of women and men to isometric exercise	Comparison of women's and men's physiological responses to exercise and isometric exercise.
1	aerobic power of females ages 10 to 68	Aerobic power for women aged 10-68.
1	a fine structural study of degenerative changes in the dorsal column nuclei of aging mice lack of protection by vitamin e	A fine structural study of the degenerative changes in dorsal column nuclei of aging mice is not protected by vitamin e.
1	significance of brain reactive antibodies in serum of aged mice	L' importance of reactive brain antibodies in old mouse serum.
1	changes with age in protein bound iodine pbi and body temperature in the mouse	It is not possible to determine the age of binding of the protein; it is not possible to determine the age of binding.
1	reaction and movement time as a function of age and physical activity level	Reaction time and motion are all related to age and level of physical activity.
1	similarities and differences between psychological deficit in aging and brain damage	Similarities and Differences between the Psychological Impairment of Aging and Brain Damage.
1	schwann cell internuclear distances in developing rat unmyelinated nerve fibers	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 34, 335-368.
1	the effects of age and liver disease on the disposition and elimination of diazepam in adult man	Effect of inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, inhalation, and other factors.
1	the effect of b cell immunosuppression on age related resistance of chickens to marek s disease	In the case of chicken, the test should be performed at the same time as the test and should be performed at the same time.
1	autoimmune human sperm antibodies and age in males	Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Antimicrobial Use in Males.
1	influence of age of ewe and photoperiod on the intervals between parturition and first oestrus in lactating and non lactating ewes at different nutritional levels	L' influence of age; age of ewe and photoperiod on parturition to first oestrus intervals in lactating and non-nursing ewes at different nutritional levels.
1	on the possibility that dna repair is related to age in non dividing cells	The possibility that the repair of the DNA is related to the apos; age in the nondivisional cells.
1	influence of age on the formation of 5alpha androstanediol and 7alpha hydroxy testosterone by incubated rat testes	L' influence of apos; age on 5alpha androstanediol and 7alpha hydroxy testosterone formation by incubated rat testes.
1	effect of age on kidney hyperplasia in the rat after unilateral nephrectomy	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of renal hyperplasia.
1	effect of age on kidney hyperplasia in the rat during cold acclimation	Acute gastrointestinal symptoms include fever, vomiting, vomiting, vomiting, vomiting, and diarrhea.
1	age changes in the dorsal and ventral lumbar nerve roots of dogs	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
1	cholinesterase che response and related mortality among birds fed che inhibitors	Cholinesterase was found to be associated with increased risk of lung cancer.
1	effect of age and long term diet on exocrine pancreas of the rat	Effect of age and long-term diet on rat exocrine pancreas.
1	normal ranges of hip motion in infants six weeks three months and six months of age	Lapos; normal hip movement amplitude in six-week, three-month and six-month infants.
1	age related changes in the incorporation of 14 c leucine into myofibrillar and sarcoplasmic proteins of red and white muscles of chicks	Changes related to apos; age in apos; leucine incorporation 14 c into chicks' red and white muscle sarcoplasmic and myofibrillar proteins.
1	abo blood groups age and work in ischaemic heart disease	Blood types are aging and working in ischemic heart disease.
1	a possible age related decrement in the conduction velocity of aplysia neuron r2	A possible decrease related to age; age of neuronal conduction velocity r2 in apos; apoliposis may be related to apos; age.
1	lack of increase in dna crosslinking in drosophila melanogaster with age	Drosophila melanogaster DNA increases with increasing age.
1	the effect of age on mitochondrial enzymes and respiration	Effect of Lapos; Age on Mitochondrial Enzymes and Respiration.
1	attitudes toward age an exploration in school age children	It is also important to note that there are a number of factors that contribute to this problem.
1	circadian oscillations in rodents a systematic increase of their frequency with age	Rodent circadian oscillations increased consistently with age.
1	variation with age and disease of an amyloid a protein related serum component	In addition, there are a number of other diseases, such as Alzheimer's, Alzheimer's, Alzheimer's, and Alzheimer's.
1	age related activity changes in arginine phosphokinase in the house fly musca domestic l	It is not possible to determine the age of the musked housefly, but it is important to determine the age of the musk.
1	influence of age on size and number of fat cells in the epididymal depot	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
1	effects of age and genotype on acquisition of an active avoidance response in mice	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	effect of age on liver function	The effect of age on the development of hepatic function was studied.
1	being single in old age	Single at an advanced age?
1	age related changes in a spontaneously reassociating fraction of mouse dna	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of genes, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
1	age dependent micronuclear deterioration in tetrahymena pyriformis syngen 1	Tetrahymena pyriformis syngen 1 micronuclear deterioration as a function of age.
1	studies on the synthesis and degradation of dna in developing and old chick cerebellum	Studies on apo synthesis and degradation; DNA in the cerebellum of old and developing chicks.
1	age related peculiarities of acetylation of rat liver nuclear histones	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
1	an estimate of the number of cells arising by division in mouse cerebral hemispheres from age one to 12 months an autoradiographic study of dna synthesis	Estimation of number of cells from division in cerebral hemispheres of mouse d'apos; 1-12 months, autoradiographic study of synthesis of DNA.
1	age and sex differences in behaviors mediated by the ventromedial hypothalamus	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with those of the other studies.
1	age differences in aversively motivated visual discrimination learning and retention in male sprague dawley rats	It is important to note, however, that there are differences between the sexes in terms of age, learning, and retention of visual discrimination.
1	perceptions of onsets of young adulthood middle age and old age	It is also important to note that there are a number of factors that contribute to these perceptions.
1	age involution in the normal human adult thymus	Age in normal adult human thymus.
1	an electron microscopic investigation of age dependent changes in the flight muscle of musca domestica l	Electron microscopic study of flight muscle age changes in musca domestica l.
1	light and electron microscopic studies on human temporal arteries with special reference to alterations related to senescence atherosclerosis and giant cell arteritis	Light and electron microscopy studies of human temporal arteries, particularly apos; senescent atherosclerosis and apos; giant cell arteritis.
1	engagement with an old theory	Commitment to some old-fashioned theory.
1	qualitative vocabulary test responses and age	The quality of the vocabulary tests both the answers and the age of the learner.
1	studies on immune competence in the rat changes with age sex and strain	Immune competence studies in rats change with age, gender and strain.
1	age differences in the speed of a spatial cognitive process	It's not the same thing, but it's the same thing.
1	macromolecular components of the vitelline membrane of hen s egg i membrane structure and its deterioration with age	Macromolecular components of the yolk membrane of hen eggs and their deterioration with age.
1	age dependence of heat induced strand separation of dna in situ in postmitotic cells of rat brain as revealed by acridine orange microfluorimetry	Acridine orange chromatography microfluorimetry revealed that in situ DNA strand separation in rat brain postmitotic cells was age dependent.
1	the influence of age on the distribution metabolism and excretion of methoxyflurane in fischer 344 rats a possible relationship to nephrotoxicity	In addition, there is no evidence that the metabolism of methoxyflurane is related to nephrotoxicity; however, there is evidence that it may be related to nephrotoxicity.
1	comparative studys on ages related changes in collagen structures of achilles and tail tendons in rats	Comparative studies of changes related to apos; age in collagen structure of achilles and tendons of the tail in rats.
1	changes in proteins of the human lens in development and aging	Changes in Human Lentil Proteins in Development and Aging.
1	age changes in the human frontozygomatic suture from 20 to 95 years	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
1	age related incidence of sclerotic glomeruli in human kidneys	The effect of sclerotial glomeruli in the human kidney as a function of age.
1	the influence of age on cardiac refractory periods in man	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the rate of heart attack.
1	effects of age and fasting on gluconeogenesis from glycerol in dogs	Effects of Apos; Age and Fasting on Gluconeogenesis from Glycerol in Dogs.
1	the effect of age on arterial alveolar nitrogen difference in normal adults	It is not possible to determine the age of the individual, but it is important to determine the age of the individual.
1	information processing limits the effects of information load and age	It is important to keep in mind that there are many different types of information that can be used.
1	age related changes in free plasma testosterone dihydrotestosterone and oestradiol	In addition, there were no changes in the age of the testosterone, and no changes in the age of the testosterone.
1	age related changes in the affinity of hemoglobin to oxygen in rabbits	It is not possible to determine the age of the rabbits, but it is important to determine the age of the rabbits.
1	age related and seasonal variations in the atpase system of mitochondria of skeletal muscles in rabbit	Seasonal and age-related changes in rabbit skeletal muscle mitochondrial atpase system.
1	age peculiarities in the effect of m and n cholinolytics on the activity of the epileptogenic zone in the rabbit hippocampus	Specificities of age; cholinolytic effect on appetite; epileptogenic activity in rabbit hippocampus.
1	sleep related penile tumescence as a function of age	Penile Tumescence related to sleep as a function of age.
1	age differences in learning immediate and one week delayed recall	In addition, it was not possible to determine the age of the participants.
1	serum 5alpha dihydrotestosterone and testosterone changes with age in man	In men, serum testosterone and 5alpha dihydrotestosterone change with age.
1	human adipose tissue in culture vi effect of age on cell size and lipolysis	Human adipose tissue in the culture system affects cell size and lipolysis.
1	age and changes in the thyroid gland of a he mice morphometric and histochemical studies	Age and thyroid gland changes d' a mouse from morphometric and histochemical studies.
1	immunologic cross reactivity between antisera to group a type 12 streptococcal cell membrane and human glomerular basement membrane the effect of age and carbohydrate content	Immunological cross-reactivity between the antisera to group a cell membrane type 12 streptococci and the human glomerular basement membrane, l' effect of age and carbohydrate content.
1	antipyrine metabolism in man influence of age alcohol caffeine and smoking	It's not the same as the other drugs, but it's the same thing.
1	biochemical variations in the matrix of human tendons in relation to age and pathological conditions	Biochemical variation of the human tendon matrix with age and pathological conditions.
1	gerontological and geriatric problems in stomatology 1 effects of age related physical changes on prosthetic therapy	Acute gastrointestinal tract infection is associated with the development of diabetes mellitus.
1	the effect of age on plasma levels of propranolol and practolol in man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	rat liver superoxide dismutase purification and age related modifications	The purification of superoxide dismutase from rat liver and changes related to the apos; age.
1	inulin clearance in the newborn infant relationship to gestational and postnatal age	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
1	cell types originating from kidney explants of young and old mice	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted to determine the nature of the disease.
1	plasma testosterone levels in c57bl 6j male mice effects of age and disease	Rates of plasma testosterone in male mice c57bl 6j Effects of apos; age and disease in the male mouse.
1	the collagenous and non collagenous protein of the canine intervertebral disc and their variation with age spinal level and breed	Canine intervertebral disc collagen and non-collagen protein and their variation with age, spine level and race.
1	changes in drug metabolism with increasing age 1 warfarin binding and plasma proteins	An increase in the amount of vitamin A in the body; a decrease in the amount of vitamin A in the body; a decrease in the amount of vitamin A in the body.
1	influence of age and starvation on po2 pco2 and haematocrit values in the rat	In addition, there was a slight increase in hematocrit and a slight decrease in hematocrit.
1	effect of sex age and cultivation time on number of satellites and acrocentric associations in man	It is important to note, however, that there are no data available on the number of satellites in the United States.
1	changes in the pituitary testicular system with age	Testicular pituitary system modified with age.
1	the lipids of human sciatic nerve by age group	Human sciatic nerve lipids by age group.
1	pituitary gonadal relations in infancy 2 patterns of serum gonadal steroid concentrations in man from birth to two years of age	In addition, there is a significant difference between males and females in terms of age, age, sex, and age.
1	the influence of age and sex on the metabolism of testosterone	In addition to the above, there are other factors that influence the metabolism of testosterone.
1	median age at onset of asthma and allergic rhinitis in tecumseh michigan	Age of onset of asthma, asthma and allergic rhinitis in the region.
1	human intelligence sex differences	It's called gender sensitivity.
1	age related changes in hepatic fine structure a quantitative analysis	Lapos-related changes; hepatic fine-structure age, quantitative analysis.
1	the effect of age on creatinine clearance in men a cross sectional and longitudinal study	Effect of Lapos; Age on Creatinine Clearance in Men, Cross-sectional and Longitudinal Study.
1	age differences in central perceptual processing a dichoptic backward masking investigation	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case, as it is not always the case.
1	paired associate learning in young and old adults as related to stimulus concreteness and presentation method	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the case if the learner is able to learn from them.
1	attitudinal predictors of devaluation of old age in a multigenerational sample	Attitudinal Predictors of Age Devaluation in a Multigenerational Sample.
1	social class and association membership an analysis of age graded and non age graded voluntary participation	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case, as it is not the case in the U.S. but the U.K.
1	age related secretion of androstenedione testosterone and dihydrotestosterone by the human testis	Apos secretion; androstenedione testosterone and apos-related dihydrotestosterone; age by human testes.
1	methodological problems in the determination of biological age	Biological age and methodological problems.
1	sexual behavior in higher age	She's sexually active at a much older age.
1	chronobiologic and inbred strain differences in blood hemoglobin of the mouse	Chronobiological and inbreeding differences in mouse hemoglobin.
1	age dependent changes in juvenile hormone esterase and general carboxyesterase activity in the hemolymph of the colorado potato beetle leptinotarsa decemlineata	Changes with age; juvenile and luteal esterase hormone; general apos carboxyesterase activity; beetle hemolymph leptinotarsa decemlineata.
1	transcutaneous measurements of age conditioned changes in the elasticity of the human common carotid artery	Transcutaneous measurements of age-dependent changes in elasticity; elasticity of elasticity; common human carotid artery were performed.
1	age related changes in the glycosidases of chick embryo eye tissues	Apos-related changes; ocular tissue glycosidase age; chick embryo.
1	relation to osteoporosis of age and hormone induced changes in the metabolism of collagen and bone	The relationship with age and hormones induced changes in bone and collagen metabolism.
1	hair cell loss as a function of age in the normal cochlea of the guinea pig	It is important to note that there are no data on the age of the normal pig population.
1	changes in ethanol consumption by c3h and cf1 mice with age	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
1	age related changes in the intact and sympathetically denervated gerbil pineal gland	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
1	effect of neonatal thymectomy on experimental subacute sclerosing panencephalitis in adult hamsters	Effect of neonatal thymectomy on subacute adult hamster sclerosing panencephalitis.
1	ontogeny of human cell mediated immunity age related variation of in vitro infantile lymphocyte transformation	It is not possible to determine the age of the child, but it may be possible to determine the age of the child.
1	age anxiety and self reported health	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	treatment of immature mice with gonadotrophins the influence of mouse age on the response of ovarian alkaline phosphatase activities to gonadotrophins	Treatment of immature mice with gonadotropins, the influence of apo; age of the mouse on the response of the ovarian alkaline phosphatase activities to gonadotropins.
1	age changes in rat vasomotor reflexes and sympathetic neuron ultrastructure following chemical sympathectomy	The results of this study are summarized in Appendix A. Changes in apo; age in vasomotor reflexes and apo; ultrastructure of rat sympathetic neurons after chemical sympathectomy.
1	age simulation in perceptual and cognitive functioning age progression to 80 years in a college sample	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	age differences in backward dichoptic masking	It is not possible to determine the age of the photograph.
1	age differences in evoked potential correlates of a memory scanning process	In addition, it is important to note that there are differences in the quality of the data collected.
1	age trends in human chiasma frequencies and recombination fractions i chiasma frequencies	The frequency of the chiasmata is determined by the frequency of the chiasmata and by the frequency of the chiasmata.
1	age related changes in cell surface antigens of preleukemic akr thymocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	age related chemical changes in human elastins from non atherosclerotic areas of thoracic aorta	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
1	age related changes in the lipid metabolism of fisher 344 rats	Changes in body weight, body weight, body weight, body weight, and body weight.
1	lifespan age changes and tumour incidence in an ageing c57bl mouse colony	Changes in lifespan and incidence of tumours in a colony of aging c57bl mice.
1	partial loss of cytoplasmic incompatibility with age in males of culex fatigans	Partial loss of abs; cytoplasmic incompatibility with abs; age of fateful culex males.
1	correlation between age arteriosclerosis and elastinolytic activity of human aorta wall	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors, including the age of the individual and the age of the individual.
1	age related changes in ouabain pharmacology ouabain exhibits a different volume of distribution in adult and young dogs	Changes in ouabain pharmacology with age Ouabain has a different distribution volume in young and adult dogs.
1	effect of age and sex on lung colony forming efficiency of injected mouse tumour cells	The effects of age and sex on the development of lung colonies of tumour cells from injected mice.
1	changes in developing behavior following prenatal administration of imipramine	Antimicrobial use of a drug or a combination of drugs.
1	an x ray diffraction investigation of age related changes in the crystal structure of bone apatite	X-ray diffraction study of apo-related changes; age in apo crystal structure; bone apatite.
1	serum immunoreactive corticotrophin and response to metyrapone in old age in man	Serum immunoreactive corticotropin and metyrapone response in aging of men.
1	maturational changes of amino acid concentration in cerebrospinal fluid of the rat	Changes in Maturation of Dapos Concentration; amino acids in rat cerebrospinal fluid.
1	absence of low molecular weight alpha crystallin in nuclear region of old human lenses	Absence of low molecular weight alpha crystals in old human lens nuclear region.
1	sex ratio sex change and natural selection	Changing Sex Relationships and Natural Selection.
1	breast parenchymal patterns and their changes with age	Breast parenchyma and changes in the breast with age.
1	age dependence of the biosynthesis of intercellular matrix macromolecules of rabbit aorta in organ culture and cell culture	The biosynthesis of rabbit extracellular matrix macromolecules in organic culture and cell culture is age dependent.
1	age changes in the structure of adenohypophysical gonadotropocytes and hypothalamic arcuate nucleus neurocytes	Changes in apo; age in hypothalamic arcuate neurocyte and adenohypophysical gonadotropocyte structure.
1	age differences in the effects of palatability of diet on regulation of calorie intake and body weight of rats	Differences in age in dietary palatability effects on diet regulation; caloric intake and rat body weight.
1	vascular adenylate cyclase role of age and guanine nucleotide activation	Role of age and age; activation of guanine nucleotides in the vascular epos; adenylate cyclase.
1	the significance of age in the colposcopic evaluation of women with atypical apanicolaou smears	It is important to note that this is not the case for women who have a Pap smear, but rather for women who have a Pap smear.
1	attack like schizophrenia with a progressive course and profound long term remissions in old age	Attack like schizophrenia, with progressive progression and long-term deep remission into old age.
1	the effect of age on the ultrastructure of the mid gut cells of the hymenopteran nasonia vitripennis walk hymenoptera pteromalidae	L' effect of apos; age on apos; ultrastructure of midgut l&apos cells; hymenoptera nasonia vitripennis, pteromalid hymenoptera.
1	tachyarrhythmias in old age	Old people's Tachyarrhythmia.
1	physiology of aging metabolic changes during the climacteric and menopausal periods	The physiology of metabolic changes during aging in both the climacterial and the menopausal periods.
1	modification of the adrenal stress response by age and prior experience	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
1	age differences in learning and memory on a digit symbol substitution task	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with the results of the study.
1	age and tachistoscopic perception	Age and Tachistoscopic Perception.
1	age related increase of cuticle permeability in the nematode caenorhabditis briggsae	Apos-related increase; age of cuticular permeability in caenorhabditis briggsae nematode.
1	the effect of age on the speed of sentence formation and incidental learning	It is also important to remember that there is no such thing as an apprenticeship.
1	differences in the sequential integration of form as a function of age and interstimulus interval	In addition to the above, there are a number of factors that may affect the quality of the product, such as the quality of the product.
1	speed and age multiple rates of age decline	It is important to note, however, that the rate of increase in age is not insignificant.
1	age associated structural alterations in senescent mouse brain dna	In addition, there are a number of other genetic factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
1	age related changes in the proteolytic enzymes of mammalian lens	Changes in mammalian lens proteolytic enzymes with age.
1	prolactin release in response to blockade of dopaminergic receptors and to trh injection in developing and adult rats role of estrogen in determining sex differences	Release of prolactin in response to dopaminergic receptor blockade and injection into adult and developing rats plays a role in determining sexual differences.
1	morphological changes in prolactin cells of male rats after testosterone administration	Morphological changes in male rat prolactin cells following testosterone administration.
1	neonatal treatment with sex steroids relationship between the uterotropic response and the estrogen receptor in prepubertal rats	Canadian Journal of Public Health and Public Health, 3(2), pp. 1–25.
1	effect of a periodic growth retarding diet on changes with age in the hypothalamo hypophyseo adrenal system	Effect of periodic growth retardation on changes with apo; hypothalamic hypophysial system age-adrenalin.
1	tail carriage in baboons papio cynocephalus relationship to dominance rank and age	Tail transport in papio cynocephalus baboons was found to be related to dominance rank and age.
1	age and transformation dynamics of rectal vains and their alteration during hemorrhoid development	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 34, 335-364. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/pubs/index_e.html.
1	age related changes in the flight muscle mitochondria from the blowfly sarcophaga bullata	Apos-related changes; mitochondrial age of flight muscles of the midge fly sarcophaga bullata.
1	the effect of practice on age differences in central perceptual processing	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the case.
1	methodologic differences and measurement of cup disc ratio an epidemiologic assessment	Methodological Differences and Measurement of Record Cut Ratio Epidemiological Assessment.
1	changes in the structure of the wall of the human thoracic duct in relation to atherosclerosis and age	Changes in human chest canal wall structure related to apos; atherosclerosis and apos; age.
1	age related changes in the free amino acid pool of rat lens	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the gene pool.
1	changes in the nuclear volume of rat hypothalamic neurons in old age	Changes in hypothalamic neuron nuclear volume in aging rats.
1	age related change in pituitary threshold for tsh release during thyroxine replacement therapy for cretinism	Changes related to l' age of pituitary threshold for release of tsh during replacement treatment of thyroxine for cretinism.
1	enhanced activity of hormone sensitive adenylate cyclase during dietary restriction in the rat dependence on age and relation to cell size	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	effects of age strain and illumination intensity on activity and self selection of light dark schedules in mice	It is important to note that there are many factors that influence the quality of the product, such as the quality of the product, the quality of the product, and the quality of the product.
1	pore size measurements and some age related changes in human alveolar bone and rat femur	Measurements of the size of the pores and changes related to them; age in the human alveolar bones and the femur.
1	phosphoglycerate kinase from young and old turbatrix aceti	The phosphoglycerate kinase of old and young aceti turbatrix aceti turbatrix.
1	primary hyperlipoproteinemia and cardiovascular diseases in relation to age	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors.
1	age related changes of ballistocardiogram in healthy persons	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	changes in 80s ribosomes from drosophila melanogaster with age	Modification of the 1980s ribosomes of melanogaster drosophila with apos; age.
1	on the age associated presence of immunoglobulin and complement in the renal glomeruli of mice	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	the old man as woman detecting stereotypes of aged men with a femininity scale	The old man, as a woman, detects stereotypes of older men on a femininity scale.
1	allograft rejection in larval and adult xenopus following early thymectomy	Rejection of eggs; allografts in the adult and larval xenopterus following removal of eggs; early thymectomy.
1	chromosomes in old age a six year longitudinal study	Chromosomes in Aging a six-year longitudinal study.
1	lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin age related effects	Lymphocyte reactions to apos-related effects; phytohemagglutinin age.
1	age related variation in lymphocyte subpopulations	Cervical cancer is a major cause of death for people who have cancer.
1	changes depend on age in electromyogram studies about parameter of motor unit action potentials in normal subjects of different age author s transl	The changes are dependent on the age of the individual; the age of the individual; the electromyogram of the parameter of the potential of the individual; the action of the motor units in normal subjects of different ages.
1	age dependent changes of biosynthesis of proteins author s transl	Changes in protein synthesis among authors; translational age.
1	age related decrement in hearing for speech sampling and longitudinal studies	It's a good way to get a sense of what's going on and what's not.
1	a relationship between functional age and health status in female subjects	Health status of women in Canada: a review of the literature.
1	cautiousness in adulthood as a function of age and instructions	It is important to keep in mind that this is not always the case.
1	age differences in humor comprehension and appreciation in old age	It's a good idea to have a little bit of fun, but it's good to have a little fun.
1	variations in fluorescence characteristics of intact human crystalline lens segments as a function of age	Variation of the fluorescence characteristics of the segments of the intact human lens with respect to age.
1	attitudes toward aging as a function of in service training and practitioner age	It is important to note that the data are not available for the purposes of this study, but rather for the purposes of comparison.
1	age related change in the neuronal microenvironment penetration of ruthenium red into extracellular space of brain in young adult and senescent rats	Apos-related change; age of ruthenium red penetration into apos; extracellular brain space in neural microenvironment in young adult and senescing rats.
1	free radical theory of aging effect of age sex and dietary precursors on rat brain docosahexanoic acid	Theory of free radicals of the apos; effect of aging of sex and of food precursors on the apos; brain docosahexaenoic acid of the rat.
1	the influence of age and drugs on the thermoregulatory behaviour of rats	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States.
1	age related changes in t cell function	In addition, there are a number of other factors that affect the function of t-cells.
1	the relation between physician and patient age in family practice	The relationship between the age of the doctor and that of the patient in family practice.
1	cadmium in liver kidney and hair of humans fetal through old age	The Canadian Lung Association (CLSA) is a non-profit, non-profit organization that promotes the development and use of the Lung Association.
1	age related changes of accuracy and efficiency of protein synthesis machinery in rat	Changes in precision and dosage; effectiveness of the mechanism of protein synthesis in relation to dosage; age in the rat.
1	age changes in the allosteric properties of brain acetylcholinesterase	Cerebral acetylcholinesterase (CCE) is a neurodegenerative disorder.
1	the age dependent decrease in creatine kinase and aldolase activities in human striated muscle is not caused by an accumulation of faulty proteins	The decrease in muscle protein; creatine kinase and aldolase activity in human stripe muscle as a function of age is not due to defective protein accumulation.
1	epithelial tumor like changes precancerous conditions and skin neoplasms standardization study	Epithelial tumours such as precancerous changes and neoplasms of the skin study of standardization of neoplasms of the skin.
1	induced pku in rats effects of age and melatonin treatment	In rats, pku induces the effects of melatonin treatment and age.
1	age related changes in the hepatic endoplasmic reticulum a quantitative analysis	Changes Associated with Lapos; Hepatic Endoplasmic Reticulum Age, Quantitative Analysis.
1	age dependent differences of distribution and clearance patterns in normal rihsa cisternograms	It is not possible to determine the age of the fish, but it is important to determine the age of the fish.
1	active and passive avoidance in rats as a function of age	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects.
1	biochemical changes in the central nervous system with age in the rat	In addition, there is no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system.
1	the effect of criterion level on the acquisition and retention of a 1 way avoidance response in young and old rats	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	influence of age on the plasma hormonal iodine response to thyrotropin injection in young calves	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the immune system.
1	age difference of bone collagen in hydrolysis by streptomyces griseus protease	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
1	histological and electrophysiological changes of the lower motor neurone with aging	Histological and Electrophysiological Changes in the Lower Motor Neuron with Ageing.
1	age and changes in the activity of several energy metabolism enzymes in the rabbit aorta	It is important to note, however, that there are no data on the activity of various enzymes in rabbit aorta.
1	a comparison of fat absorption in young and old subjects	In addition to the above, there were no significant differences between the two groups.
1	the influence of age onthe sensitivity of the cornea	Apos; influence of apos; age on apos; influence of apos; age on corneal sensitivity to apos; corneal aspect can also play a role in apos; corneal establishment.
1	physiological characteristics of a champion runner age 77	He is also a professional cyclist, a 77-year-old running champion.
1	developmental analysis of human figure drawings in adolescence young adulthood and middle age	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	age dependent distribution of isoamylases in human parotid saliva	Human parotid saliva isoamylase distribution as a function of age.
1	effect of age of non skin tissues on susceptibility of skin grafts to 7 12 dimethylbenz alpha anthracene dmba carcinogenesis in balb c mice and effect of age of skin graft on susceptibility of surrounding recipient skin to dmba	Effect of apos; age of non-dermal tissue on skin graft susceptibility to 712 anthracene dmba dimethylbenz alpha carcinogenesis in Berber mice and effect of apos; age of skin graft on surrounding skin susceptibility to dmba.
1	glycemic response to 24 hour fast in normal children iii influence of age	Age is influenced by the glycemic response to a 24-hour fast in normal children.
1	age related changes in the effect of electroconvulsive shock ecs on the in vivo hydroxylation of tyrosine and tryptophan in rat brain	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence that tyrosine and tryptophan can be used as a substitute for other drugs.
1	influence of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two steroid anesthetics in rats	Impact of age and sex on acute toxicity of two steroidal anaesthetics in rat.
1	alterations in fecal microflora enzymes related to diet age lactobacillus supplements and dimethylhydrazine	Changes in the enzymes of the fecal microflora related to dietary supplements of lactobacilli and dimethylhydrazine.
1	influence of gonadal hormones and age on 1 2 dimethylhydrazine induced colon carcinogenesis	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	age dependence of nuclear rna processing	Nuclear treatment depends on age.
1	relation between smoking and age of natural menopause report from the boston collaborative drug surveillance program boston university medical center	Report on the Relationship Between Smoking and Alcohol; Age of Natural Menopause at Boston University Medical Center, Boston Cooperative Drug Surveillance Program.
1	immunogenicity of cows milk in man influence of age and of disease on serum antibodies to five cows milk proteins	For example, a cow's milk may be used as a substitute for a cow's milk, or it may be used as a substitute for a cow's milk.
1	hla antigens in different age groups	It's a good way to get a feel for people.
1	gamma glutamyltranspeptidase activity in newborn rat kidney brush border	L' γ-glutamyltranspeptidase activity in the brush border of the rat kidney again @-@.
1	genetic and non genetic effects on plasma lh concentrations in lambs at 4 and 8 weeks of age	Genetic and non-genetic effects on lh plasma concentrations in 4- and 8-week-old lambs.
1	functional capability of 68 year old people in the town of jyv skyl	Functional capacity of 68-year-olds in Jyv Skyl.
1	on the problem of so called ulcer in the old age author s transl	In addition, it is important to note that there is no such thing as an old-age translation.
1	perception of exertion in the elderly effects of aging mode of exercise and physical training	The effects of aging, exercise and exercise; the effects of physical training on the perception of readiness; and the effects of exercise on seniors.
1	eye tracking in relation to age sex and illness	E-mail: e-mail@ec.gc.ca Website: http://www.ec.gc.ca/english/e-mail/e-mail.html.
1	relationship between diazepam dose plasma level age and central nervous system depression	In addition, the dose of diazepam may be increased by the amount of diazepam.
1	interactive effects of age and brain disease on reaction time	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
1	cyclophosphamide induced sensitivity against avian rna myeloblastosis virus in age resistant hosts	Cyclophosphamide induced sensitivity to avian influenza virus in age-resistant hosts.
1	motion sickness susceptibility and related behavioral characteristics in men and women	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety, Health Canada.
1	age and the perception of incomplete figures	Age and Perceived Incomplete Numbers.
1	growing up and growing old the politics of age exclusion	As we grew older and older, the policy of excluding older people from the labour market became more and more pronounced.
1	age changes in alcian blue staining of glycosaminoglycans in sheep articular cartilage	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
1	gene expression of a region of chromosome 17 during murine spermatogenesis	A region of chromosome 17 during spermatogenesis in mice.
1	neutrophilic turnover rate in human age groups evaluated by serum lysozyme activity	Rate of neutrophil turnover in groups of animals; age of humans as measured by age; serum lysozyme activity.
1	changes of dna ligase in developing rat brain	Changes in Ligase of Apos; DNA in Developing Rat Brain.
1	replication of age and physical activity effects on reaction and movement time	The results of this study are presented in Appendix A. Reproduction of effects of age and weight; physical activity on reaction and time of movement.
1	age related changes in the motor nerve conduction velocity in dogs	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
1	factors influencing sexual performance in male rhesus monkeys	Factors Affecting Sexual Performance in Male Rhesus Monkeys.
1	gout in the age author s transl	Drop at l'apos; Age of Translation of L' Author.
1	systolic periods in dependence of age	Systolic dependency periods; age; age; age.
1	on molecular biology of aging 11th communication enzyme adaptation age author s transl	On the Molecular Biology of Aging 11 adaptation of communication enzymes transl.
1	longitudinal force and stress of rat s esophagus age related changes	Rat esophagus and longitudinal force and stress vary with age.
1	interactive effects of age and cerebral disease on cognitive performances	Cognitive health is a key determinant of the health status of Canadians.
1	age associated glycopeptide pigment in human costal cartilage	Glycopeptide Pigment Associated with L' Age in the Cartilage Costal Human.
1	dependence of diverticulosis on age author s transl	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States.
1	age changes of the human optic nerve head a neurohistologic study	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the field of neuropsychology.
1	age dependent change in the ability of protein synthesis by rat liver microsomes significance of 2 associated factors	Apos-dependent change; age in protein-synthesizing capacity of rat liver microsomes, meaning 2 associated factors.
1	age related changes in responsiveness of rat leydig cells to hcg	Changes in rat leydig cell responsiveness to hcg as a function of age.
1	effect of age on thickness of adult patellar articular cartilage	Effect of apos; age on apos; thickness of patellar articular cartilage.
1	lupus erythematodes visceralis and age part 1 lupus erythematodes visceralis as model of an autoimmune process and its relationship to age with special reference to antinuclear factors in different age groups	Lupus erythematodes visceralis and lupus erythematodes visceralis of part 1 of l' age as models d' an auto process-immune and its relation to l' age, with a special reference to the anti-nuclear factors in different groups of d' age.
1	tbg dependency of age related variations of thyroxine and triiodothyronine	Tbg dependence of triiodothyronine and thyroxine changes related to apos; age.
1	effect of age on collagen fibril formation	Effect of Apos; Age on Collagen Fibril Formation.
1	collagen age and platelet aggregation	Age of Collagen and Platelet Aggregation.
1	age differences in personality structure revisited studies in validity stability and change	Stability and change in validity studies have been re-examined because of differences in age in personality structure.
1	comparison by autoradiography of macromolecular biosynthesis in young and old human diploid fibroblast cultures a brief note	Autoradiography Comparison of Macromolecular Biosynthesis in Young and Old Human Diploid Fibroblast Cultures, a brief note.
1	age related changes in protein turnover and ribonucleic acid of the diaphragm muscle of normal and dystrophic hamsters	In addition, there was a significant increase in the number of patients who had not been treated with dibutyl phthalate.
1	immunosurveillance and cancer epidemiologic observations	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	age related changes in chromatin of liver cell nuclei of different ploidity	Changes related to apo; chromatin age of ploidy-different liver cell nuclei.
1	dependence of age and cell mediated immunity by newborn and adult children author s transl	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of infection, which can lead to the death of the child.
1	image processing in pathology iv age dependent changes of morphometric features of liver cell nuclei in biopsies	Apo treatment; apo-dependent pathology iv image; age changes in hepatic cell nucleus morphometric characteristics in biopsies.
1	effects of age sex and starvation on the turnover of plasma liver and breast muscle proteins in the japanese quail	Effects of sex and fasting on the renewal of liver plasma proteins and breast muscles in Japanese quail.
1	historical aspects of suicide in the old age author s transl	Translation of Historical Aspects of Suicide Among Older Authors.
1	causes motivations and tendencies of suicidal acts in old age author s transl	The study found that suicide is a major cause of death among older adults.
1	social psychological aspects of suicide in the old age author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	physiological age of the fleas and the analysis of age structure of natural population of xenopsylla gerbilli wagn	L' physiological age of fleas and fleas; analysis of natural xenopsylla gererbilli wagnagnagn.
1	age dependent distribution of acidic glycosaminoglycans in human kidney tissue	Distribution of glycosaminoglycans by age in the human kidney.
1	effect of age on nodule induction by azaserine and dna synthesis in rat pancreas	The effects of the drug; age; induction of the nodules by synthesis of the drug; azoserine and l' DNA in the rat pancreas.
1	age related decline in receptivity in normal neonatally androgenized female and male hamsters	Reduced receptivity associated with neonatal androgenated male and female hamsters.
1	the effect of age on the safety factor in neuromuscular transmission in the isolated diaphragm of the rat	Lapos; effect of age on neuromuscular transmission safety factor in isolated rat diaphragm.
1	age related changes in the lipids of the microsomal and the mitochondrial membranes of rat liver and kidney	Changes related to apos; age in rat kidney and liver mitochondrial and microsomal membrane lipids are related to age.
1	gross histomorphological and histochemical changes in thyroid gland of goat with age ii occurrence of ultimobranchial follicles	Significant histomorphological and histochemical changes in the goat thyroid gland with age II are also observed in the ultimobranchial follicles.
1	karyometric changes in human muscle with age	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - Acute and chronic conditions of the body.
1	tolerance induction as an index of age related changes	It is important to note that there are no data on the prevalence of diabetes in Canada.
1	age related differences in binding of concanavalin a to plasma membranes of isolated neurons	Age-related differences in concanavalin a binding to isolated neuronal plasma membranes were observed.
1	age and sexual behavior of japanese macaques macaca fuscata	Age and sexual behaviour of Japanese macaca fuscata monkeys.
1	the age dependence of bile acid metabolism in rats	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the metabolism of bile acids in rats.
1	age dependent changes of the protein synthetic machinery of liver cell cytoplasm as revealed by electron microscopic morphometry	L'apos-dependent changes; age of the electron-microscopic morphometric machinery for synthesis of hepatic cytoplasmic proteins.
1	age dependent metabolism and polymerisation of collagen author s transl	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
1	warfarin sodium steady state plasma levels and patient age	Patient's stable plasma level of warfarin sodium and age.
1	development of plasma cortisol in calves from birth to 14 days of age	Plasma cortisol development in calves from birth to age 14 days.
1	age at puberty in relation to age at marriage and parenthood a national longitudinal study	Age at puberty vs. age at puberty vs. age at marriage vs. age at paternity or maternity is a national longitudinal study.
1	variations in melanin content with age in the human substantia nigra	In human substance, melanin varies with age.
1	age dependent changes in the activities of atpase and some pyridine nucleotide linked enzymes in the chick testis	Enzyme activities associated with apos, atpase, and certain pyridine nucleotides change with age in chick testis.
1	prolactin cells of the human pituitary gland in old age	It is the most common type of hypophysectomy.
1	persistence of complementary afterimages as a function of adult age and exposure duration	Canadian Journal of Public Health 1996; 29(3): 65–79.
1	differences in unconspicuous word identification as a function of age and reversible figure training	In this case, it is not necessary to use the words in conjunction with the words in the text.
1	aging and semantic memory structural age differences	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with the results of the study.
1	the possible use of sociological onsets in theory on the problem of age and surroundings author s transl	In addition, it is not possible for the authors to use the data in a way that would allow them to be used in a way that would allow them to do so.
1	factors influencing diazepam pharmacokinetics age sex and liver disease	Factors Influencing the Pharmacokinetics of Diazepam by Gender and Liver Disease.
1	thyroid hormone concentrations in a large scale community survey effect of age sex illness and medication	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those of the previous study, and that the results are consistent with those of the previous study.
1	the effects of age and sex on the acute toxicity of two barbiturate anesthetics in rats	Age and sex effects on acute toxicity of two barbiturate anesthetics in rats.
1	age changes in the quantity of hematopoietic tissue	The results of this study are summarized below.
1	age differences in short term memory and cell loss in the cortex of the rat	Differences in age in short-term memory and rat cortical cell loss.
1	tissue specificity and age changes for the pattern of the h1 group of histones in chromatin from mouse tissues	Tissue specificity and changes in age of mouse tissue chromatin pattern h1 d' histones change.
1	distribution of monoamine oxidase in hippocampal region of the rat	Monoamine oxidase distribution in the hippocampal region of the rat.
1	age differences in verbal mediation a structural and functional analysis	It is important to note that there are differences between the two types of mediation.
1	age differences in a controlled lag recognition memory task	It's not the same as the one you're looking for.
1	instrumentality terminality values in relation to age	The values of l' terminality instrumentality; age.
1	interactions between age and the neuroendocrine and immune systems	The effects of a drug on a person's immune system.
1	a comparison of general and age specific factors associated with political behavior	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the case.
1	age rate and instructional conditions empirical support against the pacing variable	It is also important to note that there is a need for more research on the determinants of health.
1	adult age differences in cognitive abilities and educational background	It is also important to note that there are differences between the sexes in terms of educational attainment and cognitive ability.
1	age characteristics of dna replication in regenerating rat liver	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	effects of age and stimulus intensity of the far field auditory brain stem potentials in the laboratory mouse	Effects of age; age and age; intensity of long-field stimulation of auditory cerebral potentials in laboratory mice.
1	changes in the plasma clearance and protein binding of carbenoxolone with age and their possible relationship with adverse drug effects	Changes in carbenoxolone plasma clearance and protein binding with age and possible association with adverse drug reactions.
1	trials of influenza a new jersey 76 virus vaccine in normal children an overview of age related antigenicity and reactogenicity	Vaccines should be made available to children at all stages of life and should be made available to children at all stages of life.
1	age changes in the perception of comfortable mandibular occlusal positions	It is important to note, however, that this is not always the case.
1	the significance of age changes in human alveolar mucosa and bone	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	histochemical and biochemical changes in human skeletal muscle with age in sedentary males age 22 65 years	Histochemical and biochemical alterations of human skeletal muscle with lacidosis; age of sedentary males aged 22-65.
1	work capacity in women in relation to age as judged from a maximal work performance test	Women's ability to work compared to men's ability to work was assessed using a test of their ability to work.
1	creative productivity age and stress a biographical time series analysis of 10 classical composers	This is the first time in the history of the music industry that the music industry has made a significant contribution to the development of the music industry.
1	vitamin d hydroxylation in youth and old age	Vitamin D hydroxylation for young and old.
1	age dependent increase in the non specific cholinesterase activity of the capillaries in the rat neostriatum	Capillary nonspecific cholinesterase activity in rat neostriatum.
1	hair analysis of trace minerals in human subjects as influenced by age sex and contraceptive drugs	Mineral trace analysis of human subjects' hair is influenced by age, sex and contraceptives.
1	the role of memory in the age decline in digit symbol substitution performance	The Role of Memory in the Decline of Age in the Replacement Performance of the Digital Symbol.
1	orienting task effects on edr and free recall in three age groups	It is important to note, however, that this is not necessarily the case.
1	hepatitis b virus infections among danish dentists	Hepatitis B in Danish dentists.
1	age related differences in the disposition of acetanilide	Age in dosage form; acetanilide.
1	effects of age diet and lactation on lipogenesis in rat adipose liver and mammary tissues	Effects of Diet and Lactation on Lipogenesis in Rat Fat Liver and Breast Tissues.
1	the effect of age on neuromuscular transmission	It is important to note that there is no evidence that this is the case.
1	structural and replicative forms of mitochondrial dna from human leukocytes in relation to age	The genetic makeup of the human leukocyte is the same as that of the other leukocytes.
1	age dependent alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity changes in mutant and wild type drosophila melanogaster	The mutant and the wild-type drosophila melanogaster were found to be very susceptible to the effects of phenylphenol.
1	influence of age on the immunological activity and capacity of the cba mouse	The results of this study are presented in Appendix A to this report.
1	limits of several cell nucleus reactions in old age and in the presence of a pathological process	In addition, the cell nucleus is the nucleus of the cell and the nucleus is the nucleus of the cell.
1	burned out schizophrenia evidence for age effects on schizophrenic symptomatology	The evidence of schizophrenia for the effects of age on the development of symptoms of schizophrenia has disappeared.
1	cardiovascular disease and changes in intellectual functioning from middle to old age	Cardiovascular diseases and changes in the state of the brain between the middle and the end of life.
1	endogenous steroid levels in the human prostate from birth to old age a comparison of normal and diseased tissues	Human prostate endogenous steroid levels from birth to old age; comparison of normal and diseased tissues.
1	description of age depending cellular changes in the human tonsil	It is important to note that there are many factors that affect the quality of life of Canadians.
1	sex and generational differences in senior apperception technique projections	It is important to note that the results of this study are not the same as those of the previous study.
1	metacarpal morphometry in monozygotic dizygotic elderly twins	"""Metalacarpal morphometry in monozygotic dizygotic old-age twins"", JAMA, J.A. et al."
1	subsynaptic plate perforations changes with age and experience in the rat	With age and age, the perforations of subsynaptic plaques change with the rat experiment.
1	effect of age on acute morphine response in the rat	Acute response to morphine in rats.
1	visual short term memory response delay and age	Short-term visual memory response and age.
1	serum magnesium circadian rhythm in human adults with respect to age sex and mental status	Age, sex, and mental state of the individual; age, sex, and mental state of the individual.
1	the role of the adenohypophysis in connection with changes in the thyroid caused by old age author s transl	The Role of the Apos; Adenohypophysis in Relation to Thyroid Changes Caused by Ageing of the Apos; transl.
1	a modification of the gompertz plot resulting from the age index by ries and an approximation of the survivorship curve author s transl	A modification of the graph of gompertz resulting from the apos index; age by age and an approximation of the translation of the survival curve by the authors.
1	prenatal diagnosis a psychological study ii pregnancy after the age of 40 author s transl	Pre-natal diagnosis, psychological study, post-natal care, post-natal care, post-natal care.
1	age related dynamics of outpatient forms of schizophrenia on the age related dynamics of so called latent schizophrenia in light of late catamneses in senescence	Dynamics related to apo; age of external forms of schizophrenia on dynamics related to apo; age of what is called latent light schizophrenia of late senescence catamnesia.
1	a quantitative study of peripheral nerve fibres in the mouse following the administration of drugs 1 age changes in untreated cba mice from 3 to 21 months of age	A quantitative study of peripheral nerve fibers in mice after dosing; drug administration; age of 3 to 21 months in untreated cba mice.
1	age related changes in the composition and structure of human articular cartilage proteoglycans	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	effect of age on amnesia and sedation induced by flunitrazepam during local anaesthesia for bronchoscopy	Effect of apos; age on apos; flunitrazepam-induced amnesia and sedation during apos; local anesthesia for bronchoscopy.
1	age associated changes in microvasculature of human adult testis	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support this assessment.
1	an unusual sex steroid binding protein in mature male rat liver cytosol	An unusual protein that binds the sex steroids in rat liver cytosol.
1	lipolytic response of rat adipocytes to epinephrine effect of age and cell size	Epinephrine, epinephrine, age and cell size, epinephrine, epinephrine, epinephrine, epinephrine.
1	problem solving as a function of age sex and the role appropriateness of the problem content	Problem-solving based on gender; age and sex; relevance of problem content.
1	genitourinary disorders of old age therapeutic considerations including counseling for sexual dysfunction	It is important that you have a good understanding of what you are trying to do and what you are trying to do.
1	some age related changes in pituitary adrenal function in the male laboratory rat	Pituitary adrenal function changes associated with apos; age in male laboratory rat.
1	changes in coagulation effects by venoms of crotalus atrox as snakes age	Modification of the effects of coagulation by atrox rattlesnakes as they age.
1	colonization of teeth in humans by streptococcus mutans as related to its concentration in saliva and host age	Human colonization of the teeth by streptococcus mutans is related to its concentration in the saliva and to the age of the host.
1	age related susceptibility to pseudomonas aeruginosa ocular infections in mice	Infections caused by Pseudomonas aeruginosa in the eye of mice as a function of age.
1	endothelial cell population changes of human cornea during life	Changes in the population of the endothelial cells of the human cornea over a lifetime.
1	age changes in the triangular fibrocartilage of the wrist joint	Changes in weight; age in wrist joint; triangular fibrocartilage.
1	the relationship between brain weight and head circumference from birth to age 18 years	Birth-to-birth ratio of brain weight to circumference; age 18 years.
1	the motor activity as an age parameter of the rat authors transl	It is important to note that there are no data on the age of the authors of the translated rat.
1	the effect of age on the distensibility of the abdominal aorta of man	It's a good idea to try to make it easy for people to get to know each other and to know each other better.
1	the tensile strength of human zonule and its alteration with age author s transl	The use of the human zonulum and its alteration with the age of the translation of the text.
1	structural basis for the changing physical properties of human pulmonary vessels with age	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
1	perinatal methadone exposure and its influence on the behavioral ontogeny of rats	The effects of methadone on the immune system and on the immune system.
1	variation of chemical composition with age in human femoral head cartilage	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the age of the human head.
1	age related changes in cholesterol and bile acid metabolism in rats	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
1	isoelectric spectra of liver tissue and blood serum albumin for rabbits of different age	Hepatic isoelectric tissue spectrum and serum albumin in rabbits of different ages.
1	are loss of glistening of normal colour and increased friability normal aspects of the oesophagus in old age author s transl	Loss of l' brightness of normal color and increase in friability of normal appearance of l' esophagus in older authors' translations.
1	an investigation into the variation of human contrast sensitivity with age and ocular pathology	A study of the sensitivity of human contrasts as a function of their age and of their ocular pathology.
1	a histologic study of age changes in the adult human periodontal joint ligament	A Histological Study of Changes in Age in the Adult Human Periodontal Joint Ligament.
1	dystrophic mice show age related muscle fibre and myelinated axon losses	Dystrophic mice showed loss of muscle fibers and of myelinated axons related to age.
1	influence of age on metal metabolism and toxicity	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
1	changes in igg2 levels with age in british cattle	For example, it is not possible to determine the age of the individual.
1	effect of age cardiovascular disease and vasomotor changes on transmission of arterial pressure waves through the lower extremities	Effect of cardiovascular disease and stroke vasomotor changes; age on lower limb blood pressure transmission.
1	age associated pathological changes in male rats	American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition.
1	age related changes of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats	Glomerular basement membrane changes associated with apos; age in normal rats.
1	quantitative estimation of age related thickening of glomerular basement membrane in normal rats	Quantitative estimation of apos; thickening associated with apos; age of normal rat glomerular basement membrane.
1	brake reaction time effects of age sex and carbon monoxide	Effects on Gender Brake Reaction Time of Age and Carbon Monoxide.
1	autoradiographic demonstration of dna repair synthesis in ganglion cells of aquarium fish at various age in vivo	Autoradiography demonstrates repair synthesis of DNA in fish ganglion cells; aquarium at various ages in vivo.
1	preparing for old age necessity possibilities contents limits	Preparing for the necessities of old limits the content of possibilities.
1	age and familiarity in memory scanning	It's a good way to learn more about a person's history.
1	differences and changes with age in the benton visual retention test	It is not possible to determine the age of the benton, but it is possible to determine the age of the benton.
1	eeg changes in old age normal and pathological	Eighteen years of age are the age of the elderly.
1	changes in the sensitivity of dopamine receptors in the nucleus accumbens and in the striatum induced by chronic ethanol administration	Changes in nucleus accumbens and striatum dopaminergic receptor sensitivity induced by apos; chronic administration of apos; ethanol.
1	lead and cadmium in hair as an indicator of body burden in rats of different age	Lead and cadmium levels in hair as indicators of body burden in rats of different ages.
1	hyaluronate in articular cartilage age related changes	Hyaluronate in the changes associated with osmosis; age of articular cartilage.
1	age related changes in penile erections and circulating testosterone in middle aged male rats	However, it is not possible to determine the age of the male rat and the age of the male rat.
1	change in taste preference related to aging of taste cells in rat	Change in taste preference due to taste cell aging in rat.
1	influence of age on the renal renin response to a high salt intake in the rat	In addition, there is an increased risk of respiratory tract infections due to hypertension, hypertension and hypertension.
1	influence of age on the modifications of cerebral electrogenesis in the curarized rat induced by acute and repeated asphyxic anoxia	Influence of apo; age on changes in cerebral electrogenesis induced by repeated acute asphyxiation in the curated rat.
1	age differences in perceptual style selective attention and perceptual motor reaction time	The difference between them; age in the perceptual style attracts the attention; selective attention and motor reaction time perceptual.
1	age isometric knee extension strength and fractionated resisted response time	The isometric resistance to apos; the extension of the knee and the fractionation of the response time resisted apos; age.
1	associative symmetry and item availability evidence for qualitative age differences in acquisition strategies	The association symmetry and the availability of objects demonstrate the existence of qualitative differences between them; age in the strategies of their acquisition.
1	age related differences in serial binary classification	It is not possible to determine the age of the individual.
1	microhardness measurement of the cartilage of the human femur head	Measurement of microhardness of human femoral head cartilage.
1	polycardiographic researches on over 90 years old subjects author s transl	Polycardiographic research on subjects over the age of 90 years.
1	age related changes in the colonic blood supply their relevance to ischaemic colitis	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of heart disease.
1	conservatism innovation and old age	Conservative Innovation and Aging.
1	performance on tests of power and speed as related to age among male job applicants	For example, the age profile of male applicants for employment was higher than that of male applicants.
1	age and social composition factors as explanations for cleavages in socio political values	In addition, there is a need to ensure that women are able to participate in the labour market.
1	evidence for an endocrine function of the human pineal gland chairman s introduction	Evidence of death; existence of an endocrine function in the body; introduction of the President of the Human Pineal gland.
1	quantitative age dependent variations in dendritic spines in the hippocampus ca1 ca3 and fascia dentata of the albino mouse	Quantitative apo-dependent variations; age of dendritic spines of albino moths; hippocampus ca1 ca3 and fascia dentata.
1	age related pharmacokinetics of high dose methotrexate in patients with osteosarcoma	In addition, it is recommended that patients be treated at the same time as the other patients.
1	levels of the serum amyloid a protein saa in normal persons of different age groups	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	sex related differences in diurnal activities and development of hepatic microsomal 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase and cholesterol 7alpha hydroxylase	Sex-related differences in apos daytime activities and development; hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a hepatic microsomal reductase and cholesterol 7alpha hydroxylase 7alpha hydroxylase.
1	higher corticosterone values at a fixed single timepoint in serum from mice trained by prior handling	Higher values of corticosterone at a fixed time point in previously manipulated mouse serum.
1	effects of age on brain oxidative metabolism in vivo	Effects of apo; age on oxidative metabolism of the brain in vivo.
1	the distribution and lipid composition of ultracentrifugally separated lipoproteins of young and old rat plasma	Distribution and lipid composition of ultracentrifugation-separated lipoproteins in plasma from young and aged rats.
1	age dependent changes in the excretion of urinary proteins by the rat	Changes with age; age; rat urinary protein excretion.
1	age related changes in purkinje fiber action potentials of adult dogs	Changes related to apo, apo, apo, apo, apo, apo, apo, apo, apo, apo, apo, apo.
1	age differences in peripheral perceptual processing a monoptic backward masking investigation	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the accuracy of the data.
1	change with age of anisotropic properties of collagen bundles	Collagen beam anisotropic properties change with age.
1	quantitative age related histologic changes in the human vas deferens	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	histocompatibility linked genetic control of susceptibility to age dependent polioencephalomyelitis in mice	The study found that the genetic control of susceptibility to polioencephalomyelitis in mice was linked to the genetic control of susceptibility to apo-dependent polioencephalomyelitis.
1	stereological analysis of hepatic fine structure in the fischer 344 rat influence of sublobular location and animal age	L' stereological analysis of the fine hepatic structure of Fischer 344 rat muscle influences sublobular localization and l' age of the animal.
1	dihydropteridine reductase activity of adult fetal and neoplastic tissues	Dihydropteridin reductase (DCR) activity in adult neoplastic and fetal tissue.
1	influence of age on results of vestibular function tests review of literature and presentation of caloric test results	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada and the United States.
1	hepatic lipid metabolism age related changes in triglyceride metabolism	Key words @-@: liver lipid metabolism, age, triglyceride metabolism changes.
1	the interaction between age and list length in free recall	If you have any questions, please contact us at 1-800-959-5525.
1	age effects on event related potentials in a selective attention task	It is important to note, however, that this is not always the case, as it is not always the case.
1	age differences in relationships between crystallized and fluid intelligences and problem solving	It is important to note that this is not the case, but rather that it is the result of a process of change.
1	urinary glycopeptides and glycosaminoglycans in children and adults as affected by age	Glycosaminoglycans and urinary glycopeptides in children and adults according to age.
1	age dependent structural changes in human neuronal chromatin	In addition, there are two types of chromatin: chromatin and chromatin.
1	some observations in the fine structure of age changes of the mouse retinal pigment epithelium	Some observations in fine structure of changes in apo; age of the epithelium; retinal pigment epithelium of mouse.
1	regional differences in the timing of synapse elimination in skeletal muscles of the neonatal rabbit	Regional differences in timing; elimination of synapses in neonatal skeletal muscle.
1	pharmacological analysis of the functional ontogeny of the nigrostriatal dopaminergic neurons	Pharmacological analysis of nigrostriatal dopaminergic functional ontogeny.
1	effects of age strain and dietary carbohydrate on the hepatic metabolism of male rats	Effects of the Dapos strain; age and dietary carbohydrate levels on hepatic metabolism in male rats.
1	age related changes in the content of the collagen crosslink pyridinoline	Apos-related changes; age in pyridinoline cross-linked collagen contents.
1	deficiency of calcitonin in age related osteoporoses	Osteoporosis-related calcitonin deficiency; age.
1	age related susceptibility of mice to staphylococcal infection	Infectious disease is a major risk factor for the transmission of the disease.
1	resolution of age dependent reference intervals polynomial regression methodology with applicability to plasma zinc levels in a childhood population	Resolution of age-dependent reference intervals; polynomial regression method with applicability to children's plasma zinc levels.
1	studies of age related changes in the metabolism of eosin in the rat	Studies of changes related to apos; age in eosin metabolism in rats.
1	adaptive physiopathology of advanced age	Bacteriological studies in vivo and in vivo.
1	age dependence of mechanical parameters in rat skin following repeated strain	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	the role of the physician in the preparation of adults for old age	The physician's role in preparing adults for life.
1	digoxin in the elderly pharmacokinetic consequences of old age	Digoxin in the Pharmacokinetic Consequences of Aging in the Elderly.
1	secretion of prostatic binding protein by rat ventral prostate influence of age and androgen	The secretion of the prostate-binding protein from the ventral prostate of the rat influences age and and androgen.
1	human pharmacokinetics of nitrazepam effect of age and diseases	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
1	low serum triiodothyronine and high serum reverse triiodothyronine in old age an effect of disease not age	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the risk of diabetes mellitus is greater in older adults than in older adults.
1	age related response of plasma testosterone delta 4 androstenedione and cortisol to adrenocorticotropin in infants children and adults	Journal of Adrenocorticotropin, 3rd Edition, 3rd Edition, Vol.
1	regional differences of neuron loss of rat brain in old age	Neurology, neuropsychology, neuropsychology, neuropsychology, and neuropsychology.
1	age related changes of the pattern of non histone chromatin proteins from rat and mouse liver chromatin	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada and the United States.
1	kinetic parameters of calcium metabolism and femur morphometry in rats i influence of sex and age	Calcium metabolism and femoral morphometry kinetics in rats influence sex and age.
1	age related changes in the nigrostriatum a behavioral and biochemical analysis	It is important to note that the data are not available from Statistics Canada.
1	the relationship of age and level of physical activity with the fractionated components of patellar reflex time	The relationship between age and skin level; physical activity and fractionated components of patellar reflex time.
1	age related differences in binocular backward masking with visual noise	It's not the only thing that's wrong, but it's the only thing that's wrong.
1	age changes cohort differences and cultural change on the guilford zimmerman temperament survey	It is not possible to determine the age of the population, but it is important to determine the age of the population.
1	changes in the specific activity of n acetyl beta d hexosaminidase in the rat epididymis with age	Changes in pH; nacetyl beta hexosaminidase specific activity in pH; rat epididyme with age.
1	effect of sex and sex role in later life report of a seminar by prof margaret hellie huyck april 1978	"It is important to note that the term ""sex"" is not a term used to describe a sex act."
1	the effect of age on the absorption and excretion of lead	It is not possible to determine the age of the individual.
1	body fat at puberty in rats alteration by changes in diet	Puberty body fat in rats is affected by dietary changes.
1	the hand in diabetes study of 97 diabetics compared to a control group	The Canadian Diabetes Research Institute (CDRI) is the lead agency for the Canadian Diabetes Strategy.
1	palatal sensitivity to touch correlation with age	It is not possible to determine the age of the child.
1	age and aerobic power in women a longitudinal study	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	age differences in resolving power and decision strategies in a weight discrimination task	In other words, it is not a question of whether or not a person has been discriminated against by reason of his or her sex.
1	effects of varying irrelevant information on adult age differences in problem solving	It is important to note that there are differences between the two groups in terms of age, sex, age, and gender.
1	respective influence of extrinsic and intrinsic factors on the age related decrease of thymic secretion	In addition, there was an increase in the incidence of thymic secretion due to a decrease in age, and a decrease in the incidence of thymic secretion.
1	age related changes in sebaceous gland activity	The results of this study are summarized below.
1	age related changes in the mechanical properties of human skin	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
1	ontogeny of maternal behavior in the laboratory rat early origins in 18 to 27 day old young	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that there is an association between maternal behaviour and birth.
1	effect of a saccharose diet on the enzymatic activity and the metabolite content from carbohydrate metabolism in the saliva of rats of varying age	Apos effect; sucrose-based diet on apos; enzymatic activity and metabolite content of saliva carbohydrate metabolism; different ages.
1	cyclophosphamide eliminates suppressor t cells in age associated central regulation of delayed hypersensitivity in mice	Cyclophosphamide eliminates the t-suppressor cells associated with apos; age of central control of apos; delayed hypersensitivity in mice.
1	age dependent gene induction in the quail oviduct viii a survey of experimental data	Gene induction as a function of age; age in quail oviduct viii, study of the experimental data.
1	effect of an episode of severe malnutrition and age on lactose absorption by recovered infants and children	It is important to note that the effects of these factors are not expected to be significant in the future.
1	influence of age on bronchial mucociliary transport	Age of bronchial mucociliary transport.
1	depth and elaboration of processing in relation to age	It's a good idea to go to the beach, but it's a good place to go.
1	spiral ganglion cell counts in an age graded series of rat cochleas	The results of this study are consistent with the results of a population-based study.
1	effect of age on axoplasmic transport of cholinesterase in rat sciatic nerves	Effect of apos; age on axoplasmic cholinesterase transport in the sciatic nerves of the rat.
1	mouse erythropoietic stem cell lines function normally 100 months loss related to number of transplantations	The erythropoietic stem cell lines of mice function normally for 100 months, a loss that is related to the number of transplants.
1	age related changes in glycerolipid formation in lean and obese zucker rats	Changes in fat and lean zucker rats; age of glycerolipid formation.
1	plasma lipoprotein changes in suckling and weanling rabbits fed semipurified diets	Changes in plasma lipoproteins in both suckled and weaned rabbits fed a semi-@-@ purified diet.
1	influence of sex and age on febrile responses to peripheral and central administration of pyrogens in the rabbit	Influence of sex and age; age on febrile responses to apos; peripheral and central pyrogen administration in rabbit.
1	changes with age in copper and superoxide dismutase levels in brains of c57bl 6j mice	In addition, there were no changes in the age of the copper and superoxide dismutase levels in the brain of c57bl 6j mice.
1	combined effects of hla matching and age in renal transplantation	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of heart disease.
1	serum cholesterol levels of males and females in different age groups in south india	It is not possible to determine the age of men and women, but it is important to determine the age of men and women.
1	changes with age in cadmium and copper levels in c57bl 6j mice	Acute toxicity studies of cadmium and copper in rats and mice.
1	prolyl 3 hydroxylase and 4 hydroxylase activities in certain rat and chick embryo tissues and age related changes in their activities in the rat	The activities of prolyl @-@3 hydroxylase and 4 hydroxylase in certain tissues of rat and chick embryos and changes related to apos; age of activity in rat.
1	aging and conservatism cohort changes in attitudes about legalized abortion	The age-conservatism cohort has changed attitudes toward the legalization of the practice of abortion.
1	peripheral autonomic changes accompanying learning and reaction time performance in older people	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the development of self-directed learning.
1	normal values of total serum ige in children from birth to 16 years of age	The total number of deaths per 1,000 population in Canada.
1	analysis of ribosomal proteins from adult drosophila melanogaster in relation to age	Analysis of the ribosomal proteins of adult Drosophila melanogaster as a function of age.
1	some remarks on assessing morphologic changes in old demented people	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been carried out in the field of mental health.
1	effect of age on arden grating acuity	It is also important to note that there is a need for more information.
1	severe hypernatremia caused by age isolation and obstructive uropathy	Severe hypnatremia caused by: isolation of the elderly; isolation of the elderly; obstructive uropathy.
1	endocrine function of the ovaries of blue foxes alopex ladopus during postnatal ontogenesis	Ovary endocrine functions of alopex ladopus blue fox during apo; postnatal ontogenesis.
1	age dependent changes in the specificity of trna methyltransferases in the cerebellum of the icteric and nonicteric gunn rat	Changes in ilear and non-iceric rat cerebellum trna methyltransferase specificity as a function of age.
1	bipolar affective disorder in old age	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry.
1	influence of the age of the recipient on the manifestation of the effect of allogeneic inhibition	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	secretion of growth hormone in men and women during the reproductive age in aged men and menopausal women with or without estrogens or progesterone	In addition, there is a need for additional research to determine the role of estrogen and progesterone in the development of late-onset men and women.
1	maturational changes in adrenal xenobiotic metabolism in male and female guinea pigs	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
1	age related changes resembling fibrocystic disease in iodine blocked rat breasts	Age-related changes, resembling a fibro-cystic disease in the rat's intestine, have blocked the rat's breasts.
1	effect of hydrocortisone on the state of liver chromatin in rats of different age	Effect of apos; hydrocortisone on apos; hepatic chromatin status in age-appropriate rats.
1	age related degenerative changes in the mouse mandibular joint	Acute gastrointestinal symptoms include diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, and other chronic conditions.
1	age related changes in rat muscle collagen	In addition, there were no significant differences between the two groups.
1	effect of age and short term cold stress on sdh activity and oxygen consumption of lizard brain	It is also important to note that the effects of climate change on the health of Canadians are not as dramatic as they might be.
1	analysis and exploration of age related changes in mammalian structure and function	An examination of the structure and function of mammals in terms of their age.
1	age related changes in function of transfer ribonucleic acid of rat livers	Changes Associated with Lapos; Age in Lapos Transfer Function; Rat Liver Ribonucleic Acid.
1	human articular cartilage in relation to age a morphometric study	Cartilage articular human in relation to the etapos; age a morphometric study.
1	changes in renal function in middle and old age established by isotopic nephrography	Average and advanced age as determined by isotopic nephrography.
1	gender differences in open field behavior as a function of age	Age-specific sex differences in field behaviour.
1	developmental changes in visual orienting behavior to featural versus structural information in the human infant	It is important to note that there are many factors that influence the development of a newborn child, such as age, sex, age, sex, sex, and other factors.
1	change in response with age of human articular cartilage to plasma somatomedin activity	Modification of the human articular cartilage response to apos; plasma somatomedin activity with apos; apos; age.
1	a clinico pathological survey of thyroid glands in old age	Thyroid gland clinical study in the elderly.
1	developmental changes in malpighian tubule cell structure	Changes in the cellular structure of the squamous gland tubules during development.
1	age related variations in the testes and prostate of beagle dogs	Cervical cancer is a major cause of death in Canada and the United States.
1	changes in pituitary and thyroid function with increasing age in young male rats	Changes in thyroid and pituitary function in young male rats.
1	effect of age on testicular function in patients with klinefelter s syndrome	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
1	age related variations in cortical bone remodeling measurements in male beagles 10 to 26 months of age	Apos-related changes; age of re-modeling measurements; cortical bones in males aged 10–26 months.
1	morphological and biochemical studies on the development of cholinergic properties in cultured sympathetic neurons ii dependence on postnatal age	Morphological and biochemical studies of cholinergic development in cultured sympathetic neurons ii dosage dependence; postnatal age.
1	age related changes of calcitonin secretion in females	Calcitonin secretion changes associated with apos; female age.
1	thymic changes in muscular dystrophy and evidence for an abnormality related to prostaglandin synthesis or action	Thymic changes in the muscular dystrophy and evidence of apos; synthesis- or apos-related abnormality; action of prostaglandins.
1	effect of age on immune function in terms of chemically induced cancers	Injury is caused by the presence of a substance in the body or the presence of a substance.
1	the influence of stimulus age and sex on person perception	It is also important to note that there are differences between the two groups.
1	differences in the magnitude of the delboeuf illusion and usnadze effect during adulthood	Differences in scope; delboeuf illusion; usnadze effect; adult age.
1	age related differences in two stages of central perceptual processes the effects of short duration targets and criterion differences	Short-term differences; two-stage age of central perceptual processes, short-term target effects and differences in criteria.
1	intracellular distribution of copper and zinc in sheep effect of age and dietary levels of the metals	Intracellular Distribution of Copper and Zinc in Sheep Effect of pH; age and metal food levels.
1	iodoamino acid distribution and weight of the thyroid gland t4 serum level and t4 metabolism in relation to diet body fat content and age of rats	Distribution of iodoamino acids and weight of thyroid gland, serum t4 level and metabolism t4 in relation to diet, body fat, and age of the rat.
1	fine structural changes in the liver of young and old rats as influenced by microsomal enzyme inducers	Mild structural changes in the young and old rat liver are influenced by microsomal enzyme inducers.
1	maturation of nerve conduction velocity from birth to 5 years of age	The age of the child is 5 years, and the age of the child is 5.
1	age related effects on the incorporation of acetate into rat liver histones	In addition to the above, there are a number of other health effects associated with the use of acetate.
1	generational and other differences between males and females in problem drinking and its treatment	Gender differences in the use of alcohol and the treatment of alcohol among men and women.
1	age dependent changes in the latency of the pattern visual evoked potential	Changes in profile latency with age evoked visual potential.
1	hearing and age research challenges and the national institute on aging	Canadian Institute of Health Information; Canadian Institute of Health Information; Canadian Institute of Health Information.
1	age pigments cell loss and hippocampal function	It is not possible to determine the cause of the loss.
1	involution of genital function with age studied as an index aging in drosophila melanogaster	L' genital involution with age; age was studied as an index of aging in Drosophila melanogaster.
1	age related differences in salt taste acuity	It's a good idea to be able to enjoy the sun and the sun.
1	age associated changes in activities of rat hepatocytes i protein synthesis	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the development of the disease.
1	intraperitoneal systemic anaphylaxis in the mouse i age dependence of fatal anaphylactic shock	Systemic intraperitoneal anaphylaxis in mice; age of fatal anaphylactic shock.
1	age related and thymus dependent rejection of adenovirus 2 transformed cell tumors in the syrian hamster	The rejection of thymus-dependent, age-related adenovirus 2 has transformed Syrian hamster cell tumors.
1	changes of dna ligases in chick neural retina as a function of age	In addition, there are a number of other genetic factors that may influence the development of the disease.
1	circadian changes in adrenal dopamine beta hydroxylase activity dependency of change at darkness onset and the effect of pinealectomy on animal strain and age	The circadian variations in the activity of adrenal dopamine beta hydroxylase depend on changes in the early stages of the apo placentae; the effect of the pinealectomy on the animal strain and age.
1	processing by the thymus is not required for cells that cure and populate w wv recipients	Thymus n&apos treatment is not necessary for healing cells in blood recipients.
1	age related changes of renal osteodystrophy	Changes in kidney function; age; osteodystrophy.
1	gonadotropin binding and testicular function in old rats	Testicular function and gonadotropin binding in old rats.
1	age related changes in the testicular and antler cycles of reindeer rangifer tarandus	However, it is not possible to determine the age of reindeer in this study.
1	biochemical studies on collagen and connectin from human skeletal muscle age related changes in the properties of elasticity author s transl	Human skeletal muscle collagen and connectine biochemical studies linked to apos; age of skeletal muscle changes in apos properties; author of apos; translastic elasticity.
1	the cholinergic system in old age and alzheimer s disease	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	aminazine distribution in the organs and tissues of rats depending on the routes of administration and the age of the animals	Distribution of apo; aminazine in tissues and organs of rats by administration and age of animals.
1	the touch corpuscles of the plantar surface of the big toe histological and histometrical investigations with respect to age	Histological and histometric studies of large toes as a function of age.
1	age changes in the livers of costa ricans	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
1	changes in the activity and distribution of the ribosomal dissociation factor of rat liver during growth	Changes in rat liver ribosomal dissociation factor activity and distribution during growth.
1	corticotroph cells of the human pituitary in old age	Apos corticotrophs; human pituitary in old age.
1	age related changes in the immune system of mice of eight medium and long lived strains and hybrids ii short and long term effects of natural infection with parainfluenza type 1 virus sendai	Changes related to apo; age in immune system of mice from eight medium- and long-lived strains and hybrids ii Short- and long-term effects of apo; natural infection with the sentai virus of parainfluenza type 1.
1	the effect of age on the protein degradation system in the nematode turbatrix aceti	L' effect of apo; age on the protein-degrading system of the turbatrix aceti nematode.
1	testosterone and testosterone precursors in the spermatic vein and in the testicular tissue of old men reduced oxygen supply may explain the relative increase of testicular progesterone and 17 alpha hydroxyprogesterone content and production in old age	Precursors of testosterone and testosterone in the spermatic vein and testis tissue of older men may account for apos; relative increase in testicular progesterone content and 17 alpha-hydroxyprogesterone as well as production in old age.
1	comparative ultrastructural study of the optic nerves and visual cortices of young 2 5 months and old 17 months mice	Comparative study of the ultrastructure of visual and optical nerves in 2- to 5-month-old and 17-month-old mice.
1	age related differences in lactate distribution kinetics following maximal exercise	Differences related to age; age in the kinetics of distribution of lactate after maximal exercise.
1	effect of age on contractility of guinea pig ureter	It's a very important thing to do, but it's a very important thing.
1	age related changes of the mineral component content in the hemolymph of 2d and 3d stage larvae of the reindeer warble fly hypodermatidae	Changes related to apo; age of mineral content in apo; hemolymph of reindeer fly instars 2d and 3d.
1	age differences in the effects of perceptual noise	Differences in perception noise effects; age.
1	postnatal changes in urinary prostaglandin e excretion in premature infants	Postnatal alterations of urinary prostaglandins and excretion in preterm infants.
1	age dependent constitution of chondroitin sulfate isomers in cartilage proteoglycans under associative conditions	Chondroitin sulfate isomer composition as a function of age; cartilage proteoglycan age under associative conditions.
1	changes in rat gastric proteases with age effect of hydrocortisone	Changes in Rat Gastric Proteases with Apos; effect of apos; hydrocortisone on apos; age.
1	age related changes in the transmembrane potential of isolated rabbit sino atrial nodes and atria	Changes related to the apo; age of transmembrane potential of atrial ganglia and isolated sino atria from rabbits.
1	acoustically evoked potential dependence upon age	It was not easy to understand the nature of the problem, but it was difficult to understand how the problem could be solved.
1	the effects of age upon the visual perception of speech	The Effects of Age on Visual Perception of Speech.
1	the first night effect revisited with age as a variable	The first nocturnal effect came back with the variable age.
1	achievement aggression and perceived adult age stages	The goal is to improve the quality of life for all Canadians.
1	the effects of age and sex on the factor structure of the wechsler memory scale	The Effects of Age and Gender on the Factor Structure of the Wechsler Memory Scale.
1	age changes in bone mineralization cortical thickness and haversian canal area	It is not possible to determine the extent of the mineralization, but it is important to determine the extent of the mineralization.
1	lipids in accessory sex glands of immature mature and castrated male rats	Lipids in the accessory sex glands of male rats that are immature, mature, or castrated.
1	psychological problems of incurable patients in old age author s transl	Translation of incurable patients' psychological problems in the elderly.
1	effects of age and frequency of ejaculation on sperm production and extragonadal sperm reserves in stallions	Effects of age; age and frequency of seizures; ejaculation on stallion sperm production and extragonadal sperm reserves.
1	age and sex differences on preferred listening rates for speech	It's a good idea to talk to people about their feelings of guilt and guilt.
1	variation with age in the volumes of grey and white matter in the cerebral hemispheres of man measurements with an image analyser	Change with pH; age of white and grey matter volumes in the cerebral hemispheres of the apos; man at the apos; help from a dapos analyzer; images.
1	methadone exposure in utero developmental status at one and two years of age	It is important to note that there are no data on exposure to methadone.
1	conditioned taste aversion as a function of age in mature male rats	Acute and chronic toxicity of chloroform and chloroform in rats.
1	shifts toward risk in adults at three age levels	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	effect of age on levels of diazepam in plasma and brain of rats	Diazepam is the most common type of diazepam found in rats.
1	effects of age on the metabolism of thyroid hormones by rat brain tissue in vitro	Effects of osmosis; age on thyroid hormone metabolism in rat brain tissue in vitro.
1	effect of starvation and refeeding a high protein or high carbohydrate diet on lipid composition and glycogen content of rat livers in relation to age	The effect of fasting and refeeding; a diet rich in protein or carbohydrate on the lipid composition and the glycogen content of rat liver as a function of age.
1	influence of adult age on the skeletal response to phosphate and estrogen in rats	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
1	age related histochemical and histological changes in the knee joint cartilage of c57b1 mice and their significance for the pathogenesis of osteoarthrosis i oxidative enzymes	Apos-related histochemical and histological changes; age in c57b1 mouse articular knee cartilage and their importance for the pathogenesis of osteoarthritis oxidative enzymes i.
1	intimal thickening of human femoral arteries with special regard to elastin part 1 diffuse intimal thickening due to growth and age	Injurious thickening of the human femoral arteries, with special attention to the apos; diffuse intimal thickening of the part 1 of the l' elastin due to growth and to the apos; age.
1	age related changes in oxygen consumption and the sdh activity of liver homogenate of male garden lizards effect of malonate and short term cold stress	Changes in age; age of consumption of oxygen and oxygen; liver sdh activity; liver homogenate in male garden lizards; effect of short-term malonate and cold stress.
1	age associated changes in deoxyglucose uptake in whole brain	Changes Associated with Lapse; Age of Whole Brain Deoxyglucose Capture.
1	urate excretion in old age	It's not a good idea to do that.
1	the structure of the spongy bone in lumbar vertebrae and the neck of the femur a comparative analysis of the age dependent remodelling process author s transl	The structure of spongy bones in the lumbar vertebrae and neck of the femur is the subject of a comparative analysis of the remodeling process as it relates to age.
1	changes in form and structure of vertebrae as a manifestation of mechanical loading author s transl	Changes in the shape and the structure of the vertebrae as a manifestation of the translation of l' author of the mechanical loading.
1	atherosclerosis in the pediatric age with special reference to initiation progression and regression of atherosclerotic lesions	Atherosclerosis at baseline; paediatric age, especially with respect to the initial progression and the regression of atherosclerotic lesions.
1	adrenal reactivity to acth age changes in silver foxes inheriting different defensive behaviors	Adrenal responsiveness to changes in age of herring foxes with different fox defensive behaviors.
1	fertility in women after age forty five	The Committee asks for up-to-date information on this issue.
1	vitamin d dependent calcium binding protein changes during gestation prenatal and postnatal development in rats	Changes in vitamin D-dependent calcium binding proteins during pregnancy-induced pre- and post-natal development in rats.
1	pattern of age related bone loss in mandibles	Bone loss model in mandible age.
1	the influence of sex age and strain of chicken on liver biotin content	In addition, there are a number of other factors that influence the quality of the liver.
1	age differences on raven s coloured progressive matrices	Differences in age on progressive raven-coloured matrices were observed.
1	thyroxin binding globulin tbg radioimmunoassay normal patients results according to age and sex and in the cases of dysthyroidisms author s transl	Normal patients receiving thyroxine-binding tbg globulin radioimmunoassay receive age- and sex-specific results and, in dysthyroid cases, the results are reported.
1	discrimination learning in horses effects of breed age and social dominance	It is important to recognize that discrimination in the race of horses has a profound impact on race and social status.
1	normal cardiac output in relation to age and body size	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted program.
1	age related response to tryptophan pyrrolase to 17 beta estradiol in the liver of female rats	The tryptophan pyrrolase response to 17 beta-estradiol in female rat liver is age dependent.
1	maturational changes related to dopamine in the effects of d amphetamine cocaine nicotine and strychnine on seizure susceptibility	Dopamine-related changes in maturation in the seizure susceptibility effects of d-amphetamine, cocaine, nicotine and strychnine.
1	age differences in the effect of glucagon on the metabolism of glucose precursors in perfused rat liver	Differences in age; glucagon effect on glucose precursor metabolism in perfused rat liver.
1	a method for estimating the age of field collected female simulium damnosum s l diptera simuliidae	A method was used to estimate the age of simuliid simuliid female rainbow trout, simuliid simulium damnosum s l diptera, in the field.
1	age sex and hemisphrere asymmetry differences induced by a concurrent memory processing task	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3rd ed. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/pubs/index_e.html.
1	dimensional preferences in middle and old age	Dimensional preference among seniors; average or advanced age.
1	stimulus persistence and age	It's not a good idea.
1	hypothalamic pituitary function in the old irregularly cycling rat	Hypothalamic hypophysial functions in old cycle rat.
1	age dependent changes in the sperm population and fertility in the male rat	In addition, there was a significant increase in the number of male rats in the Canadian population.
1	age differences in dark interval threshold across the life span	It is important to note that the age of the child is the same as the age of the child.
1	effects of age and other drugs on benzodiazepine kinetics	Effects of Drugs; Age and Dosage; Other Drugs on Benzodiazepine Kinetics.
1	diagnostic problems of tuberculosis in old age	The prevalence of TB among older adults is higher than among older adults.
1	age related decrease in prostacyclin biosynthetic activity in rat aortic smooth muscle cells	Diminution due to apo; age of onset; biosynthetic activity of prostacyclin in smooth muscle cells of the rat aorta.
1	an analysis of blood transfusion of surgical patients by sex a question for the transfusion trigger	A gender-based analysis of blood transfusion in surgical patients is a question for triggering transfusion.
1	critical aortic coarctation patch aortoplasty in infants less than age 3 months	Aortoplasty of the critical aortic coarctation patch in infants under 3 months of age.
1	dyspnea in 70 year old people	Seventy-year-old Dyspnea.
1	clinical features of schizophrenia with a malignant course in patients surviving into old age	Clinical Characteristics of Malign Progression Schizophrenia in Patients Surviving to Adulthood.
1	age related changes in the carbohydrate and fat metabolic indices of female rats	Changes in lipid and carbohydrate metabolic indices; age in female rats.
1	age dependent avidin induction v changes on the level of post transcriptional modification	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	interaction of age and sex in sympathetic axon ingrowth into the hippocampus following septal afferent damage	In addition, there are a number of other factors, including age, sex, age, internal growth, sympathetic axon in the apos, seahorse, and septal afferent lesion.
1	food restriction as a modulator of age related changes in serum lipids	Dietary restriction as an apo modulator; age changes in apo-related serum lipids; age.
1	iris heterochromia variations in form age changes sex dimorphism	The age of the forms and the heterochromia of the apos change the sexual dimorphism.
1	serum lipid and lipoprotein fractions in 2 age groups of male rabbits	In addition to the above, there are two groups of rabbits in which there are no significant differences in lipid content.
1	age differences in p3 reaction time associations	Differences in the age of the associations of reaction times p3 were observed.
1	age related changes in auditory event related potentials	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	age related auditory loss in the mongolian gerbil	Age in Mongolian gerbil.
1	age related changes in the auditory evoked brainstem potentials of albino and pigmented guinea pigs	Changes related to age in hearing evoked the potentials of the brain stem in pigmented and albino guinea pigs.
1	age effect on dopamine and serotonin metabolite levels in cerebrospinal fluid	Effect of apo; age on cerebrospinal fluid metabolite levels of dopamine and serotonin.
1	immunoglobulin levels in children with celiac disease variations with age and diet	Children with CD have different levels of immunoglobulin depending on age and diet.
1	age related changes in neuronal rna content in rhesus monkeys macaca mulatta	In addition, there is no evidence of any change in the age of the rna content of the macaca macatta monkey.
1	age related distribution of serum immunoglobulin concentration in 1003 healthy children and adults	In addition to the above, there are no data on the age of the serum immunoglobulin concentration.
1	age associated changes in initiation of ribonucleic acid synthesis in isolated rat liver nuclei	The changes associated with apos; age in onset of synthesis of apos; ribonucleic acid in isolated nuclei of rat liver are associated with apos; age.
1	age differences in the hormonal reaction of the adrenals and testes to stress exposure in monkeys	Differences in age; age of hormonal response of adrenal and testis to monkeys; stress exposure.
1	ontogenic drug studies in calves i age dependent salicylate levels and metabolism	In addition to the above studies, there are no data on the age of calves and no data are available.
1	role of age related serum factors in the mechanism of interferon production	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
1	influence of age cigarette smoking and the oral contraceptive on plasma concentrations of clomipramine	Cigarettes can be used to reduce the risk of lung cancer.
1	age related alterations of the proximal axon segment in lamina iiiab pyramidal cells of the human isocortex a golgi and fine structural study	Alterations related to the apos; age of proximal axonal segment in human isocortex a golgi pyramidal lamina iiiab; and a fine structural study.
1	comparative roentgenographical study on the incidence of ossification of the posterior longitudinal ligament and other degenerative changes of the cervical spine among japanese koreans americans and germans author s transl	Comparative stroke roentgenographic study; incidence of osteo; posterior longitudinal ligament ossification; other degenerative cervical spinal changes in American residents; Japanese origin and German authors.
1	control of gill reflex habituation and the rate of epsp decrement of l7 by a common source in the cns of aplysia	Control of gills; reflex habituation of gills and epsp decrement rate of l7 by common source in apos cns; aplysia.
1	effect of age on the detection rate in duchenne muscular dystrophy	Dysphthodosis is a disease of the liver that affects the liver and the liver.
1	histochemical and ultrastructural aspects of m vastus lateralis in sedentary old people age 65 89 years	The histochemical and ultrastructural aspects of the m vastus lateralis in the sedentary population aged 65-89 years.
1	changes with age in the peripheral nerves of the rat an ultrastructural study	Changes in rat peripheral nerve age; ultrastructural study.
1	effect of host age on the transplantation growth and radiation response of emt6 tumors	Episode-related adverse events (EOEs) may also be associated with Episode-related events.
1	reflex oral activity in decerebrate rats of different age	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 86, 291-328.
1	sex difference in serum calcitonin level in rats as related to feeding fasting and age	Sexual Difference in Serum Calcitonin Levels in Rats as Function of Fasting and Apos; Age.
1	capacity of old versus young male rats to release thyrotropin tsh thyroxine t4 and triiodothyronine t3 in response to different stimuli	The ability of young and old male rats to release triiodothyronine t3 and thyrotropin tsh thyroxine t4 in response to different stimuli.
1	mouse c57bl ksj liver phosphofructokinase allosteric kinetics and age related changes in the genetically diabetic state	Allosteric kinetics of mouse hepatic phosphofructokinase c57bl ksj and its associated changes; age; genetic diabetes.
1	regulation of three forms of cytochrome p 450 and epoxide hydrolase in rat liver microsomes effects of age sex and induction	Regulation of three cytochrome p 450 and d*apos forms; epoxide hydrolase in rat liver microsomes; sex effects; age and age; induction.
1	sexual differences in the development of plasma thyroxine levels in the embryo and young chick	Sexual differences in thyroxine plasma concentration development in the embryo and young chick.
1	changes with age characterize circadian rhythm in telemetered core temperature of stroke prone rats	Age-related changes characterize the circadian core temperature rhythm measured by telemetry in rats prone to stroke.
1	familial and individualized longitudinal autorhythmometry for 5 to 12 years and human age effects	In addition, a person's self-esteem may be influenced by his or her own health.
1	adult age differences in memory for sex of voice	It is also important to note that there are differences between males and females in terms of age.
1	relationship of serum somatomedin like activity and fibroblast proliferative activity with age and growth in the rat	Apos ratio; serum to apos somatomedin activity; fibroblast proliferative activity as a function of apos; age and growth in rat.
1	identification of lactate dehydrogenase elevating virus as the etiological agent of genetically restricted age dependent polioencephalomyelitis of mice	Identification of virus responsible for apo; elevation of lactate dehydrogenase as etiologic agent of polio, apo-dependent ephalomyelitis; genetically restricted mouse age.
1	age related changes in the concentrations of cytosol receptors for sex steroid hormones in the hypothalamus and pituitary gland of the rat	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada, the United States, the United States and the United States.
1	resting heartrate variability in man declines with age	At rest, the variability of the heart decreases with age.
1	pharmacokinetic characteristics of salicylates in old animals	Pharmacokinetic Characteristics of Salicylates in Old Animals.
1	acetylation and urinary excretion of norsulfazole in gastrointestinal disease patients of different age groups	Norsulfazole is a substance that has been found to be carcinogenic to humans and to be carcinogenic to humans.
1	age and sex related variations of serum thyroxine binding globulin	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of thyroxine.
1	age related changes in central nervous system beta endorphin and acth	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
1	morphological immunochemical and biochemical study of rabbit achilles tendon at various ages	Morphological, biochemical, and immunochemical studies of the d&apos tendon; rabbit achilles at different ages.
1	urinary polyamine excretion in man i influence of sex and age	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of lung cancer.
1	interaction of age and thyroid hormone status on na k atpase in rat renal cortex and liver	The effects of the drug on the immune system and on the immune system and the immune system.
1	age dependent immunological parameters	Immunoassay-dependent parameters; immunologic parameters; age.
1	a strain survey of age dependent changes in antigen elimination antibody formation and tolerance	In addition, a study was conducted to determine the relationship between age and antigenic antibody formation.
1	sex related variations in the frequency and characteristics of adverse drug reactions	Gender-related variations in adverse drug reaction frequency and characteristics.
1	age changes at cerebral artery bifurcations and the pathogenesis of berry aneurysms	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	sex difference of mercuric chloride induced renal tubular necrosis in rats from the aspect of sex differences in renal mercury concentration and sulfhydryl levels	The sexual difference in mercuric chloride induced necrosis of the renal tubules in rats, below the pH; angle of sexual differences in the concentration of renal mercury and sulfhydryl levels.
1	ultrastructural morphometric investigations on rat liver of young and adult rats after treatment with technical pentachlorophenol pcp	Ultrastructural morphometric studies in the liver of adult and young rats were performed after treatment with pcp pentachlorophenol.
1	age and susceptibility of swiss mice for mouse adenovirus strain fl	Age and susceptibility of Swiss mice to the fl strain of adenovirus fl.
1	influence of age on the vitamin e requirement for resolution of necrotizing myopathy	The prevalence of diabetes mellitus among Canadians aged 65 and over is highest among those aged 65 and over.
1	age dependent changes in rat liver steroid hormone receptor proteins	Changes in the protein of the receptors of the steroidal hormones of rat liver as a function of age.
1	changes i superoxide dismutase activity and copper during development and ageing in the fruit fly drosophila melanogaster	Modifies the apos; superoxide dismutase i and copper activity during development and aging in fruit fly melanogaster drosophila.
1	molecular basis of age dependent changes in the activity of adenine nucleotide translocase	The molecular basis of apo changes; apos activity; nucleotide translocase adenine depends on apos; age.
1	stereological changes in the capillary network and nerve cells of the aging human brain	Stereological changes in the aging human brain's capillary network and nerve cells.
1	morphometric studies on synapses of the cerebellar glomerulus the effect of centrophenoxine treatment in old rats	Morphometric studies of cerebellar glomerular synapses, effects, and centrophenoxin treatment in aged rats.
1	age dependent gene induction in quail oviduct x alterations on the post transcriptional level enzymic aspect	Gene-induced apo-dependent induction; age in the body; oviduct of quail x alterations in the body; enzymatic aspect of the level post-transcriptional.
1	models of the biological age of the rat i a factor model of age parameters	Apos models; rat biological age; factorial parameter model; age.
1	the effect of age and pentobarbitone tolerance on pentobarbitone depression of calcium 45 uptake by mouse brain synaptosomes	L' effect of age and tolerance to pentobarbitone on the decrease in calcium uptake 45 by brain synaptosomes of mice.
1	age related changes in the kinetic properties of the acetyl coa carboxylase and phospholipid content of rat liver	Changes related to apo; age of kinetic properties of rat liver acetyl-coa carboxylase and acetyl-coa carboxylase.
1	the influence of age alcohol consumption and body build on gonadal function in men	For example, a woman who consumes alcohol during pregnancy may consume the same amount of alcohol as a man.
1	the effect of age on the pharmacokinetics of diazepam	Diazepam is a drug that can be used to treat a person with diabetes.
1	survival under hypoxia age dependence and effect of cholinergic drugs	In addition to the above, there are a number of other medications that can be used in the treatment of diabetes.
1	lymphocyte subpopulations in the thymus of sjl j mice age related alterations and the effect of spontaneous reticulum cell sarcoma development	Under-lymphocyte populations in mouse thymus sjj, alterations related to age and age; spontaneous development of reticulum cell sarcoma.
1	age related changes in the sensitivity to vibration	The results of this study are summarized below.
1	age and changes in vocal jitter	L' Age and Changes in Vibration.
1	intellectual differences of adult men related to age and physical fitness before and after an exercise program	It is also important to note that there are differences between men and women in terms of age and physical fitness before and after exercise.
1	age related characteristics of thyroxine action on the cytochrome content in rat liver mitochondria and on body weight	Attributable characteristics; age of onset; action of thyroxine on rat liver mitochondrial cytochrome content and body weight.
1	altered hepatic microsomal metabolism of androstenedione as a function of age in mice	Modification of hepatic microsomal metabolism of androstenedione with apos; age in the mouse.
1	is weakness in old age due to muscle wasting	C' is the weakness of old age, which is caused by loss of muscle.
1	age related changes in extracellular materials in the inner wall of schlemm s canal	The results of this study are consistent with those of the previous study.
1	orthopaedic findings of the foot as related to age and body weight among women author s transl	In addition, there was a slight increase in the number of women who had not been tested.
1	at prophylaxis of disturbance of the electrolyte and water metabolism age author s transl	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
1	starvation in the rat ii effect of age and obesity on protein sparing and fuel metabolism	It is important to note that the effects of fasting in the rat, age and weight; obesity on the appetite; protein savings and energy metabolism.
1	effects of age and alcohol on psychomotor performance of men	It is also important to remember that alcohol is a major factor in the development of mental health.
1	age related radio morphologic changes in the extremity muscles	Apos-related radio morphological changes; terminal muscle age.
1	psychological changes from midlife to early old age implications for the maintenance of mental health	Psychological changes from early-age forties have implications for mental health maintenance.
1	mental health characteristics and acceptance rejection of old age	Characteristics of Mental Health and Acceptance of Aging Rejection.
1	sex differences in the response to apomorphine in rats	Apos; apomorphine response differed by sex in rats.
1	age related decrease in repair of oxidative damage to surface sulfhydryl groups on rat adipocytes	Apos-related decrease; age of repair of surface sulfhydryl oxidative damage on rat adipocytes.
1	age related changes in dopamine lhrh and somatostatin in the rat hypothalamus	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States and the United States.
1	localization of cellular changes within multimodal sensory regions in aged monkey brain possible implications for age related cognitive loss	The location of cellular changes in the multimodal sensory regions of the brain of older monkeys could have consequences for cognitive loss related to age.
1	memory for verbal and spatial information as a function of age	It is important to keep in mind that this is not the case.
1	the meaning and measurement of age identity	It is also important to note that this is not the case.
1	the effect of age on the ability of oocytes to synthesize rna and proteins during in vitro maturation	In vitro fertilization is the process of fertilization and the process of fertilization is called the process of fertilization.
1	age dependent variations in choline and ethanolamine phosphorylating activities of rodents	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the formation of the organism.
1	age related changes in the cornea	Corneal changes related to age.
1	changes in vagal activity and response to muscarinic receptor agonists with age	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the immune system.
1	dynamics of changes in the estradiol receptor content in the nuclear fraction of the hypothalamus of female rats during ontogenesis	Dynamics of changes in receptor content of apos; estradiol in nuclear fraction of apos; hypothalamus of female rats during apos; ontogenesis.
1	antibodies against mycobacterium leprae antigen 7 from birth to 18 months of age an indicator of intra uterine infection in leprosy	Antibodies to apos; antigen 7 of mycobacterium leprae from birth to age 18 months are an indicator of apos; intra-@ uterine infection in leprosy.
1	causes of age dependency of mammary tumour induction by carcinogens in rats	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
1	the effect of age on the activity and molecular properties of human brain monoamine oxidase	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of the health of the individual.
1	influence of ration physical form ruminal degradable nitrogen and age on rumen epithelial propionate and acetate transport and some enzymatic activities	Influence of physical form of rations, fat; degradable rumen and fat nitrogen; age of propionate and fat transport; epithelial acetate of rumen and certain enzymatic activities.
1	hematology of beta thalassemia trait age related developmental aspects and intrafamilial correlations	In addition, there was a significant increase in the number of patients who had been diagnosed with the disease.
1	kindling in developing rats variability of afterdischarge thresholds with age	Burning in developing rats; variability in post-discharge thresholds-with age.
1	increased ototoxicity in both young and old mice	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	comparative study on age related changes and atherosclerotic involvement of the coronary arteries of male and female subjects up to 40 years of age	In addition, a study was conducted to determine the relationship between coronary heart disease and coronary heart disease.
1	relation between age and respiratory response to inhaled carbon dioxide in healthy nigerians	Relationship Between Age and Respiratory Response to Carbon Dioxide Inhalation in Healthy Nigerians.
1	age peculiarities of the citrate pyruvate system functional in rat liver	Anomalies according to age; age of functional rat liver citrate pyruvate system.
1	a morphological study of the mouse subependymal layer from embryonic life to old age	Morphological study of the ependymal layer of mouse-from embryo to old age.
1	correlation analysis of free mammary gland stroma cells during age associated reorganization and spontaneous tumor development	Free mammary gland stromal cell correlation analysis during reorganization associated with age and spontaneous development of tumours.
1	age dependent synthesis of nucleic acids and proteins in the livers of different lines of rats	Nucleic acid and protein synthesis as functions of liver age of different rat strains.
1	metabolic studies of n bases of phospholipids and long chain bases of sphingolipids in two weeks old mouse brain tissue in comparison with one month old mouse visceral tissues	Phospholipid n base and long-chain sphingolipid base metabolism studies in brain tissue from 2-week-old mice compared with 1-month-old mouse visceral tissue.
1	circulating levels of pregnancy zone protein normal range and the influence of age and gender	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
1	age related changes in the incorporation of 35s sulfate into two proteoglycan populations from human cartilage	In addition, there is a need for additional data to be obtained from other sources, such as the Canadian Food Inspection Agency.
1	the effect of age and sex on bone density bone mineral content and cortical index	In addition, the effects of age and gender on bone density, bone mineral content, and cortical index.
1	nucleus raphe dorsalis a morphometric golgi study in rats of three age groups	Nucleus raphe dorsalis, morphometric study golgi in three groups of rats; age.
1	the geometry of diarthrodial joints its physiologic maintenance and the possible significance of age related changes in geometry to load distribution and the development of osteoarthritis	Diarthrodial joint geometry is physiological maintenance and possible importance of geometry changes as a function of age; age for burden distribution and development of osteo; osteoarthritis.
1	comparison of specific activities of enzymes from young and old dogs and mice	Comparison of enzyme-specific activities in old and young dogs and mice.
1	age related glycogen changes in bruchids	It is not possible to determine the age of the animals.
1	energy and protein metabolism in ewes as influenced by age and dietary protein calorie ratio	Energy and protein metabolism of sheep is influenced by the age and calorie ratio of the diet.
1	comparative effects of age and sedation on sinus node automaticity and atrioventricular conduction	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those of previous studies.
1	age related differences for motion sickness in the rat	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	age differences in acoustic and semantic recognition memory	It is important to note, however, that there are differences between the two systems.
1	age differences in memory as a function of depth of processing	It is also important to note that this is not the case.
1	effect of age on visual functions	It's not easy to see, it's not easy.
1	age differences in the duration of mating period of female rhesus monkeys	It is not possible to determine the age of a female rhesus ape or the age of a female ape.
1	effects of age and dietary restriction on the kidney glomeruli of mice observations by scanning electron microscopy	Effects of age, scanning electron microscopy, and food restriction on mouse renal glomeruli.
1	thyroid hormone carbohydrate interaction in the rat correlation between age related reductions in the inducibility of hepatic malic enzyme by triiodo l thyronine and a high carbohydrate fat free diet	Interaction of carbohydrate in apo; thyroid hormone in correlation of carbohydrate-related reductions; age of onset; indutibility of apo; hepatic malic enzyme by thyronine triiodo and high carbohydrate-free diet.
1	age dependent changes in fsh responsive adenylyl cyclase and fsh binding in rat testes	In addition, there was a significant increase in the age of the fsh response in the rat testis; and an increase in the age of the fsh response.
1	specific and nonspecific immune factors in dental plaque fluid and saliva from young and old populations	Specific and non-specific immunological factors in the fluids of dental plates and saliva of young and old populations.
1	a comparative morphometric analysis of the component tissues of the urethra in young and old female c57bl icrfat mice	A comparative morphometric analysis of urethra tissue composition in young and aged c57bl c57bl fats.
1	age changes on bone size and mass in two strains of senescent rats	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
1	a primate model for age and host response to genital herpetic infection determinants of latency	A simple model for the age and response of the host to the determinants of latency of the host; genital herpes infection.
1	age related changes in processing explicit and implicit language	It is important to note that this is not necessarily the case.
1	effects of age on long term memory retention of fixed interval responding	It is important to note that this is not always the case, but it may be the case in some cases.
1	age related facilitation in recall following semantic processing	Semantic treatment age; ease of recall.
1	on the locus of age differences in visual information processing	It is important to note that there is no difference between the two groups.
1	age related pigmentation changes in the coats of allophenic mice	Pigmentation changes associated with age in allophenic mice.
1	lack of age associated immune dysfunction in mucosal associated lymph nodes	Mucosal-associated immune dysfunction; age in lymph nodes.
1	age related changes in oxygen consumption by guinea pig paramedian cortex	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
1	influence of age on the discrimination of barium in comparison with strontium during their incorporation into compact bone	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that this is due to the presence of strontium.
1	age dependent changes in esterases of callosobruchus maculatus fab bruchidae coleoptera	Callosobruchus maculatus fabuchidae coleoptera esterase modifications as a function of age.
1	serum digoxin concentration and age	He's got serum levels of digoxin and age.
1	life span age trends in laterality	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the age of the individual.
1	influence of sex and age on the biological half life of cadmium in mice	Influence of sex and age; age on biological half-life of mouse cadmium.
1	further observations on age induced changes of cerebral arteries in rats an electron microscopic study	D' other observations on the apos; age induced changes in cerebral arteries in rats, a study by electron microscopy.
1	changes in the content of riboflavin and its coenzyme in tissues during the aging of rats	Changes in tissue riboflavin content and coenzyme during aging.
1	results of operation for obstructive hypertrophic cardiomyopathy in the elderly septal myotomy and myectomy in 20 patients 65 years of age or older	Results of surgery for obstructive hypertrophic cardiomyopathy in elderly patients who underwent septal myotomy and myectomy in 20 patients aged 65 years or older.
1	age related progress among children with severe learning difficulties	In addition, a number of initiatives have been undertaken to improve the quality of life of children.
1	age related changes of serum 5alpha androstane 3alpha 17beta diol in normal men	In addition to the above, there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	the influence of age height and weight on the bone mineral content of lumbar vertebrae	It is not possible to determine the age of the lumbar vertebrae and the age of the lumbar vertebrae.
1	age related changes in the degradation of thyrotrophin releasing hormone by human and rat serum	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
1	age strain interrelations in lipid metabolism of rats	In addition, there is a need for a more detailed description of the study.
1	postnatal development and sex differences in hepatic phosphatidate phosphohydrolase activity in the rat	Postnatal development and sexual differences in rat liver phosphatidate phosphohydrolase activity.
1	differences in mitogenic responses of murine t cells to two distinct phytohemagglutinin pha subcomponents	Differences in two-membered murine t-cell mitogenic responses under-distinct phytohemagglutinin pha components.
1	reasons for eliminating the age 60 regulation for airline pilots	In addition, there is a need to improve the quality of service to the public.
1	age dependence of social learning processes author s transl	It's a good way to learn to read, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write, write.
1	age related quantitative changes in enzyme activities of rat brain	Quantitative changes, related to age, in the rat brain's enzymatic activities.
1	the influence of age on the hypothalamo neurohypophyseal system of the mouse a quantitative ultrastructural analysis of the posterior pituitary	L' influence of apos; age on mouse hypothalamo neurohypophysial system has quantitative ultrastructural analysis of posterior pituitary.
1	susceptibility of mice to rotavirus infection effects of age and administration of corticosteroids	Rotavirus infections: mouse sensitivity to apo effects; age and apo; corticosteroid administration to rotavirus infections.
1	longitudinal changes in rigidity in old age	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
1	intelligence or relevant knowledge as a prerequisite for strategies in environmental management in old age	It is important to understand the nature of the environment and the nature of the environment in which it operates.
1	the nervous system and old age	Nervous system and aging.
1	age related changes in very low density lipoprotein metabolism in normal rats	A comparison of the results of a randomized controlled trial with those of a randomized trial.
1	creatine kinase isozyme transition in chicks with hereditary muscular dystrophy	"""Creine kinase transition isozyme in chicks with hereditary muscular dystrophy"", Arch."
1	blood pressure in the child and the adolescent effect of age sex height weight and heart rate	Blood Pressure in Children and Adolescents; Effects of Gender on Height, Weight and Heart Rate.
1	regional changes in phenylethanolamine n methyltransferase of rat brain during development	Regional Changes in Rat Brain Phenylethanolamine n Methyltransferase During Development.
2	studies on the fine structure of the mammalian testis i differentiation of the spermatids in the cat felis domestica	Fine structure studies of mammalian testes, spermatid differentiation i in felis domestica.
2	convulsant drug action on neuronally isolated cerebral cortex	Neurally isolated cerebral cortex, convulsive drug action.
2	estrogen sensitive neurons and sexual behavior in female cats	Estrogen-sensitive and female cat sexual behavior.
2	postsynaptic potentials and spike patterns during augmenting responses in cat s motor cortex	Possibilities post-synaptic and peak profiles during response; increase in chat motor cortex.
2	the effects of choline and other factors on the release of acetylcholine from the stimulated perfused superior cervical ganglion of the cat	Choline and d&apos effects; other factors on acetylcholine release from stimulated and perfused cat upper cervical ganglion.
2	visual motion detection in the cat	Cat motion visual detection.
2	reduction of dimethylsulfoxide to dimethylsulfide in the cat	Reduction of Dimethylsulfoxide to Dimethylsulfide in Cat.
2	post tetanic repetitive activity in the cat soleus nerve its origin course and mechanism of generation	L' repeat activity post-tetanic in the soleus nerve of the cat is followed by origin and generation mechanism.
2	attack elicited by stimulation of the thalamus of cats	Cats stimulated thalamic attack.
2	midbrain hemisection effect on cortical acetylcholine in the cat	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
2	electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord i action potentials of the motoneuron	In addition, it can be used as a means of reducing the risk of injury.
2	electrophysiology of the fetal spinal cord ii interaction among peripheral inputs and recurrent inhibition	Fetal spinal cord electrophysiology ii peripheral input interaction with l' recurrent inhibition.
2	the responses to tyramine of the normal and denervated nictitating membrane of the cat analysis of the mechanisms and sites of action	Normal and denervated nictitating membrane tyramine responses; cat analysis of mechanisms and sites; action.
2	activating and synchronizing centers in cat brain electroencephalograms after lesions	Cat brain electroencephalogram activation and synchronization of centers after lesions.
2	prolonged excitation in the visual cortex of the cat	Prolonged excitement in the cat's visual cortex.
2	nicotine effect on the sleep cycle of the cat	Effect of nicotine on cat sleep cycle.
2	histological evidence against the view that the cat s optic nerve contains centrifugal fibres	Histological evidence of centrifugal fibers in the cat's optic nerve.
2	somatic sensory cortical projection areas excited y tactile stimulation of the cat a triple representation	The cortical projection zones of the somatic sensory cortex excite a threefold representation.
2	the distribution of cholinesterases in the cat carotid body	Cholinesterase distribution in the carotid body.
2	background and evoked activity in the auditory pathway effects of noise shock pairing	History and activity evoked in ear canal effects; acoustic shock matching.
2	anteroventral cochlear nucleus wave forms of extracellularly recorded spike potentials	D&apos forms; peak wave potentials of the cochlear nucleus anteroventral recorded extracellularly.
2	the reflex response to sinusoidal stretching of soleus in the decerebrate cat	Reflex response to soleusal sinusoidal stretch in decerebrated cat.
2	organization of neurones in the cat cerebral cortex that are influenced from group i muscle afferents	Neuronal organization of the cerebral cortical neurons of the cat influenced by muscle afferents of group i.
2	asphyxial potentials of spinal grey matter and of ventral and dorsal roots	Asphyxiated spinal gray matter and dorsal and ventral root potential.
2	vesico somatic reflexes in the chronic spinal cat	Chronic spinal cat somatic vesico reflexes.
2	intracellular recording from cat spinal motoneurones during acute asphyxia	Intracellular recording of the cat's spinal motoneurons during asthma and asphyxiation.
2	intracellular recording from spinal motoneurones in cats with post asphyxial rigidity	Intracellular recording of cat spinal motoneurons with post-rigidity-asphyxia.
2	excretion of the glucuronide of thyroxine in cat bile	L'excretion de glucuronide de thyroxine dans la bile du chat.
2	facilitation electrical response enhanced by conditional excitation of cerebral cortex	Facilitating apos-stimulated electrical response; conditional cerebral cortical excitation.
2	synaptic noise as a source of variability in the interval between action potentials	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
2	excitation of afferent cardiac sympathetic nerve fibres during myocardial ischaemia	L' excitation of sympathetic nervous fibers of the afferent heart during ischemia.
2	acetylcholine sensitivity of cerebellar neurones in the cat	Acetylcholine sensitivity of cat cerebellar neurons.
2	learning set formation by mink ferrets skunks and cats	Training with mink ferrets, skunks, and cats.
2	input resistance electrical excitability and size of ventral horn cells in cat spinal cord	D&apos resistance; electrical excitability input and ventral horn cell size in the cat's spinal cord.
2	specialized receptive fields of the cat s retina	Specialized cat retina receptive fields.
2	the action of dopamine on neurones of the caudate nucleus	L' dopamine action on caudate nucleus neurons.
2	an analysis of spontaneous impulse activity of units in the striate cortex of unrestrained cats	Units in the striated cortex of unbridled cats; spontaneous activity of impulses.
2	the effects of suxamethonium and acetylcholine on the behaviour of cat muscle spindles during dynamics stretching and during fusimotor stimulation	The Effects of Suxamethonium and Apos; Acetylcholine on Cat Muscle Spindle Behaviour during Apos; Dynamic Stretching and Fusimotor Stimulation.
2	the release of acetylcholine from the spinal cord of the cat by antidromic stimulation of motor nerves	The release of d' acetylcholine from the cat's spinal cord by the anti-dromic stimulation of the cat's motor nerves.
2	the effects of acute haemorrhage on respiration in the cat	Acute hemorrhage on the cat's breathing.
2	algebraical summation in synaptic activation of motoneurones firing within the primary range to injected currents	Algebraic summit of the apos; synaptic activation of motor neurons discharging at injected currents in the primary range.
2	the effect of thyrocalcitonin on blood bone calcium equilibrium in the perfused tibia of the cat	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of hypertension and hypertension.
2	visual receptive fields in the cat s retina complications	Visual reception in complications of cat retina.
2	glial responses to degenerating cerebellar cortico nuclear pathways in the cat	Glial responses to the nuclear pathways of the degenerating cat cerebellar cortico.
2	sleep suppression of rapid eye movement phase in the cat after electroconvulsive shock	The fast-moving phase of the cat's eyes is suppressed by sleep after electroconvulsive shock.
2	a study of cholinoceptive cells in the lateral geniculate nucleus	A study of lateral genicular nucleus cholinoceptive cells.
2	receptive fields in the cat retina a new type	Receptive fields in cat's retina, new guy.
2	control of somatosensory input by cerebral cortex	Sensory entry by the cerebral cortex.
2	control of sensory fields by stimulation of hypothalamus	Sensory field control by stimulating the hypothalamus.
2	effects of changes in po2 pco2 and ph on the total vascular resistance of perfused cat kidneys	Effects of po2 pco2 and ph changes on total vascular resistance in perfused cat kidneys.
2	ascending and descending cholinergic fibers in cat spinal cord histochemical evidence	Cholinergic fibers, ascending and descending in the cat's spinal cord, histochemical evidence.
2	interaction of cortex and superior colliculus in mediation of visually guided behavior in the cat	Interaction of the cortex and the superior colliculus in mediating the visually guided behaviour of the cat.
2	inferior olive of the cat intracellular recording	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A system that can be used to monitor a person's health.
2	origin of synaptic noise	L&apos is the origin of the synaptic noise.
2	cilia formation in the adult cat brain after pargyline treatment	Formation of cilia in the brain of the adult cat after treatment with pargyline.
2	oxygen tension changes evoked in the brain by visual stimulation	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of oxygen.
2	binocularly driven neurons in visual cortex of split chiasm cats	Neurons that are trained by binoculation into the visual cortex of cats with separate chiasmata.
2	an inhibitory process in the cerebral cortex	An inhibitory process in cerebral cortex.
2	dissociation of the visual placing response into elicited and guided components	The visual placement response is separated into solicited and guided components.
2	responses in the inferior olive to stimulation of the cerebellar and cerebral cortices in the cat	Lapos reactions; olive inferior cerebellar and cerebral cortical stimulation in cat.
2	the laminar organization of dorsal horn and effects of descending impulses	L' dorsal horn laminar organization and descending impulse effects.
2	somatic afferent input to posterior thalamic neurones and their axon projection to the cerebral cortex in the cat	Somatic influx of posterior thalamic neurons and their axonal projection to the cat cerebral cortex.
2	activity of cells in the lateral vestibular nucleus as a function of head position	Cell activity in the lateral vestibular nucleus in relation to the position of the head.
2	thalamic projection of muscle nerve afferents in the cat	Thalamic prognosis in cats; muscle nerve afferents.
2	disuse in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat	Disuse in lateral genicular nucleus of cat.
2	release by tubocurarine of dopamine and homovanillic acid from the superfused caudate nucleus	Dopamine and d&apos tubocurarine release; homovanillic acid from superfused caudate nucleus.
2	thin layer chromatography of 1 dimethylaminonaphthalene 5 sulphonyl derivatives of amino acids present in superfusates of cat cerebral cortex	Apos thin-layer chromatography; dimethylaminonaphthalene derivative 5 sulfonyl d*apos; amino acids present in cat cerebral cortical superfusates.
2	effect on temperature of 5 hydroxytryptamine injected into the cerebral ventricles of cats	Temperature effect of 5 cerebral ventricular hydroxytryptamine injections in cats.
2	site of origin of the abnormal discharge in the electrocorticogram produced by tubocurarine perfused through the anterior horn of a lateral ventricle	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility that the implant may have been damaged by the infusion of an epidermal vein.
2	an afferent pathway for the selective release of vasopressin in response to carotid occlusion and haemorrhage in the cat	Route of selective vasopressin release in response to cat carotid occlusion and hemorrhage.
2	vestibular cochlear and trigeminal projections to the cortex in the anterior suprasylvian sulcus of the cat	Vestibular and trigeminal cochlear projections to the cerebral cortex in the cat's anterior suprasylvian groove.
2	responses of the pyramidal tract to stimulation of the baboon s motor cortex	Pyramidal tract reactions to stimulation of baboon motor cortex.
2	cerebral synaptic transmission and behavioral effects of dimethoxyphenylethylamine a potential psychotogen	Behavioural effects of dimethoxyphenylethylamine, a potential psychotogen.
2	temporal relation between long lasting aftercontractions and action potentials in cat papillary muscles	Temporal relationship between long-term post-contractions and cat papillary muscle action.
2	somatosensory thalamic neurons effects of cortical depression	Effects of Cortical Depression on the Thalamic Somatosensory Neurons.
2	visual form discrimination after removal of the visual cortex in cats	Visual form after apo discrimination; visual cortical ablation in cats.
2	dna content of neurons in the cat hippocampus	It's called a cat's hippocampus.
2	termination and functional organization of the dorsal spino olivocerebellar path	Spino olivocerebellar trail finish and functional organization dorsal.
2	three factors limiting the reliable detection of light by retinal ganglion cells of the cat	Three factors limit reliable light detection by cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	effects of nicotine on electrocortical activity and acetylcholine release from the cat cerebral cortex	Nicotine effects on apos; electrocortical activity and release of apos; acetylcholine from cat cerebral cortex.
2	gallamine flaxedil and synaptic transmission in the spinal cord	Gallamine flaxedil and synaptic spinal cord transmission.
2	projection to cerebral cortex of group i muscle afferents from the cat s hind limb	Projection of cat hindlimb i-group muscle afferents to the cerebral cortex.
2	the projection of splanchnic afferents on the cerebellum of the cat	Projection splanchnic afferents on the cat cerebellum.
2	visual area of the lateral suprasylvian gyrus clare bishop area of the cat	Visual area of suprasylvian lateral gyrus clare de l' cat bishop.
2	motor effects of copper in the caudate nucleus reversible lesions with ion exchange resin beads	Copper motor effects in reversible caudate core lesions with d&apos exchange resin beads; ions.
2	a quantitative analysis of the responses of certain dorsal horn neurones to mechanical stimulation of the large foot pad in cats	Quantitative analysis of certain dorsal horn neurons responses to mechanical pedal cushion stimulation in cats.
2	extraocular muscle afferents to the cerebellum of the cat	Extraocular muscle is attached to the cat's cerebellum.
2	responses evoked in the cerebellar cortex by stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	Reactions evoked in cerebellar cortex by caudate nucleus stimulation in the cat.
2	a reappraisal of reflex stepping in the cat	A re-evaluation of walk-in-the-cats reflex.
2	quantitative aspects of sensitivity and summation in the cat retina	Quantitative Aspects of Sensitivity and Sumation in the Cat's Retina.
2	kinins beta adrenergic receptors and functional vasodilatation in the submaxillary gland of the cat	Adrenergic beta receptor kinins and functional gland vasodilatation under-cat maxilla.
2	3h nicotine in cat superior cervical and nodose ganglia after close arterial injection in vivo	In vivo, 3 h of nicotine in the upper cervical ganglia of the cat and nodulate after narrow arterial injection.
2	group ia synaptic input to fast and slow twitch motor units of cat triceps surae	Synaptic influx of the ia group to motor units in the twitching and twitching of the cat triceps surae.
2	athetoid and choreiform hyperkinesias produced by caudate lesions in the cat	Athetoid and choreiform hyperkinesis caused by cat caudate lesions.
2	acetylcholine facilitation atropine block of synaptic excitation of cortical neurons	Facilitation of apos; acetylcholine atropine blockade of apos; cortical neuron synaptic excitation.
2	preserved vagal visceromotor function following destruction of the dorsal motor nucleus	Vagal visceromotor function was preserved after dorsal motor core destruction.
2	dorsal column projection of fibres from the cat knee joint	Fibrous spinal cord projection; articulation of the cat's knee.
2	effect of barbiturates on quantal synaptic transmission in spinal motoneurones	Effect of Barbiturates on Quantum Synaptic Transmission in Spinal Motoneurons.
2	glycine in the spinal cord of cats with local tetanus rigidity	Glycine in cat spinal cord with local tetanic rigidity.
2	opponent color cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus	Counter-cell staining of the lateral genicular nucleus of the cat.
2	non linear summation of unit synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurones of the cat	Nonlinear summation of synaptic unitary potentials in cat spinal motoneurons.
2	analysis of synaptic efficacy in spinal motoneurones from quantum aspects	It's the same thing, it's the same thing, it's different.
2	neuromuscular contacts in intracranial arteries of the cat	In the cat's intracranial arteries, neuromuscular contacts.
2	the spatial selectivity of the visual cells of the cat	Cat's visual cell spatial selectivity.
2	excitatory postsynaptic potential and monosynaptic reflex discharge of spinal motoneurons during anoxic insult	Exciting postsynaptic potentials and spinal motorcycles' monosynaptic reflex discharge during the apos; anoxic aggression.
2	properties of cholinoceptive neurones in the medial geniculate nucleus	Properties of median genicular cholinoceptor neurons.
2	studies on cholinergic transmission in the medial geniculate nucleus	Studies of median genicular cholinergic transmission.
2	mephenesin methocarbamol chlordiazepoxide and diazepam actions on spinal reflexes and ventral root potentials	Prepared for the Canadian Environmental Assessment Agency, Environment Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
2	release to the cerebral ventricles of substances with possible transmitter function in the caudate nucleus	Release of substances with a possible caudate nucleus transmitter function into the cerebral ventricles.
2	thermosensitivity of neurons in the sensorimotor cortex of the cat	Neural temperature sensitivity in the cat sensorimotor cortex.
2	cat colour vision one cone process or several	It's a good way to see the colors of a cat through a cone or through several cones.
2	the nature and location of certain phasic mechanoreceptors in the cat s foot	It's a good way to get a feel for the natural world and the location of some of the phasic mechano-receptors in the foot of the cat.
2	the mechanical properties of cat soleus muscle during controlled lengthening and shortening movements	Cat soleus muscle mechanical properties during controlled elongation and shortening motions.
2	correlation of prostaglandin release from the cerebral cortex of cats with the electrocorticogram following stimulation of the reticular formation	Correlation between cerebral cerebral cortical prostaglandin release and l' electrocorticogram after stimulation of reticular formation.
2	effect of monoamineoxidase inhibitors on 5 hydroxytryptamine output from perfused cerebral ventricles of anaesthetized cats	Effect of monoamine inhibitors-oxidase on the release of 5 perfused cerebral ventricle hydroxytryptamine from anesthetized cats.
2	cat brain mucopolysaccharides and their in vivo hyaluronidase digestion	The mucopolysaccharides of the cat brain and their digestion in vivo by the hyaluronidase.
2	electrophysiological evidence for binocular disparity detectors in human visual system	Electrophysiological evidence of the presence of detectors of binocular disparity in the human visual system.
2	somatovisceral pathway rapidly conducting fibers in the spinal cord	Somatoviscal tract, rapidly conductive fibers in her spinal cord.
2	effects of nicotine and tobacco smoke on the electrical activity of the cerebral cortex and olfactory bulb	Electrical activity of the cerebral cortex and the olfactory bulb.
2	visual experience modifies distribution of horizontally and vertically oriented receptive fields in cats	L' visual experiment modifies the distribution of the receptive fields oriented horizontally and vertically in cats.
2	number coding in association cortex of the cat	Numerical code in the d&apos cortex.
2	behavioral discrimination of click intensity in cat	Clicking is a good way to find out more about a person's behaviour.
2	afferent connexions to group i activated cells in the main cuneate nucleus of the cat	Affiliate group i connections activate the cell line in the cat's main wedge nucleus.
2	central nervous system activity associated with the pain evoked by bradykinin and its alteration by morphine and aspirin	An activity of the central nervous system associated with bradykinin-evoked pain and alteration by morphine and aspirin.
2	superior colliculus single unit responses to stimulation of visual cortex in the cat	Superior unitary responses of colliculus to cat visual cortical stimulation.
2	a method of stimulating different segments of the autonomic outflow from the spinal column to various organs in the pithed cat and rat	A method to stimulate different spinal segments; autonomous spinal flow to various organs in decerebrated cat and rat.
2	histochemical and functional correlations in anterior horn neurons of the cat spinal cord	Functional and histochemical correlations in neurons in the anterior horn of the cat spinal cord.
2	unilateral ablation of the auditory cortex in the cat impairs complex sound localization	L' unilateral ablation of auditory cortex in cat prevents a complex sound localization.
2	effects of general depressant drugs on the electrical responses of isolated slabs of cat s cerebral cortex	Effects of general depressants on electrical responses to isolated patches of cat cerebral cortex.
2	effects of general stimulant drugs on the electrical responses of isolated slabs of cat s cerebral cortex	Effects of systemic stimulants on electrical responses of isolated patches of cat cerebral cortex.
2	a study in vivo of adrenergic receptors in the rectum and in the internal and sphincter of the cat	An in vivo study of adrenergic receptors in the cat's rectum, inner sphincter, and sphincter.
2	neural pathways associated with hypothalamically elicited attach behavior in cats	Neural pathways associated with the behaviour of d' hypothalamic attachments in cats.
2	visual patterned reflex present during hypothalamically elicited attack	It's called a visual reflex, and it's present during the apos; it's triggered hypothalamously.
2	the effects of dimethothiazine on muscle spindle activity in the decerebrate cat	The effects of dimethothiazine on spindle muscle activity in a brain-dead cat.
2	geometrical illusions and the response of neurones in the cat s visual cortex to angle patterns	Geometrical illusions and cat visual cortical neuron response to d' angle.
2	microinjections of tubocurarine leptazol strychnine and picrotoxin into the cerebral cortex of anaesthetized cats	Microinjections of leptazol strychnine and picrotoxin tubocurarine into anesthetized cats cerebral cortex.
2	superior colliculus some receptive field properties of bimodally responsive cells	Superior colliculus some receptive-field properties of bimodal response cells.
2	how does the striate cortex begin the reconstruction of the visual world	How does striated cortex start-t-it visual world reconstruction?
2	somatosensory responses of bulboreticular units in awake cat relation to escape producing stimuli	Bulboreticular unit somatosensory reactions in relation to the cat awakened to flight producing stimuli.
2	functional specializations of the vascular bed of soleus	Functional Specializations of Solar Vascular Bed.
2	the extraneuronal uptake and localization of noradrenaline in the cat spleen and the effect on this of some drugs of cold and of denervation	The extraneuronal norepinephrine uptake and localization in the cat spleen and lapos; effect of certain cold and denervation drugs on norepinephrine.
2	responses of cat retinal ganglion cells to brief flashes of light	Reactions of the ganglion cells of the cat's retina to brief flashes of light.
2	the form and distribution of the surface evoked responses in cerebellar cortex from intercostal nerves in the cat	Surface shape and distribution suggest responses in the cerebellar cortex of cat intercostals.
2	perfusion from cerebral ventricle to cisterna magna in the unanaesthetized cat effect of calcium on body temperature	Perfusion of the cerebral ventricle to the magna cistern in the apos; unanaesthetized cat effect of calcium on the body temperature.
2	the representation of three dimensional visual space in the cat s striate cortex	The representation of l' three-dimensional visual space in cat's striated cortex.
2	cervico lumbar reflex interactions involving a proprioceptive receiving area of the cerebral cortex	Cervical reflex interactions-lumbar involving a cerebral cortical proprioceptive receptor area.
2	mesopic increment threshold spectral sensitivity of single optic tract fibres in the cat cone rod interaction	Apos threshold; mesopic enhancement Spectral fibre sensitivity in apos; single optical tract in apos; cat cone stick interaction.
2	differences in the distribution of catecholamine varicosities in cat and rat reticular formation	Differences in catecholamine varicose distribution in reticular formation in cat and rat.
2	field potentials evoked in the brain stem of the cat by stimulation of the carotid sinus glossopharyngeal aortic and superior laryngeal nerves	Field potentials evoked in the cat brain stem by l&apos stimulation; glossopharyngeal aorta of carotid sinus and superior laryngeal nerves.
2	responses of cells in the brain stem of the cat to stimulation of the sinus glossopharyngeal aortic and superior laryngeal nerves	Reactions of cat brain stem cells to apos stimulation; glossopharyngeal sinus aorta and superior laryngeal nerves.
2	ouabain sensitive carrier mediated transport of glucose from the cerebral ventricles to surrounding tissues in the cat	Glucose transport from the cerebral ventricles into surrounding tissues of the cat is mediated by a ouabain-sensitive carrier.
2	the afferent innervation of two infrahyoid muscles of the cat	L' innervation afferent of two subhyoid cat muscles.
2	impedance changes across the footpad of the cat in relation to action and secretion in sweat glands	L' impedance changes on the cat's floor mat as a function of sweat gland secretion and action.
2	spontaneous activity of neurones of nucleus reticularis thalami in freely moving cats	Reticularis thalami nucleus neuron spontaneous activity in free-ranging cats.
2	centrifugal inhibitory processes affecting neurones in the cat cochlear nucleus	The process of d' centrifugal inhibition affecting the cochlear nucleus neurons of the cat.
2	acetylcholine liberation from cerebral cortex during paradoxical rem sleep	Cerebral cortical acetylcholine release during REM REM REM sleep.
2	the release of gamma aminobutyric acid during inhibition in the cat visual cortex	In addition, it can be used as a tool to determine the effectiveness of the treatment.
2	the mechanism of the cardio acceleration elicited by electrical stimulation of the parahypoglossal area in the cat	The mechanism of l' cardio acceleration triggered by electrical stimulation of the cat's parahypoglossal region.
2	recurrent inhibition of interneurones monosynaptically activated from group ia afferents	Monosynaptically activated interneurons are recurrently inhibited by ia group afferents.
2	spino spinal mechanisms in the chloralose anaesthetized cat	Chloralose-anesthetized cat spinal mechanisms.
2	cat colour vision evidence for more than one cone process	The vision of the colors of the cat shows the existence of more of them; a cone process.
2	responses to visual contours spatio temporal aspects of excitation in the receptive fields of simple striate neurones	Responses to spatio-temporal visual contours of elicitation in single striated neuron receptor fields.
2	presynaptic and post synaptic inhibition elicited in the cat s dorsal column nuclei by mechanical stimulation of skin	Presynaptic and post-synaptic inhibition was induced in the nuclei of the cat's dorsal column by mechanical skin stimulation.
2	variations of the visual responses of the superior colliculus in relation to body roll	Changes in superior colliculus visual responses with respect to body roll.
2	identification of prostaglandins in prevertebral venous blood after preganglionic stimulation of the cat superior cervical ganglion	Identification of prostaglandins in the prevertebral venous blood following preganglionic stimulation of the cat's upper cervical ganglion.
2	acetylcholine in adrenergic terminals of the cat iris	L' acetylcholine, in the adrenergic endings of the cat.
2	chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of cat visual cortical cells cone rod interaction	Chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of the apos; interaction of the cone rods of visual cortical cells of the cat.
2	spinal sympathetic reflexes initiated by coronary receptors	Coronary receptor initiated spinal sympathetic reflexes.
2	neuronal correlates of eye movements in the visual cortex of the cat	Neuronal correlations of eye movements in cat visual cortex.
2	spontaneous activity of cerebellar purkinje cells and their responses to impulses in climbing fibres	L&apos is the spontaneous activity of cerebellar purkin cells and their response to pulses in climbing fibers.
2	vasoactive hormones in endotoxin shock a comparative study in cats and dogs	A comparative study of vasoactive hormones in endotoxic shock in dogs and in cats.
2	effects of some sympathomimetic drugs and their antagonists on afterdischarges elicited in chronically isolated slabs of cerebral cortex	The effects of certain antagonists and sympathomimetic drugs on post--discharges were elicited in chronically isolated slices of cerebral cortex.
2	anomalous retinal pathways in the siamese cat an inadequate substrate for normal bioncular vision	Abnormal retinal pathways in Siamese cats are an inadequate substrate for bioncular vision.
2	fusimotor innervation in the cat	Cat fusimotor innervation.
2	the parasympathetic secretory nerves of the lacrimal gland of the cat	Parasympathetic secretory nerves of the cat's lacrimal gland.
2	rod dependent intracellular responses to light recorded from the pigment epithelium of the cat retina	Rod-mediated intracellular light-dependent reactions recorded in cat retinal pigment epithelium.
2	binocular interaction fields of single units in the cat striate cortex	Fields d' binocular d&apos interaction; simple units within the striated cortex of the cat.
2	synaptic transmission in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat after reinnervation by vagus fibres	Synaptic transmission in the cat's upper cervical ganglion, following reinnervation by vaginal fibers.
2	the purkinje shift in cat extent of the mesopic range	It's the only way you can get the information you need.
2	aberrant visual projections in the siamese cat	Misleading visual projection in the Siamese cat.
2	the flow of juice from the pancreatic gland of the cat in response to vagal stimulation	The cat's pancreatic gland juice output in response to the vagal stimulation.
2	recurrent inhibition of fusimotor neurones exhibiting background discharges in the decerebrate and the spinal cat	Recurrent inhibition of fusimotor neurons, which have been shown to have a background discharge in the decerebrate and spinal cat.
2	the paramedian reticular nucleus a site of inhibitory interaction between projections from fastigial nucleus and carotid sinus nerve acting on blood pressure	The paramedial reticular nucleus is a site of blood pressure inhibition between carotid sinus nerve and fastidial nucleus projections.
2	modification of the reflex response to stimulation of carotid sinus baroreceptors during and following stimulation of the hypothalamic defence area in the cat	Modification of reflex response to carotid sinus baroreceptor stimulation during and after stimulation of the hypothalamic defense zone in the cat.
2	sex difference in the number of the sympathetic neurons in the spinal cord of the cat	Sexual difference in number of sympathetic neurons in spinal cord of cat.
2	a neuron model with spatially distributed synaptic input	Neural model with synaptic input device distributed in the apos; space.
2	radiofrequency cordotomy for the relief of spasticity in decerebrate cats	Radio frequency cordotomy to relieve spasticity in decerebrated cats.
2	spatial synaptic distribution of recurrent and group ia inhibitory systems in cat spinal motoneurones	Spatial synaptic distribution of the d&apos systems; recurrent inhibition and group inhibition in the spinal motoneurons of cats.
2	visual and auditory inputs into the cuneate nucleus	Visual and auditory kernel inputs.
2	the action of carbon dioxide on afferent transmission in the dorsal column lemniscal system	L' carbon dioxide action on afferent transmission in the lemniscal dorsal column system.
2	the action of carbon dioxide on synaptic transmission in the cuneate nucleus	L' carbon dioxide action on synaptic transmission in the dune nucleus.
2	specialized membrane junctions between neurons in the vertebrate cerebellar cortex	Specialized neuronal membrane junctions in the cerebellar cortex of vertebrates.
2	physiological and structural changes in the cat s soleus muscle due to immobilization at different lengths by plaster casts	Structural and physiological changes in the soleus muscle of the cat due to an immobilization of different lengths by plaster.
2	spontaneous and evoked activity of neurones in the somatosensory thalamus of the waking cat	Spontaneous evoked neuronal activity in the awake cat somatosensory thalamus.
2	sustained and transient neurones in the cat s retina and lateral geniculate nucleus	Transient and sustained cat retinas and lateral genital nuclei.
2	the form and distribution of the receptive fields of pacinian corpuscles found in and around the cat s large foot pad	The shape and distribution of receptive fields of pacinic corpuscles that are found within and around the cat's great paw.
2	selective inhibition by glycine of some somatic reflexes in the cat	Selective glycine inhibition of certain cat somatic reflexes.
2	effects of dopamine on the conductance of perfused vascular beds of the chloralosed cat	Dopamine effects on conductance of chloralose cat perfused vascular beds.
2	responses of neurones in the cat s visual cerebral cortex to relative movement of patterns	Reactions of visual cerebral cortical neurons to the relative motion of the models.
2	cholinergic and non cholinergic transmission in the medial geniculate nucleus of the cat	Cholinergic and noncholinergic transmission in median genicular nucleus of cat.
2	a study of stretch and vibration reflexes of the cat by intracellular recording from motoneurones	A study of the cat's reflexes, stretching, and vibration by the intracellular recording of motor neurons.
2	the vasomotor component of the carotid sinus baroreceptor reflex in the cat during stimulation of the hypothalamic defence area	The vasomotor component of the cat carotid sinus baroreceptor reflex during hypothalamic defense zone stimulation.
2	image quality of the cat eye measured during retinal ganglion cell experiments	Quality of tissue; image of tissue; cat's eye as measured by retinal ganglion cells.
2	morphologic alterations of synapses in electrically stimulated superior cervical ganglia of the cat	Morphological synaptic alterations in electrically stimulated cat superior cervical ganglia.
2	the time course of minimal excitory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurones by group ia afferent fibres	L' temporal evolution of potentials post-minimal excitatory synaptics evoked in spinal motoneurons by afferent fibers of the ia group.
2	spinal integration of segmental cortical and breathing inputs to thoracic respiratory motoneurones	Spinal Integration of Cortical and Respiratory Segmental Intakes (CRIs) with Chest Respiratory Motoneurons.
2	columnar organization of visually driven neurons in the superior colliculus of the cat	Organize in columns visually controlled neurons in the cat's upper colliculus.
2	effects of cingulate cortex lesions on emotional behavior and delayed responses in cats	The effects of the cingulate lesions of the cortex on emotional behaviour and delayed responses in cats.
2	antagonism of gaba by picrotoxin in the feline cerebral cortex	L' feline cerebral cortical picrotoxin antagonism of gaba.
2	effects of narcotic analgesics and antagonists on the in vivo release of acetylcholine from the cerebral cortex of the cat	Effects of narcotic analgesics and antagonists on in vivo acetylcholine release from cat cerebral cortex.
2	the mechanism of the facilitatory action of edrophonium in cat skeletal muscle	The Mechanism of Lapos; Facilitating Action of Edrophonium in Cat Skeletal Muscle.
2	modifications of dorsal horn cell activities in the spinal cord after intra arterial injection of bradykinin	Modification of apos; dorsal horn cell activity in spinal cord following intra-@arterial injection of bradykinin.
2	influence of adaptation level on response pattern and sensitivity of ganglion cells in the cat s retina	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - A system of cells that can be used to monitor and evaluate the performance of a cat.
2	cat hemoglobin ph dependent cooperativity of oxygen binding	It is also important to note that there is a high degree of co-operation between the two groups.
2	visual input to the pontine nuclei	Visual entry into pontic nuclei.
2	unit responses to moving visual stimuli in the motor cortex of the cat	Unitary reactions to visual moving stimuli in the cat motor cortex.
2	release of 5 hydroxytryptamine from caudate nucleus and septum	Release of five hydroxytryptamines from the caudate nucleus and septum.
2	release of transmitters on stimulation of the nucleus linearis raphe in the cat	D&apos release; linearis stimulation emitters in cat.
2	effects of denervation and reinnervation on the responses of kitten muscles to acetylcholine and suxamethonium	Effects of Denervation and Reinnervation on Cattle muscle responses to acetylcholine and suxamethonium.
2	an electrophysiological demonstration of the axonal projections of single spinal interneurones in the cat	Axonal projections of simple spinal interneurons in the cat are electrophysiologically demonstrated.
2	facilitation of monosynaptic excitatory synaptic potentials in spinal motoneurones evoked by internuncial impulses	Facilitation of synaptic excitatory monosynaptic potentials in spinal motoneurons evoked by interuncial impulses.
2	quantal components of the inhibitory synaptic potential in spinal mononeurones of the cat	Quantum components of inhibitory synaptic potential in cat spinal mononurons.
2	comparison of receptive field organization of the superior colliculus in siamese and normal cats	Comparison of l&apos, superior colliculus receptive-field organization in normal and Siamese cats.
2	the contrast sensitivity of the cat	Cat contrast sensitivity.
2	contrasts in spatial organization of receptive fields at geniculate and retinal levels centre surround and outer surround	In addition, there is a wide range of genetic factors, including genetic factors, genetic factors, genetic factors, and genetic factors.
2	the effect of chronic duct ligation on the vascular and secretory responses of the cat s submaxillary gland	Lapos; dapos effect; chronic channel ligation on gland secretory and vascular responses under <-> catilla maxilla.
2	morphology of interneurones mediating ia reciprocal inhibition of motoneurones in the spinal cord of the cat	Mediating interneurons morphology; reciprocal inhibition of motoneurons in cat spinal cord.
2	sarcocystis in mice inoculated with toxoplasma like oocysts from cat feces	In toxoplasm-inoculated mice, the sarcocyst resembles oocysts from the cat feces.
2	chromatic sensitivity and spatial organization of lgn neurone receptive fields in cat cone rod interaction	Chromatic sensitivity and l' spatial organization of the receptor fields of lgn neurons in the cell surface; interaction of cat cone rods.
2	sensitivity of the nictitating membrane of the cat to succinylcholine after decentralization and denervation	Sensitivity of cat nictitating membrane to succinylcholine following decentralization and denervation.
2	anaesthetic cardiovascular and respiratory effects of a new steroidal agent ct 1341 a comparison with other intravenous anaesthetic drugs in the unrestrained cat	Cardiovascular and respiratory anesthetic effects of apos; a new 1341 steroidal agent compared with dapos; other intravenous anesthetic drugs in the cat without restraint.
2	the behavior of chronic cats with lesions in the frontal association cortex	Chronic cat behavior with lesions in the d&apos cortex; frontal association.
2	determination of the frequency response of isometric soleus muscle in the cat using random nerve stimulation	Frequency response of isometric cat soleus muscle by random nerve stimulation.
2	cats reared in stroboscopic illumination effects on receptive fields in visual cortex	Cats raised in strobe lighting have had an effect on the receptive fields in the visual cortex.
2	differential transport of protein in axons comparison between the sciatic nerve and dorsal columns of cats	Differential protein transport in sciatic nerve vs. cat dorsal column comparison axons.
2	effects of adrenaline isoprenaline and histamine on transsinusoidal fluid filtration in the cat liver	Effects of Epinephrine, Adrenaline, Isoprenaline and Apos; Histamine on Transsinusoidal Filtration of Liquid in Cat Liver.
2	synchronization of discharge spontaneous and evoked between inspiratory neurons	Spontaneous and evoked discharge synchronization between inspiring neurons.
2	neuronal organization of the central respiratory mechanisms in the brain stem of the cat	Neuronal organization of central respiratory mechanisms in cat brain stem.
2	anatomical and functional heterogeneity of the medullary respiratory neurons	Functional and anatomical heterogeneity of spinal cord respiratory neurons.
2	isolation of rd 114 like oncornavirus from a cat cell line	Isolate rd 114 as oncornavirus from cats.
2	receptive field organization of sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells which subserve different function roles	Organizing the receptive field of the transient and sustained retinal ganglion cells, which have different functional roles.
2	release of transmitters into the perfused third cerebral ventrical of the cat	Release of transmitters in the cat's third, perfused, cerebral ventricle.
2	the visual areas in the splenial sulcus of the cat	In the splenial groove of the cat.
2	visual resolution and experience acuity deficits in cats following early selective visual deprivation	Visual resolution and the experience of shortness of breath, acuity in cats as a result of rapid onset of selective visual deprivation.
2	visual experience without lines effect on developing cortical neurons	In addition, there are a number of other factors that influence the development of cortical neurons.
2	predatory attack grooming and consummatory behaviors evoked by electrical stimulation of cat cerebellar nuclei	Predatory attack, grooming, and consumptive behaviors evoked by the electrical stimulation of the cat's central cerebellar cores.
2	flux not retinal illumination is what cat retinal ganglion cells really care about	The flow, not the lapos, is what the retinal ganglion cells of the cat are really interested in.
2	the organization of visual receptive fields or neurons in the cat colliculus superior	L' receptive visual field or neuron organization in the cat superior colliculus.
2	receptive fields of simple cells in the cat striate cortex	Receptive fields of single cells within the cat's striated cortex.
2	electron microscopy of cat spinal cord subject to circulatory arrest and deep local hypothermia 15 c	Electron microscopy of the cat's spinal cord is subject to severe local hypothermia 15 c.
2	morphometry of an ischemic lesion of cat spinal cord	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - A system of medical care in the United States.
2	evidence from the use of vibration during procaine nerve block that the spindle group ii fibres contribute excitation to the tonic stretch reflex of the decerebrate cat	Use of vibrations during nerve blockage of the process shows that spindle group ii fibers contribute to spindle apos; spindle reflex excitation; decerebrated cat tonic stretch.
2	gamma aminobutyric acid antagonism in visual cortex different effects on simple complex and hypercomplex neurons	L' gamma antagonism of l' aminobutyric acid in the visual cortex had different effects on the complex neurons and simple hypercomplexes.
2	on the pharmacology of the gamma aminobutyric acid receptors on the cuneo thalamic relay cells of the cat	On the pharmacology of l&apos gamma receptors; amino acid on cat cuneo thalamic-relay cells.
2	the amplitude time course and charge of unitary excitatory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurone dendrites	L' temporal evolution of apos; amplitude and loading of excitatory unitary post-synaptic potentials were evoked in Spinal Motoneuron dendrites.
2	physiological types and histochemical profiles in motor units of the cat gastrocnemius	Histochemical patterns and physiological types in the motor units of the gastrocnemius cat.
2	anatomy and innervation ratios in motor units of cat gastrocnemius	Anatomy and rates of apo; innervation in the cat gastrocnemius motor units.
2	actions of morphine on the segmental reflex of the decerebrate spinal cat	Morphine effects on the spinal cat's segmental reflex.
2	excitability changes in cat lateral geniculate cells during saccadic eye movements	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - A system that is used to determine the frequency and severity of stroke.
2	the projection of the posterior knee joint nerve to the cerebellar cortex	The posterior articular nerve projection from the knee to the cerebellar cortex.
2	receptive field analysis responses to moving visual contours by single lateral geniculate neurones in the cat	Receptive field analysis reacts to moving visual outlines with simple cat lateral genicular neurons.
2	kitten visual cortex short term stimulus induced changes in connectivity	Changes in connectivity were induced by the short-term visual cortical stimulus of the kitten.
2	interaction between picrotoxin and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat	Picrotoxin – 5 hydroxytryptamine interaction in the cat upper cervical ganglion.
2	synaptic vesicle depletion and recovery in cat sympathetic ganglia electrically stimulated in vivo evidence for transmitter secretion by exocytosis	Depletion and recovery of synaptic vesicles in the sympathetic ganglia of the cat were stimulated electrically in vivo, indicating exocytosis-mediated transmitter secretion.
2	central projection of tooth pulp primary afferents in the cat	Central projection of the cat's primary tooth-pulp afferents.
2	conditioned blink reflex and neuronal activity in the auditory cortex of the cat	Conditioned flashing reflex and neural activity in cat auditory cortex.
2	dynamic properties of denervated fast and slow twitch muscle of the cat	Dynamic properties of fast, slow, denervated cat twitch muscles.
2	relationships between motor nerve conduction velocities and motor unit contraction characteristics in a slow twitch muscle of the cat	Relationships between the conduction velocities of the motor nerve and the contraction characteristics of the motor unit in a slow twitch cat muscle.
2	electrical activity of cerebral cortex in the cat during closure of simple form of a temporary connection	Electrical activity of the cerebral cortex during the closure of apos; a simple form of temporary connection.
2	functional significance of ventral descending tracts of the spinal cord in the cat	Functional importance of descending spinal cord ventral pathways in cats.
2	5 hydroxyindoleacetic acid in the lumbar fluid a specific indicator of spinal cord injury	It's a specific indicator of the damage to the spinal cord.
2	macroelectrodic activity of the facial nucleus of the cat	Macroelectrodic core cat facial activity.
2	operant conditioning of single unit response patterns in visual cortex	It's called surgical conditioning of response patterns to a single unit in the visual cortex.
2	influence of eye movements on geniculo striate excitability in the cat	L' influence of ocular movements on apos; excitability of genital striate in cats.
2	normal contractile state of hypertrophied myocardium after pulmonary artery constriction in the cat	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is the most common type of hypertrophied myocardium, with the exception of hypertrophied myocardium.
2	mechanical studies on the retractor bulbi muscle and its motor units in the cat	Mechanical studies of retractor bulbs and motor units in cats.
2	the detection of differential beta adrenoceptor blockade in the cat	A differential blockade of beta-adrenergic receptors in cats.
2	the bleaching and regeneration of rhodopsin in the cat	Bleaching and rhodopsin regeneration in chat.
2	cat retinal ganglion cells size and shape of receptive field centres	The cat retinal ganglion cell size and shape are centres of receptive field.
2	temperature sensitivity of the paw of the cat a behavioural study	Cat's paw temperature sensitivity a behavioral study.
2	the afferent discharge pattern of atrial mechanoreceptors in the cat during sinusoidal stretch of atrial strips in situ	The afferent discharge pattern of cat atrial mechanoreceptors during apogee; sinusoidal stretching of atrial strips in situ.
2	the projection of the vestibular nerve to the cerebral cortex in the cat	Cerebral cortical projection from the vestibular nerve in the cat.
2	antigenicity of serum albumin in allergy against cat or dog epithelium significance of the radioallergosorbens test in the diagnosis of allergies	Antigenicity of apos; serum albumin allergy to apos; cat or dog epithelium, meaning radioallergosorbens test in diagnosis of allergies.
2	types of synapses in the claustrum of the cat	Synapses in the cat's claustrum.
2	the structure of the first auditory cortex a i in the cat i light microscopic observations on its organization	The structure of the first auditory cortex has i in the cat, i photonic microscopic observations on its organization.
2	manganese ions and synaptic transmission in the superior cervical ganglion of the cat	Manganese ions and their synaptic transmission in the cat's upper cervical ganglion.
2	reconstruction of axonal trajectory of individual neurons in the spinal cord using golgi stained serial sections	Reconstruction of the axonal trajectory of individual neurons in the spinal cord at the apos, with the aid of serial sections stained with golgi.
2	fine structure and distribution of axon terminals from the cochlear nucleus on neurons in the medial superior olivary nucleus of the cat	Fine structure and distribution of cochlear nucleus axonal terminals on cat median upper olivary nuclei neurons.
2	projections of extraocular neck muscle and retinal afferents to superior colliculus in the cat their connections to cells of origin of tectospinal tract	Extraocular neck muscle projections and upper colliculus retinal afferents in the cat their connections to d' origin of the tectospinal tract.
2	enlargement of synaptic vesicles in degenerating nerve endings a comparison between cat and monkey	Synaptic vesicles increase in degenerating nerve endings; comparison between cat and monkey.
2	effect of delayed local cooling on experimental spinal cord injury	Delayed local cooling of the experimental spinal cord injury.
2	behavioural contrast sensitivity of the cat in various visual meridians	Sensitivity to the cat's behavioral contrast in a variety of visual meridians.
2	the effect of indomethacin on the cardiovascular and metabolic responses to e coli endotoxin in the cat	Apos; effect of apos; indomethacin on metabolic and cardiovascular responses to apos; apos endotoxin; e coli in cats.
2	organization of corticofugal neurones in somatosensory area ii of the cat	Organizing corticofugal neurons in the cat's somatosensory zone ii.
2	the effect of visual experience on the development of stimulus specificity by kitten cortical neurones	L' effect of apos; visual experience on stimulus specificity development by cortical neurons of kitten.
2	contradiction of auditory and visual information by brain stimulation	It is also important to understand the role of the brain in the development of mental health.
2	abolition of electrically induced cortical seizures by stereotactic thalamic lesions evidence for descending thalamopontine medullar spinal connections in the centrencephalic epileptic system of the cat	L' abolition of electrical-induced cortical seizures induced by stereotactical thalamic lesions indicates the existence of medullary connections descending from thalamopontin in the centrainphalic epileptic system of the cat.
2	the activity of respiratory neurons before and during panting in the cat	L' respiratory neuron activity prior to and during gasping in cats.
2	treatment of ethylene glycol toxicosis in cats	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
2	cns site of antiarrhythmic action of diphenylhydantoin dph in the cat	It can be used as an anti-arrhythmic agent in cats.
2	the mode of action of 5 hydroxytryptophan in facilitating a stretch reflex in the spinal cat	The Dapos mode; action of 5 hydroxytryptophan to facilitate a Dapos reflex; stretching in spinal cats.
2	vestibular and somatosensory inflow to the vestibular projection area in the post cruciate dimple region of the cat cerebral cortex	Vestibular and somatosensory entry in the projection vestibular area of the fossa area post-crossed cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	evoked activity of cat association cortex neurons in different sleep stages	It has been suggested that cortical neuron activity is involved in the cat's association with various stages of sleep.
2	evoked automatism repeated responses of cat cardiac ventricular fibers	Cardiac ventricular fibers in the cat, evoked automated repeated reactions.
2	corticofugal influences of somatosensory areas of the cortex on signal transmission in the posterior ventral nucleus	Corticofugal influences of somatosensory regions of the cortex on signaling in posterior ventral nucleus.
2	quantitative aspects of the shift effect in cat retinal ganglion cells	Quantitative aspects of l' effect of displacement in the ganglion cells of the cat retina.
2	the synaptic structure of catecholaminergic axon varicosities in the dorso medial portion of the nucleus tractus solitarius of the cat possible roles in the regulation of cardiovascular reflexes	The synaptic structure of catecholaminergic axonal varicosities in the dorso-middle portion of the cat solitary bundle nucleus may play a role in cardiovascular reflex regulation.
2	effects of co 2 and extracellular h iontophoresis on single cell activity in the cat brainstem	Effects of apos; co2 and apos ionophoresis; h extracellular apos ionophoresis; monocytocellular activity in cat brain stem.
2	cardiovascular chemoreflexes from the perfused innervated ileum of the cat	Cardiovascular apos chemoreflexes; innervated cat ileum.
2	effect of nitrogen narcosis on cortical and subcortical evoked responses in the cat	L' effect of Narcosis on cortical responses and Narcosis under-corticalales was discussed in the cat.
2	projections from the nucleus and tractus solitarius in the cat	Nuclear and tractal projections in the cat.
2	olivocochlear and vestibular efferent neurons of the feline brain stem their location morphology and number determined by retrograde axonal transport and acetylcholinesterase histochemistry	The olivocochlear and vestibular efferent neurons of the feline brain have a localization morphology and a number determined by axonal retrograde transport and l' histochemistry of l' acetylcholinesterase.
2	projections of the dorsal column nuclei and the spinal cord on the inferior olive in the cat	Spinal column and spinal cord nuclei projected onto the cat's lower olive.
2	variability of the relative preference for stimulus orientation and direction of movement in some units of the cat visual cortex areas 17 and 18	Variability of relative preference for l' orientation of stimuli and direction of motion in some of the cat's visual cortical zones 17 and 18.
2	the effect of a chronic lesion in cortical area 17 on the visual responses of units in area 18 of the cat	L' effect of chronic lesion in cortical area 17 on visual responses in cat area 18.
2	climbing fibre inputs to cerebellar purkinje cells from trigeminal cutaneous afferents and the si face area of the cerebral cortex in the cat	Fibre-climbing inputs into the cerebellar purkinje cells of the cat's cerebral cortex and trigeminal skin afferents.
2	responses of fastigial nucleus neurones to stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	Fastigial nucleus neuron responses to caudate nucleus stimulation in cats.
2	periodic excitability changes across the receptive fields of complex cells in the striate and parastriate cortex of the cat	The excitability varies periodically through complex cell receptor fields in the cat's striated and parastriate cortex.
2	corticofugal effects from sensorimotor area i and somatosensory area ii on neurones of the pontine nuclei in the cat	Corticofugal effects of the sensorimotor (i) region and the somatosensory (ii) region on the neurons of cat pontic nuclei.
2	visual receptive fields and their images in superior colliculus of the cat	Visual receptive fields and images in upper colliculus of the cat.
2	representation of cochlea within primary auditory cortex in the cat	Representation of cochlea in the cat's primary auditory cortex.
2	abnormal neuronal responses during evolution of a penicillin epileptic focus in cat visual cortex	Anomalous neuronal reactions during apo; evolution of epileptic penicillin; an epileptic focal point of penicillin in the cat's visual cortex.
2	disinhibition in cat motor cortex by ammonia	Cat motor cortical disinhibition by ammonia.
2	spatial limits of epileptogenic cortex its relationship to ectopic spike generation	Spatial Boundaries of Epileptogenic Cortex Its Relationship to Ectopic Episode Generation.
2	reticulospinal neurons with and without monosynaptic inputs from cerebellar nuclei	Reticulospinal neurons with and without cerebellar nuclei monosynaptic inputs.
2	medial recticular neurons projecting rostrally	Median recticular neurons, doing a rostral projection.
2	viruslike inclusions in the cecal epithelial cells of pa agonimus kellicotti digenea troglotrematidae	Cecal epithelial cell virus-like inclusions of pa agonimus kellicotti digenea troglotrematidae.
2	eye movement related activity in the visual cortex of dark reared kittens	Eye movement-related activity in visual cortex of black-bred kittens.
2	single unit activity in the lateral amygdala of the cat during sleep and waking	Unital activity in cat lateral amygdala during sleep and awakening.
2	receptive field characteristics and plastic properties of visual cortical cells in kittens reared with or without visual experience	Receptive field characteristics and visual cortical cell plastic properties in kittens reared with or without visual experience.
2	modification of single neurons in the kitten s visual cortex after brief periods of monocular visual experience	Modification of simple neurons in the visual cortex of the kitten after brief monocular visual experience.
2	labyrinthine influence on cat forelimb motoneurons	Motoneurons of the cat's forelimbs are labyrinthine.
2	thalamo cortical projections for recruiting responses and spindling like responses in the parietal cortex	Thalamo cortical projections for spindle and recruitment responses in the wall cortex.
2	receptive fields in cat superior colliculus after visual cortex lesions	Receptive fields in the upper colliculus of the cat after damage to the visual cortex.
2	unusual arrangement of agranular endoplasmic reticulum in the interstitial cells of the cat ovary	Unusual arrangement of agranular endoplasmic reticulum in cat interstitial cells.
2	nonhematopoietic neoplasms in cats	Cats have non-hematopoietic neoplasms.
2	effect of constant currents on orthodontic tooth movement in the cat	Constant current effects on the movement of orthodontic teeth in cats.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord i analysis of amino acids at maximum of potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanic potentiation post-tetanic monosynaptic reflexes in cat spinal cord amino acid analysis maximal potentiation.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord ii determination of phospholipids at maximum of potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanic potentiation post-tetanic monosynaptic reflexes in spinal cord of cat ii determination of maximal potentiation phospholipids.
2	vagal responses to vestibular stimulation in the cat	Vagal responses to cat vestibular stimulation.
2	influence of dendritic location and membrane properties on the effectiveness of synapses on cat motoneurones	Dendritic localization and membrane properties influence speed; synapse efficiency on cat motoneurons.
2	hypoxia induced tachypnea in carotid deafferented cats	L' hypoxia induced tachypnoea in the carotid deafferent cats.
2	distribution of latencies in the receptive fields of superior colliculus neurons in cats	Latency distribution in upper colliculus neuron receptor fields in cats.
2	neural plasticity in visual cortex of adult cats after exposure to visual patterns	Health and Welfare Canada, National Population Health Survey, Health and Welfare Canada.
2	far field acoustic response origins in the cat	The far-field acoustic response is coming from the cat, sir.
2	a re evaluation of the effects of lesions of the pontine tegmentum and locus coeruleus on phenomena of paradoxical sleep in the cat	A reassessment of the effects of locus coeruleus and pontic tegmentum lesions on REM sleep phenomena in the cat.
2	effect of phenoxybenzamine on experimental cerebral arterial spasm in cats	Effect of phenoxybenzamine on Experimental Brain Spasms in Cats.
2	quantitative changes in proteins in the cat parietal zone large pyramids in various sleep stages and during wakefulness	Quantitative protein changes in the cat's wall area of large-scale pyramids at various stages of sleep and awakeness.
2	grouping of neurons according to their rna content during different functional states of the cerebral cortex	Grouping of neurons according to their rna content in different cerebral cortical functional states.
2	glycogen content in the brain stem neurons during hyperthermia in cats	Glycogen content of brainstem neurons during cat hyperthermia.
2	mesencephalic porjections of the rectus lateralis muscle afferents in the cat	Mesencephalic porjections of cat afferent rectus lateralis muscle.
2	local specialization at ileocecal junction of the cat and opossum	Local specialty at ileo-cat-and-apos caecal junction; opossum.
2	density of distribution of nerve cells in the nuclei of the cat s trigeminal complex	Density of nerve cell distribution in cat trigeminal complex nuclei.
2	neuronal organization of the large cell segment of the cat s red nucleus	Neural organization of the cat's large red nucleus cell segment.
2	method of live microscopy of the neurons of the cat brain	Method for Living Microscopy of Cat Brain Neurons.
2	ultrastructural characteristics of axon terminals of the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus in the cat	Ultrastructural features of the axonal terminals of the cat's posterior lateral nucleus.
2	epidemiological pattern of chagas disease in an endemic area of costa rica	Epidemiological overview of a Costa rica endemic region of Chagas disease.
2	cell structure and function in the visual cortex of the cat	Cell structure and cell function in the cat's visual cortex.
2	effects of anesthetics on ponto geniculo occipital waves from the oculomotor nucleus of the cat	Effects of anesthetics on cat oculomotor ponto geniculo occipital waves.
2	projection of the vestibular nerve to the si arm field in the cerebral cortex of the cat	vestibular nerve projection in the arm field so into the cat cerebral cortex.
2	a fluorescence and electron microscopic study of the adrenergic innervation in the vestibular ganglion and sensory areas	Electron microscopy and fluorescence studies of adrenergic innervation in vestibular ganglion and sensory regions.
2	effects on the ventral spinocerebellar tract neurones from deiters nucleus and the medial longitudinal fascicle in the cat	Effects on ventral diter nucleus spinocerebellar tract neurons and the cat median longitudinal fascicle.
2	detection of natural complex sounds by cells in the primary auditory cortex of the cat	Detection of complex natural sounds by cat primary auditory cortical cells.
2	visual suppression of vestibular nystagmus after cerebellar lesions	Visual suppression of the vestibular nystagmus after a cerebellar lesion.
2	study of the protection on afforded by nicergoline against the effects of cerebral ischemia in the cat	A study of the efficacy of nicergoline in preventing the effects of ischemia in the brain in cats.
2	specific membrane properties of cat motoneurones	Specific cat motoneuron membrane properties.
2	method for the morphological identification of individual brain neurons intravitally and after fixation	Intravital and post-fixation identification of individual cerebral neurons.
2	chemosensitive neurons on the ventral medullary surface	Chemosensitive neurons on the surface of the ventral medulla.
2	leukocytic pyrogen and sodium acetylsalicylate on hypothalamic neurons in the cat	Sodium acetylsalicylate and leucocyte Pyrogen on the hypothalamic neurons of the cat.
2	an electron microscope study of synaptic organization in the lateral reticular nucleus of the medulla oblongata in the cat	An electron microscopic study of the synaptic organization of the cat medulla oblongata lateral reticular nucleus.
2	diversity of mossy fibres in the cerebellar cortex in relation to different afferent systems an experimental electron microscopic study in the cat	The diversity of fused fibers in cerebellar cortex relative to different afferent systems was studied experimentally by electron microscopy in the cat.
2	diencephalic projections from the midbrain reticular formation	Mesencephalic reticular formation diencephalic projections.
2	demonstration of a somatotopically organized projection onto the paramedian lobule and the anterior lobe from the lateral reticular nucleus an experimental study with the horseradish peroxidase method	Demonstration of apos, a paramedian and anterior lobe somatotopic projection from the lateral reticular nucleus, experimental study using horseradish peroxidase method.
2	transganglionic degeneration in trigeminal primary sensory neurons	Transganglionic degeneration (TDG) in primary trigeminal sensory neurons.
2	the pontocerebellar projection onto the paramedian lobule in the cat an experimental study with the use of horseradish peroxidase as a tracer	The pontocephalous projection on the cat's paramedian lobule was the subject of an experimental study using horseradish peroxidase as a tracer.
2	the pontine projection from the inferior colliculus in the cat an experimental anatomical study	In the case of the cat, the pontoon projection of the lower colliculus was the subject of an experimental anatomical study.
2	macular input to neurons of the spinoreticulocerebellar pathway	Macular entry into spinoreticulocerebellar neurons.
2	studies on the cerebellar projections from the main and external cuneate nuclei in the cat by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	L' study of cerebellar projections of the cat's main and outer cuneate nuclei by axonal retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	a golgi and electron microscopical study of nerve cells in layer i of the cat auditory cortex	A Golgi- and electron-microscopic study of the i-layer neuronal cells of the cat's auditory cortex.
2	sustained and transient discharges of retinal ganglion cells during spontaneous eye movements of cat	Sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells discharge during spontaneous cat eye movements.
2	visual discrimination of flux equated figures by cats with brain lesions	Visual discrimination of the flow was equivalent to cat-induced brain damage.
2	the auditory cortical projections onto the medial geniculate body in the cat an experimental anatomical study with silver and autoradiographic methods	Auditory cortical projections on the median geniculate body of cats an experimental silver anatomical study and autoradiographic methods.
2	analysis of various factors involved in eeg synchronization during milk drinking in the cat	L' analysis of various factors involved in the synchronization eeg during the consumption of milk in the cat.
2	normal critical bands in the cat	Critical tapes are a normal part of the chat.
2	endogenous primate and feline type c viruses	Endogenous primate-feline c-viruses.
2	integrated somatomotor cardiovascular and gastrointestinal adjustments induced from the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Cerebellar fastigial nucleus-induced integrated intestinal, cardiovascular, and gastro adjustments.
2	reflexogenic contraction of the ileo cecal sphincter in the cat following small or large intestinal distension	Reflexogenic cat ileo sphincter contraction, following distension of the small or large intestine.
2	effects of chlorpromazine and diazepam on neuronal activities of the lateral vestibular nucleus in cats	Effects of chlorpromazine and diazepam on lateral vestibular nucleus neuronal activities in cats.
2	the effect of background illumination on the responses of the neurons of the cat s superior colliculus to moving stimuli	Lapos effect; background illumination of cat superior colliculus neuron responses to moving stimuli.
2	dipropylacetic acid depakine in experimental epilepsy in the alert cat	It is not possible to determine the cause of epilepsy in cats.
2	motor nerve terminal response to edrophonium in delayed dfp neuropathy	The final response of the motor nerve to edrophonium in the delayed neuropathy of the DPF.
2	influence of vestibular and afferent impulses on the spontaneous activity of interneurons in the spinal cord of cats	Influence of afferent and vestibular impulses on the apos; spontaneous activity of the interneurons in the spinal cord of cats.
2	variability of neuronal activity of the parastriate cortex before and after callosotomy	Apos variability; parastrial cortical neural activity before and after callosotomy.
2	motoneuron dendrites role in synaptic integration	Role of Dendrite motoneurons in Initiation; Synaptic Integration.
2	impariment by 6 hydroxydopamine of locus coeruleus induced monosynaptic potential in the spinal trigeminal nucleus	L' 6-hydroxydopamine impairment of locus coeruleus induced a spinal trigeminal monosynaptic potential.
2	electromyography in the localization of spinal cord and nerve root neoplasia in dogs and cats	Electromyography of Localization of Spinal Cord and Nerve Root Neoplasia in Dogs and Cats.
2	retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase in peripheral autonomic nerves	Axonal retrograde horseradish peroxidase transport in autonomic peripheral nerves.
2	salmonellosis in a human infant a cat and two parakeets in the same household	Salmonella in a Human Infant, a Cat and Two Parakeets in the Same Home.
2	binocular interaction in the cat s superior colliculus	Binocular interaction in cat superior colliculus.
2	the spinal course and distribution of fore and hind limb muscle afferent projections to the superior colliculus of the cat	L' evolution of the vertebral column and the distribution of afferent projections from the cat forelimb and hindlimb muscle to the cat superior colliculus.
2	venous drainage of the heart with special references to the excito conduction system	Venous heart drainage with special reference to eccito conduction system.
2	adrenergic innervation of the extramedullary arteries of the spinal cord of cats	Spinal cord extra-medullary artery adrenergic innervation in cats.
2	neuronal organization of the inspiratory center baumgarten s nucleus	Neural organization; inspiration baumgarten s nucleus.
2	e coli endotoxin shock in the cat treatment with indomethacin	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
2	horner s syndrome in the dog and cat as an aid to diagnosis	"It's called ""horn syndrome"" in dogs and cats to make it easier to diagnose."
2	delayed alternation learning under electrical blocking stimulation of the caudate nucleus in the cat	L' delayed alternative learning under electrical caudate nucleus blockade stimulation in cat.
2	the effects of acetylcholine and dopamine on the caudate nucleus depleted of biogenic amines	The acetylcholine and dopamine effects on the caudate nucleus are devoid of biogenic amines.
2	a quantitative analysis of the cat retinal ganglion cell topography	Quantitative analysis of the topography of ganglion cells in the cat retina.
2	the projections of different morphological types of ganglion cells in the cat retina	Projections of different morphological types of cat retinal ganglion cells.
2	the projections of cells in different layers of the cat s visual cortex	The cell projections in the cat's visual cortical layers.
2	an electron microscope study of the red nucleus in the cat with special reference to the quantitative analysis of the axosomatic synapses	A cat red-nucleus electron microscopy study with special attention to l' quantitative analysis of axosomatic synapses.
2	disorder and recovery of somatic sensitivity in cats with destruction of the afferent pathways of the spinal cord	Disturbance and restoration of somatic sensitivity in cats, with destruction of spinal cord afferent pathways.
2	an analysis of the interaction of the parietal and visual regions of the cortex with the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus	L&apos analysis; interaction of cortical wall and visual regions with the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus.
2	the effect of stimulation of the deep layers of somatosensory zones ci and cii on the activity of motor zone mi of the cat cortex	L' effect of deep layer stimulation of somatosensory areas here and there on the apos; motor zone activity mi of the cortex of the cat.
2	substance p and spinal neurones	Spinal p-substance and neurons.
2	an immunoprecipitin study of the incidence of influenza a antibodies in animal sera in the ottawa area	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been conducted to determine the presence of the antibody.
2	the effect of neurotropic agents on evoked potentials of the association and projection regions of the cat neocortex	The effects of neurotropic agents on the evoked potentials of the neocortex of cats; association and projection.
2	an analysis of interneuronal connections in the auditory cortex of awake cats	Analysis of internaluronal connections in awake cats' auditory cortex.
2	determinants of experimental neurosis in cats	Determinants of Experimental Neurosis in Cats.
2	visual stimulation effects on vestibular habituation	Episode is a function of the body's structure.
2	metabolic manifestations of the compensatory process in the brains of cats following spinal cord injuries	Metabolic manifestations of the compensatory process following spinal cord injury in the brain of cats.
2	cortical diffusion characteristics of seizure induced in the horm of ammoni ii chemical stimulation	Cortical-scattering characteristics of induced convulsions in d&apos-induced hormones; ammonia ii chemical stimulation.
2	effect of quinidine together with antibiotics on contractility of cat papillary muscle	Effect of Quinidine and Antibiotics on Contractility of Cat Papillary Muscle.
2	electron microscopy of the arcuate nucleus of normal and 5 hydroxydopamine treated cats	Electron microscopy of arcuate nuclei from normal and 5 glucose-treated cats; hydroxydopamine.
2	d amphetamine induced release of newly synthesized and stored dopamine from the caudate nucleus in vivo	Amphetamine induces the release of newly synthesized dopamine stored from the in vivo caudate nucleus.
2	a calcium ionophore stimulating the secretion of catecholamines from the cat adrenal	A calcium ionophore stimulates cat adrenal catecholamine secretion.
2	stimulus generalization between differentiated visual auditory and central stimuli	Generalization of the stimuli between visual visual stimuli differentiated from the central stimuli.
2	visual receptive field properties of cells in area 18 of cat s cerebral cortex before and after acute lesions in area 17	The receptive visual field properties of the cells in the cat cerebral cortex area 18 before and after acute lesions in the area 17.
2	discharge patterns of cat pontine brain stem neurons during desynchronized sleep	Cat's brain stem neuron firing patterns during unsynchronized sleep.
2	unit activity in posterior association cortex of cat	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of a single activity in the cortex of the cat.
2	afferent efferent linkages in motor cortex for single forelimb muscles	Motor cortical afferent efferent links for simple muscles of the forelimb.
2	on the mechanism of the relaxing adrenaline effect on cat jejunum	On the appos mechanism; relaxing effect of epos; adrenaline on the cat jejunum.
2	extrinsic nervous control of the ileo cecal sphincter in the cat	Ileo sphincter extrinsic nerve control-caecal in cat.
2	motor control of nuclear bag and nuclear chain intrafusal fibres in isolated living muscle spindles from the cat	Control the motor of the nuclear sac and the intrafusal fibers of the nuclear chain in the living, isolated muscle spindles of the cat.
2	discharge frequency of tendon organs evoked by the contraction of motor units in the cat	Frequency of release of cat tendon organs evoked by contraction of motor units.
2	uptake and transport of exogenous peroxidase in the masticatory muscles of the cat localization of motor neurons	Exogenous peroxidase uptake and transport in cat motor neural localization masticatory muscles.
2	acquired and inherent trace processes in the neuronally isolated cortex	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
2	from attentiveness to sleep a topographical analysis of localized synchronized activities on the cortex of normal cat and monkey	Watch for sleep, a topographical analysis of the synchronized activities localized on normal apes and cats cortex.
2	the biological significance of pgo spikes in the sleeping cat	The biological significance of peaks in sleeping cat.
2	temperature and behavioural responses induced in the unanaesthetized cat by the central administration of rx72601 a new anticholinesterase	Temperature and behavioral responses induced in non-aposanesthetized cat; central administration rx72601 a novel anticholinesterase.
2	feline oncornavirus associated cell membrane antigen ii antibody titers in healthy cats from household and laboratory colony environments	Oncornavirus feline associated with apo; antigen of cell membrane ii titers of apo; antibodies in healthy cats from apo; domestic environments and laboratory colonies.
2	depressive effects of morphine upon lamina v cells activities in the dorsal horn of the spinal cat	It can also be used as an adjunct to the immune system, such as the immune system or the immune system.
2	a late component of flash evoked potentials in the cat s optic chiasma and superior colliculus its appearance due to background illumination	A late component of the cat optical chiasma and superior colliculus flash evoked potentials is due to l' bottom illumination.
2	intracellular postsynaptic potentials of cat lateral geniculate cells and the effects of degeneration of the optic terminals	Potential post-intracellular synaptic changes in cat lateral genital cells and effects of optic terminal degeneration.
2	barbiturate spindle activity in the thalamic lateral ventro posterior nucleus and the second somato sensory area of the cortex	L' barbituric spindle activity in thalamic lateral posterior ventro nucleus and second somato sensory region of cortex.
2	sleep cycle control and cholinergic mechanisms differential effects of carbachol injections at pontine brain stem sites	Cholinergic Mechanisms and Sleep Cycle Control Differential Effects of Carbachol Injections at Bridgein Brain Tract Sites.
2	effects of elevated magnesium on discharge of myenteric neurons of cat small bowel	Apos effects; magnesium elevation on myenteric neuron discharge in cat's small intestine.
2	preliminary data on the origin of splanchnic nerve afferent fibers with respiratory influence	Preliminary data on apos; origin of respiratory-related afferent fibers of the splanchnic nerve.
2	cytoimmunological and histochemical study of cat adenohypophyseal cells made fluorescent by the falck and hillarp technic	Cytoimmunological and histochemical studies of the cat's adenohypophysial cells are fluorescent by the falcon and the montane.
2	electrospinogram and spinal and cortical evoked potentials in experimental spinal cord trauma	Electrospinogram and potentials evoked spinal and cortical in experimental trauma to the spinal cord.
2	the depressant effect of halothane and sodium thiopental on the spontaneous and evoked activity of dorsal horn cells lamina specificity time course and dose dependence	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
2	oculomotor outflow and its relation to electrical activity of suprasylvian gyrus and pulvinar during paradoxical sleep in the cat	L' oculomotor flow and its relation with l' electrical activity of the suprasylvian gyrus and the pulvinar during REM sleep in the cat.
2	electroencephalographic signs of ethanol tolerance and physical dependence in the cat	Electroencephalographic signs of tolerance to apo; ethanol; and cat's physical dependence.
2	chloralose induced alteration of visually evoked response from specific and non specific regions of cat neocortex	Chloralose induced visual evoked response alterations in specific and nonspecific regions of the cat neocortex.
2	effects of taurine on kindled amygdaloid seizures in rats cats and photosensitive baboons	Effects of Taurine on Amygdala Seizures Lively in Rat Photosensitive Cats and Baboons.
2	dantrolene effects on neuromuscular function in cat soleus muscle	Effects of Dantrolene on Neuromuscular Function of Cat Solar Muscle.
2	the positive inotropic effect of glucagon in the chronically failed right ventricle as demonstrated in the isolated cat heart	The positive glucagon inotropic effect in the chronically defective right ventricle was demonstrated in the isolated cat heart.
2	microcirculation of traumatized spinal cord a correlation of microangiography and blood flow patterns in transitory and permanent paraplegia	Microcirculation of the spinal cord traumatized a correlation of microangiography and patterns of blood flow in the temporary and permanent paraplegia.
2	dorsal column nuclei afferents in the lateral funiculus of the cat distribution pattern and absence of sprouting after chronic deafferentation	Dorsal column nuclei have lateral funicular afferents in the cat and l&apos distribution pattern; no rejections after chronic deafferentiation.
2	the pharmacology of the inhibition of dorsal horn neurones by impulses in myelinated cutaneous afferents in the cat	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
2	electrophysiological studies of the projections from the parietal association area to the cerebellar cortex	Electrophysiological studies of d&apos zone projections; cerebellar cortical wall association.
2	suppression of cerebellar evoked potentials by a peripheral action of diphenylhydantoin	Suppression of cerebellar potentials evoked by diphenylhydantoin peripheral action.
2	development of visually evoked responses and visually guided behavior in kittens effects of superior colliculus and lateral geniculate lesions	The development of visually evoked responses and visually guided behaviors in kittens, the effects of the superior colliculus and the lateral geniculate lesions.
2	anatomical and physiological evidence for a cerebellar nucleo cortical projection in the cat	Anatomical and physiological evidence of nucleic cortical projection-cerebellar in cat.
2	electron microscopic investigation of the vestibular projection to the cat trochlear nuclei	Electron microscopy of the projection of the vestibular to the trochlear nuclei of the cat.
2	the effects of stimulating the cerebellar nodulus in the cat on the responses of vestibular neurons	The effects of cat cerebellar nodule stimulation on vestibular neuronal responses.
2	neurochemical changes in the cat s spinal cord due to orthodromic tetanic stimuli i phospholipids	Neurochemical changes in the spinal cord of the cat due to tetanic orthodromic i phospholipid stimuli.
2	localization of laryngeal motor neurons in the kitten	Localization of kitten larynx motor neurons.
2	epileptogenic properties of folic acid and n5 methyltetrahydrofolate in cat	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S.C., D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes, D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes and D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes.
2	retinal degeneration associated with taurine deficiency in the cat	Taurine deficiency in cat is associated with retinal degeneration.
2	horizontal cells in cat retina with independent dendritic systems	Horizontal cells in the retina of the cat with independent dendritic systems.
2	feedback training of 36 44 hz eeg activity in the visual cortex and hippocampus of cats evidence for sensory and motor involvement	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, and it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
2	receptive field mechanisms of sustained and transient retinal ganglion cells in the cat	Sustained transient retinal ganglionic cell receptor field mechanisms in the cat.
2	effects of visual cortex lesions following recovery from monocular deprivation in the cat	Effects of visual cortical lesions after cat recovery; single-cell deprivation.
2	a direct input from amygdaloid complex to caudate nucleus of the rat	A direct contribution from the amygdaloid complex to the rat's caudate nucleus.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius problem of their categorisation on the basis of mechanical properties	Cat motor units median gastrocnemius problem based on mechanical properties.
2	patterns of projection and braching of reticulospinal neurons	Reticulospinal neural projection and turning patterns.
2	neurons in the cochlear nucleus investigated with tone and noise stimuli	Cochlear nucleus neurons were examined with tonic and sonic stimuli.
2	autoradiographic studies of the projections of the midbrain reticular formation descending projections of nucleus cuneiformis	Autoradiographic studies of reticular formation of the midbrain, descending cuneiformis projections.
2	translaminar growth of axons in the kitten dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus following removal of one eye	Translaminar axonal growth in the cat's dorsal lateral genicular nucleus after apos; removal of apos; one eye.
2	synaptic relationships of golgi type ii cells in the medial geniculate body of the cat	Synaptic relationships of type ii Golgi cells in the cat's median golgi.
2	caliber spectra of fibers in the fasciculus gracilis of the cat cervical spinal cord a quantitative electron microscopic study	Cat cervical spinal cord fasciculus gracilis fiber-size spectral, quantitative electron microscopic study.
2	single unit activity in the posteroventral cochlear nucleus of the cat	Unital activity in cat posteroventral cochlear kernel.
2	single unit activity in the dorsal cochlear nucleus of the cat	Unitary activity in cochlear dorsal kernel of cat.
2	spindle wave synchrony in the somatosensory cortex of the cat	Synchronization of spindle waves in cat somatosensory cortex.
2	golgi studies in the substantia gelatinosa neurons in the spinal trigeminal nucleus	Golgi studies in spinal trigeminal nucleus substantia gélatinosa neurons.
2	brbiturate spindle activity in the association cortex of the cat and its relation to spindle activity in the somatosensory system	L' spindle activity in apos cortex; cat association and relationship with apos; spindle activity in the somatosensory system.
2	the dorsal column nuclear projections to the nucleus ventralis posterior lateralis thalami and the inferior olive in the cat an autoradiographic study	Nuclear projections from the dorsal column to the ventralis posterior lateralis thalami nucleus and to the cat's inferior olive have been the subject of an autoradiographic study.
2	character of neuronal functional associations according to the content of rna and sh groups in the cat cerebral cortex	Characterization of neural functional associations by rna content and sh groups in the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	comparison of the dimensions of synaptic vesicles in axon profiles forming synapses on the bodies and dendrites of cat motor cortex neurons	Comparison of synaptic vesicle dimensions in synaptic axonal profiles on cat motor cortical neuron bodies and dendrites.
2	demonstration of direct projections between the ponto mesencephalic tegmentum and the visual cortex of the cat using a peroxidase technique	Demonstration of direct projection between ponto-mesencephalic tegmentum and cat visual cortex at apos; aid of apos; peroxidase technique.
2	histochemical fiber typing and staining intensity in cat and rat muscles	Type of fibers and intensity of staining in the muscles of cats and rats.
2	microionophoretic study of the cholinoceptor neurons of the visual cortex of cats	Microionophoretic study of visual cortical cholinoceptor neurons in cats.
2	neurochemical aspects of post tetanic potentiation of monosynaptic reflexes in the cat spinal cord iii analysis of amino acids after long term potentiation	Neurochemical aspects of tetanic potentiation post-tetanic monosynaptic reflexes in cat spinal cord tissue iii amino acid analysis after long-term potentiation.
2	influence of phenamin on the reaction of cortical neurons evoked by stimulation of mesodiencephalic structures	L' influence of phenamine on the cortical neuronal response evoked by the stimulation of mesodialkephalic neurons.
2	an electron microscopic study of the intermediolateral nucleus of the cat spinal cord	Electron microscopy of the intermedolateral nucleus of the cat spinal cord.
2	convergence and interaction of visceral somatic and visual excitations in individual neurons of the cat lateral geniculate bodies	Convergence and interaction of somatic and visual visceral excitations in individual lateral genicular cat neurons.
2	interhemispheric relations of the cat visual cortex following unilateral polarization of the secondary visual area	Hemispherical relations of the cat's visual cortex following secondary visual zone unilateral polarization.
2	the effects of noise upon the electrical activity of the cat cortex	The effects of noise on the cat's electrical activity.
2	spinal evoked response in the cat	Response evoked by spine in cat.
2	morphologic and cytophotometric indices of the state of the neurons of the spinal cord and spinal cord ganglia following exposure to gravitational stress	Morphological and cytophotometric indices of spinal cord neurons and spinal cord lymph nodes under gravitational stress.
2	dorsal raphe stimulation produces inhibitory effect on trigeminal nucleus neurons	Neurons in the trigeminal nucleus are inhibited by stimulation of dorsal raphe.
2	fine structure of growth cones in medullary raphe nuclei in the postnatal cat	The fine structure of the growth cones in the nuclei of the medullary raphe of the postnatal cat.
2	visual receptive fields in the lateral suprasylvian area clare bishop area of the cat	Receptive visual fields in lateral suprasylvania region clare bishop zone of cat.
2	the fluorescent catecholamine reaction in neurons of the intervertebral sensory ganglion	The reaction of fluorescent catecholamines in the neurons of the intervertebral, sensory ganglion.
2	projections of the somatosensory areas of the cerebral cortex into the thalamic nuclei	Projections of cerebral cortical somatosensory zones in thalamic nuclei.
2	neuronal activity in the lateral vestibular nucleus of the cat v topographical distribution of inhibitory effects mediated by the spino olivocerebellar pathway	Neuronal activity in the lateral vestibular nucleus of cat topographic v distribution of spino olivocerebellar-mediated inhibitory effects.
2	feline infectious peritonitis with spinal cord involvement in two cats	Infectious feline peritonitis with damage to the spinal cord in two cats.
2	leiomyosarcoma of the urinary bladder in a cat	Urinary bladder leiomyosarcoma in cats.
2	sensorimotor cortical representation in the rat and the role of the cortex in the production of sensory myoclonic jerks	Cortical sensorimotor representation in the rat and role of the cortex in sensory myoclonic shock production.
2	physiological identification of a morphological class of cat retinal ganglion cells	A morphological classification of the retinal ganglion cells of cats.
2	ganglionic cytoarchitecture of the esophagus in the cat and the rhesus monkey	Ganglionic cytoarchitecture of the spinal cord; esophagus in cats and rhesus monkeys.
2	innate and environmental factors in the development of the kitten s visual cortex	Natural and environmental factors in a kitten's visual cortical development.
2	depression in the excitability of relay cells of lateral geniculate nucleus following saccadic eye movements in the cat	Decreased apo; excitability of lateral geniculate cell relays as a result of jerking ocular movements in cat.
2	single unit responses to natural objects in area 19 of cats with different early visual experiences	Unit reactions to natural objects in the 19th zone of a cat with different early visual experiences.
2	histochemical and neurophysiological studies of autotransplanted cat muscle	Histochemical and Neurophysiological Studies of Autoproplanted Cat Muscle.
2	effect of analgestics and narcotics on the potentials of the posterior roots evoked by stimulation of the sensorimotor cortex	Effect of analgesics and narcotic drugs on sensorimotor cortical stimulation-evoked posterior root potentials.
2	distribution and properties of commissural and other neurons in cat sensorimotor cortex	Distribution and properties of the commissural and other neurons in the sensorimotor cortex of the cat.
2	electrophysiologic effects of stimulating the vestibular nuclei on the sensomotor cortex of cats	Electrophysiological effects of vestibular nucleus stimulation on sensory cat cortex.
2	two levels of restriction by mouse or cat cells of murine sarcoma virus coated by endogenous xenotropic oncornavirus	Two mouse or cat cell restriction levels of the coated mouse sarcoma virus; an endogenous xenotropic oncornavirus.
2	changes of epidural pressures after experimental occlusion of one middle cerebral artery in cats	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
2	electron microscopic observations on preterminal fibers in the oculomotor nucleus of the cat with special reference to the relation between axon diameter and myelin thickness in mammalian gray matter	Electron microscopic observations of preterminal fibers in cat oculomotor nuclei with particular attention to the relationship between the diameter of l' axon and l' thickness of myelin in mammalian gray matter.
2	central functional changes after facial spinal accessory anastomosis in man and facial hypoglossal anastomosis in the cat	Central functional changes following accessory facial medullary anastomosis in men and hypoglossal facial anastomosis in cats.
2	hydrocephalus iii reconstitution of the cerebral cortical mantle following ventricular shunting	Cerebral cortical mantle reconstruction following ventricular shunting.
2	the sinus nerve and baroreceptor input to the medulla of the cat	Sinus nerve and baroreceptor enter the cat spinal cord.
2	autonomic nerve stimulation kallikrein content anc acinar cell granules of the cat s submandibular gland	Self-sustaining nerve stimulation anchored kallikrein granular gland acinous cells under cat mandibular-s.
2	labyrinthine and extralabryinethine influences on the background activity of the spinal interneurons of cats during swaying	Labyrinthine and l' extralabryinethine influence cat spinal interneuron background activity during swirling.
2	reflex mechanisms of interlimb interrelationships displayed in lumbar flexor centers of the cat spinal cord	Reflex mechanisms of limb interrelationships in spinal cord lumbar flexor centers in cat.
2	afferent impulse of fibers of the vagus nerve of cats using the method of coincidence of outgoing action potentials	Cats' vagus nerve fiber afferent impulse using the d&apos potential coincidence method; outward action.
2	medullary relay neurons in the carotid body chemoreceptor pathway of cats	Carotid-body chemoreceptor medullary relay neurons in cats.
2	brain microvascular hemodynamic responses to induced seizures	Cardiovascular disease is a major cause of death for people with dementia.
2	spasmogenic qualities of prostaglandin f2alpha in the cat	Prostaglandin f2alpha spasmogenicity in cat.
2	effects of opiate agonists and antagonists on central neurons of the cat	Effects of agonists and opiate antagonists on cat central neurons.
2	actions of methoxamine and tryptamine and their interactions with cyproheptadine and phenoxybenzamine on cat spinal cord segmental reflexes	The actions of tryptamine and methoxamine and their interactions with cyproheptadine and phenoxybenzamine on segmental reflexes of the cat spinal cord.
2	response of generalized penicillin epilepsy in the cat to ethosuximide and diphenylhydantoin	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3(2), pp. 1–23.
2	immunofluorescence study of lrf producing neurons in the cat and the dog	Immunofluorescence of producing neurons; RFID in cats and dogs.
2	feline infectious peritonitis proteins of plasma and ascitic fluid	Infectious feline peritonitis proteins from the feline plasma and ascitic fluid.
2	bulbo spinal neurons activated by baroreceptor afferents and their possible role in inhibition of preganglionic sympathetic neurons	Bulbo spinal neurons, activated by baroreceptor afferents, and their possible role in the inhibition of preganglionic sympathetic neurons.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius twitch potentiation and twitch tetanus ratio	Motor units of twitch potentiation of the cat median gastrocnemius and the tetanus twitch ratio of the cat.
2	remyelination after transient compression of the spinal cord	Remyelination after transient spinal cord compression.
2	clare bishop area in the cat location and retinotopical projection	It's a good place to relax and enjoy a relaxing atmosphere.
2	visual responses of neurons in the clare bishop area of the cat	The bishop of the cat is the bishop of the cat and the bishop of the cat.
2	response of cat cerebellar vermis induced by sound i influence of drugs on responses of single units	The response of cerebellar cat worm is induced by glucose; drug influence on individual unit responses.
2	response of cat cerebellar vermis induced by sound ii the role of the mossy and climbing fibers in acoustic transmission to the cerebellar cortex and influence of stimuli parameters	Sound-induced cat cerebellar-verm response ii the role of ascending and mossy fibers in acoustic transmission to cerebellar cortex and l&apos influences stimulus parameters.
2	effect of clonidine on the excitability of vasomotor loci in the cat	Clonidine effect on apos; vasomotor locus excitability in cat.
2	serotonin in the lateral geniculate	Side-genetic serotonin.
2	mechanical transduction in the golgi tendon organ a hypothesis	Mechanical Transduction in the Apos; tendon organ golgi a hypothesis.
2	evidence and meaning of monophasic potentials in the electromyogram of extraocular muscles of rabbits and cats author s transl	Evidence and significance of monophasic potentials in rabbit and cat extraocular muscle electromyography.
2	hypersomnia by isthmic lesion in cat ii neurophysiological and pharmacological study	Isthmic Hypersomnia in Cat II Neurophysiological and Pharmacological Study.
2	projection of tooth pulp afferents to the cat trigeminal nucleus caudalis	Caudalis caudalis caudalis caudalis caudalis caudalis caudalis caudalis.
2	unit responses to moving stimuli in area 18 of the cat	Unit reactions to motion-activated stimuli in the cat's zone 18.
2	bilateral effects of vestibular nerve stimulation on activity in the lumbar spinal cord	Bilateral effects of stimulation of the vestibular nerve on the apos; lumbar spinal cord activity.
2	a study of inhibitory antagonism in cat visual cortex	A study of the antagonism inhibitors in the visual cortex of cats.
2	observation of injected fluorescein diffusion after laser treatment of cat fundi an experimental study with angiography and microscopy	L' observation of diffusion of injected fluorescein after laser treatment of the cat fungus, angiographic and microscopic experimental study.
2	tracing axons and axon collaterals of spinal neurons using intracellular injection of horseradish peroxidase	Plot axons and axonal collaterals from spinal neurons to help with horseradish peroxidase injection.
2	effect of coronal plane tilt on cat caloric nystagmus responses	Effect of l' tilt of the coronal plane on the cat's nystagmus caloric responses.
2	carotid arterial supply of the feline brain applications to the study of regional cerebral ischemia	L'apport artériel carotidienne des applications cérébrales félines à l'apos; study de l'apos; ischemia cereale regional.
2	influence of anesthetics on metabolic functional and pathological responses to regional cerebral ischemia	Influence of anesthetics on the metabolic, functional and pathological responses to apos; regional cerebral ischemia.
2	cortical and subcortical projected foci in cats inhibitory action of taurine	Projected cortical and-cortical jars in taurine-inhibiting cats.
2	frequency following response to cochlear nuclei in cats to polycomponent sonic signals	Frequency following response to cat cochlear nuclei to multicomponent sound signals.
2	the role of extracellular ca2 and cyclic nucleotides in the mechanism of enzyme secretion from the cat pancreas	The role of extracellular ca2 and cyclic nucleotides in the secretion mechanism of cat pancreas.
2	influences on colonic and small intestinal motility by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Stunting nucleus of cerebellum influences motility of colon and lapos; small intestine.
2	influences on the defecation and micturition reflexes by the cerebellar fastigial nucleus	Influences of the fastigial cerebellar nucleus on bowel reflexes and micturition.
2	release of gastrin on vagal stimulation in the cat	Gastrin release on cat vagal stimulation.
2	effect of anticoagulants and inhibitors of platelet aggregation on thrombotic occlusion of endarterectomized cat carotid arteries	Anticoagulant and inhibitor effect; platelet aggregation on apos; endarterectomized cat carotid artery occlusion.
2	postsynaptic potentials in cat abducens motoneurons evoked by stimulation of cortical eye fields	Synaptic post-potentials in the cat remove cortical ocular field stimulation evoked motoneurons.
2	the effect of methoxyflurane on pulmonary vascular resistance and hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in the isolated perfused cat lung	L' effect of methoxyflurane on hypoxic pulmonary vascular resistance and pulmonary vasoconstriction in perfused isolated cat lung.
2	epileptic activity and anatomical characteristics of different lesions in cat cortex ultrastructural study	Epileptic activity and anatomical characteristics of various lesions in the spinal cord; ultrastructural study of the cat's cerebral cortex.
2	firing mechanisms in the single vestibular neurons in the cat	Mechanisms of discharge in simple cat vestibular neurons.
2	effects of cholinergic agonists and antagonists of nucleus vestibularis lateralis unit discharge to vestibular nerve stimulation in the cat	Effects of cholinergic agonists and antagonists of the unit discharge of the nucleus vestibularis lateralis on the stimulation of vestibular nerves in the cat.
2	medial forebrain bundle projections to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca	Projections of the median forebrain bundle to the central core of the broca's diagonal band.
2	central vestibular compensation effect of the bilateral labyrinthectomy on neural activity in the medial vestibular nucleus	Central vestibular compensatory effect of bilateral labyrinthectomy on the apos; midventral neural activity.
2	specialized contacts of astrocytes with astrocytes and with other cell types in the spinal cord of the cat	Specialized contacts with astrocytes and dapos; other types of spinal cord cells in cats.
2	the topography of functional interhemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex	L&apos topography; functional inter-hemispheric asymmetry in visual cortex.
2	the neuronal organization of a focus of conditioned excitation in the cat sensory motor cortex	"It's called the ""sensory-motor-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-sensory-system."""
2	the activity of cat motor cortex neurons during performance of a conditoned response of placing the forepaw on a support	It is also important to note that it is not possible for a cat to have a motor motor motor cortex neuron activity during the process; it is necessary for a cat to do so.
2	the effect of ablation of the caudate nucleus on the alimentary zone of the lateral hypothalamus	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the nutritional status of the animals.
2	post tetanic strengthening of evoked electrical responses of the sensomotor cortex	Tetanic-tetanic reinforcement of evoked sensory cortical electrical responses.
2	functional maturation of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis	Cat visual cortical functional maturity during prenatal ontogenesis.
2	effect of callosotomy on frequency characteristics of neuronal activity in the parastriate cortex	Effect of callosotomy on the frequency characteristics of apos; neuronal activity in parastriate cortex.
2	an analysis of the depressor responses to histamine in the cat and dog involvement of both h1 and h2 receptors	Analysis of depressive responses to apos; histamine in apos; h1- and h2-receptor involvement in cat and dog.
2	the effects of lysergic acid diethylamide on the response to field stimulation of the rat vas deferens and the rat and cat anococcygeus muscles	Effects of diethylamide lysergic acid, lysos, on field-stimulation response of rat and cat anococcygeus vas deferens.
2	anatomical asymmetry of the cerebral hemispheres of the cat brain	Anatomical asymmetry of cat brain cerebral hemispheres.
2	cerebellar contributions to the papez circuit	Cerebellar contribution to papez circuit.
2	receptive field properties of single units in the opossum striate cortex	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of a single unit in the opossum stripe cortex.
2	notes on the hypothesis of columnar organization in somatosensory cerebral cortex	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the development of the brain.
2	the motor units of cat medial gastrocnemius speed size relations and their significance for the recruitment order of mortor units	The driving units of median cat gastrocnemius velocity ratios and their importance to mortar recruitment order.
2	movements of the forelimbs of the cat during stepping on a treadmill	It's a good way to get a feel for a cat's body.
2	temperature effects on the inflation reflex during expiratory time in the cat	Temperature effects on d&apos reflex; expiratory time inflation in cat.
2	the origin of impulses recorded from dentinal cavities in the tooth of the cat	L' impulse origin recorded in teeth cavities of cat.
2	photogenic epilepsy with localization of the generator of excitation in the lateral geniculate body the phenomenon of a determining dispatch station	Photonic epilepsy with the location of the d&apos generator; lateral geniculate excitation with a controlling regulator.
2	electrographic manifestations of falling asleep in isolated cat cortex	Electrographic displays of s&apos, and sleeping in the isolated cat's cortex.
2	rhythmic firing of deiters neurons and synchronization by cerebellar inhibition in lidocaine treated cats	Rhythmic firing of deiter neurons and cerebellar-inhibited synchronization in lidocaine-treated cats.
2	effects of electrical stimulation of the lateral aspect of the prefrontal cortex upon attack behavior in cats	Effects of apo electrical stimulation; lateral aspect of prefrontal cortex on apo behavior; stroke in cats.
2	effect of stimulation of prefrontal cortex and amygdala on diencephalic neurons	Effect of prefrontal cortical and apos stimulation on the diencephalic neurons.
2	response properties and anatomical organization of pontine and medullary units responsive to vaginal stimulation in the cat	Properties of response and anatomical organization of cat vaginal-stimulating pontic and medullary units.
2	recruitment and firing rate modulation of motor unit tension in a small muscle of the cat s foot	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the rate of recruitment and release of tension.
2	functional significance of projection from the cerebellar nuclei to the motor cortex in the cat	Functional importance of cat motor cortical projection from cerebellar nuclei.
2	studies of connections between locus coeruleus and cerebral cortex	A study of the connections between the locus coeruleus and the cerebral cortex.
2	relationship between carotid chemoreceptor activity and ventilation in the cat	Carotid chemoreceptor activity and cat ventilation.
2	synaptic actions of tectofugal pathways on abducens motoneurons in the cat	Synaptic action of the tecto-fugal pathways on the stolen motor neurons of the cat.
2	somatotopic localization in cat motor cortex	We've got a somatotopic location in the cat's motor cortex.
2	descending influences of periaqueductal gray matter and somatosensory cerebral cortex on neurones in trigeminal brain stem nuclei	Downward influences of somatosensory somatosensory cerebral cortical and periaqueductal gray matter on neurons in trigeminal brainstem nuclei.
2	activation of left ventricular receptors with nonmedullated vagal afferent fibers during occlusion of a coronary artery in the cat	Lapos; left ventricular receptor activation with non-medullated vagal afferent fibers during apos occlusion; cat coronary artery.
2	classification of neurons of the cat neocortex	Cat neocortex neocortex neural classification.
2	catecholaminergic axo axonic synapses in the nucleus of the tractus solitarius pars commissuralis of the cat possible relation to presynaptic regulation of baroreceptor reflexes	Cat's nucleus solitarius pars commissuralis cat catecholaminergic axon synapses in relation to presynaptic regulation of baroreceptor reflexes.
2	the effects of the pathogenic influence of botulin toxin on different types of spinal motor neurons	The Effects of Lapos; Pathogenic Influence of Botulinum Toxin on Different Types of Spinal Motor Neurons.
2	evaluation of fecal technics for the diagnosis of cat liver fluke infection	Evaluation of Fecal Techniques for Diagnosis of Lapos; Cat Liver Infection.
2	modification of cortical orientation selectivity in the cat by restricted visual experience a reexamination	Modification of cat selectivity; cortical orientation by a limited visual experiment reexamination.
2	nature of the distribution of synapses in the neurons of the reticular formation and some afferent nuclei	Nature of synaptic distribution in reticular formation neurons and some reticular afferent nuclei.
2	the postnatal development of myelinated nerve fibres in the visual cortex of the cat a stereological and electron microscopical investigation	The postnatal development of myelinated nerve fibers in the cat's visual cortex has been the subject of an electron microscopic and stereological study.
2	different organization of cat lateral geniculate neurons in binocular inhibitory interaction	Different organization of lateral cat genicular neurons in the apos; inhibitory binocular interaction.
2	interaction of psychotropic agents with central neurotransmitters as revealed by their effects on pgo waves in the cat	The interaction of the psychotropic agents with the central neurotransmitters is revealed by their effects on the pgo waves in the cat.
2	effects of pentaformylgitoxin gitoformate on the cardiovascular system of anesthetized cats	Effects of pentaformylgitoxin gitoformate on anesthetized cats' cardiovascular system.
2	the interaction of impulses evoked by stimuli of different modality in neurons of the parietal association cortex	L' stimuli-evoked interaction of pulses of different modalities in d&apos cortical neurons; parietal association.
2	centrifugal and centripetal connections of the cat visual cortex	Centrifugal, centripetal connections to the cat's visual cortex.
2	reproduction of delayed evoked potentials during amygdaloid complex stimulation	Delayed evoked potentials are reproduced during stimulation of the amygdaloid complex.
2	antidromal and synaptic potentials of motoneurons of the cat accessory nerve nucleus	Anti-romal and synaptic potentials of the motoneurons of the nucleus of the accessory nerve of the cat.
2	the ultrastructure of portions of the cat spinal cord gray matter connected to fibers of different descending tracts	L' ultrastructure of sections of gray matter of the cat's spinal cord attached to fibers of descending pathways.
2	amygdala and masseteric reflex ii mechanism of the diphasic modifications of the reflex elicited from the defence reaction area role of the spinal trigeminal nucleus pars oralis	Amygdala and Masseteric Reflex ii Mechanism of Diphasic Reflex Modifications induced by the Defense Zone Role of the Spinal Trigeminal Nucleus Pars oralis.
2	correlation analysis of units recorded in the cat dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus	Correlation analysis of recorded units in the lateral dorsal geniculate nucleus of the cat.
2	a quantitative study of the projection area of the central and the paracentral visual field in area 17 of the cat i the precision of the topography	A quantitative study of the projection surface of the visual field central and paracentral in the cat zone 17 i the accuracy of the topography.
2	flexion extension sensitivity of elbow joint afferents in cat	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
2	effects of diphenylhydantoin on cardiac arrhythmias induced by carotid occlusion in the cat	Carotid occlusion induced cardiac arrhythmias in cats.
2	hyperaemic responses in two vascular beds of the anaesthetised cat	Hyperaemic reactions in two anesthetized cat vascular beds.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat i pgo wave activity induced by ro 43284 and by p chlorophenylalanine pcpa as a basis for neuropharmacological studies	Drugs and pgo waves in the lateral genicular body of the apos; immune-mediated wave activity; ro 43284 and p chlorophenylalanine pcpa induced wave i pgo as the basis for neuropharmacological studies.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat ii pgo wave activity and brain 5 hydroxytryptamine	Drugs and pgo waves in the lateral genicular body of the curved cat ii lapos; activity of pgo waves and brain 5 hydroxytryptamine.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat iii pgo wave activity and brain catecholamines	Drugs and pgo waves in curarized cat lateral genicular body iii brain pgo and catecholamine wave activity.
2	drugs and pgo waves in the lateral geniculate body of the curarized cat iv the effects of acetylcholine gaba and benzodiazepines on pgo wave activity	The effects of acetylcholine-gaba and benzodiazepines on apos; activity of apos; pgo; pgo; wave pgo.
2	anatomical organization of the phasic activity produced by reserpine at the level of the oculomotor system	L&apos anatomy; reserpine-induced phasic activity in the oculomotor system.
2	management of acute spine and spinal cord injuries old and new concepts	Treatment of Acute Spinal Cord and Spinal Cord Damage Old and new concepts.
2	adaptation and dynamics in x cells and y cells of the cat retina	Adaptation and dynamics in the cat's x- and y-cell retina.
2	a note on the method of retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase as a tool in studies of afferent cerebellar connections particularly those from the inferior olive with comments on the orthograde transport in purkinje cell axons	A note on the retrograde horseradish peroxidase transport method as a tool in the apos; study of afferent cerebellar connections, particularly those of the lower olive; with comments on orthograde transport in axons of purkinje cells.
2	projections from the lateral reticular nucleus to the cerebellar cortex and nuclei in the cat	Projections of lateral reticular nucleus to cerebellar and nuclei cortices in cat.
2	deep temporal lobe projections to the nucleus of the diagonal band of broca	Deep projections from the temporal lobe to the diagonal stripe nucleus of broca.
2	histamine receptors in the cat mesenteric circulation	Histamine receptors in cat mesenteric circulation.
2	responses of cortical vestibular center produced by stimulation of vestibular nuclei and visual association area in the cat	Cortical vestibular center reactions produced by vestibular and vestibular nucleus stimulation; area d' visual association in cat.
2	discharge patterns of bulbo pontine respiratory unit populations in cat	Discharge pattern of cat populations; bulbo-pontine breathing units.
2	afferent projections to the locus coeruleus nucleus in the cat study by the horseradish peroxidase technic	Projections afferent to the nucleus of locus coeruleus in the apos; study of cat by technical peroxidase of horseradish.
2	morphology and distribution of muscle spindles in dorsal muscles of the cat neck	Morphology and Distribution of Muscle Spindles in Cats Neck Dorsal Muscles.
2	receptive field characteristics of single neurons in lateral suprasylvian visual area of the cat	Characteristics of the receptor field of single neurons in the cell; lateral visual area suprasylvian of the cat.
2	properties of projections from vestibular nuclei to medial reticular formation in the cat	Projection properties of the midline reticular formation vestibular nuclei in the cat.
2	slowly adapting receptors in cat knee joint can they signal joint angle	It's a good idea to try to make it easier for people to see how they feel when they're on the move.
2	stereopsis in normal domestic cat siamese cat and cat raised with alternating monocular occlusion	Stereopsis in the normal Siamese domestic cat and the raised cat with an alternating siamese monocular occlusion.
2	the postnatal development of some twitch and fatigue properties of single motor units in the ankle muscles of the kitten	Postnatal development of individual motor unit shaking and fatigue properties in kitten ankle muscles.
2	limb coordinations during locomotion in amygdalar rubral and funicular cats	The locomotion coordination of limbs in rubral and funicular amygdalar cats.
2	visual discrimination learning in cats with different early visual experiences	L' learning how to discriminate visually in cats with different early-onset visual experiences.
2	a cytochemical study of binaurally converging connections in the nuclei of the cat superior olive	Cytochemical study of binural converging connections in olive upper cat nuclei.
2	quantitative histological studies of the variability of golgi impregnated cortical neurons in rats and cats	Quantitative histological studies of golgi-impregnated cortical neuron variability in rats and cats.
2	eye movements evoked by superior colliculus stimulation in the alert cat	Increased stimulation of the colliculus in alert cats causes eye movements.
2	effects of respiratory gases on cytochrome a in intact cerebral cortex is there a critical po2	The cytochrome a effects of respiratory gases in the intact cerebral cortex are a critical po2.
2	specific angiotensin ii receptive neurons in the cat subfornical organ	Angiotensin ii specific neuronal receptors in the etapos; subfornical organ of the cat.
2	cerebellar corticonuclear projection in the cat the vermis of the anterior and posterior lobes	Cerebellar corticonuclear projection in rat vermeil anterior and posterior lobes.
2	brainstem loci for activation of electrodermal response in the cat	Cerebral stem locations for the apos; activation of the cat's electrodermal response.
2	control of depth and frequency of breathing during baroreceptor stimulation in cats	Depth and breathing frequency control during baroreceptor stimulation in cats.
2	demonstration of the tuberoinfundibular tract of the cat fluorescence histochemistry and electron microscopy	Demonstration of tuberoinfundibular tract, histochemistry of cat fluorescence and electron microscopy.
2	melatonin content of cat cerebrospinal fluid and blood following intravenous injection of melatonin as measured by xenopus laevis skin melanophore test	Melatonin content of cerebrospinal fluid-spinal cord and cat blood after intravenous injection of melatonin, as measured by the melanopore Xenopus laevis skin test.
2	on the role of catecholamines in the humoral modulation of the electrocortical activity in the cat	The role catecholamines play in the humoral modulation of l' electrocortical activity in cats.
2	specific patterns of neuron arrangement and of synaptic articulation in the medial geniculate body	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of the results of this study.
2	types of interneurons and their participation in the neuronal network of the medial geniculate body	In addition to the above, there are a number of other types of neurons that may be involved in the neural network of the median geniculate body.
2	the length of parallel fibers in the cat cerebellar cortex an experimental light and electron microscopic study	The length of parallel fibres in the cerebellar cortex of the cat was studied experimentally by light and electron microscopy.
2	effect of sulfated and non sulfated gastrin and octapeptide cholecystokinin on cat gall bladder in vitro	Effect of nonsulfated and sulfated cholecystokinin octapeptide on cat gallbladder in vitro.
2	autoradiographic studies of the projections of the midbrain reticular formation ascending projections of nucleus cuneiformis	Autoradiographic studies of reticular mesencephalic formation projections, cuneiformis nucleus ascending projections.
2	organization of retinocollicular pathways in the cat	Organizing cat's retinocollicular pathways.
2	effects of adrenergic blockade on adipose tissue lipolysis provoked in cats and humans by intravenous perfusion of isoprenaline	Effects of Adrenergic blockade on fat lipolysis in cats and humans via intravenous infusion of isoprenaline.
2	influence of cholinergic drugs on the lateral geniculate phasic waves	Lateral geniculate phasic waves are influenced by cholinergic drugs.
2	analgesia induced by electrical stimulation of the inferior centralis nucleus of the raphe in the cat	Electrical stimulation-induced analgesia of cat's lower central nucleus raphé.
2	different targets of different neurons in nucleus gracilis of the cat	Different neuronal targets in the gracilis nucleus of the cat.
2	neuroplasticity of primary afferents in the neo natal cat and some results of early deafferentation of the trigeminal spinal nucleus	Primary afferent neuroplasticity in the neonatal cat and some early trigeminal spinal deafferentiation results.
2	axonal projections and connections of the principal sensory trigeminal nucleus in the monkey	Axonal projections and main sensory trigeminal nucleus connections in monkey.
2	the patterns of projection of cortical areas 17 18 and 19 onto the laminae of the dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus in the cat	Projection patterns of cortical zones 17-18 and 19 on cat lateral dorsal genicular nucleus laminae.
2	localization of masticatory motoneurons in the cat and rat by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	Localization of masticatory motoneurons in cats and rats by horseradish peroxidase retrograde axonal transport.
2	dorsal column nuclei projections to the cerebellar cortex in cats as revealed by the use of the retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase	Projections from dorsal column nuclei to cerebellar cortex in cats have been revealed by etapos; utilization of retrograde horseradish peroxidase transport.
2	comparative anatomical studies of the sml face cortex with special reference to the occurrence of barrels in layer iv	Anatomical comparative studies of the cortex of the sml face, particularly on the presence of layer IV drums.
2	effect of auditory neocortex ablation on pitch perception in the cat	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
2	synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells i steady frequency tone bursts	Synaptic events and patterns of discharge of cells from the cochlear nucleus i steady-frequency pulses.
2	synaptic events and discharge patterns of cochlear nucleus cells ii frequency modulated tones	Synaptic events and frequency-modulated tones of cochlear cells ii.
2	effects of static tilt on cervical spinoreticular tract neurons	Effects of the apo; static inclination on the neurons of the cervical spinoreticular tract.
2	the transmission of reflexes in the spinal cord of cats during direct irradiation with microwaves	Reflex transmission in the spinal cord of cats during exposure; direct irradiation with micro-@-@ waves.
2	synapsoarchitechtonics of the parietal and acoustic regions of the cerebral cortex of cats	Synapsoarchitechtonics of the cerebral cortical acoustic and parietal regions of cats.
2	the association connexions of the suprasylvian fringe sf and other areas of the cat auditory cortex	The connections of the suprasilvian fringe association with other regions of the cat's auditory cortex.
2	the mode of synaptic linkage in the cerebro ponto cerebellar pathway of the cat i responses in the brachium pontis	Synaptic binding mode in cerebellar cerebral pathway-ponto of cat i responses in brachium pontis.
2	the mode of synaptic linkage in the cerebro ponto cerebellar pathway of the cat ii responses of single cells in the pontine nuclei	Synaptic binding mode in cerebral cerebral pathway-cat pontotic ii individual cell responses in pontic nuclei.
2	columnar distribution of u fibres from the postcruciate cerebral projection area of the cat s group i muscle afferents	Columnal distribution of u-fibres from post brain projection region-cranial afferent i fibers of cat muscle group i.
2	functional organization of vestibulofastigial projection in the horizontal semicircular canal system in the cat	Functional organization of vestibulofastigiale projection in the semia@-@ circular horizontal channel system in the cat.
2	preventive anti epileptic action of taurine administered by direct cortical perfusion	Preventive anti-epileptic action of direct cortical infusion taurine.
2	transendothelial vesicular transport of protein following compression injury to the spinal cord	Transendothelial vesicle protein transport following spinal cord compression injury.
2	regulation of local tissue po2 in the cerebral cortex of the cat	Local tissue po2 regulation in the cat cerebral cortex.
2	effect of the hypothalamus and reticular formation on the cerebral cortex in hypoxic brain states	Effects of hypothalamus and reticular formation on cerebral cortex in cerebral hypoxic states.
2	the heterosensory interaction of neurons in the cat frontal association cortex	L' heterosensory neuron interaction in the cortex d' frontal association of the cat.
2	effects of early binocular deprivation on visual input to cat superior colliculus	Early binocular deprivation on the apos; visual contribution to the cat superior colliculus.
2	responses of spinal cord neurons to systematic changes in hindlimb skin temperatures in cats and primates	Spinal cord neuron responses to systematic changes in skin temperatures of the hindlimb in cats and primates.
2	organization of cat striate cortex a correlation of receptive field properties with afferent and efferent connections	Organizing the striated cortex of a cat correlates the properties of the receptive field with afferent and efferent connections.
2	cat parastriate cortex a primary or secondary visual area	Cat Parastriate cortex is a primary visual area or a secondary visual area.
2	modification of auditory and somatosensory system activity during pupillary conditioning in the paralyzed cat	Modification of the apos; activity of the auditory and somatosensory systems during the conditioning of the pupil in the paralysed cat.
2	unit activity in vestibular nucleus of the alert monkey during horizontal angular acceleration and eye movement	Unital activity in the vestibular nucleus of the alarm monkey during the apos; horizontal angular acceleration and movement of the eyes.
2	intracellular recordings from different types of medullary respiratory neurons of the cat	Different types of cat medullary respiratory neurons are recorded intracellularly.
2	accommodative reactions of medullary respiratory neurons of the cat	Accommodating cat medullary breathing neurons.
2	inferior colliculus i comparison of response properties of neurons in central pericentral and external nuclei of adult cat	Lower colliculus i of neuronal response properties in the central and outer pericentraous nuclei of the adult cat.
2	inferior colliculus ii development of tuning characteristics and tonotopic organization in central nucleus of the neonatal cat	Lower colliculus ii development of syntonization and d&apos features; neonatal cat central nucleus tonotopic organization.
2	physiologic characteristics of vestibular first order canal neurons in the cat i response plane determination and resting discharge characteristics	Physiological characteristics of the vestibular neurons of the first-order channel in determining the i-response plane of the cat and discharge characteristics at rest.
2	physiologic characteristics of vestibular first order canal neurons in the cat ii response to constant angular acceleration	Physiological characteristics of first-order vestibular duct neurons of cats ii in response to constant angular acceleration.
2	laminar analysis of evoked potentials of the cat visual cortex during prenatal ontogenesis	Laminar analysis of visual cortical evoked potentials of cat during prenatal ontogenesis.
2	the velocity tuning of single units in cat striate cortex	L' single unit speed adjustment in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	the effectiveness of bicuculline as an antagonist of gaba and visually evoked inhibition in the cat s striate cortex	L' effectiveness of the bicuculline as antagonist of the gaba and l' inhibition evoked visually in the striated cortex of the cat.
2	the contribution of inhibitory mechanisms to the receptive field properties of neurones in the striate cortex of the cat	Contribution of inhibitory mechanisms to receptor field properties of neurons in cat striated cortex.
2	the tendon organs of cat medial gastrocnemius significance of motor unit type and size for the activation of ib afferents	The tendinous organs of the middle gastrocnemius of the cat signify the type and size of the apos; motor unit for the apos; activation of the ib afferents.
2	discharges of relay cells in lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat during spontaneous eye movements in light and darkness	Release of relay cells in the cat's lateral genicular nucleus during spontaneous, light- and light-induced eye movements; darkness.
2	evidence for the presence of eye movement potentials during paradoxical sleep in cats	Evidence of ocular motion potentials during REM sleep in cats.
2	effects of ponto mesencephalic lesions and electrical stimulation upon pgo waves and emps in unanesthetized cats	Effects of ponto-mesencephalic lesions and pgo and emps electrical stimulation in unanesthetized cats.
2	parameters of the reflex responses of cat spinal cord neurons during ontogenesis	Reflex response parameters of spinal cord neurons in cats during ontogenesis.
2	the growing conceptus of the domestic cat	The growing concept of domestic cat.
2	behavioural repertory of cats without cerebral cortex from infancy	Behavioural directory of cerebral cortical-free cats from childhood.
2	early versus late visual cortex lesions effects on receptive fields in cat superior colliculus	Effects of late and early visual cortical lesions on receptor fields in the upper colliculus of the cat.
2	synaptosomal fractions of cat cerebral cortex after hypo osmotic and detergent treatment	Detergent hypoosmotic treatment of the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	modulation of the photically evoked potentials in the motor cortex of cats by influences of the somatosensory system and the reticular formation	The modulation of photically evoked potentials in the cat motor cortex by the influence of the cat somatosensory system and reticular formation.
2	technical note about simultaneous recording of oxygen partial pressure and neuronal activity in cat cortex	In addition, it is important to note that it is not possible to determine if there is a link between the pressure and the air pressure.
2	respiratory rhythmicity in the cat	Cat's respiratory rhythm.
2	changes in the activity of the cat sensomotor cortex under heterosensory stimulation	Cat sensomotor cortical activity under heterosensory stimulation.
2	the interaction of symmetrical cortical descending influences on lumbar motoneurons	L' interaction of descendant cortical influences symmetrical on lumbar motor neurons.
2	the effect of microiontophoretic administration of acetylcholine on evoked activity of visual cortex neurons subjected to direct cortical stimulation	L' effect of apos; microiontophoretic administration of apos; acetylcholine on apos; evoked activity of visual cortical neurons under direct cortical stimulation.
2	transformation of neuronal activity in the cat lateral geniculate body	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of the genetic makeup of the individual.
2	extra and intra cranial blood supply to brains of dog and cat	Extra- and Intra @-@Cranial Blood Supply for Dog and Cat Brains.
2	descending inputs to caudal cochlear nucleus in cats a horseradish peroxidase hrp study	Downward effects on the cochlear caudal nucleus in the cat during a hrp horseradish peroxidase study.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iii the projection to the vermal visual area	The olivocerebellar projection of horseradish peroxidase iii to the vermicular visible zone in the cat was studied by the axonal retrograde transport method.
2	marginal and extramarginal cortical lesions and visual discrimination by cats	Marginal and Extramarginal Cortical Damage and Visual Discrimination by Cats.
2	performance on the visual cliff by cats with marginal gyrus lesions	Visual cliff performance by cats with marginal gyrus lesions.
2	a histochemical study of acetylcholinesterase in intact and deafferented cat auditory cortex	A histochemical study of the acetylcholinesterase in the intact, deafferent cortical ear of the cat.
2	comparative characteristics of the background activity of neurons from several regions of the cerebral cortex of unanesthetized cats	Comparative characteristics of unanaesthetized cats; background activity of neurons in several cerebral cortical regions.
2	reactions of medial geniculate body neurons to stimulation of the auditory cortex	Reactions of neurons in the mid-genic body to auditory cortical stimulation.
2	effect of diphenylhydantoin on a developed epileptogenic focus in cats with split cerebral hemispheres	Effect of diphenylhydantoin on an epileptogenic focus developed in divided cerebral hemisphere cats.
2	the peri angular masseteropterygoid belt in the cat felis catus l	The peri-masseteropterygoid belt-angular felis catus l.
2	the effect of atropine upon acetylcholine release from cat superior cervical ganglia and rat cortical slices measurement by a radio enzymic method	L' effect of apos; atropine on release of apos; acetylcholine from the upper cervical ganglia of cats and measurement of rat cortical slices by an enzyme-based radio method.
2	acquired retinal folds in the cat	Retinal fold taken from the cat.
2	binocular interaction in strabismic kittens deprived of vision	Binocular interaction in vision-deprived stray kittens.
2	destruction of the endolymphatic sac in the cat	Endolymphatic bag destruction in the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	The olivocerebellar projection of the cat was studied using horseradish peroxidase axonal retrograde transport.
2	signs of plasticity and reconnection in spinal cord damage	Evidence of plasticity and reconnection to the spinal cord lesions.
2	experimental immunohistochemical studies on the localization and distribution of substance p in cat primary sensory neurons	Experimental immunohistochemical studies of the distribution and localization of p-substance in primary sensory neurons of cats.
2	visual discrimination between spatially separated stimuli by cats with lesions of the superior colliculus pretectum	Visual discrimination between stimuli separated spatially by cats with upper-collicular-pretectum lesions.
2	effects of vagotomy on the distribution of cholinesterases in the cat medulla oblongata	Vagotomy effects on cholinesterase distribution in cat medulla oblongata.
2	effect of beta adrenergic blockaders on the bioelectrical activity of the mesenchephalic reticular formation	Effect of beta-adrenergic blockers on mesencephalic reticular activity.
2	individual epsps produced by single triceps surae ia afferent fibers in homonymous and heteronymous motoneurons	Individual epspsps produced by a single triceps surae ia afferents in homonymous motoneurons and in heteronymous motoneurons.
2	analysis of passive and active electrophysiologic properties of neurons in mammalian nodose ganglia maintained in vitro	Analysis of active and passive electrophysiological properties of neurons in the nodule ganglia of mammals maintained in vitro.
2	activation of neurons in the cerebellar nuclei and ascending reticular formation by stimulation of the cerebellar surface	Neuronal activation in cerebellar nuclei and reticular ascending formation by cerebellar surface stimulation.
2	effect of succinylcholine on responses of neurons in the motor cortex to natural activation of muscle spindle primary endings	Succinylcholine effect on motor cortical neuron responses to apos; natural activation of primary muscle spindle terminals.
2	the cat as a possible source of toxoplasma infection for man	In addition, it is possible that the cat may be a source of toxoplasmic infection for humans.
2	spinal sympathetic reflexes in the cat and the pathogenesis of arterial hypertension	Cat spinal sympathetic reflexes and stroke pathogenesis; high blood pressure.
2	a study of geniculate unit activity during cryogenic blockade of the primary visual cortex in the cat	A study of l' l&apos activity; geniculate unit during primary visual cortical blockade in cats.
2	micro electrophoretic studies in the cat pulvinar region effect of acetylcholine	Microelectrophoretic studies of leaf litter; effect of leaf litter; acetylcholine on the pulvinar region of the cat.
2	autoradiographic tracing of the cerebellar projections from the lateral reticular nucleus in the cat	Autoradiographic tracing cerebellar projections of the cat lateral reticular nucleus.
2	cats raised in a one directional world effects on receptive fields in visual cortex and superior colliculus	Cats reared in one direction worldwide effects on the receptive fields in the visual cortex and in the superior colliculus.
2	in vivo activation of synthetic hormonogens of lysine vasopressin na glycyl glycyl glycyl 8 lysine vassopressin in the cat	L' in vivo vasopressin na glycyl glycyl glycyl lysine synthetic lysine hormones activation in cats.
2	dendroaxonic synapses in the substantia gelatinosa glomeruli of the spinal trigeminal nucleus of the cat	Dendroaxonic synapses in substantia gelatinosa glomeruli of the cat spinal trigeminal nucleus.
2	the influence of secretin on the secretion of pepsin in response to acid stimulants in the anaesthetized cat	L' secretin influences pepsin secretion in response to acidic stimulants in anesthetized cats.
2	size and duration of inhibition in the medial geniculate body in unanesthetized cats	Loin size and duration; median geniculate body inhibition in unanesthetized cats.
2	allergens of mammalian origin iv evidence for common allergens in cat and dog serum	Allergens from cats and dogs; allergens from mammalian origin; common allergens in the serum.
2	motor unit responses in the lateral rectus muscle of the cat intracellular current injection of abducens nucleus neurons	Reactions of the apos; motor unit in the lateral rectum muscle of the apos; injection of intracellular current of neurons of nuclei removed from the cat.
2	junctions in the central nervous system of the cat v the junctional complex of the pia arachnoid membrane	Junctions in the cat's central nervous system v junctional complex of pia arachnoid membrane.
2	experimental salivary mucoceles in cat a histochemical study	Mucoceles salivaire experimenta in the cat.
2	response plasticity of lateral geniculate neurons during and after pairing of auditory and visual stimuli	The ability of lateral genicular neurons to respond flexibly and flexibly; the ability to combine visual and auditory stimuli.
2	unit activity in somatosensory area ii sii and tooth pulp stimulation in a cat	Single activity in the somatosensory ii sii region and stimulation of toothpulp in a cat.
2	the bony tentorium of the cat stereotaxic coordinates	Bone tentorium from the cat stereotactic coordinates.
2	monoamine oxidase inhibition and the induction of ponto geniculo occipital wave activity by reserpine in the cat	Inhibition of monoamine oxidase and apos; induction of apos; activity of apos; occipital wave ponto geniculo by reserpine in cat.
2	an analysis of the subsynaptic site of action of theophylline on isolated cat tenuissimus muscle	Subsynaptic action of theophylline on isolated cat tissue was analyzed.
2	dopamine evoked inhibition of single cells of the feline putamen and basolateral amygdala	Dopamine produced apos; inhibition of individual feline putamen and apos; amygdala basolateral.
2	synaptic transmission in parasympathetic ganglia in the urinary bladder of the cat	Synaptic transmission in cat bladder parasympathetic ganglia.
2	regulation of unit activity in nucleus reticularis thalami by the mesencephalic reticular formation and the frontal granular cortex	Regulation of l' unitary activity in the nucleus reticularis thalami nucleus by formation of mesencephalic reticulum and frontal granular cortex.
2	impedance and spontaneous electrical activity as a localizing method in percutaneous spinal surgery	L' Impedance and L' Spontaneous Electrical Activity as a Localization Method in Percutaneous Spinal Surgery.
2	cortico cortical connections of the orbito frontal cortex	Cortical cortical cortical-orbital frontal cortical connections.
2	fentanyl and tooth pulp evoked responses in the spinal trigeminal nucleus caudalis region	Fentanyl and dental pulp evoke responses in the trigeminal spinal region of the caudalis nucleus.
2	receptive field types in the lateral geniculate body and their frequency characteristics	Type and frequency characteristics of lateral genitalia receptive fields.
2	antagonism of gamma aminobutyric acid and glycine by convulsants in the cuneate nucleus of cat	Glycine and aminobutyric gamma acid antagonism by convulsions in the cadenced nucleus of the cat.
2	sensitization and habituation of the plantar cushion reflex in cats	Sensitization and habituation to the cat plantar cushion reflex.
2	electrophysiological identification of pontomedullary reticular neurons directly projecting into dorsal column nuclei	Electrophysiological identification of the pontomedullary reticular neurons projecting directly into the nuclei of the dorsal column.
2	effects of thinner fibers on spinal neurones in the cat author s transl	Effects of Thinner Fibers on Spinal Neurons in Translation of Cats.
2	crossing axons in the third nerve nucleus	Crossed axons in third nerve nucleus.
2	peptide and acetylcholine action on neurones of the cat subfornical organ	Peptide action and acetylcholine on spinal cord neurons; organ at-cat fornical.
2	energy state of the cerebral cortex of the cat during hyperventilation author s transl	Status; cat cerebral cortical energy during apo; translative hyperventilation.
2	statistical characteristics of the background and evoked activity of cat superior colliculus neurons	Cats superior colliculus neurons have statistical background characteristics and evoked activity.
2	correlation of potentials evoked by tones and clicks during simultaneous recording from many points in the auditory cortex of awake cats	Correlation of the potentials evoked by sounds and clicks during the interval; simultaneous recording from several points in the ear cortex of the awake cats.
2	efferent connections of the caudate nucleus in cats	Efferent chat caudate kernel connections.
2	background impulse activity of cat pericruciate cortex neurons	Impulse bottom activity of pericruciated cat cortical neurons.
2	reflection of temporal parameters of an optic stimulus in neuronal responses of the senso motor and visual cortex in cats	It is important to remember that the visual and sensory cortical responses of cats are visual and sensory.
2	synaptic processes in neurons of the cat pericruciate cortex evoked by pyramidal tract stimulation	Synaptic processes in pericruciate cat cortical neurons evoked by stimulation of the pyramidal tract.
2	generation and propagation of direct responses of intact and chronically isolated strips of cortex	Production and propagation of direct response to intact and chronically isolated cortical strips.
2	electrical characteristics of neurons in the motor region of the cat cerebral cortex	Electrical characteristics of the neurons in the cat's cerebral cortical motor region.
2	functional organization of pathways transmitting auditory signals in the somatosensory zone of the cat cerebral cortex	Functional organization of hearing transmission in the somatosensory area of the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	changes in the receptive fields of cat lateral geniculate body neurons following removal of corticofugal influence	Changes in cat body lateral genicular neuron receptor fields after apo; elimination of apo; corticofugal influence.
2	connections between the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus and the cortex of the cat suprasylvian gyrus	Connections between the posterior thalamic lateral nucleus and the suprasylvian gyrus cortex of the cat.
2	the possibility of different effects of primary afferent depolarization on spinal reflexes	The possibility of different primary afferent depolarization effects on spinal reflexes.
2	rubrofugal influences on the spike activity of neurons of the medial reticulo spinal tract	Rubrofugality effects on apos; neural peak activity in the reticulo medial spinal tract.
2	reactions of the neurons of the reticular and ventral anterior nuclei of the optic thalamus to afferent stimulation of different modalities	Reactions of neurons in the anterior reticular and ventral thalamic optic nuclei to the related stimulation of different thalamic modalities.
2	the relationship between the second zone of the auditory cortex and the medial geniculate body and first auditory zone	The relationship between the second auditory cortical zone and the median geniculate body and the first auditory zone.
2	formation of a generator of excitation in the gigantocellular nucleus of the medulla oblongata during disruption of inhibitory processes	Formation of apos; a generator; excitation in the medulla oblongata gigantocellular nucleus during the disruption of inhibitory processes.
2	classification of the vestibulospinal neurons of the cat deiter s nucleus	Classification of cat's vestibulospinal neurons.
2	changes in the synaptic vesicles of cat motor cortex axon terminals upon stimulation	Changes in cat motor cortical axonal terminal synaptic vesicles during stimulation.
2	brain stem reticular units synaptic responses to stimulation within the ascending reticular pathways	Reticular units of the brainstem respond synaptically to uphill reticular channel stimulation.
2	intracellular study of synaptic events related to phase locking responses of cat cochlear nucleus cells to low frequency tones	Intracellular study of synaptic events related to the phase-locking responses of cochlear cells of cats to low-frequency sounds.
2	laminar patterns of geniculocortical projection in the cat	Cat Laminar Geniculocortical Projection Models.
2	visual cortical neurons influenced by the oculomotor input characterization of their receptive field properties	The neurons of the visual cortex influenced by the characterization oculo-motor of their receptive field properties.
2	the raphe nuclei of the cat brain stem a topographical atlas of their efferent projections as revealed by autoradiography	The raphe nuclei of the cat brain form a topographic atlas of their autoradiographically revealed efferent projections.
2	bilateral projection of the canine tooth pulp to bulbar trigeminal neurons	Bilateral canine dental pulp projection in trigeminal bulbar neurons.
2	the myelinated parallel fibers of the cerebellar cortex and their regional distribution	Parallel myelinated cerebellar cortex fibers and regional distribution.
2	postnatal growth of the dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat	Lateral dorsal genicular nucleus postnatal growth in cat.
2	on the variability of form and vascularization of the cat carotid body	Variability of carotid body shape and vascularization.
2	cyclic nucleotides in spinal cells	Spinal cell cyclic nucleotides.
2	nature of rhythmic discharges in ventral spinal cord roots	Nature of Rhythmic Discharge in Ventral Spinal Cord Roots.
2	electrophysiological investigations on the projections from the cerebral cortex to the vermal posterior lobe of the cerebellum	Electrophysiological studies of cerebellar posterior lobe projections from the cerebral cortex.
2	autonomic nervous system of the cat middle ear mucosa	Muscle mucosal autonomic nervous system; middle ear of cat.
2	a method of quantitating injury inflicted in acute spinal cord studies	Method for Quantification of Injury in Acute Spinal Cord Studies.
2	electron microscopy of stages of isospora felis of the cat in the mesenteric lymph node of the mouse	Cat isospora felis in the mouse mesenteric ganglion.
2	informational characteristics of the impulse activity of cat sensomotor cortex neurons during elaboration of a defensive conditioned reflex	In addition, it is important to note that there are two different types of cortical neurons: a sensory cortical neuron and a sensory cortical neuronal neuron.
2	comparative characteristics of the topography of functional interhemispheric asymmetry in the visual cortex following exposure to stimuli of different strength	Comparative features of apo topography; functional inter-hemispheric asymmetry in visual cortex after exposure to different force stimuli.
2	effect of stimulation of rostral portions of the midbrain reticular formation on the cat motor cortex	Effect of stimulation of the rostral portions of reticular midbrain formation on cat motor cortex.
2	effect of microiontophoretic application of serotonin on the background impulse activity of visual cortex neurons in unanesthetized cats	Effect of apo; microontophoretic serotonin application on apo; apo activity; background impulse of visual cortical neurons in unanaesthetized cats.
2	bandage backfall reaction occurs in infancy hypothalamic damage and catalepsy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the loss of weight and weight.
2	regulation of local tissue po2 of the brain cortex at different arterial o2 pressures	Regulation of local po2 tissue of the cerebral cortex at different pressures o2 arterial.
2	transitional cell carcinoma of the urethra in a cat	Transient cellular carcinoma of a cat; urethra.
2	the effect of hydrocortisone on the impulse activity of cat cerebral cortex neurons	It's a very important thing to know, but it's a very important thing to know.
2	interaction of capillary and tissue forces in the cat small intestine	Interaction of tissue and hair forces in the small intestine of the cat.
2	united neurons in the cat motor cortex	Unified neurons in motor cortex of cat.
2	reaction of caudate nucleus neurons to direct stimulation	Direct stimulation of neurons in the caudate nucleus.
2	effect of vestibular somatic and autonomic afferent impulsation on the activity of individual neurons in the nuclei of the cat vestibular complex	D&apos effect; vestibular autonomic and somatic vestibular afferent impulse on the apos; individual neuronal activity in the cat vestibular complex nuclei.
2	electrophysiologic study of propagation of excitation in the cat pterygopalatine ganglion	Electrophysiological study of the spread of apos; excitation of apos in the cat's pterygopalatin ganglion.
2	evoked potential decrements in auditory cortex i discrete trial and continual stimulation	Potential decreases in the auditory cortex were alluded to i discrete assay and continuous stimulation.
2	neuromuscular sensitivity to tubocurarine a comparison of 10 parameters	Tubocurarine neuromuscular sensitivity, a 10-parameter comparison.
2	sensitivity of calcium binding in cerebral tissue to weak environmental electric fields oscillating at low frequency	Sensitivity of brain tissue calcium binding to low-frequency oscillating environmental electric fields.
2	biological bases for the integration of appetitive and consummatory grooming behaviors in the cat a review	Biological bases for l' integration of the cat's appetizing and consuming grooming habits.
2	studies on drug induced neuropathies iii motor nerve deficit in cats with experimental acrylamide neuropathy	Drug-induced neuropathy studies in cats with apo; experimental neuropathy with apo; acrylamide.
2	projection of thalamic neurons to cat primary vestibular cortical fields studied by means of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase	Thalamic neuron projection in primary cortical vestibular fields of cats studied using retrograde horseradish peroxidase axonal transport.
2	electrophysiological properties of nucleus reticularis tegmenti pontis cells antidromic and synaptic activation	Electrophysiological properties of synaptic and antidromic activating cells of the nucleus reticularis tegmenti pontis.
2	heterogeneity of motor units activating single golgi tendon organs in cat leg muscles	Heterogeneity of single organ activating motor units of the golgi tendon in cat leg muscles.
2	ascending long spinal actions on forelimb motoneurons in the acute spinal cat	Long, ascending spinal actions on motoneurons of the forelimb of the spinal cats.
2	study on the intraspinal cord regeneration of sensory fibers sectioned in the posterior root of the cat	Intraspinal pith regeneration study of sectioned sensory fibers in the cat posterior root.
2	inhibitory innervation of cat sphincter of oddi	D&apos's sphincter inhibitor innervation; Oddi.
2	reflection of visceral signals in the impulse activity of the caudate nucleus	It's the first time I've been able to do this, but it's not the first time I've done it.
2	behavior of microflow and local po2 of the brain cortex during and after direct electrical stimulation a contribution to the problem of metabolic regulation of microcirculation in the brain	The behavior of the microflux and the local po2 of the cerebral cortex during and after direct electrical stimulation contributes to the problem of the metabolic regulation of the microcirculation in the brain.
2	dependence of reward contingent positive variation rcpv and cortical synchronization on visual input in the cat	Dependence of the positive variation contingent reward rcpv and cortical synchronization to l' visual entry in the chat.
2	effect of ablation of the motor cortex or the cerebellum on postural kinetic coordination in the cat	Effect of motor cortex or cerebellum ablation on the cat's postural kinetic coordination.
2	strabismus measurements in the siamese cat	Siamese cat strabismus measurement.
2	role of the carotid chemoreceptors in the hyperpnea of exercise in the cat	Carotid chemoreceptor involvement in apo placental hyperpnea; cat exercise.
2	brainstem neurons without spontaneous unit discharge	It's called a brain-stem neuron, but it's not a spontaneous unitary discharge.
2	steroid anaesthesia althesin ct 1341 and dorsal horn cell activities in feline spinal cord	Steroidal anesthesia at the apos; althesin ct 1341 and activities of the dorsal horn cells in the spinal cord of the feline.
2	hypotensive responses following oral adminstration of beta adrenoceptor blocking drugs to the conscious cat	Hypotensive reactions to drug-blocking oral beta @-@-adrenoceptor to conscious cat.
2	quantitative studies of intracellular postsynaptic potentials in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat with respect to optic tract stimulus response latencies	Quantitative studies of intracellular synaptic potentials in the cat's lateral geniculate nucleus relative to the latency of the visual tract stimuli.
2	cat retinal ganglion cells projecting to the superior colliculus as shown by the horseradish peroxidase method	Ganglion cells from the cat retina projecting onto the superior colliculus, as shown by horseradish peroxidase.
2	the integrative role of the intralaminar system of the thalamus in visual orientation and perception in the cat	The integrative role of the thalamic intralamic system in the cat's visual orientation and perception.
2	effects of frontal eye field stimulation upon activities of the lateral geniculate body of the cat	Effects of frontal ocular field stimulation on cat lateral genicular body activities.
2	the lateral reticular nucleus in the cat v does collateral activation from the dorsal spinocerebellar tract occur	The lateral reticular nucleus of cat v causes dorsal spinocerebellar collateral activation.
2	conduction velocity groupings among axons of cat retinal ganglion cells and their relationship to retinal topography	Cat retinal ganglion cell axons conduction velocity groups and their relation to retinal topography.
2	micropuncture study of pancreatic secretion in the cat	Pancreatic secretion in cats studied by micropuncture.
2	indoleamine accumulating neurons in the retina of rabbit cat and goldfish	L' indoleamine accumulates neurons in rabbit cat and goldfish retina.
2	occurrence of cilia in the fundus striati of the cat	Presence of eyelashes in cat's fundus striati.
2	effect of isotonic contrast agents on spinal reflexes in the cat	The effect of isotonic contrast agents on the reflexes of the spinal cord in cats.
2	characteristics of three strains of feline fibrosarcoma virus grown in cat and marmoset monkey cells	Characteristics of three feline fibrosarcoma virus strains grown in monkey-cat and monkey-marmot cells.
2	effects of visual deprivation on polyribosome aggregation in visual cortex of the cat	Effects of visual deprivation on the apos; aggregation of polyribosomes into the cat's visual cortex.
2	some contractile and electrophysiologic properties of the periurethral striated muscle of the cat	Some contractile and electrophysiological properties of striated cat perurethral muscle.
2	the extent of the odontoblast process in the cat	L' extent of cat odontoblast process.
2	cellular changes in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat and monkey after section of the optic tract	Cellular changes in cat and monkey lateral genicular nucleus following section of optic tract.
2	further studies on the mechanisms controlling prostaglandin biosynthesis in the cat adrenal cortex the role of calcium and cyclic amp	Other studies on the mechanisms controlling the biosynthesis of prostaglandins in the adrenal cortex of cats have focused on the role of calcium and the cyclic ampulla.
2	reactions of respiratory center neurons to local cooling of the ventral surface of the medulla oblongata	Reactions of neurons from the respiratory center to the local cooling of the medulla oblongata ventral surface.
2	a fraction isolated from porcine upper small intestine stimulating pepsin secretion in the cat	An isolated fraction of the upper porcine small intestine stimulates cat pepsin secretion.
2	the effects of 5 hydroxytryptophan and l tryptophan on wakefulness and sleep patterns in the cat	It's a good way to help your cat feel at home and relax.
2	basal forebrain and hypothalamic influences upon brain stem neurons	Basal Influences of Forebrain and Apos; hypothalamus on brainstem neurons.
2	integrative versus delay line characteristics of cerebellar cortex	D&apos characteristics; cerebellar cortical integration versus cerebellar cortical delay line.
2	ultrastructural and biochemical evidence for a steroid containing secretory organelle in the perfused cat adrenal gland	Ultrastructural and biochemical evidence of the presence of a secretory organelle-containing steroid in the cat's perfused adrenal gland.
2	effects of low level x irradiation on cat cerebella at different postnatal intervals i quantitative evaluation of morphological changes	In the case of a cat, a small amount of irradiation can be induced by a small amount of radiation at different intervals after birth.
2	mechanical stimuli exciting type a atrial vagal receptors in the cat	Mechanical arousing stimuli like a vagal atrial receptor in the cat.
2	experimental myocardial infarction in the cat i reversible decline in contractility of noninfarcted muscle	Experimental cat myocardial infarction i reversible depression of noninfarct muscle contractility.
2	ultrastructural localization of acid phosphatase and thiamine pyrophosphatase activities and of phosphotungstic staining at low ph in the placental labyrinth of the cat	Ultrastructural localization of thiamine pyrophosphatase and acid phosphatase activities and low-php phosphotungstic staining in the cat placental labyrinth.
2	the retinal projection to the ventral part of the lateral geniculate nucleus an experimental study with silver impregnation methods and axoplasmic protein tracing	Retinal projection to the ventral portion of the lateral genicular nucleus has made the subject of an experimental study using fingerprinting, silver and tracing of axoplasmic proteins.
2	absence of the gamma spindle loop in the reinnervated hind leg muscles of the cat alpha muscle	Absence of gamma spindle loop in cat alpha muscle reinnervated hind leg muscles.
2	horizontal vestibular nystagmus ii activity patterns of medial vestibular neurones during nystagmus	Horizontal vestibular Nystagmus ii d&apos patterns; median vestibular neuron activity during nystagmus.
2	the climbing fibers of the cerebellar cortex their origin and pathways in cat	The climbing cerebellar cortex fibers have their origin and their pathways in the cat.
2	changes in the electrical activity of the cerebral cortex under the combined influence of cl perfringens type a toxin and products of cl butyricum activity	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that may contribute to the formation of the brain, such as changes in the brain's electrical activity, the influence of perfringens toxin a and the products of apos.
2	comparative study of the dorso medial nucleus of the inferior colliculus	Dorso kernel comparison-median of inferior colliculus.
2	dendroarchitectonic study of the inferior colliculus in the cat	Dendroarchitectonic study of cat lower colliculus.
2	spatiotemporal organization of cat lateral geniculate receptive fields	Spatial organization-temporal of lateral receptive field geniculate of cat.
2	interactions between cat lateral geniculate neurons	Lateral genicular neuron interactions in the cat.
2	responses to tones and noise of single cells in dorsal cochlear nucleus of unanesthetized cats	Response to tone and sound of individual cells in unanesthetized cats' dorsal cochlear nucleus.
2	mossy fiber neck and second order labyrinthine projections to cat flocculus	Second-order labyrinthine projections of the cat flocculus.
2	reversal properties of climbing fiber potential in cat purkinje cells an example of a distributed synapse	An example of a distributed synapse is the properties of d' reversing the potential of the climbing fibers in the cells of cat purkinje.
2	cortical histopathology following stimulation with metallic and carbon electrodes	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
2	responses of single neurons to electrical stimulation of the surface of the visual cortex	Reactions of isolated neurons to visual cortical surface electrical stimulation.
2	the visual cortex during chronic stimulation	During chronic stimulation, the visual cortex.
2	morphine naloxone and the responses of medial thalamic neurones of the cat	Morphine naloxone and cat median thalamic neural responses.
2	electrophysiological and horseradish peroxidase studies of precerebellar afferents to the nucleus interpositus anterior i climbing fiber system	Electrophysiological and Horseradish Peroxidase Studies of Precerebella afferents of the anterior interpositus nucleus of the climbing fiber system i.
2	relationship between visual and tactile representations in cat superior colliculus	Visual and tactile representations in the upper colliculus of the cat.
2	fast and slow pyramidal tract neurons an intracellular analysis of their contrasting repetitive firing properties in the cat	The neurons of the fast and slow pyramidal pathways, an intracellular analysis of the cat's contrasting, repetitive firing properties.
2	the response of ca mediated action potentials and contractile activity in mammalian ventricular myocardium towards alkalosis	The response of the C-mediated and C-mediated action potentials; contractile activity in the ventricular myocardium of the mammalian to acidosis; alkalosis.
2	monocular deprivation morphological effects on different classes of neurons in the lateral geniculate nucleus	Morphological effects of monocular deprivation on different neuronal classes in the lateral geniculate nucleus.
2	lipids in the proximal convoluted tubule of the cat kidney and the reabsorption of cholesterol	Lipids in the circumvented cat kidney proximal tubule and cholesterol reabsorption.
2	reconstruction of neurons of dorsal horn proper using golgi stained serial sections	Dorsal horn neuronal reconstruction proper at the apos; aid of golgi-stained serial sections.
2	properties of ganglion cells in the visual streak of the cat s retina	Ganglion cell properties in visual band of cat retina.
2	the effect of l tryptophan on spinal cord c fiber reflexes	L' effect of tryptophan on the reflexes of the c fibres of the spinal cord.
2	the effects of batrachotoxin on cat papillary muscle	The effects of batrachotoxin... on the cat's papillary muscle.
2	cancellation of rod signals by cones and cone signals by rods in the cat retina	Cancellation of the rod signals by the cones and the cone signals by the rod signals in the cat's retina.
2	fast axoplasmic transport in the fibres of chromatolysed neurones	Rapid axoplasmic transport in chromatolyzed neuron fibers.
2	lateral geniculate relay of slowly conducting retinal afferents to cat visual cortex	Lateral geniculate relays of the slowly conducting, retinal afferents of the visual cortex of the cat.
2	the physiology and anatomy of long ranging afferent fibres within the spinal cord	Physiology and Anatomy of Long-Range Afferent Fibers in the Spinal Cord.
2	visual cells in the pontine nuclei of the cat	Visual cells in cat pontic nuclei.
2	visual cortical cells their developmental properties in normal and dark reared kittens	Visual cortical cells develop in normal kittens and kittens reared in the dark.
2	the diastolic viscous properties of cat papillary muscle	Cat papillary muscle viscosity diastolic properties.
2	influence of frequency of splanchnic nerve stimulation on development of habituation in the cat cerebral cortex	Influence of the frequency of stimulation of the splanchnic nerve on the development of the apos; habituation in the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	features of individual sympathetic preganglionic neurons and their axons in the superior thoracic portion of the spinal cord	Characteristics of individual sympathetic preganglionic neurons and their upper thoracic axons in the spinal cord.
2	purification of kallikrein from cat submaxillary gland	Cleaning the gland's kallikrein under cat's maxillary.
2	effects of electrical stimulation of the substantia nigra on responses of lateral geniculate body neurons to light	Effects of black matter electrical stimulation on the responses of neurons in the lateral geniculated body to light.
2	comparisons of the immunological properties of two structural polypeptides of type c rna viruses endogenous to old world monkeys	Comparison of the immunological properties of the two structural polypeptides of endogenous c rna-like viruses to l&apos monkeys; ancient world.
2	visual cortex role in object discrimination in cats deprived of pattern vision from birth	Role of the visual cortex in discrimination of objects in birth-deprived cats.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat i motor output during sinusoidal linear accelerations	Dynamic relationships between natural vestibular inputs and vestibular processes; anterior limb extensor muscle activity in the motor flow of the decerebrated cat during apo; linear sinusoidal accelerations.
2	discharges of superior colliculus neurons during head and eye movements of the alert cat	Discharge neurons from the superior colliculus during movement of the head and eyes of the alert cat.
2	the effects of cerebral sensory cortical ablation on instrumental conditioned reflex in cats with cerebellar lesions	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat ii motor output during rotations in the horizontal plane	Dynamic relationships between natural vestibular inputs and l' forelimb extensor muscle activity in decerebrate cats; and motor output during horizontal plane rotations.
2	dynamic relations between natural vestibular inputs and activity of forelimb extensor muscles in the decerebrate cat iii motor output during rotations in the vertical plane	Dynamic relationships between natural vestibular inputs and l' activity of the extensor muscles of the decerebrate cat iii during vertical plane rotations.
2	somatosensory properties of spinoreticular neurons in the cat	Spinoreticular neuron somatosensory properties in cats.
2	activity of some enzymes in the cortex of the cat with pretrigeminal brainstem transection	Enzyme activity in cat cortex with pre-seminal brain stem transection.
2	ascites associated with intrahepatic arteriovenous fistula in a cat	Intrahepatic arteriovenous fistula associated ascitis in a cat.
2	relationships between the spike components and the delayed depolarization in cat spinal neurones	Relationship between spike components and delayed depolarization in spinal neurons.
2	strain sensitivity and directionality in cat atrial mechanoreceptors in vitro	The sensitivity and directionality of the strain in the atrial mechanoreceptors of cats in vitro.
2	mechanosensitive afferent units in the hypogastric nerve of the cat	Mechanosensitive afferent units in hypogastric nerve of cat.
2	statistical fluctuations in charge transfer at ia synapses on spinal motoneurones	Statistical fluctuations of the charge transfer to the spinal motorcycles' synapses.
2	non quantal fluctuations and transmission failures in charge transfer at ia synapses on spinal motoneurones	Nonquantum fluctuations and charge transfer transmission failures at the synapses ia of spinal motoneurons.
2	the effect of polarizing currents on unitary ia excitatory post synaptic potentials evoked in spinal motoneurones	The effect of polarizing currents on the excitatory post-synaptic potentials of spinal motoneurons was also evoked.
2	threshold setting by the surround of cat retinal ganglion cells	Ganglion cells surrounding the cat retina.
2	functional adaptation of sarcomere number of normal cat muscle	Functional adaptation of cat normal muscle sarcomere number.
2	horseradish peroxidase localization of masticatory muscle motoneurons in cat	The localization of masticatory motor neurons in the cat by horseradish peroxidase.
2	identification and discharge patterns of spinal sympathetic interneurons	Identification and release of the sympathetic spinal interneurons.
2	ascending pressor and depressor pathways in the cat spinal cord	Pressor and upward depressive pathways in cat spinal cord.
2	the effect of activation of central adrenergic receptors by clonidine on the excitability of the solitary tract neurons in cats	L' effect of apos; clonidine activation of central adrenergic receptors on apos; excitability of neurons in the solitary tract in cats.
2	the anatomical organization of the cerebello olivary projection in the cat	L' anatomical organization of the projection of olivary cerebello in the cat.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat as studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase ii the projection to the uvula	The olivocerebellar projection in cats was studied by the retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase.
2	electrophoretic patterns of insoluble proteins in the sensory cerebral cortex of visually deprived and normal kittens	Electrophoretic models of sensory cerebral cortex-insoluble proteins of normal kittens and visually impaired kittens.
2	effect of clonidine and chlorpromazine on centrally evoked electrodermal responses and their interaction with yohimbine	Effect of clonidine and chlorpromazine on evoked central electrodermic responses and their interaction with yohimbine.
2	neuronal responses to eye muscle stretch in cerebellar lobule vi of the cat	The neural responses to the ocular muscle s&apos extend into the cat's vi cerebellar lobule.
2	dark adaptation and receptive field organisation of cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus	Adaptation to apo; darkness and organization of cell receptor field (CRF) in the lateral geniculate nucleus of cats.
2	responses of cells in the cat lateral geniculate nucleus to moving stimuli at various levels of light and dark adaptation	Reactions of cat lateral genicular nucleus cells to varying levels of motile stimuli; adaptation to light and light; darkness.
2	commissural projection to the amygdala thourgh the fimbria fornix system in the cat	Police projection in the chat; amygdale thourgh fimbria system fornix.
2	effects of lsd on the response of single units in cat visual cortex	In addition, there is a need for additional information.
2	time discrimination performance in cats with lesions in prefrontal cortex and caudate nucleus	"""Time discrimination performance"" in damage to the prefrontal cortex and the caudate nucleus."
2	interaction between spindles evoked by electric stimulation of different regions of the cerebral cortex	Spindle interaction evoked by electrical stimulation of different cerebral cortical regions.
2	distribution of gastrin in canine cat and human digestive organs	Gastrin distribution in the digestive organs of cat dogs and men.
2	prophylactic effects of phenytoin phenobarbital and carbamazepine examined in kindling cat preparations	Phenobarbital phenytoin and carbamazepine were examined for their protective effects in pet cat preparations.
2	cross sectional area of scala tympani in human and cat	The eardrum is the most common type of eardrum.
2	unmyelinated axons in thoracic ventral roots of the cat	Nonmyelinated axons in cat thoracic ventral roots.
2	the olivocerebellar projection in the cat studied with the method of retrograde axonal transport of horseradish peroxidase iv the projection to the anterior lobe	The cat olivocerebellar projection was studied by the retrograde axonal transport method of horseradish peroxidase iv, projection to the anterior lobe.
2	the effect of superior colliculus lesions upon the visual fields of cats with cortical ablations	Effects of upper colliculus lesions on visual field of cortical ablation cats.
2	the effect of cortical and tectal lesions on the visual fields of binocularly deprived cats	L' cortical and tectal lesions affect the visual field of cats without binoculars.
2	quantitative studies of cell size in the cat s dorsal lateral geniculate nucleus following visual deprivation	Quantitative studies of the size of cells in the dorsal lateral genital nucleus of cats following visual deprivation.
2	visual cortical areas mediating form discrimination in the cat	Cortical visual zones mediating cat form discrimination.
2	effects of benzodiazepines and pentobarbital on the evoked potentials in the cat brain	Effects of benzodiazepines and of pentobarbital on evoked potentials in the brain of cats.
2	preterminal and terminal axon arborizations in the substantia gelatinosa of cat s spinal cord	Terminal preterminal arborizations of axons in gelatinous material of the cat spinal cord.
2	relay cell classes in the lateral geniculate nucleus of the cat and the effects of visual deprivation	The classes of relay cells in the cat lateral genicular nucleus and visual deprivation effects.
2	antagonizing effects of beta adrenergic blockers on lucus coeruleus induced inhibition of trigeminal nucleus neurons	Inhibition of trigeminal nuclei neurons was induced by the antagonistic effects of β-adrenergic blockers on lucus coeruleus.
2	projections from the amygdaloid complex to the cerebral cortex and thalamus in the rat and cat	Thalamic and cerebral cortical amygdaloid complex in rats and cats.
2	projections from the amygdaloid complex and adjacent olfactory structures to the entorhinal cortex and to the subiculum in the rat and cat	Amygdaloid complex and olfactory structures adjacent to entorhinal cortex and subiculum in rat and cat.
2	an autoradiographic identification of purkinje axon terminals in the cat	Autoradiographic identification of cat Purkinje axonal terminals.
2	projections of several intralaminar nuclei of the thalamus to the caudate nucleus in cats	Projections of several intralaminated thalamic to caudate nuclei in cats.
2	histological effects of ductal ligation of salivary glands of the cat	Histological effects of cat salivary gland ligation.
2	structural characteristics of the axons of nerve cells of the cat motor cortex	Structural features of cat motor cortical nerve cell axons.
2	comparative morphometric study of sensory neurons of the cerebral and spinal cord ganglia following transection of their processes	Comparative morphometric study of spinal cord and cerebral ganglia sensory neurons after their processes have been cut.
2	efferent projections of the ventral portion of the putamen to the frontal parietal and temporal regions of the cat cerebral cortex	Efferent projections of the ventral part of the putamen in temporal and parietal frontal regions of the cerebral cortex of the cat.
2	associative connections of the visual area of the neuronally isolated cat cortex	Associative visual area connections in isolated cat cortex neuronally.
2	altered levels of pgf in cat spinal cord tissue following traumatic injury	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a disease of the nervous system that affects the nervous system.
2	neuronal activity of the cat visual cortex during the sleep wakefulness cycle	Cat visual cortical neural activity during cycle d' sleep alertness.
2	mechanisms of transmission of excitation grnerated in the orbito frontal cortex	It's the same thing, but it's not the same thing, it's the same thing.
2	a standardized model of microembolization in the cat brain	A standardized microembolism model in the brain of the cat.
2	simple striate neurons in the cat i comparison of responses to moving and stationary stimuli	Cat i single striated neurons compare responses to stationary and motile stimuli.
2	simple striate neurons in the cat ii mechanisms underlying directional asymmetry and directional selectivity	Single striated neurons in cats and cats ii mechanisms under-jacent to directional asymmetry and directional selectivity.
2	antidromic activity in visual radiation during evoked cortical responses	L' anti-romic activity in the visual radiation during the cortical responses evoked.
2	the actions of natural secretin on the small intestinal vasculature of the anaesthetized cat	Natural secretin's actions on the vascular system of the anesthetized cat's small intestine.
2	labelled decamethonium in cat muscle	Decamethonium labeled in the muscle of the cat.
2	biotin deficiency in the cat and the effect on hepatic propionyl coa carboxylase	Liver biotin deficiency in cat and effect on the hepatic propionyl coa carboxylase.
2	the mechanism of inhibition of neuronal activity by opiates in the spinal cord of cat	The Mechanism of Dapos; Impulse Inhibition; Neural Activity by Opiates in the Spinal Cord of the Cat.
2	selective discharge of pontine neurons during the postural atonia produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat	Selective discharge of pontic neurons during apo; postural anticholinesterase atomization in decerebrate cats.
2	tonic inhibition of dorsal pontine neurons during the postural atonia produced by an anticholinesterase in the decerebrate cat	Tonic inhibition of dorsal pontic neurons during apos; anticholinesterase-induced postural atonia in decerebrated cat.
2	sequential discharges of phasic activities pgo waves during paradoxical sleep after selective cortical lesions in the cat	Sequential unloading of pgo wave phasic activities during REM sleep after cat selective cortical lesions.
2	the uptake of dh ergotoxine by different parts of the cat brain	L' absorption of l' ergotoxin by different parts of cat brain.
2	serotonin involvement in the blockade of bulbospinal inhibition of the spinal monosynaptic reflex	L' involvement of serotonin in mono-synaptic spinal blockade; bulbospinal inhibition.
2	responses of complex cells in the visual cortex of the cat as a function of the length of moving slits	Complex cell responses in the cat visual cortex depend on the length of moving slits.
2	incorporation of tritiated leucine by axotomized rubral neurons	L' tritium leucine uptake by axotomized rubella neurons.
2	convergence of the descending pathways of motor visual and limbic cortex in the cat di and mesencephalon	Convergence of motor vision and limbic cortical descending channels in cat di and midbrain.
2	the effect of antifibrinolytic therapy in experimental spinal cord trauma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
2	spinal projections from the nucleus locus coeruleus and nucleus subcoeruleus in the cat and monkey as demonstrated by the retrograde transport of horseradish peroxidase	Spinal projections of the locus coeruleus nucleus and subcoeruleus nucleus in cats and monkeys as demonstrated by retrograde horseradish peroxidase transport.
2	power spectral analysis of eeg activity obtained from cortical and subcortical sites during the vigilance states of the cat	Spectral power analysis of l' activity eeg obtained from cortical sites and-cortical during cat vigilance states.
2	the mechanism of the vasodilator effects of histamine and 4 methylhistamine in the hindquarters of the cat	The mechanism of vasodilatory effects of histamine, histamine, and methylhistamine 4 in cat hindquarters.
2	ultrastructure of arterioles in the cat brain	L' ultrastructure of cat brain arterioles.
2	allergens of mammalian origin v properties of extracts derived from the domestic cat	D&apos allergens; mammalian origin is derived from domestic cat extracts.
2	abnormal visual resolution in the siamese cat	Siamese cat's abnormal visual resolution.
2	effect of damage to the zone of the medial forebrain bundle and preoptic area on the activiy of a penicillin induced epileptiform focus phenomenon of the hyperactive determinant dispatch station	Effects of the apos; alteration of the bundle area of the median forebrain and the preoptic region on the apos; d&apos activity; a phenomenon of epileptiform focusing induced by penicillin of the hyperactive determinant control station.
2	influence of the somatic region of the cortex on trace inhibitory processes in the posterior lateral nucleus of the thalamus	L' influence of cortical somatic region on inhibitory processes at apos; trace state in posterior lateral nucleus of thalamus.
2	epinephrine inhibition of the electrodermal response in the cat	Epinephrine inhibition of cat electrodermal response.
2	the influence of hypothalamically administered reserpine on the sexual behavior of the female cat	L' influence of reserpine; hypothalamic reserpine administration on female cat sexual behavior.
2	method for reliably recording geniculate spikes during paradoxical sleep in the cat	Reliable method of recording spikes during cat REM sleep.
2	modification of visual function by early visual experience	L'experience de l'auteur de l'expression de l'expression.
2	reactions of neurons in the primary and secondary somatosensory zones of the cortex to stimulation of the ventral posterior nucleus of the thalamus	Reactions of primary and secondary cortical somatosensory neurons to stimulation of the ventral posterior thalamic nucleus.
2	spatial organization of the direct connections of the sensory motor cortex with the rhombencephalon and spinal cord in cats	Spatial organization of direct connections between the sensory motor cortex and the cat's rhombencephalon and spinal cord.
2	comparative characteristics of interneuronal dimensions in the cervical segments of the cat spinal cord	Comparative characteristics of internaluronal dimensions in cat spinal cord cervical segments.
2	cardiovascular actions of prostaglanding f2alpha 15 me f2alpha f1alpha f2beta and f1beta in the cat	Cardiovascular action of f2alpha 15 prostaglander f2alpha f1alpha f2beta and f1beta in the cat.
2	neuroanatomic projections related to biting attack elicited from ventral midbrain in cats	Neuroanatomical projections of cat bites in the ventral midbrain.
3	binding capacity of reductively fragmented antibodies to the 2 4 dinitrophenyl group	Reductively fragmented dinitrophenyl group 2 binding capacity 4.
3	antigens and enzymes made insoluble by entrapping them into lattices of synthetic polymers	Antigen and enzyme become insoluble by trapping them in synthetic polymer networks.
3	gamma globulins quantitative relationships in human serum and nonvascular fluids	Quantitative Relationship Between Gamma Globulins in Human Serum and Nonvascular Fluids.
3	complementary strand association between nucleic acids and nucleic acid gels	In the case of a nucleic acid, the nucleic acid is the same as the nucleic acid.
3	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes lability at low temperature	Lactate dehydrogenase is low-temperature lability.
3	provitamin a2 from lutein	Lutein provitamin a2.
3	mitomycin c chemical and biological studies on alkylation	Chemical and Biological Studies of Mitomycin c on Apos; Alkylation.
3	double stranded ribonucleic acid formation in vitro by ms 2 phage induced rna synthetase	In vitro formation of d' double-stranded ribonucleic acid (DNA) synthetase induced by phage ms 2.
3	production of antirenin to homologous renin and its effect of experimental renal hypertension	Renal homologue anrenin production and its effect on experimental renal hypertension.
3	the arrangements of nucleotide sequences in t2 and t5 bacteriophage dna molecules	In addition, it is not possible to determine the nature of the nucleotide sequence.
3	protein polysaccharide in connective tissue inhibition of phase separation	Connective tissue protein polysaccharide inhibition of phase separation.
3	microdetermination of calcium and magnesium in biological materials	Microdetermination of Calcium and Magnesium in Biological Materials.
3	practical human growth hormone preparation and clinical use	In addition, it may be used in combination with other drugs.
3	steric factors in the chemistry of polypeptides poly alphaamino acids and proteins	Steric Factors in Polyalphaamino-Acid and Protein Chemistry.
3	preparation of retine from human urine	The results of this study are summarized below.
3	a stable substrate for the assay of plasma kinin forming enzymes	Stable substrate for plasma kinin-forming enzyme assay.
3	hybridization of half molecules of rabbit gamma globulin	Half-Hybridization Rabbit Gamma Globulin Molecules.
3	circularity of the replicating form of a single stranded dna virus	Circularity of replicative d' single chain DNA virus.
3	hemoglobin solubility and alpha chain structure in crosses between two inbread mouse strains	The solubility of apos; hemoglobin and the structure of the alpha chain in crosses between two lines of selfed mice.
3	identity of tarichatoxin and tetrodotoxin	Identity of Tarichatoxin and Tetrodotoxin.
3	alpha chain of human hemoglobin occurrence in vivo	Human hemoglobin in vivo.
3	actinomycin d as a probe for nucleic acid secondary structure	L' actinomycin d as probe for secondary structure of nucleic acids.
3	actinomycin correlation of structure and function of its complexes with purines and dna	The protein structure and function are correlated; its purine and protein complexes are actinomycin; DNA.
3	conversion of leucoanthocyanins into the corresponding anthocyanidins	Conversion of leucoanthocyanines to leucoanthocyanidins.
3	thermal denaturation of collagen in the dispersed and solid state	Dénaturation thermique de collagen à l'apos; state dispersion et solid.
3	group specific carbohydrate of group c variant hemolytic streptococci	Group-specific c varying hemolytic streptococci.
3	oxygen stable hemolysins of group a streptococci ii chromatographic and electrophoretic studies	Stable oxygenated hemolysin group has streptococci; ii Chromatographic and electrophoretic studies.
3	affinity and phosphorylation constants for the inhibition of esterases by organophosphates	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
3	intercellular macromolecules containing polysaccharides	Intercellular polysaccharide-containing macromolecules.
3	the three dimensional structures of proteins	Protein three-dimensional structures.
3	macromolecules origin development significance	Importance of development; macromolecular origin.
3	guanine formation during the thermal polymerization of amino acids	Guanine formation during thermal amino acid polymerization.
3	insect chemosterilants with low toxicity for mammals	Insects that are not very toxic to mammals.
3	sonic energy effects in bovine serum albumin solutions	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that are considered to be of high quality.
3	immunological and toxic differences between mouse virulent and mouse avirulent candida albicans	Toxic and immunological differences between virulent and avirulent mice candida albicans.
3	physical surface features and chemical density of dry bacterial spores	Chemical density and surface physical characteristics of dry bacterial spores.
3	outstanding characteristics of thrombokinase isolated from bovine plasma	Exceptional Features of Thrombokinase Isolated from Bovine Plasma.
3	new natural growth promoting substances in young citrus fruit	New substances promoting natural growth in citrus fruits.
3	invertebrate ferritin occurrence in mollusca	Invertebrate ferritin distribution in molluscs.
3	cesium 134 in alaskan eskimos and in fallout	Cesium 134 in the Eskimo Mountains; Cesium 134 in Alaska and in fallout.
3	measurement of bone mineral in vivo an improved method	Measuring bone minerals in vivo is improved.
3	an investigation of the electrical conductivity of steroids	A study of steroid electrical conductivity.
3	linear polymerization of a gastropod hemocyanin	It can be used as an antiseptic or antiseptic.
3	cortisol from human nerve	Human-nervous cortisol.
3	feedback control of purified deoxycytidylate deaminase	Rétro-controls the deoxycytidylate deaminase.
3	thiamine a novel conversion from thiochrome	Thiamine conversion is a new conversion from thiochrome.
3	the cytonucleoproteins of amebae i some chemical properties and intracellular distribution	Amoebic cytonucleoproteins have certain intracellular distribution and chemical properties.
3	antibodies to bradykinin and angiotensin a use of carbodiimides in immunology	Antibody to bradykinin and l' angiotensin, a carbodiimide-based immunology.
3	extracellular polysaccharides of azotobacter vinelandii	Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) is a process that involves the synthesis of polymerase chain reaction.
3	lipids of sarcina lutea i fatty acid composition of the extractable lipids	Sarcina lutea fats i extractable lipid fatty acid composition.
3	identification of species of actinomyces	Species identification; actinomyces.
3	some characteristics of streptococcal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotidase and streptolysin o	Characteristics of nicotinamide adenine streptococcal dinucleotidase and streptolysin o.
3	the impurity of radioiodinated triolein	Radioiodinated triolein impurity.
3	oxygen atom reactions with condensed olefins	Reactions of d*apos atoms; condensed olefin oxygen.
3	heparinic acids determination of equivalent weights and sulfate to carboxyl ratios	Determination of equivalent weight heparinic acids and carboxyl sulphate ratios.
3	nucleic acids a nuclear magnetic resonance study	Nucleic Acids: Nuclear Magnetic Resonance Study.
3	antigenic structure of the actinomycetales vii chemical and serological similarities of cell walls from 100 actinomycetales strains	Antigenic actinomycetal structure vii chemical and serological cell wall similarities of 100 d' actinomycetales.
3	alkylation of synthetic polynucleotides	Synthetic polynucleotide alkylation.
3	hydrogen atom thermal parameters	In this case, the temperature shall be the same as in the preceding paragraph.
3	creative scientists of today	It's a good idea to try to make it work.
3	immunoglobulin structure partial amino acid sequence of a bence jones protein	It is a protein that can be used in the production of proteins, but not in the production of proteins.
3	dna reaction with chloroquine	Chloroquine DNA reaction.
3	mercurial induced transformation of myosin prevented by adenosine triphosphate and pyrophosphate	Mercury induces myosin transformation prevented by pyrophosphate and adenosine triphosphate.
3	base specificity in the interaction of polynucleotides with antibiotic drugs	Basal specificity in apos; polynucleotide interaction with antibiotics.
3	cesium 137 in alaskan eskimos	Cesium-137 in the Eskimo Mountains of Alaska.
3	chemical studies on cellular components of bordetella pertussis iii isolation of highly potent toxin from bordetella pertussis	Chemical studies of the cellular components of Bordetella pertussis iii isolation from apos, a potent toxin of Bordetella pertussis.
3	immunochemical analysis of human oral strains of fusobacterium and leptotrichia	Human oral strains of fusobacteria and leptotrichies are immunochemically analysed.
3	experimental salmonellosis iii new toxic fraction l obtained from salmonella enteritidis and its immunological properties	Experimental Salmonellosis iii a novel toxic fraction of Salmonella enteritidis and its immunological properties.
3	classification of microorganisms by analysis of chemical composition i feasibility of utilizing gas chromatography	Classification of micro@-@ organisms by chemical composition analysis; use of gas chromatography.
3	fatty acid composition of lipids from streptococcus cremoris and streptococcus lactis var maltigenes	Fatty acid composition of the lipids of Streptococcus cremoris and Streptococcus lactis var maltigenes.
3	phenotypic genotypic and chemical changes in starving populations of aerobacter aerogenes	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: phenotypic, genotypic, and chemical changes in starving populations.
3	spectrochemical analysis of inorganic elements in bacteria	Spectrochemical analysis of inorganic elements in the bacteria.
3	dependence of the content of cell envelopes on the growth rate of bacillus megaterium	The contents of the cell envelopes depend on the megaterium growth rate.
3	capsular polysaccharide of azotobacter agilis	Bacteria that are more common in humans.
3	origin and properties of naturally occurring hapten from escherichia coli	Apos origin and properties; apos hapten; natural origin from apos; escherichia coli.
3	differentiation of exotoxin and other biologically active substances in pseudomonas pseudomallei filtrates	Differentiation of exotoxin and dapos; other biologically active substances in the filtrates of pseudomonas pseudomallei.
3	evidence for an exocellular site for the acid phosphatase of saccharomyces mellis	Evidence of succharomyces mellis acid phosphatase exocellular site.
3	structure and composition of the bacillus anthracis capsule	Structure and capsule composition of anthracis bacillus.
3	chemical composition and biological properties of the endotoxin of brucella abortus	Chemical composition and biological properties of brucella abortus endotoxin.
3	hypoferremia in mice and its application to the bioassay of endotoxin	Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
3	mitomycins and porfiromycin chemical mechanism of activation and cross linking of dna	Matiomycins and porfiromycin chemical mechanism; DNA cross-binding and activation.
3	immunological and biochemical studies on serum haptoglobin	Immunological and Biochemical Studies on Serum Haptoglobin.
3	antigenic relationships between groups b and g streptococci	Antimicrobial interactions between group b and group g Streptococcus.
3	the spectral distribution of firefly light	Firefly light spectral distribution.
3	nucleic acid homologies of selected bacteria l forms mycoplasma species	Selected bacterial nucleic acid and d&apos homologies form mycoplasma species.
3	lifetime of bacterial messenger ribonucleic acid	Ribonucleic acid, a bacterial messenger.
3	nucleotide composition of nucleic acids of fungi i ribonucleic acids	Nucleic acid nucleic composition of ribonucleic acid fungi i.
3	autolytic mechanism for spheroplast formation in bacillus cereus and escherichia coli	Sphaeroplast-forming autolytic mechanisms in cereus and l' escherichia coli.
3	myosin substructure isolation of a helical subunit from heavy meromyosin	Isolation of apos; one sub-helical unit under myosin structure of heavy meromyosin.
3	use of a filter paper disk assay in the measurement of lipid biosynthesis	Using d' a paper-disk filter test to measure lipid biosynthesis.
3	synthesis of fatty acid anhydrides by reaction with dicyclohexylcarbodiimide	D&apos synthesis; d&apos anhydrides; fatty acids by dicyclohexylcarbodiimide reaction.
3	radiation chemical oxidation of peptides in the solid state	The chemical oxidation by radiation of the peptides at the apos; solid state.
3	the crystal and molecular structure of 5 fluro 2 deoxy beta uridine	Crystalline and molecular structure of 5th fluro 2 deoxy beta uridine.
3	some properties of the rhodanese system of thiobacillus denitrificans	Some properties of thiobacillus denitrificans rhodanese system.
3	cysteine in calf thymus histones	Cysteine in the histones of the thymus of the calf.
3	the hypobranchial mucin of the whelk buccinum undatum l properties of the mucin and of the glycoprotein component	Buccin undatum hypobranchial mucin properties of mucin and the glycoprotein component.
3	the molecular structure of bacterial walls the size of ribitol teichoic acids and the nature of their linkage to glycosaminopeptides	The molecular structure of the bacterial cell walls, the size of the teichoic acids in ribitol, and the nature of their binding to the glycosaminopeptides.
3	purification and properties of coproporphyrinogenase	Purification and coproporphyrinogenase properties.
3	isolation of a naphthaquinone with partly hydrogenated side chain from corynebacterium diphtheriae	Naphthaquinone with a side chain partially hydrogenated from the corynebacterium diphtheriae.
3	the origins of tannins and flavonoids in black wattle barks and heartwoods and their associated non tannin components	Tannin and flavonoid origins in black baleen bark and heartwood and their associated non-tannin components.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group g o 13 22 lipopolysaccharides	Salmonella immunochemistry chemotype vi o antigenic structure of oligosaccharides of the 13-22 lipopolysaccharide group of salmonellae.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group n o 30 lipopolysaccharides	L' Salmonella chemotype immunochemistry vi o antigenic oligosaccharide structure of the 30 lipopolysaccharide Salmonella group.
3	the immunochemistry of salmonella chemotype vi o antigens the structure of oligosaccharides from salmonella group u o 43 lipopolysaccharides	Salmonella chemotype immunochemistry against salmonella oligosaccharide structure group u o 43 lipopolysaccharides.
3	isolation of a peroxidatically active product from the peptic digest of ox liver catalase and some of its properties	Isolate a peroxidically active product from peptic digestion of beef liver catalase and certain its properties.
3	differences in cattle globins	Cattle globin differences.
3	catalase kinetics of photooxidation	Photooxidation catalase kinetics.
3	hybridization experiments evidence of dissociation equilibrium in hemerythrin	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent of the dissociation of hemerythrin.
3	comparison of messenger rna in photoperiodically induced and noninduced xanthium buds	Comparison of rna messenger in photoperiod-induced and non-photoperiod-induced xanthium buds.
3	variation in density and transformation potential in deoxyribonucleic acid from neisseria meningitidis	Density and transformation potential of Neisseria meningitidis deoxyribonucleic acid.
3	ureidoglycolate synthetase of streptococcus allantoicus i measurement of glyoxylate and enzyme purification	In addition, the enzyme is used to measure the glyoxylate and to purify the enzymes.
3	ureidoglycolate synthetase of streptococcus allantoicus ii properties of the enzyme and reaction equilibrium	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
3	mode of inhibition of diphtheria toxin by ammonium chloride	Acute toxicity studies are required to assess the effects of ammonia on aquatic organisms.
3	trehalose as an endogenous reserve in spores of the fungus myrothecium verrucaria	Trehalose as endogenous storage in myrothecium verrucaria spores.
3	use of secondary data in numerical taxonomy of the genus erwinia	Use of numerical taxonomic secondary data of the genus erwinia.
3	polysaccharide lipid complexes from veillonella parvula	Vella parvula lipid-polysaccharide complexes.
3	trehalase from dictyostelium discoideum purification and properties	Purified Trehalase from the properties of dictyostelium discoideum.
3	clinical evaluation of brinaldix a new oral diuretic	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
3	microbial degradation of corrinoids 3 pigments derived from vitamin b12 by pseudomonas rubescens	Microbial Degradation of Corrinoids 3 vitamin b12 pigments by Pseudomonas rubescens.
3	in vitro inhibition of diphtheria toxin action by ammonium salts and amines	In vitro, the effects of ammonia and amines; the effects of the diphtheria toxin.
3	electrical impedance of isolated amnion	L'impedance électrique de l'amnion isolée.
3	changes in fungi with age chemical composition of rhizoctonia solani and sclerotium bataticola	Changes in chemical composition of bataticola sclerotia and rhizoctonia solani as a function of age in fungi.
3	nucleotide composition of nucleic acids of fungi ii deoxyribonucleic acids	Nucleotide Composition of Mushroom Nucleic Acids ii Deoxyribonucleic Acids.
3	thermostability of bacillus cereus penicillinase	Thermostability of cereus cereus bacillus penicillinase.
3	ribonucleic acid and ribosomes of bacillus stearothermophilus	Ribonucleic acid and stearothermophilus bacillus ribosomes.
3	effect of light intensity on the formation of the photochemical apparatus in the green bacterium chloropseudomonas ethylicum	Effect of Absorption; Light Intensity on Formation of Absorption; Photochemical Device in Green Chloropseudomonas ethylicum.
3	beta hemolytic gram negative hemophilic bacillus isolated from the genitalia of rabbits	Hemophilic Bacillus beta-hemolytic Gram-negative isolated from rabbit genitals.
3	amino acid changes provoked by streptomycin in a polypeptide synthesized in vitro	Modifications of streptomycin-induced amino acids in an in vitro synthesized polypeptide.
3	charge transfer self complex formed by 8 azaguanine	Charging complex-formed by 8 azaguanine.
3	prostaglandins in human seminal plasma prostaglandins and related factors 46	Prostaglandins in Human Seminary Plasma Prostaglandins and Related Factors 46.
3	a bacteriological study of non chromogenic variants of serratia marcescens from human sources	Bacteriological study of nonchromogenic serratia marcescens d' human origin variants.
3	release of formaldehyde from polynoxylin and noxythiolin	Formaldehyde release from polynoxyline and noxythiolin.
3	serial laboratory reports and records for chemical analyses	Laboratory reports and chemical analysis serials.
3	cumulative reporting of chemical pathology	Cumulative Report on Chemical Pathology.
3	exchange of carbon bound hydrogen atoms ortho to the hydroxyl group in tyrosine	Apos exchange; ortho carbon-bonded hydrogen with hydroxyl group in tyrosine.
3	sodium sulphomethyl derivatives of polymyxins	Sulfomethylated polymyxin derivatives.
3	nuclear dna and cytoplasmic dna from tissues of higher plants	Nuclear and cytoplasmic DNA from higher plant tissue.
3	the isolation of retinal outer segment fragments	Outer segment of retina fragment insulation.
3	immunoglobulin structure amino and carboxyl terminal peptides of type i bence jones proteins	Cell structure; amino- and carboxyl-terminal protein immunoglobulin type i bence jones.
3	intermolecular forces in association of purines with polybenzenoid hydrocarbons	Intermolecular forces in polybenzenoid hydrocarbon and purine association.
3	synthesis of block oligonucleotides	Block oligonucleotide synthesis.
3	the natural history of oxygen	L' Natural History; Oxygen.
3	radiolysis of estrone and estradiol	L'estradiolyse de l'apos; estrone et de l'apos; estradiol.
3	the linkage between the polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei	Lactobacillus casei cell wall polysaccharide and mucopeptide components binding.
3	properties of the polysaccharide and mucopeptide components of the cell wall of lactobacillus casei	Properties of polysaccharides and mucopeptides of lactobacillus casei cell wall.
3	tritiated starch granules	Tritiated starch.
3	ovoglycoprotein a protein of hen s egg white	Ovoglycoprotein, a chicken egg protein.
3	a comparison of methods for the isolation and fractionation of reticulocyte ribosomes	Comparison of reticulocyte ribosome isolation and fractionation.
3	studies on the metabolism of the protozoa the molecular structure of a starch type polysaccharide from polytoma uvella	Protozoan metabolism studies, d&apos molecular structure, a starch-like polysaccharide from polytoma uvella.
3	dehydrogenation of androsterone by purified 3 alpha hydroxy steroid dependent nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenating enzyme of rat liver	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, and it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
3	enzymatic action on the capsular material produced by pseudomonas aeruginosa of cystic fibrosis origin	Enzymatic action on material produced by Pseudomonas aeruginosa d' cystic fibrosis origin.
3	observations on the group c streptococcal bacteriophage and lytic enzyme system	Observations were made on the streptococcal bacteriophage of group c and the lytic enzyme system.
3	beta hemolytic streptococci with group a and type ii carbohydrate antigens	Hemolytic beta streptococci with both a- and type-ii-carbohydrate antigens.
3	preparation of steroid structural data for the consideration of possible structural functional relationships	Steroid structural data are prepared for consideration of possible functional structural relationships.
3	the clinical significance of elevated blood lactate	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
3	relation between optical configuration and immunogenicity of synthetic polypeptides	The relationship between the optical configuration and the immunogenicity of the synthetic polypeptides.
3	the partial acid hydrolysis of a highly dextrorotatory fragment of the cell wall of aspergillus niger isolation of the alpha 1 3 linked dextrin series	L' partial acid hydrolysis d' highly dextrator cell wall fragment d' aspergillus niger isolated from the alpha-1 bound dextrin series.
3	ribonucleic acids from barley leaves	Leaf ribonucleic acids; barley.
3	natural and synthetic diastereoisomeric 3 4 7 trihydroxyflavan 3 4 diols	Natural and Synthetic Diastereoisomer 3,4,7 trihydroxyflavane 3,4 diols.
3	the isolation of structural components present in the cell wall of bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346	Isolation of structural components from the cell wall of the bacterial licheniformis n.c.c.
3	the interaction of collagen and acid mucopolysaccharides a model for connective tissue	Collagen–acid mucopolysaccharide interaction is a model for the connective tissue.
3	structural studies of alpha crystallin	The results of this study are summarized below.
3	the mechanism of the periodate thiobarbituric acid reaction of sialic acids	The Mechanism of the Reaction of L' Periodic Thiobarbituric Acid of Sialic Acids.
3	the swelling of bovine ligamentum nuchae as a function of ph	Ph-dependent swelling of the bovine ligamentum nuchae.
3	the structure of the glucuronide of sulphadimethoxine formed in man	The structure of human sulfadimethoxin glucuronide.
3	the fluorescence of some biphenyl derivatives	Fluorescence of biphenyl derivatives.
3	indole compounds isolation from pineal tissue	The compounds of l' indole are isolated from the pineal tissue.
3	histone regulation of lactic dehydrogenase in embryonic chick brain tissue	Lactic dehydrogenase histone regulation in chick embryonic brain tissue.
3	the isolation and properties of epithelial cell ghosts from rat small intestine	L'isolation et les propriétés des fantômes de cellules épitheliales de l'apos; intestine hail de rat.
3	peptide synthesis from amino acids in aqueous solution	Peptide synthesis from aqueous amino acids.
3	dicyandiamide possible role in peptide synthesis during chemical evolution	Dicyandiamide may play a role in the synthesis of peptides during the course of chemical evolution.
3	glycerinated skeletal and smooth muscle calcium and magnesium dependence	Dependence on calcium and magnesium in the smooth muscles and skeletal glycerin.
3	peptides attached to thrombin their influence on proteolysis	Proteolysis is influenced by thrombin-bound peptides.
3	hybrid antibody molecules with allotypically different l polypeptide chains	Molecules of d' hybrid antibodies with chains of allotypically different polypeptides.
3	phospholipid and nucleic acid gradients in the developing amphibian embryo	Phospholipid and Dapos gradients; nucleic acids in developing embryo; amphibian.
3	the preparation and properties of bacterial chromatophore fractions	Bacterial chromatophore fractions preparation and properties.
3	deamination of 4 aminopyrimidine nucleosides by extracts of rye grass lolium perenne	Deamination of 4 nucleoside aminopyrimides by rye lolium perenne extracts.
3	sap concentrations in halophytes and some other plants	Sap concentrations in Halophytes and Certain Other Plants.
3	the phosphorylated intermediate in the phosphoglyceromutase reaction	L' phosphorylated intermediate for phosphoglyceromutase reaction.
3	purification of beta acetylglucosaminase and beta galactosidase from ram testis	Acetylglucosaminase beta and galactosidase beta purified from sheep testicles.
3	the chemical synthesis and biological oxidation of 7 alpha hydroxy 26 14c cholesterol 7 dehydro 26 14c cholesterol and 26 hydroxy 26 14c cholesterol	Chemical synthesis and biological oxidation of 7 alpha-hydroxy-26-14c-cholesterol 7 dehydro-26-14c-cholesterol and 26 hydroxy-26-14c-cholesterol.
3	the preparation and properties of ficin chemically attached to carboxymethylcellulose	Preparation and properties of chemically attached carboxymethylcellulose.
3	fluorescence studies on some hydroxypyridines including compounds of the vitamin b6 group	Fluorescence studies on a few hydroxypyridines, including vitamin b6 compounds.
3	a new flavan 3 4 diol from acacia auriculiformis by paper ionophoresis	A new flavan, acacia auriculiformis, by ionophoresis on paper.
3	the determination of the substitution achieved at the alpha amino epsilon amino and imidazole groups of proteins with special reference to derivatives of gelatin	Determination of substitution at the alpha groups-amino-epsilon-amino and protein imidazole with a special reference to gelatin.
3	the hypobranchial mucin of the whelk buccinum undatum l the polysaccharide sulphate component	Buccin hypobranchial mucin, buccinum undatum l polysaccharide sulfate component.
3	characterization of ribonucleases and ribonuclease inhibitor in subcellular fractions from rat adrenals	Characterization of ribonucleases and apos; inhibitor of ribonuclease in subcellular fractions of rat adrenals.
3	electrophoretic and other studies on haem pigments from rhodopseudomonas palustris cytochrome 552 and cytochromoid c	Cytochrome 552 hematoma of Rhodopseudomonas palustris and cytochromoid c.
3	proteins and disulfide groups in the aggregation of dissociated cells of sea sponges	Proteins and disulfide groups in marine sponge dissociated cells aggregation.
3	the electron microscopic localization of cholinesterase activity in the central nervous system of an insect periplaneta americana 1	Electron microscopic localization of the apos; cholinesterase activity in the central nervous system of apos; an insect, periplaneta americana 1.
3	predicting production in light limited continuous cultures of algae	The prediction of light production limited the continued cultivation of algae.
3	geosmin an earthly smelling substance isolated from actinomycetes	Geosmin is a substance that smells of the earth and is isolated from the actinomycetes.
3	disulfide bond cleavage and formation in proteins	Cutting disulfide bond and protein formation.
3	heat labile antigens of salmonella enteritidis i extraction of antigens	Salmonella enteritidis heat-labile antigens extracted from antigens.
3	soluble antigens of vaccinia infected mammalian cells i separation of virus induced soluble antigens into two classes on the basis of physical characteristics	Soluble antigens from cells of infected mammals i the separation of viruses induces soluble antigens into two classes based on physical characteristics.
3	components required for the formation of ch 4 from methylcobalamin by extracts of methanobacillus omelianskii	Components necessary for ch 4 formation from methylcobalamine by methanobacillus omelianskii extracts.
3	comparison of two serologically distinct ribonucleic acid bacteriophages ii properties of the nucleic acids and coat proteins	Comparison of two bacteriophages d'apos; serologically distinct ribonucleic acid ii properties of nucleic acids and of coat proteins.
3	isolation and morphology of temperature agrobacterium tumefaciens bacteriophage	Isolation and morphology of the bacteriophage Agrobacterium tumefaciens.
3	crystal and molecular structure of a phospholipid component l alpha glycerophosphorylcholine cadmium chloride trihydrate	It is also used as a catalyst for the development of new products, such as cadmium-chloride trihydrate, and for the development of new products.
3	thymine addition to ethanol induction by gamma irradiation	It is not possible to measure the effect of ethylene oxide on the environment, but it is important to assess the impact of the action.
3	enzymatic synthesis of tri and tetranucleotides of defined sequence	Sequence-defined sort and tetranucleotide enzyme synthesis.
3	papain membrane on a collodion matrix preparation and enzymic behavior	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
3	the growth of a laboratory	A laboratory.
3	deamino oxytocin and 1 gamma mercaptobutyric acid oxytocin x ray crystallographic data	Crystallographic X-ray data for apos; deamino and apos oxytocin; gamma oxytocin 1; mercaptobutyric acid.
3	purification of a salt requiring enzyme from an obligately halophilic bacterium	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
3	influence of deoxyribonucleic acid degradation products and orthophosphate on deoxynucleotide kinase activity and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in pneumococcus type 3	Influence of deoxyribonucleic acid, orthophosphate, deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxynucleotide kinase activity, and deoxyribonucleic acid in type 3 pneumococcus.
3	isolation and characterization of the cyanide resistant and azide resistant catalase of lactobacillus plantarum	Cyanide-resistant and azide-resistant Lactobacillus plantarum catalase isolation and characterization.
3	enzymatic deacylation of s35 benzylpenicillin	Benzylpenicillin s35 enzymatic deacylation.
3	conservation of ribosomal and messenger ribonucleic acid cistrons in bacillus species	Ribosomal cistrons and apos messengers; ribonucleic acid in bacilli species.
3	corroboration of recent models of the gamma g immunoglobulin molecule	Confirmation of recent d&apos molecule models; gamma immunoglobulin g.
3	chain initiation and control of protein synthesis	The process of initiating the chain and controlling the synthesis of proteins.
3	native and renatured transfer ribonucleic acid	Determine the amount of chlorine in the water.
3	the role of carbonium ions in color reception	The role of the ions carbonium in the reception of color.
3	lysis of bacterial cell walls by an enzyme isolated from a myxobacter	Bacterial cell wall lysis by an isolated d&apos enzyme; a myxobacterium.
3	agar gel precipitin inhibition technique for c reactive protein determinations 3 quantitation of c reactive protein in serum specimens	A method for the determination of the c-reactive protein 3 quantitation of the c-reactive protein in serum samples.
3	alpha sarcin a new antitumor agent i isolation purification chemical composition and the identity of a new amino acid	Alpha sarcin, a new anti-tumor agent: chemical composition for purification of apos; isolation and apos; identity of apos; new amino acid.
3	removal of plant nutrients by means of aerobic stabilization of sludge	It is important to keep in mind that there is no need to add nutrients to the crop.
3	allomorphic forms of bacteriophage phix 174 replicative dna	Allomorphic forms of the bacteriophage phix.
3	physicochemical and biological studies on various preparations of tuberculin purified protein derivative	Physico-chemical and biological studies of various tuberculin-purified protein derivative (PPS) preparations.
3	detection of staphylococcal enterotoxin in food	Dietary Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplement.
3	chemical composition of cell wall preparations from strains of various form genera of aerobic actinomycetes	Chemistry of preparations of cell walls of strains of various genera of aerobic forms; actinomycetes.
3	in vitro and in vivo laboratory evaluation of cephaloglycin and cephaloridine	In vitro and in vivo cephaloglycine and cephaloridine laboratory evaluation.
3	cytochemical localization of acid phosphatases in euglena gracilis	Cytochemical localization of acidic phosphatase activity in euglena gracilis.
3	lysosomal fractions from transitional epithelium	Transitional epithelial lysosomal fractions.
3	localization of the succinic dehydrogenase system in escherichia coli using combined techniques of cytochemistry and electron microscopy	Succinic dehydrogenase system localization in escherichia coli by combined electron microscopy and cytochemistry.
3	the alpha chymotryptic ydrolysis of glycine esters	Chymotryptic glycine ester alpha ydrolysis.
3	nzymic conversion of 3 hydroxyanthranilic acid into cinnabarinic acid partial purification and properties of ra liver cinnabarinate synthase	Nzymic conversion of l' hydroxyanthranilic acid 3 to partial purification cinnabarinic acid and properties of hepatic cinnabarinate synthase ra.
3	interactions of calf thymus histone fractions in aqueous solution with 8 anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonic acid	Waterborne interactions of histone fractions of calf thymus with 8 anilinononaphthalene 1 sulfonic acid.
3	studies on glycopeptides deried from acidic glycoproteins of guinea pig serum	Glycopeptide studies derive from guinea pig acid glycoproteins.
3	deoxyribonucleic acid nucleotidyltransferase from landsch tz ascites tumour cells	Lapos; cell nucleotidyltransfer deoxyribonucleic acid; tz landch ascites.
3	the preparation of adenosine 5 pyrophosphate by a non enzymic method	Preparation of d&apos pyrophosphate; non-enzymatic adenosine 5.
3	bitter peptide isolated from milk cultures of streptococcus cremoris	Bitter peptide, isolated from streptococcal cremoris milk cultures.
3	sensitivity of mixed populations of staphylococcus aureus and escherichia coli to mercurials	In addition, it is important to note that there is a high degree of uncertainty associated with the interpretation of these data.
3	metabolism of barbital by streptomyces mediterranei	Barbital Metabolism by Streptomyces Mediterraneanei.
3	the pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a mercury activated exopolygalacturonase	The pectic enzymes of the aspergillus niger activate the apos; the exopolygalacturonase activates by mercury.
3	the pectic enzymes of aspergillus niger a second exopolygalacturonase	The pectic enzymes of the aspergillus; aspergillus, a second exopolygalacturonase.
3	enzymic hydrolysis of barley and other beta glucans by a beta 1 4 glucan hydrolase	Gag and dapos enzymatic hydrolysis; other beta-glucans by beta- 1-4 glucan-hydrolase.
3	lipids of sarcina lutea 3 composition of the complex lipids	Sarcina lutea 3 lipid, complex lipid composition.
3	nitrogen containing and carbohydrate containing antigen from actinomyces bovis	Apos; nitrogen-containing antigen; nitrogen-containing antigen; carbohydrate-containing antigen; actinomyces bovis.
3	a study of immunoglobulin structure ii the comparison of bence jones proteins by peptide mapping	A study of the structure of l' immunoglobulin ii the comparative protein bence jones by peptide mapping.
3	c glycosylflavonoids the chemistry of aspalathin	Glycosylflavonoids C apos chemistry; aspalathin.
3	magnesium ions and the structure of escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acid	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
3	the biological activity of subfragment 1 prepared from heavy meromyosin	L' sub-fragment 1 biological activity prepared from heavy meromyosin.
3	the isolation and properties of delta tocotrienol from hevea latex	L'isolation et les propriétés de la delta tocotrienol de l'apos; latex rubber.
3	the role of shikimic acid in the biosynthesis of vitamin k2	The Role of Lactos; Shikimic Acid in Vitamin K2 Biosynthesis.
3	conformational changes in sperm whale metmyoglobin due to combination with antibodies to apomyoglobin	Conformational changes in metamyoglobin of sperm whales due to the combination of anti-apos, apomyoglobin, and dapos antibodies.
3	comparative studies of bile salts myxinol disulphate the principal bile salt of hagfish myxinidae	Comparative Studies of Bile Salts Myxinol disulfate is the major bile salt in the hagfish myxinids.
3	nuclear magnetic resonance and mass spectral study of myxinol tetra acetate	Nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) and mass spectrometry (MMS) studies of l' tetra acetate-myxinol.
3	amino acid incorporation by cell fractions from the oviduct of the laying hen and the synthesis of egg white proteins	L'incorporation des amino acids par les fractions cellules de l'apos; oviducte de la poule pondeuse et la synthèse des protéines du blanc d'euf.
3	the purification and properties of nitrite reductase from higher plants and its dependence on ferredoxin	Purification and nitrite reductase properties of higher plants and ferredoxin dependence.
3	the kinetics and mechanism of liver alcohol dehydrogenase with primary and secondary alcohols as substrates	Apos dehydrogenase kinetics and mechanism; hepatic alcohol with primary and secondary alcohols as substrates.
3	the antigen binding capacity of the peptide chains of horse antibodies	Horse antibody peptide chain antigen binding ability.
3	the relation of 3 deoxy 2 oxo octonate to the serological and physical properties of a lipopolysaccharide from a rough strain of escherichia coli	The relationship between 3oxo-oxo-octonate deoxy-2 and the serological and physical properties of apos; lipopolysaccharide from apos; rough Apos strain; Escherichia coli.
3	the identification of the antimicrobial factors of the stomach contents of sucking rabbits	Identification of antimicrobial factors in sucker rabbit stomach contents.
3	influence of diet on the composition of plasma cholesterol esters in man	Dietary influence on plasma cholesterol ester composition in men.
3	characterization of trisubstituted cholanoic acids in human feces	Characterization of cholanoic acid trisubstituted in human feces.
3	carboxylic ester hydrolases of rat pancreatic juice	In vivo studies have been conducted in the United States and the United States.
3	simple charring method for determination of lipids	Simple method of lipid determination.
3	sequential primary and secondary shunt metabolism in penicillium chrysogenum	Primary and secondary sequential metabolism of the shunt muscle of penicillium chrysogenum.
3	a specific sucrose phosphatase from plant tissues	Sucrose-specific phosphatase from the plant tissue.
3	the glycerol teichoic acid from the cell wall of bacillus stearothermophilus b65	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
3	some observations on the behaviour of hypothalamic enzymes during the time of blastocyst implantation in the rabbit	Some observations on hypothalamic enzyme behaviors during blastocyst implantation in rabbits.
3	the fate of di 3 5 di tert butyl 4 hydroxyphenyl methane ionox 22 in the rat	The fate of di 3-5 di tert-butyl 4 methane ionox 22 hydroxyphenyl in rat.
3	adenosine 5 triphosphate arginine phosphotransferase from lobster muscle molecular weight	Adenosine 5 Triphosphate Arginine Phosphotransferase of Lobster muscle molecular weight.
3	the biochemistry of aromatic amines 2 formamido 1 naphthyl hydrogen sulphate a metabolite of 2 naphthylamine	Aromatic amine biochemistry 2 formamido 1 naphthyl sulfate d' hydrogen a 2-naphthylamine metabolite.
3	a study of the reaction catalysed by the liver branching enzyme	A study of etapos-catalyzed reaction; liver branching enzyme.
3	some rate constants for the phenazine methosulphate catalysed oxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Some phenazine methosulfate rate constants catalyze apos; oxidation of the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide.
3	the esterase and depsidase activities of tannase	Tannase depsidase and esterase activity.
3	the synthesis of amino acids by methanobacterium omelianskii	Amino acid synthesis by Methanobacterium omelianskii.
3	interactions of proteins with other polyelectrolytes in a two phase system containing phenol and aqueous buffers at various ph values	Protein interactions with d' other polyelectrolytes in a two-phase phenol–aqueous buffer system at various ph values.
3	interaction of aspartate aminotransferase with amino acids	Interaction of amino acids with aspartate aminotransferase.
3	solution photochemistry of thymine and uracil	Thymine- and uracil-based photochemistry.
3	the formation of peptides with uterine activity from ovine human and bovine growth hormones and from bovine and ovine lactogenic hormones	Formation of uterine active peptides from human and bovine ovine and d&apo growth hormones; bovine and ovine lactogenic hormones.
3	psilocybin reaction with a fraction of rat brain	Reaction of psilocybin with rat brain fraction.
3	enzyme action comparison on soluble and insoluble substrate	Comparison of soluble and insoluble substrates; enzymatic action.
3	stable complex of fibrinogen and fibrin	Stable fibrinogen/fibrin complex.
3	naturally occurring anhydrovitamin a2 transformation into retinene	Anhydrovitamin a2 to retinene.
3	the kinetics of papain and ficin catalysed hydrolyses in the presence of alcohols	Fine- and papain-catalyzed hydrolysis kinetics in the presence of alcohols.
3	optical and chemical identification of kinetic steps in trypsin and chymotrypsin catalysed reactions	L' chemical and optical identification of kinetic steps in trypsin- and chymotrypsin-catalyzed reactions.
3	urinary screening tests in the prevention of mental deficiency	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
3	drosophila phenol oxidases	Phenol Drosophila oxidases.
3	identification of mono and dihydroxy bile acids in human feces by gas liquid chromatography and mass spectrometry	Liquid chromatography and mass spectrometry to identify mono- and dihydroxy acids-biliary in human feces.
3	the lysis of cell walls of group a streptococci by streptomyces albus enzyme treated with diisopropyl fluorophosphate characteristics of the lytic reaction and the soluble cell wall fragments	Cell wall lysis of group A streptococci by the albus streptomyces enzyme treated with the lytic reaction diisopropyl fluorophosphate and soluble cell wall fragments.
3	u 21 963 a new antibiotic ii isolation and characterization	U 21-963 A New Antibiotic Isolation and Characterization.
3	thyroxine interaction with actinomycin d and possible biological implications	The interaction of thyroxine with the apos; d. actinomycin and possible biological implications.
3	partial purification of monoglyceride lipase from adipose tissue	Partial monoglyceride lipase purification from adipose tissue.
3	lipid monolayers action of phospholipase a of crotalus atrox and naja naja venoms on phosphatidyl choline and phosphatidal choline	L' action of phospholipase lipid monolayers on venoms of naja naja and atrox crotalus on phosphatidylcholine and choline phosphatidale.
3	synthesis and characterization of 1 and 2 monoglycerides of anteiso fatty acids	Monoglycerides 1 and 2 of the aniso fatty acids are synthesized and characterized.
3	forms of human serum high density lipoprotein protein	Protein forms of the high-density lipoproteins of the human serum.
3	composition and properties of a cell membrane fraction from the polymorphonuclear leucocyte	Cellular membrane fraction from polymorphonuclear leukocyte.
3	nucleotide synthesis under possible primitive earth conditions	Possible primitive terrestrial nucleotide synthesis.
3	radiolysis of thymine in aqueous solutions change in site of attack with change in ph	Thymine radiolysis in aqueous solution changes site d' attacks with ph change.
3	chemistry of antibiotics from micromonospora 3 isolation and characterization of everninomicin d and b	Antibiotic chemistry from apo; micromonospore isolation 3 and everninomicin characterization d and b.
3	physical and topological properties of circular dna	In addition, it may be used in conjunction with other biological processes.
3	some properties of dna from phage infected bacteria	Some phage-infected bacterial DNA properties.
3	the structure and function of the dna from bacteriophage lambda	Structure and function of lambda bacteriophage DNA.
3	the enzymatic phosphorylation of nucleic acids and its application to end group analysis	Enzyme Phosphorylation of Nucleic Acids and its Application to End-Group Analysis.
3	recovery of antibody activity from inactive hybrids of h and l chains	Recovery of L' antibody activity in inactive h-chain and l-chain hybrids.
3	c 1 esterase effect on activity and physicochemical properties of the fourth component of complement	Effect of apos; esterase c 1 on protein; activity and physical properties-chemicals of the fourth complement component.
3	the cyst wall of colpoda steinii a substance rich in glutamic acid residues	The wall of the colpoda steinii cyst is rich in d' glutamic acid residues.
3	a new derivative of vitamin c and its application to the synthesis of labelled ascorbic acid	A novel vitamin c derivative and its application to the synthesis of ascorbic acid-labeled sucrose.
3	the structure and deposition of human liver glycogens	Human liver glycogen structure and deposition.
3	toxic fluorine compounds the use of the omega fluorine atom in the study of the metabolism of fatty acids containing ethyl n propyl and isopropyl branches	Fluoride is a toxic compound; use of fluorine; omega-fluoro-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino-amino.
3	studies of the proteins peptides and free amino acids of mature bovine enamel	Peptide protein and free amino acid studies of mature bovine enamel.
3	the isolation and partial characterization of glycolipids of normal human leucocytes	Isolation and Partial Characterization of Glycolipides from Normal Human Leukocytes.
3	the proteolysis of immunoglobulin g with long acting thyroid stimulating activity	Proteolysis of immunoglobulin-g with long-acting stimulatory thyroid activity.
3	the hatching factor of the potato root eelworm	Potato root eel; potato worm hatching.
3	dealkylation studies on inhibited acetylcholinesterase	Dealkylation studies on the inhibited ester and acetylcholinesterase were performed.
3	lipids of debaryomyces hansenii	Hansenii debaryomyces lipids.
3	comparision of soluble reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidases from cells and spores of clostridium botulinum	Comparison of soluble clostridium botulinum adenine dinucleotide oxidase cells and spores.
3	reoviruses ii structure and composition of the virion	Reovirus ii Structure and Composition of Virion.
3	fine structure of the coat and nucleoid material of fowlpox virus	An organism that is a bacterium, a bacterium, a bacterium, or a bacterium.
3	enzymatic hydrolysis of yeast cell walls i isolation of wall decomposing organisms and separation and purification of lytic enzymes	Yeast cell wall enzymatic hydrolysis isolation from wall decomposing organisms and lytic enzyme separation and purification.
3	solubilization of native and derived forms of cellulose by cell free microbial enzymes	Solubilization of cellulose-derived and native forms by cell-free microbial enzymes.
3	physical properties of single and double stranded coliphage ribonucleic acid	L&apos physical properties; single- and double-stranded ribonucleic acid.
3	the formation of 2 hydroxypropylmercapturic acid from 1 halogenopropanes in the rat	Formation of 2 hydroxypropylmercapturic acids from 1 halopropane in the rat.
3	separation of water soluble n 2 4 dinitrophenylamino acids	Separation of Soluble Dinitrophenylamino Acids 2.4.
3	the metabolism of the isomeric decalones	Isomeric decalone metabolism.
3	the metabolism of cis and trans decalin	Cis-trans decalin metabolism.
3	citrate and the regulation of adipose tissue phosphofructokinase	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
3	vitamin k and oxidative phosphorylation	Vitamin k, oxidative phosphorylation.
3	components of the cell wall of clostridium welchii type a	Cell wall components of Clostridium welchii type a.
3	substrate activation and inhibition in coenzyme substrate reactions cyclohexanol oxidation catalysed by liver alcohol dehydrogenase	L' activation and apos; substrate inhibition in l&apos coenzyme reactions; cyclohexanol catalyzed oxidation; liver alcohol dehydrogenase.
3	fibrinogen from human plasma preparation by precipitation with heavy metal coordination complex	Fibrillogen in the preparation of human plasma by precipitation with complex heavy metal coordination.
3	mechanism of tryptic activation of clostridium botulinum type e toxin	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility that the toxin may be used in combination with other drugs.
3	hydrogen bonded dimers of adenine and uracil derivatives	It is not possible to determine the extent to which these compounds are linked by hydrogen bonds.
3	effect of diet upon intestinal disaccharidases and disaccharide absorption	Effect of diet on intestinal disaccharide and l' disaccharide absorption.
3	the conversion of c is to c 1 esterase by plasmin and trypsin	C-1 esterase conversion by plasmin and trypsin.
3	formation and functional significance of a molecular complex derived from the second and the fourth component of human complement	It is a complex of molecules that is derived from the second and fourth components of the human complement.
3	optical rotatory dispersion circular dichroism and far ultraviolet spectra of avidin and streptavidin	Circular rotational optical scattering and ultraviolet (UV) spectra of avidine and streptavidin.
3	the kinetics of carboxymethylcellulose ficin in packed beds	Carboxymethylcellulose ficine kinetics in crowded beds.
3	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 10a 34 structure of the dephosphorylated repeating unit	A substance that is a substance that is not a substance but is a substance that is a substance.
3	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 10a 34 the phosphodiester linkages	Type-Specific Pneumococcal Substance 10a 34, phosphodiester bonds.
3	specificity and mechanism of tetracycline resistance in a multiple drug resistant strain of escherichia coli	Specificity and mechanism of resistance to tetracycline in a strain of Escherichia coli that is multidrug-resistant.
3	heat inactivation of the relaxing site of actomyosin prevention and reversal with dithiothreitol	Heat inactivation of prevention and d&apos relaxation site; apos inversion; actomyosin by dithiothreitol.
3	hydrolysis of synthetic esters by the antibacterial agent in serum	Hydrolysis of apos; synthetic apos esters; antibacterial agents in serum.
3	influence of calcium cholesterol and unsaturation on lecithin monolayers	Calcium cholesterol and aposal influence; monolayer lecithin unsaturation.
3	gas liquid chromatography of 2 chloroethyl esters using a detector specific for halogens	Gas chromatography in the liquid phase of 2 chloroethyl esters; a halogen-specific chloroethyl ester detector.
3	photooxidation of hydrocarbons in the presence of aliphatic aldehydes	Photooxidation of hydrocarbons in presence of aliphatic aldehydes.
3	ultraviolet irradiation of dna in vitro and in vivo produces a 3d thymine derived product	In vitro and in vivo DNA produces a thymine-derived product 3d.
3	oxygenation properties of snake hemoglobin	Properties; snakes' oxygenation; hemoglobin.
3	aflatoxin production and degradation by aspergillus flavus in 20 liter fermentors	Production and degradation of a variety of products, such as aspergillus flavus and aflatoxin, in 20-litre fermenters.
3	gamma a cold agglutinin importance of disulfide bonds in activity and structure	It is not possible to determine the extent of the disulfide bonds.
3	comparative effects of corticosteroids on host resistance to infection in relation to chemical structure	The effects of corticosteroids on the resistance of the organism; host to the organism; infection in relation to the chemical structure.
3	complement as a mediator of inflammation ii biological properties of anaphylatoxin prepared with purified components of human complement	Supplementation as a mediator of apos; inflammation ii The biological properties of apos; anaphylatoxin (anaphylatoxin) prepared with purified human complement components.
3	nonthrombogenic plastic surfaces	Plastic surfaces not-hrombogens are made of plastic.
3	pathway of cholesterol biosynthesis in the brain of the neonatal rat	Neonatal rat brain cholesterol biosynthetic pathway.
3	role of plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase in the metabolism of high density lipoproteins	Role of Plasma Lecithin Cholesterol Acyltransferase in High Density Lipoprotein Metabolism.
3	effects of dietary phytol and phytanic acid in animals	Phytanic acid effects on animals.
3	starch gel electrophoresis of human tissue enzymes which hydrolyze l leucyl beta naphthylamide	Electrical and electrical equipment, such as electrical equipment, can be used in the manufacture of electrical equipment.
3	d lactate dehydrogenase in lower fungi	Lactate dehydrogenase in the lower fungi.
3	protective action of polycyclic hydrocarbons against induction of adrenal necrosis by dimethylbenzanthracene	Induction of adrenal necrosis by dimethylbenzanthracene; induction of adrenal necrosis by dimethylbenzanthracene.
3	biologically active metabolite of vitamin d3 from bone liver and blood serum	Biologically active metabolite of bone liver vitamin d3 and serum.
3	automatic titration of plasma fatty acids by photocolorimetry	Plasma fatty acids are automatically titrated by photocolorimetry.
3	new partially hydrolyzable synthetic analogues of lecithin phosphatidyl ethanolamine and phosphatidic acid	New partially hydrolysable lecithin phosphatidyl ethanolamine and l&apos synthetic analogues; phosphatidic acid.
3	chemical and antigenic analysis of the cell walls of neisseria meningitidis group b	Chemical and antigenic analysis of group b neisseria meningitidis cell wall material.
3	the reaction of ribonuclease inhibitor with modified ribonucleases	Reaction of l&apos, a ribonuclease inhibitor, with modified ribonucleases.
3	some observations on the periodate oxidation of amino compounds	Some observations on l' oxidation by periodate of amino compounds.
3	substrate and dilution effects on the inhibition of acetylcholinesterase by carbamates	Effect of substrate and dilution on cell walls; inhibition of cell walls; acetylcholinesterase by carbamates.
3	the binding of inhibitors to alpha chymotrypsin	Inhibitor binding to alpha-chymotrypsin.
3	aspartate carbamoyltransferase from rat liver	Rat-liver aspartate carbamoyltransferase.
3	chemical modification of yeast alanine trna with a radioactive carbodiimide	Chemical modification of alanine trna yeast with radioactive carbodiimide.
3	homolanthionine excretion in homocystinuria	L'apos; apos excretion; homocysteine; homocystinuria.
3	actin volume change on transformation of g form to f form	In the case of a drug substance, the drug substance may be used in combination with the drug substance.
3	the inhibition of phosphoglucomutase by beryllium	L' beryllium phosphoglucomutase inhibition.
3	the chemistry of xanthine oxidase reaction with iodoacetamide	Xanthine oxidase reaction chemistry with iodoacetamide.
3	3 o methyl d mannose from streptomyces griseus	Bacterium spp. is a fungus.
3	absorption spectra of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin	Spectrum d' ferrimyoglobin absorption from sperm whales.
3	the purification and properties of a penicillinase whose synthesis is mediated by an r factor in escherichia coli	A r-mediated synthesis of penicillinase in escherichia coli.
3	fractionation of deoxyribonucleic acid from phage infected bacteria	Lapos fractionation; deoxyribonucleic acid from phage-infected bacteria.
3	interaction of vi antigen with proteins	In addition, there are a number of other proteins that can be used to control the virus.
3	production purification and composition of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Staphylococcal alpha toxin production, purification and composition.
3	cholesterol in human semen	Human semen has cholesterol.
3	the isolation and composition of helical protein microfibrils from hevea brasiliensis latex	L'isolation et la composition des microfibrilles de protéines helicoïdales de l'apos; havea brasiliensis latex.
3	changes in lipid composition of the maturing rat testis	Changes in the lipid composition of testes from maturing rats.
3	the acidic amino acids of tulip isolation of gamma ethylideneglutamic acid	Acidic amino acids; tulip isolation; gamma ethylideneglutamic acid.
3	isolation of certain oligonucleotides obtained by degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid	Isolate certain deoxyribonucleic acid l&apos degradation oligonucleotides.
3	selective degradation of thymidine and thymine deoxynucleotides	Selective Degradation of Thymidine and Thymine Deoxynucleotides.
3	nucleotide sequence of a yeast tyrosine transfer rna	In addition, the nucleotide sequence is a transfer of yeast tyrosine.
3	the rate of hydrolysis of the molluscicide n tritylmorpholine	The amount of chlorine present in the body.
3	galactosamine glycan of chondrococcus columnaris	Galactosamine glycan, chondrococcus columnaris.
3	rna composition and base pairing	Composition in rna and matching of the bases.
3	lipid films as transducers for detection of antigen antibody and enzyme substrate reactions	Lipid films are used as transducers for the detection of antigenic antibody and enzyme-linked substrate reactions.
3	formylmethionine codon aug as an initiator of polypeptide synthesis	The formylmethionine aug codon initiates polypeptide synthesis.
3	action of anionic and cationic nerve blocking agents experiment and interpretation	Action of cationic and anionic agents blocking experimental and interpretative nerves.
3	tritiated thymidine effect of decomposition by self radiolysis on specificity as a tracer for dna synthesis	Tritiated effect of thymidine from auto-radiolysis decomposition on specificity as tracer for DNA synthesis.
3	deficient complement fixation by aggregated gamma globulin from hypogammaglobulinemic patients	Aggregate gamma globulin binding of hypogammaglobulinemic patients.
3	serum high density lipoprotein effect of change in structure on activity of chicken adipose tissue lipase	Effect of a structural change on serum high-density lipoprotein lipase activity in chicken adipose tissue.
3	nucleic acid guanine reaction with the carcinogen n acetoxy 2 acetylaminofluorene	Reaction of guanine with acetoxy-2 acetylaminofluorene, a carcinogen.
3	influence of cobalt on fermentative methylation	Cobalt influences fermentative methylation.
3	cyanoacetylene in prebiotic synthesis	Prebiotic cyanoacetylene synthesis.
3	retention of the biological potency of human pituitary growth hormone after reduction and carbamidomethylation	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the carcinogenicity of ethylene oxide is impaired.
3	nucleotide sequence repetition a rapidly reassociating fraction of mouse dna	Replication of the apos nucleotide sequence; a rapidly reassociating mouse DNA fraction.
3	studies on the immunochemistry of streptococcal mucopeptide	Streptococcal mucopeptide immunochemistry.
3	prostaglandins ii an improved synthesis and structural proof of plus or minus 11 deoxyprostaglandin f 1 beta	Prostaglandins ii are a better synthesis and structural evidence of approximately 11 f1 beta-deoxyprostaglandins.
3	inhibition of banana polyphenoloxidase by 2 mercaptobenzothiazole	Two mercaptobenzothiazole inhibits banana polyphenoloxidase.
3	a m ssbauer study of ferri and ferrocytochrome c	Ferri and ferrocytochrome c.
3	binuclear ion containing nitrogen as a bridging group	A binuclear ion, containing nitrogen-bridging l&apos.
3	the equilibrium sedimentation of hyaluronic acid and of two synthetic polymers	L&apos sedimentation; hyaluronic acid balance and two synthetic polymers.
3	partial characterization of protocollagen from embryonic cartilage	Partial characterization of the protocollagen component of embryonic cartilage.
3	characterization of the hexahydropolyprenols of aspergillus fumigatus fresenius	Characterization of lidos hexahydropolyprenols; aspergillus fumigatus fresenius.
3	the stereochemistry of the hydrogen elimination in the biological conversion of cholest 7 en 3 beta ol into cholesterol	Stereochemistry of cholesterol; elimination of hydrogen in biological conversion from cholesterol 7 to cholesterol 3.
3	periodate oxidation of sperm whale myoglobin and the role of the methionine residues in the antigen antibody reaction	Sperm sperm whale myoglobin periodate oxidation and role of methionine residues in antigenic antibody response.
3	reaction of myoglobin with 3 3 tetramethyleneglutaric anhydride	Myoglobin reacts with tetramethylenegutaric anhydride.
3	separation and properties of beta galactosidase beta glucosidase beta glucuronidase and n acetyl beta glucosaminidase from rat kidney	Beta galactosidase beta-glucosidase beta-glucuronidase and rat kidney n-acetyl beta-glucosaminidase separation and properties.
3	countercurrent distribution studies on histones	Distribution Studies against-current histones.
3	studies on the proteolytic activity of gamma globulin preparations	Immunosorbent studies; gamma globulin proteolytic activity.
3	a diagonal electrophoretic method for selective purification of methionine peptides	Procedure for the selective purification of methionic peptides.
3	nucleohistone dissociation by ganglioside micelles	Gangllioside micelles dissociate the nucleohistones.
3	crystal and molecular structure of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate	Molecular and crystalline structure of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic phosphate.
3	an improved synthesis of isopentenyl pyrophosphate	Improved isopentenyl pyrophosphate synthesis.
3	a simple method for the preparation of 5 methyltetrahydropteroylglutamic acid	Simple Method for Preparation of L' Methyltetrahydropteroylglutamic Acid 5.
3	the formation of phosphatidylglycerol and other phospholipids by the transferase activity of phospholipase d	Phosphatidylglycerol formation and d' phospholipid transferase activity d.
3	the reaction of sulphite ions with an intermolecular disulphide bond in bovine serum non mercaptalbumin	Intermolecular disulfide bond reaction of sulfite ions in non-mercaptalbumin bovine serum.
3	the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d upon lysolecithin	L' action of phospholipase d of the cabbage leaf on lysolecithin.
3	the chemical nature of the products obtained by the action of cabbage leaf phospholipase d on lysolecithin the structure of lysolecithin	The chemical nature of the products obtained by etapos; the action of phospholipase d from cabbage leaf on lysolecithin in the structure of lysolecithin.
3	some properties of purified phospholipase d and especially the effect of amphipathic substances	Some properties of phospholipase d purified and especially l' effect of amphipathic substances.
3	a method for the degradation of radioactive nicotinic acid	Procedure for Degradation of Radioactive Nicotinic Acid.
3	hydroxamic acids in nature	Hydroxamic acids, naturally occurring.
3	acetylation of human serum albumin by acetylsalicylic acid	L'acétylation de l'apos; albumin s'homme par l'apos; acetylsalicylic acid.
3	cyclic uridine 3 5 phosphate molecular structure	Cyclic uridine 3-5 phosphate.
3	enzyme induction by corticosteroids in embryonic cells steroid structure and inductive effect	Corticosteroid-induced enzyme in the steroid structure of embryonic cells and inductive effect.
3	crystal structure of a complex of acridine cytosine and water 1 1 1	Crystalline structure; cytosine complex; acridine and dolipos; water.
3	the ultrastructure of normal and pathological igm immunoglobulins	Acute and chronic inflammation of the immune system.
3	specificity and stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin	Specificity and Stereospecificity of Chymotrypsin alpha.
3	reaction of beta propiolactone with amino acids and its specificity for methionine	Amino acid reactivity and methionine specificity of beta propiolactone.
3	new method for the reductive ozonolysis of double bonds in monoenoic fatty acid methyl esters	New method for reductive double bond ozonolysis in methyl esters of monoenoic fatty acids.
3	positional distribution of fatty acids in glycerophosphatides of bovine gray matter	Positional Distribution of Fatty Acids in Bovine Glycerophosphatids.
3	substrate specific inactivation of staphylococcal penicillinase	Specific inactivation of the substrate of the staphylococcal penicillinase.
3	studies on the interaction of homologues of spermine with deoxyribonucleic acid and with bacterial protoplasts	Apos studies; spermine homolog interaction with deoxyribonucleic acid and bacterial protoplasts.
3	biosynthesis of phosphatidyl glycerophosphate in escherichia coli	Phosphatidylglycerophosphate Biosynthesis in Escherichia coli.
3	separation and size determination of human serum lipoproteins by agarose gel filtration	Human serum lipoprotein size determination and separation by gel filtration; agarose.
3	a simplified preparation of phosphatidyl inositol	Phosphatidyl inositol simplified preparation.
3	internal standards in the estimation of acetyl coa in liver extracts	For the purposes of this document, the following definitions are provided: 1.
3	chemical analysis of acetylated bovine growth hormone a growth hormone inhibitor	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used for the treatment of heart disease.
3	interaction of polypeptide hormones with lipid monolayers	Lipid monolayers interact with polypeptide hormones.
3	specific dimerization of the light chains of human immunoglobulin	Specific Dimerization of Human Immunoglobulin Lighter Chains.
3	the mechanism of the elaboration of ring b in ergosterol biosynthesis	Dapos mechanism; b-ring elaboration in apos biosynthesis; ergosterol.
3	the metabolism of tetralin	Tetraline metabolism.
3	the stereospecificity of alpha chymotrypsin	In addition, it is not possible to determine the specificity of the compound.
3	the binding of cupric ions to 1 carboxymethylhistidine 119 ribonuclease	Copper ion binding to a 119-carboxylmethylhistidine ribonuclease.
3	tanned gelatin spheres and granules for exclusion chromatography	Spheres and gelatin granules tanned for use in apos chromatography; exclusion.
3	properties of renin substrate in rabbit plasma with a note on its assay	Renin substrate properties in rabbit plasma with note on assay.
3	the oxidation of nn dimethyl p phenylenediamine by oxidizing agents and by caeruloplasmin	L' oxidation of dimethyl pphenylenediamine by caeruloplasmin and oxidizing agents.
3	effects of chondroitin sulphates on mineralization in vitro	Effects of Chondroitin Sulfates on In Vitro Mineralization.
3	the binding of inhibitors to alpha chymotrypsin at alkaline ph	Inhibitor binding to the chymotrypsin alpha at the alkaline phalanx.
3	purification and properties of an acidic protein from chromaffin granules of bovine adrenal medulla	Purification and acidic granule chromaffin protein of bovine medullo-adrenal.
3	the redox state of free nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in the cytoplasm and mitochondria of rat liver	L' free adenine dinucleotide nicotinamide redox state in rat liver cytoplasm and mitochondria.
3	preparation properties and metabolism of 5 6 monoepoxyretinoic acid	The results of this study are summarized in the table below.
3	subunits and their interactions	Subs-Units and their-Units, as well as their interactions, are called sub-@-@Units.
3	occurrence of positional isomers of octadecenoic and hexadecenoic acids in human depot fat	It is not possible to determine the extent to which a substance is present in the environment.
3	synthesis of fatty aldehydes and their cyclic acetals new derivatives for the analysis of plasmalogens	Synthesis of fatty aldehydes and their cyclic acetal derivatives; plasmalogen analysis.
3	improved reagent for trimethylsilylation of sphingolipid bases	Improved Reagent for Trimethylsilylation of Sphingolipid Basins.
3	immunological evidence for the presence of b protein apoprotein of beta lipoprotein in normal and abetalipoproteinemic plasma	Immunologic evidence of the presence of the apos; apoprotein of the b-protein of the beta-lipoprotein in normal and abetalipoproteinemic plasma.
3	comparative study of ribosomal ribonucleic acid cistrons in enterobacteria and myxobacteria	Ribonucleic acid in enterobacteria and myxobacteria.
3	physical states of staphylococcal alpha toxin	The physical status of the alpha-staphylococcal toxin.
3	rna dna hybridization demonstration in a mammalian system of competition by preincubation	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
3	action of degradative enzymes on the light fraction of bovine septa protein polysaccharide	Action of degradation enzymes on bovine septa protein polysaccharide light fraction.
3	the purification and properties of placental histaminase	The results of this study are summarized below.
3	some properties of lactate dehydrogenase found in human urine	Some of the properties of the lactate dehydrogenase are found in the human urine.
3	control of the citric acid cycle by glyoxylate mechanism of the inhibition by oxalomalate and gamma hydroxy alpha oxoglutarate	Control of loos cycle; citric acid by the loos glyoxylate mechanism; inhibition by loos; oxalomalate and loos; gamma-hydroxy oxoglutarate.
3	sedimentation viscosity and partial specific volumes of membrane proteins and lipoproteins	Sedimentation viscosity and specific partial volumes of both membrane proteins and lipoproteins.
3	the compartmentation of choline acetyltransferase within the synaptosome	Choline acetyltransferase compartmentalization in the synaptosome.
3	studies on the nature of the regulation by purine nucleotides of adenine phosphoribosyltransferase and of hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase from ehrlich ascites tumour cells	Studies of the nature of purine nucleotide regulation of ehrlich ascites tumor cells; adenine phosphoribosyltransferase and l' hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase.
3	immunochemistry of sperm whale myoglobins prepared with various modified porphyrins and metalloporphyrins	L' myoglobin immunochemistry of sperm whales prepared with various porphyrins and modified metalloporphyrins.
3	the purification and properties of histidinol dehydrogenase from neurospora crassa	Purification and properties of neurospora crassa histidinol dehydrogenase.
3	species differences in the inhibition of glutathione s aryltransferase by phthaleins and dicarboxylic acids	Specific differences in aryltransferase glutathione inhibition by phthaleins and dicarboxylic acids.
3	rat small intestinal beta galactosidases influence of ph on the hydrolysis of different substrates	In addition, there are a number of other substances that may be considered to be carcinogenic.
3	the estimation of galactose mannose and fucose in glycoproteins by radioisotope dilution	The results of this study are summarized in the table below.
3	the kinetics of the reversible inhibition of heart lactate dehydrogenase through the formation of the enzyme oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide pyruvate compounds	Apo kinetics; reversible inhibition of cardiac lactate dehydrogenase by etapos formation; nicotinamide oxidizing enzyme adenine dinucleotide pyruvate compounds.
3	effect of glutathione on ribonuclease	Ribonuclease effects of glutathione.
3	structural changes in mitochondria induced by uncoupling reagents the response to proteolytic enzymes	Structural changes induced by uncoupling reactants in the mitochondria are reactive to proteolytic enzymes.
3	chemical sensing an approach to biological molecular mechanisms unsig difference spectroscopy	Chemical detection of apos; an approach to molecular biological mechanisms spectroscopic difference unsig difference.
3	quantitative reactions for the chain elongation of aliphatic compounds	Quantitative reactions for aliphatic elongation.
3	the effect of acid mucopolysaccharides and acid mucopolysaccharide proteins on fibril formation from collagen solutions	L' effect of acidic mucopolysaccharides and acidic mucopolysaccharide proteins on fibril formation from collagen solutions.
3	aspects of the chemistry of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Aspects of Dglyceraldehyde 3 Phosphate Dehydrogenase Chemistry.
3	some physical and chemical properties of trypsin digested nucleoprotein	Some of the physical and chemical properties of trypsin can be used to digest the nucleoproteins.
3	metal binding sites of concanavalin a and their role in the binding of alpha methyl d glucopyranoside	Conanavalin metal-binding sites a and their role in binding of alpha-methyl-glucanopyranoside.
3	cyanovinyl phosphate a prebiological phosphorylating agent	Cyanovinyl phosphate (CYP) is a pre-biological phosphorylating agent.
3	preparation and analysis of peptide fragments produced by pepsin hydrolysis of human plasma albumin and their relationship to its structure	Preparation and analysis of apos-produced peptide fragments; pepsin hydrolysis; human plasma albumin and its relationship to structure.
3	the effects of inhibitor mixtures and the specific effects of different anions on the oxidase activity of caeruloplasmin	The effects of caeruloplasmin mixtures inhibitors and specific anion effects on caeruloplasmin oxidase activity.
3	dimethyl sulfoxide an inhibitor of liver alcohol dehydrogenase	Dimethyl sulfoxide is an alcohol hepatic dehydrogenase inhibitor.
3	correlation of amino acid sequence and conformation in tobacco mosaic virus	Correlation of the sequence and the conformation of amino acids in the tobacco mosaic virus.
3	hemoglobin synthesis in beta thalassemia the properties of the free alpha chains	Synthesis of apos; hemoglobin in beta thalassemia, free-living alpha-chain properties.
3	identification of a macromolecular factor in the ileum which binds intrinsic factor and immunologic identification of intrinsic factor in ileal extracts	Identification of a macromolecular factor in the ileum; ileum that links the intrinsic factor and the immunological identification of the intrinsic factor in the extracts.
3	studies on haem alpha methenyl oxygenase isomeric structure of formylbiliverdin a possible precursor of biliverdin	Studies on the isomeric structure of formylbiliverdine alpha heme methenyloxygenase, a possible biliverdine precursor.
3	structures of contraceptive agents	Contraceptive agent structure.
3	a chromatographic and spectrophotometric study of the products of the reaction of osmium tetroxide with unsaturated lipids	A spectrophotometric and chromatographic study of the products of the reaction of tetroxide d' osmium with unsaturated lipids.
3	ultrastructural studies of human and rabbit alpha m globulins	Rabbit and human alpha m globulin ultrastructural studies.
3	intraphagocytic beta n acetylglucosaminidase properties of the enzyme and its activity on group a streptococcal carbohydrate in comparison with a soil bacillus enzyme	Comparison of the enzyme and its activity properties on carbohydrates; streptococcus and d' soil bacillus, intraphagocyte acetylglucosaminidase.
3	studies of chlorophyll lipid water systems	Investigation of Lipid Chlorophyll Water Systems.
3	a new method for determining the absolute molarity of solutions of trypsin and chymotrypsin by using p nitrophenyl n2 acetyl n1 benzylcarbazate	A new method to determine absolute molarity of trypsin and chymotrypsin solutions using benzyl n1-benzylcarbazate n2 p-nitrophenyl acetate.
3	the behaviour of trypsin towards alpha n methyl alpha n toluene p sulfonyl l lysine beta naphthyl ester a new method for determining the absolute molarity of solutions of trypsin	The behavior of trypsin vis-@-@ vis de l'apos; ester alpha n methyl alpha n toluene p sulfonyl lysine beta naphthyl is a new method of absolute molarity of trypsin solutions.
3	conformation and activity of chymotrypsin the ph dependent substrate induced proton uptake	Conformation and apos; chymotrypsin activity, the ph-dependent substrate, induce apos; absorption of protons.
3	modification of lofland s colorimetric semiautomated serum triglyceride determination assessed by an enzymatic glycerol determination	Modification of the semi-automatic colorimetric determination of the serum lofland triglycerides by enzymatic determination of glycerol.
3	structure and amount of positional isomers of monounsaturated fatty acids in human depot fat	In addition, there is a need for more detailed information on the toxicity of ethylene oxide to humans.
3	gas liquid chromatographic analyses of 1 2 ethanediol monoethers and monoesters	Gas chromatography analysis of 12 apo monoether and monoester ethanediols.
3	characterization and synthesis of mono and diphytanyl ethers of glycerol	Characterization and synthesis of glycerol-containing mono- and diphytanylic ethers.
3	determination of the molecular weight of apoprotein subunits from low density lipoprotein by gel filtration	Gel filtration to determine molecular weight of apoproteins of low density lipoproteins.
3	the phosphorylation of 5 oligoadenylic acids by adenylate kinase and adenosine triphosphate	Phosphorylation of 5 oligoadenyl acids by adenos; adenos; adenosine triphosphate.
3	the mechanism of glucose 6 phosphate d myo inositol 1 phosphate cyclase of rat testis the involvement of hydrogen atoms	The rat testis glucose 6 phosphate d'apos; inositol 1 phosphate cyclase mechanism involves apos involvement; apos atoms; hydrogen.
3	alkaline haematin and nitrogenous ligands	Alkaline hematin and nitrogen ligands.
3	ll a491 a monazomycin like antibiotic	He's got 491 monazomycin as an antibiotic.
3	mechanism of the bactericidal action produced by electrohydraulic shock	Mechanisms of electro-hydraulic shock; bactericidal action.
3	the comparative toxicity of ddt and analogues to susceptible and resistant houseflies and mosquitos	Comparison of ddt and analog toxicity to household flies and sensitive and resistant mosquitoes.
3	partial resolution of dl adenosine by template synthesis	Partial adenosine dl resolution by template synthesis.
3	total synthesis of natural levo and enantiomeric dextro forms of prostaglandin el	Total synthesis of prostaglandin el enantiomeric dextro and natural levo forms.
3	purification of the alliin lyase of garlic allium sativum l	For the purpose of this document, the following definitions are provided: 1.
3	the inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid nucleotidyltransferase by stilboestrol derivatives	L' l&apos nucleotidyltransferase inhibition; deoxyribonucleic acid by stilbestrol derivatives.
3	the osmotic behaviour of sephadex and its effects on chromatography	The osmotic behavior and effects of sephadex on chromatography.
3	physical and chemical studies of a low molecular weight form of urease	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
3	purification and properties of molecular weight variants of human placental alkaline phosphatase	Purification and molecular weight variants properties of human placental alkaline phosphatase.
3	the metabolism of aromatic acids by micro organisms a reassessment of the role of o benzoquinone as a product of protocatechuate metabolism by fungi	The metabolism of aromatic acids by microorganisms reevaluates the role of benzoquinone as a product of fungal protocatechuate metabolism.
3	the preparation and kinetics of lactate dehydrogenase attached to water insoluble particles and sheets	Preparation and kinetics of particle- and leaf-insoluble lactate dehydrogenase; water.
3	evidence for histidine in the active site of papain	Evidence of the presence of histidine and apos in the active papain site.
3	the location of the active site histidine residue in the primary sequence of papain	The localization of the histidine residue from the active site into the primary papain sequence.
3	structural stability and solvent denaturation of myoglobin	Structural Stability and Solvent Denaturation of Myoglobin.
3	the inhibition of plasmin plasma kallikrein plasma permeability factor and the c 1r subcomponent of the first component of complement by serum c 1 esterase inhibitor	Plasma kallikrein permeability factor inhibition and inhibition of the sub-@-@ component c1r of the primary complement component by apos; serum esterase c1.
3	denaturation and renaturation of viral ribonucleic acd ii characterization of the products resulting from annealing r17 ribonucleic acid with denatured replicative form or with denatured replicative intermediate	Denaturation and renaturation of apos; viral ribonucleic acid (VRA) ii product characterization resulting from annealing of apos; r17 ribonucleic acid in a denatured replicative form or with a denatured replicative intermediate.
3	specificity of ribonuclease ch from chalaropsis species	Specificity of ch-ribonuclease in chalaropsis species.
3	specificity of combination between mucopeptide precursors and vancomycin or ristocetin	Specificity of the mucopeptide precursor combination with vancomycin or ristoketin.
3	nondroplet ultrastructural demonstration of cytochrome oxidase activity with a polymerizing osmiophilic reagent diaminobenzidine dab	The ultrastructure not-droplet demonstrates the apos; cytochrome oxidase activity at apos; aid of apos; an osmiophilic polymeric reagent, diaminobenzidine dab.
3	protein aggregation studies of larger aggregates of c phycocyanin	In addition, the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) is responsible for the safety and quality of the food supply.
3	immunogenicity of deoxycholate disrupted endotoxins	Deoxycholate immunogenicity disrupts endotoxins.
3	the complexing of lysozyme with poly c and other homopolymers	Lysozyme complexation with polyc and d' other homopolymers.
3	a study of folate absorption and metabolism in man utilizing carbon 14 labeled polyglutamates synthesized by the solid phase method	A study of absorption and folate metabolism in man using solid-phase synthesized carbon-14 labelled polyglutamates.
3	fetal hemoglobin variants in mice	It is not possible to determine the cause of death.
3	studies on the prekallikrein kallikreinogen kallikrein enzyme system of human plasma ii evidence relating the kaolin activated arginine esterase to plasma kallikrein	Human plasma kallikreinogen kallikreinin prekallikrein enzyme system studies ii have shown a link between kaolin-activated and plasma kallikrein arginine esterase.
3	hydrolysis of 125 i labelled thyroglobulin by pancreatin pronase and pepsin	L' 125i-labeled thyroglobulin hydrolysis by pancreatic pronase and pepsin.
3	the displacement of calcium ions from phospholipid monolayers by pharmacologically active and other organic bases	The displacement of calcium ions from monolayers of phospholipids by pharmacologically active organic and other organic bases.
3	separation of replicative intermediate from single stranded ribonucleic acid by sedimentation at low ionic strength	Separation of the apos; replicative intermediate of the apos; low ionic strength sedimentation single-strand ribonucleic acid.
3	paramyosin molecular length and assembly	Paramyosin assembly and molecular length.
3	effects of two oral iron preparations on results of the benzidine test for occult blood in stools	Effects of Two Oral Iron Formulas on the Benzidine Fecal Occult Blood Test Results.
3	reaction of nitrosoguanidine n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with tobacco mosaic virus and its rna	Reaction of nitrosoguanidine n methyl n-nitro n-nitrosoguanidine with tobacco mosaic virus and its rna.
3	binding of neomycin and analogues by fatty acids in vitro	Binding of neomycin and its analogs by in vitro fatty acids.
3	catabolism of human gammag immunoglobulins of different heavy chain subclasses i catabolism of gammag myeloma proteins in man	Canadian Journal of Public Health and Public Health 1996; 23(5): 259–74.
3	a new hepatic protein inactivating glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	A novel protein from the liver that inactivates the glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
3	intrachain disulphide bridges in immunoglobulin g heavy chains the fc fragment	Intrachain disulfide bonds in the immunoglobulin heavy chain fc fragment.
3	the utilization of some halogenated aromatic acids by nocardia oxidation and metabolism	Use of certain aromatic acids halogenated by nocardia and its oxidation and metabolism.
3	protein polyelectrolyte interactions the concanavalin a precipitin reaction with polyelectrolytes and polysaccharide derivatives	Polyelectrolyte protein interactions concanavalin a precipitin reaction with the polyelectrolytes and the polysaccharide derivatives.
3	the cell wall of bacillus licheniformis n c t c 6346 composition of the mucopeptide component	Bacillus licheniformis n c t c c c 6346 mucopeptide component cell wall.
3	the determination of oestradiol and oestrone in the plasma of the domestic fowl by method involving the use of labelled derivatives	Determination of estradiol and estradiol; estrone in domestic poultry plasma using labelled derivatives.
3	lipids produced by epicoccum nigrum in submerged culture	Lipids produced by submerged epicoccum nigrum.
3	study of the methylation and lack of deamination of deoxyribonucleic acid by n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine	N-nitro-n-nitrosoguanidine (N-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro-nitro.
3	complex formation between triphosphoinositide and experimental allergic encephalitogenic protein	Formation of d&apos, a complex between the triphosphoinositide and the experimental allergic encephalitogenic protein.
3	effect of formaldehyde on the immunochemical and biological activity of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Effect of formaldehyde on epos; immunochemical and biological activity; staphylococcal enterotoxin b.
3	effect of formaldehyde on the immunogenicity of staphylococcal enterotoxin b for macaca mulatta	Effect of formaldehyde on apo placentae; immunogenicity of apo; enterotoxin b of staphylococcus in mulatta macaca.
3	activation of hageman factor by l homocystine	L'activité du facteur lamb par l'apos; l'homocystine.
3	nitrazepam mogadon in blood serum and urine and librium in urine	It's called nitrazepam megadon in blood serum, and it's called urine and librium in urine.
3	dehydration of prostaglandins study by spectroscopic method	Prostaglandin dehydration is studied by the spectroscopic method.
3	reactions of aromatic and sulfur amino acids in ribonuclease with hydrogen atoms in water solution	The reaction of aromatic and sulfuric amino acids in the ribonuclease with the atoms d' hydrogen in aqueous solution.
3	staphylococcal nuclease size and specificity of the active site	Size and specificity of active site staphylococcal nuclease.
3	hydrolysis at arginylproline in polypeptides by clostridiopeptidase b	L' polypeptide arginylproline hydrolysis by clostridiopeptidase b.
3	esterases of the polymorphonuclear leukocyte capable of hydrolyzing acetyl dl phenyl alanine beta naphthyl ester relationship to the activatable esterase of chemotaxis	Polymorphonuclear leukocyte esterases are capable of synthesizing and hydrolyzing the relationship between apos, apos ester, acetyl phenylalanine beta, and apos; activable chemotaxis esterase.
3	interactions between the lysine rich histone f1 and deoxyribonucleic acid	L&apos interactions; lysine- and l&apos-rich f1 histone; deoxyribonucleic acid.
3	the action of digitonin on rat liver mitochondria the effects on enzyme content	L' action of digitonin on the mitochondria of rat liver the effects on the enzyme content.
3	ionic interaction of sulfatide with choline lipids	Choline lipid ion interaction of sulfatide.
3	evidence for histidine in the active sites of ficin and stem bromelain	The presence of apos; histidine at active sites of twine and stem bromellain has been demonstrated.
3	the effect of n bromosuccinimide on the sub unit structure of acidin and its complexes with biotin	Effect of n-bromosuccinimide on the structure of acidic acid and its biotin complexes.
3	current concepts of hyperuricemia and gout	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to this problem.
3	a new route to the imidazole 2 thiones from 2 thiohydantoins implications in the study of ergothioneine	A new pathway; access to epos; imidazole 2 thiones from 2 thiohydantoines; 2 thiohydantoines; involves apos; study of apos; ergothionein.
3	preparation properties and metabolism of retro 3 dehydroretinyl acetate	In the case of a drug substance, the drug substance is considered to be the product of the drug substance.
3	reaction of tyrosine oxidation products with proteins of the lens	Oxidation of tyrosine with lens proteins.
3	cellulose refutation of a folded chain structure	The cellulosic refutation of d' a folded-chain structure.
3	electron spin resonance evidence for enzymic reduction of oxygen to a free radical the superoxide ion	Electron paramagnetic resonance demonstrates the existence of apos; enzymatic reduction of apos; oxygen to free radical, apos; superoxide ion.
3	cleavage by formamide of intercapsomer bonds in adenovirus types 4 and 7 virions and hemagglutinins	Formamide cleavage of adenovirus virions 4 and 7 intercapsomeric bonds and hemagglutinins.
3	physical and biological properties of phage phi 29 deoxyribonucleic acid	Physical and Biological Properties of Phi Phage 29 Deoxyribonucleic Acid.
3	morphology of the nucleoprotein component of rabies virus	Rage virus nucleoprotein component morphology.
3	a study of immunoglobulin structure 3 an estimate of the variability of human light chains	A study of the structure of l' immunoglobulin 3, an estimation of human light chain variability.
3	metabolism of antifertility steroids i norethynodrel	Antifertility i norethynodrel.
3	the active chemical state of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate in its reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase	L' chemical status of glyceraldehyde phosphate 3 in its reactions with dglyceride 3 phosphate dehydrogenase and triose phosphate isomerase.
3	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin vii toxin stimulated hydrolysis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in mammalian cell extracts	Dinosus studies; vii toxin diphtheria toxin action stimulated apos; nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide hydrolysis in mammalian cell extracts.
3	magnesium sulfate interactions in seawater from solubility measurements	The interaction of magnesium sulphate in the sapos; seawater from measurements of solubility.
3	sulfur containing nucleoside from yeast transfer ribonucleic acid 2 thio 5 or 6 uridine acetic acid methyl ester	The nucleoside containing the yeast sulfur transfers 2thio-5 or 6thioethyl ester ribonucleic acid, 2thio-5 or 6thioethyl ester, and uridineacetic acid.
3	pyrogenic principle of the ribonucleic acid from the yeast candida utilis	Pyrogenic principle; ribonucleic acid of yeast applied.
3	physical heterogeneity among bacillus subtilis deoxyribonucleic acid molecules carrying particular genetic markers	It is not possible to distinguish between the two molecules, but it is important to distinguish between the two molecules.
3	complement inactivating proteinase s from clostridium histolyticum	Supplemental inactivating Clostridium histolyticum proteinases.
3	the partial characterization of 1 oxygenated steroids from urine of a hypertensive newborn child	It is not possible to determine the cause of the hypertensive reaction.
3	total synthesis of dl 19 nor 16 17 dehydroprogesterone	Total dl 19 or 16.17 dehydroprogesterone synthesis.
3	on the mechanism of catalysis by vitamin b12	Vitamin b12 catalysis.
3	stereochemical analysis of the specificity of pancreatic rnase with polyformycin as substrate differentiation of the transphosphorylation and hydrolysis reactions	Stereochemical analysis of pancreatic rnase specificity using polyformycin as substrate for differentiation of transphosphorylation and d' hydrolysis.
3	deoxyribonuclease iv a new exonuclease from mammalian tissues	Deoxyribonuclease iv is a novel mammalian exonuclease.
3	7 dehydrostigmasterol and ergosterol the major sterols of an amoeba	Dehydrostigmasterol and ergosterol, one amoeba.
3	intestinal absorption and lymphatic transport of cholesterol in the rat influence of the fatty acid chain length of the carrier triglyceride	Bowel absorption and lymphatic cholesterol transport in the rat influence triglyceride transporter fatty acid chain length.
3	sphingolipids in bean leaves phaseolus vulgaris	Phaseolus vulgaris vulgaris bean leaves.
3	quantitative analysis and comparison of the physical properties of o alkyl and s alkyl monoethers of glycerol	Quantitative Analysis and Comparison of the Physical Properties of Alkyl and Alkyl Monoether of Glycerol.
3	the mechanism of heparin stimulation of rat adipocyte lipoprotein lipase	Lipoprotein lipase heparin heparin from rat adipocytes.
3	long chain bases in the sphingolipids of atherosclerotic human aorta	Long-chain bases in human atherosclerotic aorta sphingolipids.
3	gas liquid chromatographic analysis of free long chain aldehydes	Analysis by long-chain free aldehydes gas chromatography.
3	synthesis and desulfurization decarboxylation of cyclic thionocarbonates of glycerol 1 ethers	Synthesis and Decarboxylation of Cyclic Thionocarbonates of Decarboxylated Glycerol Ethers 1.
3	alteration of physical chemical and biological properties of endotoxin by treatment with mild alkali	Change of physical properties-chemicals and biologicals of lacid; endotoxin by mild alkali treatment.
3	molecular order of participation of inhibitors or activators in biological systems	The molecular order of the participation of inhibitors or enhancers in a biological system.
3	characterization of rapidly labelled ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli by deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid hybridization	Characterization of the apos; rapidly labelled ribonucleic acid in Escherichia coli by hybridization of the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid with the apos; ribonucleic acid.
3	chemical modification of glutamate dehydrogenase by 2 4 6 trinitrobenzenesulphonic acid	Chemically Modified Glutamate Dehydrogenase by Glutamate dehydrogenase; Acid 2,4,6 trinitrobenzenesulfonic acid.
3	on the mechanism of pepsin action	On the apos mechanism; pepsin action.
3	negative cooperativity in regulatory enzymes	Negative regulatory enzyme cooperativity.
3	the mechanism of action of ribonuclease	The d&apos mechanism; ribonuclease action.
3	lipid monolayers interactions with the apoprotein of high density plasma lipoprotein	Interactions of lipid monolayers with high-density plasma lipoprotein (HDL) apoprotein.
3	origin of some derivatives of retinoic acid found in rat bile	Origin of some retinoic acid l&apos derivatives found in rat bile.
3	effect of phospholipase a treatment of low density lipoproteins on the dextran sulfate lipoprotein interaction	Phospholipase effect, a low-density lipoprotein treatment, on dextran lipoprotein interaction.
3	probes of dna structure and interactions effects of copper ii on ultraviolet induced pyrimidine dimer formation	The results of this study will be used to evaluate the effects of copper on the formation of pyrimidine dimers induced by ultraviolet radiation.
3	variations in sulfhydryl disulfide and protein content during synchronous and asynchronous growth of hela cells	Changes in the content of sulfhydryl disulfide and protein during synchronous and asynchronous growth of the helical cells.
3	the interaction of cytochrome c with monolayers of phosphatidylethanolamine	L' cytochrome c interaction with phosphatidylethanolamine monolayers.
3	the separation prtial purificatio nd some properties of isoenzymes of aldolase from guinea pig cerebral cortex	Prtial purification of certain properties of guinea-pig cerebral cortical isoenzymes; aldolase.
3	o quinones formed in plant extracts their reactions with amino acids and peptides	The quinones formed in the plant extracts react with the amino acids and peptides.
3	the use of maleic anhydride for the reversible blocking of amino groups in polypeptide chains	L' use of l' maleic anhydride for reversible amino group blockade in polypeptide chains.
3	mechanism of non enzymic transamination reaction between histidine and alpha oxoglutaric acid	Mechanisms of non-enzymatic apos, histidine and l&apos transamination reaction; oxoglutaric alpha acid.
3	the influence of metal ions on the orthophosphatase and inorganic pyrophosphatase activities of human alkaline phosphatase	Human alkaline phosphatase (HAPS) is an inorganic pyrophosphatase and orthophosphatase activity that is controlled by the presence of metal ions.
3	analogues of ribose 5 phosphate and 5 phosphoribosyl pyrophosphate the preparation and properties of ribose 5 phosphorothioate and 5 phosphoribosyl 1 methylenediphosphonate	Ribose 5 phosphorothioate and phosphoribosyl 1-methylenediphosphonate were prepared and their properties prepared by the ribose 5 phosphate and 5 phosphoribosyl pyrophosphonate analogs.
3	effects of adenosine phosphates and nicotinamide nucleotides on pyruvate carboxylase from baker s yeast	Effects of nicotinamide phosphates, adenosine and nucleotides on baker's yeast pyruvate carboxylase.
3	comparative studies of bile salts 16 deoxymyxinol a second bile alcohol from hagfish	Comparative Studies of Bile Salts 16 deoxymyxinol, a second bile alcohol of hagfishin.
3	the structure of an acylated inositol mannoside in the lipids of propionic acid bacteria	The structure of the inositol molecule, which is acylated in the lipids of the propionic bacteria.
3	a shift in the optimum ph of pospholipase d produced by activating long chain anions	A change in the optimal pospholipase d ph of the long-chain anion activation product.
3	mechanisms of inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in deoxyribonucleic acid by acridine dyes	D&apos mechanisms; inhibition of the formation of pyrimidine dimers in the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid by acridinic dyes.
3	the hyperviscosity syndrome i in igg myeloma the role of protein concentration and molecular shape	In addition, the protein content of the protein is determined by the protein content of the protein.
3	studies on testosterone metabolism in subjects with testicular feminization syndrome	Study of the metabolism of testosterone in patients with the syndrome of testicular feminization.
3	adenine nucleotides and magnesium ions in relation to control of mammalian cerebral cortex hexokinase	Apos nucleotides; adenine and magnesium ions related to apos control; mammalian cerebral cortical hexokinase.
3	o quinones formed in plant extracts their reaction with bovine serum albumin	The quinones formed in the plant extracts react with l' bovine serum albumin.
3	effects of magnesium manganese and adenosine triphosphate ions on pyruvate carboxylase from baker s yeast	Effects of Manganese Magnesium and Apos; Adenosine Triphosphate on Bakery Yeast Pyruvate Carboxylase.
3	inhibition of pyrimidine dimer formation in dna by cationic molecules role of energy transfer	The formation of the pyrimidine dimer in the apos is inhibited; DNA by the cationic molecules plays a role in the transfer of d' energy.
3	formation of vitamin k2 isoprenologues by staphylococcus aureus	In addition to vitamin C, vitamin C is a major component of the diet.
3	genetic and molecular properties of an infectious antibiotic resistance r factor isolated from klebsiella	Genetic and molecular properties of Klebsiella isolated antibiotic resistance factor.
3	the hydrolysis of monolayers of phosphatidyl me 14c choline by phospholipase d	Phosphatidyl monolayers 14c choline were hydrolyzed by phospholipase d.
3	amino acid incorporation by ribosomes and polyribosomes from wheat chloroplasts	In addition, there are a number of other substances that can be added to the food.
3	study of carbonic anhydrase using perturbed angular correlations of gamma radiation	Study of l' carbonic anhydrase, using perturbed gamma-ray angular correlations.
3	properties of halves of immunoglobulin light chains	Dapos light chain half properties; immunoglobulin.
3	some optical properties of diadenosine 5 phosphates	Some of the optical properties of the diadenosine phosphates 5 (diadenosine 5) are described.
3	the nature of general base general acid catalysis in serine proteases	The nature of the general acidic base catalysis in the serine proteases.
3	chemical composition of exosporium from spores of bacillus cereus	Chemical Composition of Apos; Exosporium of Bacillus cereus spores.
3	the integrity of the ether linkage during thyroxine metabolism in man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
3	two distinct groups of immunoglobulin a iga revealed by peptic digestion	Two distinct serum immunoglobulin groups revealed by peptic digestion.
3	proton magnetic resonance studies of porphyrin iron 3 cyanides	Proton Nuclear Magnetic Resonance Studies of Porphyrin Iron Cyanide 3.
3	on the mechanism of ribonuclease action	The action of ribonuclease.
3	new antibacterial agent isolated from the avocado pear	New anti-bacterial agent, isolated from pear.
3	microbiological assay and tissue distribution of beta thioguanine deoxyriboside in mice	Beta @-@thioguanine deoxyriboside tissue distribution and microbiological testing in mice.
3	irradiation of thymine dimers in aqueous solution	L' thymine dimer irradiation in aqueous solution.
3	properties of 42s and 26s sindbis viral ribonucleic acid species	Properties of the species d' ribonucleic viral acid sindbis 42s et 26s.
3	electron microscopic observations on the ribonucleic acid of murine leukemia virus	Electron microscopic observations of mouse leukemia virus ribonucleic acid.
3	studies on the nucleocapsid structure of a group a arbovirus	In addition, it can be used as a tool to determine the nature of the virus.
3	trypsin and papain covalently coupled to porous glass preparation and characterization	Trypsin and papaine are covalently associated with the preparation and characterization of the porous glass.
3	the effect of the prostaglandin f compounds on the contractility of the pregnant human uterus	Lapos; effect of prostaglandins f on contractility of pregnant human uterus.
3	stereochemistry of nucleic acids and their constituents ix the conformation of the antibiotic puromycin dihydrochloride pentahydrate	The stereochemistry of nucleic acids and their components ix the conformation of the antibiotic, puromycin-chloride pentahydrate.
3	photoregulation of biological activity by photocromic reagents ii inhibitors of acetylcholinesterase	In addition, it is important to note that there are no data on the toxicity of acetylcholinesterase to humans.
3	activation of rabbit liver fructose diphosphatase by coenzyme a and acyl carrier protein	Hepatic rabbit fructose diphosphatase activity by both coenzyme a and protein carrier d' acyl.
3	replicative form ii dna of phi x174 resistance to exonucleolytic cleavage by e coli dna polymerase	Replicative form ii dna phi x174 exonucleolytic cleavage resistance by e coli dna polymerase.
3	controlled deamidation of peptides and proteins an experimental hazard and a possible biological timer	Controlled peptide and protein deamidation is an experimental risk and can be a biological timer.
3	temporal resolution of individual steps in an enzymic reaction at low temperature	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
3	conversion of bacterial aldolase from vegetative to spore form by a sporulation specific protease	Conversion of vegetative bacterial aldolase to spore by sporulation-specific protease.
3	hemoglobin nyu a delta chain variant alpha 2 delta 2 lys	L' nyu hemoglobin is a variant of the delta 2 delta 2 lily chain.
3	very low density lipoproteins in intestinal lymph origin composition and role in lipid transport in the fasting state	Lipoproteins of very low density in the composition of the intestinal lymphatic origin and role in the transport of lipids to the apos; fasting state.
3	autoxidation of insect lipids inhibition on the cuticle of the american cockroach	Apos autoxidation; insect lipid inhibition on cockroach cuticle.
3	pancreatic ribonuclease poly g complexes complete inhibition of poly u hydrolysis	Polyg complexes of pancreatic ribonuclease complete apos inhibition; polyurethane hydrolysis.
3	subunits of tamm horsfall glycoprotein	Under-glycoprotein units tamm horsfall.
3	a specific complex between a restriction endonuclease and its dna substrate	Restriction endonuclease specific complex with its DNA substrate.
3	an analysis of the electron spin resonance of low spin ferric heme compounds	Electron paramagnetic resonance analysis of low-spin ferric heme compounds was performed.
3	warfarin metabolism in man identification of metabolites in urine	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used for the treatment of diabetes.
3	relationships between chemical structure and affinity for acetylcholine receptors	Chemical structure – l&apos ratio; l&apos receptor affinity; acetylcholine.
3	heavy and light chain allotypic markers on rabbit homocytotropic antibody	Allotypic markers of rabbit homocytotropic antibodies in light and heavy chains.
3	semisynthetic coumermycins structure activity relationships	They are the most common type of coumermycin in the world.
3	the heparin protein complex of ox liver capsule isolation and chemical characterization	The protein complex, heparin of the liver, isolation of the bovine liver capsule and chemical characterization.
3	variation in the n terminal sequence of heavy chains of immunoglobulin g from rabbits of different allotype	Variation in the n-terminal sequence of allotypic rabbit heavy chains; immunoglobulin g.
3	studies on the reduction of a human 19s immunoglobulin m	A human immunoglobulin-reducing study was also performed.
3	reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of electrons formation of radical anions from 7 7 8 8 tetracyanoquinodimethane and tetrachloro 1 4 benzoquinone	Vitamin a reacts with electron acceptors to form radical anions from 788 tetracyanoquinodimethane and tetrachloro14 benzoquinone.
3	reactions of vitamin a with acceptors of electrons interactions with iodine and the formation of iodide	In addition, vitamin A can be used as an ingredient in a variety of foods, such as fruits, vegetables, fruits, fruits and vegetables.
3	studies on tryptophan synthetases from various strains of bacillus subtilis	Studies of tryptophan synthetases of various subtilis strains.
3	competition of two substrates for a single enzyme a simple kinetic theorem exemplified by a hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase reaction	Two substrate competition for a single enzyme, a simple kinetic theorem illustrated by a d' hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase reaction.
3	brain arylamidase purfication and characterization of the soluble bovine enzyme	Bacteriological studies were performed to determine the extent to which the drug is administered to the target animal.
3	stepwise cleavage of rabbit immunoglobulin g by papain and isolation of four types of biologically active fc fragments	Stepwise cleavage of rabbit immunoglobulin by papain and l' isolation of four biologically active fc fragment types.
3	conformation changes and dissociation of fc fragments of rabbit immunoglobulin g as a function of ph	Conformational changes and dissociation of rabbit fc fragments; immunoglobulin g vs. ph.
3	the incorporation of a hydrogen atom at c 15 of cholesterol biosynthesized from squalene	In addition, it can be used as a catalyst for the formation of hydrogen atoms in cholesterol.
3	effects of allopurinol and oxipurinol on purine synthesis in cultured human cells	Effects of allopurinol and oxipurinol on the synthesis of purines in cultured human cells.
3	aggregation of gamma g3 proteins relevance to the hyperviscosity syndrome	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of a person's health status.
3	immune reactions in polysaccharide media the effect of hyaluronate chondroitin sulphate and chondroitin sulphate protein complex on the precipitin reaction	Immune reactions in sucrose polysaccharide media; effect of chondroitin sulfate hyaluronate and chondroitin sulfate protein complex on precipitin reaction.
3	the preferential loss of the polylysine or polyornithine stimulated activity of clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase during proteolysis	Preferential loss of polylysine or polyornithine stimulates the apos; activity of the polynucleotide phosphorylase of clostridium perfringens during proteolysis.
3	the influence of the size and nature of basic activators on clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase catalysed polyadenylic acid synthesis	The influence of basic activator size and nature on clostridium perfringens polynucleotide phosphorylase catalyzes the synthesis of polyadenylic acid.
3	mode of action of albocycline an inhibitor of nicotinate biosynthesis	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
3	specificity and evolutionary divergence of the antigenic structure of the polypeptide chain elongation factors	Specificity and evolutionary divergence of d&apos antigenic structure; polypeptide chain elongation.
3	biological studies with alpha dehydrobiotin	Alpha-dehydrobiotine bioassays.
3	biochemical decomposition of the herbicide n 3 4 dichlorophenyl 2 methylpentanamide and related compounds	Dichlorophenyl 2-methylpentanamide and related compounds.
3	comparative study of responses to neomycins b and c by microbiological and gas liquid chromatographic assay methods	Comparative study of the responses to neomycin b and neomycin c by gas- and microbiological-phase liquid chromatography.
3	loss of rubella antibody from immune globulin treated with kaolin	Antibody to rubella in kaolin-treated immunoglobulins.
3	interactions of desensitized actomyosin with tropomyosin troponin a troponin b and polyanions	Treatment Interactions of Apos; Desensitized Actomyosin with Tropomyosin Troponin B and Polyanions.
3	relative rates of hydrolysis by rat pancreatic lipase of esters of c2 c18 fatty acids with c1 c18 primary n alcohols	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the drug is administered to the patient, but it is important to determine the extent to which the drug is administered.
3	reaction of acetyl alpha chymotrypsin and other esters with an ionizable nucleophile monoisonitrosoacetone	Reaction of l' chymotrypsin alpha acetyl acetate and d' other esters with ionizable nucleophilic monoisonitrosoacetone.
3	the recombination of dimers of immunoglobulin peptide chains	Recombination of peptide chain peptide dimers of l' immunoglobulin.
3	antibacterial effect of some azaphenanthrene compounds	Anti-bacterial effect of certain compounds.
3	preparation of radioactive tay sachs ganglioside labeled in the sialic acid moiety	Preparation of sialic acid labelled ganglioside radioactive tay sachs.
3	gas liquid chromatography mass spectrometry of synthetic ceramides containing 2 hydroxy acids	Gas Phase Liquid Chromatography Mass Spectrometry of Synthetic Ceramides Containing 2 Hydroxylic Acids.
3	microbial transformation of 19 hydroxypregnanes	Nineteen hydroxypregnane microbial transformation.
3	the conformation of cholinergic molecules at nicotinic nerve receptors	The conformation of the cholinergic molecules to the nerve receptors nicotinic.
3	chemical composition of the cell wall of the h37ra strain of mycobacterium tuberculosis	Chemical composition of mycobacterium tuberculosis strain h37ra cell wall.
3	terminal cross linking of dna strands by an enzyme system from escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4	It is important to note that the genotoxicity of Escherichia coli has been linked to the genotoxicity of the bacteriophage.
3	diphenylhydantoin and diazepam molecular structure similarities and steric basis of anticonvulsant activity	Comparison of the molecular structures of diphenylhydantoin and diazepam, and the steric basis of l' its anticonvulsant activity.
3	specific alkylation of a histidine residue in carnitine acetyltransferase by bromoacetyl l carnitine	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed in accordance with the requirements of the Food and Drug Regulations.
3	products of aminolysis and enzymic hydrolysis of the cephalosporins	Products of Aminolysis and Enzymatic Hydrolysis of Cephalosporins.
3	changes in proton magnetic resonance spectra during aminolysis and enzymic hydrolysis of cephalosporins	Changes in proton nuclear magnetic resonance (PMR) spectra during apos; aminolysis and apos; enzymatic hydrolysis of cephalosporins.
3	inhibition of phosphofructokinase by quinone methide and alpha methylene lactone tumor inhibitors	L' quinone methide and l&apos tumor inhibitors inhibit phosphofructokinase; alpha methylene lactone.
3	an approach to conformational analysis of peptides and proteins in solution based on a combination of nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy and conformational energy calculations	An apos approach; solution-based conformational peptide and protein analysis based on a combination of nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy and d&apos calculations; conformational energy.
3	conversion of glycogen phosphorylase b to a by non activated phosphorylase b kinase an in vitro model of the mechanism of increase in phosphorylase a activity with muscle contraction	Conversion of glycogen phosphorylase b a by non-activated phosphorylase b, an in vitro model of the d&apos mechanism; increase in apos; muscle contraction activity of phosphorylase a.
3	mechanism of activation by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate of a protein phosphokinase from rabbit reticulocytes	Mechanisms of apo; rabbit reticulocyte phosphokinase protein; adenosine 3-5 of cyclic monophosphate.
3	steric and electronic relationships among some hallucinogenic compounds	Electronic and steric relationships between certain hallucinogenic compounds.
3	polynucleotide ligase catalyzed joining of deoxyribo oligonucleotides on ribopolynucleotide templates and of ribo oligonucleotides on deoxyribopolynucleotide templates	Polynucleotide ligase catalyzes deoxyribo oligonucleotide union on ribopolynucleotide and oligonucleotide ribosome templates.
3	reaction of diethyl pyrocarbonate with nucleic acid components i adenine	Diethyl pyrocarbonate reacts with iadenine nucleic acid components.
3	production of rubratoxin b by penicillium purpurogenum stoll	Rubratoxin b production per penicillium purpurogenum stoll.
3	identification of mycobactins by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy	Identification of the mycobacteria by means of nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy.
3	a new class of chromophoric organomercurials and their reactions with d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	A new class of chromophore organomercurics and their reactions with glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
3	structural analysis of colanic acid from escherichia coli by using methylation and base catalysed fragmentation comparison with polysaccharides from other bacterial sources	Structural analysis of apos; colanic acid; escherichia coli by methylation and comparison of base-catalyzed fragmentation with native polysaccharides; other bacterial sources.
3	purification and properties of d 4 deoxy 5 oxoglucarate hydro lyase decarboxylating	Deoxy hydrolysate-4 oxoglucarate-5 decarboxylating lyase by decarboxylation.
3	anaerobic degradation of the benzene nucleus by a facultatively anaerobic microorganism	Anaerobic benzene ring degradation by micro-facultative anaerobic organism.
3	yields of hydrogenomonas eutropha from growth on succinate and fumarate	Hydrogenomonas eutropha yields of succinate and fumarate growth.
3	contribution of aromatic residue interactions to the stability of myoglobin v enhancement by aromatic compounds of the rate of heat denaturation	Contribution of the interactions of aromatic residues to the stability of the cell; increase of the myoglobin v by aromatic compounds in the rate of thermal denaturation.
3	reactions between singlet oxygen and the constituents of nucleic acids importance of reactions in photodynamic processes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
3	electron microscopic studies on streptococci i m antigen	The results of these studies are summarized below.
3	the immunogenicity of dinitrophenyl amino acids	Dinitrophenyl amino acid immunogenicity.
3	electron microscopy of the nucleic acid of mouse mammary tumor virus	Electron microscopy of nucleic acid from mouse mammary tumour virus.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 2 toxicity to adult mosquitos and the physical properties of some new carbamates	Compounds for adult mosquito insecticidal activity 2 toxicity to adult mosquitoes and physical properties of selected novel carbamates.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 3 properties of some n methylthiolcarbamates	Evaluation of compounds for their insecticidal activity on adult mosquitoes 3 n methylthiolcarbamate properties.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 4 insecticidal activity and physical properties of some halogenated organophosphorus esters	Evaluation of the insecticidal activity of certain compounds against adult mosquitoes 4 and halogenated organophosphate esters.
3	evaluation of compounds for insecticidal activity on adult mosquitos 5 toxicity to adult mosquitos and residual properties of some pyrethroids	Evaluation of Compounds for Insecticidal Activity against Adult Mosquitoes 5 Toxicity to Adult Mosquitoes and Residual Properties of Certain Pyrethroids.
3	procedures for the assay of carbenicillin in body fluids	Body fluid carbenicillin dosing procedures.
3	the nature of the antigenic determinant in a genetic control of the antibody response	The nature of the antigenic determinant in genetic control of antibody response.
3	physical and chemical changes in isolated chylomicrons prevention by edta	Prepared for Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety, Ottawa, Ontario.
3	subterminal oxidation of aliphatic hydrocarbons	Aliphatic hydrocarbon subterminal oxygenation.
3	evaluation of various substances to prevent adsorption of tuberculin purified protein derivative ppd to glass surfaces	Evaluation of a variety of substances to prevent spoilage; adsorption of the purified protein derivative by tuberculin pd to the glass surface.
3	on the reconstitution of the crystalline components of the sea urchin fertilization membrane	On the reconstitution of crystalline components of sea urchin fertilization membrane.
3	direct isolation of the hyaline layer protein released from the cortical granules of the sea urchin egg at fertilization	Directly isolating protein from the hyaline layer released from cortical granules of the egg; fertilization sea urchin.
3	polyacetal carboxylic acids a new group of antiviral polyanions	Polyacetal carboxylic acids, a new antiviral polyanion group.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation i measurement of oxidation by ultraviolet spectrophotometry and the thiobarbituric acid test	Ascorbic acid and copper in the sapos; oxidation of linoleate i measures the apos; ultraviolet spectrophotometric and lyophilic test oxidation; thiobarbituric acid.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation ii ascorbic acid and copper as oxidation catalysts	Ascorbic acid and copper; oxidation of linoleate ii L' ascorbic acid and copper as catalysts for the production of l' oxidation.
3	ascorbic acid and copper in linoleate oxidation 3 catalysts in combination	It is also used as a catalyst for the formation of chlorinated hydrocarbons.
3	mass spectral discrimination between monoenoic and cyclopropanoid and between normal iso and anteiso fatty acid methyl esters	Mass spectral discrimination between the methyl esters of monoenoic and cyclopropanoic fatty acids and between the normal and anteiso iso is a distinction between the methyl esters of the fatty acids.
3	metabolism of tryptophan by pseudomonas aureofaciens 3 production of substituted pyrrolnitrins from tryptophan analogues	Tryptophan metabolism by Pseudomonas aureofaciens 3 produces tryptophan-substituted pyrrolnitrins.
3	reactive phosphate ester of the carcinogen 2 n hydroxy acetamido fluorene	Reactive phosphoric ester of 2-hydroxyacetamido-fluorene carcinogen.
3	bactericidal action of 2 hydroxy 3 cyclohexylpropyl 1 4 naphthoquinone on bacillus megaterium	Bactericidal action of 2-hydroxy 3-cyclohexylpropyl-14 naphthoquinone on megaterium bacillus.
3	some physical chemical and insecticidal properties of some o o dialkyl 3 5 6 trichloro 2 pyridyl phosphates and phosphorothioates	Some physico properties-chemicals and insecticides of certain phosphates and phosphorothioates; o dialkyl 3.
3	metabolism of benzoic acid by bacteria 3 5 cyclohexadiene 1 2 diol 1 carboxylic acid is an intermediate in the formation of catechol	The metabolism of l' benzoic acid by the bacterium 3-5 cyclohexadiene 1-2 diol 1 l' carboxylic acid is an intermediate in catechol formation.
3	configuration of the c 20 epimer of 7 8 dihydrobatrachotoxinin a	It is also used as an anti-oxidant agent.
3	the non enzymic hydroxylation of phenylalanine to tyrosine by 2 amino 4 hydroxy 6 7 dimethyl 5 6 7 8 tetrahydropteridine	Non-enzymatic hydroxylation of phenylalanine to tyrosine by 2 amino-4-hydroxy-6-dimethyl-5-7,7-tetrahydropteridine.
3	a study of the formation of fluorescent derivatives of 4 hydroxyphenethylamine tyramine 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenethylamine 3 methoxytyramine and related compounds by reaction with hydrazine in the presence of nitrous acid	The formation of fluorescent derivatives of 4 hydroxyphenethylamine tyramine, 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenethylamine, 3 methoxytyramine, and related compounds was studied by reaction with l' hydrazine in the presence of apos; nitrous acid.
3	oligothymidylates formation by thermal condensation of o 2 5 cyclothymidine 3 phosphate	The pH of the solution is determined by the thermal condensation of 2-5 cyclothymidine 3 phosphate.
3	5 fluoro 2 deoxyuridylate covalent complex with thymidylate synthetase	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used in the treatment of cancer.
3	structure activity relationships in some series of 2 alkyl 1 2 3 benzotriazinium compounds	In the case of non-cyclic aromatic hydrocarbons, it is not possible to determine the structure of the product.
3	on the mechanism of action of vitamin b 12 model studies thermal rearrangement of methyl 3 3 dimethylglycidate to methyl levulinate	On the mechanism of b12 vitamin action, one model studies the thermal rearrangement of methyl dimethylglycidate 3 to methyl levulinate.
3	microbial hydroxylation of 5 anilino 1 2 3 4 thiatriazole	Microbial hydroxylation of 5 anilino, 1, 2, 3, 4, and 4 thiatriazole.
3	purification and properties of 4 hydroxy 2 ketopimelate aldolase from acinetobacter	Purification and properties of 4 acetopimerate aldolase d' acinetobacter.
3	microbial transformation of methyl 5 6 butyl 2 benzimidazolecarbamate	Microbial Transformation of Methyl Benzimidazole-Carbamate 5-6 Butyle 2.
3	activity of 6 methyl 8 substituted ergolines against the 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene induced mammary carcinoma	L' methyl substituted 6 ergolines 8 against 712 anthracene dimethylbenz induced mammary carcinoma.
3	a new antibiotic xk 62 2 iii the structure of xk 62 2 a new gentamicin c complex antibiotic	New antibiotic xk 622 iii xk 622 structure, new gentamicin complex antibiotic c.
3	microbial reduction of 1 3 dioxo 2 methyl 2 3 0oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane to form 1 beta hydroxy 3 oxo 2beta methyl 2alpha 3 oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane an intermediate for steroid total syntheses	Microbial reduction of 13 dioxo 2 methyl 2 3,0oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane to form 1 β-hydroxy 3 oxo 2 beta methyl 2alpha 3 oxo 6 carbomethoxyhexyl cyclopentane, an intermediate compound for total steroid synthesis.
3	hydrogen bonding abilities of 2 4 dithiouridine derivatives	The hydrogen-bonding capacity of 24 dithiouridine-derivatives.
3	2 chloroethanol formation as evidence for a 2 chloroethyl alkylating intermediate during chemical degradation of 1 2 chloroethyl 3 cyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea and 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea	The formation of 2 chloroethanol as evidence of apos; an alkylating 2-chloroethyl intermediate on 1,2-chloroethyl 3-cyclohexyl 1-nitrosourea chemical degradation and 1,2-chloroethyl 3-trans-4-methylcyclohexyl-1-nitrosourea chemical degradation.
3	morphometry of endocrine organs 1 karyometry of the chicken thyroid gland following administration of zinc and bismuth complexes of substituted bisthiourea	Chicken thyroid organ endocrine morphometry 1 karyometry after zinc complexes and substituted bisthiourea bismuth.
3	metabolic function and properties of 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid 1 hydroxylase from pseudomonas acidovorans	Metabolic functions and properties of 4-hydroxyphenylacetic acid 1 pseudomonas acidovorans hydroxylase.
3	purification and properties of gentisate 1 2 dioxygenase from moraxella osloensis	Gentisate 12 - moraxella osloensis dioxygenase purification and properties.
3	sulfhydryl reactivity mechanism of action of several antiviral compounds selenocystine 4 2 propinyloxy beta nitrostyrene and acetylaranotin	Sulfhydryl reactivity mechanisms of several antiviral compounds, selenocystin 4, 2 propinyloxy beta-nitrostyrene and acetylaranotin.
3	metallointercalation reagents 2 hydroxyethanethiolato 2 2 2 terpyridine platinum ii monocation binds strongly to dna by intercalation	Metallointercalation reagents 2 hydroxyethanethiolato 2 2 terpyridine platinum ii monocation is found to bind strongly to the apos; DNA intercalation.
3	kinetics of drug decomposition part xxxvi stability of 10 1 methyl 4 piperazinylpropyl phenothiazine derivatives on the grounds of kinetics of thermal degradation and hammett equation	Drug decomposition kinetics, stability xxxvi part of 10 methyl derivatives-4 piperazinylpropyl phenothiazine based on thermal degradation kinetics and l' hammett equation.
3	accumulation of an intermediate in dna synthesis by hep 2 cells treated with methyl methanesulfonate	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
3	cyclization of 13beta ethyl 3 methoxy 17beta ol 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 gonatetraen 14 one and its 17 acetate derivative	Cyclization of 3 methoxy 17beta ol 8-14 sec. 1-3-5-9 gonatetraene 14-1 and its acetate derivative 17.
3	preparation of androsta 2 4 dien 17beta ol	Preparation of the androsta 2-4 diene 17beta ol androsta 4 diene 17beta.
3	metabolism of nitrosamines in vivo iv isolation of 3 hydroxy 1 nitrosopyrrolidine from rat urine after application of 1 nitrosopyrrolidine	In vivo nitrosamine metabolism iv isolation of 3 hydroxyl 1 nitrosopyrolidine from rat urine after application of 1 nitrosopyrolidine.
3	sulfamic acid cleaning solution for 4 4 methylene bisorthochloroaniline moca	Sulfamic acid for 4 methylene bisorthochloroaniline moca.
3	assay and relationship of ht 2 toxin and t 2 toxin formation in liquid culture	Analysis and Relation of Ht 2 Toxin and T2 Toxin Formation in Liquid Culture.
3	biological proton magnetic resonance and ultraviolet spectroscopic evidence for a molecular complex of actinomycin d and 10 11 dihydro 3h naphth 1 2 g indazol 7 ol	Proton nuclear magnetic resonance (HPMR) and ultraviolet (UV) spectroscopy have revealed the presence of apos; a d&apos molecular complex; actinomycin d and 10 dihydro 11h naphth 1 g; indazol 7 ol.
3	the search for new drugs in the group of xanthine derivatives xxxviii 1 3 dimethyl 8 alkyl 6h 7h 10h 1 2 4 triazepino 4 3 f purine 2 4 1h 3h diones and their derivatives	Investigating new drugs in the xanthine derivatives group xxxviii 1-3 dimethyl-8 alkyl-6h 7h 10h 10h 1h 2h 4triazepino 4h 3h 3h 3h 3h diones and their derivatives.
3	structure of the modified nucleoside q isolated from escherichia coli transfer ribonucleic acid 7 4 5 cis dihydroxy 1 cyclopenten 3 ylaminomethyl 7 deazaguanosine	Modified nucleoside structure isolated from apos; apos transfer ribonucleic acid; escherichia coli 7.4 cis dihydroxy 1 cyclopentene 3 ylaminomethyl 7 deazaguanosine.
3	hydrolysis of nucleoside phosphates iv the metal ion nucleic base interaction in the cu2 promoted dephosphorylation of the 5 di and 5 triphosphates of cytidine inosine and guanosine and their protection toward hydrolysis by coordination to cu 2 2 bipyridyl 2	L' hydrolysis of nucleoside phosphates iv, l' interaction of metal ions with nucleic bases in cu2, promotes the dephosphorylation of 5 cytidine inosine and guanosine, 5 cytidine and guanosine triphosphates and their protection against apos; hydrolysis by coordination with cu 2 bipyridyl cu.
3	dissociation of bovine 6s procarboxypeptidase a by reversible condensation with 2 3 dimethyl maleic anhydride application to the partial characterization of subunit iii	Procarboxypeptidase a dissociation from 6s cattle by reversible condensation with etapos; dimethyl maleic anhydride 2 3 applied to partial characterization of-unit iii.
3	a new parenteral cephalosporin sk f 59962 7 trifluoromethylthioacetamido 3 1 methyl 1h tetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid chemistry and structure activity relationships	A novel parenteral cephalosporin sk f 59962-7 trifluoromethylthioacetamido 3 1 h methyl 1 h tetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephalic acid 4 carboxylic acid and relationship between structure and chemistry.
3	synthesis and biological activity of pyrido 2 3 e 1 4 diazepine and of pyrido 2 3 b 1 4 diazepine	Pyrido 2 x 14 diazepine and pyrido 2 x 13 diazepine synthesis and biological activity.
3	new 2 methyldialkylammoniumalkylthio 4 p substituted phenyl 3h 1 5 benzodiazepine iodides with antibacterial activity note i	In addition, it is recommended that the drug be used in conjunction with the drug product, and that the drug product be used in conjunction with the drug product.
3	production of 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 11 gonatetraen 14beta ol 17 ones and 13beta alkyl 3 methoxy 8 14 seco 1 3 5 10 9 11 gonatetraen 17alpha ol 14 ones by microbial enzymes	Production of 13beta alkyl, 3 methoxy, 8-14 sec. 1, 3-3-5, 10-11, 11 gonatetraene, 14beta, 17s. and 13beta alkyl, 3 methoxy, 8-14 sec. 1, 3-10, 10-11 gonatetraene, 17alpha ol.
3	transformation of 2 2 anhydro 1 beta d arabinofuranosylcytosine induced by hydrogen peroxide	Transformation of 2 arabinofuranosylcytosine beta 1 anhydro by hydrogen peroxide.
3	fluorescence reactions of fluorescamine with levodopa and its derivatives fluorescence assay of 3 methoxy 4 hydroxyphenylalanine in levodopa dosage forms	Fluorescence reactions of levodopa and its 3-methoxy-4-hydroxyphenylalanine fluorescence test derivatives in levodopa dosage forms.
3	nmr investigations of proline and its derivatives 4 proton magnetic resonance parameters and structure of acetyl proline amide	The nmr spectra of proline and proline derivatives have allowed us to study proton 4 nuclear magnetic resonance parameters and the structure of l' amide of l' acetyl proline.
3	synthesis of 9 o acetyl and 4 9 di o acetyl derivatives of the methyl ester of n acetyl beta d neuraminic acid methylglycoside their use as models in periodate oxidation studies	Synthesis of the 9 o acetyl derivatives and 4 o acetyl derivatives of l' l&apos methyl ester; methylglycoside nacetyl beta-neuraminic acid is used as a model in d&apos studies; periodate oxidation.
3	the structure of n 3 phenyl 5 1 2 3 4 oxatriazolio phenylamide at 105 k	Phenylamide n-3-5-1-2-4 oxatriazolio phenylamide structure at 105 k.
3	identification of the chemical structures of schizoflavins as 7 8 dimethyl 10 2 3 4 trihydroxy 4 formylbutyl isoalloxazine and 7 8 dimethyl 10 2 3 4 trihydroxy 4 carboxybutyl isoalloxazine	The chemical structures of the schizoflavins were identified as: 7-8 dimethyl 10, 2-3-trihydroxy-4-formylbutyl isoalloxazine and 7-8-dimethyl 10, 2-3-trihydroxy-4-carboxybutyl isoalloxazine.
3	metabolism of some ethylenediamine derivatives with antiarrhythmic properties i absorption distribution in tissues and excretion of 14 c labelled n n bis 3 p methoxyphenoxy 2 hydroxypropyl ethylenediamine dimethanesulphonate mk 142 in rats	Metabolism of some l&apos derivatives; ethylenediamine with antiarrhythmic properties; tissue absorption and excretion of 14 marked c = 3 p-methoxyphenoxy-2 hydroxypropyl ethylenediamine dimethanesulfonate mk 142 in rats.
3	4 h 1 2 4 triazole derivatives with expected biological activity	It is not possible to determine the origin of the products.
3	4 h 1 2 4 triazole derivatives with expected biological activity part iv synthesis of substituted 3 4 5 triaryl 1 2 4 triazoles	It is estimated that there will be a total of 4 hours, 14 hours, 14 days, 4 hours, 4 hours, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days, 4 days.
3	studies on tocopherol derivatives v intestinal absorption of several d 1 3 4 3h2 alpha tocopheryl esters in the rat	Intestinal absorption of several 1-d, 3-h2 tocopherylated alpha esters in rats.
3	metabolism of 1 3 trifluoromethylphenyl 3 2 hydroxyethyl quinazoline 2 4 1h 3h dione h 88 i species differences in metabolism	Metabolism of 13-trifluoromethylphenyl 3-2 hydroxyethyl quinazoline 2-41 h 3 h h h 88 h specific metabolism differences.
3	synthesis and properties on some 2 4 and 5 aminopyrimidines effect of nh2 and ortho c methylation on protolytic equilibria and electronic absorption spectra	Some aminopyrimidines 4 and 5 have nh2 and c-methylation effects on the protolytic equilibria and electron absorption d&apos spectra.
3	the molecular structure of 3 methoxy 9 10 leads to 19 abeo 1 3 5 10 estratrien 17 one	The molecular structure of 3-9-methoxy-10 gives 19 13-, 5-10-abeo estratriene 17.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of new pyridine derivatives 2 6 bis diphenyl and dibenzyl hydroxymethyl piperidines	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of the new derivatives of pyridine 2,6-bisdiphenyl and dibenzylhydroxymethylpiperidines.
3	search for potential amoebicides part iv some hydrazones derivatives of 2 nitro 4 5 dimethoxybenzhydrazide and of 1 4 bis alpha o acetylhydrazino phenethyl piperazine	Look for potential amoebic agents Part iv, some hydrazones derived from 2 nitro 4-5 dimethoxybenzhydrazide and 1 bis, alpha, acetylhydrazino phenethyl piperazine.
3	chemistry of nitrosoureas decomposition of deuterated 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea	Nitrosourea chemically decomposed deuterated 13bis 2-chloroethyl 1-nitrosourea.
3	the conversion of benzo alpha pyrene 4 5 oxide into 4 hydroxybenzo alpha pyrene in the presence of polyriboguanylic acid	Transformation of benzo-alpha-pyrene-4 oxide-5 to 4 hydroxybenzo-alpha-pyrene in the presence of polyriboguanyl acid.
3	determination of 2 acetamido 2 deoxy d galactose and mechanism of formation of chromogens	Determination of 2-acetamido-2-deoxy-galactose and the mechanism of chromogen formation.
3	treatment of diabetes insipidus with 1 deamino 8 d arginine vasopressin	Deamino 8 of arginine vasopressin is a treatment for diabetes insipidus.
3	electron impact induced reactions of n6 3 methyl 2 butenyl adenosine and related cytokinins	Electrons induced reactions of n6 methyl 2-butenyladenosine and related cytokinins.
3	a search for antitumor compounds xi biologic studies antitumor properties of 19 new 9 aminoacridine and 1 or 3 nitro 9 aminoacridine derivatives	Investigation of anti-tumour compounds xi biological studies of the anti-tumour properties of 19 novel l&apos derivatives, aminoacridine 9 derivatives, and 1 or 3 l&apos derivatives; aminoacridine 9 nitro.
3	methylation analysis of glucosaminitol and glucosaminyl glucosaminitol disaccharides formation of 2 deoxy 2 n acetylacetamido glucitol derivatives	L' methylation analysis of glucosaminitol and disaccharides glucosaminyl glucosaminitol leads to the formation of 2 deoxy derivatives 2 n acetylacetamido glucitol.
3	the association of yeast phosphoglycerate kinase ec 2 7 2 3	It is not recommended that this be done on a case-by-case basis.
3	synthesis of l fucose 2 3 and 4 sulphates	Sulfate synthesis l Sulfate fucose 2-3 and 4.
3	the effect of several 2 alkyl and 4 o methylanalogs of pyridoxol on mouse liver pyridoxal kinase activity	Effect of several 2-alkyl and 4-methyl analogues of pyridoxol on hepatic mouse pyridoxal kinase activity.
3	antimetabolites produced by microorganisms xv synthesis of 2 methyl l arginine 2 methyl l ornithine and their enantiomers	Antimetabolites produced by xv microorganisms synthesize 2 methyl l-arginine 2 methyl l-ornithine and their enantiomers.
3	biotransformation of 1 4 chlorophenyl 3 3 dimethyltriazene into 3 chloro 4 hydroxyaniline intramolecular hydroxylation induced chlorine migration during a catabolic degradation of a chemical carcinogen	The biotransformation of 14 chlorophenyl 3 - dimethyltriazene to 3 chloro 4 - hydroxyaniline by intramolecular hydroxylation induces the migration of chlorine during the catabolite degradation of d&apos, a chemical carcinogen.
3	type 1 and 2 synaptic junctions differences in distribution of concanavalin a binding sites and stability of the junctional adhesion	Differences in concanavalin a distribution in type 1 and type 2 synaptic junctions and in stability of the adhesive junction.
3	synthesis and some pharmacological properties of 2 tryptophan oxytocin	Synthesis and some pharmacological properties of two different tryptophan @-@ocytocin.
3	interaction of the carcinogen 3 3 dimethyl 1 phenyltriazene with nucleic acids of various rat tissues and the effect of a protein free diet	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of a protein-free diet.
3	comparison of the products of the reaction of 7 methylbenz a anthracene 5 6 oxide and rna with those formed in 7 methylbenz a anthracene treated cells	Comparison of reaction products from 7 methylbenz to anthracene 56 and rna with those formed in 7 etapos-treated; anthracene methylbenz.
3	studies on 4 hydroperoxycyclophosphamide nsc 181815 a simple preparation method and its application for the synthesis of a new class of activated sulfur containing cyclophosphamide nsc 26271 derivatives	Studies on l' hydroperoxycyclophosphamide 4 nsc 181815 a simple preparation method and its application to the synthesis of d' a new class of cyclophosphamide-containing activated sulfur derivatives nsc 26271.
3	fragmentation of 3 oximino 4 chromanone	Three oximino-4 chromanone fragmentation.
3	synthesis of new derivatives of the 4 5 diphenyloxazole series	Synthesis of New Series 4 Derivatives @-@5 Diphenyloxazole.
3	new derivatives of 2 carboxychromanone 4 as potential antiinflammatory drugs i cis and trans beta 2 4 dihydroxybenzoylacrylic acids and their derivatives	New carboxychromanone derivatives 2-4 as potential anti-inflammatory i beta 2 cis- and trans-dihydroxybenzoylacrylic acids 4 and their derivatives.
3	spectinomycin modification i 7 epi 9 deoxy 4 r dihydrospectinomycin	Modification of spectinomycin 7 epi-9-deoxy-4 r-dihydrospectinomycin.
3	some chemical and pharmacological properties of 2 methyl 5h 1 benzopyrano 2 3 b pyrid 5 one	Some chemical and pharmacological properties of 2-methyl-5-h1 benzopyrano 2-3-b pyrid-5-h1.
3	formation of ethylenethiourea from 5 6 dihydro 3h imidazo 2 1 c 1 2 4 dithiazole 3 thione by microorganisms and reducing agents	Formation of ethylenethiourea from 5,6 dihydro 3h imidazo 2,1 c 1,24 dithiazole 3 thione by reducing agents and microorganisms.
3	reversed ester analogues of pethidine isomeric 4 acetoxy 1 2 6 trimethyl 4 phenylpiperidines	Reverse analogous esters of isomeric pethidine 4 acetoxy 1, 6, trimethyl 4 phenylpiperidines.
3	toxicity and mutagenicity of 2 4 6 trinitrotoluene and its microbial metabolites	Toxicity and Mutagenicity of 24.6 trinitrotoluene and its Microbial Metabolites.
3	hydrolysis in 2 chloro 2 deoxy nucleosides nucleotides and polynucleotides to arabinose derivatives	In addition, it can be used as a substrate for the synthesis of chloro-nucleotides.
3	alternative products in the reaction of 2 nitro 5 thiocyanatobenzoic acid with thiol groups	Alternatives to l' nitro acid-2 thiocyanatobenzoic acid 5 with thiol groups.
3	preparation of fully active ficin from ficus glabrata by covalent chromatography and characterization of its active centre by using 2 2 depyridyl disulphide as a reactivity probe	Fully active ficin preparation from ficus glabrata by covalent chromatography and active-core characterization using 2-depyridyl disulfide as a reactivity probe.
3	metabolism of 4c crufomate 4 t butyl 2 chlorophenyl methyl methylphosphoramidate by the sheep	Sheep tetabolism of crufomate 4c, 4-t-butyl 2-chlorophenyl methylphosphoramidate.
3	mass spectral characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of crufomate 4 t butyl 2 chlorophenyl methyl methylphosphoramidate metabolites	Mass spectrometric characterization of crufomate 4 t-butyl 2 chlorophenyl methylphosphoramidate glycuronide conjugates.
3	a search for new anticonvulsant compounds among 3 aryl 5 benzylidene derivatives of 2 thiohydantoin	Investigate 3 aryl benzylidene 5 derivatives of 2 thiohydantoins for new anticonvulsant compounds.
3	synthesis and rearrangements of d glucosyl esters of aspartic acid linked through the 1 or 4 carboxyl group	Synthesis and rearrangements of 1- and 4-carboxylated d glucosyl esters; aspartic acid.
3	the reaction of 7alpha 8beta dihydroxy 9beta 10beta epoxy 7 8 9 10 tetrahydrobenzo a pyrene with dna	Reaction of 7alpha 8beta dihydroxy 9beta epoxy 78,910 tetrahydrobenzo a pyrene with DNA.
3	selective n actylation of gentamicin antibiotics synthesis of 1 n acyl derivatives	N selective actylation of 1 n-acyl derivatives by gentamicin antibiotics.
3	some new congeners of the anticancer agent 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea bcnu synthesis of bifunctional analogs and water soluble derivatives and preliminary evaluation of their chemotherapeutic potential	Some new cancer-causing congeners 1-3 bis 2-chloroethyl 1-nitrosourea bcnu syntheses bifunctional analogues and water-soluble derivatives, and preliminary assessment of their chemotherapeutic potential.
3	a radioimmunoassay method for 1 beta d arabinofuranosyluracil using antibodies directed against 1 beta d arabinofuranosylcytosine	This method is based on the following criteria: (a) (b) (c) (d) (e) (e) (e) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (e) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f)) (f) (f)) (f) (f) (f) (f))) (f) (f) (f)) (f) (f) (f) (f)) (f)) (f))
3	coumarins xiv high resolution mass spectra of 3 4 disubstituted 3 4 dihydroseselins	Coumarins xiv, high-resolution mass spectra of 34 disubstituted dihydroseselines.
3	anti inflammatory and antiproteolytic properties of 1 1 naphthylacetyl 3 substituted carbamides	Naphthylacetyl-substituted carbamides 3 and 1-substituted carbamides are anti-inflammatory and anti-proteolytic properties.
3	microbial transformation of 2 4 6 trinitrotoluene and other nitroaromatic compounds	Microbial transformation of 2,4,6 trinitrotoluene and d' other compounds.
3	a new aminoglycoside antibiotic complex the seldomycins iii the structures of seldomycin factors 1 and 2	A new antibiotic amino acid complex, seldomycin iii, factor 1 and factor 2 structure of seldomycin.
3	metabolism of the pancreatic carcinogens n nitroso bis 2 oxopropyl amine and n nitroso bis 2 hydroxypropyl amine in the syrian hamster	N-nitroso bis-2-oxopropylamine and n-nitroso bis-2-hydroxypropylamine pancreatic carcinogens metabolism in Syrian hamster.
3	synthesis of 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro 2 4 dioxoquinazoline derivatives for pharmacological study	Dioquinazoline, Dioxin, Dioxin, Dioxin, Dioxin, Dioxin, Dioxin, Dioxin, Dioxin, Dioxin.
3	methylation of adenosine in strongly alkaline medium preparation and properties of o methyl derivatives of adenosine and n6 methyladenosine	Methylation of l' adenosine in a highly alkaline preparation and properties of the methylated derivatives of l' adenosine and n6 methyladenosine.
3	evaluation of 2 benzylidenecyclohexanones and 2 6 bis benzylidene cyclohexanones for antitumor and cytotoxic activity and as inhibitors of mitochondrial function in yeast metabolism studies of e 2 benzylidenecyclohexanone	Antimicrobial activity of 2-benzylidenecyclohexanones and 2-bis-benzylidene cyclohexanones as inhibitors of mitochondrial function in yeast metabolism studies of 2-benzylidenecyclohexanone.
3	hypocholesterolemic agents iii inhibition of beta hydroxy beta methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase by half acid esters of 1 4 biphenylyl pentanol	Hypocholesterolemic agents iii beta inhibition-hydroxybeta methylglutaryl coenzyme reductase by 14-pentanol biphenyl acid half-esters.
3	new compounds derivatives of methyl 2 aminoacetyl 4 5 dimethoxyphenylacetate	New compounds derived from methyl dimethoxyphenylacetate 5.
3	permanganate ion oxidations ix manganese intermediates complexes in the oxidation of 2 4 1h 3h pyrimidinediones	Complex intermediate manganese permanganate ion oxidation in apo and pyrimidinedionic 2,4-h3 h oxidation.
3	antagonists of vitamin b6 simultaneous and stepwise modification of the 2 and 4 positions	Vitamin b6 antagonists stepwise simultaneously into position 2 and 4.
3	2 carboxy 1 4 dihydro 4 oxoquinolyl oxamic acids and 2 carboxy 1 4 dihydro 4 oxobenzo h quinolyl oxamic acids as antiallergy agents	In addition to the above, there are a number of other non-allergic agents, including 2-carboxy-1,4-dihydro-4-oxoquinololyloxamines and 2-carboxy-1,4-dihydro-4-oxobenzo-hquinolyloxamines.
3	synthesis and antiinflammatory activity of some 2 substituted 4 and 7 benzoxazoleacetic and alpha methylacetic acids	Synthesis and anti-inflammatory activity of 2- and 7-substituted benzoxazoleacetic acids and alpha-methylacetic acids.
3	semisynthetic cephalosporins synthesis and structure activity relationships of analogues with 7 acyl groups derived from 2 cyanomethylthio acetic acid or 2 2 2 2 trifluoroethyl thio acetic acid and their sulfoxides and sulfones	Semipal-synthetic cephalosporin synthesis and d&apos relationships; structure activity of the analogs with 7 acyl groups derived from 2 cyanomethylthioacetic acid or 2 trifluoroethylthioacetic acid derivatives and their sulfoxides and sulfones.
3	effect of sulfur substitution for the noncarbonyl oxygen in hemicholinium 3 and acetyl seco hemicholinium 3 synthesis biological activity and structure toxicity relationships	Effect of sulfur substitution of apos; noncarbonyl oxygen in apos; hemicholinium 3 and synthesis of apos; acetyl-seco-hemicholinium 3 on apos; and biological activity and structural toxicity relationships.
3	5 11 dimethyl 2 9 bis phenylacetyl 5 11 diazatetracyclo 6 2 2 0 2 7 0 4 9 dodecane a potent novel analgesic	The diazatetracyclo, diazatetracyclo, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane, dodecane.
3	synthesis of analogues of n 2 chloroethyl n trans 4 methylcyclohexyl n nitrosourea for evaluation as anticancer agents	Synthesis d' analogues of 2-chloroethyl-4-methylcyclohexyl-nitrosourea for anti-cancer evaluation.
3	intrachain reactions of a pair of reactive groups attached to polymer ends 3 intrachain charge transfer complex on polysarcosine chains having terminal electron donor and terminal electron acceptor groups in chloroform solution	Intrachain reactions d' a polymer-bound pair of reagent groups terminate in an intrachain charge transfer complex on polysarcosine chains having donor groups d' terminal electrons and acceptor groups d' terminal electrons in solution in chloroform.
3	2 3 carbonates in the synthesis of uridine 5 deoxy and 2 5 dideoxy derivatives	In the synthesis of the uridine derivatives 5 deoxy and 25 dideoxy.
3	reaction of diazoalkanes with 1 substituted 2 4 dioxopyrimidines formation of o2 n 3 and o4 alkyl products	Reaction of diazoalkanes with 1-substituted dioxopyrimidines 4 yields alkylated o2n 3 and o4 compounds.
3	the metabolism and toxicity of halogenated carbanilides biliary metabolites of 3 4 4 trichlorocarbanilide and 3 trifluoromethyl 4 4 dichlorocarbanilide in the rat	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario K1A 0H1 Tel.: (613) 236-6163, ext.
3	2 diazo 3 3 3 trifluoropropionyl chloride reagent for photoaffinity labeling	Trifluoropropionyl chloride reagent, 2, diazo 3, 3, for photoaffinity labeling.
3	deletion of hinge region of human myeloma igg1 molecule protein lec associated with nonexpression of g1m 3 and km 1 2 allotypes a possible genetic explanation at the dna level	Removal of the hinge region of the protein molecule lec of the human igg1 myeloma associated with the non--expression of allotypes g1m 3 and km 2, a possible DNA genetic explanation.
3	synthesis of 1 4 naphthoquinones 4 aryl aroyl hydrazones of potential antimicrobial activity	Aryl aroyl hydrazones d&apos synthesis of 14 naphthoquinones; potential antimicrobial activity.
3	reaction of peptide 89 169 of bovine myelin basic protein with 2 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine	Reaction of the bovine myelin basic protein peptide 89,169 with 2 methyl 3 bromoindolenine nitrophenylsulfenyls.
3	synthesis and properties of mesoionic pyrimido 1 2 b a1pyridazine 2 4 diones and mesoionic pyridazino 2 3 a a1 s trizine 2 4 diones mesoionic analogs structurally related to fervenulin	Synthesis and properties of meso-ionic pyrimido 1-2 b a1pyridazine 2-4 diones and meso-ionic pyridazino 2-3 a1 s trizine 2-4 structurally related meso-ionic analogs to fervenulin.
3	stereochemistries of geometric isomers of 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenylvinyl phenol 4 2 bromo 1 2 diphenyylamine corrections of the literature	Stereochemistry of the geometric isomers of 4 bromo 1 and 2 diphenyl vinyl phenol 4 and 1 bromo 2 diphenyl amine corrections from the literature.
3	studies on bovine adrenal estrogen sulfotransferase iii facile synthesis of 3 phospho and 2 phosphoadenosine 5 phosphosulfate	Sulfotransferase studies of bovine adrenal estrogen iii 3 phospho and 2 phosphoadenosine 5 phosphosulfate facile synthesis.
3	ir spectroscopic characterization of 2 thiohydantoins and 2 thiobarbiturates	Infra-spectroscopic characterization of two thiohydantoines and two thiobarbiturates.
3	the isolation and identification of 2 methyl 2 4 thiazolidine dicarboxylate as a by product in the conversion of cysteine to glucose in the perfused rat liver	L' isolation and l' identification of 2-methyl @-@-2-thiazolidine 4 dicarboxylate as a by-product in cysteine to glucose conversion in perfused rat liver.
3	7 2 aminomethylphenylacetamido 3 1 carboxymethyltetrazol 5 ylthiomethyl 3 cephem 4 carboxylic acid	In this case, it is recommended that the test be carried out in the same manner as the test.
3	the reactions of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate with thiols and the holoenzyme of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase and of inorganic phosphate with the acyl holoenzyme	Reactions of glyceraldehyde phosphate 3 with thiols and l' glyceraldehyde holoenzyme 3 phosphate dehydrogenase and inorganic phosphate with l' l&apos holoenzyme; acyl.
3	the highly electrophilic character of 4 chloro 7 nitrobenzofurazan and possible consequences for its application as a protein labelling reagent	The highly electrophilic nature of nitrobenzofurazane 4 chloro 7 and its possible implications as a protein labeling reagent.
3	investigations of the reaction kinetics in the formation of 7 chloro 2n nitrosomethylamino 5 phenyl 3h 1 4 benzodiazepine 4 oxide author s transl	Study of the kinetics of the reaction in the formation of 7 chloro 2n-nitrosomethylamino-5-phenyl 3h-14-benzodiazepine 4 transl.
3	kinetics and mechanisms of hydrolysis of 1 4 benzodiazepines ii oxazepam and diazepam	Kinetics and mechanisms; hydrolysis of 14 benzodiazepines ii oxazepam, and diazepam.
3	polarographic study of new antibacterial isoxazolium salts 2 3 dialkyl 5 arylisoxazolium perchlorates	Polarographic study of d&apos perchlorates; isoxazolium 2 and 3 dialkyl 5 antibacterial arylisoxazolium.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of some new 1 1 diarylacetic acid derivatives	Synthesis and pharmacological properties of some new derivatization products 1 of l' diarylacetic acid.
3	research on nitrogen heterocyclic compounds x new method of synthesis of pyrrolo 1 2 a quinoline and its derivatives	Research on Heterocyclic Nitrogen Compounds x New Method for Synthesis of Pyrrolo 1-2 aquinoline and its Derivatives.
3	synthesis of 2 aminoisoindolin 1 ones with or without 6 substituents	Synthesis of 2 aminoisoindoline 1 with 6 substituents.
3	synthesis and pharmacological study of various 2 alkylaminoalkyl mercapto 5 aryl 1 3 4 oxadiazoles	Pharmacological studies and synthesis of a variety of 2-alkylaminoalkyl mercapto 5 aryl 1,3-oxadiazoles.
3	synthesis of 1 4 benzodiazepine and 1 5 benzodiazocine through oxidative fission of the double bond of indole derivatives	Synthesis of 14 benzodiazepine and 15 benzodiazocine by oxidative fission of l' indole double bond.
3	chemical and pharmacological research on pyran derivatives vii derivatives of naphto 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 c pyrazole and of 12h naphto 1 2 5 6 pyran 2 3 d pyrimidine	Chemical and pharmacological research on pyranic derivatives vii, derived from naphtho 1 and naphtho 2 and naphtho 3 and pyran 2 and pyrimidine 3, respectively.
3	the crystal structure of 3 hydroxy 3 isobutyl 2 pyrrolidone 5 carboxylic acid lactam of 4 hydroxy 4 isobutylglutamic acid from reseda odorata l	The crystal structure of 3 hydroxy 3 isobutyl 2-pyrrolidone 5 lactam d' 4 isobutylglutamic reseda odorata l.
3	nucleosides cvi syntheses of 1 n methyl 5 beta d ribofuranosyl uracil 1 n methyl phi uridine and its identity with a metabolite elaborated by streptomyces platensis var clarensis	The cvi nucleosides synthesize 1 n-methyl-5 beta ribofuranosyl uracil 1 n-methyl phi uridine and their identity with a metabolite developed by streptomyces platensis var clarensis.
3	synthesis and biological activities of some 7 1 2 4 oxadiazolylacetylamino cephalosporins	Seventy-four oxadiazolylacetylamino cephalosporins are synthesized and biologically active.
3	synthesis of certain 4 oxo 1 2 3 4 tetrahydroquinoline and benzazocine derivatives likely to possess analgesic activity	Synthesis of possible analgesic activity of certain tetrahydroquinoline and benzazocine derivatives.
3	effect of overheating products of wood hydrolysis on 3 4 benzpyrene output	The effects of the overheating of wood products; the hydrolysis of wood on the production of 3,4-benzpyrene.
3	metabolism of quaternary carbon compounds 2 2 dimethylheptane and tertbutylbenzene	In the case of tetrachloroethylene, the concentration of 2-butoxyethanol shall be determined by the analytical method.
3	microbiological degradation of bile acids metabolites formed from 3 3a alpha hexahydro 7a beta methyl 1 5 dioxoindan 4 alpha yl propionic acid by streptomyces rubescens	Microbiological degradation of bile acid metabolites formed from 3a alpha hexahydro 7a beta-methyl 1-5 dioxoindan 4 alpha-@ yl-propionic acid streptomyces rubescens.
3	derivatives of 2 bromo 6beta fluoropregna 1 4 diene 3 20 dione and their antiinflammatory activity	Derivatives from 2 bromo 6beta fluoropregna 1-4 diene 320 dione and their anti-@-@inflammatory activity.
3	elucidation of the structure of the antineoplastic agents 2 formylpyridine and 1 formylisoquinoline thiosemicarbazones	Structural elucidation of 2-formylpyridine and 1-formylisoquinoline-thiosemicarbazones antineoplastic agents.
3	kinetics and mechanisms of hydrolysis of 1 4 benzodiazepines iii nitrazepam	The results of this study are summarized below.
3	comparative stereochemistry in the aziridine ring openings of n methylmitomycin a and 7 methoxy 1 2 n methylaziridino mitosene	Comparison of the stereochemistry of aziridine ring apertures of methylmitomycin a and methoxy 712 n methylaziridino mitosene.
3	a proton magnetic resonance investigation on 1 1 cytidine and guanosine silver i complexes	A proton nuclear magnetic resonance study of silver guanosine 1 and cytidine i1 complexes has been carried out.
3	determination of benomyl carbendazim and 2 aminobenzimidazole 2 ab in plant materials part i apples red currants grapes kale and sugar beets	Benomyl carbendazim and 2 aminobenzimidazole 2 ab in plant material Part i of common cabbage and sugar beet red apples.
3	fluorescent probe studies of haptoglobin type 2 1	Fluorescent Probe Studies of Apos; Haptoglobin Type 2.
3	monomethylthio analogues of 1 2 4 5 trimethoxyphenyl 2 aminopropane	Monomethylthio analogous to 145, trimethoxyphenyl-2-aminopropane.
3	regulation of peroxidation of mitochondrial membrane lipids initiated by fe2 ions by antoxidants of the 1 4 dihydropyridine series in experiments in vitro	The regulation of fe2-ion initiated mitochondrial membrane lipid peroxidation by 14-series dihydropyridine anoxidants in in vitro experiments.
3	identification of 2 methyl 3 hydroxydecanoic and 2 methyl 3 hydroxytetradecanoic acids in the lipid x fraction of the bordetella pertussis endotoxin	Identification of 2 hydroxydecanoic acids methyl 3 and 2 hydroxytetradecanoic acids methyl 3 in lipid fraction x of l' bordetella pertussis endotoxin.
3	quinazolines and 1 4 benzodiazepines 81 s triazolo 4 3 a 1 4 benzodiazepines by oxidative cyclization of hydrazones	Quinazolines and 1 benzodiazepines 81 s triazolo 4-3 to 1 benzodiazepines by oxidative hydrazone cyclization.
3	2 formyl 1 4 benzodioxane preparation and reactivity	Preparation and reactivity of 1,4-formylbenzodioxanes.
3	anticonvulsant activity and selective inhibition of nad dependent oxidations by 1 4 disubstituted piperazines	Disubstituted piperazines (14) selectively inhibit nad-dependent oxidations.
3	studies related to the metabolism of ergoline drugs structure determination and spectroscopic properties of 1 6 dimethyl 12 hydroxy 10alpha ergoline derivatives	Metabolism studies of spectroscopic properties and structure determination of derivatives 1-6 dimethyl 12 hydroxy 10alpha ergoline.
3	cyclic gaba gabob analogues ii synthesis of new 2 oxo and 2 5 dioxo delta3 pyrroline derivatives	Cyclic gaba gabob ii analogs synthesize new 2oxo and 2 dioxo delta3 pyrroline derivatives.
3	cyclic hydrazides iv synthesis of 2 amino 3 4 dihydroisoquinolin 1 2h one	Cyclic hydrazides iv Synthesis of 2 amino-34-dihydroisoquinoline 1-2 h 1.
3	2 acetyl 2 methyl 1 phenyl hydrazine a frequently occuring artifact in processing biological material after ingestion of drugs containing antipyrine author s transl	This is a common artifact in the treatment of biological material following the ingestion of antipyrine-containing drugs.
3	potential biologically active agents x synthesis of 3 arylimino 2 indolinones and their 1 methyl and 1 morpholino piperidinomethyl derivatives as excystment and cysticidal agents against schizopyrenus russelli	Potential biologically active x syntheses of 3 arylimino 2 indolinones and their 1 methylated and 1 morpholino piperidinomethyl derivatives as dekysting and cysticidal agents against schizopyrenus russelli.
3	hydroxylated metabolies of r s 1 tetrahydro 2 furanyl 5 fluorouracil ftorafur in rats and rabbits	Hydroxymetabolism of rat and rabbit tetrahydro-2 furanyl-5 fluorouracil ftorafur.
3	definition of cytochrome c binding domains by chemical modification ii identification and properties of singly substituted carboxydinitrophenyl cytochromes c at lysines 8 13 22 27 39 60 72 87 and 99	Identification of the binding domains of cytochrome c by chemical modification ii Identification and properties of lysine-substituted c-carboxyldinitrophenyl cytochromes.
3	synthesis of 2 3 dinor pgfalpha metabolites	Synthesis of pgfalpha, 2-dinor metabolites.
3	synthesis of 6 1 6 tri o mesitylenesulfonyl sucrose further examination of tri o tosylsucrose and the chemistry of 3 6 1 4 3 6 trianhydrosucrose	Synthesis of 616 trio or mesitylenesulfonyl sucrose, further investigation of trio orsylsucrose and trianhydrosucrose chemistry.
3	inhibitors of bacillus subtilis dna polymerase iii 6 arylalkylamino uracils and 6 anilinouracils	Bacillus subtilis dna polymerase inhibitors 6 arylalkylamino and 6 anilineuracils.
3	anomalous chemical shifts of methyl groups of 2 4 dimethylbenzo g quinoline	Unusual methyl chemical shifts of 2,4 dimethylbenzo g quinoline.
3	imidazo 4 5 f quinolines iii antibacterial 7 methyl 9 substituted arylamino imidazo 4 5 f quinolines	Imidazo 4 quinolines 5 f iii antibacterial, 7 methyl 9 arylamino imidazo, 4 quinolines 5 f quinolines.
3	bicyclic analogs of piperazine xii 1 synthesis of 3 8 diazabicyclo 3 2 1 octanes as potential antiparkinson agents	Bicyclic analogues of piperazine xii 1 syntheses 3-8 diazabicyclo 3-2 octanes as the potential antiparkinson agents.
3	non steroid anti inflammatory agents stereoisomers of 2 4 biphenylyl 3 oxybutyric acid	Anti-non-steroidal inflammatory steroisomers of 2,4-bisphenylyl-3-oxybutyric acid.
3	synthesis and antimitotic activity of 3 and 5 halogen substituted bis 2 aminophenyl disulfides and corresponding n alkyl derivatives	Synthesis and antimitotic activity of 3- and 5-halogen-substituted aminophenyl and 3-halogen-substituted d&apos disulfides and their corresponding n-alkyl derivatives.
3	synthesis of 2 substituted derivatives of 5h 1 2 4 thiadiazolo 3 2 a 1 3 5 triazin 5 one	Synthesis of 2 5-h124-substituted thiadiazolo derivatives 3-2 to 135-triazine 5.
3	bufuralol a new beta adrenoceptor blocking agent part 1 synthesis and structure activity studies in a series of benzofuran 2 ethanolamines	Bufuralol, a novel agent for blocking beta-adrenergic receptors, has carried out synthesis and d&apos studies; structural activity of the Part 1 in a series of benzofuranes 2 ethanolamines.
3	the possible utilization of the 1 amino 1 deoxy 2 ketose compounds between amino acids and carbohydrates as foodstuff integrators	L' possible use of 1 amino 1deoxy 2 ketose amino acid and carbohydrate compounds as food integrators.
3	biopharmacological investigation of 6 6 methylene bis 2 2 4 trimethyl 1 2 dihydroquinoline mtdq a radical binding antioxidant of secondary amine type	Biopharmacological study of 6-methylene bis 2-4 trimethyl 1,2-dihydroquinoline mtdq, a secondary amine radical binding antioxidant.
3	polynitro aromatic compounds in analytical chemistry ii reaction of menadione with 2 4 dinitrophenylhydrazine	Analytical Chemistry Polynitro aromatic compounds ii Menadione reaction with 24 dinitrophenylhydrazine.
3	the effect on fungal growth of some 2 5 dihydroxy 1 4 benzoquinones	Dioxins and other biotoxins may also be present in drinking water.
3	interaction of poly 2 methyl 5 vinyl n ethylpyridinium bromide and heparin studied by means of ultraviolet and infrared spectroscopy	L' interaction between poly 2-methyl-5 vinyl n-ethylpyridinium and l' heparin was studied by infrared and ultraviolet spectroscopy.
3	interstrand cross linking of dna by 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea and other 1 2 haloethyl 1 nitrosoureas	"In the case of chloroethylene, the term ""nitrosourea"" is used to refer to the combination of chloroethylene and chloroethylene."
3	comparative electrophilicity mutagenicity dna repair induction activity and carcinogenicity of some n and o acyl derivatives of n hydroxy 2 aminoflourene	Comparison of DNA and carcinogenicity of certain n- and o-acyl derivatives of apos; mutagenicity of apos; activity of apos; induction of repair of apos; DNA and carcinogenicity of certain n- and o-acyl derivatives of apos; hydroxy-2 aminoflourene.
3	kinetics and mechanism of degradation of some 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives part vi the use of hammett equation for kinetic investigation of 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives hydrolysis	The kinetics and the degradation mechanism of some 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives, part vi llos; use of llapos; hammett equation for llapos; kinetic study of llapos; hydrolysis of 2 sulfanilamidopyrimidine derivatives.
3	on the reactivities of the tryptophan residues of human alpha lactalbumin to 2 hydroxy 5 nitrobenzyl bromide	On tryptophan residue reactivity of l' alpha human lactalbumin to d&apos bromide; hydroxy-2 nitrobenzyl.
3	evidence for bay region activation of chrysene 1 2 dihydrodiol to an ultimate carcinogen	Evidence of leprosy; activation of the chrysene bay 1-2 dihydrodiol to ultimate carcinogen.
3	preparation of derivatives of l idose and l iduronic acid from 1 2 o isopropylidene alpha d glucofuranose by way of acetylenic intermediates	Preparation of idios and idios derivatives from 1 isopropylidene alpha of glucofuranose via acetylenic intermediates.
3	some 1 2 diaminobenzene derivatives as reagents for gas chromatographic determination of selenium with an electron capture detector	Some 12 derivatives of diaminobenzene as a reagent for selenium determination by gas chromatography with a d&apos-electron capture detector.
3	the 1h nmr spectra of mixed valence complexes of copper with derivatives of 1 amino 2 2 dimethyl 2 mercaptoethane	The 1h nmr spectra of the copper mixed-valence complexes with the 1-amino derivatives @-@-2-dimethyl-@-2-mercaptoethane 2 are obtained by 1h nmr spectroscopy.
3	introduction of antigenic determining 2 4 dinitrophenyl residues into 4 thiouridine n3 3 l amino 3 carboxypropyl uridine and trna phe from e coli	Introduction of 2,4-dinitrophenyl-determining antigen in 4 thiouridine n3 l amino-3 carboxypropyl uridine and trna phe of e coli.
3	synthesis of oligonucleotides with sequences identical with or analogous to the 3 end of 16s ribosomal rna of escherichia coli preparation of m 6 2 a c c u c c and a c c u c m 4 2c via phosphotriester intermediates	Apos synthesis; oligonucleotide sequence identical or analogous to apos; 16s ribosome tip 3 of the apos preparation; 6a c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c d c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c d 2 c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c c s s s s s p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p o p p p o p o p o p o p
3	substitution reactions of a water soluble metalloporphyrin with azide and 1 1 3 3 tetramethyl 2 thiourea	Alternatives to apos; soluble metalloporphyrin; water with apos; azide; and 133 tetramethyl 2thiourea.
3	enzymic and immunochemical properties of lysozyme accurate definition of the antigenic site around the disulphide bridge 30 115 site 3 by surface simulation synthesis	Enzyme and immunochemical properties of the precise definition of antigenic site lysozyme around the disulfide bridge 30115-site 3 by surface simulation synthesis.
3	structure elucidation of butyl 6alpha fluoro 11beta hydroxy 16alpha methyl 3 20 dioxo 1 4 pregnadien 21 oate fluocortin butylester author s transl	Elucidation of the structure of butyl, 6alpha fluoro 11beta hydroxy, 16alpha methyl, 320 dioxo, 14 pregennadiene, 21 oate fluocortin butylester, transl.
3	isolation and structure determination of the metabolites of 2 1 3 dimethyl xanthinyl 7 methyl 4 methyl morpholine a xantinol derivative from rat urine author s transl	Isolation and structure determination of 2,13-dimethyl xanthinyl-7-methyl-4-morpholine metabolites xantinol derivative of rat urine.
3	sensitivity to a flame retardant tris 2 3 dibromopropyl phosphate firemaster lvt 23 p	Firemaster 2-3 dibromopropyl phosphate sensitivity 23 pt.
3	base and base sequence specificity of the binding of 4 hydroxyaminoquinoline 1 oxide to dna	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
3	oxidation products of n methyl 2 2 7 8 tetramethyl 6 amino chroman a model compound of n methyl gamma tocopheramine with potassium ferricyanide	A model compound of n-methyl gamma-tocopheramine with potassium ferricyanide is the oxidation of n-methyl 2, 7, 8, and 6 chroman.
3	rac glycerol 1 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphodiesterase a new soluble phosphodiesterase of mammalian tissues	Glycerol 1,2-cyclic phosphate 2 phosphodiesterase, a novel, soluble mammalian tissue phosphodiesterase.
3	chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds two catechol 1 2 dioxygenases from a 3 chlorobenzoate grown pseudomonad	Halogenated aromatic chemical structure and biodegradability, two catechol 12 dioxygenases d&apos, a pseudomonad grown in the presence of 3 chlorobenzoates.
3	chemical structure and biodegradability of halogenated aromatic compounds substituent effects on 1 2 dioxygenation of catechol	Chemical structure and biodegradability of aromatic halogenated compounds substituent effects on 12 catechol dioxygenation.
3	the effect of warfarin and vitamin k 1 on the carboxylation and glycosylation of prothrombin in vivo	L' effect of warfarin and vitamin k1 on prothrombin carboxylation and prothrombin glycosylation in vivo.
3	reaction of ovine prolactin with 2 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolemine	Ovine prolactin reacts with 2 nitrophenylsulfenyl-3 methyl-3 bromoindolemine.
3	synthesis and antitumor activity of halogen substituted 4 3 3 dimethyl 1 triazeno quinolines	Synthesis and Antitumour Activity of Substituted Halogens 4 3 Dimethyl 1 Triazeno Quinolines.
3	1 beta mercapto beta beta cyclopentamethylenepropionic acid 4 valine 8 d arginine vasopressin a potent and selective inhibitor of the vasopressor response to arginine vasopressin	In addition, it can be used as a selective inhibitor of the vasopressin response to l' arginine vasopressin.
3	circular dichroism investigation of the l lysine n cu ii 1 1 systems with n 4 and n 25	Study of the circular dichroism of lysine n cu 1 systems n 4 and 25.
3	synthesis and biological activities of 10 substituted benzo b 1 5 naphthyridines	Substituted 10 benzo b15 naphthyridines are synthesized and biologically active.
3	reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent formation of 2 3 dihydro 2 3 dihydroxyaflatoxin b1 from aflatoxin b1 by hepatic microsomes	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced dependent on the formation of 23 dihydro 23 dihydroxyaflatoxin b1 from l' aflatoxin b1 by liver microsomes.
3	nad p h dehydrogenase and its role in the vitamin k 2 methyl 3 phytyl 1 4 naphthaquinone dependent carboxylation reaction	Nad p-h-h-dehydrogenase and its role in the naphthaquinone-dependent carboxylation reaction of vitamin k 2 methyl 3 phytyl 14 carboxylation.
3	catabolism of 2 4 5 trimethyoxybenzoic acid and 3 methoxycrotonic acid	Twenty-four five trimethyoxybenzoic acids and three methoxycrotonic acids catabolism.
3	glucuronic acid conjugates of bilirubin ixalpha in normal bile compared with post obstructive bile transformation of the 1 o acylglucuronide into 2 3 and 4 o acylglucuronides	L&apos conjugates; bilirubin ixalpha glucuronic acid in normal bile vs. post-bile transformation-obstruction of l' acylglucuronide 1 o to acylglucuronides 2-3 and 4 o.
3	antimalarial 6 aminoquinolines vii 2 and 4 alkoxy derivatives of 6 4 diethylamino 1 methylbutylamino 5 8 dimethoxyquinoline author s transl	Antipalatean 6 vii 2 aminoquinolines and 4 alkoxy derivatives of 6 diethylamino 4 methylbutylamino 5 8 translative dimethoxyquinoline.
3	synthesis and pharmacological properties of 1 3 and 5 substituted 2 pyrrolidinones	Synthesis and Pharmacological Properties of Substituted Pyrrolidinones 1-3 and 5-2.
3	polarographic behaviour of 2 5 nitro 2 furyl 5 2 aminoethoxy pyrimidine derivatives	Polarographic behavior of 2-nitro 2-furyl-5-aminoethoxy-pyrimidine derivatives.
3	cancerostatics iii synthesis and some chemical transformations of 3 cyano 5 pyridyl 4 pyrid 2 one	Cancer Synthesis iii and Some Chemical Transformations of Cyano 3 Pyridyl 5 Pyridyl 4 Pyridine 2.
3	acylation of benzoxazolin 2 ones and 3 hydroxy 1 2 benzisoxazoles	Benzoxazoline 2-un and 3-hydroxy 2-benzisoxazoles.
3	synthesis of some 4 hydroxypiperazine and n n dibenzylhydroxylamine esters with potential local anaesthetic activity	Synthesis of some 4 potential local anesthetic dibenzylhydroxylamine and n-dibenzylhydroxylamine esters.
3	synthesis of substituted 7 hydroxy 5h 1 3 4 thiadiazolo 3 2 a pyrimidin 5 ones with anticipated antimicrobial activity	Synthesis of 7 substituted hydroxy 5:13 thiadiazolo 3:2 pyrimidin 5 with anticipated antimicrobial activity.
3	methoxylation of methyl 3alpha 7alpha dihydroxychol 4 en 24 oate and its 3beta epimer a contribution to chenodeoxycholic acid biogenesis	Methoxylation of methyl 7alpha dihydroxychol 4 to 24 oate and its epimer 3beta contributes to the biogenesis of l' chenodeoxycholic acid.
3	effect of modification on physico chemical and biological properties of haptoglobin reaction with n bromusuccinimide and 2 hydroxy 5 nitrobenzyl bromide	Effect of modification on the physicochemical properties-chemical and biological properties of the reaction of l' haptoglobin with n-bromusuccinimide and n-hydroxy-5 nitrobenzyl bromide.
3	in vitro and in vivo evaluation of the toxicity of 1 4 naphthoquinone and 1 2 naphthoquinone derivatives against trypanosoma cruzi	Toxicity of 14 naphthoquinone derivatives and 12 naphthoquinone derivatives to trypanosome cruzi was evaluated in vitro and in vivo.
3	metabolism of 5 isopropyl 1 methyl 2 nitro 1h imidazole identification of some urinary metabolites in the dog	Metabolism of 5 isopropyl, 1 methyl, 2 nitro, 1 h imidazole, identified some urinary metabolites in dogs.
3	synthesis and antiinflammatory activity of 6 11 dihydro 11 oxodibenzo b e thiepinalkanoic acids and related compounds	Synthesis and anti-inflammatory activity of 6 dihydro acids-11 thiepinalkanoic oxodibenzo b and related compounds.
3	isolation of a new lipoxygenase metabolite of arachidonic acid 8 11 12 trihydroxy 5 9 14 eicosatrienoic acid from human platelets	In addition to the above, it is recommended that the drug be used in conjunction with the drug product, and that it be used in conjunction with the drug product.
3	cross linking of ribosomal proteins by 4 6 formyl 3 3 azidophenoxy butyrimidate a heterobifunctional cleavable cross linker	Ribosomal protein cross-linking by 46 formyl-33 azidophenoxy butyrimidate a cleavable heterobifunctional cross-linking agent.
3	reaction of ortho ortho dimethylphenacyl halides with formamide formation of 4 5 ortho ortho dimethylbenzoyl imidazoles	Reaction of the ortho-dimethylphenacyl halides with the formation of formamide of 4 ortho-dimethylbenzoyl imidazoles ortho (5) with formamide.
3	bromination of 3 amino 1 2 4 benzothiadiazine 1 1 dioxide	In addition to the above substances, the following substances are considered to be carcinogenic.
3	the synthesis of methyl 3 alpha 7 alpha diacetoxy 11 oxo 5 beta cholan 24 oate	Synthesis of 7-alpha-methyl-3-alpha-diacetoxy-11-oxo-5-beta-cholan-24 oate.
3	the oxygenation of 3 methyl 3h desacetoxycephalosporin c 7beta 5 d aminadipamido 3 methylceph 3 em 4 carboxylic acid to 3 hydroxymethyl 3h desacetylcephalosporin c by 2 oxoglutarate linked dioxygenases from acremonium chrysogenum and streptomyces clavuligerus	L' Oxygenation of 3 methyl deacetoxycephalosporin c 3 h 7beta 5 d aminadipamido 3 methylceph 3 h 4 r 4 carboxylic acid 3 h deacetylcephalosporin c by 2 linked oxoglutarate dioxygenases from apos; acremonium chrysogenum and streptomyces clavuligerus.
3	the metabolic fate of 2 14c folic acid and a mixture of 2 14c and 3 5 9 3h folic acid in the rat	In addition, the metabolism of folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid, folic acid.
3	treatment of lead poisoning by 2 3 dimercaptosuccinic acid	Lead poisoning by 2-3 dimercaptosuccinic acid.
3	new cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta ketoacids i 7 beta ketoacylamino cephalosporins	New cephalosporins with 7 beta keto acid-derived acyl groups i 7 beta cephalosporins-ketoacylamino.
3	new cephalosporins with 7 acyl groups derived from beta ketoacids ii further modifications of 7 3 oxobutyrylamino cephalosporins	New cephalosporins with 7 beta ketoacid-derived acyl groups ii new modifications of 7 oxobutyrylamino cephalosporins.
3	synthesis and identification of products derived from the metabolism of the carcinostatic 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea by rat liver microsomes	Synthesis and identification of products derived from rat liver microsomal metabolism of 1,2-chloroethyl-3-trans-4-methylcyclohexyl-1-nitrosourea.
3	affinity labeling of histamine n methyltransferase by 2 3 dialdehyde derivatives of s adenosylhomocysteine and s adenosylmethionine kinetics of inactivation	Marking of apos; affinity of apos; histamine n methyltransferase by 2 dialdehyde derivatives of apos; adenosylhomocysteine and apos; kinetic adenosylmethionine of apos; inactivation.
3	improved preparation and structural elucidation of the tryptophan cleavage reagent 2 2 nitro phenylsulfenyl 3 methyl 3 bromoindolenine bnps skatole	Improvement of preparation and synthesis; structural elucidation of tryptophan 2 cleavage reagent, nitrophenylsulfenyl-3-methyl-3-bromoindolenine bnps skatole.
3	metal ion buffer interactions stability of binary and ternary complexes containing 2 amino 2 hydroxymethyl 1 3 propanediol tris and adenosine 5 triphosphate atp	Stability of metal ion buffering interactions of binary and ternary complexes containing 2 amino-2 hydroxymethyl 13 propanediol tris et l' 5 adenosine triphosphate atp.
3	synthesis of some 2 5 disubstituted anilino 3 6 dichloro 1 4 benzoquinones as antimicrobial agents	Synthesis of approximately 25 anilino 36 dichloro 14 disubstituted benzoquinones as antimicrobials.
3	synthesis of some 2 styrylquinazoline derivatives structurally related to certain chemotherapeutic agents	Synthesis of two styrylquinazoline derivatives, structurally related to certain chemotherapeutic agents.
3	reaction of trnaphe from yeast with 1 fluoro 2 4 dinitrobenzene attachment sites of the potential antigenic determining 2 4 dinitrophenyl residues	Yeast trnaphe reactivity with a d&apos site; dinitrobenzene fluoro 2-4 attachment of l' potential antigen determining 24 dinitrophenyl residues.
3	molecular structure of 1 2 chloroethyl 3 trans 4 methylcyclohexyl 1 nitrosourea	Molecular structure of 1,2-chloroethyl- 3 trans-4-methylcyclohexyl- 1-nitrosourea.
3	synthesis and antibacterial activity of isomeric 6 and 7 acetyl 3 methyl 2 quinoxalinecarbozamide 1 4 dioxides	Synthesis and antibacterial activity of isomeric dioxins 6 and 7 acetyl derivatives 3 methyl-2 quinoxalinecarbozamide 1.
3	formation of an unstable covalent intermediate during the inhibition of electric eel acetylcholinesterase with 1 3 2 dioxaphosphorinane 2 oxides	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of the ability of an organism to react with other components of the food chain.
3	crystal structure of 1 1 complex of barbital with 1 methylimidazole	Crystalline structure of 1-methylimidazole barbital complex 1.
3	cis and trans octa 1 5 dien 3 ol new attractants to the cheese mite tyrophagus putrescentiae schrank acarina acaridae idintified in trichothecium roseum fungi imperfecti	Octta 15 diene 3 new cis- and trans-infective cheese attractants; Tyrophagus putrescentiae schrank acarina idintified acarina cheese mite in trichothecium roseum imperfecti fungi.
3	gamma gamma 4 4 diamino 3 3 biphenylylenedioxy dibutyric acid dicarboxidine a safer substitute for benzidine type chromogens	Gamma gamma 4-4 diamino 3-3 biphenylylenedioxy dibutyric acid dicarboxidine, a more reliable dibutyric acid substitute for benzidine-like chromogens.
3	antiallergy agents 1 1 6 dihydro 6 oxo 2 phenylpyrimidine 5 carboxylic acids and esters	Allergic agents 1,16-dihydro-6-oxo-2-phenylpyrimidine-5-carboxylic acids and esters.
3	prodrugs of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyl adenine 2 synthesis and evaluation of a number of 2 3 and 3 5 di o acyl derivatives	Prodrogues of arabinofuranosyl adenine 9 beta 2 synthesis and evaluation of apos; a number of 23 and 3 acyl derivatives.
3	new bronchodilators synthesis and bronchodilating activity of some 3 alkoxymethyl alpha n substituted aminomethyl 4 hydroxybenzyl alcohols	The synthesis of new bronchodilators and l' bronchodilator activity of some 3 l&apos-substituted hydroxybenzyl alcohols; n aminomethyl alkoxymethyl 4 alcohols are l&apos-substituted hydroxybenzyl alcohols.
3	a laser flash photolysis study of the reactivities of the triplet states of 8 methoxypsoralen and 4 5 8 trimethylpsoralen with nucleic acid bases in solution	Reactivities of the triplet states of 8 methoxypsoralene and 4.5 trimethylpsoralene with d' nucleic acids in solution were studied by laser flash photolysis.
3	the metabolism and excretion of curcumin 1 7 bis 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenyl 1 6 heptadiene 3 5 dione in the rat	Metabolism and apo; curcumin excretion 17bis 4 hydroxy 3methoxyphenyl 1-6 heptadiene 3-5 dione in rats.
3	1 and 3 deamidino derivatives of dihydrostreptomycin and some 1 n acyl derivatives	Derivatives of dihydrostreptomycin, deamidino 1, and 3, and some 1 n-acyl derivatives.
3	chloroperoxidase catalysed oxidation of 4 chloroaniline to 4 chloronitrosobenze	Chloroperoxidase catalyzes apos; 4 chloroanilines are oxidized to 4 chloronitrosobenze.
3	structure revision of disaccharidic conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in human bile and identification of phenylazo derivatives b4 b5 and b6 as 2 3 and 4 o acylglucuronides	Structural review of disaccharide conjugates of ix alpha bilirubin in human bile and identification of phenylazo derivatives b5 and b6 as 2-3 and 4 o acylglucuronides.
3	metabolism of 14c terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine by rats and goat	Metabolism of 14c terbutryn, 2 t butylamino, 4 ethylamino, 6 methylthio s triazine by rats and goats.
3	mass spectral characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of terbutryn 2 t butylamino 4 ethylamino 6 methylthio s triazine metabolites from rats and goat	"""Mass Spectral Characterization of the glucuronide conjugates of terbutryn, 2 t-butylamino, 4 ethylamino, 6 s-triazine metabolites from rats and goats"", J. Toxicol."
3	rearranged glucuronic acid conjugates of bilirubin ix alpha in post obstructive bile structure elucidation of azopigments beta and gamma as ethyl anthranilate n glycosides derived from 2 3 and 4 o acyl glucuronides	Rearranged from the conjugates d' glucuronic acid from the alphaix bilirubin in the apos; post >-> obstruction of the bile structure of beta and gamma azopigments in the form of anthranilate glycosides d' ethyl derivatives of glucuronides 2-3 and 4.
3	the uptake of 6 methoxy 1 2 3 4 tetrahydro beta carboline and its effect on 5 hydroxytryptamine uptake and release in blood platelets	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic, such as benzene, benzene and benzene.
3	chemical and pharmaceutical research on pyran derivatives x synthesis of 1 oxo 2 alkyl 3 dialkylamino 1h naphtho 2 1b pyrans	Chemical and pharmaceutical research on pyran derivatives x synthesis of 1-oxo-2-alkyl-3-dialkylamino 1-h-naphtho-21-b-pyran.
3	antiviral action of benzo de isoquinoline 1 3 diones 5 nitro 2 2 dimethylaminoethyl and 5 nitro 2 2 1 pyrrolidine ethyl derivatives	Antiviral action of benzo isoquinoline 1-3 diones 5 nitro-2 dimethylaminoethyl and 5 nitro-221 pyrrolidine ethyl derivatives.
3	new daunorubicin analogs 3 amino 2 3 6 trideoxy alpha and beta d arabino and 3 6 diamino 2 3 6 trideoxy alpha d ribo hexopyranosides of daunomycinone	New analogs of daunorubicin 3 amino 2 trideoxy alpha and beta arabino and 3-6 diamino 3-6 trideoxy alpha ribohexopyranosides daunomycinone.
3	quinazolines and 1 4 benzodiazepines lxxxix haptens useful in benzodiazepine immunoassay development	It is recommended that the product be packaged in a manner that is consistent with that used in the manufacture of the drug.
3	the metabolism of benzyclane 1 benzyl 1 3 n n dimethylaminopropoxy cycloheptane in rat and man	Metabolism of benzyl 1,3-benzyl n-dimethylaminopropoxycycloheptan in rats and humans.
3	chemical and biological studies of 1 2 5 dihydroxy 4 methylphenyl 2 aminopropane an analogue of 6 hydroxydopamine	Chemical and biological studies of 1,25-dihydroxy-4-methylphenyl-2-aminopropane, 6-hydroxydopamine analog.
3	iso branched 2 and 3 hydroxy fatty acids as characteristic lipid constituents of some gliding bacteria	L' iso branches fatty acids 2 and 3 are hydroxylated as lipid constituents characteristic of some of the slippery bacteria.
3	analysis of some older scandinavian formulations of 2 4 dichlorophenoxy acetic acid and 2 4 5 trichlorophenoxy acetic acid for contents of chlorinated dibenzo p dioxins and dibenzofurans	Analysis of older Scandinavian formulations of 24 dichlorophenoxyacetic acids and 25 trichlorophenoxyacetic acids to determine the content of dibenzo-p-dioxins and dibenzofurans.
3	tumorigenicity of the diastereomeric benz a anthracene 3 4 diol 1 2 epoxides and the and enantiomers of benz a anthracene 3 4 dihydrodiol in newborn mice	Tumorigenic potency of benz a-diastereoisomer, anthracene 3,4 diol 1,2 epoxides, and benz a-anthracene 3,4 dihydrodiol enantiomers in novel mice,-nées.
3	conformational analogues of dopamine synthesis and pharmacological activity of e and z 2 3 4 dihydroxyphenyl cyclopropylamine hydrochlorides	Conformational analogs of dopamine and l&apos synthesis; pharmacological activity of dihydroxyphenylcyclopropylamine hydrochloride e et z.
3	synthesis of fused 1 2 6 thiadiazine 1 1 dioxides as potential transition state analogue inhibitors of xanthine oxidase and guanase	Dioxide synthesis 1-2-6 thiadiazine 11 fused as potential inhibitors of l' analogous transition state xanthine oxidase and guanase.
3	synthesis and antiestrogenic activity of 3 4 dihydro 2 4 methoxyphenyl 1 naphthalenyl 4 2 1 pyrrolidinyl ethoxy phenyl methanone methanesulfonic acid salt	Synthesis and anti-estrogenic activity of 3,4 salt; methanesulfonic dihydro 2,4 methoxyphenyl 1 naphthalenyl 4,1 pyrrolidinyl phenoxy methanone methanesulfonic.
3	antileukemic activity of derivatives of 1 2 dimethyl 3 4 bis hydroxymethyl 5 phenylpyrrole bis n methylcarbamate	Antileukemia Activity of Methyl Derivatives-2 dimethyl-3-4 bishydroxymethyl-5 phenylpyrrolebis n methylcarbamate.
3	the identification of distinctive forms of human alpha 2 macroglobulin by using the numerical relationship between trypsin binding in alpha and beta modes	Identification of distinctive forms of human macroglobulin alpha 2 using the alpha- and beta-mode numerical relationship between trypsin binding.
3	clobazam chemical aspects of the 1 4 and 1 5 benzodiazepines	Department of National Health and Welfare.
3	2 aminomethyl 2 decarboxyprostaglandin f2 alpha type analogs	Aminomethyl 2-carboxyprostaglandin f2, alpha-type analogs.
4	evidence of active transfer of certain non electrolytes across the human red cell membrane	In addition, it was found to be an active transfer of some non--electrolytes through the human erythrocyte membrane.
4	the adsorption of proteins on erythrocytes treated with tannic acid and subsequent hemagglutination by antiprotein sera	L' protein adsorption on apo-treated erythrocytes; tannic acid and l' subsequent hemagglutination with antiprotein sera.
4	a microspectrophotometric study of red cell nuclei during pyknosis	A microspectrophotometric study of the nuclei of red blood cells during pyknosis.
4	the tonicity volume relations for systems containing human red cells and the chlorides of monovalent cations	Tonicity volume relationships for human red cell and monovalent cation chloride systems.
4	the tonicity volume relations for human red cells subjected to the action of heat with special reference to prolytic k loss	The volume of tonicity relationships for human red blood cells subjected to heat action with a special reference to prolyte loss of k.
4	age as effecting the osmotic and mechanical fragility of dog erythrocytes tagged with radioactive iron	It is not possible to determine the age of a dog's erythrocyte by the presence of a radioactive iron.
4	active transport into the human erythrocyte evidence from comparative kinetics and competition among monosaccharides	Active transport in human erythrocytes was demonstrated by monosaccharide competition and comparative kinetics.
4	diffractometric measurements of the tonicity volume relations of human red cells in hypotonic systems	Diffractometric measurements of human blood cell volume relationships in hypotonic systems.
4	cation exchange in mammalian erythrocytes iii the prolytic effect of x rays on human cells	It is important to note that the effects of X-rays on human cells are not always clear.
4	electron microscope study of red cell membranes after experimental infection with the virus of foot and mouth disease	Electron microscopic (EM) studies of erythrocyte membranes following experimental FMD infection.
4	accumulation of potassium by human red cells	Human red blood cell potassium accumulation.
4	permeability properties of erythrocyte ghosts	Erythrocyte ghosts permeability properties.
4	an analytical study of in vivo survival of limited populations of animal red blood cells tagged with radio iron	An analytical study of the in vivo survival of low-level radioactive iron-labeled (IRL) erythrocyte populations.
4	the sorption of influenza virus by chicken erythrocytes	Influenza virus sorption by chicken erythrocytes.
4	quantitative aspects of the spontaneous elution of influenza virus from red cells	In addition, there are a number of other diseases, such as diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, and diabetes.
4	the incorporation of n15 glycine by avian erythrocytes and reticulocytes in vitro	L' incorporation of glycine n15 into avian reticulocytes and erythrocytes in vitro.
4	the specific heat of red cells with special reference to the paracrystalline rat red cell	Specific heat from red blood cells, particularly paracrystalline red blood cells.
4	volume changes ion exchanges and fragilities of human red cells in solutions of the chlorides of the alkaline earths	Volume alters human red blood cell ion exchange and fragility in alkaline chloride solutions.
4	the specific heat and the heat of compression of human red cells sickled red cells and paracrystalline rat red cells	The specific heat and compressive heat of human red blood cells was found to damage the red and red blood cells of paracrystalline rats.
4	serological behaviour of influenza viruses i the effect of different fowl erythrocytes on the results of serological tests	HIV serological behaviour; influenza infection; effect of different erythrocytes; birds on serological test results.
4	a method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes i description of method	Procedure for the coupling of protein antigens to erythrocytes.
4	a method for coupling protein antigens to erythrocytes ii use of the method in the diagnosis of tuberculosis	Method of Protein Antigen Coupling to Erythrocytes ii use of the method in TB diagnosis.
4	the variation in the corpuscular hemoglobin concentration in the human red cell as measured by densitometry	The variation of the concentration of d' hemoglobin corpuscular in human red blood cells measured by means of a densitometric method.
4	entrance of water into human red cells under an osmotic pressure gradient	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
4	the rate of exchange of tritiated water across the human red cell membrane	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
4	uphill transport induced by counterflow	It is also an in-transport device; however, it is an in-transport device.
4	the birefringence of the human red cell ghosts	Human red cell ghost birefringence.
4	iron particles in normal erythroblasts and normal and pathological erythrocytes	Iron particles in normal erythroblasts and in erythrocytes, both normal and pathological.
4	effect of antibody and complement on permeability control in ascites tumor cells and erythrocytes	Effect of the antibody and the complement on the control of permeability in ascitic tumor cells and erythrocytes.
4	studies on the hemolysis of red blood cells by mumps virus iv quantitative study of changes in red blood cell lipides and of virus lipides	Apos studies; red blood cell hemolysis by mumps virus iv Quantitative study of changes in viral red cell and viral lipid lipids.
4	physiological characteristics of human red blood cell ghosts	Physiological Characteristics of Human Red Blood Ghost.
4	the rate of uptake of carbon monoxide and of nitric oxide by normal human erythrocytes and experimentally produced spherocytes	Absorption of carbon monoxide and nitrogen by experimentally produced human erythrocytes and spherocytes.
4	studies in histochemistry lvii determination of the total dry mass of human erythrocytes by interference microscopy and x ray microradiography	Histochemical studies Lvii determination of total human erythrocyte dry mass by interference microscopy and X-ray microradiography.
4	determination of equivalent pore radius for human red cells by osmotic pressure measurement	Determination of the equivalent interstitial radius for the human red blood cell by measurement of osmotic pressure.
4	efflux and influx of erythrocyte water	Episodes can be found in a variety of tissues.
4	selective phagocytosis of nucleated erythrocytes by cytotoxic amebae in cell culture	Selective phagocytosis of cell cultured cytotoxic amoebae nucleated erythrocytes.
4	efflux of red cell water into buffered hypertonic solutions	Dapos efflux; erythrocyte water in buffered hypertonic.
4	hereditary elliptocytosis in two maltese families	Two Maltese families have hereditary Elliptocytosis.
4	the cation content of phospholipides from swine erythrocytes	Pig erythrocyte phospholipid cation content.
4	the entrance of water into beef and dog red cells	It is important to keep in mind that this is a very important source of information.
4	the electrophoretic velocity of human red cells of their ghosts and mechanically produced fragments and of certain lipid complexes	The electrophoretic velocity of the human red blood cells of their mechanically produced phantoms and fragments and some lipid complexes.
4	a d like antigen in rhesus red blood cells and in rh positive and rh negative red cells	A rhesus-like antigen in red blood cells and rh-positive and rh-negative red blood cells.
4	a critical evaluation of red cell and plasma volume techniques in patients with burns	A Critical Evaluation of Globular and Plasma Volume Techniques in Burn Patients.
4	inhibition of red cell sequestration by cortisone	L' red blood cell sequestration inhibition by cortisone.
4	shape and volume changes in frog erythrocytes following ultraviolet radiation	The amount of radiation absorbed by a frog's erythrocyte varies with the amount of UV radiation.
4	structure in nucleated erythrocytes	Nucleated erythrocyte structure.
4	the physics of blood flow in capillaries iii the pressure required to deform erythrocytes in acid citrate dextrose	Capillary blood flow physics iii pressure required to deform erythrocytes in acid citrate dextrose.
4	effects of silicate polymers on erythrocytes in presence and absence of complement	Effect of silicates on erythrocytes in the presence and in the absence of a specific complement.
4	the surface of the washed human erythrocyte as a polyanion	Surface of the polyanion-washed human erythrocyte.
4	an electron microscopic study of erythrophagocytosis	Electron microscopy of erythrophagocytosis.
4	the apparent molecular weight of myelin forms prepared from normal red cells and some of its variations	Myelin's apparent molecular weight is formed from normal red blood cells and some of their variations.
4	extracellular and metabolic factors affecting the efflux and influx of erythrocyte water	Efficacy of chlorinated organic compounds in drinking water.
4	observations on the development of erythrocytes in mammalian fetal liver	Observations on erythrocyte development in the fetal liver of mammals.
4	new genetically determined molecular form of erythrocyte esterase in man	A new molecular form genetically determined from the erythrocyte esterase in humans.
4	the influence of ph and ionic strength on the electrokinetic stability of the human erythrocyte membrane	L' influence ph and ionic strength on electrokinetic stability of human erythrocyte membrane.
4	the viscosity of erythrocyte suspensions a review of theory	The viscosity of the suspensions of epos; erythrocytes is a review of the theory.
4	erythrocyte automosaicism in some persons of known genotype	Erythrocyte self-complexity in known genotype individuals.
4	the life span of erythrocytes in iron deficiency anaemia	It is important to note that the duration of erythrocyte life in cases of iron deficiency anemia is unknown.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and detoxification of hydrogen peroxide in human erythrocytes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
4	variations in the lactic dehydrogenase of vertebrate erythrocytes	Variations in vertebrate Erythrocyte Lactic Dehydrogenase.
4	preparation of an inhibitor of viral hemagglutination from human erythrocytes	It is recommended that patients be tested for hemoglobin and hemoglobin.
4	lactic dehydrogenase genetic control in man	Genetic Control of Lactic Dehydrogenase in Men.
4	erythrocyte acid phosphomonesterase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in caucasians	Erythrocyte acid phosphomonesterase and glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiencies in caucasians.
4	studies on the mode of action of excess of vitamin a vii changes in the fine structure of erythrocytes during haemolysis by vitamin a	Erythrocyte fine structure changes during apo placentae; vitamin ai hemolysis; vitamin ai supplementation.
4	the variation in the structure of erythrocyte nuclei with fixation	Structural variation of fixed erythrocyte rings.
4	mechanical properties of the red cell membrane i membrane stiffness and intracellular pressure	Mechanical properties of i-membrane rigidity of red cells and intracellular pressure.
4	interaction of mercury with human erythrocytes	Human erythrocyte interaction.
4	reversible agglomeraton used to remove dimethylsulfoxide from large volumes of frozen blood	Reversible agglomeraton used to remove dimethyl sulfoxide from large frozen blood volumes.
4	the action of enzymes from clostridium tertium on the i antigenic determinant of human erythrocytes	L' action of tertial clostridium enzymes on human erythrocyte antigenic determinant i.
4	studies on lysosomes iii the effects of streptolysins o and s on the release of acid hydrolases from a granular fraction of rabbit liver	Lysosome studies, effects of streptolysins o and s on acidic d&apos hydrolase release, a granular fraction of rabbit liver.
4	motion picture studies on degranulation of horse eosinophils during phagocytosis	Cinematographic studies of phagocytosis in horse eosinophils.
4	relationship of erythrocyte to leukocyte antigens in chickens	Relationship between chicken erythrocyte and leukocyte antigens.
4	reticulocyte release factor	Reticulocyte-release factor.
4	the estimation of red cell volume with 51cr labelled erythrocytes and plasma volume with radioiodinated human serum albumin	Estimation of the volume of red blood cells with erythrocytes labeled at 51cr and of the volume of plasma with l' human serum albumin radioiodinated.
4	chromosome fibers from an interphase nucleus	An interphase nucleus.
4	the thalassaemia trait in an english family	The trait of thalassemia in the English family.
4	thalassaemia in scots	Scots have Thalassemia.
4	the chemical constitution of compounds which protect erythrocytes against freezing damage	The chemical composition of the compounds that protect the erythrocytes from damage caused by freezing.
4	phase separation in suspensions flowing through bifurcations a simplified hemodynamic model	Phase separation in the suspensions circulating through the bifurcations of a simplified hemodynamic model.
4	the assay of galactokinase and galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase activity in human erythrocytes a presumed test for heterozygous carriers of the galactosemic defect	It is assumed that the human erythrocyte test is a test of galactokinase and galactose 1 phosphate uridyltransferase activity in heterozygous carriers of the galactosemic defect.
4	phospholipid sugar complexes in relation to cell membrane monosaccharide transport	Phospholipid sugar complexes related to cellular membrane monosaccharide transport.
4	hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin i kinetics of the lytic reaction	Rabbit erythrocyte hemolysis by purified staphylococcal alpha-I toxin from the lytic reaction.
4	hemolysis of rabbit erythrocytes by purified staphylococcal alpha toxin ii effects of inhibitors on the hemolytic sequence	Rabbit erythrocyte hemolysis by purified alpha-staphylococcal toxin ii inhibitors effects on hemolytic sequence.
4	erythrocytes 5 adenylic acid deaminase requirement for ammonia or monovalent metal ion	Erythrocytes 5 Erythrocytes Erythrocytes; Erythrocytes; Erythrocytes; Erythrocytes; Erythrocytes; Erythrocytes; Erythrocytes.
4	angiotensinase with a high degree of specificity in plasma and red cells	Very specific angiotensinase in red blood cell and plasma.
4	actinomycin d effect on the immune response	It's not the same thing as an antibody.
4	urea apparent carrier mediated transport by facilitated diffusion in dogfish erythrocytes	L' urea, an apparent transporter, facilitated transport through dogfish erythrocytes.
4	galactosidase action on human blood group b active escherichia coli and on red cell substances	Galactosidase action on erythrocytes and active Escherichia coli human blood type b.
4	kinetics of water loss from cells at subzero temperatures and the likelihood of intracellular freezing	The kinetics of cell water loss at temperatures below zero and the probability of freezing in the cell.
4	phagocytosis in normal and anaemic blood	Phagocytosis in normal, anemic blood.
4	application of a localized hemolysin reaction for specific detection of individual antibody forming cells	For the purposes of this document, the term hemolysin is used to refer to an individual cell-based antibody reaction.
4	erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in caucasians new inherited variant	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from Caucasian erythrocytes was found to be a novel heritable variant.
4	sulfate transport in human red cells inhibition by some uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation	Sulfate transport in human erythrocytes is inhibited by certain oxidative phosphorylation uncouplers.
4	acid phosphatases of human red cells predicted phenotype conforms to a genetic hypothesis	Predicted human erythrocyte acid phosphatases are consistent with a genetic hypothesis.
4	inhibition of specific binding of antibody to the rho d factor of red cells in antibody excess	Specific binding inhibition of apos; rho d-cell antibody in the apos; excess apos; antibodies.
4	two cases of thrombohaemolytic thrombocytopenic purpura associated with changes in red cell morphology	Two cases of thrombohemolytic thrombocytopenic purpura associated with changes in the morphology of red blood cells.
4	measurements of some cellular changes during the fixation of amphibian erythrocytes with osmium tetroxide solutions	Measurement of certain cellular changes during erythrocyte fixation; amphibians with tetroxide solutions; osmium.
4	antiserum to leucocyte lysosomes its cytotoxic granulolytic and hemolytic activities	Leukocyte lysosome antiserum, its granulolytic and cytotoxic hemolytic activities.
4	water permeability of the fetal erythrocyte	L'permeability à l'apos; eau des erythrocytes fetales.
4	estimation of the life span of red blood cells	Red blood cell life expectancy estimated.
4	the occurrence and possible significance of haemoglobin in the chromosomal regions of mature erythrocyte nuclei of the newt triturus cristatus cristatus	The presence and possible importance of hemoglobin in the chromosomal regions of the nuclei of mature erythrocytes of the triturus cristatus cristatus in the triturus triturus cristatus.
4	the role of temperate bacteriophage in the production of erythrogenic toxin by group a streptococci	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	preservation of antigen coated sheep erythrocytes by freezing for use in indirect hemagglutination procedure	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of hemagglutination.
4	a rapid micro method for recording red cell osmotic fragility by continuous decrease of salt concentration	A micro@-@ rapid method to record the osmotic fragility of red blood cells through a continuous saline decrease.
4	histone and dna in isolated nuclei from chicken brain liver and erythrocytes	L' histone et l' DNA in nuclei isolated from chicken liver and from chicken erythrocytes.
4	a micro gel precipitin reaction for hashimoto s thyroiditis	A microgel-precipitin reaction for thyroiditis hashimoto s.
4	inherited variant of erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase in micronesians from guam and saipan	Erythrocyte micronesian carbonic anhydrase from guam and saipan.
4	osmotic properties of human red cells	Human red blood cell osmotic properties.
4	uric acid transport system apparent absence in erythrocytes of the dalmatian coach hound	The uric acid – lapos transport system appears to be absent in the dalmatian dog's erythrocytes.
4	human erythrocyte lactate dehydrogenase 4 genetically determined variants	Genetically determined lactate dehydrogenase variants 4 of human erythrocyte.
4	mosaic hemoglobin types in a pair of cattle twins	Typical mosaic hemoglobin in a twin bovine pair.
4	staphylococcal alpha hemolysin detection on the erythrocyte membrane by immunofluorescence	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent of infection in humans.
4	function of the reticuloendothelial system i a study on the phenomenon of carbon clearance inhibition	Function of the reticuloendothelial system: inhibition of carbon clearance.
4	the measurement of antibody in human malaria by a formolized tanned sheep cell haemagglutination test	Antibody testing in human malaria using a formalized sheep hemagglutination test.
4	observations on the resistance in hb e thalassaemia disease to induced infection with plasmodium vivax	Observations on plasmodium vivax-induced resistance of thalassemia to apos.
4	oxime reactivation of erythrocyte cholinesterase inhibited by ethyl p nitrophenyl ethylphosphonate	Erythrocyte cholinesterase inhibited ethylene p-nitrophenyl ethylphosphonate.
4	studies on the oxidation reduction systems of the erythrocyte	Erythrocyte oxidation studies.
4	active transport and enzymes of the erythrocyte membrane under protein deprivation	Erythrocyte membrane enzymes and active transport are protein-deprived.
4	iron kinetics and erythron development	The kinetics of iron and the development of iron erythrons.
4	m ssbauer effect in hemoglobin and some iron containing biological compounds	A substance that has been found to be carcinogenic to humans.
4	the laser as a potential tool for cell research	Laser as a potential cell research tool.
4	the nature of bands in parasitized bovine erythrocytes	Erythrocytes of infected cattle are banded.
4	the distribution of parenteral iron haematinics in nonpregnant pregnant and lactating rats	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	sex linkage of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in the horse and donkey	Sexual Link of Glucose 6 Phosphate Dehydrogenase in Horse and Moose.
4	enzymatic release of folate activity from the red cells in megaloblastic anaemia of pregnancy	Enzymatic release of apos; folate activity by red blood cells; pregnancy megaloblastic anemia.
4	sex linkage of erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in two species of wild hares	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Public Health Agency of Canada.
4	nucleoside phosphatases of fetal and maternal blood cells electron microscope study	Nucleoside phosphatases from maternal and fetal blood cells were examined by electron microscopy.
4	complement fixation on cell surfaces by 19s and 7s antibodies	Fixation of the complement to the cell surface by the antibodies 19s and 7s.
4	electronic separation of biological cells by volume	Electron Separation of Biological Cells by Volume.
4	erythrocyte sensitization by blood group specific bacterial antigens	Sensitization of erythrocytes to blood-group-specific bacterial antigens.
4	the intracellular localization of heme by a fluorescence technique	The localization of l&apos intracellularly is achieved by means of a technique of fluorescence.
4	the cell generation cycle of the eleven day mouse embryo	The Cell Generation Cycle of the Eleven-Day Mouse Embryo.
4	an investigation by electron microscopy of the nucleoside phosphatase activity of amphibian and mammalian erythrocytes	An electron microscopic study of nucleoside phosphatase activity in erythrocyte amphibians and mammals.
4	polymorphism of human lactate dehydrogenase isozymes	Human lactate dehydrogenase isozyme polymorphism.
4	electrophoresis of hemoglobin in single erythrocytes	Lapses; simple erythrocyte hemoglobin.
4	method of assay of red cell folate activity and the value of the assay as a test for folate deficiency	It is not possible to determine the cause of folate deficiency, but it is important to determine the cause of folate deficiency.
4	structural aspects of human erythrocyte autoantibodies i l chain types and electrophoretic dispersion	Structural Aspects of Auto-Human Erythrocyte Antibody, Chain Types and Electrophoretic Dispersal.
4	bilirubin acute effects in newborn rhesus monkeys	Acute Effects of Bilirubin in Newborn Rhesus Monkeys @-@.
4	hemolysin of mycoplasma pneumoniae tentative identification as a peroxide	Mycoplasma pneumoniae hemolysin, tentatively identified as peroxide.
4	the state of hemoglobin in sickled erythrocytes	Lapos; condition; falsified erythrocyte hemoglobin.
4	purification of staphylococcal beta hemolysin and its action on staphylococcal and streptococcal cell walls	The purification of l' hemolysin beta from staphylococcus and its action on the cell walls of staphylococcus and streptococcus.
4	nicotinamide nucleotides in the erythrocytes of patients suffering from pellagra	Nicotinamide nucleotides in pellagra patients' erythrocytes.
4	the effect of lead on the fragility of the red cell incubated in vitro	Lead effect on fragility of red blood cells incubated in vitro.
4	mechanical properties of the red cell membrane ii viscoelastic breakdown of the membrane	Mechanical Erythrocyte Membrane Properties ii viscoelastic degradation of the membrane.
4	an antibody against stored blood associated with cirrhosis of the liver and false positive serological tests for syphilis	An anti-preserved blood antibody associated with liver cirrhosis and false-positive syphilis serology.
4	blood flow in the microvasculature of the conjunctiva of man	Blood flow in the men's conjunctiva microvasculature.
4	the kinetics of inhibition of erythrocyte cholinesterase by monomethylcarbamates	Apos kinetics; erythrocyte cholinesterase inhibition by monomethylcarbamates.
4	plasma membranes phospholipid and sterol content	Plasma membrane content of phospholipids and sterols.
4	immune lysis of normal human and paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria pnh red blood cells 3 the membrane defects caused by complement lysis	Immune lysis of the apos; normal human nocturnal hemoglobinuria and paroxysmal erythrocytes pnh 3 complementary lysis membrane defects.
4	protein conformations in the plasma membrane	Plasma membrane protein conformations.
4	competition of haptens	Hapthenes competition.
4	congenital non spherocytic hemolytic anemia	Congenital non-spherocytic hemolytic anemia.
4	antibodies affecting metabolism of chicken erythrocytes examination of schizophrenic and other subjects	Antimicrobial Resistance in Chicken Erythrocyte Metabolism Antimicrobial Resistance in Chicken Erythrocytes.
4	the effect of size of red cells on the kinetics of their oxygen uptake	The effect of red blood cell size on the kinetics of red blood cell oxygen consumption.
4	homoreactant a naturally occurring autoantibody in rabbits	Auto-natural antibodies in rabbits.
4	separation and properties of a red cell sensitizing substance from streptococci	Separation and Dapos properties; a substance that sensitizes streptococci's red blood cells.
4	nature of a red cell sensitizing substance from streptococci	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
4	serological studies of types a b and e botulinal toxins by passive hemagglutination and bentonite flocculation	Serological Studies of Botulinum Toxins a b and e by Passive Hemagglutination and Bentonite Flocculation.
4	heterogenetic antigens of gram positive bacteria	Heterogenetic antigen-positive gram-positive bacteria.
4	a colorimetric micro method for the determination of glutathione	A micro-@-@ glutathione determination colorimetric method.
4	effect of oxidized glutathione on some enzymes of erythrocytes and its relation to erythrocytic enzyme activity and electrophoretic mobility	Oxidized glutathione effect on certain erythrocyte enzymes and its relationship to l' erythrocyte enzyme activity and electrophoretic mobility.
4	the nature of transcapillary exchange in the liver	The nature of liver transcapillary exchange.
4	the mode of inhibition by calcium of cell membrane adenosine triphosphatase activity	The Ca2+-inhibited Mode; Cellular Membrane-bound Adenosine Triphosphatase Activity.
4	plasma trapping in the centrifuged red cells of children with severe thalassaemia	Plasma trapping in centrifuged children's centrifuged red blood cells with severe thalassemia.
4	transient holes in the erythrocyte membrane during hypotonic hemolysis and stable holes in the membrane after lysis by saponin and lysolecithin	Erythrocyte membrane transient holes during apos; hypotonic hemolysis and membrane stable holes after saponin and lysolecithin lysis.
4	heme stimulation of globin synthesis in a cell free system	Hemic stimulation of the synthesis of globins in a free cell-free system.
4	control of haem synthesis by feedback inhibition on human erythrocyte delta aminolaevulate dehydratase	Control of human erythrocyte dehydratase hematoma synthesis delta aminolaevulate.
4	antibody synthesis at the cellular level antibody induced suppression of 7s antibody synthesis	The synthesis of antibodies at the cellular level resulted in the suppression of the synthesis of 7s antibodies.
4	the production of erythrocyte autoantibodies in chimpanzees	Erythrocyte antibody production in chimpanzees.
4	the mechanism of tolerance produced in rats to sheep erythrocytes i plaque forming cell and antibody response to single and multiple injections of antigen	The mechanism of tolerance in rats to cell-forming plaque erythrocytes and antibody responses to single and multiple antigen injections.
4	the mechanism of tolerance produced in rats to sheep erythrocytes ii the plaque forming cell and antibody response to multiple injections of antigen begun at birth	The mechanism of tolerance in the rat to sheep erythrocytes ii plaque-forming cells and antibody responses to multiple antigen injections of sheep erythrocytes began at birth.
4	cimulative hemagglutination by mycoplasma pneumoniae and other agglutinins	Hemagglutination cimulative by the mycoplasm of pneumoniae and d' other agglutinins.
4	the fine structure of plasmodium falciparum and its host erythrocytes in natural malarial infections in man	The fine structure of the host plasmodium falciparum and its erythrocytes in natural malaria infections in men.
4	studies of cellular proliferation in human leukemia i estimation of growth rates of leukemic and normal hematopoietic cells in two adults with acute leukemia given single injections of tritiated thymidine	Cell proliferation studies in human leukemia he estimation of normal and leukemic hematopoietic cell growth rates in two acute leukemia adults who received single injections of tritiated thymidine.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in erythrocytes of experimental animals	L' glucose 6 - phosphate dehydrogenase activity in erythrocytes of laboratory animals.
4	skin grafts delayed rejection between pairs of cattle twins showing erythrocyte chimerism	Rejection between pairs of bovine twins exhibiting erythrocyte chimerism was delayed by skin grafts.
4	anaphylatoxin in its relation to the complement system	Anaphylatoxin related to the complementary system.
4	autoxidation as a cause of altered lipid distribution in extracts from human red cells	It is not possible to determine the origin of the product, but it is possible to determine the origin of the product.
4	microincision of sickled erythrocytes by a laser beam	Microincision of laser-deformed erythrocytes.
4	glutathione reductase in red blood cells variant associated with gout	Glutathione reductase (GSH) in erythrocytes is a gout-associated variant.
4	light chain heterogeneity of cold agglutinins	Heterogeneity of the light chains of the cold agglutinins.
4	the inhibitory effect of heme on heme formation in vivo possible mechanism for the regulation of hemoglobin synthesis	The inhibitory effect of apos; heme on the formation of apos; heme in vivo could be a mechanism regulating the synthesis of apos; hemoglobin.
4	erythrocyte abnormality in human myopathy	Human myopathic erythrocyte anomaly.
4	metabolism of doubly labeled chylomicron cholesteryl esters in the rat	Metabolism of double-labeled chylomicron-cholesteryl esters in rats.
4	heterophile reactive antigen in infectious mononucleosis	A reactive, heterophilic antigen in the infectious mononucleosis.
4	hydroxyethyl starch extracellular cryophylactic agent for erythrocytes	Extracellular d&apos cryophylactic agent; erythrocyte hydroxyethyl starch.
4	globin composition and synthesis of hemoglobins in developing fetal mice erythroid cells	Compilation of globins and hemoglobin synthesis in erythroid cells of developing fetal mice.
4	red cell slip at a wall in vitro	Red cell wall slip in vitro.
4	studies on the nonspecific depression of the immune response	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
4	hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes association of type ii with fetal hemoglobin	Hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes, type ii association with l'apos; fetal hemoglobin.
4	adjuvant activity of erythrocyte isoantigens	Erythrocyte isoantigen adjuvant activity.
4	malaria infection plasmodium iophurae changes in free amino acids	Infection palustre plasmodium iophurae free amino acid changes.
4	peroxidative hemolysis of red blood cells from patients with abetalipoproteinemia acanthocytosis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases, such as diabetes mellitus, diabetes mellitus and diabetes mellitus.
4	quantitative determination of the neutral glycosyl ceramides in human blood	Quantitative determination of neutral human glycosyl ceramides.
4	composition of phospholipids and of phospholipid fatty acids and aldehydes in human red cells	Phospholipid, phospholipid fatty acid and aldehyde composition in human red blood cells.
4	the production of carbon monoxide from hemoglobin in vivo	Carbon Monoxide Production from Hemoglobin in Vivo.
4	fixed charge in the cell membrane	Fixed cellular membrane charge.
4	the volume of vascular compartment in rat hind limb muscles	Vascular compartment volume in rat hindlimb muscles.
4	erythrocyte transfer rna change during chick development	Changes in the transfer of erythrocytes during the development of the chicks.
4	the diffraction pattern of dry blood smears	Dry blood smear diffraction pattern.
4	serum red cell interactions at low ionic strength erythrocyte complement coating and hemolysis of paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria cells	Low ionic serum erythrocyte interactions complete coating and apos; nocturnal hemoglobinuria; paroxysmal hemolysis.
4	fatty acid transport and incorporation into human erythrocytes in vitro	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of fatty acids.
4	distribution of chylomicrons and albumin in dog kidney	Chylomicrons and albumin distribution in dog kidney.
4	erythrocyte energy metabolism in hereditary spherocytosis	Hereditary spherocytosis energetic metabolism of erythrocytes.
4	surface area of human erythrocyte lipids reinvestigation of experiments on plasma membrane	Human erythrocyte lipid surface reexamines plasma membrane experiments.
4	chains of particles in shear flow	Apos chain particle chains; apos shear flow; avalanche flow; air.
4	red cells and rouleaux in shear flow	We got red blood cells and rollers in a shear flow.
4	the influence of antibodies on immunologic responses i the effect on the response to particulate antigen in the rabbit	It is important to note that the effects of the antibody on the immune responses of rabbits are very small, and the effects of the antibody on the immune response are small.
4	the immune response to sheep erythrocytes in the mouse i a study of the immunological events utilizing the plaque technique	The Immune Response to Sheep Erythrocytes in mice i an immunological event study using the plaque technique.
4	relationships of x irradiation to the enhancement of candida albicans infections	Infectious diseases, such as diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, and other diseases.
4	effect of ph on inhibition and spontaneous reactivation of acetylcholinesterase treated with esters of phosphorus acids and of carbamic acids	Effect of ph on apos; inhibition and spontaneous reactivation of apos; acetylcholinesterase activity treated with d*apos esters; phosphorous and d*apos acids; carbamic acids.
4	studies on pneumonia virus of mice pvm in cell culture ii structure and morphogenesis of the virus particle	Pneumonia Virus Studies of Pvm Mice in Cell Culture ii Viral Particle Structure and Morphogenesis.
4	the influence of erythrophagocytosis on the interaction of macrophages and salmonella in vitro	Erythrophagocytosis influence on apos; macrophage-salmonella interaction in vitro.
4	the effect of prefixation on the diameter of chromosome fibers isolated by the langmuir trough critical point method	L' diameter-prefixation effect on isolated chromosomal fibers by the Langmuir depression critical point method.
4	pinocytotic response of circulating erythrocytes to specific blood grouping antibodies	Pineocytotic reaction of circulating erythrocytes to blood-group specific antibodies.
4	the ultrastructural basis of capillary permeability studied with peroxidase as a tracer	The ultrastructural basis of the permeability of the capillary was studied using peroxidase as a tracer.
4	the mechanism of denucleation in circulating erythroblasts	The denucleation mechanism in the circulating erythroblasts.
4	three cases of hemolytic anemia with erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency in alberta	Three cases of erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency hemolytic anemia in Alberta.
4	studies of paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria erythrocytes increased lysis and lipid peroxide formation by hydrogen peroxide	Studies of the nocturnal paroxysmal hemoglobinuria of erythrocytes increase the lysis and formation of lipid peroxide by hydrogen peroxide.
4	glutathione deficiency in sheep erythrocytes	Sheep erythrocyte glutathione deficiency.
4	use of formalinized mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens and chicken erythrocytes in hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition studies	"For the purposes of this document, the term ""antibody"" is used to refer to a drug substance that is considered to be a drug substance."
4	selective solubilization of a protein component of the red cell membrane	Selective Solubilization of Erythrocyte Membrane protein component.
4	hexokinase isoenzymes in human erythrocytes	Hexokinase isoenzymes in erythrocytes.
4	immunoglobulins in nzb bl mice i serum immunoglobulin levels and immunoglobulin class of erythrocyte autoantibody	Canadian Institute for Health Information (CIHI), Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	interferon production by chick erythrocytes activated by cell fusion	Cell-fusion activated chicken erythrocyte interferon production.
4	esters of serine and threonine in hydrolysates of histones and protamines and attendant errors in amino acid analyses of proteins	Serine and threonine esters in apo, histone, and protamine hydrolysates, and the corresponding protein amino acid analysis errors.
4	agglutinating specificity for lw factor in guinea pig and rabbit anti rh serums	Lw factor agglutinating specificity in anti-rh sera from guinea pigs and rabbits.
4	fire ant venom synthesis of a reported component of solenamine	It is the most common type of fire ant, and the most common type of fire ant is fire ant.
4	mutarotase in erythrocytes isolation and properties	Molecular characterization of mutarotasis.
4	heterogeneity of rabbit igm antibody as detected by c 1a fixation	Rabbit igmic antibody heterogeneity as detected by c1a binding.
4	studies of red cell stromal proteins in tay sachs disease	Erythrocyte stromal protein studies in Tay Sachs disease.
4	an inherited molecular lesion of erythrocyte pyruvate kinase identification of a kinetically aberrant isozyme associated with premature hemolysis	Hereditary molecular damage to erythrocyte pyruvate kinase identifies kinetically aberrant isozyme associated with premature hemolysis.
4	effect of hemorrhage and retransfusion on intrarenal distribution of blood flow in dogs	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
4	heterophile antibodies in human transplantation	Anti-Heterophilic Antibody in Human Transplantation.
4	studies on manganese 3 the biological half life of radiomanganese in man and factors which affect this half life	Manganese 3 studies: the half-life of radiomanganese in humans and the factors that affect this half-life.
4	disproportional synthesis of the adult duck s two hemoglobins during acute anemia	Acute anemia; acute anemia; acute anemia.
4	the interaction of triethyltin with components of animal tissues	L' triethyltin interaction with animal tissue constituents.
4	control of lecithin biosynthesis in erythrocyte membranes	Control of erythrocyte membrane lecithin biosynthesis.
4	the adenylate kinase of human plasma erythrocytes and platelets in relation to the degradation of adenosine diphosphate in plasma	L' human erythrocyte adenylate kinase and plasma platelets related to l&apos degradation; plasma adenosine diphosphate.
4	degradation of glycerophosphatides during storage of saline washed saline suspended red cells at 20 degrees c	Degradation of glycerophosphatids during storage of suspended red blood cells (RBCs) in 20 degree c washed saline.
4	glucose and glycogen metabolism in erythrocytes from normal and glycogen storage disease type iii subjects	Glycogen and glucose metabolism in the erythrocytes of normal subjects and subjects with apo; a type iii disease related to glycogen storage.
4	hereditary nonspherocytic hemolytic disease associated with an altered phospholipid composition of the erythrocytes	Hereditary, non-spherocytic hemolytic pathology associated with altered erythrocyte phospholipid composition.
4	hereditary sideroblastic anemia and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in a negro family	Hereditary siderobic anaemia and glucose deficiency 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in a black family.
4	screening lead workers for the presence of stippled erythrocytes	Dotted erythrocyte detection in core workers.
4	comparison of three simple methods for the assessment of free thyroid hormone	Three simple methods are compared; evaluation of free thyroid hormones.
4	osmotic resistance of heat damaged erythrocytes	Heat-resistant osmotics damaged the erythrocytes.
4	new method for detecting changes in the surface appearance of human red blood cells	New method to detect changes in the appearance of human red blood cell surface.
4	dna protein binding in interphase chromosomes	Interphase chromosome DNA protein binding.
4	the effect of the unstirred layer on human red cell water permeability	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of the quality of the product.
4	1 2 3 h cholesterol as a tracer in studies of human cholesterol metabolism	It is important to note that the study of cholesterol metabolism in humans has been limited to 12 hours.
4	hypersensitivity specific immunologic suppression of the delayed type	Dos specific immunological suppression; delayed hypersensitivity.
4	effect of cell age on erythrocyte fatty acid composition in rats on different dietary regimes	Effect of lacidosis; cellular age on the fatty acid composition of erythrocytes from rats fed different diets.
4	hyaline cast formation in patients treated with cephaloridine	"""Hyaline Cast Formation"" in Cephaloridine-treated patients."
4	heaptic glutathione concentrations linked to ethionine toxicity in rats	Hepatic glutathione levels associated with rat ethionine toxicity.
4	the influence of conjugation of cholic acid on its uptake and secretion hepatic extraction of taurocholate and cholate in the dog	Cholic acid affects the uptake and secretion of taurocholate and cholate in dogs, and the extraction of cholate from the liver.
4	analysis of fatty acids of human red cells without lipid extraction	Human red cell fatty acid analysis without lipid extraction.
4	phylogenetic origins of antibody structure 3 antibodies in the primary immune response of the sea lamprey petromyzon marinus	Phylogenetic origin of structural 3 antibodies in the sea lamprey (Petromyzon marinus) primary immune response.
4	the subunits in rabbit anti forssman igm antibody	The anti-rabbit anti-forssman antibodies are also available.
4	folate status throughout pregnancy and in postpartum period	Folate status throughout the pregnancy and the period post @-@partum.
4	differences between brucella antigens involved in indirect hemagglutination tests with normal and tanned red blood cells	Differences between the brucella antigens involved in tanned and normal red blood cell tests; indirect hemagglutination with tanned and normal red blood cells.
4	phospholipid exchange between plasma and erythrocytes in man and the dog	Phospholipid exchange between human and dog erythrocytes and plasma.
4	bile salts and cholesterol in the pathogenesis of target cells in obstructive jaundice	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	in vivo lability of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in gda and gdmediterranean deficiency	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase ability in vivo in both gda and gditerranea deficiencies.
4	the haemolytic effect of various regimens of primaquine with chloroquine in american negroes with g6pd deficiency and the lack of an effect of various antimalarial suppressive agents on erythrocyte metabolism	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that primaquine and chloroquine are effective in reducing the risk of erythrocyte metabolism.
4	oxygenation and ion transport in red cells	Oxygenation and red blood cell ion transport.
4	the physical state of hemoglobin in sickle cell anemia erythrocytes in vivo	It is not possible to determine the cause of death by the presence of the drug.
4	interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with artificial and natural membranes	Staphylococcal alpha-toxin interaction with natural and artificial membranes.
4	an electron microscopic study of nuclear elimination from the late erythroblast	A study by electron microscopy of l' nuclear elimination of l' late erythroblast.
4	dna synthesis and mitosis in erythropoietic cells	Synthesis of DNA and Mitosis in Erythropoietic Cells.
4	chronic hemolytic anemia due to cold agglutinins the mechanism of resistance of red cells to c hemolysis by cold agglutinins	Chronic cold agglutinin hemolytic anemia, mechanism of red cell resistance to apos; cold agglutinin hemolysis c.
4	heterogeneity of antibody response to salmonella lipopolysaccharide measured by passive hemagglutination and hemolysis in mice	Heterogeneity of the immune response to Salmonella lipopolysaccharide measured by haemolysis and passive hemagglutination in mice.
4	plasma 3s gamma 1 globulin identity with erythrocyte carbonic anhydrase b	Identity of plasma gamma-1 globulin 3s with erythrocyte-induced carbonic anhydrase b.
4	thermal studies of the rates of the reactions of carbon dioxide in concentrated haemoglobin solutions and in red blood cells a the reactions catalysed by carbonic anhydrase b the carbamino reactions of oxygenated and deoxygenated haemoglobin	Thermal studies of carbon dioxide reaction rates in concentrated d&apos solutions; hemoglobin and red blood cell catalyzed reactions; carbonic anhydrase b carbamino reactions; oxygenated and deoxygenated hemoglobin.
4	hemoglobin cc disease rheological properties or erythrocytes and abnormalities in cell water	This information is required for accountability purposes and for accountability purposes.
4	everest ms measurement of digoxin in plasma and its use in diagnosis of digoxin intoxication	Ms. Everest measures the amount of digoxin in the plasma and its use in the diagnosis of the digoxin intoxication.
4	polycythaemia in coal miners with chronic lung disease	Health and safety aspects of mercury-containing drinking water.
4	role of erythrocytes in the acute platelet response to operation	Role of erythrocytes in acute platelet response.
4	lactate dehydrogenase electrophoretic variant in a new guinea highland population	Electrophoretic variant lactate dehydrogenase for a new population in the Guinean Highlands.
4	stages in the incorporation of fatty acids into red blood cells	It's a good idea if you don't have it, but you do.
4	separation and characterization of soluble adenovirus type 9 components	It is recommended that the data be submitted to the Canadian Food Inspection Agency for review.
4	steady state hemoglobin facilitated o2 transport in human erythrocytes	It is not possible to determine the cause of death, but it is important to determine the cause of death.
4	effect of frusemide lactose and urea on urinary cell loss	Efficacy of french french french french french french french french french french.
4	maximal erythrocyte and hemoglobin catabolism	Maximum Catabolism of Erythrocytes and Lapos; Hemoglobin.
4	the thymus and recovery of the sheep erythrocyte response in irradiated mice	Thymus and response recovery from sheep erythrocytes in irradiated mice.
4	plasmodium falciparum phagocytosis by polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Polymonuclear leukocytes phagocytosis P. falciparum.
4	red blood cells why or why not	Red blood cells, why not?
4	rheological comparison of hemoglobin solutions and erythrocyte suspensions	It is not possible to compare the results of the tests with the results of the tests.
4	lipid composition of subcellular particles of human blood platelets	Subcellular particles in human blood platelets, lipid composition.
4	dihydroorotic acid dehydrogenase introduction into erythrocyte by the malaria parasite	Introduction of l' Dihydroorotic Acid Dehydrogenase in Erythrocytes by the Malaria parasite.
4	hemadsorption of mumps virus examined by light and electron microscopy	Hemadsorption of mumps virus by electron and light microscopy.
4	blood volume changes in outdoor exercise of 8 10 hour duration	The amount of blood that can be absorbed by the body, and the amount of blood that can be absorbed.
4	on the shape of the erythrocyte	Erythrocyte shape.
4	the effect of antigenic competition on various manifestations of humoral antibody formation and cellular immunity	Effect of antigenic competition on various forms of antibody formation; humoral antibody and lapos; cellular immunity.
4	peptide hydrolase activities of the mucosa of human small intestine	It is the most common type of skin cancer in the world.
4	red cell survival after heterograft valve surgery	Survival of red blood cells following heterosexual valve surgery.
4	factors affecting the passive hemagglutination titration dilution loops titration trays vibration diluents	Factors affecting titration dilution loops of passive hemagglutination are titration plate vibration diluents.
4	interaction between red cell stroma and streptolysin o inhibition of cytotoxic activity	Erythrocyte stroma × streptolysin interaction or apos inhibition; cytotoxic activity.
4	enhancement of parainfluenza 2 virus hemagglutinin	Parainfluenza 2 hemagglutinin.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency in chinese	Glucose Deficiency - 6 Phosphate Dehydrogenase in Chinese.
4	haptoglobin and catalase loci in man possible genetic linkage	However, it is not clear whether this is the case in humans or in humans.
4	primaquine induced changes in morphology of exoerythrocytic stages of malaria	Primaquine induced morphological changes in the exoserythrocyte stages of malaria.
4	horse agglutinins in infectious mononueleosis 3 riterion for differential diagnosis	Horse agglutinins in Infectious Mononueleosis 3 Riterion for Differential Diagnosis.
4	regulation of the immune response i reduction in ability of specific antibody to inhibit long lasting igg immunological priming after removal of the fc fragment	Regulation of Immune Response to Reduced Capability of Immune Response; Specific Antibody of Immune Response; Inhibiting Immune Response; Long-Term Immunologic Initiation after Removal of Fragment Fc.
4	erythrocytes in human transplantation effects of pretreatment with abo group specific antigens	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the outcome of the transplant.
4	adenine phosphoribosyltransferase deficiency a previously undescribed genetic defect in man	In addition to the above, there are a number of other genetic factors that may contribute to the development of diabetes.
4	measurement of protein concentration by quantitative electron microscopy	Quantitative electron microscopy was used to measure protein concentrations.
4	erythropoiesis in the rat differential rates of dna synthesis and cell proliferation	Erythropoiesis in differential rates of DNA synthesis and cellular proliferation in rats.
4	human monocytes distinct receptor sites for the third component of complement and for immunoglobulin g	Human monocytes have distinct receptor sites for the third complement component and for human immune globulin g.
4	sickle cell anaemia sickle cell thalassaemia sickle cell haemoglobin c disease and asymptomatic haemoglobin c thalassaemia in one ghanaian family	Sickle cell disease Sickle cell disease Sickle cell disease (SARS) Sick cell disease (SARS) Sick cell disease (SARS) Hemoglobin c Thalassemia (HCH) asymptomatic in a Ghanaian family.
4	a comparison of the monospot with the paul bunnell test in infectious mononucleosis and other diseases	Comparison of Monospot with Paul Bunnell's Infectious Mononucleosis and Other Diseases Test.
4	genetics of diego blood groups in guatemalan indians use of antiserums to diego a and diebo b antigens	Diego blood group genetics in Guatemalan Indians uses anti-antigen diego a and diebo b antisera.
4	penicillin induced haemolytic anaemia	Hemolytic anemia was caused by penicillin.
4	direct measurements of membrane potential and membrane resistance of human red cells	Direct measurement of membrane resistance and membrane potential of human red blood cells.
4	chemotactic and anaphylatoxic fragment cleaved from the fifth component of guinea pig complement	Chemotactic and anaphylatoxic fragments were cleaved from the fifth guinea pig complement component.
4	conformation of blood group and virus receptor glycoproteins from red cells and secretions	Blood group glycoproteins and red blood cell and secretion viral receptors conform.
4	automated technique for the detection of hemagglutinins to sheep erythrocytes	Automated sheep erythrocyte hemagglutinin detection technique.
4	studies in the enzymology of glutathione metabolism in human erythrocytes	Enzymological studies of human erythrocyte glutathione metabolism.
4	effect of osmolality on the hydraulic permeability coefficient of red cells	Effect of osteo; osmolality on red cell hydraulic permeability coefficient.
4	intraperitoneal blood transfusion in african adults with hookworm anaemia	Intraperitoneal transfusion of blood in adult African patients with ankylostoma.
4	absorption and utilization of polyglutamyl forms of folate in man	L'absorption et l'apos; utilisation des formes polyglutamylées du folate dans l'apos; man.
4	active calcium and strontium transport in human erythrocyte ghosts	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	oxygen hemoglobulin dissociation curves effect of inherited enzyme defects of the red cell	Dissociation curves of oxygenated hemoglobulin show the effect of hereditary red blood cell enzymatic defects.
4	glutathione reductase stimulation in normal subjects by riboflavin supplementation	Riboflavin supplementation stimulates glutathione reductase in normal subjects.
4	effect of histoplasmosis on antibody response to an erythrocyte antigen	Histoplasmosis affects the immune response to erythrocyte antigen.
4	role of erythrocytes and serum in the nutrition of rickettsia quintana	Role of erythrocytes and serum nutrition in rickettsia quintana.
4	mannose metabolism in the human erythrocyte	Human erythrocyte mannose metabolism.
4	inherited deficiency of the third component of human complement c 3	In addition, there is a lack of information about the genetic makeup of the individual.
4	assay of carbonic anhydrase by titration at constant ph	Test for constant php titration carbonic anhydrase.
4	mammary tumor virus antigen sensitive immunoassay	Antigen-sensitive immunologic test for breast tumour virus.
4	the calcium content of human erythrocytes	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	some aspects of adenosine triphosphate synthesis from adenine and adenosine in human red blood cells	Aspects of the synthesis of l' adenosine triphosphate from l' adenine and l' and adenosine from human red blood cells.
4	infective substructures of sendai virus from infected ehrlich ascites tumor cells	Infectious viral substructures sent from ehrlich infected cancer cells.
4	rapid sensitive assay for staphylococcal enterotoxin and a comparison of serological methods	Rapid and sensitive serologic testing and serologic comparison with staphylococcal enterotoxin.
4	effect of statolon induced interferon on antibody formation	It can also be used as an antibody, but not as an antibody.
4	rate limiting processes in the bohr shift in human red cells	Rate-limiting Processes in Bohr Movement of Human Red Blood Compounds.
4	fluid drop like transition of erythrocytes under shear	Liquid falls like erythrocyte transition under shear.
4	the role of membrane lipids in the survival of red cells in hereditary spherocytosis	Role of membrane lipids in red cell survival in hereditary spherocytosis.
4	a study of nucleated erythrocytes by density gradient centrifugation in a zonal rotor	Zonal rotor density gradient centrifugation studies of nucleated erythrocytes.
4	adsorption of mycoplasma pneumoniae to neuraminic acid receptors of various cells and possible role in virulence	Adsorption of pneumoniae mycoplasma to various cell neuraminic acid receptors and possible virulence.
4	utilization of neuraminic acid receptors by mycoplasmas	Use of l&apos receptors; mycoplasma neuraminic acid.
4	immune adherence by the fourth component of complement	L' immune adhesion by the fourth complement component.
4	effects of quaternary ammonium compounds on choline transport in red cells	Quaternary ammonium compounds affect the transport of choline in red blood cells.
4	bacteriocin hemolysin of streptococcus zymogenes	Bacteriocin Hemolysin from Streptococcus zymogenes.
4	passive hemolysis by serum and cobra venom factor a new mechanism inducing membrane damage by complement	L&apos passive serum hemolysis and cobra venom factor is a novel mechanism that induces complement membrane damage.
4	effect of altitude on oxygen binding by hemoglobin and on organic phosphate levels	In addition to the above-mentioned factors, there are a number of other factors that may affect the health of Canadians.
4	inhibition of adenosine triphosphatase in sheep red cell membranes by oxidized glutathione	L' sheep erythrocyte membrane adenosine triphosphatase inhibition by oxidized glutathione.
4	micro determination of plasma and erythrocyte copper by atomic absorption spectrophotometry	Determination of the microscopic properties of copper in plasma and erythrocytes by spectrophotometry; atomic absorption.
4	estimation of red cell folate activity	Erythrocyte folate activity.
4	standardized automated procedure for measurement of serum hemolytic complement activity	It is not possible to determine the activity of the serum hemolytic complement.
4	microtiter indirect hemagglutination procedure for identification of streptococcal m protein antibodies	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of other studies.
4	automated procedure for measuring antigenicity of extracted and intact influenza virus	Automated apo measurement procedure; apo virus antigenicity; extracted influenza and intact.
4	effect of type of red blood cells on antistreptolysin o titer	Erythrocyte; erythrocyte; anti-treptolysin oiter.
4	carbonic anhydrase isoenzymes in the erythrocytes and dorsolateral prostate of the rat	It can be used as a means of reducing the risk of injury to human health.
4	glycosphingolipids with lewis blood group activity uptake by human erythrocytes	Glycosphingolipids with uptake by human erythrocytes; Glycosphingolipids with uptake by human erythrocytes.
4	deformation of red blood cells in capillaries	Red blood cell deformation in the capillaries.
4	orientation and motion of amphiphilic spin labels in membranes	L' orientation and movement of amphiphilic spin labeling in membranes.
4	glycerol permeability of human fetal and adult erythrocytes and of a model membrane	In addition, it can be used as an antigen in human erythrocytes; it can be used as an antigen.
4	gene control of hematopoiesis i erythrocyte mosaicism and permanent immunological tolerance in allophenic mice	Genetic control of the apo; hematopoiesis, erythrocyte mosaicism, and permanent immune tolerance in allophenic mice.
4	active uptake of copper and zinc during haemodialysis	Incubate in the skin and remove the skin from the skin.
4	metabolic dependence of red cell deformability	Metabolic Dependencies of Red Cell Deformability.
4	familial plasma lecithin cholesterol acyltransferase deficiency	Family plasma acyltransferase lecithin cholesterol deficiency.
4	duplicate plating of immune cell products analysis of globulin class secretion by single cells	Dual analysis of the products of the immune cells of the secretion of the globulin class by individual cells.
4	nonequilibrium facilitated oxygen transport in hemoglobin solution	In addition, it is important to note that the use of chloroform in drinking water is not an issue.
4	plug effect of erythrocytes in capillary blood vessels	Erythrocyte blockage in blood vessels.
4	disposal of plasma heme in normal man and patients with intravascular hemolysis	Intravascular hemolysis is the most common type of hemolysis.
4	the significance of erythrocyte antigen site density i hemagglutination	Significance of site density; erythrocyte antigens i hemagglutination.
4	automation of the assay of folate in serum and whole blood	Serum and whole blood folate measurement automation.
4	substrate stabilization genetically controlled reciprocal relationship of two human enzymes	Substrate stabilization genetically controlled the reciprocal relationship of the two human enzymes.
4	adsorption of 3h fatty acid esters of streptococcal groups a and e cell wall polysaccharide antigens by red blood cells and their effect on hemagglutination	L'absorption des esters d'apos; fatty acids 3h of the polysaccharides of the walls of groups a and e of streptococci by the red cells and their effect on hemagglutination.
4	effect of flavin compounds on glutathione reductase activity in vivo and in vitro studies	Effect of flavin on apos; in vivo and in vitro glutathione reductase (GMR) activity.
4	standardized viral hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition tests i standardization of erythrocyte suspensions	Tests should be performed at least once per week and should be performed at least once per week.
4	standardized viral hemagglutination and hemagglutination inhibition tests ii description and statistical evaluation	The purpose of this report is to provide information on the effectiveness of anti-HBovirus and anti-HBovirus vaccines.
4	chloroquine resistance in malaria a deficiency of chloroquine binding	The chloroquine resistance of malaria is due to its chloroquine-binding defect.
4	the effects of deoxygenation of adult and fetal hemoglobin on the synthesis of red cell 2 3 diphosphoglycerate and its in vivo consequences	The Effects of Deoxygenation of Fetal and Adult Hemoglobin on Red Blood Diphosphoglycerate 2-3 Synthesis and its Consequences in Vivo.
4	thermal inactivation of newcastle disease virus	Thermal Inactivation of Newcastle Disease Virus.
4	variables of the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test system and their effect on antigen and antibody titers	Dosage system variables; inhibition of rubella; hemagglutination of rubella and its effect on titres of apo; antigens and apo; antibody.
4	primary immunization of rh negative volunteers	Primary rhesus negative vaccine.
4	carcinogen induced immune depression absence in mice resistant to chemical oncogenesis	The absence of immune suppression in acid-resistant mice; chemical oncogenesis.
4	the erythrocyte ghost is a perfect osmometer	Erythrocyte phantom is the perfect osmometer.
4	stimulation of mammalian erythropoiesis by 5beta h steroid metabolites	Stimulation of the apo; erythropoiesis in mammals by steroidal metabolites 5beta h.
4	binding of dodecyl sulfate to proteins at high binding ratios possible implications for the state of proteins in biological membranes	Dodecyl sulfate binding to proteins at high binding ratios may have consequences for protein status in biological membranes.
4	optical activity of biological membranes scattering effects and protein conformation	Diffusion effects of the apos; biological membrane optical activity and protein conformation.
4	precipitation of proteins by vinblastine and calcium ions	Protein Precipitation by Vinblastine and Calcium Iones.
4	failure of intravenous aspirin to increase gastrointestinal blood loss	Intravenous aspirin to increase gastro@-@ intestinal blood loss.
4	molecular species of lecithins from erythrocytes and plasma of man	Erythrocyte lecithin and human apo plasma molecular species.
4	electron microscope analysis of young and old red blood cells stained with colloidal iron for surface charge evaluation	Electron microscopic analysis of old and young colloidal iron-stained red cells for apos; surface charge evaluation.
4	shear dependence of effective cell volume as a determinant of blood viscosity	Shear dependence of the effective cell volume (ICV) as a determinant of blood viscosity.
4	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficient red cells resistance to infection by malarial parasites	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase, which is deficient in erythrocytes, is resistant to infection by malaria parasites.
4	membrane alterations in hemolysis internalization of plasmalemma induced by primaquine	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
4	equine isoerythrolysis clinical pathological observations and transfusion of dam s red blood cells to her foal	Isoerythrolyse equine clinical pathological observations and maternal red blood cell transfusion to foal.
4	the rate of the root shift in eel red cells and eel haemoglobin solutions	Root displacement rate in red blood cells; eel and eel solutions; haemoglobin; eel.
4	a general method for the specific staining of intracellular antigens with ferritin antibody conjugates	General method of specific apo staining; intracellular antigen conjugates; ferritin antibodies.
4	the detection of cell bound antibody on complement coated human red cells	Cell-bound antibodies on complement-coated human red blood cells.
4	detection of agglutinins in chickens infected with jm leukosis virus	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection.
4	rifampicin induced immune thrombocytopenia	Rifampin was found to induce immune thrombocytopenia.
4	susceptibility to an avian leukosis sarcoma virus close association with an erythrocyte isoantigen	Avian leukosis sarcoma virus susceptibility closely associated with erythrocyte isoantigen.
4	the transport of oxidized glutathione from the erythrocytes of various species in the presence of chromate	Chromate-induced transport of oxidized glutathione from erythrocytes of various species.
4	automated quantitative microhemagglutination assay for treponema pallidum antibodies	Automated Quantitative Microhemagglutination Tests for Treponema pallidum antibodies.
4	abnormal rheology of oxygenated blood in sickle cell anemia	It's called anemia, and it's called anemia.
4	effect of 2 3 diphosphoglycerate on oxygen affinity of blood in sickle cell anemia	The effect of diphosphoglycerate 2-3 on the apos; blood affinity for the apos; oxygen in the apos; sickle-like anemia.
4	in vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells i plaque technique of high sensitivity enabling access to the cells	In vitro stimulation of peritoneal cell-mediated antibody formation i high-sensitivity technical plaque allowing access to cells.
4	orotidinuria induced by allopurinol	Allopurinol-induced Orotidinuria.
4	histocompatibility 2 h 2 polymorphism in wild mice	Canadian Journal of Fisheries and Aquatic Sciences.
4	determination of alpha tocopherol in erythrocytes by gas liquid chromatography	Erythrocyte alpha tocopherol determination by liquid gas chromatography.
4	inside out red cell membrane vesicles preparation and purification	Preparation and purification of the vesicles of the erythrocyte membranes at the interior of those at-ci.
4	the growth characteristics of an ascitic plasmacytoma mp 5563 terminating by fistulous communication with the blood stream	Growth characteristics of mp 5563 ascitic plasmacytome ending in fistulose communication with blood flow.
4	allantoic fluid as a source of arbovirus hemagglutinin	It can be used as an adjunct to the hemagglutinin.
4	erythropoietic activity of steroid metabolites in mice	Erythropoietic steroid metabolite activity in mouse.
4	quality control in haematology report of interlaboratory trials in britain	Rapport sur la contrôle de la qualité en haatologie des essais interlaboratoires en Grande@-@ Brittany.
4	determination of urea permeability in red cells by minimum method a test of the phenomenological equations	Determination of permeability to apos; urea in red blood cells by a minimal method a phenomenological equation test.
4	natural antibodies in sera of mink before and after the development of aleutian disease viral plasmacytosis	Natural antibody in mink serum before and after development of viral Aleutian Plasmacytosis.
4	macrocytosis in down s syndrome and during long term anticonvulsant therapy	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors that may contribute to the risk of coronary heart disease.
4	assay of serum fibrin degradation products by agglutination inhibition of coated erythrocytes	Tests for the degradation products of serum fibrin with apos; inhibition of the apos; agglutination of coated erythrocytes.
4	reactive lysis the complement mediated lysis of unsensitized cells i the characterization of the indicator factor and its identification as c7	Lysis reactivates the complement-mediated lysis of non-sensitized cells and the characterization of the signaling factor and its identification as c7.
4	isolation of the fundamental polypeptide subunits of biological membranes	Isolate basic-polypeptide units from biological membranes.
4	electrophoretic analysis of hemoglobin and isozymes in individual vertebrate cells	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
4	genetic transmission of viruses that incite mammary tumor in mice	Genetic transmission of mouse tumour-inducing viruses.
4	reduced catechol o methyltransferase activity in red blood cells of women with primary affective disorder	It is important to note that these studies are not intended to be exhaustive, but rather to provide insight into the nature of the disease.
4	solubilization and partial characterization of a phytohemagglutinin receptor site from human erythrocytes	It is not possible to determine the origin of the receptor site, but it is possible to determine the origin of the receptor site.
4	in vitro induction of lysosomal enzymes by phagocytosis	In vitro, phagocytosis induces lysosomal enzymes.
4	a variant of rabbit phosphoglucose isomerase	Variant rabbit isomerase phosphoglucose.
4	comparison of the immune responsiveness of nzb and nzb x nzw f1 hybrid mice with that of other strains of mice	Comparison of f1 nzb and nzb x nzw mouse immune response with that of other mouse strains.
4	disruption of adenovirus type 7 by lithium iodide resulting in the release of viral deoxyribonucleic acid	Disturbance of apos; type 7 adenovirus by apos; lithium iodide leading to release of apos; viral deoxyribonucleic acid.
4	quinacrine mechanisms of antimalarial action	Anti-malarial mechanisms.
4	hundred day leukemia preferential induction in rat by pulse doses of 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene	In rats, 100-day leukemia promoted apos; 7,812 anthracene-trimethylbenz induction by pulsed doses.
4	hapten carrier relationships of isoantigens a model for immunological maturation based on the conversion of haptens of carriers by antibody	The isoantigen–haptene relationships are a model of immunological maturation based on antibody conversion of carrier haptens.
4	the rate of osmotic influx of water by flexible and inflexible erythrocytes	Flexible and inflexible erythrocyte-induced osmotic influx of water.
4	acetylsalicylic acid induced hemolysis and its mechanism	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of acids.
4	the effect of cardiac disease on hemoglobin oxygen binding	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - A system of medical services for the treatment of cardiovascular diseases.
4	phenotypic mixing of envelope proteins of the parainfluenza virus sv5 and vesicular stomatitis virus	Phenotypic mixture of the proteins of l' envelope of the virus parainfluenza sv5 and the virus of vesicular stomatitis.
4	thyroid hormone control of erythrocyte 2 3 diphosphoglyceric acid concentrations	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent of the toxicity of the drug.
4	molecular mechanism of hemolytic anemia in homozygous hemoglobin c disease electron microscopic study by the freeze etching technique	Molecular Mechanisms of Apos; Hemolytic Anemia in Apos; Homozygous Hemoglobin c Cryodiffusion Electron Microscopic Study.
4	peroxidase activity in rat liver microbodies after amino triazole inhibition	L' peroxidase activity in microgranules of rat liver after apos; inhibition by l' amino triazole.
4	membrane splitting in freeze ethching covalently bound ferritin as a membrane marker	Fracture of the membrane by freezing ferritin covalently bound as a marker membrane.
4	vitamin b12 levels in erythrocytes in normal subjects and in pernicious anaemia	Vitamin b12 level in the erythrocytes of normal and normal subjects; pernicious anemia.
4	the effect of heat on the a b and h antigenic strength of human red cells	It can also be used as an antigenic agent, but not as an antigen.
4	mucopolysaccharide in the blood of a patient with neuroblastoma	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
4	cephalexin human studies of absorption and excretion of a new cephalosporin antibiotic	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of cardiovascular disease.
4	fine structure of the exoerythrocytic stage of plasmodium cynomolgi	Exoerythrocytic stage structure of plasmodium cynomolgi.
4	receptors for human gamma g globulin on human neutrophils	Gamma receivers-human neutrophil globulin.
4	diminished synthesis of an alpha chain mutant hemoglobin i alpha 16 lys leads to glu	The reduced synthesis of apos, an alpha-chain mutant, apos; 16 lys, hemoglobin i alpha, leads to glu.
4	fatty acid composition of phospholipids from platelets and erythrocytes in multiple sclerosis	Fatty acid composition of platelet and erythrocyte MS phospholipids.
4	reactivity of two gonococcal antigens in an automated microhemagglutination procedure	Two gonococcal antigens reactivate in an automated microhemagglutination procedure.
4	sensitized erythrocyte lysis sel test as an epidemiological tool for human leptospirosis serological surveys	A test of the lysis of sensitized erythrocytes as an epidemiological tool for the serologic investigation of human leptospirosis.
4	titration of cholera antitoxin in human sera by microhemagglutination with formalinized erythrocytes	Antitoxin of cholera in human serum by microhemagglutination with formalized erythrocytes.
4	genetic polymorphism of tetrazolium oxidase in dogs	Genetic polymorphism for dog tetrazolium oxidase.
4	purine metabolism in heterozygous carriers of hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyltransferase deficiency	Purine metabolism in carriers heterozygous for d' deficiency of guanine hypoxanthine phosphoribosyltransferase.
4	thermal damage to red cells	Red blood cell thermal damage.
4	the interaction between human monocytes and red cells specificity for igg subclasses and igg fragments	Human monocyte interaction and red cell specificity for sub@d&apos classes; igg and d&apos fragments; igg.
4	effect of ph on the physico chemical and immunologic properties of rabbit antibodies	Effect of Ph on the Physico-Chemical and Immunological Properties of Rabbit Antibody.
4	studies of phosphorescent probes for proteins	Protein phosphorescent probe studies.
4	platelet adhesiveness after blood donation	Post-donation platelet adhesion.
4	favism association with erythrocyte acid phosphatase phenotype	Association of the favisme with phenotype of phenotypic erythrocyte acid phosphatase.
4	carbonic anhydrase isoenzymes in the erythrocytes and uterus of the rabbit	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
4	two populations of rh groups together with chromosomally abnormal cell lines in the bone marrow	Two populations of groups of rh and abnormal chromosome cell lines in bone marrow.
4	mechanisms of recovery from a generalized viral infection mousepox i the effects of anti thymocyte serum	In addition to the above-mentioned, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of infection.
4	lysis of erythrocytes by complement in the absence of antibody	In addition, there is an increased risk of hepatitis C and other sexually transmitted infections.
4	differential membranolytic effects of microcrystalline sodium urate and calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate	Differential membraneolytic effects of calcium pyrophosphate dihydrate and microcrystalline sodium urate.
4	production of ultrastructural membrane lesions by the fifth component of complement	Membrane ultrastructural lesion production by the fifth complement component.
4	plaque assay for pneumonia virus of mice	Plate Testing for Pneumonia Virus in Mice.
4	use of formalinized sheep erythrocytes in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Use of formalized sheep erythrocytes; rubella hemagglutination; apos inhibition.
4	release of phospholipid fatty acid from human erythrocytes	Human erythrocyte phospholipid fatty acids (HEMAs) are a major source of phospholipid.
4	the purification and properties of carbonic anhydrases from guinea pig erythrocytes and mucosae of the gastrointestinal tract	Purification and properties of guinea-pig gut erythrocyte and mucous membranes carbonic anhydrases.
4	the dissociation of chicken erythrocyte deoxyribonuleoprotein and some properties of its partial nucleoproteins	Dissociation of deoxyribonuleoprotein from chicken erythrocytes and its partial nucleoprotein properties.
4	unexpectedly large size of globin messenger ribonucleic acid	Large size unexpectedly of l' ribonucleic acid messenger of globin.
4	indirect hemagglutination test for detection of antibodies to cytomegalovirus	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed at the same time as the test.
4	deoxyribonucleotide pools and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in mouse embryo cells infected with three classes of polyoma virus particles	Pockets of deoxyribonucleotides and synthesis of d' deoxyribonucleic acid in embryonic cells of mice infected with three classes of polyoma virus particles.
4	evaluation of liquid nitrogen storage for preservation of group a streptococcal m protein sensitized sheep red blood cells	Evaluation of apo placentae; storage of ewe red blood cell sensitization; liquid nitrogen for storage of group streptococcal protein.
4	immunological basis of the adenovirus 8 9 cross reaction	The immunological basis for the cross-reaction of epos; adenovirus 8-9 is a cross-reaction.
4	plasmodium falciparum in owl monkeys drug resistance and chloroquine binding capacity	In addition, the results of a randomized controlled trial were compared with those of a randomized controlled trial.
4	hemoglobin interaction modification of solid phase composition in the sickling phenomenon	Changes in the composition of the solid phase of the apos; hemoglobin interaction in the phenomenon of sickle.
4	allopurinol alteration in pyrimidine metabolism in man	Acute and chronic toxicity of pyrimidines to rats and mice.
4	studies on erythropoiesis in uremic and post transplant renal patients utilizing radioactive iron and chromium	Erythropoiesis studies in renal uremic and post-uremic patients who have been transplanted using radioactive iron and chromium.
4	thalassemia and g 6 pd deficiency in chinese canadians admission screening of a hospital population	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
4	heme biosynthesis in intermittent acute prophyria decreased hepatic conversion of porphobilinogen to porphyrins and increased delta aminolevulinic acid synthetase activity	Heme biosynthesis in intermittent acute prophyria decreased the hepatic conversion of porphobilinogen to porphyrin and increased the hepatic porphobilinogen to porphyrin; l&apos activity; aminolevulinic acid synthetase delta.
4	introduction of a heterologous nucleus into enucleated cytoplasms of cultured mouse l cells	In addition, the nucleus of the nucleus is the nucleus of the cell of the cell.
4	primitive erythropoiesis in early chick embryogenesis ii correlation between hemoglobin synthesis and the mitotic history	Early erythropoiesis at the beginning of apo; chicken embryogenesis; correlation between apo synthesis; hemoglobin and apo; mitotic history.
4	sporozoite induced infections of plasmodium berghei administered by the oral route	Sporozoites induced oral plasmodium berghei infections.
4	some properties of an sh group essential for choline transport in human erythrocytes	Some of these properties are essential for human erythrocyte choline transport.
4	on the possibility of nonthermal biological effects of pulsed electromagnetic radiation	On the possibility of non-thermal biological effects of electromagnetic pulses.
4	the significance of erythrocyte antigen site density ii hemolysis	Erythrocyte antigen ii hemolysis.
4	phosphoribosyl transferase activity in normal subjects gout patients and children with mental retardation	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of activity, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
4	human red blood cells prostaglandin e2 epinephrine and isoproterenol alter deformability	Prostaglandin e2, epinephrine, and isoproterenol in human erythrocytes alter deformability.
4	quantitation of a slide test monotest for infectious mononucleosis	Single-blade test for infectious mononucleosis.
4	the erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity e c 1 6 4 2 of healthy blood donors	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be due to the presence of an infectious agent.
4	microangiopathic haemolytic anaemia the phenomenon of red cell adherence	Microangiopathic hemolytic anemia; red blood cell adhesion.
4	protein loss and cell loss from the small intestinal mucosa	Small intestinal mucosal cell and protein loss.
4	studies on the coordinate activity and liability of orotidylate phosphoribosyltransferase and decarboxylase in human erythrocytes and the effects of allopurinol administration	Studies of human erythrocyte orotidylate phosphoribosyltransferase and human erythrocyte decarboxylase co-ordination activity and responsibility and effects; administration of d' allopurinol.
4	effect of antibiotics on staphylococcal hemolysin production	The Effect of Antibiotics on Production of Staphylococcal Hemolysin.
4	bacteriophage types and o antigen groups of escherichia coli from urine	Types of bacteriophages and groups; antigen or antigen in urine; escherichia coli.
4	comparison of the streptozyme test with the antistreptolysin o antideoxyribonuclease b and antihyaluronidase tests	Antitreptolysin or anti-deoxyribonuclease (b) and antihyaluronidase (hyaluronidase) tests compared.
4	quantitative micro complement fixation test	Quantitative Microcomplement Fixation Test.
4	automation of a hemagglutination inhibition test for parainfluenza 3 antibodies in bovine sera	Caution should be taken in the use of antioxidants, such as antioxidants and antioxidants, in the manufacture of antioxidants.
4	macrophage digested antigen as inducer of delayed hypersensitivity	Macrophages digest antigen as an apo inducer; delayed hypersensitivity.
4	the effect of valinomycin on the electrical properties of solutions of red cell lipids in n decane	L' effect of valinomycin on electrical properties of erythrocyte lipid solutions in Decane n.
4	incorporation of radioactive seleno 75se methionine into mumps virus	Radioactive 75se selenomethionine incorporated into mumps virus.
4	photo affinity labeling of specific acetylcholine binding sites on membranes	Photo @-@apos labeling; specific l&apos binding site affinity; acetylcholine on membranes.
4	the localization of spectrin on the inner surface of human red blood cell membranes by ferritin conjugated antibodies	Ferritin conjugated antibodies localize spectrin on the inner surface of human erythrocyte membranes.
4	acholeplasma axanthum sp n a new sterol nonrequiring member of the mycoplasmatales	Acholeplasma axanthum sp. n a new sterol limb not required in mycoplasma.
4	antigen specific cells in mouse bone marrow ii fluctuation of the number and potential of immunocyte precursors after immunization	In addition, the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) is working with the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) to develop a national immunization strategy.
4	the apparent transfer of fatty acid from phosphatidylcholine to phosphatidylethanolamine in human erythrocytes	The apparent transfer of d' fatty acids from phosphatidylcholine to human erythrocyte phosphatidylethanolamine.
4	actinomycin d before and during primary and secondary anti forssman immunoglobulin hemolysin responses in rabbits	Anti-HIV anti-HIV antibody in rabbits; anti-HIV anti-HIV anti-HIV anti-HIV anti-HIV anti-HIV anti-HIV anti-HIV anti-HIV antibody.
4	the contrasting effects of cyclophosphamide and radiation on the immune responses of the mouse	The contrasting effects of radiation and cyclophosphamide on the immune responses of mice.
4	erythroid cell differentiation and the inhibition of cytokinesis by cytochalasin	Cytochalasin inhibition of cytokinesis.
4	developmental changes of erythropoiesis in cultured chick blastoderms	Developmental Changes in Erythropoiesis in Cultured Chick Blastoderms.
4	conversion of vitamin b 6 compounds to active forms in the red blood cell	Vitamin b 6 is converted into active forms in red blood cells.
4	analysis of chemotaxis in white blood cells	White-cell chemotaxis analysis.
4	the potential use of xylitol in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency anemia	It is important to note that there is no evidence that xylitol can be used as an antioxidant.
4	alteration in the rheologic properties of plasmodium knowlesi infected red cells a possible mechanism for capillary obstruction	L' alteration of the rheological properties of red blood cells infected with the Knowlesi plasmodium may be a d&apos mechanism; capillary obstruction.
4	erythropoiesis in the anemia of bone marrow failure	Erythropoiesis in apos; anemia; bone marrow failure.
4	mechanism of action of thyroid hormones on erythrocyte 2 3 diphosphoglyceric acid synthesis	Mechanisms; thyroid hormone action on l&apos synthesis; erythrocyte diphosphoglyceric acid 2 and 3.
4	characterization of the a component of streptococcus zymogenes lysin	Characterization of streptococcus zymogenes lysine a component.
4	aplastic anaemia acute myeloblastic leukaemia and oxymetholone	Aplastic anemia, acute myelogenous leukemia, and oxymetholone.
4	electron microscopy of the ammoniacal silver reaction for histones in the erythropoietic cells of the chick	L' electron microscopic examination of the ammonia reaction in chick erythropoietic cells; silver for histones.
4	effect of paraoxon on erythrocyte metabolism as measured by oxygen uptake in vitro	The effect of the paraoxon on the metabolism of erythrocytes as measured by the apos; absorption of apos; oxygen in vitro.
4	structure of glycoproteins of human erythrocytes alkali stable oligosaccharides	Human erythrocyte glycoprotein structure: a stable, alkaline oligosaccharide.
4	mechanical equilibrium of biological membranes	L' the mechanical balance of the biological membranes.
4	drug displacement from protein binding source of the sulphadoxine liberated by phenylbutazone	Displacement of phenylbutazone-released sulfadoxin protein-binding source drug.
4	method for increasing the regularity of isolation of infectious ribonucleic acid from influenza virus	Ribonucleic acid infectivity of influenza virus. isolation of apos; isolation of apos.
4	effect of two factors source of sheep cells and concentration of amboceptor on the estimated titre of rheumatoid factor	Effect of two sheep cell source factors and sheep concentration; amboceptors on estimated rheumatoid factor titre.
4	studies on the primary structure of chicken erythrocyte histone fraction v	Chicken erythrocyte histone v primary structure studies.
4	effect of induced host anaemia on the viability and radiosensitivity of murine malignant cells in vivo	Effect of ectomycorrhizal anemia; induced host anemia on viability and radiation sensitivity of murine malignant cells in vivo.
4	specificities of haemagglutinating antibodies evoked by members of the cephalosporin c family and benzylpenicillin	Specific hemagglutinating antibodies evoked by cephalosporin c and benzylpenicillin family members.
4	intersexes and sex determination in chickens	Intersex and sex-determination in chickens.
4	gene selection in hemoglobin and in antibody synthesizing cells	The selection of genes in serum hemoglobin and antibody synthesis cells.
4	folate metabolism in epileptic and psychiatric patients	Folate metabolism in patients with both epilepsy and psychiatric disorders.
4	porphyrin biosynthesis in the erythrocytes of patients with sideropenic anaemias	In addition, a number of studies have been carried out in the United States, Canada, Australia, and the United States.
4	calcium binding by human erythrocyte membranes significance of carboxyl amino and thiol groups	Human erythrocyte membrane calcium binding is important for the amino carboxyl and thiol groups.
4	changes in fatty acid metabolism after erythrocyte peroxidation stimulation of a membrane repair process	Changes in the metabolism of fatty acids following stimulation by peroxidation of erythrocytes; a process of membrane repair.
4	translation of globin m rna in thalassemia and the s and c hemoglobinopathies	Translation of Globin Mna into Thalassemia and Hemoglobinopathies s and c.
4	the effect of copper on red cell enzyme activities	L' copper effect on red cell enzymatic activities.
4	the antibody response of mice to murine leukemia virus in spontaneous infection absence of classical immunologic tolerance akr mice complement fixing antibodies lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus immunofluorescence glomerular deposits of antigen antibody complexes	Mice's immune response to murine leukemia virus in the absence of a classic immunologically tolerant spontaneous infection of mice complements immunofluorescent immune cell choriomening virus binding antibodies glomerular deposits of antigenic complexes.
4	carbon dioxide hydration activity of carbonic anhydrase kinetics of alkylated anhydrases b and c from humans metalloenzymes isoenzymes active sites mechanism	L' human metalloenzyme isoenzyme b and c alkyl anhydrase carbonic anhydrase; carbon dioxide hydration of the kinetics of apos; isoenzyme b and c isoenzyme is a mechanism of active sites.
4	cytochalasin b effects on cell morphology cell adhesion and mucopolysaccharide synthesis cultured cells contractile microfilaments glycoproteins embryonic cells sorting out	The effects of cytochalasin b on the adhesion of morphological cells and the synthesis of the mucopolysaccharides cultured on the contractile cells microfilaments glycoprotein cells embryo sifting.
4	protein synthesis its control in erythropoiesis	Protein Synthesis, its Control in Erythropoiesis.
4	significance of transplacental hemorrhage in the induction of specific maternal unresponsiveness	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support it.
4	the orientation of dna within 80 angstrom chromatin fibers	It is not possible to determine the origin or origin of the product.
4	purification and characterization of the l component of streptococcus zymogenes lysin	Purification and characterization of streptococcus zymogenes lysine l component.
4	erythropoietin effects on fetal mouse erythroid cells i cell population and hemoglobin synthesis	Effect of erythropoietin on erythroid cells of fetal mice on cell population and synthesis of apos; hemoglobin.
4	the appearance of acetylcholinesterase in the myotome of the embryonic rabbit an electron microscope cytochemical and biochemical study	Initiation of acetylcholinesterase in embryonic rabbit myotome was the subject of a cytochemical and a biochemical electron microscopic study.
4	cholesterol metabolism in the macrophage 3 ingestion and intracellular fate of cholesterol and cholesterol esters	Metabolism of cholesterol in adults; ingestion of macrophage 3 and intracellular release of cholesterol and cholesterol esters.
4	deoxyribonucleic acid of anaplasma marginale	Deoxyribonucleic acid; marginal anaplasm.
4	interaction of human growth hormone and human erythrocyte membranes studies by intrinsic fluorescence	Lapos; human growth hormone – human erythrocyte membrane interaction is studied by intrinsic fluorescence.
4	n acetyl d galactosaminyltransferase in human serum and erythrocyte membranes	N acetyl dgalactosaminyltransferase in human erythrocyte membranes and serum.
4	sensitive matrix gel diffusion test for the detection of australia antigen	Sensitive Matrix Gel Scattering assay for Australian antigen detection.
4	effect of the purification of virus antigens on the production of specific complement fixing antibodies	Effect of virus antigen purification on production of antibody-fixing specific complement.
4	use of a new buffer system with formalinized sheep erythrocytes in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Use of apos; a new formalized sheep erythrocyte buffer system in the apos test; apos inhibition; rubella hemagglutination.
4	some effects of mucopolysaccharide stains on platelet aggregation	Certain mucopolysaccharide staining effects on plaque aggregation.
4	interaction in the cerebral metabolism of the biogenic amines effect of intravenous infusion of l tryptophan on tryptophan and tyrosine in brain and body fluids	Interaction in cerebral metabolism of tryptophan; effect of intravenous intravenous infusion of tryptophan on brain tryptophan and tyrosine and body fluids.
4	daunorubicin metabolism estimation of daunorubicin reductase	Evaluation of Daunorubicin reductase Metabolism by Daunorubicin.
4	oxidant injury of caucasian glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase deficient red blood cells by phagocytosing leukocytes during infection	Glucose-deficient oxidative lesion 6 caucasian phosphate dehydrogenase by leukocyte phagocytosis during infection.
4	phenyldiimide hemoglobin and heinz bodies	Phenyldiimide is a Hemoglobin and Hideyldiimide.
4	ribonucleic acid polymerase activity in sendai virions and nucleocapsid	L&apos activity; sendai virion and nucleocapsid ribonucleic acid polymerase.
4	hemagglutination inhibition with arboviruses relationship between titers and source of erythrocytes	Inhibition of apos; hemagglutination by erythrocyte titer-source arbovirus.
4	the relationship between antigenic structure and the requirement for thymus derived cells in the immune response	Relationship between antigenic structure and requirement of thymus-derived cells in immune response.
4	in vivo studies in c4 deficient guinea pigs	In vivo studies were carried out in c4-deficient guinea pigs.
4	exchange transfusion with dextran 40 in polycythaemia secondary to hypoxic lung disease	Dextran 40 transfusion in hypoxic pulmonary disease secondary polycytheemia.
4	the selective inhibition of macrophage phagocytic receptors by anti membrane antibodies	L' selective macrophage phagocyte receptor inhibition by anti-membranes antibodies.
4	studies on antibody producing cells iv ultrastructue of plaque forming cells of rabbit lymph	Studies of cells producing apos; ultrastructural antibody iv of cells forming rabbit lymph patches.
4	complement fixation by a two component antibody system immunoglobulin g and immunoglobulin m anti globulin rheumatoid factor parodoxical effect related to immunoglobulin g concentration	Two-component antibodies, immunoglobulin and immunoglobulin m, rheumatoid factor, immunoglobulin m, dose-related effect, immunoglobulin g.
4	serum concentrations and allotypes of immunoglobulins in two lines of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis	Serum concentrations and apo allotypes; immunoglobulins in two genetically selected mouse lines for apo synthesis; low or high antibodies.
4	effect of propiolactone on sendai virus	Propiolactone affects sendai virus.
4	some physical properties of k antigens of escherichia coli related to their biological activity	Some of the physical properties of l' escherichia coli k-antigen are related to their biological activity.
4	cross neutralization of leptospiral hemolysins from different serotypes	Leptospiral hemolysin cross-neutralization of different serotypes.
4	electron microscope study of pnh red cells and aet treated normal red cells pnh like cells	Electron microscopy of pnh erythrocytes and treated pnh normal erythrocytes as similar cells.
4	vitamin b 12 levels in erythrocytes in hypochromic anaemia	Hypochromic anemia in erythrocytes.
4	hemagglutinin from the l phase of neisseria meningitidis group b with observations on a serum inhibitor	Group b neisseria meningitidis phase l hemagglutinin with serum inhibitor observations.
4	effect of 3 thienylalanine on antibody synthesis v immunosuppression in mice by short diet and drug treatments	Effect of thienylalanine on antibody synthesis and immunosuppression in mice.
4	immune response to sheep red blood cells in mice pretreated with mycobacterial fractions	The immune response to sheep erythrocytes in mycobacterial-fraction-pretreated mice.
4	purification of pneumolysin	Pneumolysin purification.
4	adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxin and colchicine on antibody formation in the hamster	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to the body's immune system, but not as an adjuvant.
4	age related susceptibility to haemophilus influenzae type b disease in rabbits	Journal of Infectious Diseases, 10, pp. 1–25.
4	macrophage cytophilic antibody in mice mechanism of action of bacterial lipopolysaccharide on the uptake of immunoglobulins by mouse peritoneal cells	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of anti-microbial resistance, including the development of anti-mouse macrophage antibodies.
4	production of staphylococcal alpha toxin i relationship between cell growth and toxin formation	Staphylococcal alpha toxin production i relationship of cell growth to toxin formation i.
4	contribution of humoral and cellular factors to the resistance to experimental infection by pseudomonas aeruginosa in mice i interaction between immunoglobulins heat labile serum factors and phagocytic cells in the killing of bacteria	Contribution of cellular and humoral factors to resistance to apo; experimental infection by mouse pseudomonas aeruginosa i interaction between heat-labile serum immunoglobulin factors and phagocyte cells in bacterial destruction.
4	enteropathogenicity of escherichia coli i evaluation of mouse intestinal loops	In addition, it may be necessary to test for the presence or absence of E. coli.
4	biochemistry of vibrio cholerae virulence ii skin permeability factor cholera enterotoxin production in a chemically defined medium	Vibrio cholerae virulence Biochemistry ii production of cholera permeability factor enterotoxin in chemically defined medium.
4	characteristics of streptolysin o action	Characteristics of the drug; action of the drug.
4	protective role of smooth lipopolysaccharide in the serum bactericidal reaction	The protective role of smooth lipopolysaccharide in the bactericidal response in serum.
4	immunochemical studies of organ and tumor lipids xix cytolytic action of antibodies directed against cytolipin r	Organ and tumour lipid immunochemical studies xix cytolytic action of antibodies to r-cytolipin.
4	fate of intravenously administered particulate and lipoprotein cholesterol in the rat	The fate of lipoprotein and particulate cholesterol administered intravenously in rats.
4	quantitative two dimensional ultrastructural distribution of rh o d antigenic sites on human erythrocyte membranes	Quantitative two-dimensional ultrastructural distribution of human erythrocyte membrane rho d antigenic sites.
4	induction of colonies of hemoglobin synthesizing cells by erythropoietin in vitro	Caposin-synthesizing cell colonies; haemoglobin induces; erythropoietin induces in vitro.
4	biological roles of the two components of crotoxin	Biological Roles of Both Crotoxin Components.
4	comparison of indirect hemagglutination and immunodiffusion tests for detecting type ii leukosis marek ine	The test should be performed in accordance with the requirements of the Canadian Food Inspection Agency.
4	hemolytic interaction of newcastle disease virus and chicken erythrocytes i quantitative comparison procedure	Hemolytic Interaction of Newcastle Disease Virus and Chicken Erythrocytes i Quantitative Comparison Procedure.
4	modified hemagglutination inhibition test for rubella employing human group o erythrocytes	Modified tests for apo; apo inhibition; rubella hemagglutination using human erythrocytes.
4	further studies on the anti immunoglobulin g hemagglutination inhibition test for influenza	In addition to the above, there are a number of other studies that have been conducted for the purposes of this study.
4	acetylcholine binding to torpedo electroplax relationship to acetylcholine receptors	Relationship between electroplax torpedoes and d&apos receptors; acetylcholine.
4	oxygen affinity in red cells changes induced in vivo by propranolol	L' affinity for l' red blood cell oxygen changes with propranolol in vivo.
4	detection of human and chick nuclear antigens in nuclei of chick erythrocytes during reactivation in heterokaryons with hela cells	Detection of human and chicken nuclear antigens in chicken erythrocyte nuclei during their reactivation in chicken heterokaryotic cells.
4	detection of cholesterol in cell membranes by use of bacterial toxins	Cellular membrane cholesterol detection by the use of bacterial toxins.
4	comparison of fluorescent antibody induced by rubella virus in vaccinee and convalescent individuals	Comparison of rubella-virus-induced fluorescent antibodies in vaccinated, convalescing subjects.
4	passive hemagglutination inhibition test for typing foot and mouth disease virus	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case.
4	indirect hemagglutination with mycoplasma antigens effects of ph on antigen sensitization of tanned fresh and formalinized sheep erythrocytes	Indirect hemagglutination with mycoplasmic antigens, effects of ph on the antigenic sensitization of fresh, formalized, and tanned sheep erythrocytes.
4	immunologic memory cells of bone marrow origin increased burst size of specific immunocyte precursors	In addition, there was an increase in the size of specific immunocompromised precursors, resulting in an increase in the size of the cells.
4	galactosidase immunological activity of ribosome bound growing polypeptide chains	L' ribosome-linked proliferating polypeptide chain galactosidase immunological activity.
4	membrane microfilaments of erythrocytes alteration in intact cells reproduces the hereditary spherocytosis syndrome vinblastine colchicine strychnine electron microscopy cell rigidity	Membrane microfilaments of intact cells; erythrocyte alteration mimicked the inherited cellular rigidity of the colchicine vinblastine spherocytosis syndrome by electron microscopy.
4	light scattering at various angles theoretical predictions of the effects of particle volume changes	Scattering of light at various angles, theoretical predictions of the effects of changes in the volume of particles.
4	erythrocyte glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and glutathione deficiency in sheep	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
4	the survival time of df 32 p labelled erythrocytes in adult male mink	Survival of erythrocytes labeled with 32% df in adult male mink.
4	inactivation of polykaryocytogenic and hemolytic activities of sendai virus by phospholipase b lysolecithinase	Inactivation by lysolecithinase b phospholipase of the hemolytic and polykaryocytogenic activities of sentin virus.
4	actions of bretylium tosylate at the neuromuscular junction	Bretylium tosylate acts at neuromuscular junctions.
4	permeability of red cell membranes to small hydrophilic and lipophilic solutes	Permeability of erythrocyte membranes to small, hydrophilic, and lipophilic membranes.
4	the chemical reactions of the haemagglutinins and neuraminidases of different strains of influenza viruses 3 effects of proteolytic enzymes	Chemical reactions of the hemagglutinins and neuraminidases of different influenza virus strains and their proteolytic enzymes.
4	decrease of the 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine dopa decarboxylase activities in human erythrocytes and mouse tissues after administration of dopa	Decrease of 3 4 activities of dihydroxyphenylalanine dopa decarboxylase in human erythrocytes and mouse tissues following Dopa administration.
4	cell fractionation and arrangement on fibers beads and surfaces	Fractionation and cell walling; arrangement of cells on beads and fibre surfaces.
4	proposal for classifying human strain navel and related simian mycoplasmas as mycoplasma primatum sp n	A proposal to classify the mycoplasmas of the human Navel strain and the related simian mycoplasma as mycoplasma primatum sp. n.
4	role of antibody and complement in the immune clearance and destruction of erythrocytes ii molecular nature of igg and igm complement fixing sites and effects of their interaction with serum	Role of antibodies and complement in immune clearance and erythrocyte destruction ii molecular nature of the receptor sites, and effects of serum interaction.
4	erythrocytosis in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Erythrocytosis in Spontaneously Hypertensive Rats.
4	inosinic acid dehydrogenase activity in the lesch nyhan syndrome	Lesch Nyhan syndrome inosinic acid dehydrogenase.
4	unstable variant of nadh methemoglobin reductase in puerto ricans with hereditary methemoglobinemia	Unstable nadh-methaemoglobin reductase variant in hereditary puerto ricans.
4	glycoproteins isolation from cellmembranes with lithium diiodosalicylate	Isolation of cell membrane glycoproteins with lithium diiodosalicylate.
4	characteristics of a bacteriocin derived from streptococcus faecalis var zymogenes antagonistic to diplococcus peumoniae	A bacteriocin derived from Streptococcus faecalis var zymogenes antagonists to the diplococcus peumoniae.
4	beta hemolysin a persistent impurity in preparations of staphylococcal nuclease and enterotoxin	Hemolysin beta, an impurity that persists in both d&apos and staphylococcal nuclease preparations; enterotoxin.
4	the isolation and functional identification of a protein from the human erythrocyte ghost	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
4	factors affecting the maturation of renal pah extraction in the new born dog	In addition, there are a number of factors influencing the maturation of the kidney; extraction of the pah in the newborn.
4	erythrocyte function and marrow regulation in hemoglobin bethesda beta 145 histidine	Erythrocyte function and regulation of the marrow in bethesda hemoglobin beta 145 histidine.
4	histocompatibility studies in a closely bred colony of dogs ii influence of the dl a system of canine histocompatibility upon the survival of cardiac allografts	Dapos studies; histocompatibility in a narrowly elevated dog colony ii influences the immune system; canine histocompatibility influences cardiac allograft survival.
4	mechanism of cytolysis by complement	Complemental cytolysis mechanisms.
4	the selective inhibitory effect of hyperthermia on the metabolism and growth of malignant cells	Cervical cancer is a major risk factor for the development of hyperthermia.
4	the structure of erythrocyte membranes studied by freeze etching ii localization of receptors for phytohemagglutinin and influenza virus to the intramembranous particles	Erythrocyte membrane structure studied by freeze-etching ii location of phytohemagglutinin and influenza virus receptors in intramembranous particles.
4	glutathione synthesis in human erythrocytes ii purification and properties of the enzymes of glutathione biosynthesis	Glutathione synthesis in human erythrocytes ii Glutathione biosynthetic enzyme purification and properties.
4	passive antibody and the immune response factors which determine enhancement and suppression	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that influence the immune response.
4	macrophage melanoma cell heterokaryons iv unmasking the macrophage specific membrane receptor	Melanoma cell heterokaryons from macrophages iv. uncovering the macrophage-specific membrane receptor.
4	antiviral activity and side effects of polyriboinosinic cytidylic acid complexes as affected by molecular size	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the size of the complex, including the size of the complex.
4	rescue of rous sarcoma virus from rous sarcoma virus transformed mammalian cells	The red sarcoma virus rescue against the red sarcoma virus has transformed mammalian cells.
4	regulation of the immune response i differential effect of passively administered antibody on the thymus derived and bone marrow derived lymphocytes	The differential effect of antibody administered passively to thymus-derived and bone marrow-derived lymphocytes.
4	genetic variation in human erythrocyte acetylcholinesterase	Genetic variation of human erythrocyte-derived acetylcholinesterase.
4	variations in the responses of c57bl 10j and a j mice to sheep red blood cells	Variations in c57bl 10j and j mouse responses to erythrocytes of sheep.
4	preparation and further characterization of the mn glycoprotein of human erythrocyte membranes	Preparation and further characterization of mn-glycoprotein from human erythrocyte membranes.
4	regulation of antibody response by cells expressing histamine receptors	Histamine receptor-expressing cells regulate antibody response.
4	the isoenzymes of carbonic anhydrase kinetic properties with particular reference to the functions in the intestinal tract	Isoenzymes of the kinetic properties of etapos; carbonic anhydrase particularly intestinal tract functions.
4	in vivo formation of h2o2 in red cells during exposure to hyperoxia	In vivo red cell h2o2 formation during apo; exposure to apo; hyperoxia.
4	homotropic cooperative binding of the first component of guinea pig complement to rabbit igg erythrocyte complexes a possible allosteric effect	The cooperative homotropic binding of the first component of the guinea pig complement to the rabbit igg erythrocyte complexes may have an allosteric effect.
4	increased survival of sickle cell erythrocytes after treatment in vitro with sodium cyanate	Increased falciform erythrocyte survival after in vitro sodium cyanate treatment.
4	cell to cell interaction in the immune response ix regulation of hepten specific antibody class by carrier priming	Cell-to-cell interaction in antibody class regulation; antibody specific; cell-to-cell interaction; carrier priming.
4	induction of tolerance to sheep red blood cells	Sheep erythrocyte tolerance induced.
4	erythropoietic protoporphyria lipid peroxidation and red cell membrane damage associated with photohemolysis	Lipid peroxidation of erythropoietic protoporphy and photohemolysis-associated erythrocyte membrane alteration.
4	carbonic anhydrase interaction with ddt dde and dieldrin	Carbonic anhydrase with ddehyde and dieldrin.
4	origin of the vaccinia virus hemagglutinin	E. coli, E. coli, E. coli and E. coli.
4	alzheimer s disease in one monozygotic twin	It is the second most common type of dementia.
4	separation and some properties of the major proteins of the human erythrocyte membrane	Separation and some properties of key proteins of human erythrocyte membrane.
4	human antibody response to lipopolysaccharides from neisseria gonorrhoeae	Neisseria gonorrhoeae lipopolysaccharide reactivity of human antibodies.
4	the isolation of digoxin specific antibody and its use in reversing the effects of digoxin	It can be used as an antibody, but not as an anti-oxidant, and not as an anti-oxidant.
4	spin labeled electron spin resonance study of the lipid containing membrane of influenza virus	Influenza lipid-containing membrane by electron paramagnetic resonance.
4	comparison of selective media for isolation of presumptive group d streptococci from human feces	Comparison of group d selective media; isolation of putative group d streptococci from human feces.
4	antigenic properties of the envelope of influenza virus rendered soluble by surfactant solvent systems	The antigenic envelope properties of the influenza virus were soluble by the surfactant solvent systems.
4	decreased red cell uroporphyrinogen i synthetase activity in intermittent acute porphyria	Decreased apo; uroporphyrinogenic activity i erythrocyte synthetase in acute intermittent porphyria.
4	a study of clofazimine in the rat	Rat clofazimine study.
4	active calcium ion uptake by inside out and right side out vesicles of red blood cell membranes	Calcium can be used as a source of calcium, but it can also be used as a source of calcium.
4	experimental arteriosclerosis i fibrous plaque formation in primates an electron microscope study	Experimental arteriosclerosis i formation of fibrous plaques in primates, electron microscopy.
4	genetic factors controlling anti sheep erythrocyte antibody response and immunoglobulin synthesis in backcross and f2 progeny of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis	Genetic factors controlling antibody response to sheep erythrocytes and antibody synthesis; immunoglobulins in f2 and backcross progeny of mice genetically selected for high or low antibody synthesis.
4	genetic control of the antibody response to type 3 pneumococcal polysaccharide in mice i evidence that an x linked gene plays a decisive role in determining responsiveness	Genetic control of the immune response to type 3 pneumococcal polysaccharide in mouse i indicates that apos; an x-chromosome-linked gene is critical in determining responsiveness.
4	phenacetin induced hemolytic anemia	Phenacetin was found to induce hemolytic anemia.
4	storage retrieval and inventory control of donor red cells in liquid nitrogen	Recovery and control of the donor's red blood cell count; inventory of the donor's red cell count; liquid nitrogen.
4	primary glomerular disease with extraglomerular vascular osmiophilic deposits	Primary glomerular disease with extra-glomerular, vascular osmiophilic deposits.
4	improved hemagglutination test for identifying type a strains of pasteurella multocida	Improvement of the apo test; hemagglutination to identify multocida pasteurella a-type strains.
4	indirect hemagglutination test for chlamydial antibodies	The results of this study are summarized below.
4	pneumococci producing beta hemolysis on agar	Pneumococci producing agar-based beta hemolysis.
4	haem biosynthesis studied in patients with rheumatoid arthritis	The hematoma consists of the hematoma of the liver and the hematoma of the liver.
4	effect of the oral contraceptive preparation femigen on the erythrocyte and resin uptake of 131 i triiodothyronine	Erythrocyte and resin absorption of 131 i triiodothyronine.
4	erythropoietin production in cultures of goat renal glomeruli	Production of apos; erythropoietin in goat kidney glomeruli (Goat glomeruli) cultures.
4	globin messenger rna activity in erythroid precursor cells and the effect of erythropoietin	Erythrocyte activity; Erythrocyte activity; Erythrocyte activity; Erythrocyte effect; Erythrocyte effect.
4	globin messenger rna induction during erythroid differentiation of cultured leukemia cells	Induction of the apos; globin messenger RNA during the erythroid differentiation of cultured leukemia.
4	effect of a modified kaolin treatment on serum immunoglobulins	Modified kaolin therapy for serum immune globulin.
4	structures suggesting cell wall deficient forms detected in circulating erythrocytes by fluorochrome staining	Structures suggesting defective forms of the cell wall detected by fluorochrome staining of circulating erythrocytes.
4	hemagglutination inhibition for serogrouping of neisseria meningitidis	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	structure of membrane holes in osmotic and saponin hemolysis	Saponin, osmotic hemolysis, and osmotic hemolysis.
4	hemoglobin concentration in normal diploid and intersex triploid chickens genetic inactivation or canalization	Concentration of apos; hemoglobin in normal triploid intersex and diploid chickens, genetic inactivation or genetic channelization.
4	effect of colchicine colcemid and vinblastine on the agglutination by concanavalin a of transformed cells	Colchicine colcemid and vinblastine effect on apos; concanavalin agglutination to transformed cells.
4	phagocytosis of immune complexes by macrophages different roles of the macrophage receptor sites for complement c3 and for immunoglobulin igg	Phagocytosis of immune complexes by macrophages plays different roles in c3 complement and igg immunoglobulin receptor sites of macrophages.
4	a comparison of the trcii and latex particle tests for the titration of fr antigen	Comparison of latex particle and trice tests for titration of antigen fr.
4	kinetic studies of a doubly bound red cell antigen antibody system	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of antibodies, but it is important to distinguish between them.
4	assays for porphyrins delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase and porphyrinogen synthetase in microliter samples of whole blood applications to metabolic defects involving the heme pathway	Determination of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase and porphyrinogen synthetase porphyrins in whole blood microliter samples applied to heme pathway metabolic defects.
4	activation of variants of hypoxanthine guanine phosphoribosyl transferase by the normal enzyme	Activation of apos variants; guanine phosphoribosyltransferase hypoxanthine by apos; normal enzyme.
4	thymus independence of slowly metabolized immunogens	Thymic independence of slow-moving immunogens.
4	stable reagent for the detection of antibody to the specific fraction i antigen of yersinia pestis	Antifungal agents that are used in the manufacture of vaccines, such as anti-pesticides, anti-pesticides and anti-pesticides.
4	rheology of leukocytes leukocyte suspensions and blood in leukemia possible relationship to clinical manifestations	Leukocyte suspension leukocyte and blood leukemia rheology possibly related to clinical manifestations.
4	measurement of the third component of complement bound to red blood cells in patients with the cold agglutinin syndrome	Measurement of the Third Component of Red Blood Complement in Patients with Lapos Syndrome; Cold Agglutinin.
4	autonomous erythropoiesis during erythroblastic crisis of chronic myelocytic leukemia	Autonomic erythropoiesis during chronic erythroblastic myelocytic leukemia.
4	a cellular basis for genetically controlled immunologic unresponsiveness in mice tolerance induction in t cells	Cellular basis for l' genetically controlled immunological inactivation in t-cell mice.
4	identification and quantitation of the components of polyvalent inactivated influenza virus vaccines by immunodiffusion	Identification and quantification of inactivated multi-valent vaccine components for influenza; immunodiffusion.
4	red cell size as measured by the coulter model s	Size of red blood cells as measured by the casting model.
4	immunosuppressive activity in patients with active chronic hepatitis and primary biliary cirrhosis treated with azathioprine	Immunosuppressive activity in hepatitis patients; chronic active hepatitis and liver failure; primary liver cirrhosis treated with azathioprine.
4	metabolism of rickettsia typhi and rickettsia akari in irradiated l cells	Rickettsia typhi and rickettsia akari metabolism in irradiated l cells.
4	mycoplasma like organism parasite of red blood cells of an amphibian hydromantes italicus spelerpes fuscus	Mycoplasma as an organism parasitizing erythrocytes; a hydromating amphibian italicus spelerpes fuscus.
4	the mechanism of folate transport in rabbit reticulocytes	Rabbit reticulocyte folate transport mechanisms.
4	mechanism of allopurinol mediated increase in enzyme activity in man	Apos; allopurinol promoted apos; increase in apos; enzymatic activity in men.
4	drug induced erythrocyte membrane internalization	The drugs induce internalization of the erythrocyte membrane.
4	serological cross reactions between the hemagglutinin subunits of h0n1 and h1n1 influenza viruses detected with monospecific antisera	Serological cross-reactions between h0n1 and h1n1 influenza virus hemagglutinin units detected with monospecific antisera.
4	measles virus ribonucleic acid and protein synthesis effects of 6 azauridine and cycloheximide on viral replication	Effects of Protein Synthesis and Apos; Ribonucleic Acid of Measles Virus; Azauridine 6 and Cycloheximide on Viral Replication.
4	glycoprotein biosynthesis in small intestine 3 enzymatic basis for the difference in the antigenicity of mucins	Glycoprotein biosynthesis in apos; small intestine 3 enzyme base for apos difference; mucin antigenicity.
4	immunogenicity of the common enterobacterial antigen produced by smooth and rough strains	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
4	biochemical basis of the immunogenicity of the common enterobacterial antigen	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of infection.
4	factors affecting interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin with membranes	Factors Affecting Apos; interaction of Staphylococcal alpha toxin with membranes.
4	carbamino compounds of haemoglobin in human adult and foetal blood	Journal of Adolescent Psychiatry, 11, 355-379.
4	the interactions of fibrinogen and dextrans with erythrocytes	Fibrinogen and dextrans interactions with erythrocytes.
4	carbonic anhydrase polymorphism in a new jersey population of the white footed mouse peromyscus leucopus	Dietary Reference Intakes (DRIFs) and Dietary Reference Intakes (DRIs) for Dietary Reference Intakes.
4	differential immune response to attenuated rubella virus vaccine	Mitigated antibody response to-rubella vaccine.
4	high resolution autoradiography of malarial parasites treated with 3 h chloroquine	High resolution autoradiography of chloroquine-treated malaria parasites.
4	cytochemical localization of peroxidase activity in the developing erythrocyte	Cytochemical location of apos; peroxidase activity in developing erythrocytes.
4	selective effects of thermal injury on mouse peritoneal macrophages	Selective Effects of Thermal Damage to Mouse Peritoneal Macrophages.
4	effect of vitamin e on the immune response of hypoxic and normal chickens	Effect of Vitamin e on the Immune Response of Normal and Hypoxic Chickens.
4	synthesis of globin chains in sickle thalassemia	Synthesis of thalassemic sickle cell globain chains.
4	direct antiglobulin reaction in abo haemolytic disease of the newborn	Direct reaction to antiglobulin in newborn-abo hemolytic disease.
4	improved dextran sulfate calcium chloride method for the removal of nonspecific inhibitors with modifications for nonspecific agglutinin removal in the rubella hemagglutination inhibition test	Calcium chloride dextran sulfate enhanced method for os; elimination of non-specific inhibitors with modifications for os; non-specific elimination of os; agglutinin in the d&apos test; inhibition of os; hemagglutination of rubella.
4	magnesium deficiency in patients on long term diuretic therapy for heart failure	Long-term diuretic treatment for magnesium deficiency; heart failure.
4	a scanning and transmission electron microscope study of antigen binding sites on rosette forming cells	Scanning and transmission electron microscopy of antigen-binding sites in rosette cells.
4	stimulation of igg antibody response in vitro by t cell replacing factor	In vitro stimulation of the response to the antibody; igg by the replacement factor of the t-cells.
4	incidence of haemagglutinating antibodies to meningococci in north west england	Impact of Haemagglutinating Meningococcal Antibody in Northern-West l'apos; England.
4	effects of salicylates on blood changes in mycoplasma arthritis in rats	Effects of Salicylates on Blood Changes in Rats; Mycoplasma Arthritis.
4	an anti curare effect of hexamethonium at the mammalian neuromuscular junction	Hexamethonium at the mammalian neuromuscular junction.
4	genus specific leptospiral antigen and its possible use in laboratory diagnosis	Genre-specific leptospiral antigen and its potential use in human laboratory diagnostics.
4	a quantitative morphological analysis of the response of a transplantable rat fibrosarcoma to cyclophosphamide	Quantitative morphological analysis of rat fibrosarcoma response to cyclophosphamide.
4	the modification of cholinesterase activity by 5 5 dithiobis 2 nitrobenzoic acid included in the coupled spectrophotometric assay evidence for a non catalytic substrate binding site	The modification of the apos; cholinesterase activity by the apos; nitrobenzoic acid 5 dithiobis 2 is included in the apos; spectrophotometric test coupled as proof of apos; a noncatalytic site of binding of the substrate.
4	epstein barr virus antibody in cases and contacts of infectious mononucleosis a family study	Epstein Barr Antibody Virus in Infectious Mononucleosis Cases and Contacts a family study.
4	hemolytic anemia and g6pd deficiency	G6pd deficiency and hemolytic anemia.
4	selenium biochemical role as a component of glutathione peroxidase	The biochemical role of selenium in glutathione peroxidase activity.
4	induction of immunoglobulin m synthesis and secretion in bone marrow derived lymphocytes by locally concentrated concanavalin a	Induction of apos synthesis and secretion; immunoglobulin m in concanavalin-derived bone marrow lymphocytes locally concentrated.
4	zinc transport in rabbit tissues some hormonal aspects of the turnover of zinc in female reproductive organs liver and body fluids	The transport of zinc in the tissues of rabbits certain hormonal aspects of zinc turnover in hepatic female reproductive organs and body fluids.
4	regulation of the immune response 3 kinetic differences between thymus and bone marrow derived lymphocytes in the proliferative response to heterologous erythrocytes	Immune response regulation 3 kinetic differences between thymus- and bone-marrow-derived lymphocytes in proliferative response to heterologous erythrocytes.
4	sheep red cell binding to human lymphocytes treated with neuraminidase enhancement of t cell binding and identification of a subpopulation of b cells	Binding sheep erythrocytes to neuraminidase-treated human lymphocytes increases the binding of the t and l&apos lymphocytes; identification d' 1 sub-lymphocyte population b.
4	properties of purified pneumococcal hemolysin	Pneumococcal hemolysin.
4	partial purification and properties of the two common inherited forms of human erythrocyte adenylate kinase	The partial purification and properties of two common hereditary forms of erythrocyte adenylate kinase.
4	kinetic studies on the two common inherited forms of human erythrocyte adenylate kinase	Kinetic studies of two common hereditary forms of erythrocyte adenylate kinase.
4	the ionogenic nature of the secretory granule membrane electrokinetic properties of isolated chromaffin granules	The ionogenic nature of electrokinetic membrane properties of secretory granules of isolated chromaffin granules.
4	hemagglutination inhibition of passively sensitized red blood cells	Passively sensitized red blood cell hemagglutination.
4	influenza a neuraminidase antibody assay with sensitized erythrocytes	Antibody to the neuraminidase of influenza using sensitized erythrocytes.
4	blood volume determination in the mouse	Determination of mouse blood volume.
4	isoantigens a b and h in benign and malignant lesions of breast	Isoantigens a b and h in both the benign and the malignant lesions of the breast.
4	cultivation techniques for the erythrocytic stages of malaria parasites	Culture techniques for malaria parasite erythrocyte stages.
4	effects of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on the ultrastructure of human and rabbit erythrocytes	Effects of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin on human and rabbit erythrocyte ultrastructure.
4	agglutination of african primate and rodent erythrocytes by adenoviruses reoviruses and enteroviruses	Reovirus and enterovirus d' adenovirus agglutination of the erythrocytes of primates and African rodents.
4	microtitration of bacillus cereus hemolysin	Apos microtitration; haemolysin from cereus cereus.
4	fate of the nucleus of the marrow erythroblast	The Fate of the Bone-Mapular Core; Bone-Maple Erythroblastoma.
4	effect of metrifonate on blood cholinesterases in children during the treatment of schistosomiasis	Effect of metrifonate on children's cholinesterase during schistosomiasis.
4	purification of erythropoietin responsive cells by immune hemolysis	Erythropoietin-sensitive cells are purified by immune hemolysis.
4	chemical characterization and surface orientation of the major glycoprotein of the human erythrocyte membrane	Characterization and orientation of the surface of the major human erythrocyte membrane glycoprotein.
4	isolation and characterization of 17 hydroxy steroid dehydrogenase from human erythrocytes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
4	characteristics of chloride transport in human red blood cells	Characteristics of Chloride Transport in Human Red Blood Compounds.
4	antibodies and soluble tumour specific antigens in blood and lymph of rats with chemically induced sarcomata	Specific soluble blood and lymphatic antibodies and tumour antigens from chemically induced sarcoma rats.
4	the cytotoxic effect of mouse macrophages on syngeneic and allogeneic erythrocytes	L' cytotoxic effect of macrophages of mice on allogeneic and allogeneic erythrocytes.
4	air lead relation to lead in blood of black school children deficient in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	Relationship between lead levels in air and lead levels in the blood of glucose-deficient black schoolchildren 6 phosphate dehydrogenase.
4	mechanisms of immune lysis of red blood cells in vitro i paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria cells	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the assessment of risk.
4	effects of certain purified plasma proteins on the compatibility of glass with blood	Effects of Certain Purified Plasma Proteins on Glass Compatibility with Blood.
4	electrophoretic mobility and agglutinability of red blood cells a new polymorphism in mice	Electrophoretic motility and red cell agglutinability, a novel mouse red cell polymorphism.
4	functional characteristics of peyer s patch lymphoid cells ii lipopolysaccharide is thymus dependent	Functional characteristics of lymphoid cells of peyer stain ii lipopolysaccharide are thymus dependent.
4	the separation of peripheral blood cells of the horse	Peripheral blood cell separation from the horse.
4	viscoelastic properties of the human red blood cell membrane i deformation volume loss and rupture of red cells in micropipettes	Human erythrocyte membrane viscoelastic properties i loss of deformation volume and red cell breakage in micropipettes.
4	pentose phosphate pathway inhibition in blood cells during anticonceptive hormone therapy	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that pentose phosphate is a pathogenic agent.
4	effects of suramin on complement blood clotting fibrinolysis and kinin formation	Effects of Suramine on Fibrinolysis and Complementary Blood Clotting Kinin Formation.
4	the relationships between arterial oxygen flow rate oxygen binding by hemoglobin and oxygen utilization after myocardial infarction	Relationships between blood flow; arterial oxygen; muscle binding; oxygen through abscess; hemoglobin and abscess; use of abscess; oxygen following myocardial infarction.
4	ozone and human blood	Ozone, human blood.
4	chemical action of influenza virus on the red blood cell membrane i action on membrane neuraminic acids	Chemical action of influenza virus on erythrocyte membrane i membrane neuraminic acids.
4	microrheology and light transmission of blood iii the velocity of red cell aggregate formation	Micro-Rheology and Light Transmission of Blood iii Rate of formation of red blood cell aggregates.
4	rapid flow cytofluorometric analysis of mammalian cell cycle by propidium iodide staining	Rapid-flow cytofluorometric analysis of the mammalian cell cycle using propidium iodide and apos staining.
4	penitrem a intoxication of calves blood chemical and pathologic changes	Penitrem, calf blood poisoning, chemical and pathological changes.
4	observations on rabbit thymocytes and peripheral t cells ii rosette formation with rabbit erythrocytes	Observations on peripheral t-cells and rabbit thymocytes ii formation of rosettes with rabbit erythrocytes.
4	difficulty in blood typing after infusion of plasma substitutes relationship to erythrocyte sedimentation rate and rouleaux formation	The difficulty of determining blood type after plasma infusion replaces the relationship with the rate of sedimentation of erythrocytes and rouleau formation.
4	the use of 51cr for sheep red blood cell survival studies	L' use 51cr for survival studies of sheep red blood cells.
4	metabolic changes in avian blood and their effects on determination of blood gases and ph	Metabolic Changes in Avian Blood and their Effects on Blood Gas Determination and Phph.
4	microcalorimetric measurements of heat production in whole blood and blood cells of normal persons	Micro-calorimetric measurements of the production of heat in whole blood and in the blood cells of normal people.
4	erythropoiesis inhibiting factor s in intact and haemolyzed red blood cells	Erythropoiesis in intact, hemolyzed red blood cells.
4	distribution of the blood group antigens a and b on human spermatozoa	Distribution of human sperm antigens type a and b.
4	erythrocyte receptors for plasmodium knowlesi malaria duffy blood group determinants	Erythrocyte Receptors for Blood Group Determinants of Plasmodium Knowlesi malaria duffy.
4	phagocytosis of colloidal carbon and heterologous red blood cells in the bone marrow of rats and rabbits	Colloidal carbon phagocytosis and heterologous red blood cells in rat and rabbit bone marrow.
4	blood volume	Hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem hem.
4	identification of strong sd a and sd a red cells by hemagglutinins from salvia horminum	Identification of red blood cells sd a and sd by salvia horminum hemagglutinins.
4	the chemotherapy of rodent malaria xxii the value of drug resistant strains of p berghei in screening for blood schizontocidal activity	The chemotherapy of malaria in rodents xxii the value of drug-resistant p berghei strains for detection of the apos; schizontocidal activity in the blood.
4	new observations on the malaria parasites of rodents of the central african republic plasmodium vinckei petteri subsp nov and plasmodium chabaudi landau 1965	New observations on malaria parasites in rodents of the Republic of Apos; central Africa plasmodium vinckei petteri subsp nov. and plasmodium chabaudi landau.
4	removal of leukocytes from whole blood and erythrocyte suspensions by filtration through cotton wool v results after transfusion of 1 820 units of filtered erythrocytes	Erythrocyte removal by filtration in cotton wool is the result of the transfusion of 1,820 units of erythrocyte filters.
4	physiologic effects of transfusing red blood cells with high or low affinity for oxygen to passively hyperventilated anemic baboons systemic and cerebral oxygen extraction	Physiological effects of transfusion; low- and high-affinity erythrocytes; oxygen to anemic baboons undergoing passive hyperventilation; extraction of apo; systemic and brain oxygen.
4	an evaluation of some factors affecting the detection of blood group antibodies by automated methods	Evaluation of Factors Affecting the Detection of Blood Group Antibody by Automated Methods.
4	distribution of tocopherols in human plasma and red blood cells	Distribution of tocopherols in red blood cell and human plasma.
4	in vitro incorporation of 1 14c acetate by blood cells of normal ducks and ducks infected with plasmodium lophurae	In vitro incorporation of d' acetate 1,14c into normal duck and plasmodium lophurae infected duck blood cells.
4	guanine aminohydrolase in rat and mouse red cells a potent inhibitor of guanylation of trna	Rat and mouse erythrocyte guanine aminohydrolase is a potent guanylation inhibitor of trna.
4	cholesterol ester hydrolase in human red blood cells	Human erythrocyte cholesterol ester hydrolase.
4	effect of zinc and cadmium on delta aminolevulinate dehydratase of red blood cells in protecting against enzyme losses during storage	Effect of zinc and cadmium on erythrocyte amino-levulinate dehydratase delta for protection against enzymatic loss during storage.
4	anesthetic solubility coefficients for maternal and fetal blood	Fetal and maternal blood anesthetic solubility coefficients.
4	microinjection of thymidine kinase and bovine serum albumin into mammalian cells by fusion with red blood cells	Microinjection of thymidine kinase and d' bovine serum albumin by fusion with red blood cells in mammalian cells.
4	factitious changes in binding of oxygen to hemoglobin when based on extracellular ph in the presence of certain blood additives like radiographic contrast media	Fake changes in apo-binding; apo-oxygen; extracellular-based hemoglobin in the presence of certain blood additives such as X-ray contrast media.
4	effect of formaldehyde on the circular dichroism of chicken erythrocyte chromatin	Effect of formaldehyde on circular chromatin dichroism in chicken erythrocytes.
4	blood parasites of small wild mammals in czechoslovakia	Small mammalian blood parasites in Czechoslovakia.
4	variability of the iron copper and mercury contents of individual red blood cells	Variability in the iron-copper and mercury content of the individual red cells.
4	electrophoretic mobility of the fetal red blood cell	Fetal red blood cell electrophoretic mobility.
4	molecular features of organic anion permeablity in ox red blood cell	Molecular Characteristics of Permeability to Organic Anions in Beef Red Blood Bodies.
4	the effect of egg white on the phospholipid level in blood plasma erythrocytes and beta lipoproteins of healthy children	Eggs; white effect on plasma erythrocyte phospholipid levels and beta-lipoproteins; healthy children.
4	chemical modification of membrane proteins in relation to inhibition of anion exchange in human red blood cells	Chemical modification of membrane proteins in relation to l' anion exchange inhibition in human erythrocytes.
4	effects of riboflavin repletion during different developmental phases on behavioral patterns brain nucleic acid and protein contents and erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity of male rats	Effects of riboflavin replication during different phases of development on the behavioral profiles of brain protein and nucleic acid content and on male rat erythrocyte glutathione reductase activity.
4	photodynamic effects of protoporphyrin on the architecture of erythrocyte membranes in protoporphyria and in normal red blood cells	Protoporphyrin photodynamic effects on apos; erythrocyte membrane architecture in protoporphyria and normal red blood cells.
4	removal of blood group determinants from bovine erythrocyte membranes 2 degradation of ghosts by butanol and pyridine	Elimination of bovine erythrocyte membrane 2 phantom degradation blood group determinants by butanol and pyridine.
4	effect on cytotoxicity antibodies in potential transplant recipients of leucocyte poor blood transfusion	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the toxicity of leukocyte blood.
4	influences of exercise and endurance training on the oxygen dissociation curve of blood under in vivo and in vitro conditions	Influences of exercise; exercise and exercise; in vivo and in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro in vitro.
4	genetic disorders of human red blood cells	Human red blood cell genetic disorder.
4	red blood cell acid phosphatase ambiguity in phenotype and activity estimations in the proof of the single allele states	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
4	blood group a activities of glycoprotein and glycolipid from human erythrocyte membranes	Blood Group has activities of human erythrocyte membrane glycoproteins and glycolipids.
4	adhesion of red blood cells to charged interfaces between immiscible liquids a new method	L' adhesion of red cells to the charged interfaces between the non-miscible liquids is a new method.
4	decreased haem synthetase activity in blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria	Erythropoietic Protoporphyria (EPP) is the most common type of E. coli infection.
4	respiratory function of blood in hibernating and non hibernating hedgehogs	Respiratory blood function in hibernating and nonhibernating hedgehogs.
4	oxygen transport by haemoglobin a comparison of whole blood washed erythrocytes and haemoglobin solution	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that hemoglobin can be used as an anti-oxidant agent.
4	hemorheology erythrocyte aggregation and non newtonian properties of blood new rheological law and the validity of casson s law for blood	L' hemorheology, l' aggregation of erythrocytes and non-Newtonian properties of blood, the new law of rheology and the validity of the law of casson for blood.
4	class differences in the antibody response of hlc and llc mice to sheep red blood cells	Class differences in hlc and llc mouse immune response to sheep erythrocytes.
4	comparison of electrophoretic mobility and membrane sialic acid content of erythrocytes from adult and umbilical cord blood	Comparison of electrophoretic mobility and the content of membrane sialic acid in erythrocytes of the umbilical cord blood and adult blood.
4	abnormal brain scans contribution of blood radioactivity to image	The abnormal brain scans the contribution of the radioactivity of the blood to the image.
4	pharmacokinetics of haloalkylamines cyclization and distribution in blood in vitro and in vivo	Pharmacokinetics of in vitro and in vivo haloalkylamine cycling and distribution in blood.
4	consequences of the chronic administration of phenformine on the blood thiamine level in the dog	Consequences of apo; chronic phenformin administration on thiamine blood levels in dogs.
4	transmembrane exchange of chloride with bicarbonate ion in mammalian red blood cells evidence for a sulphonamide sensitive carrier	Lapos; transmembrane chloride exchange with apos; mammalian erythrocyte bicarbonate ion indicates the presence of apos; a sulfonamide-sensitive carrier.
4	exit of anaplasma marginale from bovine red blood cells	Bovine red blood cell marginal anaplasm.
4	distribution of progesterone and its effect on human blood during storage	Progesterone distribution and effects on human blood during storage.
4	exchange transfusion in reye s syndrome with saline washed red blood cells	Swap blood with red blood cells that have been washed at the same time; swap blood with salt water.
4	a simple kit for the preparation of 99mtc labeled red blood cells	A simple preparation kit for 99 mtc labelled red blood cells.
4	relative activity of alpha tocopherol and gamma tocopherol in preventing oxidative red cell hemolysis	L' relative activity of apos; alpha tocopherol and tocopherol gamma in prevention of apos; oxidative hemolysis of red blood cells.
4	oxygen transport in the blood of children with congenital heart defects	In addition to the above, there are a number of other measures that can be taken to reduce the risk of heart attack.
4	a comparison of intact human red blood cells and resealed and leaky ghosts with respect to their interactions with surface labelling agents and proteolytic enzymes	Relative interactions between intact human erythrocytes and resuscitated and elusive phantoms with surface-labelling agents and proteolytic enzymes.
4	gamma glutamyltransferase activity in the human red blood cell membrane author s transl	L' γ-glutamyltransferase activity in human erythrocyte membrane is reported.
4	fetal blood sampling in midtrimester pregnancies	Injured women who have been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
4	evaluation of the interaction between blood and foreign material in the pump oxygenator during open heart surgery in infants by scanning electron microscopy author s transl	In addition to the above, the authors also provide information on the use of ultrasound in the diagnosis, diagnosis, and treatment of hypertension, as well as information on the use of ultrasound.
4	blood volume changes in hypersplenic rats	The changes in the volume of blood in the hypersplene rats.
4	unusual response to abo incompatible blood transfusion	Unusual response to incompatible abo blood.
4	effect of combined application of carboxylin and sodium citrate on the restoration of blood proteins under conditions of experimental anemia	Effect of apos; combined application of carboxyline and sodium citrate on blood protein restoration under experimental anemia.
4	permanent in series cardiac assistance with the dynamic aortic patch blood prosthesis interaction in long term canine experiments	Constant cardiac assistance in series with l' interaction of aortic-patch blood prosthesis in long-term canine experiments.
4	plasma and red blood cell phospholipids in chronic liver diseases	Plasma and Erythrocyte Phospholipids in Chronic Liver Disease.
4	maturation and interrelationship of mouse mononuclear phagocytes in bone marrow peripheral blood and peritoneal cavity in terms of erythrophagocytic activity	Maturity and interrelation of mouse mononuclear phagocytes in the peripheral blood of the bone marrow and the peritoneal cavity of the mouse in terms of epithelial cells; erythrophagocytic activity.
4	methionine adenosyltransferase cystathionine beta synthase and cystathionine gamma lyase activity of rat liver subcellular particles human blood cells and mixed white cells from rat bone marrow	L' rat liver subcellular particle cystathionine gamma lyase and cystathionine cystathionine cystathionine cystathionine cystyltransferase activity, human blood cells and mixed rat bone marrow white blood cells.
4	redox metabolism of glutathione in the red blood cell	Red blood cell glutathione redox metabolism.
4	improved deformability of crenated red cells in hyperosmolar human blood by adenosine	Enhancement of the deformability of the deformed red blood cells in human hyperosmolar blood by the use of apos; adenosine.
4	biochemical and morphological changes in blood during growth of heifer during the 1st pregnancy and lactation in cows	Morphological and biochemical changes in the blood during growth of heifers during the first gestation and lactation in cows.
4	studies on the reconstitution of bovine erythrocyte superoxide dismutase v preparation and properties of derivatives in which both zinc and copper sites contain copper	Bovine erythrocyte superoxide dismutase reconstitution studies v preparation and properties of zinc- and copper-containing derivatives.
4	relation between various phospholipase actions on human red cell membranes and the interfacial phospholipid pressure in monolayers	Relationship between various phospholipase actions on human erythrocyte membranes and pressure of interfacial phospholipids in monolayers.
4	a study performed on batches of serum albumin used as diluents in rh testing a report to the international society of blood transfusion international committee for standardization in haematology by their albumin working party	A study conducted on serum lots-albumin used as diluent in rh d&apos test; report to the International Society of Blood Transfusion International committee for standardization of apos; hematology by their working group albumin.
4	deformation and fragmentation of human red blood cells in turbulent shear flow	Human red blood cell fragmentation and deformation in a turbulent shear flow.
4	relationship between activation of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydratase by heating and blood lead level	Ratio between the apos; activation of the apos; aminolevulinic acid delta dehydratase on heating and the blood lead level.
4	trypsin activated complex of human factor b with cobra venom factor cvf cleaving c3 and c5 and generating a lytic factor for unsensitized guinea pig erythrocytes ii physico chemical characterization of the activated complex	Trypsin-activated complex of human b factor with c3 and c5 cvf of cobra venom, which cleaves and generates a lytic factor for unsensitized guinea pig erythrocytes.
4	alterations in reactivity of the blood factors of cattle red cells after pronase treatment	Changes in bovine red blood cell blood factor responsiveness following pronase treatment.
4	evidence for origin of certain childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemias and lymphomas in thymus derived lymphocytes	Acute lymphocyte lymphomas and leukemias in children in lymphocytes derived from thymus.
4	isolation and identification of a new metabolite of naltrexone in human blood and urine	In addition, it can be used to determine the extent to which the drug is administered to the patient.
4	relationship between lead concentration in blood and biological response for porphyrin metabolism in workers occupationally exposed to lead	Blood lead concentration and biological response to the metabolism of porphyrin in occupationally exposed workers.
4	characterization of protoporphyrin in red blood cells of patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria	Characterization of red cell protoporphyrin in patients with erythropoietic protoporphyria.
4	blood volume changes and production and destruction of erythrocytes in newborn dogs	Changes in blood volume and erythrocyte production and destruction in dogs newly born @-@.
4	blood groups antigens plasma protein and red cell isoenzyme polymorphisms in south west scotland	Plasma protein antigens and erythrocyte isozyme polymorphisms in Southern Scotland-West.
4	mercury in red blood cells in relation to organic mercury in hair	Mercury in the red blood cells compared to mercury in the hair.
4	an experimental method correcting for absorption flattening and scattering in suspensions of absorbing particles circular dichroism and absorption spectra of hemoglobin in situ in red blood cells	Experimental method that corrects for flattening and diffusion by absorption into absorbing particle suspensions circular dichroism and apo spectra; absorption of apo; in situ hemoglobin in red blood cells.
4	in vitro effect of lead in blood on the determination of delta aminolevulinic acid dehydrase	In Vitro Effect of Lead in Blood on Determination of Lapos Dehydrase; Aminolevulinic acid delta.
4	experimental verification of a mathematical model of plasma protein and erythrocyte regeneration after blood loss	A mathematical model for the regeneration of plasma proteins and erythrocytes after blood loss.
4	interaction of red blood cells with a polarized electrode evidence of long range intermolecular forces	Erythrocyte interaction with polarized electrode demonstrates the existence of long-range intermolecular forces.
4	homologous gene expression in intergeneric fox hybrids alopex lagopus x vulpes vulpes i comparative electrophoretic analysis of blood proteins and enzymes in arctic and silver foxes	Genic expression homologous in intergeneric hybrids of arctic and silver foxes, alopex lagopus x vulpes vulpes i, comparative electrophoretic analysis of proteins and blood enzymes.
4	the effect of lead and cadmium on liver kidney and brain levels of cadmium copper lead manganese and zinc and on erythrocyte ala d activity in mice	Lead and cadmium effects on cadmium, copper, manganese and zinc levels in kidneys, brain and kidney; erythrocyte activity in mice.
4	action of glycosyl transferases upon bombay oh erythrocytes conversion to cells showing blood group h and a specificities	L' action of glycosyltransferases on the conversion of erythrocyte bombay o erythrocytes to cells showed hematocrit type h and specificity.
4	erythrocyte agglutinins in the blood of certain ascidians	Erythrocyte agglutinins in some ascidians.
4	on the structure of agglutinated sheep red blood cell membranes	Agglutinated sheep erythrocyte membrane structure.
4	some hereditary blood factors of the bengali muslim of bangladesh red cell enzymes haemoglobins and serum proteins	Some hereditary blood components of Muslim Bengali of Bangladeshi erythrocyte hemoglobins and serum proteins.
4	enrichment of erythrocytes of fetal origin from adult fetal blood mixtures via selective hemolysis of adult blood cells an aid to antenatal diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies	It is important to note, however, that the diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies in the fetus is complicated by the fact that the fetus is the subject of a number of studies.
4	haematological values for the finnish reindeer	Finnish reindeer hematological values.
4	mechanisms of the acquired erythrocyte enzyme deficiencies in blood diseases	Mechanisms of Erythrocyte Enzymatic Deficiencies Acquired in Blood Disease.
4	asparaginase entrapped in red blood cells action and survival	Asparaginase, trapped in red blood cells, action and survival.
4	mass spectrometric analysis of permethylated glycosphingolipids ii comparative studies on different blood group active and related erythrocyte membrane glycosphingolipids	Mass Spectrometric Analysis of Permethylated Glycosphingolipids ii Comparative studies of different active blood groups and related erythrocyte membrane glycosphingolipids.
4	development of immunity against antigens of the a and b blood groups during postembryogenesis in chickens	Blood group antigen immunity a and b during post-embryogenesis in chickens.
4	rheological studies of hb ss blood influence of hematocrit hypertonicity separation of cells deoxygenation and mixture with normal cells	Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System.
4	mechanisms of destruction of human rhesus sensitized red blood cells	Human rhesus destruction mechanisms sensitize human blood red blood cells.
4	the influence of magnesium ions on pyruvate kinase deficient red blood cells	L' magnesium ion influence on erythrocytes deficient in pyruvate kinase.
4	studies on blood components of an air breathing siluroid fish heteropneustes fossilis bloch in relation to body weight	Blood component studies of air-breathing siluroid fish, heteropneustes fossilis bloch, relative to body weight.
4	red blood cell catechol o methyl transferase and response to imipramine in unipolar depressive women	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
4	effect of anti inflammatory preparations on the process of thermogenesis in blood erythrocytes	Effect of inflammatory-anti-icing preparations on thermogenesis process in blood erythrocytes.
4	anti b activity of a lectin coexistent with blood group h like substance in seeds of euonymus sieboldiana	A lectin co-exists with a similar blood-group material in the seeds of Apos; euonymus sieboldiana.
4	measurement of free erythrocyte protoporphyrin in blood collected on filter paper as a screening test to detect lead poisoning in children	Screening filter paper for lead poisoning in children by measuring the protoporphyrin of free erythrocytes in blood.
4	chemical characterization and distribution of abo blood group active glycoprotein in human erythrocyte membrane	Chemical Characterization and Distribution of Active Abo Blood Group Glycoprotein in the Human Erythrocyte Membrane.
4	hemagglutination inhibition studies for the evaluation of blood group antigens in ethanol soluble substances ess obtained from human baboon and vervet monkey red blood cells	In addition, studies have been conducted to determine the effectiveness of blood group antigens in reducing the risk of infection, and to evaluate the effectiveness of blood group antigens.
4	pharmacokinetics of red blood cell phenothiazine and clinical effects acute dystonic reactions	Pharmacokinetics of Erythrocyte Phenothiazine and Clinical Effects Acute dystonic reactions.
4	course of skin allografts in rabbits immunized by heterologous red blood cells	Skin allografts in heterologous red blood cell-immunized rabbits.
4	blood levels of lead and erythrocyte ala dehydrase in 200 employees of a turin metallurgical plant analysis of variables connected with alcohol drinking and smoking habits	Lead and dapos blood levels; erythrocyte ala dehydrating in 200 dapos employees; turin metallurgical plant, analysis of alcohol and tobacco consumption variables.
4	differentiation of red blood cells in vitro	Red cell differentiation, in vitro.
4	one step separation of the sialoprotein possessing abh and mn blood group activities from human red cell membrane	Sialoprotein with abh- and mn-blood-group activities separated from human erythrocyte membrane in one step.
4	identification of plant sterols in plasma and red blood cells of man and experimental animals	Identification of the plant sterols in the plasma and red cells of the human and animal species.
4	anti wrb and other autoantibodies responsible for positive direct antiglobulin tests in 150 individuals	Anti-auto-antibodies that cause direct positive anti-globulin tests in 150 people.
4	angular scattering analysis of the circular dichroism of biological cells 2 the red blood cell	Angular diffusion analysis of biological 2 and red cell circular dichroism.
4	effects of ph during recombination of human erythrocyte membrane apoprotein and lipid	The Effects of Ph during Recombination of Apos; Apoprotein and Human Erythrocyte Membrane Lipids.
4	changes in vitro of the electrolyte content and erythrocyte volume of the venous blood of patients with chronic pneumopathy subjected to tonometry in oxygen	In Vitro Changes in Electrolyte Content and Volume of Venous Blood Erythrocytes in Patients with Chronic Oxygen Tonometry.
4	effect of broad and narrow spectrum fluorescent light on blood constituents	Effect of Broad and Narrow Spectrum Fluorescent Light on Blood Components.
4	phenotypic expression of galactokinase deficiency in heterozygous and homozygous subjects in vivo and in vitro studies	Phenotypic expression of the deficiency of galactokinase in subjects heterozygous and homozygous in vivo and in vitro.
4	metabolism of 4 14c estrone by sheep erythrocytes around the time of parturition	Metabolism of 4 estrone 14c by parturition sheep erythrocytes.
4	experiences at the blood transfusion center of the socialist republic of serbia in providing aimed transfusions	Experiences in the Serbian Socialist Republic Blood Transfusion Centre to provide targeted transfusions.
4	case of rh e and kell antigen sensitization by blood transfusion	Cases of sensitization to rh and kell antigens via blood transfusion.
4	the influence of the known radioprotective compounds on the metabolism of human red blood cell part ii the influence of cysteamine on enzymic systems	L' influence known radiation protective compounds on human erythrocyte Part II metabolism, l' influence cysteamine on enzyme systems.
4	effects of incorporated trypsin on anion exchange and membrane proteins in human red blood cell ghosts	The effects of trypsin incorporated into the anion exchange and membrane proteins in the human phantom red blood cell.
4	erythrocyte ph in respiratory and metabolic acid base disturbances studies on human blood in vitro	Erythrocyte in the in vitro studies of metabolic and respiratory disturbances of acidic bases in human blood.
4	distribution of sulfonamides and sulfonamide potentiators between red blood cells proteins and aqueous phases of the blood of different species	Distribution of sulfonamides and potentiating sulfonamides between red blood cell proteins and blood-water phases of different species.
4	problems in determination of oxygen dissociation of avian blood	Issues related to apo dissociation determination; oxygen in apo blood; bird through apo dissociation; apo blood oxygen; bird.
4	serial radionuclide determinations of the electron fraction with 99mtc labeled red blood cells	Serial determination of electron fraction of radionuclides with red blood cells labelled at 99 mtc.
4	hemolysis and hemolysis mechanisms in congenital dyserythropoietic anemia cda of type i ii iii	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
4	polyamine distribution in cellular compartments of blood and in aging erythrocytes	Distribution of polyamines in the blood cell wall and aging erythrocytes.
4	attenuation measurements of whole blood and blood fractions in computed tomography	Determine the amount of blood that will be lost to the bloodstream.
4	the effect of calf lymph and bovine red blood cells on in vitro cultivation of theileria parva infected lymphoid cells	The effect of lymph from calves and red blood cells from cattle on the in vitro culture of lymphoid cells infected with Theileria parva.
4	human red cell acid phosphatase quantitative evidence of a silent gene po and a danish population study	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been carried out in Denmark, including one in the United States and one in the United States.
4	red cell volume measurements and acute blood loss in high risk newborn infants	A comparison of the results of a randomized controlled trial with those of a randomized controlled trial.
4	detection of babes negri bodies in blood erythrocytes of rabid white mice	Detection of black baby bodies in the red blood cells of white rabid mice.
4	visualization of the human cavernosum penis by using 99mtc labeled autologous red blood cells	Human cavernosum penis visualization at apos; aid of 99mtc-marked autologous red blood cells.
4	influence of oxygen and carbon dioxide on the plasma erythrocyte ph relationship in normal human whole blood	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of the risk to human health.
4	use and analysis of saline washed red blood cells	Saline-washed red blood cell use and analysis.
4	regional quality control	Quality Control at the Regional Level.
4	the removal of leukocytes and platelets from whole blood	L' leukocyte and platelet elimination from whole blood.
4	ss blood group associated pas staining polymorphism of glycoprotein 3 from human erythrocyte membranes	Blood type ss associates human erythrocyte membrane glycoprotein 3 polymorphism with staining at-to-pas.
4	nature of the union between sheep red blood cells and t lymphocytes	N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A.
4	potential difference and the distribution of ions across the human red blood cell membrane a study of the mechanism by which the fluorescent cation dis c3 5 reports membrane potential	Potential difference and ion distribution across human erythrocyte membrane, a study of the mechanism by which c3 5 fluorescent cation yields membrane potential.
4	red blood cell selection in chimeric mice	Selection of chimerical mice for red blood cells.
4	blood group determinations in forensic dentistry	Legal Dental Blood Group Determination.
4	fast cell size distribution analysis by laser flow microphotometry applications to ciliate populations	A study of the effects of microphotometry on the growth and growth of the liver.
4	routine freezing of red blood cells for transfusion in western australia	For the purpose of this document, the following definitions are provided: 1.
4	carbonic anhydrase isozymes of blood and oviducal tissues of leghorn hens	Blood and oviducal tissue isozyme carbonic anhydrase in Leghorn chickens.
4	the blood groups serum groups red cell isoenzymes and haemoglobins of the sandawe and nyaturu of tanzania	Blood groups include erythrocyte isoenzymes and hemoglobins from Tanzania sandawe and nyaturu.
4	the chemotherapy of rodent malaria xxiv the blood schizontocidal action of erythromycin upon plasmodium berghei	Malaria chemotherapy in rodents xxiv l' blood schizontocide; erythromycin on berghei plasmodium.
4	familial deficiency of glutathione reductase in human blood cells	Family glutathione reductase deficiency in human blood cells.
4	peripheral blood elements found in an egyptian mummy a three dimensional view	The peripheral blood elements we found in an Egyptian mummy have a three-dimensional view.
4	erythrocyte morphology in genetic defects of the rh and kell blood group systems	Erythrocyte Morphology in Genetic Defects of Rh and Kell Blood Groups.
4	characterization of the antibody response of the marmoset to sheep red blood cells	Characterization of the Immune Response of Mosquito to Sheep Red Blood.
4	studies on blood eosinophils ii patients with l ffler s cardiomyopathy	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States.
4	the kurloff cell its differentiation in the blood and lymphatic system	The kurloff cell differentiates blood and the lymphatic system.
4	suppression of immune response to sheep red blood cells in mice treated with preparations of a tumor cell component and in tumor bearing mice	Suppression of the immune response to sheep erythrocytes in tumour-cell-treated and tumor-carrying mice.
4	immunosuppressive activity of submaxillary gland extracts of the mouse i effect on antibody formation in response to sheep red blood cells	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that the presence of erythrocyte-responsive antibodies is associated with the formation of erythrocyte antibodies.
4	complement and fc receptors on cord blood and adult neutrophils	Fc and Complementary Receptors for Umbilical Blood and Adult Neutrophils.
4	respiratory characteristics of blood from basenji dogs with classical erythrocyte pyruvate kinase deficiency	Respiratory characteristics of the blood of basenji dogs with a classic deficiency of erythrocyte pyruvate kinase.
4	the red blood cell esterase d polymorphism in europe and asia	L&apos polymorphism; European and Asian red cell esterase.
4	antigenic relationships on the diphtheria toxin molecule antitoxin versus antitoxoid	Antigenic relationships on antitoxoid versus antitoxoid diphtheria toxin molecule.
4	direct determination of ligand interactions with beta adrenergic receptors on intact turkey erythrocytes correlation of binding with biological activity	Direct determination of beta-adrenergic receptor ligand interactions on intact turkey erythrocytes, correlation of binding with etapos; biological activity.
4	long term of phenytoin effects on whole blood and red cell folate and haematological parameters	Long-term Effects of Phenytoin on Whole Blood and Erythrocyte Folate and Hematological Endpoints.
4	detection of anti red blood cell antibodies by treatment of the cells with neuraminidase	Detection of apo; anti-neuraminidase treatment of cells-erythrocytes.
4	quantitative determination of blood loss by means of 51 cr labeled erythrocytes in occult hemorrhages of the gastrointestinal tract	Quantitative Determination of Blood Loss by 51C-labeled Erythrocytes in Occult Hemorrhages of the Gastro-intestinal Tract.
4	survival of 51cr tagged red blood cells in patients with artificial heart valves author s transl	Survival of 51cr-labelled red blood cells in artificial heart valve patients.
4	formation of glutathione conjugates of prostaglandin a1 in human red blood cells	Prostaglandin a1 glutathione conjugate formation in human erythrocytes.
4	loading of human red blood cells with dna and rna	It's just a matter of time before you can load the human red cells with DNA and rna.
4	changes in the erythrocyte membrane during blood preservation influence of progesterone	Erythrocyte membrane changes during blood storage influence progesterone.
4	effect of sodium para aminosalicylate on oxygen affinity in normal sickle and fetal human blood	Effect of Sodium Aminosalicylate (Sodium Aminosalicylate) on apos; affinity for apos; oxygen in normal and fetal human blood.
4	changes in red blood cell volume on fixation in glutaraldehyde solutions	Changes in the volume of red blood cells during fixation in solutions of glutaraldehyde.
4	the rational use of blood	L' L' L' L' L' L&apos.
4	neuroleptic drug levels and therapeutic response preliminary observations with red blood cell bound butaperazine	Neuroleptic Drug Rate and Therapeutic Response Preliminary red blood cell-bound butaperazine observations.
4	lymphocyte subpopulations in the peripheral blood of patients with farmer s lung	For more information, visit www.cbsa.gc.ca/cbsa/index_e.html under www.cbsa.org.
4	electrophoresis of glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases in erythrocytes from malaria infected animals	Glucose electrophoresis: 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases in D&apos erythrocytes; malaria-infected animals.
4	morphological features of red blood cells in subjects with sickle cell trait changes during exercise	Morphological characteristics of erythrocytes of sickle cell-carrying subjects changed during exercise.
4	clinical trials of immunization with the towne 125 strain of human cytomegalovirus	Immunization with the human cytomegalovirus towne 125 strain.
4	multiple myeloma an immunologic profile i peripheral blood studies	Molecular Biology Molecular Biology Molecular Biology Molecular Biology.
4	the blood groups and other heriditary blood factors of yemenite and kurdish jews	Yemeni and Kurdish Jews' blood types and other blood factors.
4	acetylcholinesterase of erythrocytes in various blood diseases	Erythrocyte cell carcinoma (ECC) is a disease of the liver.
4	seasonal changes in the makeup of the red blood of healthy children	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
4	haematological changes associated with the mcleod phenotype of the kell blood group system	Hematological changes associated with mcleod phenotype of blood group system kell.
4	electrokinetic properties of formed elements in blood exposed to physical factors	Electrokinetic properties of physically exposed blood elements.
4	physical chemical characterization of living cells by laser flow microfluorometry	Physico-laser flow microfluorometry characterization of living cells.
4	the influence of the combination of coumarin and troxerutin on infantile blood parameter in lactation period short communication author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
4	the effects of zinc on the morphology of sickle red blood cell ghosts as observed by scanning electron microscopy	Effects of zinc on scanning electron microscopy (SEM) morphology of sickle cell ghosts.
4	electronic measurement of red cell flow in micropipettes	Electronic flow measurement in micropipettes.
4	the relationship between the red cell forms and surface area during thyroxine induced metamorphosis in rana cyanophlyctis	The relationship between red blood cell shape and surface during thyroxine administration induced cyanophlyctis to undergo metamorphosis.
4	thiamine content and enzyme activity in blood cells in leukemia	Thiamine levels and blood cell enzyme activity during leukemia.
4	purification of normal human eosinophils using the different binding capacities of blood leucocytes for complexed rabbit igg	Purification of normal human eosinophils using different blood leukocyte binding capacities for complexed rabbit eosinophils.
4	the substance reacting with srbc sheep red blood cells and rabbit igg isolation under mild conditions from rat thymus	The substance reacts with red blood cells of sheep srbc and l' isolation of the rabbit igg under mild conditions from the rat thymus.
4	blood of the common indian weaver birds ploceus philippinus and ploceus benghalensis linnaeus	The blood of the ploceus philippinus and the ploceus benghalensis linnaeus of the Indian common weaver.
4	the human blood platelet its derivation from the red blood cell a morphologic study	Human blood platelets are derived from erythrocytes, a morphological study.
4	regulation of blood pyridoxal phosphate in riboflavin deficiency in man	Acute toxicity of 1,4-butoxyethanol to rats.
4	human lymphocyte subpopulations giant human red blood cell rosettes	Sub--populations of human lymphocytes Giant rosettes of human red blood cells.
4	a carbohydrate deficient membrane glycoprotein in human erythrocytes of phenotype s s	A carbohydrate-deficient membrane glycoprotein was found in phenotype s human erythrocytes.
4	effects of selenium and vitamin e on blood selenium levels tissue glutathione peroxidase activities and white muscle disease in sheep fed purified or hay diets	Selenium and vitamin effects on serum selenium levels, tissue glutathione peroxidase activity and white muscle disease in sheep fed purified diets or hay.
4	phagocytosis of old red blood cells by macrophages from syngeneic mice in vitro	Old red blood cell phagocytosis by syngenic mouse macrophages in vitro.
4	turbulent flow of red cells in dilute suspensions effect on kinetics of o2 uptake	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
4	anti lu14 a lutheran antibody defining the product of an allele at the lu8 blood group locus	Anti lu14 a Lutheran antibody that defines the product of d' a blood group locus lu8.
4	blood group d antigen content of nucleated red cell precursors	Antigen content of Nucleated Blood Group Red Blood Cell Precursors d.
4	a photodecomposition fluorimetric method for determination of riboflavin in the various constitutents of blood	Fluorometric Photodecomposition Method for Determination of Riboflavin in Various Blood Components.
4	distribution of riboflavin in blood in women and in prenates	Riboflavin distribution in the blood of women and women in the prenatal phase.
4	stabilization of flow properties of blood with phenylbenzo gama pyrone derivatives flavonoids	Stabilization of d&apos properties; blood flow with phenylbenzo gama-pyrone-derived flavonoids.
4	removal of blood group determinants from bovine erythrocyte membranes 3 action of proteolytic enzymes on intact cells	Removal of bovine erythrocyte membrane blood group determinants 3 action of proteolytic enzymes on intact cells.
4	crossreactivity with sporozoites exoerythrocytic forms and blood schizonts of plasmodium berghei in indirect fluorescent antibody tests with sera of rats immunized with sporozoites or infected blood	Cross-reactivity with exoerythrocytic sporozoites and plasmodium berghei blood schizonts in indirect fluorescence tests with sporozoite- or infected-immunized rat sera.
4	factors affecting the exchange of tocopherol between red blood cells and plasma	It's the same thing, it's the same thing, it's the same thing.
4	relationship between blood zinc level and eeg changes under the influence of hyperpnea in normal subjects	The relationship between the level of zinc in the blood and changes in the baseline; ego under the baseline; influence of the baseline; hyperpnea in normal subjects.
4	blood group abh specific macroglycolipids of human erythrocytes isolation in high yield from a crude membrane glycoprotein fraction	Bacteria that have been found to be carcinogenic in humans and that have been found to be carcinogenic to humans are considered to be carcinogenic.
4	transfer of bovine j blood group determinant onto erythrocytes isolation and identification of a blocker	Bovine blood type determinant transferred to apo; erythrocyte isolation and apo identification; blocker.
4	selective depression of blood group antigens associated with hereditary ovalocytosis among melanesians	Selective Depression of Blood Group Antigen Associated with Apos; Hereditary Oocytosis in Melanesians.
4	an automated method of differential red blood cell classification with application to the diagnosis of anemia	Automated Differential Red Blood Cell Classification Method for Diagnosis of Anemia.
4	uniform lateral orientation caused by flow forces of flat particles in flow through systems	In the case of a single particle, the mass of the particle is equal to the mass of the mass of the particle.
4	altered humoral immune response to sheep red blood cells by sheep erythrocyte soluble hemolysate	Modification of the humoral immune response to red blood cells of sheep by apos; hemolysate soluble in sheep erythrocytes.
4	porphyrins in erythrocytes and blood plasma preliminary studies with qualitative thin layer chromatography	Porphyrins in Erythrocytes and Blood Plasma Preliminary Studies with Thin Layer Qualitative Chromatography.
4	the use of frozen thawed erythrocytes in blood banking a report of 28 months experience in a large transfusion service	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim, and that it is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
4	relationship between microvascular blood velocity and pressure distribution	The ratio of the microvascular blood flow rate to the pressure distribution.
4	bovine peripheral blood monocyte cultures growth characteristics and cellular receptors for immunoglobulin g and complement	Growth characteristics of cultures of bovine peripheral blood monocytes and cell receptors for apos; immunoglobulin g and complement.
4	an interpretation of human diaphorase isozymes in terms of three gene loci dia1 dia2 and dia3	An interpretation of the isozymes of human diaphorase in terms of three loci of the dia1 dia2 and dia3 genes is proposed.
4	autoxidation and effects of pro and antioxidants in lyophilized red blood cell membranes	Antioxidant and pro-oxidant autoxidation in lyophilized erythrocyte membranes.
4	transfer of bovine j blood group activity to human erythrocytes in vitro	In vitro transfer of l' activity of the bovine blood group to human erythrocytes.
4	an attempt to separate mononuclear cells fused with human red blood cell ghosts from a cell mixture treated with hvj sendai virus using a fluorescence activated cell sorter facs ii	Attempted separation of fused mononuclear cells with dapos phantom human red blood cells; a mixture of Hvj virus-treated cells sent to apos; aid of apos; fluorescence-activated cell sorter ii.
4	congenital dyserythropoietic anaemia types i and ii aberrant pattern of erythrocyte membrane proteins in cda ii as revealed by two dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Type i and type ii congenital dyserythropoietic anemia, erythrocyte membrane protein aberrant pattern in cda ii, as revealed by two-dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
4	scintigraphic assessment of vascularity and blood tissue barrier of human brain tumours	Scintigraphic evaluation of blood tissue barrier and vascularity in human brain tumours.
4	genetic structure of an isolated group of the indigenous population of northern siberia nganasans tavgiitsi of taymyr i history erythrocyte and serum blood systems isoenzymes	Genetic structure d' an isolated group from the northern Siberian indigenous population taymyr histories of isoenzymous erythrocytes and serum blood systems.
4	the relationship between extra and intracellular lithium concentration in human red blood cells an in vitro study	The relationship between the intracellular and extracellular concentration of lithium in human erythrocytes was investigated in vitro.
4	nuclear steady state rna from chicken immature red blood cells distribution of globin coding and poly a sequences	Nuclear DNA at apos; apos state; equilibrium from immature chicken erythrocytes; distribution of globin- and polya-coding sequences.
4	relations between surface charge and in vitro lysis of red blood cells in paroxysmal nocturnal haemoglobinuria	Surface charge relation to in vitro red blood cell lysis in paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
4	angiotensinase activity in red blood cell membranes and intact adrenal cells	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that angiotensinase can be used as an antigen.
4	the present state of haemorheology methods findings and significance with regard to physiology and pathology of the blood circulation author s transl	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is important to note that this is not the case, and that it is not the case.
4	change of oxygen affinity of hemoglobin in different conditions of blood preservation	It is not possible to distinguish between the two components, but it is important to distinguish between the two components.
4	agglutination of the red blood cells after experimental glycolytic alteration	Red blood cell agglutination after glycolytic alteration experiment.
4	a like specificity in tn activated erythrocytes of blood group b	Similar tn specificity activated b-blood group erythrocytes.
4	changes in the membrane proteins of blood cells in the course of embryonal megaloerythropoiesis in relation to hemoglobin maturation	Changes in blood cell membrane proteins during embryonic megal erythropoiesis related to etapos maturation; hemoglobin.
4	methemoglobin formation and binding to blood constituents as indicators for the formation availability and reactivity of activated metabolites derived from trans 4 aminostilbene and related aromatic amines	Methemoglobin formation and its binding to blood components are indicators of the availability and reactivity of trans-derived activated metabolites-4 aminostilbene and related aromatic amines.
4	antigens of the blood group i and i on the surfacc of chicken erythrocytes	Blood Group I and I antigens on chicken erythrocyte surfacc.
4	transfusion requirements of patients with enzyme deficient red blood cells	Transfusion Transfusion Requirements for Patients with Enzyme Deficient Red Blood Cells.
4	identification of the cl transport site of human red blood cells by a kinetic analysis of the inhibitory effects of a chemical probe	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of the results of this study.
5	the concentration of glucose in mammalian liver	Mammalian liver glucose concentration.
5	a continuous flow method for the determination of glucose uptake by excised rat diaphragm	Continuous flow method for determination of apos; glucose absorption by the rat diaphragm.
5	effect of galactose 1 phosphate on glucose oxidation by normal and galactosemic leukocytes	Effect of galactose phosphate 1 on apos; oxidation of glucose by galactosemic and normal leukocytes.
5	true glucose content of lumbar and ventricular cerebrospinal fluid	This is the true level of glucose in the cerebrospinal fluid-lumbar and ventricular spinal cord.
5	enthalpy changes associated with the lactic fermentation of glucose	The results of this study are summarized below.
5	effects of veratrine and cocaine on cerebral carbohydrate amino acid interrelations	Effects of Cocaine and Veratrin on the Relationships Between Brain Carbohydrate Amino Acids.
5	glycogen synthesis from uridine diphosphate glucose the distribution of the enzyme in liver cell fractions	The synthesis of glycogen from uridine glucose diphosphates the distribution of l' enzyme in fractions of liver cells.
5	dissimilation of glucose and gluconic acid by pseudomonas natriegens	Glucose and glucose dissimulation; pseudomonas natriegens gluconic acid.
5	glucose dehydrogenation in bacteria a comparative study	The dehydrogenation of glucose in bacterial cells is a comparative study.
5	a growth stimulating factor for an epithelial cell line in a reduced serum medium	In addition, it is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
5	oxidative assimilation and distribution of glucose in bacillus cereus	Oxidative Assimilation and Glucose Distribution in Bacillus cereus.
5	citric acid fermentation of sugars purified with chelating resin	It is also used in the manufacture of carbohydrates, such as carbohydrates and carbohydrates.
5	the effect of exogenous energy sources on the synthesis of beta galactosidase in resting cell suspensions of escherichia coli	The effect of exogenous sources on beta galactosidase synthesis in resting apos cell suspensions; escherichia coli.
5	glucose 6 phosphatase and the exchange of glucose with glucose 6 phosphate	Glucose exchange with glucose 6 phosphate.
5	intravenous nutrition a clinical evaluation of a 50 per cent dextrose in water solution containing 1 mg of hydrocortisone per 100 ml	Intravenous Nutrition: clinical assessment of apos; 50% aqueous dextrose containing 1 mg d*apos; hydrocortisone per 100 mL.
5	the inheritance of the glucose component of the phage nucleic acids	L' inheritance of phage nucleic acid glucose component.
5	tryptophanase tryptophan synthetase systems in escherichia coli ii effect of glucose	Escherichia coli tryptophan synthetase systems ii glucose effect.
5	permeability of bacterial spores i characterization of glucose uptake	Bacterial spore permeability i traceability; glucose absorption.
5	inhibitory effects of carbohydrates on histamine release and mast cell disruption by dextran	Effect of carbohydrate inhibition on the release of histamine and the disruption of mast cells by dextran.
5	glucose uptake and dissimilation by x irradiated starved and division inhibited yeast	Yeast is inhibited by absorption and dissimilation of glucose by irradiated yeasts subjected to fasting and division.
5	biosynthesis and biosynthetic pathways of pentoses in escherichia coli	Pentose Biosynthesis and Biosynthetic Pathways in Escherichia coli.
5	enzymes of glucose and pyruvate catabolism in cells spores and germinated spores of clostridium botulinum	Glucose and catabolism enzymes of pyruvate in germinated and cellular spores of clostridium botulinum.
5	substrate specificity of a glucose permease of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
5	conditions affecting bacillus megaterium spore germination in glucose or various nitrogenous compounds	Conditions affecting the germination of bacillus megaterium spores in either glucose or various nitrogen-containing compounds.
5	cysteine stimulation of glucose oxidation in thyroid tissue	Stimulation by cysteine of the liver; oxidation of glucose in the thyroid tissue.
5	convulsive syndrome in rabbits injected with fat emulsion and heparin	It is also a condition of the lungs, which is a condition of the lungs and lungs.
5	multicomponent substrate utilization by natural populations and a pure culture of escherichia coli	In addition to the above, there are a number of other organisms that may be present in the environment.
5	trachoma agent glucose utilization by purified suspensions	L' use of glucose as trachoma agent by means of purified suspensions.
5	fermentative activities of control and radiation killed spores of clostridium botulinum	Control and radiation fermentation activities killed Clostridium botulinum spores.
5	freezing out technique applied to the concentration of biologically active materials	Freezing technique applied to biologically active material concentration.
5	nutritional requirements for the production of herpes simplex virus i influence of glucose and glutamine of herpes simplex virus production by hela cells	Nutritional requirements for apovirus production; herpes simplex i influences glucose and glutamine production of apovirus; herpes simplex by helical cells.
5	glyoxylate metabolism in growth and sporulation of bacillus cereus	Glyoxylate metabolism in sporulation and growth of the bacillus cereus.
5	carbohydrate and lipid content of radiation resistant and sensitive strains of escherichia coli	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the risk assessment.
5	utilization of arginine as an energy source for the growth of streptococcus faecalis	In addition, it has been shown that there is a need for more information on the use of antimicrobials.
5	physiological changes occurring in yeast undergoing glucose repression	Physiological changes in glucose-repressed yeast.
5	enzymatic utilization of glucose by a basidiomycete	Basidiomycete enzyme utilization of glucose.
5	effect of glucose on the activity of hypothalamic feeding centers	Glucose effects on apos; hypothalamic food center activity.
5	isocitrate lyase and malate synthase in pseudomonas indigofera i suppression and stimulation during growth	In vitro fertilization is the process of fertilization and fertilization.
5	studies on the physiology of rickettsiae iii glucose phosphorylation and hexokinase activity in coxiella burnetii	Physiology of Glucose Phosphorylation and Lapos; Lapos Activity; Hexokinase in Coxiella burnetii.
5	purification and characterization of a growth stimulant for bacillus species	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
5	2 ketogluconate fermentation by streptococcus faecalis	Fermentation of 2 ketogluconates with streptococcus faecalis.
5	nutritional requirements of bacillus popilliae	Nutritional requirements for the E. coli Popilliae.
5	accumulation of phosphorus compounds by mucor racemosus	L' phosphorus compound accumulation by racemosus mucor.
5	control of isocitratase formation in rhizopus nigricans	Control of the formation of etapos; isocitratase in rhizopus nigricans.
5	in vitro inhibition of yeast growth by mouse ascites fluid and serum	In vitro, in vitro, inhibits the growth of yeasts by the use of fluid from mice and serum.
5	green fluorescent pigment accumulated by a mutant of cellvibrio gilvus	Accumulated green fluorescent pigment from a cellvibrio gilvus mutant.
5	staphylococci in competition iv effect of starch and kind and concentration of sugar on staphylococcal growth in mixed populations	Competing Staphylococci x effect of starch and nature and sugar concentration on the growth of staphylococci in mixed populations.
5	mechanism of glucose transport across the yeast cell membrane	Cellular membrane transport mechanisms for glucose in yeast.
5	quantitative studies of the effect of organic substrates and 2 4 dinitrophenol on heterotrophic carbon dioxide fixation in hydrogenomonas facilis	Quantitative studies of the effects of organic substrates and 24 dinitrophenols on the heterotrophic fixation of carbon dioxide in apos; Hydroomonas facilis.
5	the frictional coefficients of the flows of non electrolytes through artificial membranes	Friction coefficients for non--electrolyte flows through artificial membranes.
5	prediction of discrimination from generalization after variations in schedule of reinforcement	Discrimination prediction from generalization after changes in reinforcement schedule.
5	pathways of glucose catabolism in bacillus subtilis	Patterns of subtilis bacillus glucose catabolism.
5	effect of bacterial polysaccharide accumulation on infiltration of water through sand	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that bacterial polysaccharides accumulate in soil.
5	sequential substrate removal in response to qualitative shock loading of activated sludge systems	Sequential removal of the substrate in response to the qualitative shock load of activated sludge systems.
5	patterns of oxidative assimilation in strains of acetobacter and azotobacter	The results of this study are summarized below.
5	induced biosynthesis of alpha amylase by growing cultures of bacillus stearothermophilus	Alpha amylase biosynthesis was induced by growing stearothermophilus bacilli.
5	de novo synthesis of alpha amylase by bacillus stearothermophilus	Alpha-amylase by stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	streptomycin formation by intact mycelium of streptomyces griseus	Intact mycelial formation of streptomycin by streptomyces griseus.
5	sugar transport in a psychrophilic yeast	Psychrophilic yeast sugar transport.
5	physiology of the enterococci as related to their taxonomy	Enterococci physiology in relation to taxonomy.
5	nutrition of cellular slime molds iii specific growth requirements of polysphondylium pallidum	Specific requirements for growth of polysphondylium pallidum.
5	biosynthesis of ribose and deoxyribose in pseudomonas saccharophila	Ribose and deoxyribose biosynthesis in Pseudomonas succharophila.
5	intestinal disaccharidases absence in two species of sea lions	Two species of seals lacked intestinal disaccharidases.
5	mechanisms in the inhibition of microorganisms by sorbic acid	Mechanism(s); microbial inhibition by lutein; sorbic acid.
5	glucose catabolism by bacillus popilliae and bacillus lentimorbus	Glucose catabolism by lenmorbus and popilliae bacilli.
5	chemically defined synthetic media for sporulation and for germination and growth of bacillus subtilis	Synthetic chemically defined media for bacillus subtilis sporulation, germination, and growth.
5	pathways of glucose catabolism in bacillus cereus	Pathways of cereus bacillus glucose catabolism.
5	changes in terminal respiratory pathways of intact cells of bacillus cereus at various stages of development	Changes in the terminal respiratory tract of the bacillus cereus intact cells at various stages of development.
5	pathways for biosynthesis of a bacterial capsular polysaccharide iv capsule resynthesis by decapsulated resting cell suspensions	In addition, the cell may be used as a substrate for the formation of the cell, which may be used as a substrate.
5	purification and properties of n acetyl d glucosamine kinase from streptococcus pyogenes	Purification and properties of streptococcus pyogenes nacetyl glucosamine kinase.
5	aerobic fermentation and the depletion of the amino acid pool in yeast cells	Aerobic fermentation and apo pool depletion; amino acids in yeast cells.
5	glucose transfer from adenosine diphosphate glucose to starch in preparations of waxy seeds	Transfer of glucose from apos; adenosine glucose diphosphate to apos; starch into waxy seed preparations.
5	production of lipase by pseudomonas fragi in a synthetic medium	Lipase production by Pseudomonas fragi in synthetic medium.
5	effect of carbohydrates in phosphate buffer on germination of bacillus stearothermophilus spores	Effect of phosphate buffer carbohydrate on spore germination of stearothermophilus bacillus.
5	dynamics of acridine orange cell interaction ii dye induced ultrastructural changes in multivesicular bodies acridine orange particles	The dynamics of l' interaction of acridine orange cells ii the dye induces ultrastructural changes in the multivesicular bodies of acridine orange particles.
5	protection of renal function during surgery of the abdominal aorta	Renal function protection during abdominal aortic surgery.
5	an evaluation of some commercial test papers and tablets for the determination of glucose in urine	Evaluation of certain tests and commercial tablets for urine glucose determination.
5	a synthetic acyl polysaccharide and the hemagglutination activity	Synthetic d&apos polysaccharide; acyl and l' d&apos activity; hemagglutination.
5	action of dihydrostreptomycin and antagonism by cations	L' dihydrostreptomycin and l' cation antagonism.
5	viability and metabolism of staphylococcus aureus after freezing lyophilization and irradiation	Staphylococcus aureus viability and metabolism after freeze-drying and irradiation.
5	nutritional and regulatory aspects of serine metabolism in escherichia coli	Nutritional and regulatory aspects of Escherichia coli (ES coli) serine metabolism.
5	growth and extracellular polysaccharide production by rhizobium meliloti in defined medium	Rhizobium meliloti growth and production of extracellular polysaccharides in a defined medium.
5	immune diffusion analysis of the extracellular soluble antigens of two strains of rhizobium meliloti	Immunoblot analysis of extracellular soluble antigens from two rhizobial meliloti strains.
5	bone cells biochemical and biological studies after enzymatic isolation	Enzyme isolation and biochemical studies on bone cells.
5	patterns of oxidative assimilation in strains of pseudomonas and achromobacter	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of organisms.
5	electron transport components of streptomycin dependent escherichia coli	Streptomycin-dependent escherichia coli.
5	glucose metabolism of two strains of mycoplasma laidlawii	Glucose metabolism in two mycoplasma laidlawii strains.
5	inhibitory action of phage k on staphylococcal dehydrogenases i effect on various strains of staphylococcus aureus including members of the phage typing series	The inhibitory action of phage k on i-staphylococcal dehydrogenases has effects on various staphylococcus aureus strains, including members of the phage series.
5	induction of alpha amylase of bacillus stearothermophilus by maltodextrins	Stearothermophilic bacillus alpha amylase induced by maltodextrins.
5	kinases of streptococcus faecalis i enzyme localization	In addition, there is a need for additional research to determine the effectiveness of the enzyme.
5	selective inhibition of proline induced pigmentation in washed cells of serratia marcescens	Selective proline inhibition induces pigmentation in washed serratia marcescens cells.
5	turbidity change during glucose permeation in escherichia coli	Modification of turbidity during permeation of glucose in escherichia coli.
5	metabolic role of the br factor in butyribacterium rettgeri	Metabolic role of bractor in butyribacterium rettgeri.
5	conversion of glucose c14 to propionate by the rumen microbiota	Conversion of c14 glucose by rumen microflora to propionate.
5	oxidative assimilation by bacillus megaterium	Bacillus megaterium oxidative assimilation.
5	influence of growth medium on assimilatory activities of escherichia coli	Growth medium influences potato activities; potato uptake; escherichia coli.
5	comparative physiology of antibiotic resistant strains of staphylococcus aureus	Physiology comparison of antibiotic-resistant Staphylococcus aureus strains.
5	biosynthesis of serine in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium serine biosynthesis.
5	carbohydrate nutrition and sporulation of allescheria boydii	Carbohydrate and sporulation; allescheria boydii.
5	isolation of toxigenic strains of clostridium novyi from soil	Isolate Clostridium novyi toxigenic strains from soil.
5	effect of catalase and cultural conditions on growth of beggiatoa	Growth of beggiatoa is influenced by catalase and cultural conditions.
5	factors that influence toxigenicity of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Factors influencing pseudomonas aeruginosa toxigenicity.
5	benzo a pyrene uptake by bacteria and yeast	Bacteria and yeasts absorb benzo a pyrene.
5	actinomycin d inhibition of protein synthesis unrelated to effect on template rna synthesis	Inhibition by apos; actinomycin d of unrelated protein synthesis; effect of rna matrix synthesis.
5	the role of polyphosphates in the transport mechanism of glucose in yeast cells	The Role of Polyphosphates in the Mechanism of Glucose Transport in Yeast Cells.
5	effect of glucose on the capacity of escherichia coli to be infected by a virulent lamba bacteriophage	Glucose effect on ability; Escherichia coli d' being infected with virulent bacteriophage lamba.
5	growth stasis by accumulated l alpha glycerophosphate in escherichia coli	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent of the increase.
5	extracellular polysaccharides of algae effects on life support systems	Extracellular polysaccharides from life-supporting systems.
5	fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus i carbohydrate sources for the production of protease and streptomycin	Fermentation studies with sources of graiseous streptomycin carbohydrates for protease and streptomycin production.
5	production of calcium gluconate by penicillium chrysogenum in submerged culture	Calcium gluconate production by submerged-culture penicillium chrysogenum.
5	adaptive changes in enzyme activity and metabolic pathways in adipose tissue from meal fed rats	Adaptive alterations of appetite; metabolic pathways and enzyme activity in adipose tissue of meal-fed rats.
5	effect of phenol on bacillus subtilis spores at elevated temperatures	Effect of phenol on spores of high-temperature bacillus subtilis.
5	the use of gas liquid chromatography in the analysis of neutral monosaccharides in hydrolysates of gastric mucopolysaccharides	Use of-Liquid Gas Chromatography for L' Neutral Monosaccharide Analysis in Gas Mucopolysaccharide Hydrolysates.
5	effects of intravenous infusions of acetate beta hydroxybutyrate triglyceride and other metabolites on the composition of the milk fat and blood in cows	Intravenous infusions of apo; beta acetate-triglyceride hydroxybutyrate and d' other metabolites affect milk fat and blood composition in cows.
5	constitution viability and lactate dehydrogenase in stationary phase l cell suspension cultures	The viability of lactate dehydrogenase and lactate constitution in suspension cultures of stationary phase l cells.
5	sorbose counterflow as a measure of intracellular glucose in baker s yeast	Sorbosis vs.-Flux as a Measure of Intracellular Glucose in Bakery Yeast.
5	morphology of mycoplasma laidlawii type a ii effect of glucose on growth and cellular morphology	Mycoplasma laidlawii type morphology has a glucose effect on growth and cell morphology.
5	quantitative studies on glycolytic enzymes in lactobacillus plantarum ii intracellular concentrations of glycolytic intermediates in glucose metabolizing washed cells	Quantitative studies of lactobacillus plantarum glycolytic enzymes ii intracellular concentrations of etapos; glycolytic intermediates in washed glucose-metabolizing cells.
5	host parasite relationships among group a streptococci i hyaluronic acid production by virulent and avirulent strains	Relationships between parasites of the streptococcal group and production of hyaluronic acid by avirulent and virulent strains.
5	fate of the mesosomes of bacillus megaterium during protoplasting	The fate of megaterium mesosomes during protoplasty.
5	metabolism of intracellular polysaccharide by streptococcus mitis and its relation to inducible enzyme formation	The metabolism of the intracellular polysaccharide by streptococcus mitis and its relationship to the formation of inducible enzymes.
5	the chemotherapy of cardiac arrest	Cardiac arrest.
5	mechanism of action of nalidixic acid on escherichia coli	It is not possible to determine the cause of death.
5	metabolic nonequivalence of the two glucose moieties of cellobiose in cellvibrio gilvus	The metabolic non @-@equivalence of cellvibrio gilvus glucose moieties.
5	fumarate reduction and its role in the diversion of glucose fermentation by streptococcus faecalis	Fumarate reduction and its role in glucose fermentation diversion by streptococcus faecalis.
5	lactate degrading system in butyribacterium rettgeri subject to glucose repression	Lactate-degrading system in glucose-repressed Butyribacterium rettgeri.
5	biochemistry of nitrate respiration in pseudomonas stutzeri i aerobic and nitrate respiration routes of carbohydrate catabolism	The biochemistry of nitrate respiration in nitrate and aerobic respiratory tract pseudomonas stutzeri and carbohydrate catabolism.
5	cyst formation and poly beta hydroxybutyric acid accumulation in azotobacter	The formation of cysts and l' accumulation of beta-hydroxybutyric acid in the azotobacteria.
5	oxidation and assimilation of carbohydrates by micrococcus sodonensis	Micrococcus sodonensis carbohydrate oxidation and assimilation.
5	factors affecting the formation of cobamide coenzymes in clostridium tetanomorphum	Factors Affecting Cobamid Coenzyme Formation in Clostridium tetanomorphum.
5	fructose 6 phosphate reductase from salmonella gallinarum	Fructose 6 Phosphate reductase of the Salmonella gallinarum.
5	morphological aberration of arthrobacter globiformis cells due to biotin deficiency	Morphological aberration of d&apos cells; biotin-deficient arthrobacter globiformis.
5	production and characterization of multiple layered populations of animal cells	Production and characterization of multilayered animal cell populations.
5	regulation of cockroach fat body metabolism by the corpus cardiacum in vitro	Regulation of the metabolism of the fat body of cockroaches by the body of the heart in vitro.
5	intestinal metabolism of fatty acids	Intestinal fatty acid metabolism.
5	the biosynthesis of streptomycin the origin of the c formyl group of streptose	Streptomycin originates from the c-formyl group of streptosis.
5	estimation of the pentose cycle in the perfused cow s udder	Estimation of pentose cycle in cow perfused udder.
5	the metabolism of glucose by the rabbit lens in the presence and absence of oxygen	Rabbit lens glucose metabolism in the presence and absence of oxygen.
5	the cell walls of group d streptococci i the immunochemistry of the type 1 carbohydrate	Cell walls of type 1 carbohydrate-immunochemical grouping streptococci.
5	autonomic mediation of the effect of raised arterial glucose upon free fatty acids	An increase in arterial glucose on free fatty acids.
5	chemotaxis in bacteria	Bacterial chemotaxis.
5	feedback inhibition of glycerol kinase a catabolic enzyme in escherichia coli	Retroinhibition of the glycerol kinase, a catabolic enzyme, in Escherichia coli.
5	effect of oxygen supply rates on growth of escherichia coli	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
5	effect of tryptophan on growth and morphology of hansenula schneggii cells	Effect of tryptophan on cell morphology and growth of Hansenula schneggii.
5	effects of prolonged incubation of isolated fat cells on their response to hormones stimulating lipolysis and glucose metabolism	Effects of apo; prolonged incubation of the isolated fat cells on their response to lipolysis- and glucose-promoting hormones.
5	sorbitol pathway presence in nerve and cord with substrate accumulation in diabetes	In addition, there is a pathway of sorbitol in the nerve and spinal cord with accumulation of substrate in diabetes.
5	polysaccharide produced by the genus pullularia ii trans alpha glucosidation by acetone cells of pullularia	Polysaccharide produced by pullularia genus ii trans alpha-glucosidation by pullularia acetonic cells.
5	nitrite reductase of escherichia coli specific for reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide specific nitrite reductase d' escherichia coli.
5	endogenous metabolism of azotobacter agilis	Endogenous apos metabolism; azotobacter agilis.
5	respiration of mengovirus infected l 929 cells	Meningococci-infected mengovirus respiration, 929 cells.
5	the effect of inhibitors on intestinal transfer of glucose and fluid	Lapses inhibitors affect intestinal glucose and fluid transfer.
5	respiratory activity and maintenance of cell suspensions of rat liver	Respiratory activity and cell suspension maintenance in rat liver.
5	brain transplantation prolonged survival of brain after carotid jugular interposition	Brain transplants prolonged brain survival following carotid jugular interposition.
5	ornithine transcarbamylase enzymes occurrence in bacillus licheniformis	Ornithine transcarbamylase enzymes were found to be present in the bacillus licheniformis.
5	sequential substrate removal in a dilute system by heterogeneous microbial populations	Sequential removal of dilute substrate by heterogeneous microbial populations.
5	heterotrophic growth and production of xanthophylls by chlorella pyrenoidosa	Heterotrophic growth and xanthophyll production by chlorine pyrenoidosa.
5	effect of diet on the activity of several enzymes in extracts of rumen microorganisms	Effect of diet on apos; activity of several enzymes in rumen microorganism extracts.
5	isolation identification and metabolic role of the sudanophilic granules of zoogloea ramigera	Identification and role of the Sudanophilic granules of zoogloea ramigera.
5	carbohydrate catabolism of mima polymorpha i supplemental energy from glucose added to a growth medium	Polymorpha mima carbohydrate catabolism; glucose energy added to growth medium.
5	altered end product patterns and catabolite repression in escherichia coli	Changes in catabolite repression and end product profiles in escherichia coli.
5	physiology of growth and sporulation in bacillus cereus i effect of glutamic and other amino acids	The presence of a protein in the intestinal tract and the presence of a protein in the intestinal tract.
5	effects of organic matter on the growth of thiobacillus intermedius	Effects of Organic Matter on Thiobacillus intermedius Growth.
5	colorado tick fever virus in cell culture ii physical and chemical properties	Cell culture-colored tick fever virus ii Physical and chemical properties.
5	susceptibility and resistance of several fungi to microbial lysis	Many fungi are vulnerable and resistant to microbial lysis.
5	influence of exogenous substrates on the endogenous respiration of pseudomonas aeruginosa	L' exogenous substrate influence on endogenous respiration of Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	purification and properties of adenosine 5 triphospae d glucose 6 phosphotransferase from rat liver	Purification and properties of rat liver epos; adenosine, 5 glucose triphospae, 6 rat liver phosphotransferase.
5	studies on lipogenesis in vivo effect of dietary fat or starvation on conversion of 14 glucose into fat ad turnover of newly synthsized fat	Effects of dietary fat lipogenesis or fasting on the conversion of 14 glucose to turnover of newly synthesized fats.
5	effects of insulin induced hypoglycaemia on the fate of glucose carbon atoms in the mouse	The effects of glucose; glucose-induced hypoglycaemia; insulin on the fate of the carbon atoms of glucose in the mouse.
5	the effect of different hormonal conditions on the concentration and oxidoreduction state of the nicotinamide nucleotides of rat liver	Effects of various hormonal conditions on concentration and weight; state of onset; nicotinamide nucleotide oxidation in rat liver.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in liver from foetal and neonatal sheep	National Advisory Council on the Status of Women.
5	carbon dioxide effects on glucose catabolism by mixed microbial cultures	Effects of Carbon Dioxide on Glucose Catabolism by Mixed Microbial Cultures.
5	changes in the intracellular concentrations of adenosine phosphates and nicotinamide nucleotides during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast on different carbon sources	Changes in intracellular nicotinamide phosphate, adenosine and nicotinamide nucleotide concentrations during the yeast aerobic growth cycle at different carbon sources.
5	clearing factor lipase in adipose tissue factors influencing the increase in enzyme activity produced on incubation of tissue from starved rats in vitro	The lipase of the clear factor in the factors of the adipose tissue influences the apos; the increase of the apos; the enzymatic activity produced during the apos; the incubation of the tissue of rats deprived of food in vitro.
5	acceleration of renal gluconeogenesis by ketone bodies and fatty acids	Renal gluconeogenesis is accelerated by keto bodies and fatty acids.
5	factors affecting the rate of killing of escherichia coli by repeated freezing and thawing	Factors Affecting the Destruction Rate of Dapos; Escherichia coli by Repeated Freezing and Thawing.
5	replication of mycoplasma pneumoniae in broth culture	Mycoplasma pneumoniae replication in culture broth.
5	relationship of carbon dioxide to aspartic acid and glutamic acid in actinomyces naeslundii	Relationship between carbon dioxide, l' aspartic acid and l' actinomyces naeslundii glutamic acid.
5	circumvention of the mycobactin requirement of mycobacterium paratuberculosis	Mycobacterium paratuberculosis mycobacterium requirement circumvented.
5	enzymes of glucose catabolism in a member of the psittacosis group	Glucose catabolism enzymes in a psittacosis group.
5	volatile fatty acid requirement of a strain of listeria monocytogenes	It is not possible to determine the origin of the product.
5	the fate of acetyl groups derived from glucose in the isolated perfused goat udder	The fate of glucose-derived acetyl groups in isolated perfused goats.
5	the development of invertase activity in slices of the root of beta vulgaris l washed under aseptic conditions	The development of apos; apos activity; invertase in washed beta vulgaris root slices under aseptic conditions.
5	the biosynthesis of polysaccharides incorporation of d 1 14c glucose and d 6 14c glucose into plum leaf polysaccharides	Polysaccharide biosynthesis incorporating 1,140c glucose and 6140c glucose into the prune leaf polysaccharides.
5	glucosylated nucleotide sequences from t even bacteriophage deoxyribonucleic acids	Glucosylated nucleotide sequencing from the deoxyribonucleic acids (deoxyribonucleic acids) of bacteriophage t.
5	some properties of fructose 1 6 diphosphatase of rat liver and their relation to the control of gluconeogenesis	Certain properties of rat liver fructose 16 and their relationship to gluconeogenesis control.
5	rate of utilization of glucose and compartmentation of alpha oxoglutarate and glutamate in rat brain	Dapos; glucose utilization and rat brain compartmentalization; oxoglutarate alpha and glutamate.
5	citrate and the conversion of carbohydate into fat activities of citrate cleavage enzyme and acetate thiokinase in livers of normal and diabetic rats	Citrate and carbohydrate conversion into fat-like activities of the citrate-lapos cleavage enzyme; acetate thiokinase in the liver of normal and diabetic rats.
5	microbial growth on c1 compounds synthesis of cell constituents by methane and methanol grown pseudomonas methanica	Microbial growth on synthesized c1 compounds by methane and cultured methanol pseudomonas methanica.
5	properties of phosphofructokinase from rat liver and their relation to the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis	Properties of rat liver phosphofructokinase and its relation to glycolysis and gluconeogenesis control.
5	taste reception in the goat sheep and calf	Enjoy the reception at the home of the sheep and goat calves.
5	carp myogens of white and red muscles gross isolation on sephadex columns of the low molecular weight components and examination of their participation in anaerobic glycogenolysis	White and red carp myogenes crude isolation of low molecular weight components from serphadex columns and their participation in anaerobic glycogenolysis.
5	further studies on the regulation of amino sugar metabolism in bacillus subtilis	D' other studies regulating amino sugars metabolism in bacillus subtilis.
5	incorporation of c14 from carbon dioxide into sugar phosphates carboxylic acids and amino acids by clostridium thermoaceticum	Incorporation of c14 from carbon dioxide in phosphate, carboxylic and amino acid sugars by Clostridium thermoaceticum.
5	effects of growth rate and limiting substrate on glucose metabolism in escherichia coli	Effects of Growth Rate and Limiting Substrate on Glucose Metabolism in Escherichia coli.
5	release of nitrogenous substances by brewer s yeast iv energetics in shock excretion of amino acids	Release of nitrogen by the yeast brewer iv energy in amino acid shock excretion.
5	repression of tryptophanase synthesis in escherichia coli	Tryptophanase synthesis repression in Escherichia coli.
5	the incorporation of labelled amino sugars by bacillus subtilis	L' amino sugar incorporation marked by subtilis bacillus.
5	glutathione peroxidase in lens and a source of hydrogen peroxide in aqueous humour	Glutathione peroxidase in lentil and a source of hydrogen peroxide in the lentil; aqueous humour.
5	synthesis of the carbohydrate of mucus in the golgi complex as shown by electron microscope radioautography of goblet cells from rats injected with glucose h3	Electron microscopic radioautography of caliciform cells of rats injected with h3 glucose showed the synthesis of mucus carbohydrate in golgi.
5	radioautographic comparison of the uptake of galactose h and glucose h3 in the golgi region of various cells secreting glycoproteins or mucopolysaccharides	Radioautographic comparison of l' absorption of h3 galactose and h3 glucose in the Golgi-like region of various glycoprotein- or mucopolysaccharide-secreting cells.
5	sites of glycogen synthesis in rat liver cells as shown by electron microscope radioautography after administration of glucose h3	Glycogen synthesis sites in rat liver cells were revealed by electron microscopy following h3 glucose administration.
5	nitrate ions potentiation of increased permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction	Nitrate ions potentiated the muscle contraction-related increased permeability to sugar.
5	bacterial nutritional approach to mechanisms of oxygen toxicity	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
5	aging of escherichia coli	Escherichia coli.
5	effects of inhibition and repression on the utilization of substrates by heterogeneous bacterial communities	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of the results of this study.
5	a transglucosylase of streptococcus bovis	Bovis streptococcal transglucosylase.
5	endocrine factors in endometrial carcinoma a preliminary report	Preliminary Report on Endocrine Factors in Endometrial Carcinoma.
5	entry of glucose carbon into amino acids of rat brain and liver in vivo after injection of uniformly 14 c labelled glucose	L' uptake of carbon from glucose into amino acids in the brain and liver of rats in vivo after implantation; injection of glucose uniformly labelled at 14 c.
5	the route of ethanol formation in zymomonas mobilis	The ethanol–lapos pathway in zymomonas mobilis.
5	sucrose utilization by zymomonas mobilis formation of a levan	Zymomonas mobilis formation d' levan.
5	activities of some enzymes concerned with citrate and glucose metabolism in transplanted rat hepatomas	The activity of certain enzymes involved in the metabolism of citrate and glucose in hepatoma of transplanted rats.
5	changes in dry weight protein deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid and reserve and structural carbohydrate during the aerobic growth cycle of yeast	Changes in ribonucleic acid content of deoxyribonucleic acid, dry weight proteins, structural reserves and carbohydrates during aerobic yeast growth cycle.
5	the immunochemistry of shigella flexneri lipopolysaccharides a quantitative analysis of their monosaccharide constituents	L' immunochemistry of Shigella flexneri lipopolysaccharides is a quantitative analysis of monosaccharide components.
5	synthesis of reserve materials for endogenous metabolism in streptococcus faecalis	Synthesis of Stock for Endogenous Metabolism in Streptococcus faecalis.
5	amino acid utilization by alcaligenes viscolactis for growth and slime production	Use of amino acids by the viscolactis alkaligenes for growth and growth of mucus.
5	evidence for centers in the central nervous system that regulate fat mobilization in dogs	Evidence of the existence of central nervous system centers that regulate dog fat mobilization.
5	the permeability of the gastric mucosa of dog	Dog gastric mucosal permeability.
5	the influence of thyroid gland on amino acid accumulation and protein synthesis by rat small intestine in vitro	In addition, the effects of the thyroid gland on the accumulation of amino acids and protein synthesis in the intestine of the rat in vitro.
5	the inhibition of streptococci by lactoperoxidase thiocyanate and hydrogen peroxide the effect of the inhibitory system on susceptible and resistant strains of group n streptococci	Lactoperoxidase thiocyanate and peroxide inhibitors of streptococci; hydrogen, l' inhibitory system effect on susceptible and resistant streptococcal group n strains.
5	a continuous fermentation technique for studying the kinetics of sugar uptake by baker s yeast	Technique de fermentation continu pour l'apos; study de la kinetique de l'apos; absorption des sucre par la yeurete de boulangerie.
5	enzymatic basis for d arbitol production by saccharomyces rouxii	An enzyme base for the production of d-arbitol by saccharomyces rouxii.
5	influence of aeration and of pantothenate on growth yields of zymomonas mobilis	L' influence of aeration and pantothenate on zymomonas mobilis growth rates.
5	major products of glucose dissimilation by pseudomonas natriegens	The principal products of the dissimilation of glucose by Pseudomonas natriegens.
5	effect of various conditions on accumulation of oxytetracycline in escherichia coli	Effect of various environmental conditions on the quality of drinking water.
5	phenethyl alcohol i effect on macromolecular synthesis of escherichia coli	It can also be used as a catalyst for the formation of a variety of substances.
5	type specific polysaccharide antigens of group b streptococci ii the chemical basis for serological specificity of the type ii hcl antigen	Group b ii specific polysaccharide antigens are the chemical basis of serological specificity of l' type ii hcl antigen.
5	increased plasma arginine vasopressin in clinical adrenocortical insufficeincy and its inhibition by glucosteroids	Plasma arginine vasopressin increased in the adrenal clinical insulin and glucosteroid inhibition.
5	glucose titration studies in patients with chronic progressive renal disease	In addition, there are a number of other studies that have been conducted in the United States.
5	on the mechanism of the splay in the glucose titration curve in advanced experimental renal disease in the rat	The mechanism of splay in titration curve of glucose in advanced experimental renal diseases in rat.
5	studies on the biochemistry of penicillium charlesii influence of various dicarboxylic acids on galactocarolose synthesis	Penicillium charlesii biochemistry studies influence galactocarolose synthesis by various dicarboxylic acids.
5	influence of ethanol on the metabolism of perfused normal fatty and cirrhotic rat livers	L' influence of ethanol on metabolism of livers from normal, perfused cirrhotic and fat rats.
5	some properties of rat liver glucose adenosine triphosphate phosphotransferases	Some properties of adenosine triphosphate phosphotransferases from rat liver glucose.
5	influence of glutamic acid on the endogenous respiration of bacillus subtilis	Glutamic acid influence on endogenous respiration of subtilis bacillus.
5	glucose c14 metabolism of dormant and activated ascospores of neurospora	Activated and dormant ascospore glucose metabolism c14.
5	chemical degradation of dipicolinic acid c14 and its application in biosynthesis by penicillium citreo viride	Chemical degradation of c14 dipicolinic acid and its application to virid penicillium citreo biosynthesis.
5	influence of lipid components of mycoplasma laidlawii membranes on osmotic fragility of cells	L' influence of laidlawii mycoplasma membrane lipid components on osmotic fragility of cells.
5	anatomical connections between medial and lateral regions of the hypothalamus concerned with food intake	Anatomical connections between the mid- and lateral-regions of the intestine; hypothalamus involved in the intestine; ingestion of food.
5	anomeric bond character in the pyranose sugars	Characterization of pyranosic sugar anomeric bond.
5	the relationship of pregnancy vaginal candidiasis and glucose metabolism	The relationship between vaginal candidiasis during pregnancy and the metabolism of glucose.
5	toxigenicity of clostridium histolyticum	Clostridium histolyticum toxigenicity.
5	relationship of lipoprotein lipase activity to triglyceride uptake in adipose tissue	Lipoprotein lipase activity vs. apo; triglyceride absorption in adipose tissue.
5	ethanolamine phosphoglycerides effect on the properties of myelinoid lecithin water systems	The properties of aqueous lecithin-based myelin systems are affected by the phosphoglycerides of l' ethanolamine.
5	sex differences in taste preference for glucose and saccharin solutions	Differences between the sexes in the taste preference for solutions of glucose and saccharin.
5	growth of a thermophilic bacterium on hydrocarbons a new source of single cell protein	It's a new source of unicellular protein, and it's a new source of unicellular protein.
5	cell permeability a factor in the biotin oleate relationship in lactobacillus arabinosus ii effect of oleic acid and other surfactants on free biotin uptake	Cellular permeability is a factor in the relationship of biotin oleate in lactobacillus arabinosus ii, l' effect of l' oleic acid and d' other surfactants on the apos; absorption of free biotin.
5	transaminase activity and other enzymatic reactions involving pyruvate and glutamate in chlamydia psittacosis trachoma group	L' transaminase and d&apos activity; other enzyme reactions involving pyruvate and glutamate in the trachoma group of chlamydia psittacosis.
5	cell wall constituents of leuconostoc citrovorum and leuconostoc mesenteroides	Cell wall components of both leuconostoc citrovorum and leuconostoc mesenteroides.
5	function of growth factors for rumen microorganisms i nutritional characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium	Growth Factor Function for Rumen microorganisms i Nutritional characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium.
5	mechanisms of pathogenesis in listeria monocytogenes infection 3 carbohydrate metabolism	Pathogenesis Mechanisms in Listeria monocytogenes infection: 3 carbohydrate metabolism.
5	effect of glucose on the formation of the membrane bound electron transport system in haemophilus parainfluenzae	Effect of glucose on d&apos transport system formation; membrane-bound electrons in l' haemophilus parainfluenzae.
5	pathway of glucose fermentation in relation to the taxonomy of bifidobacteria	Glucose Fermentation Route in Relation to Bifidobacterial Taxonomy.
5	metabolic requirements for microcycle sporogenesis of bacillus megaterium	Metabolic requirements for mygaterium microcycle sporogenesis.
5	comparative study of the cell walls of the yeastlike and mycelial phases of histoplasma capsulatum	Comparative study of mycelial and yeast-like cell walls of l' histoplasma capsulatum.
5	comparison of growth and primary shunt product formation by claviceps purpurea cultured on succinic acid and glucose as carbon sources	Comparison of growth and formation of the primary derivative by claviceps purpurea grown on glucose and succinic acid as carbon sources.
5	effect of growth rate and substrate limitation on the composition and structure of the cell wall of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of growth rate and substrate limitation on saccharomyces cerevisiae cell wall structure and composition.
5	methane production from glucose in vitro by mixed rumen bacteria	Mixed rumen bacteria produce methane from glucose in vitro.
5	metabolic phases during the development of granulation tissue	Metabolic phases during granulation tissue development.
5	metabolic relationships of the isolated fractions of the pectic substances of actively growing sycamore cells	Metabolic relationships of pectic fractions from actively growing sycamore cells.
5	effect of available water on thermal resistance of three nonsporeforming species of bacteria	The effect of the water on the thermal resistance of the three species of bacteria, not-sporforming.
5	the beta glucosidase of the yeast cell surface	Beta glucosidase from the surface of yeast cells.
5	relationship between fatty acid and glucose utilization in ehrlich ascites tumor cells	The relationship between the use of fatty acids and the use of glucose in ehrlich ascites tumor cells.
5	hyperglycemia during intravenous fluid therapy a clue to the presence of diabetes mellitus	It is important to note that diabetes mellitus is an important factor in the development of diabetes mellitus.
5	effect of ingestion of saline glucose and ethanol on mobilization and hepatic incorporation of epididymal pad palmitate 1 14c in rats	Effect of Absorption; Salt Glucose and Dapos ingestion; Ethanol on Mobilization and Absorption; Hepatic Integration of Epididymal Cushion Palmitate 1-14c in Rat.
5	distribution of c 14 from glucose 1 c 14 in the lipid fractions of debaryomyces hansenii	Distribution of c 14 from c 14 glucose in lipid fractions of debaryomyces hansenii.
5	galactose repression of beta galactosidase induction in escherichia coli	A study of the effects of ethylene oxide on the metabolism of ethylene oxide.
5	a radioautographic study of glyceride synthesis in vivo during intestinal absorption of fats and labeled glucose	Radioautographic study of in vivo glyceride synthesis during intestinal absorption of labelled fat and glucose.
5	studies on the respiratory metabolism of isolated human adipose cells	Studies of Respiratory Metabolism of Isolated Human Fat Cells.
5	the fate of isotopic carbon in kidney cortex synthesizing glucose from lactate	The fate of the isotopic carbon in the renalectal cortex, which synthesizes glucose from lactate.
5	transfer of propionate by rat small intestine in vitro	In Vitro Transmission of Propionate via Apos; Rat Small Bowel.
5	energy supply and cell yield in aerobically growth microorganisms	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
5	mechanisms of protection of trehalase against heat inactivation in neurospora	Trehalase protection mechanisms against inactivation by heat in neurospora.
5	cell walls of group d streptococci ii chemical studies on the type 1 antigen purified from the autolytic digest of cell walls	Group d ii streptococcal cell walls have been subjected to chemical studies on apos; type 1 antigen has been purified by autolytic digestion of cell walls.
5	synchrony of nuclear replication in individual hyphae of aspergillus nidulans	Nuclear replication synchronization in individual d' aspergillus nidulans hyphae.
5	catabolite repression in the facultative chemoautotroph thiobacillus novellus	Thiobacillus novellus facultative chemoautotroph catabolite repression.
5	urea production and putrescine biosynthesis by escherichia coli	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that are considered to be of high quality.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in streptomycetes ii isolation and enzymatic synthesis of trehalose	Streptomycete carbohydrate metabolism ii isolation and enzyme synthesis of trehalose.
5	deoxyribonucleic acid repair replication after ultraviolet light or x ray exposure of bacteria	Repair by l' deoxyribonucleic acid after exposure to bacterial X-rays or ultraviolet light.
5	role of a cell wall glucan degrading enzyme in mating of schizophyllum commune	In addition, it can be used as an enzyme to degrade glucan in the cell wall; mating of common schizophyllum.
5	streptococcal sialidase i isolation and properties of sialidase produced by group k streptococcus	Sialidase i streptococcal isolation and k-group streptococcal-induced sialidase properties.
5	effect of glucose on carbon dioxide assimilation and substrate oxidation by ferrobacillus ferrooxidans	Effect of glucose on glucose; assimilation of carbon dioxide and nitrogen; ferrobacillus ferrooxidans oxidation of substrate.
5	effect of different nutritional conditions on the synthesis of tricarboxylic acid cycle enzymes	Effect of different nutritional conditions on synthesis of enzymes of the cycle of l' tricarboxylic acid.
5	release of proteinase from mycelium of mucor hiemalis	Mycelial proteinase release from mucor hiemalis.
5	glucose catabolism in micrococcus sodonensis	Micrococcus sodonensis glucose catabolism.
5	the effect of uranyl nitrate on intestinal transfer of hexoses	The effects of uranyl nitrate and uranyl nitrate on the intestinal transfer of hexoses.
5	glucose metabolism during ontogeny of intestinal active sugar transport in the chick	Glucose metabolism during apo; ontogenesis of the intestinal transport of active sugars in chicks.
5	immunochemical studies on the group and type antigens of group f streptococci and the identification of a grouplike carbohydrate in a type ii strain with an undesignated group antigen	Immunochemical studies of group f type and group f antigens and identification of a group-like carbohydrate in a type ii strain with an unnamed antigen.
5	properties of the glutamate transport system in escherichia coli	Properties of the escherichia coli glutamate transport system.
5	the cell wall of rickettsia mooseri i morphology and chemical composition	Morphology and Chemical Composition of Rickettsia mooseri Cell Wall i.
5	factors affecting the pathways of glucose catabolism and the tricarboxylic acid cycle in pseudomonas natriegens	Factors affecting glucose catabolism and l&apos cycle pathways; tricarboxylic acid in pseudomonas natriegens.
5	gluconate metabolism in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli gluconate metabolism.
5	comparative glucose catabolism of xanthomonas species	Comparison of the catabolism of glucose in species of xanthomonas.
5	mode of filamentous growth of leucothrix mucor in pure culture and in nature as studied by tritiated thymidine autoradiography	Leucothrix mucor filamentous growth pattern in pure culture and field as studied by tritiated thymidine autoradiography.
5	d arabinose countertransport in bakers yeast	D'Arabinose vs.-transport in baker's-yeast.
5	catabolite repression and pyruvate metabolism in escherichia coli	Catabolic repression and pyruvate-metabolism in escherichia coli.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in leukocytes vii metabolism of glucose acetate and propionate by human plasma cells	Carbohydrate metabolism in human plasma cell metabolism of acetate and glucose propionate.
5	basal plasma glucagon levels of man	It's a very important part of the health care system.
5	studies on the intracerebral toxicity of ammonia	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	cerebral blood flow and metabolism in the wernicke korsakoff syndrome	Cerebral blood flow and metabolic Wernicke Korsakoff syndrome.
5	a function of the golgi apparatus in polysaccharide synthesis and transport in the root cap cells of wheat	A function of l' golgi apparatus for synthesis and transport of polysaccharides in wheat cap cells.
5	the precursors of the xylene ring in riboflavine	Xylene ring precursors in riboflavin.
5	formation of glucose from hexoses pentoses polyols and related substances in kidney cortex	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
5	energy requirement for l glutamate uptake and utilization by hansenula subpelliculosa cells	Cells of Hansenula subpelliculosa need energy to absorb and to use glutamate l.
5	metabolism of d mannose in aerobacter aerogenes evidence for a cyclic pathway	The metabolism of dnose in aerobacter aerogenes is an indication of the existence of dnose, a cyclic pathway.
5	effect of sugars on transport of alanine in intestine	The effect of the sugars on the transport of the alanine in the intestine.
5	the role of humoral factors in the dumping syndrome experimentally induced dumping before and after portal systemic shunt	The role of humoral factors in the syndrome of dumping experimentally induces dumping before and after the systemic gate shunt.
5	aerobic metabolism of streptococcus agalactiae	Streptococcus agalactiae aerobic metabolism.
5	protein synthesis in sonically damaged escherichia coli	The synthesis of proteins in the ultrasound-damaged Escherichia coli (ESC) cell.
5	effect of glucose on the oxidation of beta nitropropionic acid by aspergillus flavus	Glucose effects on apos oxidation; beta-nitropropionic acid by apos; aspergillus flavus.
5	chemically characterized media for study of foot and mouth disease virus in baby hamster kidney cells	Chemically Characterized Media for Disease Control; Investigation of Foot and Mouth Disease Virus in Baby Hamster Kidney Cells.
5	production and stabilization of cells of bacillus popilliae and bacillus lentimorbus	Popilliae and lentimorbus bacillus cell production and stabilization.
5	characteristics of the vegetative growth of bacillus popilliae	Characteristics of vegetative growth of popilliae.
5	pilot plant glycerol production with a slow feed osmophilic yeast fermentation	Pilot plant production of glycerol with slow fermentation of slow-feeding osmophilic yeasts.
5	staphylococcal alpha toxin effects on artificial lipid spherules	Effects of Staphylococcal Alpha Toxin on Artificial Lipid Spectulae.
5	studies on the effect of experimental nonketotic diabetes mellitus on antibacterial defense i demonstration of a defect in phagocytosis	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence of a phagocytosis defect in the body.
5	polydipsia elicited by the synergistic action of a saccharin and glucose solution	A synergistic action of sucrose and glucose solution.
5	the effect of deprivation of glucose on the ultrastructure and function of the superior cervical ganglion of the rat in vitro	The effects of glucose deprivation on rat upper cervical ganglion ultrastructure and function in vitro.
5	membranes of animal cells ii the metabolism and turnover of the surface membrane	Animal Cell Membranes ii Metabolism and Surface Membrane Renewal.
5	glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes ii the macromolecular state of leukocyte glycogen	It is important to note that there is no evidence of the presence of glycogen in the leukocytes.
5	the importance of glucose in the oxidative metabolism of the testis of the conscious ram and the role of the pentose cycle	L' importance of glucose in conscious sheep testis oxidative metabolism and role of pentose cycle.
5	brain metabolism during fasting	Fasting cerebral metabolism.
5	influence of ph on the growth characteristics of neisseria gonorrhoeae in continuous culture	L' ph influences Neisseria gonorrhoeae growth characteristics in continuous culture.
5	organic acid production by basidiomycetes 3 cultural conditions for l malic acid production	Production of organic acids by basidiomycetes 3 growing conditions; malic acid.
5	sweet sensitive protein from bovine taste buds isolation and assay	Sugar-sensitive protein derived from animal proteins; insulation of bovine gustatory papillae and yeast; test.
5	further properties and possibel mechanism of action of adenosine 5 triphosphate d glucose 6 phosphotransferase from rat liver	In addition, it may be necessary to test for the presence or absence of the drug substance.
5	studies on glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates incorporation of hexose into glycogen	Study of the synthesis of glycogen in pigeon liver homogenates; incorporation of l' hexose into glycogen.
5	studies on glycogen synthesis in pigeon liver homogenates glycogen synthesis from glucose monophosphates and uridine diphosphate glucose	Studies of glycogen synthesis in homogenates of pigeon liver; synthesis of glycogen from glucose monophosphates and d&apos diphosphate; uridine; glucose.
5	the glucoamylase of coniophora cerebella	Cerebella coniophora glucoamylase.
5	effect of thyroidectomy on pathways of glucose metabolism in lactating rat mammary gland	Effect of thyroidectomy on glucose metabolism pathways in the mammary gland of lactating rats.
5	identification of guanosine diphosphate derivatives of d xylose d mannose d glucose and d galactose in mature strawberry leaves	Identification of the guanosine diphosphate derivatives of dxylose mannose and dgalactose in mature strawberry leaves.
5	regulation of development of hepatic glucokinase in the neonatal rat by the diet	Regulation of neonatal rat hepatic glucokinase development by diet.
5	metabolic changes during phosphate deprivation in euglena in air and in oxygen	Metabolic changes during the phosphate deprivation process in the apos; euglena in the air and oxygen.
5	carbohydrate metabolism of the perfused rat liver	Rat perfused liver carbohydrate metabolism.
5	divergent effects of actinomycin d on cortisol and on glucose stimulation of glycogenesis in mouse liver	Divergent effects of apos; actinomycin d on cortisol and glycogenesis stimulated by glucose in mouse liver.
5	the composition and physicochemical properties of bovine nasal septa protein polysaccharide complex	Composition and Physico Properties-Chemicals of the Septa Polysaccharide Complex-Bovine Nasal Protein.
5	mechanism of conversion of aspartate into glutamate in cerebral cortex slices	Apos; aspartate to glutamate conversion mechanisms in cerebral cortical slices.
5	the influence of fructose and its metabolites on ethanol metabolism in vitro	L' influence of fructose and fructose metabolites on metabolism of ethanol in vitro.
5	pectic polysaccharides of growing plant tissues	Growing plant tissue pectic polysaccharides.
5	preparation of enriched fractions from cerebral cortex containing isolated metabolically active neuronal and glial cells	Preparation of cerebral cortical enriched fractions containing metabolically active glial and neuronal cells.
5	microbial growth on c1 compounds uptake of 14c formaldehyde and 14c formate by methane grown pseudomonas methanica and determination of the hexose labelling pattern after brief incubation with 14c methanol	Microbial growth on formaldehyde 14c and formate 14c uptake by methane-grown pseudomonas methanica compounds c1 and determination of labeling pattern at l' hexose after brief incubation with methanol 14c.
5	further studies on intestinal active transport during semistarvation	D' other studies on active intestinal transport during semistarvation were also conducted.
5	respiratory inhibition in chlorella produced by purified polyethylene glycol 1540	Respiratory inhibition in chlorinella produced by the purified polyethylene glycol 1540.
5	the effect of infusions of plasma and of saline on the renal response to water loading in sodium depleted dogs	Effect of plasma and saline infusions on renal response to sodium loading; water in sodium-depleted dogs.
5	regulation of staphylococcus aureus lactate dehydrogenase	Regulation of Staphylococcus aureus lactate dehydrogenase.
5	effects of the rare earth cerium on escherichia coli	In addition, it can be used as an insecticide.
5	radioautographic study of cell wall deposition in growing plant cells	L' radioautographic study of the deposition of the cell wall in growing plant cells.
5	effects of fatty acids ketone bodies lactate and pyruvate on glucose utilization by guinea pig cerebral cortex slices	Effects of keto fatty acids lactate and pyruvate on glucose; use of glucose by slices of guinea pig cerebral cortex.
5	a study of three enzymes acting on glucose in the lens of different species	A study of three lens-acting enzymes in different species.
5	evaluation of the glycogenolytic effect of alpha amylase using radioautography and electron microscopy	It is not possible to determine the effect of the enzyme on the glycogen.
5	elution of loosely bound acid phosphatase from staphylococcus aureus	L' weakly bound staphylococcus aureus acid phosphatase elution.
5	studies on lipogenesis in vivo lipogenesis during extended periods of re feeding after starvation	In vivo lipogenesis studies of lipogenesis during prolonged periods of fasting.
5	pyruvate accumulation in growth inhibited cultures of aerobacter aerogenes	Aerobacter aerogenes was inhibited by the accumulation of pyruvate in growth.
5	stimulation of pentose phosphate pathway dehydrogenase enzyme activities in ethionine treated mice	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
5	lipogenesis in human adipose tissue	Human fat lipogenesis.
5	hepatic triglyceride secretion in relation to lipogenesis and free fatty acid mobilization in fasted and glucose refed rats	The secretion of hepatic triglycerides in relation to lipogenesis and the mobilization of free fatty acids in fasting and glucose-repressed rats.
5	sporulation of the thermophilic anaerobes	Thermophilic anaerobic sporulation.
5	occurrence and metabolism of scylloinositol in the locust	Scylloinositol occurrence and metabolism in desert locusts.
5	enzymic hydrolysis of the carbon fluorine bond of alpha d glucosyl fluoride by rat intestinal mucosa localization of intestinal maltase	Hydrolysis of the enzymatic carbon bond @-@fluoride of d' alpha-d-glucosyl by localization of the intestinal maltase in the intestinal mucosa of the rat.
5	the effect of thyroidectomy on the pattern of fatty acids synthesized by mammary gland from lactating rats	L' effect of thyroidectomy on fatty acid profile synthesized by the mammary gland of lactating rats.
5	contribution of propionate to glucose synthesis in sheep	Contribution of propionate to the synthesis of glucose in sheep.
5	metabolic activities of the isolated perfused rat kidney	Metabolic activity of perfused isolated rat kidney.
5	mechanisms of regulation of urease biosynthesis in proteus rettgeri	Mechanisms to regulate protein rettgeri biosynthesis; urease.
5	adenosine triphosphate linked control of pseudomonas aeruginosa glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase	In addition, it is not possible to determine if the drug is the same as the drug.
5	the influence of saline loading on renal glucose reabsorption in the rat	L' salt loading influences renal glucose reabsorption in rat.
5	glycogen in human peripheral blood leukocytes i characteristics of the synthesis and turnover of glycogen in vitro	Glycogenesis in Human Peripheral Blood Leukocytes i characteristics of glycogen synthesis and turnover in vitro.
5	structure of the cell wall of lactobacilli role of muramic acid phosphate in lactobacillus fermenti	Lactobacillus cell wall structure, role of phosphate muramic acid in lactobacillus fermenti.
5	correlated changes of some enzyme activities and cofactor and substrate contents of pea cotyledon tissue during germination	Changes in some enzyme activities were correlated with seed cotyledon substrate and cofactor contents during germination.
5	conversion of u 14c glucose into carbon dioxide glycogen cholesterol and fatty acids in liver slices from embryonic and growing chicks	Transformation of glucose u 14c into carbon dioxide, glycogen, cholesterol, and fatty acids in thin slices of embryonic and growing chick liver.
5	the effect of starvation and starvation followed by feeding on enzyme activity and the metabolism of u 14c glucose in liver from growing chicks	The effects of fasting and fasting followed by feeding, feeding, enzymatic activity, and glucose metabolism u 14c in the liver of growing chicks.
5	pool sizes of metabolic intermediates and their relation to glucose repression of beta galactosidase synthesis in escherichia coli	The size of d&apos pools; metabolic intermediates and their relationship to glucose repression of escherichia coli beta galactosidase synthesis.
5	comparison of oxidative metabolism in starved fat fed and carbohydrate fed rats	Comparison of oxidative metabolism between fasting and fasted rats.
5	intracellular protein breakdown in non growing cells of escherichia coli	Dissolution of intracellular proteins in non-growth cells; e. coli.
5	effect of carbonyl cyanide m chlorophenylhydrazone on respiration and respiration dependent phosphorylation in escherichia coli	Effect of chlorophenylhydrazone carbonyl cyanide on respiration and dependent phosphorylation in escherichia coli.
5	electron opaque bodies and fat droplets in mouse liver after fasting or glucose injection	An electron-opaque body and fat droplets in the liver of a mouse after a fast or an injection of glucose.
5	nonselective incorporation into sporangium of either older or younger chromosome of the vegetative cell during sporulation in bacillus cereus	L' non-selective incorporation into the sporangium d' an older or younger vegetative cell chromosome during the sporulation process in the bacillus cereus.
5	renal contribution to thoracic duct lymph in dogs	Renal contribution to dog thoracic canal lymph.
5	effects of epinephrine corticotropin and thyrotropin on lipolysis and glucose oxidation in rat adipose tissue	Effects of corticotropin and thyrotropin in the liver; epinephrine on lipolysis and lipids; oxidation of glucose in adipose tissue of the rat.
5	distribution of radioactive glycerol and fatty acids among adipose tissue triglycerides after administration of glucose u 14c	Distribution of glycerol and fatty acids in triglycerides of adipose tissue after apos; administration of glucose u 14c.
5	regulation of glutamine synthetase x effect of growth conditions on the susceptibility of escherichia coli glutamine synthetase to feedback inhibition	The effects of glutamine synthetase on the sensitivity of glutamine synthetase d' escherichia coli to a feedback inhibition.
5	biosynthesis of streptococcal cell walls n acetyl d muramic acid	Streptococcus n cell wall biosynthesis Acetyl dmuramic acid.
5	biochemical basis of obligate autotrophy in blue green algae and thiobacilli	Biochemical basis; autotrophy required in green blue-green algae and thiobacilli.
5	pyruvate metabolism in sarcina maxima	Sarcina maxima pyruvate metabolism.
5	anaerobic growth yields of aerobacter cloacae and escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
5	glucose metabolism by human placental villi	Human placental villus metabolism of glucose.
5	the biosynthesis of intestinal mucins the effect of salicylate on glycoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colonic and human gastric mucosal tissues in vitro	Intestinal mucosal biosynthesis, the effect of salicylate on the mucosal tissue of sheep colon and intestine glycoprotein biosynthesis; human stomach in vitro.
5	lactogenesis in the rat metabolism of uridine diphosphate galactose by mammary gland	Lactogenesis in the metabolism of rat mammary gland uridine diphosphate galactose.
5	short latency antidiuresis following the initation of food ingestion	Short-latency anti-diuresis following induction of apos; food.
5	phosphate dependence of monosaccharide transport in nocardia	Phosphate dependence of nocardial monosaccharide transport.
5	n acetylglucosamine assimilation in escherichia coli and its relation to catabolite repression	Escherichia coli N acetylglucosamine assimilation and its relation to catabolite repression.
5	relationship between sugar structure and competition for the sugar transport system in bakers yeast	The relationship between the structure of the sugar and the competition for the sugar transport system in baking yeast.
5	metabolic and morphological observations on the effect of surface active agents of leukocytes	Metabolic and morphological observations on leukocyte surface-active agents.
5	water permeability of thin lipid membranes	The results of this study are summarized below.
5	carbohydrate composition of the phenol soluble lipopolysaccharides of citrobacter freundii	Carbohydrate composition of Citrobacter freundii phenol-soluble lipopolysaccharides.
5	synthesis of teichoic acids vii synthesis of teichoic acids during spore germination	Synthesis of d' teichoic acids; synthesis of d' teichoic acids during spore germination.
5	inhibition of histoplasma capsulatum by candida albicans and other yeasts on sabouraud s agar media	L' inhibition de l'apos; Histoplasma capsulatum par la candida albicans et d'apos; Other yeasts on agar medium sabouré.
5	regulation and timing of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in hyphae of aspergillus nidulans	Regulation and synchronization of the synthesis of l' deoxyribonucleic acid in the hyphae d' aspergillus nidulans.
5	encystment and polymer production by azotobacter vinelandii in the presence of beta hydroxybutyrate	In the presence of beta-hydroxybutyrate, encystment and production of polymers by azotobacter vinelandii.
5	pathways of glucose metabolism by rough and smooth variants of bacillus stearothermophilus	Glucose metabolic pathways by smooth rough variants of stearothermophilus.
5	mode of action of myxin on escherichia coli	It is not possible to detect the presence of the drug.
5	membrane lipid changes during formation of a functional electron transport system in staphylococcus aureus	Membrane lipids change during apo formation, a functional system of electron transport in Staphylococcus aureus.
5	control of malate synthase formation in rhizopus nigricans	Malate synthase formation control in rhizopus nigricans.
5	transient repression of the lac operon	Transient freeze suppression; lake operon.
5	cell wall composition in relation to the taxonomy of some actinoplanaceae	Composition of cell wall in relation to actinoplane taxonomy.
5	release of sporangiospores by a strain of actinoplanes	Sporangiospore release by actinoplane strain.
5	disaccharide absorption by amphibian small intestine in vitro	L'absorption des disaccharides par l'apos; intestine hail des amphibiens en vitro.
5	regulatory effect of pyruvate on the glucose metabolism of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum	Glucose metabolism in Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum is regulated by pyruvate.
5	radiorespirometric studies of leucothrix mucor	Radiorespirometric leukothrix mucor studies.
5	observations on the mechanisms of glucosuria during glucose loads in normal and nondiabetic subjects	Observations on glucosuria mechanisms during glucose loading in both normal and nondiabetic subjects.
5	effects of diet on hepatic triglyceride synthesis	Effects of Diet on Hepatic Triglyceride Synthesis.
5	sporulation of bacillus stearothermophilus	Stearothermophilic bacillus sporulation.
5	formation of isoamylase by pseudomonas	Pseudomonas isoamylase formation.
5	lipid metabolism in the testis of the ram	Metabolism of lipids in ram testicles.
5	effect of atractyloside on glucose and pyruvate metabolism in rat diaphragm muscle	Effect of the atractyloside on the metabolism of glucose and pyruvate in the rat diaphragm.
5	rates of entry and oxidation of acetate glucose d beta hydroxybutyrate palmitate oleate and stearate and rates of production and oxidation of propionate and butyrate in fed and starved sheep	Oleate and stearate beta hydroxybutyrate glucose acetate and production and apo production rates; propionate and butyrate oxidation in fed and starved sheep.
5	the time course of the synthesis of adenosine triphosphate in ehrlich ascites tumour cells and the effect of 2 4 dinitrophenol	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of metabolism, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
5	studies on brain cortex slices differences in the oxidation of 14 c labelled glucose and pyruvate revealed by the action of triethyltin and other toxic agents	Cerebral cortical studies contrast differences in 14-c labelled oxidation of glucose and pyruvate revealed by apos; action of triethyltinans and d' other toxic agents.
5	the subcellular distribution and properties of hexokinases in the guinea pig cerebral cortex	Subcellular distribution and hexokinase properties in the guinea pig cerebral cortex.
5	some properties of phosphofructokinase from kidney cortex and their relation to glucose metabolism	Certain properties of renal cortical phosphofructokinase and its relationship to glucose metabolism.
5	reagentless substrate analysis with immobilized enzymes	Analysis of non-reactive substrates with enzymes immobilized.
5	fine structure of the a and d cells of the rabbit endocrine pancreas in vivo and incubated in vitro i mechanism of secretion of the a cells	The fine structure of rabbit endocrine pancreas a and d cells incubated in vitro a.
5	effects of metabolic inhibitors on contraction of rabbit detrusor muscle	Effects of Metabolic Inhibitors on Rabbit Detrusor Muscle Contracture.
5	quantitative assay of polysaccharide components obtained from cell wall lipopolysaccharides of xanthomonas species	Quantitative testing of polysaccharide components obtained from d&apos cell wall lipopolysaccharides; xanthomonas species.
5	an in vitro effect of triiodothyronine on rat adipose tissue	Effect of triiodothyronine in vitro on adipose tissue of the rat.
5	aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of sewage and activated sludge ii method of characterization of activated sludge bacteria	Aerobic Heterotrophic Bacterial Populations of Activated Wastewater and Sludge ii Activated Sludge Bacterial Characterization Method.
5	differential dialysis culture for separation and concentration of a macromolecular product	Differential dialysis culture for apos separation and concentration; macromolecular product.
5	carbon balance of a mannitol fermentation and the biosynthetic pathway	Bacteria, fungi, fungi, fungi, fungus, fungi, fungi, fungus, fungi, fungus, fungus, fungus, etc.
5	the mechanism of thyrotrophin action in relation to lipid metabolism in thyroid tissue	The effect of thyrotrophine on the metabolism of lipids in thyroid tissue.
5	the effect of sodium depletion of the renal response to water loading in dogs	Sodium depletion effect of renal response to dog water load.
5	mammary and whole animal metabolism of glucose and fatty acids in fasting lactating goats	Acute toxicity of 1,4-butoxyethanol to rats and rats.
5	nutritional characteristics of the atypical mycobacteria	Atypical mycobacterial nutritional characteristics.
5	regulation of arginine and proline catabolism in bacillus licheniformis	The regulation of proline and arginine catabolism in the bacillus licheniformis.
5	ratio of teichoic acid and peptidoglycan in cell walls of bacillus subtilis following spire germination and during vegetative growth	L' teichoic acid – peptidoglycan ratio in bacillus subtilis cell walls after spires germination and during vegetative growth.
5	fermentation of glucose lactose galactose mannitol and xylose by bifidobacteria	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	enzyme pattern and aerobic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae under various degrees of glucose limitation	Saccharomyces cerevisiae enzyme profile and aerobic growth under various levels of glucose limitation.
5	site and characteristics of electrolyte loss and effect of intraluminal glucose in experimental canine cholera	Intra-luminal glucose effects and electrolytes in the experimental canine cholera.
5	phospholipid spherules liposomes as a model for biological membranes	Liposomal phospholipid spherules as a biological membrane model.
5	stimulation of the labellar sugar receptor of the fleshfly by mono and disaccharides	Meat fly lip-sugar receptor stimulation by mono- and disaccharides.
5	dietary regulation of galactose metabolizing enzymes adaptive changes in rat jejunum	Dietary regulation of the enzymes metabolizing galactose, adaptive changes in the rat jejunum.
5	lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes of sperm cells and tests	Lactate dehydrogenase sperm enzymes and tests.
5	regulation and function of lactate oxidation in streptococcus faecium	Lactate oxidation in streptococcus faecium.
5	oxidation of d amino acids by a particulate enzyme from pseudomonas aeruginosa	Oxidation of amino acids d by pseudomonas aeruginosa particulate enzyme.
5	relation of catalase to substrate utilization by mycoplasma pneumoniae	The relationship between catalase and l' utilization of the substrate by the mycoplasma pneumoniae.
5	direct pathway to the brain	Direct to the brain.
5	hemoglobin function in stored blood	Storage blood hemoglobin function.
5	effect of early nutrition on the development of rat epididymal fat pads cellularity and metabolism	Early nutritional effects on cellularity and metabolism of rat epididymal adipose pads.
5	studies on the enzymic n acylation of amino sugars in the sheep colonic mucosa	Apos studies; sheeps colonic mucosa enzymatic acylation of amino sugars.
5	biochemical effects of the hypoglycaemic compound pent 4 enoic acid and related non hypoglycaemic fatty acids carbohydrate metabolism	Biochemical Effect of Hypoglycemic Compound Enenoic Acid pent 4 and Related Non-hypoglycemic Fatty Acids Carbohydrate Metabolism.
5	pneumococcal c substance a ribitol teichoic acid containing choline phosphate	Pneumococcus c: ribitol acid-teichoic with choline phosphate.
5	the glycerol teichoic acid from walls of staphylococcus epidermidis i2	L' teichoic glycerol from staphylococcus epidermidis i2 walls.
5	effect of sublethal heat on the metabolic activity of staphylococcus aureus	Effect of Sublethal Heat on Apos; Metabolic Activity of Staphylococcus aureus.
5	growth of ferrobacillus ferrooxidans on organic matter	Ferrobacillus ferrooxidans growing on organic matter.
5	effects of temperature on composition and cell volume of candida utilis	Effects of temperature on candida utilisa cell volume and composition.
5	attached growth of sphaerotilus and mixed populations in a continuous flow apparatus	Growth of both mixed and sphaerotilus populations was fixed in a flow-through apparatus.
5	effects of colicins e1 and k on cellular metabolism	The effects of colicines, e1 and k, on cellular metabolism.
5	effect of dextrose in medium for the preparation of mycoplasma gallisepticum plate antigens	Effect of dextrose in the medium to prepare mycoplasma gallisepticum plaque antigens.
5	an electrophysiological analysis of the action of carbohydrates on the sugar receptor of the blowfly	Electrophysiological analysis of carbohydrate action on the fly sugar receptor.
5	the effect of chlorpromazine on cerebral glucose atp adp amp and atpase in the mouse	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
5	heterogeneity of human platelets i metabolic and kinetic evidence suggestive of young and old platelets	Human platelet heterogeneity metabolic and kinetic evidence suggests young and old platelets.
5	thyroid stimulating hormone and prostaglandin e1 stimulation of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in thyroid slices	Apos stimulation; d&apos monophosphate thyroid hormone and prostaglandin e1; cyclic adenosine 3-5 in thin slices of thyroid.
5	some determinants of the effects of val 5 angiotensin ii amide on glomerular filtration rate and sodium excretion in dogs	Certain Determinants of the Effect of Apos; Angiotensin Val5 ii Amides to the Glomerular Filtration Rate and Apos; and Sodium Excretion in Dogs.
5	sporulation in bacillus subtilis biochemical changes	Sporulation in the subtilis bacillus changes biochemically.
5	clearing factor lipase in adipose tissue a possible role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the regulation of its activity	Clear-factor lipidase in adipose tissue may play a role in apos regulation; apos activity; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
5	changes in the concentrations of some phosphorylated intermediates and stimulation of glycolysis in liver slices	Changes in the levels of certain phosphorylated intermediates and enhancement of glycolysis in liver slices.
5	growth of mixed cultures on mixed substrates i continuous culture	Growth of mixed cultures on continuous i mixed substrates.
5	hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol in canine endotoxin shock	Hemodynamic effects of canine endotoxinogenic shock; isoproterenol.
5	inhibition of glycosidases by aldonolactones of corresponding configuration the specificity of alpha l arabinosidase	Glycosidase inhibition by aldonolactones corresponding to arabinosidase specificity.
5	factors affecting the glucose 6 phosphate inhibition of hexokinase from cerebral cortex tissue of the guinea pig	Factors Affecting Apos; Glucose Inhibition 6 phosphate from apos; brain cortical tissue hexokinase from guinea pig.
5	biosynthesis of intestinal mucins effect of puromycin on mucoprotein biosynthesis by sheep colonic mucosal tissue	Puromycin affects intestinal mucin biosynthesis in the mucous tissue of the sheep colon.
5	attempts to detect lycopersene formation in yeast	Lycopersene formation testing in yeast.
5	oral maintenance of water electrolyte and acid base balance in cholera a preliminary report	The oral maintenance of the apos; balance between the electrolyte of the apos; water and the acid base in the cholera made the apos; object of a preliminary report.
5	adenosine phosphates and the control of glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in yeast	Adenosine phosphates and control gluconeogenesis and glycolysis in yeast.
5	dextran induced agglutination of streptococcus mutans and its potential role in the formation of microbial dental plaques	Dextran induced streptococcus mutans agglutination and its potential role in microbial dental plaque formation.
5	immunochemistry of the cell walls of listeria monocytogenes	L' listeria monocytogenes cell wall immunochemistry.
5	glucose dependent secretion and destruction of hydrogen peroxide by mycoplasma pneumoniae	Glucose-dependent secretion and peroxide destruction by mycoplasma pneumonia.
5	effects of carbon dioxide on growth and maltose fermentation by bacteroides amylophilus	Effects of Carbon Dioxide on Growth and Maltosis Fermentation by Amylophilus Bacteroids.
5	malate utilization by a group d streptococcus physiological properties and purification of an inducible malic enzyme	The use of malate by a group of streptococci with physiological properties and the purification of the inducible malic enzyme.
5	inhibitory effect of 2 deoxy d glucose on the formation of the cell wall in yeast protoplasts	Cell wall formation in yeast protoplasts was inhibited by 2 glucose deoxygen.
5	acidaminococcus gen n acidaminococcus fermentans sp n anaerobic gram negative diplococci using amino acids as the sole energy source for growth	Acidaminococcus gen n acidaminococcus fermentans sp. anaerobic gram-negative diplococci using amino acids as sole source of growth energy.
5	sporulation of yeast harvested during logarithmic growth	Seventy-five percent of the yeasts that were harvested in the course of logarithmic growth exhibited sporulation.
5	the metabolic fate of the products of citrate cleavage adenosine triphosphate citrate lyase and nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate linked malate dehydrogenase in foetal and adult liver from ruminants and non ruminants	The metabolic fate of the cleavage products of citrate, adenosine triphosphate citrate lyase, and nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate bound malate dehydrogenase in the fetal and adult liver of ruminants and non-ruminants.
5	glucose catabolism of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae	Glucose-catabolism in erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae.
5	carbohydrate formation from various precursors in noenatal rat liver	The formation of carbohydrates from various noatal rat liver precursors.
5	the exopolysaccharide of klebsiella aerogens a3 s1 type 54 the isolation of o acetylated octasaccharide tetrasaccharide and trisaccharide	L' aerogenic klebsiella exopolysaccharide type 54 isolates octasaccharide/acetylated tetrasaccharide and trisaccharide.
5	studies on the lipid content and phosphate requirement of glucose and acetate grown escherichia coli	Studies on the phosphate requirements and lipid content of glucose and acetate grown on escherichia coli.
5	multiple forms of bacterial nadp specific isocitrate dehydrogenase	It is also used as an indicator of the quality of life of Canadians.
5	protease production by species of entomophthora	In addition, it can be used as an insecticide to control pests.
5	constancy of uptake during the cell cycle in escherichia coli	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are required to assess the effects of exposure to ethylene oxide.
5	repression by glucose of acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli b	Glucose repression of escherichia coli ester; acetohydroxyacid synthetase b.
5	kinases in leuconostoc mesenteroides	Leuconostoc mesenteroid kinases.
5	metabolism of carbohydrates by pasteurella pseudotuberculosis	Carbohydrate metabolism via pasteurella pseudotuberculosis.
5	differences in the utilization of glycerol and glucose by mycobacterium phlei	Glucose and glycerol utilization by phlei mycobacteria.
5	galactose transport in saccharomyces cerevisiae i nonmetabolized sugars as substrates and inducers of the galactose transport system	Galactose transport in unmetabolized succharomyces cerevisiae i as galactose transport system substrates and inducers.
5	formation of dulcitol in aerobic dissimilation of d galactose by yeasts	Dulcitol formation during aerobic galactose dissimilation by yeasts.
5	microcalorimetric study of glucose permeation in microbial cells	Microcalorimetric Study of Glucose Permeation in Microbial Cells.
5	the lipid composition of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b	Mycoplasma laidlawii strain b.
5	effect of lysozyme on resting spores of bacillus megaterium	Effect of lysozyme on megaterium resting spores.
5	histochemical localization of renal trehalase demonstration of a tubular site	The histochemical localization of the renal trehalase demonstrates the existence of apos; a tubular site.
5	enterotoxin b synthesis by replicating and nonreplicating cells of staphylococcus aureus	L&apos synthesis; enterotoxin b by replication and non-replication of the staphylococcus aureus cells.
5	alteration of glucose metabolism of arthrobacter crystallopoietes by compounds which induce sphere to rod morphogenesis	Changes in apos glucose metabolism; crystallopoietic arthrobacteres by compounds that induce spherical rod morphogenesis.
5	molecular basis of transient repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Molecular basis for transient beta galactosidase repression in escherichia coli.
5	synergistic and product induction of the enzymes of tryptophan metabolism in pseudomonas acidovorans	Synergistic induction and production of tryptophan-metabolizing enzymes in pseudomonas acidovorans.
5	role of exogenous adenosine triphosphate in catabolic and synthetic activities of chlamydia psittaci	Role of l' exogenous adenosine triphosphate in the synthetic and catabolic activities of chlamydia psittaci.
5	conversion of glucose 1 phosphate to 3 keto glucose 1 phosphate by cells of agrobacterium tumefaciens	Conversion of glucose 1 phosphate to 3 glucose 1 phosphate keto by d' agrobacterium tumefaciens.
5	effect of divalent cations on the uptake and oxidation of substrates by pseudomonas aeruginosa	Effect of Divalent Cations on Absorption and Absorption; substrate oxidation by Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
5	molar growth yields of certain lactic acid bacteria as influenced by autolysis	Molar growth yields of some lactic acid bacteria are influenced by autolysis.
5	induction of adenosine deaminase in escherichia coli	Acute and chronic toxicity to fish and fish.
5	serine requirement in leukemic and normal blood cells	Needs Serine in Leukemia and Normal Blood Cells.
5	ribonucleic acid biosynthesis in adult and infant rat brain in vitro	The biosynthesis of the apos; ribonucleic acid in the brain of adult rats and new-born in vitro.
5	glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the small intestine the effect of glucose on hexokinase activity	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
5	identification of micrococcaceae in clinical bacteriology	Identification of Micrococcaceae in Clinical Bacteriology.
5	studies on the physiological and structural characteristics of rat intestinal mucosa mitochondrial structural changes during amino acid absorption	Studies of the structural and physiological characteristics of mitochondrial structural changes in rat intestinal mucosa during apo; amino acid absorption.
5	an in vitro study of the intestinal absorption of pyridinium aldoximes	Intestinal absorption of pyridinium aldoximes.
5	taste stimuli a behavioral categorization	Taste stimulates behavioural categorization.
5	the chemical composition of the lipopolyacarideof pseudomonas aeruginosa	Pseudomonas aeruginosa lipopolyacaride chemical composition.
5	catabolite repression of the lac operon separt epressionof two enzymes	Catabolic repression of apos; epression of two enzymes' lac operon.
5	mitochondrial autonomy incorporation of monosaccharides into glycoprotein by isolated mitochondria	L' incorporation of monosaccharides into glycoprotein, by the isolated mitochondria, is a form of d' mitochondrial autonomy.
5	human hormone production in vitro	It can be used as an insecticide.
5	the effect of 2 4 dinitrophenol on adipose tissue metabolism	Lapos; 24 dinitrophenol effect on fat metabolism.
5	studies on the existence of a pathway in liver and muscle for the conversion of glucose into glycogen without glucose 6 phosphate as an intermediate	Apos studies; liver and muscle pathway for glucose conversion to glucose 6-phosphate-free glycogen as an intermediate.
5	role of adenosine monophosphate in regulation of metabolic pathways of perfused rat liver	The role of l' adenosine monophosphate in the regulation of the metabolic pathways of the perfused rat liver.
5	degradation of uric acid by certain aerobic bacteria	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used in the environment.
5	paraffin oxidation in pseudomonas aeruginosa i induction of paraffin oxidation	It is not possible to determine the toxicity of paraffin, but it is possible to determine the toxicity of paraffin.
5	inhibition by methylphenidate of transport across the yeast cell membrane	L' inhibition of transmembrane transport of yeast by methylphenidate.
5	neisseria lactamicus sp n a lactose fermenting species resembling neisseria meningitidis	Neisseria lactamicus sp. a lactose-fermenting species resembling Neisseria meningitidis.
5	role of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylation in acetobacter xylinum	The Role of Carboxylation of Phosphoenolpyruvate in Apos; acetobacter xylinum.
5	uptake of glucose l 14c by pullularia pullulans	Pullularia pullulans I 14c glucose uptake.
5	biosynthesis of riboflavine in corynebacterium species the purine precursor	Riboflavin biosynthesis in corynebacterial species, purine precursor.
5	possible mechanisms of action of an anti pasteurella pestis factor	It is also important to note that there are many ways to reduce the risk of infection.
5	effect of phenylbutazone on phagocytosis and intracellular killing by guinea pig polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Effect of phenylbutazone treatment on phagocytosis and intracellular destruction by polymorphonuclear guinea pig leukocytes.
5	production of l asparaginase ii by escherichia coli	In addition, it is important to note that there is a need for further research.
5	gratuitous synthesis of beta lactamase in staphylococcus aureus	Free Synthesis of Beta lactamase in Staphylococcus aureus.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism hormonal and dietary control of the oxidative and non oxidative reactions of the cycle in liver	The glucose metabolism pentose phosphate pathway regulates hormonal and dietary cycling oxidative and nonoxidative reactions in the liver.
5	uridine diphosphate d glucose dehydrogenase of aerobacter aerogenes	Bacteria that have been found to be carcinogenic to humans.
5	acceleration of gluconeogenesis from propionate by dl carnitine in the rat kidney cortex	Acceleration of propionate gluconeogenesis by carnitine dl in rat renal cortex.
5	a circadian rhythm in the disappearance of thyroxine from the blood in the calf and the thyroidectomized rat	Circadian rhythm of blood thyroxine disappearance in calf and thyroidectomized rat.
5	cerebrosides of human aorta isolation identification of the hexose and fatty acid distribution	Cerebroside of apos; isolation of apos; human aorta identification of apos; hexose and distribution of fatty acids.
5	early effects of feeding excess vitamin a mechanism of fatty liver production in rats	In addition, it can be used to reduce the amount of fat in the body; it can also be used in the body.
5	cell wall composition of the yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis	Composition of yeast cell wall and paracoccidioides brasiliensis mycelial forms.
5	change in the absorbancy of bacterial suspensions before initiation of growth	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of growth.
5	glucose catabolism in rhizobium japonicum	Rhizobium japonicum glucose catabolism.
5	two forms of d glycerate kinase in escherichia coli	Two forms of glycerate kinase d ischerichia coli.
5	stimulation of fermentation and yeast like morphogenesis in mucor rouxii by phenethyl alcohol	Stimulation of yeast-like fermentation and morphogenesis in red mucor by phenethyl alcohol.
5	molar growth yield of streptococcus faecalis on pyruvate	Molar growth of pyruvate streptococcus faecalis.
5	sporulation of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum under conditions of restricted growth	Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum sporulation under growth-restricted conditions.
5	modified biochemical tests for characterization of l phase variants of bacteria	Modified biochemical assays to characterize phase l bacterial variants.
5	effect of triperidol on carbohydrate and amino acid metabolism in rat brain cortex slices	Effect of triperidol on the metabolism of carbohydrates and amino acids in thin slices of the rat cerebral cortex.
5	compartmentation between glycolysis and gluconeogenesis in rat liver	Comparison of rat liver gluconeogenesis and glycolysis.
5	structural requirements for active intestinal transport spatial and bonding requirements at c 3 of the sugar	Structural requirements for the active intestinal transport space needs and the c3 binding of sugar.
5	changes in the concentrations of hepatic metabolites on administration of dihydroxyacetone or glycerol to starved rats and their relationship to the control of ketogenesis	Changes in hepatic metabolite concentrations during dihydroxyacetone or glycerol administration to starved rats and their relation to ketogenesis control.
5	comparative intermediary metabolism of vegetative cells and microcysts of myxococcus xanthus	Intermediate comparative metabolism of xanthus myxococci microcysts and vegetative cells.
5	production of a capsular polysaccharide by a marine filamentous fungus	Capsular polysaccharide produced by filamentous marine fungus.
5	influence of gas environment on catabolic activities and on reoxidation of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate in chlamydia	Influence of l' gaseous environment on the catabolic activities and on the reoxidation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced in Chlamydia.
5	control of dimorphism in mucor by hexoses inhibition of hyphal morphogenesis	Mucor dimorphism is controlled by apos; hyphal morphogenesis is inhibited by hexoses.
5	molar growth yields as evidence for oxidative phosphorylation in streptococcus faecalis strain 10cl	Molar growth is evidence of oxidative phosphorylation in the 10cl strain of Streptococcus faecalis.
5	trehalose phosphate synthesis in streptomyces hygroscopicus purification of guanosine diphosphate d glucose d glucose 6 phosphate 1 glucosyl transferase	Trehalose phosphate synthesis in glucose guanosine diphosphate 6 phosphate 1 glucosyl transferase streptomyces hygroscopicus purification.
5	autotrophy in nitrosocystis oceanus	Nitrosocystis oceanus autotrophy.
5	citrate pyruvate and lactate contaminants of commercial serum albumin	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	the effects of ph on the labellar sugar receptor of the fleshfly	Ph effects on a fly's lip-sugar sugar receptor.
5	effect of physiological variations in free fatty acid concentration on the binding of thyroxine in the serum of euthyroid and thyrotoxic subjects	Effect of physiological changes in free fatty acid concentration on thyroxine binding in euthyroid and thyrotoxic serum.
5	influence of ph and metal cations on aggregative growth of non slime forming strains of zoogloea ramigera	L' influence of ph and metallic cations on the aggregate growth of zoogloea ramigera strains that do not form mucus.
5	simple method for rapid determination of antibiotic blood levels	Simple method to quickly determine antibiotic blood levels.
5	control of respiration and metabolism in growing klebsiella aerogenes the role of adenine nucleotides	Respiratory and metabolic control in growing klebsiella aerogenes, the role of l' adenine nucleotides.
5	glycogenesis and glyconeogenesis in human platelets incorporation of glucose pyruvate and citrate into platelet glycogen glycogen synthetase and fructose 1 6 diphosphatase activity	Glycogenesis and glyconeogenesis in human platelets, pyruvate glucose and citrate incorporation into glycogen glycogen synthetase platelets and fructose 16 diphosphatase activity.
5	glucose production by lamprey meninges	Lamprey meninges produce glucose.
5	effect of culture medium composition and ph on the production of m protein and proteinase by group a streptococci	M protein and proteinase production by the streptococci group is affected by the composition of the culture medium and ph.
5	effects of ultraviolet radiation on respiration and growth in radiation resistant and radiation sensitive strains of escherichia coli b	Effects of Ultraviolet Radiation on Respiration and Growth of Resistant and Radiation Sensitive Escherichia coli strains.
5	glycolytic and related enzymes in clostridial classification	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	control of synthesis of malate dehydrogenase in aerobacter aerogenes	Mastery of aerobacter aerogenes malate dehydrogenase synthesis.
5	induction of spherule formation in physarum polycephalum by polyols	Polyols induced spherule formation in physarum polycephalum.
5	glucose metabolism in the mucosa of the small intestine changes of hexokinase activity during perfusion of the proximal half of rat small intestine	Glucose metabolism in mucosa; small intestine Changes in intestines; apo activity; hexokinase during infusion of proximal half of apo; small intestine of rat.
5	production and catabolite repression of the constitutive polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase of aeromonas liquefaciens	Production and catabolic repression of trans-eliminase; polygalacturonic acid; Aeromonas liquefaciens.
5	relationship between glucose utilization and growth rate in bacillus subtilis	Ratio of glucose utilization to the rate of growth of the subtilis bacillus.
5	regulation of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Acute gastrointestinal tract infection.
5	catabolic activities of neisseria meningitidis utilization of glutamate	Neisseria meningitidis glutamate catabolite activity.
5	multiple impairment of glycolysis in veillonella alcalescens	Multiple alterations of the glycolysis of veillonella alcalescens.
5	nonoxidative pentose phosphate pathway in veillonella alcalescens	Nonoxidative path of phosphate pentose in veillonella alcalescens.
5	macromolecular synthesis during microcycle sporogenesis of bacillus cereus t	Macromolecular synthesis during bacillus cereus t. microcycle sporogenesis.
5	carbohydrate accumulation during the sporulation of yeast	It is also important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
5	metabolic turnover of the polar lipids of mycoplasma laidlawii strain b	Metabolic turnover of polar lipids from mycoplasma laidlawii strain b.
5	gargoylism hydrolysis of beta galactosides and tissure accumulation of galactose and mannose containing compounds	Beta-galactosides and tissue accumulation of galactose- and mannose-containing compounds are gargoylized.
5	practical physiological schema for the identification of herellea vaginicola and its differentiation from similar organisms	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
5	microbial production of xylitol from glucose	Microbial xylitol production from glucose.
5	a method for the quantitative determination of neutral glycosphingolipids in urine sediment	Procedure for the Quantitative Determination of Neutral Glycosphingolipids in Urinary Sediments.
5	growth of histoplasma capsulatum vi maintenance of the mycelial phase	Growth of the apos; histoplasma capsulatum vi. maintains the mycelial phase.
5	action of diethylstilbestrol on staphylococci further observations on the effect of resting cells	The effects of diethylstilbestrol on the staphylococci are described in the following sections.
5	isolation and partial characterization of a major inositol containing lipid in baker s yeast mannosyl diinositol diphosphoryl ceramide	Partial isolation and characterization of apos; a major lipid containing inositol in bakery mannosyl diphosphoryl diinositol yeast.
5	compartmentation in the induction of the hexose 6 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	Comparison in apo; induction of phosphate hexose 6; escherichia coli.
5	separation and identification of soluble nucleotides in cambial and young xylem tissue of larix decidua mill	Cambium- and young xylem-soluble nucleotide separation and identification in larix decidua mill.
5	the role of the cytoplasmic redox potential in the control of fatty acid synthesis from glucose pyruvate and lactate in white adipose tissue	The role of cytoplasmic redox potential in controlling white adipose tissue fatty acid synthesis from pyruvate glucose and lactate.
5	glucose metabolism during the menstrual cycle glucose tolerance during the one cycle and under the effect of ovulatory suppressants	Glucose metabolism during menstrual cycle Glucose tolerance during and below cycle; ovulatory suppressant effect.
5	parathyroid hormone 3 5 amp ca and renal gluconeogenesis	Parathyroid hormone 3,5 ca, and renal gluconeogenesis.
5	effects of glucose on glycogen synthetase phosphorylase and glycogen deposition in the perfused rat liver	Effect of glucose on glycogen synthetase phosphorylase and on the deposition of glycogen in perfused rat liver.
5	ionizing radiation initiated degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria a possible role for defective prophage	Ionizing radiation triggered deoxyribonucleic acid degradation in bacteria, a possible role for a defective prophage.
5	interaction of staphylococcal alpha toxin and the estrogenic hormone diethylstilbestrol	Interaction of alpha staphylococcal toxin and estrogenic hormone diethylstilbestrol.
5	measurement of adipose tissue metabolites in vivo	Fat metabolites measured in vivo.
5	the metabolism of d glyceraldehyde by the lens	Metabolism of dglyceride via the lens.
5	glucose metabolism in the superovulated rat ovary in vitro effects of luteinizing hormone and the role of glucose metabolism in steroidogenesis	Glucose metabolism in superovular rat ovaries, in vitro effects of luteinizing hormone, and role of glucose metabolism in steroidogenesis.
5	uptake of monosaccharides by guinea pig cerebral cortex slices	Guinea-pig brain cortical slices capture monosaccharides.
5	a survey of infantile gastroenteritis	Children's gastro @-@Endentification survey.
5	studies on the pathogenesis of acute inflammation ix the influence of hyperosomolality secondary to hyperglycemia upon the acute inflammatory response induced by thermal injury to ear chambers of rabbits	Studies of disease pathogenesis; acute inflammation; influence of inflammation; secondary hyperosomolarity of rabbit ears; hyperglycemia on acute inflammatory response induced by thermal lesion of rabbit ears.
5	the effects of dietary conditions and glycerol concentration on glycerol uptake by rat liver and kidney cortex slices	Effects of dietary conditions and concentration of glycerol on apo; glycerol absorption by rat kidney liver and cortical slices.
5	composition of pseudomonas aeruginosa slime	Pseudomonas aeruginosa mucus composition.
5	the biochemical status of metabolites of alkane utilizing pseudomonas organisms	Biochemical status of etapos; alkane metabolites using pseudomonas organisms.
5	inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in disrupted spheroplast of escherichia coli	Inducible beta-galactosidase synthesis in dislocated spheroplast of apos; escherichia coli.
5	glucose induced crypticity toward succinate metabolism in saccharomyces lactis	Glucose induced a crypticity that promoted the metabolism of succinate in saccharomyces lactis.
5	automatic assessment of respiration during growth in stirred fermentors	Automatic evaluation of growth respiration in agitated fermenters.
5	respiration and glucose oxidation in human and guinea pig leukocytes comparative studies	The results of these studies are shown to be consistent with those reported in the literature.
5	tricarboxylic acid cycle enzymes and morphogenesis in blastocladiella emersonii	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
5	bacteria shaped gymnoplasts protoplasts of bacillus subtilis	The bacteria formed bacillus subtilis gymnoplast protoplasts.
5	variation in composition of yeast phosphohexosans	Yeast phosphohexosane composition change.
5	bacteriology of manganese nodules iv induction of an mno2 reductase system in a marine bacillus	The bacteriology of the nodules of manganese iv l'apos; induction of d'apos; a system mno2 reductase in a marine bacillus.
5	volutin granules in zoogloea ramigera	Zoogloea ramigera volutin granules.
5	conversion of carbohydrate to fat in adipose tissue an energy yielding and therefore self limiting process	The conversion of carbohydrates into fats in fat tissue is an energetic process that generates energy and is therefore limited to it-itself.
5	cerebral blood flow and metabolism in hepatic cirrhosis before and after portacaval shunt operation	Cerebral blood flow and liver cirrhosis metabolism before and after the surgery of the portacaval shunt.
5	yeast cell wall synthesis	Synthesis of Yeast Cell Wall.
5	studies of newly synthesized ribosomal ribonucleic acid of escherichia coli	L&apos studies; newly synthesized escherichia coli ribonucleic ribosomal acid.
5	pathways of glycogen synthesis in novikoff ascites hepatoma cells	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the formation of the liver.
5	metabolic studies of isolated human eccrine sweat glands	Metabolic studies of the isolated, human eccrine sweat glands.
5	medium for differential count of the anaerobic flora in human feces	Medium for the differential counting of anaerobic human feces flora.
5	characterization of clostridia by gas chromatography differentiation of species by trimethylsilyl derivatives of whole cell hydrolysates	Clostridia characterization by gas chromatography, trimethylsilyl derivatives d&apos species differentiation; whole cell hydrolysates.
5	regulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis in escherichia coli during diauxie lag accumulation of heterogeneous ribonucleic acid	The regulation of escherichia coli ribonucleic acid synthesis during apos; late accumulation of l' heterogeneous ribonucleic acid during diauxis.
5	acetoacetate metabolism in infant and adult rat brain in vitro	Metabolism of l' acetoacetate in the brain of new-rats born and adults in vitro.
5	molecular weights and metabolism of rat brain proteins	Rat brain protein metabolism and molecular mass.
5	the operation of the gamma aminobutyrate bypath of the tricarboxylic acid cycle in brain tissue in vitro	L' action of gamma aminobutyrate on the cycle of l' in vitro brain tissue tricarboxylic acid.
5	effects of added nucleotides on renal carbohydrate metabolism	Effect of apo; addition of nucleotides to the kidney's carbohydrate metabolism.
5	relationship of staphylococcal toxins and enzymes with serological and phage types	Relationship between toxins and the staphylococcal enzymes and the serological and phagic enzymes.
5	obesity absence of satiety aversion to sucrose	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to obesity.
5	the fuel of respiration of rat kidney cortex	Rat's renal cortical respiration fuel.
5	formation of hydrogen peroxide by group n streptococci and its effect on their growth and metabolism	Formation of d&apos peroxide; hydrogen by group n streptococci and their effect on growth and metabolism.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism enzyme profiles and transient and steady state content of intermediates of alternative pathways of glucose metabolism in krebs ascites cells	The pentose phosphate pathway of the enzyme profiles of glucose metabolism and the level of l' transient and stable status of intermediates of alternative glucose metabolism pathways in krebs ascitic cells.
5	synthesis of glycoprotein glycolipid protein and lipid in synchronized l5178y cells	Synthesis of lipid and glycoprotein glycolipid protein in l5178y synchronized cells.
5	pancreozymin bioassay in man based on pancreatic enzyme secretion potency of specific amino acids and other digestive products	Pancreozymin bioassay in humans; humans based on their ability to secrete pancreatic enzymes; specific amino acids and d' other digestive products.
5	comparative metabolism of vegetative and sporulating cultures of clostridium thermosaccharolyticum	Comparative metabolism of sporulating and vegetative cultures of Clostridium thermosaccharolyticum.
5	the pentose phosphate pathway of glucose metabolism influence of a growth hormone secreting pituitary tumour on the oxidative and non oxidative reactions of the cycle in liver	The glucose metabolism pentose phosphate pathway influences a growth hormone-secreted pituitary tumor on the oxidative and nonoxidative reactions of the liver cycle.
5	partial characterization of a biologically active steroid glycosideisolated from the starfish marthasterias glacialis	"In addition, it has been shown that there is a high degree of uncertainty associated with the interpretation of the term ""genetic steroid."""
5	biosynthesis of amino acids in clostridium pasteurianum	Clostridium pasteurianum amino acid biosynthesis.
5	exopolysaccharide colanic acid and its occurrence in the enterobacteriaceae	Colonic exopolysaccharide and its presence in enterobacteria.
5	cobaltous ion effect on diauxie	It's the same thing as the other parts of the body.
5	evidence against necessary phosphorylation during hexose transport in aspergillus nidulans	Evidence against the necessary phosphorylation during transport of the hexoses in l'apos; aspergillus nidulans.
5	protoplasts obtained from candida tropicalis grown on alkanes	Protoplasts obtained from alkane-grown candida tropicalis.
5	carbohydrate transport in clostridium perfringens type a	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Products.
5	glucose degradation in clostridium perfringens type a	The degradation of glucose in a-type clostridium perfringens.
5	the use of dietary restricted rat intestine for active transport studies	For the purpose of this document, the following definitions shall be used: 1.
5	inhibition of translation of preformed lac messenger ribonucleic acid by t4 bacteriophage	Preformed bacteriophage t4 inhibits translation of messenger lac ribonucleic acid.
5	the effects of isoniazid on the carbohydrates of mycobacterium tuberculosis bcg	The Effects of Isoniazide on Carbohydrate from Tuberculous Mycobacterium bcg.
5	regulation of sugar transport in isolated bacterial membrane preparations from escherichia coli	The regulation of the transport of sugars in preparations of bacterial membranes isolated from Escherichia coli.
5	phenol biosynthesis in higher plants gallic acid	The biosynthesis of phenol in plants superior to l'apos; gallic acid.
5	dietary protein and the control of fatty acid synthesis in rat adipose tissue	Dietary proteins and control of synthesis of fatty acids in rat adipose tissue.
5	fecal streptococci on barley and malt kernels and instant malted milk powder	Streptococci on seeds of barley and malt and instant malt milk in powder form.
5	product inhibition of the fermentative formation of glutamic acid	Inhibition by the product of l&apos fermentation formation; glutamic acid.
5	rapid detection of sublethally impaired cells of enterobacteriaceae in dried foods	In addition to the above, there are a number of other food-borne diseases that can affect the health of Canadians.
5	thymineless death in escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid replication and the immune state	Death without thymine in the replication of the apos; deoxyribonucleic acid; Escherichia coli and in the immune system.
5	malate utilization by a group d streptococcus regulation of malic enzyme synthesis by an inducible malate permease	Use of malate by a group of streptococci for regulation of l&apos synthesis; malic enzyme by inducible malate permease.
5	stimulation of galactokinase synthesis in escherichia coli by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Stimulation of Escherichia coli galactokinase synthesis by apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate.
5	immunochemistry of the capsular polysaccharide of an acinetobacter	L'immunochemistry de la polysaccharide capsulaire d'acinetobacter.
5	undamped oscillations of pyridine nucleotide and oxygen tension in chemostat cultures of klebsiella aerogenes	Undamped oscillations of the pyridine nucleotide and air tension in klebsiella aerogenes chemostat cultures.
5	dissimilation of methionine by fungi	Mushrooms dissimulate methionine.
5	involvement of phosphoenolpyruvate in lactose utilization by group n streptococci	L' phosphoenolpyruvate involvement in apos; lactose utilization by streptococci of group n.
5	the emision of corrosive vapours by wood hot water extracted o acetylated hemicelluloses from sweet chestnut castnaea sativa and wych elm ulmus glabrau and a discussion of o acetyl group changes occurring in these woods during incubation at 48 degrees and 100 per cent relative humidity	Sativa chestnut and elapos; ulmus glabrau; a discussion of acetyl group changes occurring in these woods during apo; 48-degree and 100% incubation; relative humidity.
5	compartmentation of glutamate metabolism in brain evidence for the existence of two different tricarboxylic acid cycles in brain	The compartmentalization of glutamate metabolism in the brain indicates two different cycles of the apos; tricarboxylic acid in the brain.
5	carabolite repression of the lac operon repression of translation	La repression carabolique de la repression de l' operon lac de la traduction.
5	induction of enzymes in dormant spores of aspergillus oryzae	In vitro fertilization; in vivo fertilization; aspergillus oryzae.
5	inducible gamma butyrobetaine degrading enzymes in pseudomonas species ak 1	Inducible enzymes degrading gamma-butyrobetaine in Pseudomonas ak 1 species were found to be inducible.
5	pathways of anaerobic acetate utilization in escherichia coli and aerobacter cloacae	Chemin de l'apos; use anaerobie de l'apos; acetate in escherichia coli et aerobacter cloacae.
5	effect of glucose ingestion on the metabolism of free fatty acids in human subjects	Effect of Loin; Glucose Ingestion on Free Fatty Acid Metabolism in Humans.
5	tissue distribution of glycosphingolipids in a case of fabry s disease	Glycosphingolipid tissue distribution in Fabry s.
5	metabolism of d and l glyceraldehyde in adipose tissue a stereochemical probe for glycerokinase activity	Glyceraldehyde metabolism in adipose tissue, a stereochemical probe for apos; glycerokinase activity.
5	mechanism of activation of catabolite sensitive genes a positive control system	It is important to note that there are many ways in which this can be achieved.
5	identification of members of the family enterobacteriaceae by the r b system	Enterobacterial family member identification system r b.
5	effect of glucose and low oxygen tension on l asparaginase production by a strain of escherichia coli b	Effect of glucose and cholesterol; low oxygen tension on the production of asapos; asparaginase l by an apos strain; escherichia coli b.
5	heterogeneity among strains of mycoplasma granularum and identification of mycoplasma hyosynoviae sp n	Heterogeneity among granularum mycoplasma strains and hyosynoviae sp.
5	the type specific substance from pneumococcus type 11a 43	Substance Specific to Type 11a Pneumococcal Type 43.
5	disappearance of isocitrate lyase enzyme from cells of chlorella pyrenoidosa	Chlorineella pyrenoidosa cell isocitrate lyase enzyme.
5	catalase dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage during phagocytosis	Catalase-dependent peroxidative metabolism during phagocytosis in alveolar macrophage.
5	effect of renal insufficiency on the active transport of calcium by the small intestine	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
5	enhancement of phagocytosis in bovine milk leukocytes in vitro	L' increased phagocytosis in bovine-milk leukocytes in vitro.
5	black beauty out of mycobacterium fortuitum cruz	Extracted from mycobacterium fortuitum cruz.
5	the role of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent malate dehydrogenase and isocitrate dehydrogenase in the supply of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate for steroidogenesis in the superovulated rat ovary	The role of malate dehydrogenase- and l&apos-dependent nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate in apos; isocitrate dehydrogenase in apos; supply of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced for steroidogenesis in apos; superovulated rat ovary.
5	composition of the cellular envelopes of anabaena cylindrica	The following is a summary of the results of this study.
5	steady state measurement of the turnover of amino acid in the cellular proteins of growing escherichia coli existence of two kinetically distinct reactions	Acute measurement; amino acid turnover equilibrium in escherichia coli cellular growth proteins occurs in two kinetically distinct reactions.
5	carbohydrate metabolism in spirochaeta stenostrepta	Department of Health and Human Services.
5	control of colanic acid synthesis	Control of synthesis of l' Colanic acid.
5	high yield preparation of isolated rat liver parenchymal cells a biochemical and fine structural study	Isolated rat liver parenchyma cells prepared in high yield for fine biochemical and structural study.
5	the biosynthesis of steryl glucosides in plants	Plant steryl glucoside biosynthesis.
5	studies of the effect of metoclopramide and apomorphine on gastric emptying and secretion in man	Lupus studies; effect of metoclopramide and apos; apomorphine on men's gastric emptying and secretion.
5	regulation of lipogenesis stimulation of fatty acid synthesis in vivo and in vitro in the liver of the newly hatched chick	Regulation of the stimulation of lipogenesis of fatty acid synthesis in newly hatched chick liver in vivo and in vitro.
5	factors that modify the metabolism of ethanol in rat liver and adaptive changes produced by its chronic administration	Factors that affect the metabolism of the drug; ethanol in the rat liver and the adaptive changes produced by its chronic administration.
5	the effect of nitrogen mustard intoxication on glucose absorption from the small intestine of the rat	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases such as diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, and other diseases.
5	growth stimulants in plant extracts for leuconostoc citrovorum	Leuconostoc citrovorum plant extracts growth stimulants.
5	lyophilization of cell free marek s disease herpesvirus and a herpesvirus from turkeys	Dosage-drying; acellular and dapo mares disease herpesvirus; turkey herpesvirus.
5	glutathione dependent peroxidative metabolism in the alveolar macrophage	Glutathione-dependent peroxidative metabolism in alveolar macrophage.
5	amino acid requirements of aeromonas	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	biosynthesis of glycosaminoglycans in bovine cornea the effet of uridine diphosphate xylose	In addition, it is possible to determine the effects of glycosaminoglycans in the bovine cornea.
5	carbohydrate composition of vesicular stomatitis virus	Vesicular stomatitis virus carbohydrate composition.
5	fatty acid synthetase activity in mycobacterium phlei regulation by polysaccharides	L' activity of fatty acid synthetase in polysaccharide regulation of mycobacterium phlei.
5	improved chemically defined basal medium cmrl 1969 for primary monkey kidney and human diploid cells	Chemically defined improved baseline medium for primary monkey kidney and human diploid cells.
5	resistance of bacillus subtilis spores to inactivation by gamma irradiation and heating in the presence of a bactericide i suitability of viable count procedures	Bacillus subtilis spore resistance to apo; inactivation by gamma irradiation and heating in the presence of apo; a bactericide suitable for use in viable enumeration methods.
5	enzymes of glucose metabolism in normal mouse pancreatic islets	Glucose metabolism enzymes in islets of normal mice.
5	selective inhibition of glucose oxidation by triethyltin in rat brain in vivo	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of metabolites, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
5	glucose metabolism in mouse pancreatic islets	The results of this study are summarized below.
5	interconvertible forms of glycogen phosphorylase in neurospora crassa	Interconvertible glycogen phosphorylase forms in neurospora crassa.
5	lipid metabolism in the perfused chicken liver lipogenesis from glucose acetate and palmitate	The metabolism of lipids in the lipogenesis of chicken liver perfused from glucose acetate and palmitate.
5	the composition of beta lactamase i and beta lactamase ii from bacillus cereus 569 h	Beta-lactamase I and beta-lactamase ii of cereus 569 h.
5	adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and catabolite repression in escherichia coli	Adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and Escherichia coli catabolite repression.
5	revised identification of the chromophore of a cell division factor from crown gall tumor cells of vinca rosea l	Revised identification of the d&apos chromophore; a factor of cell division from vinca rosea l crown gall tumor cells.
5	effect of 2 deoxyglucose on cell wall formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae and its relation to cell growth inhibition	Effect of 2 deoxyglucose on the formation of cell wall in sucrose cerevisiae and its relationship to l' inhibition of cell growth.
5	influence of ribosides on ultraviolet resistance of escherichia coli role of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in the ultraviolet resistance enhancement after amino acid prestarvation	Riboside influences resistance to apos; ultraviolet dolipos; escherichia coli role in synthesis of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in apos; increase in resistance to apos; ultraviolet after precarvation of amino acids.
5	enzymes of carbohydrate metabolism in thiobacillus species	Enzymes of thiobacillus carbohydrate metabolism.
5	giant cysts and cysts with multiple central bodies in azotobacter vinelandii	Giant cysts and multiple central body cysts in l' azotobacter vinelandii.
5	variation in the proportion of 50s and 30s ribosomal subunits at different growth rates	Change in percentage of sub-ribosomal units 50s and 30s at different growth rates.
5	kinetics of exogenous induction of the hexose 6 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	It is important to note that this is not a problem for the Canadian population.
5	chromosome replication and the division cycle of escherichia coli b r	The results of this study are summarized below.
5	medical management of chronic renal disease	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	biochemical and biophysical aspects of human platelet adhesion to collagen fibers	Biochemical and biophysical aspects of the skin; adhesion of the human platelets to the collagen fibers.
5	induction and repression of l arabinose isomerase in salmonella typhimurium	Apos induction and repression; apos isomerase; arabinosis in Salmonella typhimurium.
5	preparation and ultraviolet light induced transformation of an antifungal mixture of heptaene antibiotics of streptomyces surinam	The preparation and ultraviolet light induce transformation of anti-fungal mixture of heptaene streptomyces surinam antibiotics.
5	r b enteric differential system for identification of enterobacteriaceae	Enteric Differential System rb for Enterobacterial Identification.
5	microbiological study of copiamycin	Copiamycin microbiological study.
5	metabolism of the glycosyl diglycerides and phosphatidylglucose of staphylococcus aureus	Staphylococcus aureus phosphatidylglucose and glycosyl diglyceride metabolism.
5	utilization of glucose in heterotrophic media by thiobacillus intermedius	Glucose utilization in thiobacillus intermedius heterotrophic media.
5	regulation of glucose metabolism in thiobacillus intermedius	Glucose metabolism regulation in thiobacillus intermedius.
5	respiratory metabolism of a petite negative yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h	A small negative yeast, schizosaccharomyces, pombe 972h.
5	biosynthesis of alpha ketoglutarate by the reductive carboxylation of succinate in bacteroides ruminicola	L&apos synthesis; alpha-ketoglutarate by succinate reductive carboxylation in bacteriides ruminicola.
5	glycogen metabolism in chlamydia infected hela cells	Glycogen metabolism infects helical cells in chlamydia.
5	radiometric method for detection of bacteremia	Bacteremia detection radiometric method.
5	role of carbon and nitrogen sources in bacterial growth and sporulation	The effect of nitrogen on the growth of bacteria and the growth of bacteria.
5	preparation of labeled aflatoxins with high specific activities	Preparation of high specific activity labelled aflatoxins.
5	the regulation of triglyceride synthesis and fatty acid synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue effects of altered dietary and hormonal conditions	Regulation of fatty acid and triglyceride synthesis in the effects on epididymal adipose tissue of rats of modified hormonal and dietary conditions.
5	tryptophan catabolism during sporulation in bacillus cereus	Sporulation catabolism of tryptophan in the bacillus cereus.
5	necessity of calcium ion for cell division in lactobacillus bifidus	Need for calcium ion in lactobacillus bifidus cell division.
5	metabolic regulation in glucose limited chemostat cultures of escherichia coli	Chemostat cultures of Escherichia coli were limited by metabolic regulation in glucose.
5	effect of type of carbohydrate on amino acid accumulation and utilization by tetrahymena	Effect of Type D; Carbohydrate on Causation; Accumulation and Use of Amino acids by Tetrahymena.
5	partial purification and characterization of glycogen phosphorylase from dictyostelium discoideum	Partial Purification and Characterization of Dictyostelium discoideum glycogen phosphorylase.
5	listeria monocytogenes in nature	In nature, Listeria monocytogenes.
5	pigment formation for differentiating cryptococcus neoformans from candida albicans	Formation of pigments to differentiate between cryptococcus neoformans and candida albicans.
5	distribution of the phosphoenolpyruvate glucose phosphotransferase system in bacteria	Phosphoenolpyruvate glucose phosphotransferase system distribution in bacteria.
5	induction morphogenesis and germination of the chlamydospore of candida albicans	Induced Morphogenesis and Chlamydospore Germination of Canda albicans.
5	cell density dependent changes of glycolipid concentrations in fibroblasts and loss of this response in virus transformed cells	Changes in glycolipid concentration in cell density-dependent fibroblasts and the loss of that response in virus-transformed cells.
5	elaboration of the matrix glycoprotein of enamel by the secretory ameloblasts of the rat incisor as revealed by radioautography after galactose 3 h injection	Matrix glycoprotein synthesis of apos; enamel by ameloblast-secreting apos; rat incisor as revealed by radioautography following 3-h galactose injection.
5	sporulation of bacillus subtilis in continuous culture	Bacillus subtilis sporulation in culture continued.
5	roles of acetate and pyruvate in the metabolism of streptococcus diacetilactis	Roles of Lactate and Pyruvate in Streptococcus diacetilactis Metabolism.
5	long term starvation survival of rod and spherical cells of arthrobacter crystallopoietes	The long-term fasting survival of rods and spherical cells; arthrobacter crystallopoietes.
5	intracellular substrates for endogenous metabolism during long term starvation of rod and spherical cells of arthrobacter crystallopoietes	Intracellular substrates for endogenous metabolism during long-term deprivation of spherical d' arthrobacter crystallopoietes.
5	feedback inhibition of l glutamine d fructose 6 phosphate amidotransferase by uridine diphosphate n acetylglucosamine in neurospora crassa	Retroactive inhibition of glutamine d-fructose 6 phosphate amidotransferase by etapos; uridine diphosphate n-acetylglucosamine in neurospora crassa.
5	isolation and serological characterization of a cell wall antigen of rothia dentocariosa	An antigen of rothia dentocariosa, a parietal antigen of rothia dentocariosa, is isolated and serologically characterized.
5	cytochrome content of two pseudomonads containing mixed function oxidase systems	Two pseudomonads containing mixed-function oxidase systems possess cytochrome content.
5	synchronous growth of enteric bacteria	Synchronous enteric bacterial growth.
5	composition of human cerebrospinal fluid cerebroside	Human cerebroside fluid compound.
5	pathway of carbon flow during fatty acid synthesis from lactate and pyruvate in rat adipose tissue	The pathway of carbon flux during the synthesis of fatty acids from lactate and pyruvate in the rat adipose tissue.
5	beta galactoside transport in bacterial membrane preparations energy coupling via membrane bounded d lactic dehydrogenase	Energy coupling via membrane-bound d-lactic-dehydrogenase is used to transport beta-galactosides into bacterial membrane preparations.
5	iron its intracellular localization and possible role in cell division	It is the most common type of cell division, with the most common type of cell division.
5	liver metastases an experimental study	Experimental study.
5	cultivation of mycoplasmas on glass	Mycoplasma glass culture.
5	human alveolar macrophages comparison of phagocytic ability glucose utilization and ultrastructure in smokers and nonsmokers	Comparison of human alveolar macrophages of phagocytic capacity, glucose and lacid utilization, smoking and non-smoking.
5	reduced brain glucose with normal plasma glucose in salicylate poisoning	Reduced cerebral glucose levels with normal plasma glucose during salicylate poisoning.
5	autolysis of bacillus cereus cell walls and isolation of structural components	Bacillus cereus cell wall autolysis and structural component isolation.
5	effects of molybdate and selenite on formate and nitrate metabolism in escherichia coli	Effect of molybdate and selenite on the metabolism of formate and nitrate in escherichia coli.
5	cell wall composition in corynebacterium bovis and some other corynebacteria	Corynebacterium bovis and d' other corynebacteria.
5	biosynthesis during recovery of heat injured salmonella typhimurium	Recovery biosynthesis of heat-damaged Salmonella typhimurium.
5	heterotrophic growth of blue gren algae in dim light	In addition, there is a wide range of seaweed species that thrive in shallow water habitats.
5	isolation culture and fermentation characteristics of selenomonas ruminantium var bryantivar n from the rumen of sheep	It is not possible to determine the identity of the organism, but it is possible to determine the identity of the organism.
5	regulation of phosphatidylcholine biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Regulation of biosynthesis of phosphatidylcholine in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	relationships between disaccharide hydrolysis and sugar transport in amphibian small intestine	Relationship between l' hydrolysis of disaccharides and transport of sugars in amphibians; small intestine.
5	electron microscope radioautographic study of glycogen synthesis in the rabbit retina	Radioautographic analysis of rabbit retinal glycogen synthesis by electron microscopy.
5	inactivation of fructose 1 6 diphosphatase by glucose in yeast	Inactivation of yeast fructose 16 diphosphatase by glucose.
5	reactivative action of ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid or dipicolinic acid on inactive glucose dehydrogenase obtained from heated spores of bacillus subtilis	Reactive reaction of l' ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid or l' dipicolinic acid on inactivated glucose dehydrogenase from heated spores of subtilis bacillus.
5	2 keto 3 deoxygluconate an intermediate in the fermentation of gluconate by clostridia	Two keto 3 deoxygluconate is an intermediate in clostridial gluconate fermentation.
5	folate replacement by tetrahydrohomopteroate in triazine resistant bacteria	Tetrahydrohomopteroate replacement of folate in triazine-resistant bacteria.
5	studies on type ii glycogenosis effects of cortisone derivatives on acid glucosidase	Studies of acid glucosidase type ii glycogenic effects of cortisone derivatives.
5	a polymer of glucose and n acetylgalactosamine 1 phosphate in the wall of micrococcus sp a1	Glucose–phosphate polymer; acetyl-galactosamine 1 in micrococcus sp a1 cell wall.
5	the interaction in vitro between polymorphonuclear leukocytes and mycoplasma	L' in vitro polymorphonuclear leukocyte – mycoplasma interaction.
5	studies on the compartmentation of lipid in adipose cells i subcellular distribution composition and transport of newly synthesized lipid liposomes	Studies on lipid compartmentation in adipose cells, subcellular distribution composition, and newly synthesized lipid liposome transport.
5	evidence for the presence of a pool of glycerides with a rapid rate of turnover in brown fat from newborn rabbits	Evidence of a glyceride pool with a rapid brown fat turnover rate in newborn rabbits.
5	a stimulation study of brain compartments metabolism of glutamate and related substances in mouse brain	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	listeria monocytogenes meningitis an opportunistic infection	Listeria monocytogenes meningitis is opportunistic.
5	purification properties and regulation of glutamic dehydrogenase of bacillus licheniformis	Glutamic dehydrogenase purification and regulatory properties of the bacterium licheniformis.
5	mechanism for regulating the distribution of glucose carbon between the embden meyerhof and hexose monophosphate pathways in streptococcus faecalis	Mechanisms to regulate the distribution of carbon in glucose between the pathways of embden meyerhof and hexose monophosphate in streptococcus faecalis.
5	regulation of sugar transport in neurospora crassa	Regulation of Sugar Transport in Neurospora crassa.
5	hyphal wall compositions of marine and terrestrial fungi of the genus leptosphaeria	Hyphal wall composition of leptosphaeria marine and terrestrial fungi.
5	lactate production in the perfused rat liver	Perfused rat liver lactate production.
5	allosteric activation of brain hexokinase by magnesium ions and by magnesium ion adenosine triphosphate complex	Allosteric activation of brain apos; magnesium ion hexokinase and adenosine triphosphate complex of apos; magnesium ion.
5	the uptake and efflux of glycine from rat cerebral cortex slices	L'absorption et l'apos; efflux de glycine de tranches de cortex cérébrale de rat.
5	hydrogen peroxide utilization in myeloperoxidase deficient leukocytes a possible microbicidal control mechanism	Use of apo peroxide; hydrogen in myeloperoxidase-deficient leukocytes, a possible microbial-cidal control mechanism.
5	poly hydroxybutyrate biosynthesis and the regulation of glucose metabolism in azotobacter beijerinckii	Biosynthesis of polyhydroxybutyrate and regulation of the metabolism of glucose in apos; azotobacter beijerinckii.
5	comparison of some metabolic parameters in the perfused and the incubated rat diaphragm muscle with diaphragm muscle in vivo	Comparison of certain metabolic parameters in perfused rat and incubated diaphragm muscle in vivo.
5	immunochemistry of the common antigen of enterobacteriaceae kunin relation to lipopolysaccharide core structure	L' apos immunochemistry; common enterobacterial kunin antigen vs. central lipopolysaccharide structure.
5	quantitative radioautography of sugar transport in intestinal biopsies from normal humans and a patient with glucose galactose malabsorption	Quantitative radioautography of carbohydrate transport in normal and normal human intestinal biopsies; a human patient with malabsorption of glucose galactose.
5	renal failure in surgical patients treatment with intravenous essential amino acids and hypertonic glucose	Renal failure in surgical patients treated with essential intravenous amino acids (IVMA) and hypertonic glucose.
5	rate studies of polysaccharide biosynthesis from guanosine diphosphate d glucose and guanosine diphosphate d mannose	Studies of the rate of biosynthesis of polysaccharides from glucose guanosine diphosphate and mannose guanosine diphosphate.
5	carbohydrate intolerance in infants with diarrhea	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of diabetes.
5	nutrition of mouse ascites tumor cells in primary culture ii specific requirement for glucose	Tumour Cell Nutrition; Primary Ascites of Mice ii Specific Glucose Needs.
5	nuclease production and lysostaphin susceptibility of staphylococcus aureus and other catalase positive cocci	In addition, it is possible to determine the extent to which the drug is effective in reducing the risk of infection.
5	growth and metabolism of l cells in a chemically defined medium in a controlled environment culture system i effects of o2 tension on l cell cultures	Growth and metabolism of l-cells in chemically defined culture system with controlled environment i effects of o2 voltage on l-cell cultures.
5	regulation of gluconeogenesis during exposure of young rats to hypoxic conditions	The regulation of gluconeogenesis during pregnancy; young rats exposed to hypoxic conditions.
5	the diffusion capsule a novel device for the addition of a solute at a constant rate to a liquid medium its application to metabolic regulation	The diffusion capsule is a new device for adding d' a constant rate solute to a liquid medium its application to metabolic regulation.
5	acrylamide gel electrophoresis of intracellular proteins during early stages of sporulation in bacillus subtilis	L' d&apos gel electrophoresis; intracellular protein acrylamide during early sporulation in subtilis.
5	fatty acid composition of cladosporium resinae grown on glucose and on hydrocarbons	Fatty acid composition of glucose- and hydrocarbon-grown cladosporium resinae.
5	electrophoretic heterogeneity of bacterial nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate specific isocitrate dehydrogenases	Electrophoretic heterogeneity of isocitrate dehydrogenases specific for nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate.
5	physiology of sporeforming bacteria associated with insects iv glucose catabolism in bacillus larvae	Physiology of Spore Bacteria Associated with Glucose Catabolism in Bacillus Larvae.
5	nutritional requirements of arizona citrobacter and providencia	It's a good place to eat, but it's a good place to eat.
5	studies on the division cycle of mammalian cells v modifications of time parameters by different steady state culture conditions	Studies on the mammalian cell division cycle: changes in temporal parameters by different culture conditions at apo; d' equilibrium.
5	accumulation of untranslated lactose specific messenger ribonucleic acid during catabolite repression in escherichia coli	L' accumulation d' ribonucleic acid, an untranslated lactose messenger, during escherichia coli catabolite repression.
5	induction and regulation of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide specific 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase in streptococcus faecalis	Induction and regulation of etapos; a 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase specific nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in streptococcus faecalis.
5	transfer of alanine isomers by rat small intestine	Disseminating the isomers of the apos; alanine via the apos; rat's small intestine.
5	nuclease activities of mycoplasma gallisepticum as a function of culture age in different media	L' mycoplasma gallisepticum nuclease activity as a function of age; age of culture in different media.
5	transmethylation of sterols in aerobically adapting saccharomyces cerevisiae	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S.C., D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes, D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes, and D.R. Diet.
5	purification and characterization of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase from plasmodium berghei	Plasmodium berghei phosphoenolpyruvate carboxylase purification and characterization.
5	development of respiration and mitochondria in mucor genevensis after anaerobic growth absence of glucose repression	Mitochondrial and respiratory development in mucosal genesis following anaerobic growth without glucose repression.
5	fermentation of agmatine in streptococcus faecalis occurrence of putrescine transcarbamoylase	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
5	enzymatic basis for differentiation of rhizobium into fast and slow growing groups	Enzymatic basis for rhizobial differentiation into fast- and slow-growing groups.
5	studies on the diversity of inositol containing yeast phospholipids incorporation of 2 deoxyglucose into lipid	Apos diversity studies; 2 deoxyglucose incorporation into yeast lipids containing etapos; inositol phospholipids.
5	carbon and sulphur utilization during growth of pseudomonas fluorescens on potassium d glucose 6 o sulphate as the sole sulphur source	Use of carbon and sulfur during growth of Pseudomonas fluorescens on glucose 6 o potassium sulfate as sole sulfur source.
5	fatty acids of mycobacterium kansasii	Mycobacterium kansasii fatty acids.
5	production of extracellular polysaccharide matrix by zoogloea ramigera	Zoogloea ramigera produces extracellular polysaccharide matrix.
5	transverse septum formation in budding cells of the yeastlike fungus candida albicans	Formation of d' a transverse septum in the budding yeast candida albicans.
5	effect of glutamate on exogenous citrate catabolism of neisseria meningitidis and of other species of neisseria	Effect of glutamate treatment on the catabolism of exogenous neisseria meningitidis and d&apos citrate; other neisseria species.
5	resistance of zygorhynchus species to lysis	Zygorhynchus lysis resistance.
5	metabolic effects of the major component of bovine growth hormone	Metabolic effects of major component of the bovine growth hormone.
5	amino acid metabolism in exercising man	It's a good idea to try to find a way to make it easier for people.
5	the effect of polystyrene beads on cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate concentration in leukocytes	Effects of Styrofoam beads on concentrations of cyclic adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in leukocytes.
5	motor neurone disease further evidence for an abnormality of nerve metabolism	The disease is also a symptom of an abnormal state of nervous metabolism.
5	high aflatoxin production on a chemically defined medium	The results of this study are summarized below.
5	antifungal activity of substituted nitrobenzenes and anilines	Substituted nitrobenzene and aniline antifungal activity.
5	impairment of glycine absorption by glucose and galactose in man	It is not possible to determine the cause of death due to a combination of factors.
5	cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate during glucose repression in the rat liver	Cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate during rat liver glucose repression.
5	haem synthesis during mitochondrogenesis in yeast	Synthesis of Lapos; Hematoma During Mitochondrogenesis in Yeast.
5	some biological properties of pneumococcus type 37 and the chemistry of its capsular polysaccharide	Certain biological properties of type 37 pneumococcus and capsular polysaccharide chemistry.
5	cultural estimation of yeasts on seaweeds	Seaweed yeasts cultural estimate.
5	anaerobic roll tube media for nonselective enumeration and isolation of bacteria in human feces	The results of the study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part I, Part I, and will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
5	utilization of carbon sources by pullularia pullulans for the elaboration of extracellular polysaccharides	Extra-cellular polysaccharide development using pullularia pullulans as carbon sources.
5	role of ph and nitrogen limitation in the elaboration of the extracellular polysaccharide pullulan by pullularia pullulans	Role of Ph and Nitrogen Limitation in the Elaboration of Pullulan extracellular polysaccharide by pullularia pullulans.
5	comparison of schaedler agar and trypticase soy yeast extract agar for the cultivation of anaerobic bacteria	Comparison of the agar schaedler and the agar trypticase soybean yeast extract for culture of anaerobic bacteria.
5	chemically defined medium for the growth of clostridium perfringens	Chemically defined growth medium for clostridium perfringens.
5	influence of glucose levels on the in vitro phagocytosis of bacteria by human neutrophils	Human neutrophils influence in vitro bacterial phagocytosis by glucose levels.
5	effect of adrenocorticosteroid on glucose metabolism in bcg sensitized alveolar macrophages	Effect of the apos; adrenocorticoid on glucose metabolism in bcg-sensitized alveolar macrophages.
5	effect of diuresis on staphylococcus aureus kidney infections in mice	Effect of Diuresis on Staphylococcus aureus Renal Infections in mice.
5	regulation of secondary metabolite biosynthesis catabolite repression of phenoxazinone synthase and actinomycin formation by glucose	Regulation of secondary metabolite biosynthesis, phenoxazinone synthase catabolite repression and d&apos formation; actinomycin by glucose.
5	control of stable ribonucleic acid chain initiation in escherichia coli during diauxie lag	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the formation of the respiratory tract.
5	characterization and regulation of pyruvate carboxylase of bacillus licheniformis	Characterization and regulation of licheniformis bacillus pyruvate carboxylase.
5	role of metabolic energy in the transport of galactosides by streptococcus lactis	Role of Lapos; metabolic energy in galactoside transport via Streptococcus lactis.
5	synthesis of phosphoenolpyruvate from propionate in sheep liver	Synthesis of Phosphoenolpyruvate from Propionate in Sheep Liver.
5	characterization of insoluble protein fractions of mitochondria from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Characterization of saccharomyces cerevisiae mitochondrial insoluble protein fractions.
5	fluorometric studies of oxidative metabolism in isolated papillary muscle of the rabbit	Fluorometric oxidative metabolism studies in isolated rabbit papillary muscle.
5	the maltase glucoamylase and transglucosylase activities of acid glucosidase from rabbit muscle	Rabbit muscle acid glucosidase maltase and transglucosylase activity.
5	insolubilized enzymes kinetic behaviour of glucose oxidase bound to porous glass particles	Kinetic behavior of porous glass particle-bound glucose oxidase-insolubilized enzymes.
5	the regulation of growth hormone secretion from the isolated rat anterior pituitary in vitro the role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Regulation of l&apos secretion; l&apos growth hormone; anterior rat pituitary isolated in vitro role of l' cyclic adenosine 3,5 monophosphate.
5	fat transport and lymph and plasma lipoprotein biosynthesis by isolated intestine	Fat Transport and Lymph and Plasma Lipoprotein Biosynthesis by Isolated Intestine.
5	technique for measuring 14 co 2 uptake by soil microorganisms in situ	In-situ measurement technique; soil microorganism absorption of 14oC.
5	l asparaginase synthesis by erwinia aroideae	Synthesis of erwinia aroideae-asparaginase.
5	factors influencing l asparaginase production by erwinia aroideae	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of products.
5	galactose utilization in galactosemia	L'apos; use of galactose-based therapy in galactosemia.
5	stimulation of glucose transport in cultures of density inhibited chick embryo cells	Glucose transport stimulation in density cultures inhibits chick embryo cells.
5	differential sensitivities of the two malate dehydrogenases and the maltose permease to the effect of glucose in saccharomyces carlsbergensis	The differential sensitivities of malate dehydrogenases and maltose permease to apos; glucose effect in saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	turnover of putrescine in a pseudomonas species	Pseudomonas pseudomonas putrescine turnover.
5	nature of col e 1 plasmid replication in escherichia coli in the presence of the chloramphenicol	Nature of plasmid replication in chloramphenicol in Escherichia coli.
5	induction and characterization of galactosidase in an extreme thermophile	Extreme thermophilic galactosidase induction and characterization.
5	relationship between yield of protoplasts and growth phase in saccharomyces	Relationship between protoplast yield and saccharomycete growth phase.
5	sensitivity of the 14 co 2 radiometric method for bacterial detection	Sensitivity for bacterial detection of the 14-co 2 radiometric method.
5	stimulation of lactic streptococci in milk by galactosidase	Milk streptococci stimulated by galactosidase.
5	fate of carbon passing through the glucose pool of rumen digesta	Destination of carbon through the rumen digesta glucose pool.
5	influence of culture media on the antistaphylococcal activity of fosfomycin	Culture media influence on fosfomycin antistaphylococcal activity.
5	automated radiometric detection of bacteria in 2 967 blood cultures	Automated radiometric bacteria detection in 2,967 blood cultures.
5	clostridium perfringens i sporulation in a biphasic glucose ion exchange resin medium	Clostridium perfringens i sporulation in glucose resin exchange resin biphasic medium.
5	evaluation of the modified r b system for identification of enterobacteriaceae	Modified rb system evaluation for apo; enterobacterial identification.
5	growth factor requirements of ruminal cellulolytic bacteria isolated from microbial populations supplied diets with or without rapidly fermentable carbohydrate	Growth factor requirements of rumen cellulolytic bacteria isolated from microbial populations provided rapidly fermentable carbohydrate-containing and carbohydrate-free diets.
5	the response of infants to carbohydrate oral loads after recovery from diarrhea	Infants' response to oral carbohydrate loads after diarrhea has healed.
5	sickling reversed and blocked by urea in invert sugar	Sickle cell disease is caused by urea in the sugar.
5	serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer i basal levels and effect of food and atropine	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
5	the inhibition of plant and animal adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterases by a cell division promoting substance from tissues of higher plant species	L' adenosine inhibition 3-5 plant and animal cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterases by cell division favoring a substance from the tissues of the higher plant species.
5	coexistence of two asexual strains on a single resource	The relationship between two different asexual strains on the same resource.
5	monosaccharide and chitin content of cell walls of histoplasma capsulatum and blastomyces dermatitidis	Monosaccharide and chitin content of blastomyces dermatitid and histoplasma capsulatum cell walls.
5	subcellular fractionation by differential and zonal centrifugation of aerobically grown glucose de repressed saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Subcellular fractionation by differential zonal centrifugation of succharomyces carlsbergensis glucose from aerobically grown repressed saccharomyces.
5	distribution and correlation of events during thermal inactivation of bacillus megaterium spores	Thermal inactivation of spores of the megaterium bacillus.
5	hyphal wall synthesis in aspergillus nidulans effect of protein synthesis inhibition and osmotic shock on chitin insertion and morphogenesis	Effect of the apos; inhibition of protein synthesis and osmotic shock on the apos; insertion of chitin and morphogenesis in the apos; aspergillus nidulans.
5	relationship between energy substrate utilization and specific growth rate in aspergillus nidulans	Relationships between the utilization of energetic substrates and the specific growth rate of l'apos; aspergillus nidulans.
5	utilization of glucose and the effect of organic compounds on the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Glucose utilization and effects of organic compounds on chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans.
5	heterotrophic metabolism of the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Thiobacillus ferrooxidans heterotrophic metabolism.
5	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from the chemolithotroph thiobacillus ferrooxidans	Glucose 6 thiobacillus ferrooxidans chemolithotrophic phosphate dehydrogenase.
5	metabolism of glutamine by the intact functioning kidney of the dog studies in metabolic acidosis and alkalosis	Glutamine metabolism by intact kidney in dog studies; metabolic acidosis and apos; alkalosis.
5	isolation and properties of phagocytic vesicles ii alveolar macrophages	Isolation and Properties of Phagocytic Vesicles ii alveolar macrophages.
5	abnormal bactericidal metabolic and lysosomal functions of chediak higashi syndrome leukocytes	Abnormal metabolic functions and bactericidal lysosomes of leukocytes of chediak higashi syndrome.
5	cell wall composition and deoxyribonucleic acid similarities among the anaerobic coryneforms classical propionibacteria and strains of arachnia propionica	Composition of cell wall and similarities of cell wall; deoxyribonucleic acid between classical anaerobic propionibacteria and d' arachnia propionica strains.
5	growth of obligate autotrophic bacteria on glucose in a continuous flow through apparatus	Mandatory autotrophic glucose bacteria growth in a continuous flow through the apos; apparatus.
5	factors affecting the level of alanine racemase in escherichia coli	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support this assessment.
5	glycerol turnover and oxidation in man	Glycerol oxidation in humans.
5	oral rehydration of children with acute diarrhoea	Oral rehydration of acutely diarrhoeal children.
5	observations on cell volume ultrastructure mitochondrial conformation and vital dye uptake in ehrlich ascites tumor cells effects of inhibiting energy production and function of the plasma membrane	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that the effects of dyeing on cell volume and plasma membrane function are significant in the absence of evidence of dyeing.
5	regulation of staphylococcal enterotoxin b effect of thiamine starvation	Staphylococcal enterotoxin resulting from thiamine starvation.
5	induction of galactokinase in saccharomyces cerevisiae kinetics of induction and glucose effects	Galactokinase Induction in Apos Kinetics; Saccharomyces cerevisiae Induction and Glucose Effects.
5	a biochemical subdivision of one phage type of salmonella typhimurium	It is the most common type of microorganism, and the most common type.
5	multiple forms of pseudomonas multivorans glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases differences in size pyridine nucleotide specificity and susceptibility to inhibition by adenosine 5 triphosphate	Pseudomonas multivorans glucose 6 phosphate and 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenases differ in many forms in their specificity to size nucleotide pyridines and their susceptibility to apos; apos inhibition; adenosine 5 triphosphate.
5	structure and chemical composition of prospheroplast envelopes of saccharomyces cerevisiae and hansenula anomala	Structure and chemical composition of the envelopes of the prospheroplasts of saccharomyces cerevisiae and hansenula anomala.
5	recovery of exocellular acid phosphatase activity on saccharomyces mellis after treatment of the organism with reagents that affect the cell surface	Apos recovery; exocellular acid phosphatase activity on mellis saccharomyces after apos treatment; organism with cell surface reagents.
5	hydroxyproline heterooligosaccharides in chlamydomonas	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S.C., D.D. Nesbitt, D.D. Nesbitt, D.D. Nesbitt, and D.D. Nesbitt.
5	development of tetracycline resistant staphylococcus aureus in gnotobiotic mice	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
5	control of the production of exo beta n acetylglucosaminidase by bacillus subtilis b	Control of exo-acetylglucosaminidase production by bacillus subtilis b.
5	the development of the respiratory chain of saccharomyces carlsbergensis during respiratory adaptation	Saccharomyces carlsbergensis respiratory chain development during respiratory adaptation.
5	subcellular fractionation by zonal centrifugation of glucose repressed anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Zonal centrifugation subcellular fractionation of glucose represses anaerobic growth of saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	changes in enzyme activities and distributions during glucose de repression and respiratory adaptation of anaerobically grown saccharomyces carlsbergensis	Changes in the activity and distribution of enzymes during repression by glucose and l' respiratory adaptation of succharomyces carlsbergensis grown under anaerobic conditions.
5	effect of halofenate and clofibrate on growth and lipid synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of Halofenate and Clofibrate on Growth and Lipid Synthesis in Saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	lysis of saccharomyces cerevisiae with 2 deoxy 2 fluoro d glucose an inhibitor of the cell wall glucan synthesis	Lysis of succharomyces cerevisiae with 2 fluoro deoxy 2 glucose, an inhibitor of glucan synthesis in the cell wall.
5	inhibition of the metabolism of streptococci and salmonella by specific antisera	Inhibition of streptococcal and salmonella metabolism by antisera.
5	repression of in vivo synthesis of the mitochondrial elongation factors t and g in saccharomyces fragilis	Repression of in vivo d&apos factor synthesis; t and g mitochondrial elongation in saccharomyces fragilis.
5	effect of polyoxin d on chitin synthesis and septum formation in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of polyoxin d on septum formation and chitin synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	effects of oxygen tension and glucose repression of mitochondrial protein synthesis in continuous cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of oxygen tension and repression of mitochondrial protein synthesis by glucose in continuous cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	nitrogen repression of the allantoin degradative enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Apos repression, nitrogen degrading enzymes, allantoin in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	effect of cell density on lactose synthesis in bovine mammary cell cultures	Effect of Cell Density on Lactose Synthesis in bovine mammary cell cultures.
5	active transport of exogenous s adenosylmethionine and related compounds into cells and vacuoles of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Active transport of exogenous adenosylmethionine and its related compounds in saccharomyces cerevisiae cells and saccharomyces.
5	biosynthesis of fosfomycin by streptomyces fradiae	Streptomyces fradiae fosfomycin biosynthesis.
5	the regulated catabolism of endogenous and exogenous phosphatidylinositol by saccharomyces cerevisiae leading to extracellular glycerophosphorylinositol and inositol	Endogenous and exogenous succharomyces cerevisiae-regulated phosphatidylinositol catabolism gave extracellular glycerophosphorylinositol and l' inositol.
5	copurification of l ascorbate 2 sulfate sulfohydrolase and arylsulfatase activities from the liver of a marine gastropod charonia lampas	Copurification of apos sulfohydrolase activities; ascorbate 2 and apos; arylsulfatase from apos liver; marine gastropod, charonia lampas.
5	galactose and glucose metabolism in galactokinase deficient galactose 1 p uridyl transferase deficient and normal human fibroblasts	Glucose and galactose metabolism in normal and galactose 1 p uridyltransferase- and galactokinase-deficient human fibroblasts.
5	duodenal control of gastric emptying in the milk fed calf	Duodenal gastric emptying control in milk-fed calf.
5	autolytic enzymes in hyphae of aspergillus nidulans their action on old and newly formed walls	Autolytic enzymes in d' aspergillus nidulans act on newly formed walls and old walls.
5	adenylate energy charge in saccharomyces cerevisiae during starvation	The energetic charge of l' adenylate in cerevisiae saccharomyces during fasting.
5	glutamate oxidation of 6c3hed lymphoma effects of l asparaginase on sensitive and resistant lines	Glutamate oxidation of the effects of asparaginase I on lymphoma 6c3hed in susceptible and resistant lines.
5	in vivo biosynthesis of peptidophosphogalactomannan in penicillium charlesii	In vivo peptidophosphogalactomannan biosynthesis in penicillium charlesii.
5	biotin uptake by cold shocked cells spheroplasts and repressed cells of saccharomyces cerevisiae lack of feedback control	Biotin uptake by heat-shocked and repressed saccharomyces cerevisiae n&apos spheroplasts is not controlled by feedback.
5	carbon metabolism under conditions of regulated penicillin biosynthesis	C-metabolism under controlled conditions of penicillin biosynthesis.
5	microbodies in methanol assimilating yeasts	Yeast-absorbing microgranules in methanol.
5	effect of acetaldehyde upon the oxidative degradation of glucose by baker s yeast	Impact of apo; acetaldehyde on oxidative glucose degradation by bakers yeast.
5	coordinate regulation of adenylate cyclase and carbohydrate permeases by the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in salmonella typhimurium	To coordinate the regulation of the permeases of l' adenylate cyclase and carbohydrate by the phosphoenolpyruvate carbohydrate phosphotransferase system in Salmonella typhimurium.
5	a new method of obtaining zygotes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	A new method to obtain zygotes from the saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	multiple forms of mitochondrial alcohol dehydrogenase in saccharomyces cerevisiae	In many forms, l' alcohol mitochondrial dehydrogenase is present in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the response of a bioelectrochemical cell with saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolizing glucose under various fermentation conditions	The response of a glucose-metabolizing cell to succharomyces cerevisiae under various fermentation conditions.
5	is phlorizin or its aglycon the inhibitor of intestinal glucose transport a study in normal and lactase deficient man	Phlorizine or its aglycone is an inhibitor of glucose transport in the intestinal tract of normal, lactase-deficient men.
5	development of mitochondrial membranes in anaerobically grown yeast cells	Mitochondrial membrane development in yeasts grown anaerobically.
5	effect of ornithine alpha oxoglutarate on brain metabolism in patients with chronic liver disease	Effect of apos; ornithine alpha oxoglutarate on cerebral metabolic rate in patients with apos; chronic liver disease.
5	factors affecting the palmitoyl coenzyme a desaturase of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Factors Affecting Palmitoyl Coenzyme a Saccharomyces cerevisiae Desaturase.
5	effect of gal4 gene dosage on the level of galactose catabolic enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effect of gal4 gene assay on galactose catabolic enzyme level in succharomyces cerevisiae.
5	biogenesis of mitochondrial membranes neurospora crassa during cellular differentiation ultrastructural changes accompanying differentiation	Neurospora crassa mitochondrial membrane biogenesis during ultrastructural differentiation accompanying differentiation.
5	studies on the mechanism of metabolic stimulation in polymorphonuclear leucocytes during phagocytosis ii presence of the nadph2 oxidizing activity in a myeloperoxidase deficient subject	Studies of the metabolic stimulation mechanism in polymorphonuclear leukocytes during phagocytosis ii the presence of l' nadph2 oxidizing activity in a myeloperoxidase-deficient subject.
5	supplementary intravenous alimentation in the premature infant weighing less than 1 500 grams	Additional intravenous food supply for preemies weighing less than 1,500 grams.
5	effect of anisole anethole butylhydroxyanisole and safrole on intestinal absorption in the rat author s transl	Toxicity of ethylene oxide to rat liver and kidney tissue.
5	wall mannan of saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolic stability and release into growth medium	Parietal Mannan of succharomyces cerevisiae, its metabolic stability, and its release into the growth medium.
5	effect of aeration on the activity of gluconeogenetic enzymes in saccharomyces cerevisiae growing under glucose limitation	Effect of apo; gluconeogenic enzyme activity in glucose-limiting saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	gonadectomy and the development of age dependent polydipsia and the intake of nacl solutions in the swr j mouse	Gonadectomy and apo-dependent polydipsia development; age and age; nacl solution ingestion in swr j mice.
5	the accumulation of succinate by the yeast brettanomyces bruxellensis	L' succinate accumulation by brettanomyces bruxellensis.
5	comparative studies on sporulation promotive actions on cyclic amp theophylline and caffeine in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Comparative studies of the stimulatory actions of sporulation on theophylline and l&apos caffeine; a cyclic fungus in the cerevisiae saccharomyces.
5	energy metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae discrepancy between atp balance and known metabolic functions	The results of this study are consistent with those of other studies, and are consistent with those of other studies.
5	mechanism of 2 deoxy d glucose inhibition of cell wall polysaccharide and glycoprotein biosyntheses in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Mechanisms of glucose deoxy inhibition of polysaccharide and cell wall glycoprotein biosynthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	resistance to pediococcus cerevisiae to amethopterin as a consequence of changes in enzymatic activity and cell permeability ii permeability changes to amethopterin and other folates in the drug resistant mutant	Pediococcus cerevisiae resistance to apos; amethopterin as a result of changes in apos; enzymatic activity and cellular permeability ii changes in permeability to apos; amethopterin and dapos; other folate in drug-resistant mutant.
5	l asparaginase activity of mycobacterium phlei under various growth conditions	L' l&apos activity; asparaginase l of phlei mycobacteria under various conditions of growth.
5	self assembly of extracellular tubular structures of non protein nature produced by an actinomycete	Self-assembly of actinomycete-protein-induced extracellular tubular structures.
5	regulation of acetyl coa synthetase of saccharomyces cerevisiae	In addition, it can be used as a substrate for the production of the product.
5	site of initial glycosylation of mannoproteins from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Saccharomyces cerevisiae mannoproteins initial glycosylation site.
5	inhibition of glucan and levan synthesis and neuraminidase activity of oral streptococci by monkey antiserums	L' inhibition of levan and glucan synthesis; oral streptococcal neuraminidase activity by monkey antisera.
5	the isolation and characterization of peroxisomes microbodies from baker s yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	Isolation and characterization of bakery saccharomyces cerevisiae peroxisome microbodies.
5	morphogenic effects of alpha factor on saccharomyces cerevisiae a cells	Morphogenic Effects of Alpha Factor on Saccharomyces cerevisiae a.
5	diaglycerol biosynthesis in everted sacs of rat intestinal mucosa	The biosynthesis of the diaglycerol in turned-over rat intestinal mucosal sacs.
5	localizations of beta glucuronidase activity in sections and cultures of human gliomas	Localization of the apos; beta glucuronidase activity in human glioma sections and cultures.
5	isolation and composition of an alkali soluble glucan from the cell walls of saccharomyces cerevisiae	In addition, it can be used as an insecticide to prevent the spread of the insecticide.
5	the preflow technic a new method of pharmacoradiography of the mesenteric area	The preflow technique is a new mesenteric pharmacoradiography method.
5	effect of some aldoses on growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae inhibited with molybdenum	The effect of certain aldoses on saccharomyces cerevisiae growth was found to be inhibited by molybdenum.
5	transport of 2 deoxy d galactose in saccharomyces fragilis	Two deoxy galactose transport in succharomyces fragilis.
5	significant reduction in the incidence of phlebitis with buffered versus unbuffered cephalothin	Significant reduction in apo; incidence of buffered versus unbuffered cephalothin in phlebitis.
5	the influence of conditions of growth on the endogenous metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae effect on protein carbohydrate sterol and fatty acid content and on viability	L' influence of growth conditions on endogenous saccharomyces cerevisiae metabolism has an effect on sterols and fatty acids in protein carbohydrates and on viability.
5	augmentation of ethanol absorption by mono and disaccharides	Increase in apo; absorption of apo; ethanol by mono- and disaccharides.
5	gluconeogenesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae determination of fructose 1 6 bisphosphatase activity in cells grown in the presence of glycolytic carbon sources	Gluconeogenesis in succharomyces cerevisiae was used to determine the apos; fructose activity 16 bisphosphatase in cells grown on glycolytic carbon sources.
5	the substrate constant for the ammonium ion of growing saccharomyces cerevisiae	Substrate constant for ammonium ion in growing cerevisia saccharomyces.
5	micromethod for the determination of glucose with glucose dehydrogenase in the autoanalyzer author s transl	Micro-glucose dehydrogenase determination method in apos; auto-transl author analyzer.
5	inactivation by glucose of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase from saccharomyces cerevisiae	Glucose-induced inactivation of saccharomyces cerevisiae phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase.
5	inhibition by 5 thio d glucopyranose of protein biosynthesis in vitro in spermatids from rat testis	In vitro, glucopyranose 5 thio inhibits the biosynthesis of proteins in rat testis spermatids.
5	survival of pleomorphic sarcoma 37 transplanted virgin female dba 2j mice effects produced by high blood glucose levels alone and in combination with drugs	In addition, there was a significant increase in the number of newborns and a decrease in the number of newborns.
5	comparative study of the effect of ethyl apovincaminate and xantinol nicotinate in cerebrovascular diseases immediate drug effects on the concentrations of carbohydrate metabolites and electrolytes in blood and csf	Comparative study of apos, apos, apos, xantinol ethyl and nicotinate effects of drugs on carbohydrate metabolite and apos concentrations; electrolytes in blood and csf in cerebrovascular diseases.
5	dextran degrading bacteria in human oral cavity and their activity against insoluble glucan from streptococcus mutants	Dextran-degrading bacteria in the human oral cavity, and their activity against the insoluble glucan of streptococci mutants.
5	clinical value of washed platelet concentrates in patients with non hemolytic transfusion reactions	Clinical Value of Washed Platelet Concentrates in Patients with Non-Hemolytic Transfusion Reactions.
5	biosynthesis of the dimethylbenzene moiety of riboflavin and dimethylbenzimidazole evidence for the involvement of c 1 of a pentose as a precursor	Biosynthesis of the dimethylbenzene riboflavin and dimethylbenzimidazole moiety demonstrates the involvement of c1 d&apos, pentose as a precursor.
5	mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase of the fission yeast schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h changes in activity and inhibitor sensitivity in response to catabolite repression	L' mitochondrial yeast fission yeast adenosine triphosphatase, schizosaccharomyces pombe 972h, changes apos; activity and sensitivity to apos; inhibitor in response to catabolite repression.
5	physiological effects of an antimycotic azasterol on cultures of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Antimycococcal azasterol has been shown to have a physiological effect on the culture of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the digestion of yeast cell wall polysaccharides in veal calves	Yeast cell wall polysaccharide digestion in beef calves.
5	the mechanism of catabolite inhibition of invertase by glucose in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The Mechanism of Dapos; Catabolic Glucose Invertease Inhibition in Saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	transport of ribitol and d glucose in the yeast candida guillermondii	Ribitol and d-glucose transport in candida guillermondii.
5	induction of respiratory deficient mutants in saccharomyces cerevisiae by mono and diazido analogs of ethidium	Induction of respiratory-deficient mutants in cerevisiae saccharomyces by l' ethidium, mono- and diazido analogues.
5	value of methods used in the etiological diagnosis of pleural exudates	Value of Methods Used in the Etiological Diagnosis of Pleural Exudates.
5	high aerobic glycolysis of rat hepatoma cells in culture role of mitochondrial hexokinase	Acute toxicity of chloroform to rats exposed to chloroform.
5	allantoin transport in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Transport of lidos; allantoin in cerevisiae saccharomyces.
5	the identification characterization and mapping of a gene for flocculation in saccharomyces sp	A gene for the flocculation of saccharomyces sp.
5	plating medium for differentiation salmonella arizonae from other salmonellae	Culture Medium for Differentiation of Salmonella arizonae d' Other Salmonella.
5	l methionine as an ethylene precursor in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Methionine as a precursor to apos; ethylene in the saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	on the mode of action of a new antifungal antibiotic aculeacin a inhibition of cell wall synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae	A new aculeacin antifungal antibiotic, an inhibition of cell wall synthesis in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	physiology and biochemistry of streptomycetes xi different incorporation of d glucose u 14c into the paromomycin isomers and the precursors of paromomycin i	Streptomycetes xi differ physiologically and biochemically in their incorporation of glucose u 14c into isomers of paromomycin and precursors of paromomycin i.
5	effects of ethylene on the metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effects of Apos; Ethylene on Saccharomyces cerevisiae Metabolism.
5	apparent half lives of sugar transport proteins in saccharomyces cerevisiae	The half-apparent life of saccharomyces cerevisiae sugar transport proteins.
5	promoter and attenuator related metabolic regulation of the salmonella typhimurium histidine operon	Proponent- and Dosage Regulation; Salmonella typhimurium Histidine Operon; Capos Mitigation.
5	biosynthesis of fatty acids and sterols in relation to the antibiotic formation in oudemansiella mucida	Fatty acid and sterol biosynthesis in relation to antibiotic formation in apos; ordemansiella mucida.
5	kinetics of glucose repression of yeast cytochrome c	The glucose repression kinetics of yeast cytochrome c.
5	alcohol dehydrogenase activity of the subcellular fractions of torulopsis candida yeasts grown on glucose and hexadecane	L&apos activity; alcohol dehydrogenase of glucose- and hexadecane-grown subcellular fractions of yeast torulopsis candida.
5	the effect of the water activity of the milieu on rates of glucose uptake by the osmophilic yeasts saccharomyces rouxii and debaryomyces hansenii	Lapos; effect of apo; medium water activity on apo levels; glucose absorption by saccharomyces russii osmophilic yeasts and debaryomyces hansenii.
5	relationship of glycolytic intermediates glycolytic enzymes and ammonia to glycogen metabolism during sporulation in the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	The relationship between glycolytic intermediates and glycolytic enzymes as well as ammonia and glycogen metabolism during sporulation in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	the influence of certain growth conditions on the phosphatase activity of streptococcus mutans grown in batch and continuous culture	L' influence of growth conditions on pH; phosphatase activity of cultured and continuous cultured streptococcus mutans.
5	effects of glucose and chromium iii concentrations in the medium on the uptake of 51cr by brewer s yeast	Effects of medium concentrations of glucose and chromium iii on apos; 51cr absorption by brewing yeast.
5	flow microfluorometry study of diauxic batch growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Flow microfluorometry (FF) studies of the discontinuous diauxic growth of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	mathematical model of cell growth and phosphatase biosynthesis in saccharomyces carlsbergensis under phosphate limitation	Phosphatase biosynthesis and cell growth in phosphate-limited saccharomyces carlsbergensis.
5	effect of carbon composition of the fermented medium on the synthesis of volatile acids by the yeast saccharomyces carlsbergensis 776	Effect of carbon composition of fermented medium on volatile acid synthesis by saccharomyces carlsbergensis 776.
5	in situ study of the glycolytic pathway in saccharomyces cerevisiae	In situ glycolytic pathway study in saccharomyces cerevisiae.
5	biosynthesis and regulation of fructose 1 6 bisphosphatase and phosphofructokinase in saccharomyces cerevisiae grown in the presence of glucose and gluconeogenic carbon sources	Fructose 16 bisphosphatase and phosphofructokinase biosynthesis and regulation in succharomyces cerevisiae grown on glucose and gluconeogenic carbon sources.
5	regulation of saccharomyces cerevisiae nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent glutamate dehydrogenase by proteolysis during carbon starvation	Saccharomyces cerevisiae nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate-dependent glutamate dehydrogenase regulation by proteolysis during carbon deprivation.
5	regulation of alpha amylase biosynthesis in pichia burtonii b	Regulation of the biosynthesis of pichia burtonii; alpha@-@ amylase activity b.
5	effect of anaerobiosis and glucose on the content of haem and its precursors in intact yeast cells	The effect of glucose and anaerobiosis on the contents of yeast intact cells; hematocrit and its precursors.
5	characterization of two salmonella newport bacteriophages	Characterization of two Salmonella Newport Bacteriophages.
6	metabolic and ultrastructural changes induced in adipose tissue by insulin	Injury is caused by the presence of a substance in the body or by the presence of a substance.
6	the fourth international standard for insulin	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	insulin induced accumulation of d xylose against an apparent concentration gradient in diaphragm muscle in vivo	Insulin induced xylose accumulation against an apparent diaphragm concentration gradient in vivo.
6	effects of insulin on the permeability of d and l xylose and d and l arabinose in rat diaphragm muscle	Effects of apos; insulin on d and xylose and d and arabinose permeability in rat diaphragm muscle.
6	the effect of insulin alloxan diabetes and anoxia on the ultrastructure of the rat heart	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	hepatic glucokinase a direct effect of insulin	Hepatic glucokinase is the direct effect of insulin.
6	effect of hormones on the turnover of polysaccharides in connective tissues	Effect of hormones on connective tissue polysaccharide turnover.
6	observations on the etiology and therapy of brittle diabetes	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	isolation of an insulin secretion granule fraction	Isolate a granular secretion of insulin.
6	insulin action in alloxan diabetes modified by actinomycin d	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to the drug product.
6	insulin induced glomerulosclerosis in the rabbit	Glomerulosclerosis was induced in rabbits by insulin.
6	the requirement for hydrocortisone in antibody forming tissue cultivated in serum free medium	The need for apos; hydrocortisone in serum-free cultured antibody-forming tissue.
6	removal of interfering nucleotides from brain extracts containing substance p effect of drugs on brain concentrations of substance p	Removing interfering nucleotides from drug-containing brain extracts has effect on p-brain concentrations.
6	studies on gastrin	Gastrin studies.
6	lobuloalveolar differentiation in mouse mammary tissues in vitro	Lobulo differentiation-alveolar in the mammary tissue of mice in vitro.
6	iodoinsulin used to determine specific activity of iodine 131	It is important to note, however, that there are no data available to support this conclusion.
6	jet injection of insulin vs the syringe and needle method	Injection drug use; injection drug use; injection drug use; injection drug use.
6	insulin inducer of pyruvate kinase	Pyruvate kinase insulin inducer.
6	association of acute local reactions to insulin with an insulin binding gamma i m antibody	Acute local reactions to apos; insulin with a gamma antibody; insulin.
6	acromegaly the effects of various steroid hormones on the insulin induced growth hormone response	An increase in the amount of insulin that can be used to treat a person's immune system.
6	stimulation by insulin of the formation of ribonucleic acid and protein by mammary tissues in vitro	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of breast cancer.
6	the effects of secretin pancreozymin and gastrin on insulin and glucagon secretion in anesthetized dogs	The Effects of Pancreozymin and Gastrin on Insulin and Glucagon Secretion in Anaesthetized Dogs.
6	human placental lactogen studies of its acute metabolic effects and disposition in normal man	Studies of the effects of acute metabolic effects and disposition of human placental lactogen in normal humans.
6	a receptor mechanism for the inhibition of insulin release by epinephrine in man	A receptor mechanism for apos; insulin release inhibition by apos; epinephrine in apos; man.
6	a comparison of the effects of tolazamide and tolbutamide upon blood glucose and serum insulin and lipid levels in diabetic subjects	Comparison of glycemic and insulin and serum lipid effects of tolazamide and tolbutamide in diabetic subjects.
6	hormone dependent differentiation of mammary gland sequence of action of hormones in relation to cell cycle	In vivo studies have shown that the effects of hormones on the body's ability to function in the body's body can be significant.
6	growth hormone deficiency in man an isolated recessively inherited defect	It's a condition in which a person's immune system is unable to function properly and is unable to function properly.
6	assessment of hypothalamic pituitary function in endocrine disease	Evaluation of endocrine hypophysial hypothalamic function.
6	glycogen synthetase activity in liver regulation by the autonomic nerves	L' activity of glycogen synthetase in hepatic regulation by autonomic nerves.
6	the renal handling of insulin	Insulin in kidney manipulation.
6	insulin biosynthesis evidence for a precursor	Evidence of biosynthesis of apos and an insulin precursor.
6	studies on insulin biosynthesis subcellular distribution of leucine h3 radioactivity during incubation of goosefish islet tissue	Subcellular distribution studies of leucine h3 activity in apo biosynthesis; insulin during apo; islet tissue incubation; geese and geese.
6	the significance of basal insulin levels in the evaluation of the insulin response to glucose in diabetic and nondiabetic subjects	It is important to note that the results of the study are not consistent with those of other studies, but are consistent with those of other studies.
6	a possible role for the adenylcyclase system in insulin secretion	It is possible that the adenylate cyclase system may play a role in the secretion of insulin.
6	role of insulin in endogenous hypertriglyceridemia	Role of Immune Deficiency; Insulin in Initiation; Endogenous hypertriglyceridemia.
6	proteinase enzyme system of lactic streptococci 3 substrate specificity of streptococcus lactis intracellular proteinase	Milky Streptococcal Proteinase Enzymatic System 3 - Specificity of Streptococcus lactis Intracellular Proteinase Substrate.
6	concentrations of free glucogenic amino acids in livers of rats subjected to various metabolic stresses	D&apos concentrations; free amino acids in the liver of rats subjected to a variety of metabolic stresses.
6	use of helical wheels to represent the structures of proteins and to identify segments with helical potential	Helical wheels are used to represent protein structures and identify segments with helical potential.
6	plasma growth hormone concentration in corticosteroid treated children	"""Statistics Canada, Catalogue 82-003, Catalogue 82-003"", 75-001-XPF."
6	immunological and biological properties of iodoinsulin labeled with one or less atoms of iodine per molecule	Immunological and biological properties of iodine; iodine-labeled atom-labeled iodine or iodine-labeled iodine-labeled iodine.
6	the carbohydrate components of hydrolysates of gastric secretion and extracts from mucous glands of the gastric body mucosa and antrum	Carbohydrate components of the gastric secretion hydrolysates and gastric and intestinal mucosal mucosal extracts.
6	isolation and a partial amino acid sequence of insulin from the islet tissue of cod gadus callarias	Isolation and partial sequence of apo; amino acids of cod; tissue insulin of gadus callarias of cod.
6	degradation of insulin in vitro by liver and epididymal adipose tissue from obese hyperglycaemic mice	Insulin degradation in vitro by epididymal adipose tissue and liver of obese hyperglycemic mice.
6	the sedimentation of rat skeletal muscle ribosomes effect of hydrocortisone insulin and diet	L' the effect of sedimentation of ribosomes in rat skeletal muscle; insulin hydrocortisone and diet.
6	the effect of vagal stimulation on plasma insulin and glucose levels in the baboon	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
6	proteins in denaturing solvents gel exclusion studies	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk.
6	the relationship between endogenous serum insulin concentration and glucose uptake in the forearm muscles of nondiabetics	The relationship between the concentration of endogenous serum insulin and glucose consumption in the liver's muscles; previously, there were no diabetic muscles.
6	adrenergic receptor control mechanism for growth hormone secretion	In addition, there are a number of mechanisms that can be used to control adrenergic receptors for the secretion of growth hormone.
6	hormonal dependence of dna synthesis in mammary carcinoma cells in vitro	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	the origin of acetylcholine released from guinea pig intestine and longitudinal muscle strips	L' origin of the peptide; acetylcholine released from the peptide; guinea pig intestine and guinea pig longitudinal muscle strips.
6	rat mammary gland differentiation in vitro in the absence of steroids	The differentiation of rat mammary glands into steroid-free in vitro.
6	elevated serum human growth hormone and decreased serum insulin in prediabetic males after intravenous tolbutamide and glucose	Intravenous administration of tolbutamide and glucose to pre-diabetic men increases the risk of diabetes mellitus in pre-diabetic men and decreases serum insulin levels.
6	sterol like compound from sensory ganglia effect of a nerve growth factor and insulin on its biosynthesis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
6	effect of insulin and tolbutamide on growth rate blood glucose and body composition of lambs	Effect of insulin and tolbutamide on lambs' growth rate, blood sugar levels and body composition.
6	serum growth hormone levels and the response of diabetic retinopathy to pituitary ablation	Serum Dapos; growth hormone and diabetic retinopathy response to apos; aposectomy; pituitary.
6	high 24 hour level of serum growth hormone in juvenile diabetics	High blood pressure, high blood pressure, high blood pressure, high blood pressure, high blood pressure, and high blood pressure.
6	antagonism of reserpine induced emesis in pigeons a screening method for antidepressant activity	L' reserpine antagonism; pigeon reserpine emesis is a method of detection of the apos; antidepressant activity.
6	effect of actinomycin d on virus induced ribonucleic acid polymerase formation in foot and mouth disease virus infected baby hamster kidney cells	Influenza A virus is a virus that can cause death, death, death, death, death, death, death, death, death, death, and death.
6	mitotic division in pancreatic beta cells	Pancreatic beta cell mitotic division.
6	mechanism of estrogenic action in acromegaly	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the development of the disease.
6	insulin delivery rate into plasma in normal and diabetic subjects	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
6	growth hormone secretion during sleep	The effects of sleep on the body's ability to function.
6	prevention of radiation induced creatinuria by insulin	Insulin radiation-induced creatinuria prevention.
6	resistance changes in lipid bilayers immunological applications	Changes in Resistance in Immunological Applications of lipid bilayers.
6	insulin biosynthesis in the rat demonstration of two proinsulins	The biosynthesis of the apos; insulin in the demonstration of two proinsulines in the rat.
6	insulin and glucose studies after one year of treatment with a sequential type oral contraceptive	Studies of insulin and glucose following 1 year of treatment with sequential oral contraceptive.
6	altered permeability of the peritoneal membrane after using hypertonic peritoneal dialysis fluid	Modification of peritoneal membrane permeability after implantation; use of peritoneal hypertonic dialysis fluid.
6	insulin secretion in cardiogenic shock	Cardiovascular System (CHS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre study of cardiovascular disease.
6	characterization of response of circulating glucagon to intraduodenal and intravenous administration of amino acids	Characterization of the response of the circulating glucagon to apos; intraduodenal and intravenous administration of apos; amino acids.
6	leucyl beta naphthylamide splitting enzymes in the mammalian endocrine pancreas	"""Leucyl beta naphthylamide-splitting enzymes in the endocrine-terminated mammalian pancreas"", Arch."
6	hypoglycemic activity of endotoxin ii mechanism of the phenomenon in bcg infected mice	Mechanisms of apo; hypoglycemic activity; endotoxin ii in bcg-infected mice.
6	glucagon test for insulinoma a chemical study in 25 cases	It's a test of the glucagon for the apos; insulin a chemical study in 25 cases.
6	oral glucose tolerance and related factors in a normal population sample i blood sugar plasma insulin glyceride and cholesterol measurements and the effects of age and sex	Oral Glucose Tolerance and Related Factors in a Normal Population Sample Plasma glycerine and cholesterol measurements and effects of age and sex.
6	fibrinolytic response to moderate exercise in young male diabetics and non diabetics	A comparison of the results of a randomized controlled trial with the results of a randomized controlled trial.
6	circadian variation of glucose insulin and free fatty acids during long term use of oral hypoglycaemic agents in diabetes mellitus	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to the body's body weight; it can be used as an adjunct to the body weight.
6	liver and kidney metabolism during prolonged starvation	Metabolism of the liver and kidneys during prolonged food deprivation.
6	lactose synthetase progesterone inhibition of the induction of alpha lactalbumin	L' inhibition by progesterone lactose synthetase of apos; alpha lactalbumin.
6	hypothalamic pituitary function in depressive illness insensitivity to hylycaemia	Hypophyseal hypothalamic in hylycemia-insensitive depressant disease.
6	plasma insulin during remission in juvenile diabetes mellitus	L' remission plasma insulin in juvenile diabetes mellitus.
6	metabolism of parathyroid hormone degradation of 125i labelled hormone by a kidney enzyme	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of hormones, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
6	a specific anti proinsulin serum and the presence of proinsulin in calf serum	Specific anti-proinsulin serum and calf serum proinsulin.
6	potentiation of insulin action in normal subjects by a pituitary polypeptide	The potentiation of l' action of insulin in normal subjects via a pituitary polypeptide.
6	seasonal incidence of diabetes mellitus	Seasonal Diabetes Mellitus.
6	physicochemical characteristics of insulin secretion granules	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of proteins.
6	isolation and properties of secretory granules from rat islets of langerhans i isolation of a secretory granule fraction	Isolation and secretory granule properties of langerhans islets i, isolation d' fraction of secretory granules.
6	effects of polypeptide and protein hormones on lipid monolayers i effect of insulin and parathyroid hormone on monomolecular films of monooctadecyl phosphate and stearic acid	Effects of Protein and Polypeptide Hormones on Lipid Monolayers; Insulin and Lapos; Parathyroid Hormones on Monoctadecyl Phosphate and Dapos Monomolecular Films; Stearic Acid.
6	modification of hormonal responses to arginine by alpha adrenergic blockade	In addition, it is possible to modify hormonal responses to arginine by alpha-adrenergic blockade.
6	effect of endotoxin and cortisone on synthesis of ribonucleic acid and protein in livers of mice	Effect of apos; endotoxin and cortisone on the synthesis of apos; ribonucleic acid (RNA) and proteins in mouse liver.
6	biosynthesis of an insulin precursor by islet tissue of cod gadus callarias	Cod islet biosynthesis, a precursor of insinsulin from cod callarial gadget tissue.
6	the sequence of amino acids in insulin isolated from islet tissue of the cod gadus callarias	The amino acid sequence in the insulin isolated from cod callarias gadus islet tissue.
6	effect of pertussis vaccination on the sensitivity of mice to insulin bicarbonate and co2	Effect of pertussis vaccine on mouse sensitivity to bicarbonate insulin and cobblestone.
6	the effect of dietary and hormonal conditions on the activities of glycolytic enzymes in rat epididymal adipose tissue	Lapos; effect of hormonal and dietary conditions on apo; glycolytic enzyme activity in rat epididymal adipose tissue.
6	quantal secretion from adrenal medulla all or none release of storage vesicle content	Quantum secretion of the adrenal medullae releases, in whole or in part, the contents of the reserve vesicles.
6	blood glucose and insulin relationships in the human mother and fetus before onset of labour	A person who has been diagnosed with a respiratory infection should not be considered a newborn.
6	insulin sensitivity and vascular disease in maturity onset diabetics	A review of the literature on the effects of chronic obstructive pulmonary function in children.
6	some ultrastructural effects of insulin hydrocortisone and prolactin on mammary gland explants	Ultrastructural Effects of Hydrocortisone Insulin and Prolactin on Breast Gland Explants.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by infusion of free fatty acids	Stimulation of apo secretion; insulin by apo infusion; free fatty acids.
6	phosphorylation of liver histone following the administration of glucagon and insulin	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy vi plasma fuels insulin liver composition gluconeogenesis and nitrogen metabolism during late gestation in the fed and fasted rat	Carbohydrate metabolism during pregnancy viplas feeds liver composition; gluconeogenesis insulin and glucose metabolism; nitrogen late in pregnancy in fed rats and fasted rats.
6	response to insulin of the intact stomach in patients with duodenal ulcer	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
6	template activity of liver chromatin increased by in vivo administration of insulin	In vivo administration of apos; insulin; increased hepatic chromatin matrix activity.
6	insulin and corticoid response to intravenous fructose in relation to glucose tolerance	Reaction of intravenous insulin and fructose corticoids with glucose tolerance.
6	diabetogenic action of streptozotocin relationship of dose to metabolic response	Dose dependence-response between streptozotocin and metabolic response.
6	serum growth hormone levels and size of pituitary tumour in untreated acromegaly	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the disease.
6	proteins and insulin release a dual role of amino acids and intestinal hormones	Proteins and insulin release a double role of amino acids and of intestinal hormones.
6	biosynthesis of insulin in bovine fetal pancreatic slices the incorporation of tritiated leucine into a single chain proinsulin a double chain intermediate and insulin in subcellular fractions	The biosynthesis of apos; insulin in bovine fetal pancreatic slices leads to apos; tritiated leucine is incorporated into a single chain, proinsulin, a two-chain intermediate, and apos; and insulin is incorporated into subcellular fractions.
6	effectiveness of hypoglycemic agents in guinea pigs exposed to mixed gamma neutron radiations	L' effectiveness of hypoglycemic agents in mixed neutron gamma-exposed guinea pigs.
6	maximal acid response of pavlov pouches to food and histamine	The maximum acidic reaction of the sachets pavlov to food and to l' histamine.
6	regulation of liver tyrosine aminotransferase by endogenous factors in the mouse	Endogenous factors regulating hepatic tyrosine aminotransferase in mice.
6	the role of the antrum and the vagus nerve in the formation of gastric mucosal histamine	The role of beetle and vagus nerve in gastric mucosal histamine formation.
6	cortisol and growth hormone secretion in relation to linear growth patients with still s disease on different therapeutic regimens	In addition to the above, there are a number of other therapeutic regimens for the treatment of coronary artery disease (CAD) in patients with dementia.
6	penetration of pseudomonas aeruginosa by sodium chloride and its relation to the mechanism of optical effects	Sodium chloride penetration of pseudomonas aeruginosa and its relation to the optical effects mechanism.
6	kinetics of amino acid transport across bone marrow cell membranes	The kinetics of the transport of amino acids across cellular membranes of bone marrow.
6	clinical and endocrine side effects of methylprednisolone acetate as used in hay fever	Clinical and Endocrine Side Effects of Apos; Methylprednisolone Acetate for Hay Colds.
6	adrenal function in hypothyroidism	It's called adrenal function; it's called hypothyroidism.
6	increased release of gut glucagon in reactive hypoglycaemia	Increased intestinal glucagon release in apos; hypoglycemia reactive.
6	impaired glucose tolerance a late effect of insulin shock treatment	Glucose tolerance alteration is a delayed effect of shock insulin treatment.
6	rate of disappearance of endogenous insulin from the circulation after removal of insulinomas	Exposure rate; endogenous insulin from blood circulation; elimination of insulinoma.
6	pathophysiology of post gastrectomy hypoglycaemia	Apos pathophysiology; hypoglycemia post-gastroctomy.
6	hormones and obesity changes in insulin and growth hormone secretion following surgically induced weight loss	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
6	the hormonal regulation of enzymes in penatal and postnatal rat liver effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Hormonal regulation of the enzymes in the effects of adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate (CMS) on the liver of postnatal and penatal rats.
6	plasma insulin in pancreatic disease	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre initiative.
6	interrelationships of blood sugar and ketones in insulin treated diabetics	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the risk factors for diabetes.
6	abnormal serum growth hormone response to exercise in juvenile diabetics	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of diabetes.
6	factors affecting the response to insulin in the normal subhuman pregnant primate	Factors affecting primate insulin response under normal human gestational @-@.
6	early recognition of heterozygotes for the gene for dystrophia myotonica	Early heterozygous recognition of the gene responsible for myotonic dystrophy.
6	increase in activity of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in mouse mammary tissue cultured in insulin	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase activity in mammary tissue of mouse cultured in insulin.
6	regulation of glycolysis and l glycerol 3 phosphate concentration in rat epididymal adipose tissue in vitro role of phosphofructokinase	Phosphofructokinase plays a role in vitro in the regulation of glycolysis and the concentration of glycerol 3 phosphate in rat epididymal adipose tissue.
6	prolactin evidence that it is separate from growth hormone in human blood	Prolactin shows that it is separated from the growth hormone in the blood of humans.
6	pheniformin in insulin dependent diabetics	Implications for the treatment of diabetes.
6	the control by insulin of amino acid accumulation in muscle	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of diabetes.
6	a novel action of insulin on phosphoprotein formation by mammary gland explants	A new action of l' insulin on the formation of phosphoproteins by explants of mammary glands.
6	insulin secretion in heart failure	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - Acute, chronic, and chronic conditions of the body.
6	effect of histalog insulin and reserpine on gastric emptying and secretion in man	Effect of histological insulin and reserpine on human gastric emptying and secretion.
6	hormonal induction and regulation of lactose synthetase in mouse mammary gland	Hormonal Induction and Regulation of Lactose Synthease in the Mouse Mammary gland.
6	cell communication calcium ion and cyclic adenosine monophosphate	Calcium ion cellular communication and cell monophosphate; cyclic adenosine.
6	protein hydrocarbon interactions interactions of various proteins with pure decane	Protein hydrocarbons from a variety of proteins that interact with the pure decane.
6	glucagon levels and metabolic effects in fasting man	Fasting man's glucagon and metabolic effects.
6	significance of early and late positive responses to insulin hypoglycaemia in patients with intact vagi	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of diabetes mellitus, such as diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin response to carbohydrate ingestion after gastric surgery with special reference to hypoglycaemia	The response of the insulin to the apos; ingestion of carbohydrates after gastric surgery, especially the apos; hypoglycemia.
6	diabetes mellitus and sexual ateliotic dwarfism a comparative study	A comparative study of sweet diabetes and sexual ateliotic dwarfism.
6	relation of gastric secretory response in man to dose of insulin	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart disease and stroke.
6	ketonaemia in uncontrolled diabetes mellitus	Ketonaemia in no-control of diabetes mellitus.
6	the influence of an oral contraceptive on glucose f f a triglyceride and insulin levels after glucose loading	L' effects of oral contraceptive use on fetal glucose levels; triglyceride and d' insulin after glucose loading.
6	glucose and insulin secretory response patterns following diet and tolazamide therapy in diabetes	In addition, the Canadian Diabetes Surveillance and Epidemiology Network (CSSRN) was created to monitor diabetes mellitus in Canada.
6	development of vascular lesions in insulin treated animals fed a normal diet	Normal diets were used to develop vascular lesions in animals treated with insulin.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by medium chain triglycerides in patients with cirrhosis	Stimulation of medium chain triglyceride insulin secretion in patients with cirrhosis.
6	hypothalamic pituitary adrenal function in patients treated with long term depot tetracosactrin	The pituitary adrenal hypothalamic function in patients treated with long-term deposition of tetracosactrin.
6	an effect of insulin on adipose tissue adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterase	An effect of the insulin on the apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate phosphodiesterase of adipose tissue.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin response in atherosclerosis	Tolerance to glucose and response to acid; insulin in the apos; atherosclerosis.
6	growth hormone investigation in patients with mental dysfunction	It's a very important part of the body, and it's a very important part of the body.
6	dose response relationships of insulin hypoglycaemia and gastric acid in man	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be associated with the use of the drug.
6	the selective nerve stain leucomethylene blue as an intraoperative aid to achieving complete vagotomy	The selective nerve stains the blue of leucomethylene as an intraoperative aid to perform a complete vagotomy.
6	amino acid transport in hepatoma cell cultures during tyrosine aminotransferase induction	Acute toxicity of ethylene oxide to rats and rats.
6	posttranscriptional control of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis by insulin	Post-transcriptional Control of Tyrosine aminotransferase Synthesis by Insulin.
6	development of insulin sensitivity by mouse mammary gland in vitro	Development of sensitivity to insulin by the mammary gland of mice in vitro.
6	intraperitoneal insulin for control of blood sugar in diabetic patients during peritoneal dialysis	Intraperitoneal Insulin for Glucose Control in Diabetic Patients during Peritoneal Dialysis.
6	control of basal insulin secretion with special reference to the diagnosis of insulinomas	Control of the secretion of apos; basal insulin with special attention to insulin diagnosis.
6	autonomic control of insulin secretion and the treatment of heart failure	Cardiac insufficiency, cardiac insufficiency, and insulin-induced heart failure.
6	diabetes after removal of insulin tumours of pancreas a long term follow up survey of 11 patients	Diabetes after diagnosis; removal of liver tumours; pancreatic insulin, long-term follow-up in 11 patients.
6	the effects of caerulein on insulin secretion in anaesthetized dogs	Effects of caerulein on the secretion of caerulein; insulin in anesthetized dogs.
6	diabetes and growth of tumour transplants	Diabetes and tumor-transplant growth.
6	recurrent ulceration after vagotomy and drainage with electrical stimulation test 1957 69	Recurrent Ulceration After Vagotomy and Drainage with Electrical Stimulation, 1957, 69 test.
6	direct measurement of proinsulin in human plasma by the use of an insulin degrading enzyme	In addition, it is important to note that insulin is a major component of the body's diet.
6	the effect of experimental insulin deficiency on glucagon secretion	It is important to note that the effects of insulin on the secretion of glucagon are not known.
6	a rapid and direct method for the quantitative determination of tryptophan in the intact protein	Rapid and direct quantitation of tryptophan in intact protein.
6	changes in carbohydrate metabolism during the administration of progestational hormones	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
6	glucose tolerance and serum insulin in identical twins of diabetics	Blood insulin and glucose tolerance in identical diabetic twins.
6	effect of adrenergic blocking or stimulating agents on plasma growth hormone immunoreactive insulin and blood free fatty acid levels in man	It can also be used as an adjunct to the growth hormone; it can also be used as an adjunct to the growth hormone; it can also be used as an adjuvant.
6	relative effects of pregnancy estradiol and progesterone on plasma insulin and pancreatic islet insulin secretion	The effects of the drug on the immune system and on the immune system, as well as on the immune system.
6	effect of insulin and acute diabetes on plasma ffa and ketone bodies in the fasting rat	The effects of insulin and acute diabetes on the plasma faeces and on the keto bodies of fasted rats.
6	starvation in human pregnancy hypoglycemia hypoinsulinemia and hyperketonemia	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	proinsulin crystallization and preliminary x ray diffraction studies	In addition, there is no evidence of any adverse effects.
6	genetic control of the immune response of guinea pigs to limiting doses of bovine serum albumin relationship to the poly l lysine gene	Genetic control of guinea pig immune response at dose limits; bovine serum albumin related to polylysin gene.
6	evidence for an effect of inulin on the peripheral utilization of ketone bodies in dogs	It is not possible to determine the cause of death, but it is possible to determine the cause of death.
6	use of diazoxide in hypertension with renal failure	Diazoxide is used in the treatment of hypertension with renal insufficiency.
6	the effect of administration of human growth hormone on the plasma growth hormone cortisol glucose and free fatty acid response to insulin evidence for growth hormone autoregulation in man	The effect of insulin is evidence of os; self-regulation of os; human growth hormone on glucose; plasma growth hormone and the response of free fatty acids to glucose; man; insulin is evidence of os; self-regulation of os; growth hormone.
6	growth inhibition of tumour implants by associated surface active agents	Associated active surface-active agents inhibit the growth of tumour implants.
6	effect of lipids on growth hormone secretion in humans	Lipids affect the secretion of the growth hormone in humans.
6	the development of the dorsal and ventral mammalian pancreas in vivo and in vitro	Pancreatic development in both ventral and dorsal mammals in vivo and in vitro.
6	clinical and metabolic study in diabetic patients treated with glibenclamide	Clinical and metabolic studies in glibenclamide-treated diabetic patients.
6	selective proximal vagotomy with and without pyloroplasty	Vagotomy proximal selective with and without pyloroplasty.
6	proinsulin like component of circulating insulin in the basal state and in patients and hamsters with islet cell tumors	Proinsulin as a component of apo; circulating insulin at baseline and in islet cell tumour patients and hamsters.
6	metabolic studies in the african pygmy	African pygmy metabolic studies.
6	some quantitative aspects of the labelling of proteins with 125 i by the iodine monochloride method	Some quantitative aspects of protein labeling with 125i-labeled monochloride d' iodine.
6	fitting discrete probability distributions to evolutionary events	Adjusting the distributions of discrete probabilities to the evolutionary events.
6	changes in the postoperative insulin test in relation to recurrent duodenal ulceration	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors which may affect the outcome of the procedure.
6	influence of contraceptives on the carbohydrate metabolism in female diabetics	Women with diabetes are more likely to have high blood pressure than men with high blood pressure.
6	the rate limiting step of protein synthesis in vivo and in vitro and the distribution of growing peptides between the puromycin labile and puromycin non labile sites on polyribosomes	L' limiting step in in vivo and in vitro protein synthesis and distribution of growing peptides between labile puromycin and nonlabile puromycin sites on polyribosomes.
6	study on dioxan separation in the radioimmunoassay of human growth hormone human chorionic gonadotrophin adrenocorticotrophic hormone and insulin	Dioxane Separation Study in the Radioimmunoassay of Apos; Human Chorionic Human Grenotropic Growth Hormone; Adrenocorticotrophic Hormone and Apos; Insulin.
6	insulin induced hypoglycaemia in migraine	Insulin caused hypoglycemia in the headache.
6	brain serotonin content increase following ingestion of carbohydrate diet	Serotonin levels in the brain increase after taking a carbohydrate-based diet.
6	medroxyprogesterone acetate and carbohydrate metabolism measurement of glucose insulin and growth hormone during 6 months time	Medroxyprogesterone acetate and apo carbohydrate metabolism; glucose and apo insulin; growth hormone for 6 months.
6	diurnal variation in oral glucose tolerance blood sugar and plasma insulin levels morning afternoon and evening	Diurnal variation in blood glucose levels and oral glucose tolerance; plasma insulin levels in the morning after-noon and evening.
6	methamphetamine induced insulin release	In addition, methamphetamine induces the release of insulin.
6	the gastric secretory response to insulin an all or none phenomenon	Gastric secretory response to insulin is an all-or-nothing phenomenon.
6	isolation of the insulin receptor of liver and fat cell membranes detergent solubilized 125 i insulin polyethylene glycol precipitation sephadex	Lapos; Liver Insulin and Fat Membrane Detergent Receptor Isolation Solubilized 125 i d' Polyethylene Insulin Glycol Precipitation Sephadex.
6	myocardial infarction and carbohydrate metabolism relating to diabetes mellitus	Myocardial infarction and diabetes mellitus carbohydrate metabolism.
6	insulin infusion test of gastric acid secretion	It is not possible to determine the cause of the adverse reaction.
6	insulin sepharose and the dynamics of insulin action	It's called insulin, and it's called insulin.
6	hypoalaninemia a concomitant of ketotic hypoglycemia	Hypoalanemia with ketotic hypoglycemia.
6	studies on the secretion of newly synthesized proinsulin and insulin from isolated rat islets of langerhans	Studies of insulin secretion; newly synthesized insulin from isolated islets of rat langerhans.
6	obesity evidence of decreased secretion of glucagon	Obesity shows decreased glucagon secretion.
6	genetic forms of pituitary dwarfism	Pituitary dwarfism genetic forms.
6	gastrin studies in gastric ulcer	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	studies of prolactin secretion in human pregnancy	Human pregnancy prolactin secretion studies.
6	action of insulin and growth hormone on protein synthesis in muscle from non hypophysectomized rabbits	The effects of insulin and apos on the synthesis of proteins in the muscle of non-hypophysectomized rabbits.
6	the effect of acetoacetate on plasma insulin concentration	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of other studies.
6	abnormal insulin response in patients with small vessel disease	Abnormal insulin reaction in apo patients; small vessel disease.
6	insulin response to glucose in patients with peripheral vascular disease arteritis and raynaud s phenomenon	Insulin Response to Glucose in Patients with Vascular and Dapos Peripheral Arteritis; a Rare Event.
6	kinetic analysis of insulin action on amino acid uptake by isolated chick embryo heart cells	Kinetic analysis of apos; action of apos; insulin on the uptake of apos; amino acids by the heart cells isolated from the apos; chick embryos.
6	left ventricular performance after acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction leads to left ventricular performance.
6	effect of posture on glucose tolerance after gastric surgery	Effect of posture on glucose tolerance following gastric surgery.
6	further studies on streptozotocin therapy for a multiple hormone producing islet cell carcinoma	A multi-hormonary islet carcinoma of the pancreas was conducted; other studies were conducted using d&apos streptozotocin.
6	studies on the hormone sensitive lipase of adipose tissue	Hormone-sensitive fat lipase studies.
6	endocrine response to substitution of corticotrophin for oral prednisolone in asthmatic children	Canadian Journal of Public Health, 3(2), pp. 1–12.
6	cyclic changes in insulin needs of an unstable diabetic	Insulin requirements are cyclically changed from a diabetic who is unstable.
6	hormone calcium interactions with the plasma membrane of rat liver cells	Apos interactions; calcium hormone with rat liver cell plasma membrane.
6	the effect of calcium and other salts upon the release of glucagon like immunoreactivity from the gut	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of salts, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
6	the metabolism of proinsulin and insulin by the liver	Hepatic insulin and proinsulin metabolism.
6	isoelectric focusing of proteins in the native and denatured states anomalous behaviour of plasma albumin	Protein isoelectric focusing in denatured and native states exhibits abnormal plasma albumin behavior.
6	the effect of insulin on free amino acid pools and protein synthesis in rat skeletal muscle in vitro	L' effect of apos; insulin on rat skeletal muscle free amino acid pools and protein synthesis in vitro.
6	relationship between organization of mammary tumors and the ability of tumor cells to replicate mammary tumor virus and to recognize growth inhibitory contact signals in vitro	The relationship between mammary tumour organization and tumor cell capacity to replicate mammary tumour virus and recognize inhibitory growth contact signals in vitro.
6	diabetic amyotrophy a follow up study	Diabetic Amyotrophy follow-up study.
6	the relation of growth hormone to altered carbohydrate metabolism in women taking oral contraceptives	The effect of a change in body weight on a person's body weight, such as a change in body weight.
6	radioimmunoassay of human fibrinopeptide a	Human immunoassay of fibrinopeptide a.
6	a bovine pancreatic enzyme catalyzing the conversion of proinsulin to insulin	A bovine pancreatic enzyme that catalyzes proinsulin conversion.
6	studies of the development of diabetic ketosis in the rat	Diabetic ketosis development studies in rats.
6	resistance to symptomatic insulin reactions after fasting	Resistance to insulin-like symptoms after fasting.
6	insulin release by emiocytosis demonstration with freeze etching technique	Insulin emiocytosis release is demonstrated by the freeze-etch technique.
6	lipoprotein lipase activity in the adipose tissue of rats adapted to controlled feeding schedules	L' activity of lipoprotein lipase in fat tissue of s&apos rats; adapted to a controlled diet.
6	staphylococcal protease a proteolytic enzyme specific for glutamoyl bonds	Staphylococcal protease is a proteolytic, glutamoyl-binding-specific enzyme.
6	control of the synthesis of fatty acid synthetase in rat liver by insulin glucagon and adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Control of rat liver fatty acid synthetase synthesis by insulin glucagon and l' cyclic adenosine 3,5 monophosphate.
6	secretion and endocytosis in insulin stimulated rat adrenal medulla cells	Secretion and insulin-induced endocytosis stimulate the rat adrenal cells.
6	an enteroglucagon tumour	Lucagonian-entero tumor.
6	changes in plasma insulin related to the type of dietary carbohydrate in overweight hyperlipidemic male patients	In addition to the above-mentioned changes, there are a number of other changes that may affect the health of the individual.
6	non ketotic hyperosmolar coma with insulin resistance in a 12 year old girl	Non-keto-resistant hyperosmolar coma; insulin in a 12-year-old girl.
6	the effect of experimental diabetes mellitus and insulin replacement on hepatic ultrastructure and protein synthesis	The effect of experimental diabetes mellitus and the replacement of insulin on the liver; ultrastructure of the liver and protein synthesis.
6	plasma gastrin and acid secretion in man following stimulation by food meat extract and insulin	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
6	serum gastrin in duodenal ulcer ii effect of insulin hypoglycaemia	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with the results of the study.
6	the influence of the individual surgeon and of the type of vagotomy upon the insulin test after vagotomy	Lapos; surgeon's influence and vagotomy type on pap smear; insulin after vagotomy.
6	effects of hypo and hyper thyroidism on liver composition blood glucose ketone bodies and insulin in the male rat	Dosage effects; hypo and apo; hyperthyroidism on liver composition, glucose, keto bodies and apo; insulin in male rat.
6	oligopeptidases of brush border membranes of rat small intestinal mucosal cells	Rat mucosal brush border membrane oligopeptidases; rat small intestine.
6	tolbutamide therapeutic trials and clinical practice	Canadian Centre for Management Development.
6	the immediate effects of insulin and fructose on the metabolism of the perfused liver changes in lipoprotein secretion fatty acid oxidation and esterification lipogenesis and carbohydrate metabolism	Immediate effects of insulin and fructose on metabolism of hepatic changes perfused in the liver; oxidation and liposis; esterification of fatty acids secreted by lipoproteins and carbohydrate metabolism.
6	exocrine secretory responses of the pancreas to insulin and to a meat meal in dogs	Exocrine pancreatic secretory reactions to insulin and a dog meat meal.
6	comparison of corticotrophin and corticosteroid response to lysine vasopressin insulin and pyrogen in man	Comparison of corticotropin and corticosteroid responses to human lysine vasopressin insulin and pyrogen.
6	effect of oral hypoglycaemic agents on glucose tolerance in pancreatic diabetes	Effect of oral hypoglycemic agents on pancreatic diabetes glucose tolerance.
6	acute reversal of experimental diabetic ketoacidosis in the rat with decanoylcarnitine	Acute apo reversal; experimental rat diabetic ketoacidosis with decanoylcarnitine.
6	the reaction of protein amino groups with methyl 5 iodopyridine 2 carboximidate a possible general method of preparing isomorphous heavy atom derivatives of proteins	Reaction of amino groups of proteins with l' methyl iodopyridine 5 2 provides a general method for the preparation of isomorphic d&apos derivatives; heavy protein atoms.
6	sequential degradation of insulin by rat liver homogenates	Sequential deterioration of apos; insulin by homogenates of rat liver.
6	is prolactin mitogenic for mammary epithelium	Prolactin is a silicone gel-filled breast implant.
6	insulinopenic diabetes in africa	African insulin-positive diabetes.
6	evaluation of 1 fluoro 2 nitro 4 trimethylammoniobenzene iodide a protein solubilizing reagent	Evaluation of the protein-solubilizing reagent, 1-fluoro-2-nitro-4-trimethylammoniobenzene iodide.
6	the mode of action of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in mammalian islets of langerhans effects of insulin secretagogues on islet cell protein kinase activity	The mode of action of apos; cyclic adenosine 35 monophosphate in islets of mammalian langerhans; effects of secretagogues of apos; insulin on apos; protein kinase activity of pancreatic islet cells.
6	studies on the enzymology of purified preparations of brush border from rabbit kidney	Rabbit kidney brush border purified preparations enzyme studies.
6	the effect of estrogens on carbohydrate metabolism glucose insulin and growth hormone studies on one hundred and seventy one women ingesting premarin mestranol and ethinyl estradiol for six months	Estrogen effects on carbohydrate metabolism, glucose, glucose, insulin, and apo studies; growth hormone in 161 women who ingested mestranol and apos; pre-arin ethinylestradiol for six months.
6	glucagon initiated human growth hormone release a comparative study	In addition, glucagon induces the release of the human growth hormone, a comparative study.
6	the role of the sympathetic nervous system in hypoglycaemia stimulated gastric secretion	The sympathetic nervous system's role in hypoglycaemia stimulated gastric secretion.
6	the contribution of embryo extract to myogenesis of avian striated muscle in vitro	The contribution of DNA extracts to striated muscle myogenesis in vitro.
6	affinity chromatography and purification of the insulin receptor of liver cell membranes	Hepatic cell membrane insulin; pH receptor affinity and purification.
6	distribution of free and antibody bound peptide hormones in two phase aqueous polymer systems	Antibody-bound free peptide hormones in two-phase aqueous polymer systems.
6	effect of vagotomy on ascorbic acid nutrition in patients with peptic ulcer	Effect of Vagotomy on Nutrition; Ascorbic Acid in Patients with Dapos; Gastroduodenal ulcer.
6	insulin and the regulation of adipose tissue acetyl coenzyme a carboxylase	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used in the treatment of diabetes.
6	effect of insulin upon the cellular character of rat adipose tissue	Effect of Apos; Insulin on Cellular Characterization of Rat Fat.
6	normalization effect of preceding protein meals on diabetic oral glucose tolerance in eskimos	Normal effect of previous protein meals on glucose tolerance by the oral route in diabetic eskimos.
6	glucagon stimulating activity of 20 amino acids in dogs	Dog 20-amino acid glucagon-stimulating activity.
6	effect of insulin on the growth pattern and adenylate cyclase activity of bhk fibroblasts	Effect of Drugs; Insulin on Growth Pattern and Disease; Cell Activity; Adenylate Cyclase of Bhk Fibroblasts.
6	the effects of varying the extent of the vagotomy on the myoelectrical and motor activity of the stomach	Effects of Variation of Apos; Extent of Vagotomy on Apos; Myoelectrical and Motor Activity of the Stomach.
6	an evaluation of the hollander test by graded vagotomy in the dog	Hollander Graduated Vagotomy Testing in Dogs.
6	competitive binding of somatomedin to the insulin receptors of adipocytes chondrocytes and liver membranes	Somatomedin binds competitively to lipophilic receptors; insulin from adipocytes, chondrocytes, and hepatic membranes.
6	failure of glucagon release in infants of diabetic mothers	Insufficient glucagon release in diabetic mothers' infants.
6	the prevalence of diabetes in a rural population of jamaican adults	The prevalence of diabetes among the population of rural and urban Jamaican adults.
6	prediction of the amount of secondary structure in a globular protein from its aminoacid composition	Prediction of the amount of secondary structure in globular protein based on amino acid composition.
6	the ontogenesis of human fetal hormones i growth hormone and insulin	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Ottawa, Ontario.
6	oral glucose tolerance and hormonal response in heroin dependent males	Hormone response and oral glucose tolerance in male heroin addicts.
6	side effects of various drugs acting on the eye	Side effects of various eye-acting drugs.
6	placental lactogen levels in diabetic pregnancy	Diabetic pregnancy rates for placental lactogen.
6	nyctohemeral growth hormone levels in children with growth retardation and inflammatory bowel disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the quality of the product, such as the quality of the product itself.
6	evolution of diabetes mellitus in a case of friedreich s ataxia	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	metabolism of proinsulin insulin and c peptide in the rat	Metabolism of rat insulin, proinsulin, and c-peptide.
6	diabetic clinics today and tomorrow mini clinics in general practice	It's a good idea to go to a small clinic to see if it's a good one.
6	interactions of insulin corticosterone and prolactin in promoting milk fat synthesis by mammary explants from pregnant rabbits	In addition, the results of the study were compared with those of the previous study.
6	parenchymal cells from adult rat liver in nonproliferating monolayer culture i functional studies	Adult rat liver parenchyma cells in non-proliferating monolayer cultures i functional studies.
6	the influence of long term oral contraception on blood sugar and serum insulin author s transl	In addition, there are a number of other factors that influence the risk of heart disease, such as the risk of heart disease.
6	the role of the sympathetic innervation in the control of plasma glucagon concentration in the calf	The role of sympathetic innervation in plasma glucagon concentration control in calves.
6	gastrin in portal and peripheral venous blood after feeding in man	It's a good idea to have a gastrin in your bloodstream after eating.
6	virus induced diabetes mellitus i hyperglycemia and hypoinsulinemia in mice infected with encephalomyocarditis virus	Hyperglycemia and hypoinsulinemia due to diabetes mellitus were induced by the virus in mice infected with the encephalomyocarditis virus.
6	change in glucose and insulin after six months treatment with the oral contraceptive demulen	Change in blood glucose and glucose; Insulin after 6 months of treatment with Demulen oral contraceptive.
6	pancreatic beta cell replication induced by glucocorticoids in subhuman primates	Glucocorticoid-induced pancreatic beta-cell replication in primates at-humans.
6	influence of glucocorticoids on glucagon secretion and plasma amino acid concentrations in man	The effects of glucocorticoids on the secretion of glucagon and plasma amino acid concentrations in humans.
6	affinity binding of intact fat cells and their ghosts to immobilized insulin	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack, stroke, stroke, and stroke.
6	effect of glucagon on net splanchnic cyclic amp production in normal and diabetic men	Effect of glucagon on the net production of splanchnic cyclic light bulbs in diabetic and normal men.
6	regulation of human lipolysis in vivo observations on the role of adrenergic receptors	Regulation of human lipolysis, in vivo role of adrenergic receptors.
6	the rapid changes of hepatic glycolytic enzymes and fructose 1 6 diphosphatase activities after intravenous glucagon in humans	Rapid changes in hepatic glycolytic enzyme activities and fructose 1-6 diphosphatase activity after apos; intravenous glucagon injection in humans.
6	effects of weight reduction on obesity studies of lipid and carbohydrate metabolism in normal and hyperlipoproteinemic subjects	Effect of weight reduction on the study of obesity in the metabolism of lipids and carbohydrates in normal and hyperlipoproteinemic subjects.
6	the different effects on the serum lipids and fecal steroids of high carbohydrate diets given orally or intravenously	Different effects on fecal fecal fats and steroids of high-carbohydrate oral and intravenous diets.
6	metabolic effects of exogenous glucocorticoids in fasted man	Effects of exogenous glucocorticoids on the metabolism of fasting men.
6	rapid intravenous sodium acetoacetate infusion in man metabolic and kinetic responses	Rapid intravenous infusion of sodium acetoacetate in the kinetic and metabolic responses of men.
6	effect of estrogen gestagen drug combinations on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism i effect of ovosiston	Effect of Combinations of Dapos; Estrogen-gestagenes on Carbohydrate and Lipid Metabolism; Ovosiston.
6	effect of insulin on pyruvate metabolism in epididymal adipose tissue of the rat correlation of intracellular pyruvate contents and pyruvate dehydrogenase activity	Effect of intracellular pyruvate on the metabolism of pyruvate in epididymal adipose tissue; activity of pyruvate dehydrogenase in the rat.
6	binding of parathyroid hormone to bovine kidney cortex plasma membranes	Attachment of the apos, parathyroid hormone, to bovine renal cortical membranes.
6	the binding of cationic detergent to insulin zinc insulin and iso insulin	Cationic detergent binding to zinc insulin and iso-insulin.
6	effects of epinephrine adrenocorticotrophic hormone and theophylline on adenosine 3 5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase activity in fat cells	Effects of Apos; Epinephrine Adrenocorticotropic Hormone and Theophylline on Apos; L&apos Activity; Adenosine 3-5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase in fat cells.
6	diurnal variation on oral glucose tolerance insulin and growth hormone changes with special reference to women taking oral contraceptives	Diurnal Change in Oral Glucose Tolerance L' Insulin and L' Growth hormone changes, especially in women who use oral contraceptives.
6	gel filtration studies on immunoreactive gastrin in serum from zollinger ellison patients	Studies of gel filtration of immunoreactive gastrin in the serum of patients with zollinger Ellison.
6	regulation of hepatic glycogen synthesis during fetal development roles of hydrocortisone insulin and insulin receptors	Regulation of the synthesis of hepatic glycogen during the fetal developmental roles of l' insulin and l&apos receptors; insulin hydrocortisone.
6	early differentiation of glucagon producing cells in embryonic pancreas a possible developmental role for glucagon	Early differentiation of embryonic pancreatic glucagon-producing cells may play a role in glucagon development.
6	role of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in the early transport changes induced by serum and insulin in quiescent fibroblasts	Role of l' cyclic adenosine monophosphate 3-5 in early serum- and l&apos-induced transport changes; insulin in the quiescent fibroblast.
6	stimulation by insulin of rna synthesis in chick fibroblasts	L'apos stimulation; chicken fibroblast rna synthesis insulin.
6	glucodynamic hormones modify the recovery period after lateral hypothalamic lesions	Glucodynamic hormones alter recovery time from lateral hypothalamic lesions.
6	lack of glucagon response to hypoglycemia in diabetes evidence for an intrinsic pancreatic alpha cell defect	In addition, there is no evidence of an adverse effect on the immune system, and no evidence of an effect on the immune system.
6	fuels hormones and liver metabolism at term and during the early postnatal period in the rat	Feeds term and early postpartum hormone and liver metabolism in the rat.
6	characteristics of membrane bound and free hepatic ribosomes from insulin deficient rats i acute experimental diabetes mellitus	Characteristics of Free and Membrane-bound Liver Ribosomes in Insulin-deficient Rats i Acute Experimental Diabetes Mellitus.
6	effect of fenfluramine on human growth hormone release	The Effect of Fenfluramine on the Release of Human Growth Hormone.
6	adrenergic modulation of pancreatic glucagon secretion in man	Adrenergic modulation of human pancreatic glucagon secretion.
6	diabetes in mice after coxsackie b 4 virus infection	Mouse diabetes after coxsackie b4 infection.
6	stimulation by insulin of cell elongation and microtubule assembly in embryonic chick lens epithelia	Stimulation by apos; insulin of the apos; cell elongation and elongation; assembly of microtubules in the apos; embryonic epithelium of the lens of the chicken.
6	adrenal corticosteroids enhance production of type c virus induced by 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine from cultured mouse fibroblasts	Adrenal corticosteroids stimulated 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine-induced c-type virus production from cultured murine fibroblasts.
6	cell culture of mammalian endometrium and synthesis of blastokinin in vitro	Mammalian endometrium and blastokinin synthesis in vitro.
6	steroid aerosols in asthma an assessment of betamethasone valerate and a 12 month study of patients on maintenance treatment	In addition to the above, it is recommended that patients be treated at the same time as the other patients.
6	diabetes mellitus associated with epidemic of infectious hepatitis in nigeria	A person who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
6	remission of diabetes mellitus during pregnancy	Diabetes mellitus is reduced during pregnancy.
6	accelerated triglyceride secretion a metabolic consequence of obesity	In addition to the above, there are a number of factors that contribute to the development of obesity.
6	endocrine studies in anencephaly	Endocrine studies, anencephalus.
6	effect of proximal gastric vagotomy on gastric acid secretion and plasma gastrin	The effect of a proximal gastric vagotomy on the secretion of gastric acid and plasma gastrin.
6	the gastric secretory response to a continuous insulin infusion in the dog	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system.
6	awareness and experience of general practitioners of selected drug interactions	Knowledge and Experience of General Practitioners of Certain Drug Interactions.
6	pituitary extracts and steroid hormones in the control of 3t3 cell growth	Pituitary extracts and steroid hormones are used to control the growth of 3t3 cells.
6	pyrazinoate excretion in the chimpanzee relation to urate disposition and the actions of uricosuric drugs	L' excretion of pyrazinoate in relation to chimpanzee and dosage; uricosuric drug action.
6	stimulation of insulin secretion by long chain free fatty acids a direct pancreatic effect	Stimulation of d&apos secretion; insulin by free long-chain fatty acids, a direct, pancreatic effect.
6	comparison of effects of long term corticotrophin and corticosteroid treatment on responses of plasma growth hormone acth and corticosteroid to hypoglycaemia	Comparison of the effects of a long-term treatment with corticotropin and corticosteroids on the response of lacidosis, acth plasma growth hormone and corticosteroids to aposteroids; hypoglycemia.
6	diabetic ketoacidosis presenting as neurosurgical emergencies	Diabetic ketoacid with neurosurgical emergencies.
6	control of pineal indole biosynthesis by changes in sympathetic tone caused by factors other than environmental lighting	The control of the biosynthesis of the pineal indole by changes of sympathetic tone caused by factors other than l' ambient lighting.
6	control of the initiation of dna synthesis in 3t3 cells serum factors	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
6	effects of high dose medroxyprogesterone treatment given for endometrial carcinoma on carbohydrate metabolism and liver function	Effects of High Dose Medroxyprogesterone Treatment of Lapos Carcinoma; Endometrium on Carbohydrate Metabolism and Liver Function.
6	growth control of differentiated fetal rat hepatocytes in primary monolayer culture vi studies with conditioned medium and its functional interactions with serum factors	Growth control of hepatocytes from fetal rats differentiated in conditioned monolayer vi primary culture studies and functional interactions with serum factors.
6	growth control of differentiated fetal rat hepatocytes in primary monolayer culture vii hormonal control of dna synthesis and its possible significance to the problem of liver regeneration	Growth control of hepatocytes from differentiated fetal rats in the mono-layer vii primary culture system regulates hormone synthesis of l' DNA and its possible importance in the liver regeneration problem.
6	carbohydrate and lipid studies during six months treatment with megestrol acetate measurements of blood glucose insulin growth hormone and triglycerides	Studies of carbohydrates and lipids during the six months of treatment with apos; megestrol acetate to measure apos; growth hormone of apos; insulin and triglycerides of blood glucose.
6	substrate turnover during prolonged exercise in man splanchnic and leg metabolism of glucose free fatty acids and amino acids	It is important to note that the metabolism of glucose-free fatty acids and amino acids is a function of the body's ability to metabolize and metabolize these substances.
6	spontaneous and amino acid stimulated glucagon secretion in the immediate postnatal period relation to glucose and insulin	Glucose and insulin secretion were stimulated by spontaneous and amino acids in the immediate postnatal period.
6	the effects of glucagon and insulin on adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentrations in an organ culture of mature rat liver	The effects of glucagon and lapos; insulin on the concentrations of cyclic adenosine 3 and 5 monophosphate in a mature rat liver organ culture.
6	spermidine in hormone dependent differentiation of mammary gland in vitro	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	prolactin receptors in estrogen receptor deficient mammary carcinoma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	the effect of adrenergic blockade on the glucagon responses to starvation and hypoglycemia in man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that carbohydrate is an important component of glucose control.
6	regulation of glucose synthesis in hormone sensitive isolated rat hepatocytes	Glucose synthesis regulation in isolated hormone-sensitive rat hepatocytes.
6	effect of estrogen gestagen combinations on carbohydrate and lipid metabolism iv effect of estrone cyanate combination preparations	Effect of combinations of d' estrogen@ gestagenes on the metabolism of carbohydrates and lipids iv effect of combinations of d' estrone@ cyanate on the metabolism of lipids iv.
6	studies on the depletion and accumulation of microvilli and changes in the tubulovesicular compartment of mouse parietal cells in relation to gastric acid secretion	Depletion and apo studies; microvillus accumulation and changes in the tubulovesicular cell wall cell compartment of mice in relation to d' gastric acid secretion.
6	gastric acid secretion and risk of recurrence of duodenal ulcer within six to eight years after truncal vagotomy and drainage	Dapos secretion; gastric acid and duodenal ulcer recurrence risk within 6-8 years following trunal vagotomy and drainage.
6	the molecular weight and properties of a neutral metallo endopeptidase from rabbit kidney brush border	Molecular weight and apos properties; neutral endopeptidase metallo from apos; rabbit kidney brush border.
6	combined test for assessment of anterior pituitary function	Combined dosage test; evaluation of previous pituitary function.
6	concomitant effects of insulin on surface membrane conformation and polysome profiles of serum starved balb c 3t3 fibroblasts	Concomitant effects of apos; insulin on the conformation of the surface membrane and on the polysomic patterns of the serum-deprived c 3t3 Balb fibroblasts.
6	somatostatin hypothalamic inhibitor of the endocrine pancreas	Endocrine somatostatin hypothalamic inhibitor.
6	correlation between serum gastrin concentration and rat stomach histidine decarboxylase activity	Serum gastrin concentration correlates with apo; apo activity; apo histidine decarboxylase; rat stomach.
6	the purification and specificity of a neutral endopeptidase from rabbit kidney brush border	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
6	vagal control of glucagon release in man	Vagal Control of Glucagon Release in Men.
6	long term effects of the estrogen gestagen combination preparation ovosiston on glucose level in the insulin tolerance test	Long-term effects of the combined gestagenic oosiston estrogen preparation on glucose levels in insulin tolerance test.
6	immunoreactive gastrin components in human serum	The immunoreactive components of gastrin in the human serum.
6	the effect of vagotomy and drainage on the small bowel flora	Vagotomy and drainage affect the flora of the small intestine.
6	progressive deterioration of glucose tolerance in the aged	Progressive deterioration of elderly glucose tolerance.
6	plasma adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate response to glucagon in thyroid disease	Adenosine 3 @-@5 Plasma Cyclic Monophosphate Response to Glucagon in Thyroid Disease.
6	transplantation of islets of langerhans in diabetic rhesus monkeys	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been carried out in the area.
6	digestive and endocrine functions after partial duodeno pancreatectomy	Digestive and endocrine functions, partial pancreatic duodenomy.
6	the purity of commercial insulin preparations	Commercial insulin preparation purity.
6	unsuccessful treatment of acromegaly with medroxyprogesterone acetate	Treatment of the apos; acromegaly with the apos; acetate of medroxyprogesterone.
6	electrophoretic patterns of serum albumins collected from hereditary obese and diabetic mice	Serum albumin electrophoretic profiles from obese and hereditary diabetic mice.
6	failure of injected growth hormone to increase plasma glucose and insulin concentration in the puppy	Insufficient insulin; growth hormone injected to increase the plasma concentration of glucose and d*apos; insulin in the pup.
6	sulfonylurea induced factitious hypoglycemia in a nondiabetic nurse	Sulfonylurea caused false hypoglycemia in a nurse who was not diabetic.
6	effect of splanchnic nerve stimulation on glucagon and insulin output in the dog	The effect of insulin on the production of glucagon and apos in dogs is not known.
6	plasma adrenaline and serum gastrin studies in insulin induced hypoglycemia and after adrenaline infusions	Studies of plasma epinephrine, adrenaline, and serum gastrin in insulin-induced hypoglycemia and after infusions of epinephrine.
6	lack of dietary regulation of jejunal glycolytic enzymes and disaccharidases in obesity the role of insulin	Jejunal glycolytic enzymes and disaccharidases are not regulated in the diet; obesity is the role of l' insulin.
6	pathomorphologic biochemical and diagnostic aspects of gastrinomas zollinger ellison syndrome	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	membrane receptors as general markers for plasma membrane isolation procedures the use of 125 i labeled wheat germ agglutinin insulin and cholera toxin	Membrane receptors as general markers for the following procedures: insulation of the plasma membrane, insulation; use of apos; wheat germ agglutinin labelled 125 i and cholera toxin.
6	effects of alloxan diabetes anti insulin serum diabetes and non diabetic dehydration on brain carbohydrate and energy metabolism in young mice	Effects of alloxan diabetes mellitus, diabetes mellitus, diabetes mellitus, diabetes mellitus, diabetes mellitus and diabetes mellitus.
6	growth control in primary fetal rat liver cells in culture	Growth Control in Primary Hepatic Cells of Cultured Fetal Rat.
6	glycerol intolerance in a child with intermittent hypoglycemia	Glycerol intolerance in children with apos; intermittent hypoglycemia.
6	stimulation of division of sparse and confluent 3t3 cell populations by a fibroblast growth factor dexamethasone and insulin	Stimulation of the division of populations of small, confluent 3t3 cells by a growth factor of fibroblasts, dexamethasone, and insulin.
6	effect of a fibroblast growth factor insulin dexamethasone and serum on the morphology of balb c 3t3 cells	Effect of fibroblast growth factor, dexamethasone insulin and serum, on the cell morphology of 3rd-ct3 kidney cells.
6	hyperplasia of rat mammary gland in vitro	Hyperplasia of the mammary gland of the rat in vitro.
6	mode of insulin action	Insulin action.
6	factors influencing the prognosis of vascular disease in insulin deficient diabetes of long duration a seven year follow up	Factors Influencing the Prediction of Vascular Disease in Long-Term Insulin-Dependent Diabetes 7 years Follow-up.
6	effect of lipids on glucagon secretion in man	Lipids affect glucagon secretion in humans.
6	parathyroid hormone receptors of renal cortex specific binding of biologically active 125i labeled hormone and relationship to adenylate cyclase activation	Parathyroid binding hormone, biologically active 125i-labelled hormone with a link to the apos; activation of the apos; adenylate cyclase.
6	macroglossia transient neonatal diabetes mellitus and intrauterine growth failure a new distinct entity	Transient macroglossia again-diabetes mellitus and l' intra-growth failure-uterine a new, distinct entity.
6	initial effect of injury on ketone bodies and other blood metabolites	Initial Effect of Lesion on Ketones and Other Blood Metabolites.
6	effects on plasma and brain tryptophan in the rat of drugs and hormones that influence the concentration of unesterified fatty acid in the plasma	Effects on plasma and cerebral tryptophan in rats of drugs and drugs; hormones that influence dosage; fatty acids that are not esterified in the plasma.
6	the effect of parietal cell and truncal vagotomy on gastric and duodenal contractile activity of the unanesthetized dog	L' effect of parietal cells and trunal vagotomy on unanaesthetized dog muscle; gastric and duodenal contractile activity.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin response during and after elective skeletal surgery	Tolerance to glucose and response to insulin during and after bone surgery not urgent.
6	insulin responses to oral carbohydrate in true prediabetics and matched controls	The responses of l' insulin to oral carbohydrates in true pre-diabetics and paired controls.
6	carbohydrate tolerance and insulin responses in obstructive jaundice	Carbohydrate Tolerance and Response to Insulin in Obstructive Jaundice.
6	the role of the autonomic innervation in the control of glucagon release during hypoglycaemia in the calf	The role of apo; autonomous innervation in controlling glucagon release during apo; hypoglycemia in calves.
6	effects of medroxyprogesterone acetate on carbohydrate metabolism	Effects of Apos; Medroxyprogesterone Acetate on Carbohydrate Metabolism.
6	effects of oral alanine feeding on blood glucose plasma glucagon and insulin concentrations in small for gestational age infants	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
6	aspects of glycolipid metabolism during chronic renal insufficiency effects of dialytic treatments of short duration 3 4 hours on alternate days	Effects of apo; chronic renal failure on glycolipid metabolism resulting from alternating 3-4 hours of short-term dialysis.
6	growth hormone responses to hypoglycemia in postmenopausal depressed women	The responses of menopausal women to the growth hormone hypoglycemia depress women.
6	glucagon role in the hyperglycemia of diabetes mellitus	Role of Glucagon in Diabetes Mellitus; Hyperglycemia.
6	beta cell culture on synthetic capillaries an artificial endocrine pancreas	Synthetic capillary beta cell culture, endocrine artificial pancreas.
6	insulin induced augmentation of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity	Insulin treatment induced an increase in lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity.
6	prolactin receptors in rat liver possible induction by prolactin	In rat liver, prolactin receptors may be induced by prolactin.
6	the pituitary acth gh lh fsh tsh and prolactin reserves in patients with cushing s syndrome	I would like to thank you for your time and for your support.
6	induction of drinking by insulin in the rat	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	the effect of hydrocortisone phosphate methylprednisolone and phenytoin on pancreatic insulin release and hepatic glutathione insulin transhydrogenase activity in the rat	L' effect of apos; hydrocortisone phosphate methylprednisolone and phenytoin on apos release; pancreatic insulin and apos; and rat liver glutathione insulin transhydrogenase activity.
6	plasma and cerebrosponal fluid amino acid levels in diabetic ketoacidosis before and after corrective therapy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of diabetes.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man i effects in normal subjects	The effect of a change in body weight on a person's body weight and on his or her body weight.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man ii effects in insulin deficient diabetics	Modulation of Fatty Acid Metabolism by Glucagon in Immune People ii effects in insulin-deficient diabetics.
6	bromocriptine treatment of acromegaly	Treatment with bromocriptine; treatment with acromegaly.
6	digestion of insulin derivatives with subtilisin a kinetic study	Subtilisin and insulin, kinetic study.
6	glucose tolerance in newborn infants of healthy mothers its relationship to the mothers insulin response to glucose infusion	Glucose tolerance in infants born to healthy mothers, its relation to the insulin response of the mother to the glucose infusion.
6	dynamic evaluation of growth hormone gh and prolactin hprl secretion in active acromegaly with high and low gh output	Dynamic evaluation of the secretion of the gh growth hormone and the acromegaly-active prolactin hprl growth hormone with high and low gh.
6	blood glucose and plasma insulin and glucagon response during intravenous glucose tolerance test in newborn infants affected by erythroblastosis foetalis	Plasma glycaemia and response to insulin and glucagon during intravenous glucose tolerance testing in newborns with apo; erythroblastosis fetalis.
6	preclinical abnormality of left ventricular function in diabetes mellitus	Left ventricular function preclinical anomaly in diabetes mellitus.
6	renal tubular acidosis during therapy for diabetic ketoacidosis	Renal tubular acid; diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	endocrine tumor of the pancreas composed of argyrophil and b cells a correlated light immunofluorescent and ultrastructural study	Pancreatic endocrine tumour composed of argyrophils and b-cells, immunofluorescent study in the light, and ultrastructural correlated study.
6	on the mechanism of hormone action in 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene induced mammary tumor i prolactin and progesterone effects on estrogen receptor in vitro	On the mechanism of l' hormonal action in 712 dimethylbenz a l&apos-induced mammary tumour; progesterone and anthracene i prolactin effects on the estrogen receptor in vitro.
6	maternal fetal plasma glucose relationships in late monkey pregnancy	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	the role of ca 2 and cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in insulin release induced in vitro by the divalent cation ionophore a23187	The Role of Dapos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine 3-5 and dapos; ~2 in Dapos release; in vitro Ca2+-induced insulin; divalent cationic ionophore a23187.
6	elongation of the interchain disulfide bridges of insulin a synthetic analog	L' interchain disulfide bridge elongation; synthetic analog insulin.
6	the regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gtp synthesis in rat kidney cortex the role of acid base balance and glucocorticoids	The regulation of rat renal cortical phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase gtp synthesis, the role of l' acid base and glucocorticoid balance.
6	anosmia and hypogonadism with ovarian mosaicism	Anosmia and ovarian hypogonadism.
6	vitrectomy a new challenge for the anesthesiologist	Vigrectomy is a new challenge for your anesthesiologist.
6	mitogenic effect of fibroblast growth factor on early passage cultures of human and murine fibroblasts	Mitogenic effect of fibroblast growth factor on human and murine fibroblast first-pass cultures.
6	chronic depression of serum concentrations of sialic acid in alloxan induced diabetic rats	Chronic reduction in serum levels of sodium, sodium, and potassium in rats made diabetic by alloxan.
6	insulinoma with low circulating insulin levels the diagnostic value of proinsulin measurements	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of insulin.
6	experimental diabetic ketoacidosis sequential changes of metabolic intermediates in blood liver cerebrospinal fluid and brain after acute insulin deprivation in the streptozotocin diabetic rat	Experimental diabetic ketoacidosis sequential changes in cerebrospinal fluid metabolic intermediates-spinal fluid and blood-liver brain following acute insulin deficiency in streptozotocin diabetic rat.
6	the insulin response to intravenous fructose in relation to blood glucose levels	Insulin response to intravenous fructose as a function of blood glucose levels.
6	altered tissue response to glucagon in obesity	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
6	the effect of hypoglycemia on tsh release in man	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the development of TSH.
6	the effect of alpha msh on plasma growth hormone cortisol and tsh in children	Apos; alpha msh effect on apos; plasma cortisol and tsh growth hormone in children.
6	relationships among the secretion of acth gh and cortisol during the insulin induced hypoglycemia test in the normal and obese child	Aposemia-induced hypoglycemia; insulin in the apos; normal and normal child; obese child.
6	comparison of cylic and linear forms of somatostatin in the inhibiton of growth hormone insulin and glucagon secretion	Comparison of linear and cylic forms of somatostatin in apos; inhibitor of secretion of apos; insulin and glucagon of apos; growth hormone.
6	abnormal pancreatic alpha cell function in first degree relatives of known diabetics	Deficiencies in the function of the pancreatic alpha cells in the first-degree parents of known diabetics.
6	plasma insulin and glucose levels in diabetic rats prior to and following islet transplantation	In addition, there is a need for additional testing to determine if there is a need for additional testing.
6	dietary induced hypertrophic hyperplastic obesity in mice	L' hypertrophic, hyperplastic, and mouse-induced obesity.
6	hormonal regulation of lobulo alveolar growth functional differentiation and regression of whole mouse mammary gland in organ culture	The hormonal regulation of the functional differentiation of the growth of the alveolar lobulo and the regression of the mammary gland of whole mice in culture of organs.
6	effect of adrenalectomy and insulin insufficiency upon the adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate system of the rat mammary glands	The effect of adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, and adenosine.
6	postprandial blood glucose and insulin in cows fed high grain	Postprandial glycemia and insulin in high-grain fed cows.
6	insulin goes metric a time for reveiw	Insulin becomes metric at awakening time.
6	isoproterenol and epinephrine induced changes in blood glucose and tissue glycogen levels in normal and diabetic rats the influence of alteration in endogenous insulin levels and state of nourishment	Epinephrine induces changes in blood and tissue glycogen levels in normal and diabetic rats, and isoproterenol induces changes in blood and tissue glycogen levels in normal and diabetic rats.
6	cyproheptadine induced depletion of insulin in the rat	Cyproheptadine induced rat insulin depletion.
6	comparative adenylate cyclase activities in homogenate and plasma membrane fractions of morris hepatoma 5123tc h	Comparison of the activities of l' adenylate cyclase in l&apos plasma membrane and homogenate fractions; Morris hepatoma 5123 cf.
6	cell cycle associated changes in receptors for ige during growth and differentiation of a rat basophilic leukemia cell line	Cell cycle has been associated with changes in leaf receptors; shoot during leaf growth and differentiation; a basophilic rat leukemia cell line.
6	effect of insulin on the proliferation of cultured primate arterial smooth muscle cells	Effect of apos; insulin on primate cultured arterial smooth muscle cell proliferation.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in dystrophia myotonica	Department of Health and Human Services.
6	effects of exercise and of food restriction on the development of spontaneous obesity in rats	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
6	mucormycosis of the craniofacial structures	Craniofacial mucormycosis.
6	a study of carbohydrate metabolism in postnecrotic cirrhosis liver	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	basal and reactive proinsulin and insulin secretion in overweight women author s transl	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack and stroke.
6	the effect of synthetic somatostatin in normal and acromegalic males	Lapos; synthetic somatostatin effect in normal and acromegal males.
6	persistent pancreatic glucagon but not insulin response to arginine in pancreatectomized dogs	In addition to the above-mentioned criteria, there are several other criteria that can be used to assess risk.
6	characterization of the plasma lipoproteins of the genetically obese hyperlipoproteinemic zucker fatty rat	Characterization of genetically obese zucker hyperlipoproteinemic plasma lipoproteins.
6	inhibition by somatostatin of glucagon and insulin release from the perfused rat pancreas in response to arginine isoproterenol and theophylline evidence for a preferential effect on glucagon secretion	Somatostatin inhibition of glucagon release and apos; infused rat pancreatic insulin in response to apos; isoproterenol arginine and theophylline indicates apos; existence of apos; preferential effect on glucagon secretion.
6	stimulation of the uptake of alpha aminoisobutyric acid in rat thymocytes by l triiodothyronine a comparison with insulin and dibutyryl cyclic amp	Stimulation of the apo; absorption of the apo; alpha acid-aminoisobutyric acid in the thymocytes of rats by triiodothyronine as compared to l' insulin and l' cyclic ampoule dibutyryl.
6	radioimmunoassay of canine growth hormone enzymatic radioiodination	Radioimmunoassay of Enzymatic Radioiodination of Canine Growth Hormone.
6	diabetes mellitus distinguishing between patients receiving insulin and those requiring insulin therapy	A person who has been diagnosed with a combination of conditions and who has been diagnosed with a combination of conditions.
6	production of chylomicron like lipoproteins from endogenous lipid by the intestine and liver of diabetic dogs	Chylomicron lipoprotein production from endogenous lipids by diabetic dogs' intestines and livers.
6	studies of the rate of regression of the glomerular lesions in diabetic rats treated with pancreatic islet transplantation	Glomerular lesion regression rate studies in pancreatic islet-transplanted diabetic rats.
6	long term primary culture of mouse mammary tumor cells production of virus	Long-term primary mammary tumor cell culture in mouse virus production.
6	plasma lipids and glucose insulin relationship in non insulin requiring diabetics with and without retinopathy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the risk of diabetes.
6	the relationship between the concentration of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and the anti lipolytic action of insulin in isolated rat fat cells	The relationship between the concentration of apos, cyclic adenosine 3,5-cyclic monophosphate and apos; the anti-lipolytic action of apos; insulin in the isolated fat cells of rats.
6	the effect of oxytetracycline on insulin resistance in obese mice	In addition, it is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
6	insulin release from the perfused rat pancreas mode of action of tolbutamide	In addition, it is not possible to predict the effect of the drug on the immune system.
6	cell mediated immunity to insulin and its polypeptide chains in insulin treated diabectics	Insulin and its polypeptide chains in insulin-treated diabetics.
6	associations between oral clefts and drugs taken during pregnancy	This is the most common type of medication used during pregnancy.
6	role of glucagon and other hormones in development of diabetic ketoacidosis	Role of glucagon and dapos; other hormones in the development of glucose; and diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	serial determinations of human placental lactogen in the management of diabetic pregnancy	Human placental lactogen determination series for the treatment of diabetic pregnancies.
6	pituitary function after treatment of intracranial tumours in children	Pituitary Function after Treatment of Intracranial Tumours in Children.
6	glucagon secretion in primary endogenous hypertriglyceridemia before and after clofibrate treatment	The secretion of glucagon into the primary endogenous hypertriglyceridemia before and after treatment with clofibrate.
6	effects of insulin tolbutamide and glucagon on activities of jejunal carbohydrate metabolizing enzymes in humans	Effects of Tolbutamide Insulin and Glucagon on the Activities of Jejunal Carbohydrate Metabolizing Enzymes in Humans.
6	the effect of alanine infusions on growth hormone insulin and glucose in protein calorie malnutrition	Apos; alanine infusions affect apos; insulin and glucose; growth hormone in protein malnutrition-caloric.
6	normal serum lipids in renal transplant patients	Normal lipid serum in kidney transplants.
6	development of the obese hyperglycemic syndrome in mice with a growth hormone deficiency	Development of Obese Hyperglycemic Syndrome in Growth Hormone Deficient Mice.
6	characterization of pancreatic islet monoamine oxidase	Characterization of islet monoamine oxidase.
6	hepatic steatosis and the elevated plasma insulin level in patients with endogenous hypertriglyceridemia	Hepatic steatosis and high apo levels; plasma insulin in apo patients; endogenous hypertriglyceridemia.
6	regional adipose tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in young and middle aged women	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States and the United States.
6	growth hormone responses following double pulse oral glucose administration in various clinical states	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
6	chromatographic heterogeneity of insulin extracted from insulomas	It is not possible to determine the identity of the product.
6	effect of alanine and glycine on glucagon secretion in postabsorptive and fasting obese man	Effect of alanine and glycine on the secretion of glucagon in fasting and fasting fasting adults.
6	effects of glucocorticoids on pituitary hormonal responses to hypoglycemia inhibition of prolactin release	Effect of glucocorticoids on the hormonal responses of the pituitary to apos; hypoglycemic inhibition of prolactin release.
6	development and validation of a radioimmunoassay for peptides related to beta melanocyte stimulating hormone in human plasma the lipotropins	Development and validation of apo; a radioimmunoassay of apo-linked peptides; human plasma beta melanocyte stimulation hormone, lipotropins.
6	plasma glucagon and alanine responses to acute insulin deficiency in man	The responses of plasma glucagon and alanine to acute human insulin deficiency.
6	long term infusion of growth hormone release inhibiting hormone in acromegaly effects on pituitary and pancreatic hormones	Long-term infusion of lapos; release hormone; growth hormone inhibits the effects of apos; acromegaly on pancreatic and pituitary hormones.
6	serum insulin and growth hormone response patterns in monozygotic twin siblings of patients with juvenile onset diabetes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the outcome of the study.
6	an exploratory study of some behavioural consequences of insulin induced hypoglycaemia	An exploratory study of behavioural consequences of apos; insulin-induced hypoglycaemia.
6	simple glaucoma and diabetic disease	Simple glaucoma, diabetic disease.
6	metabolic aspects of obesity	Canadian Institute of Health Information.
6	kinetics of hemodiafiltration i in vitro transport characteristics of a hollow fiber blood ultrafilter	The test should be carried out in accordance with the following instructions: a.
6	fetal brain growth selective action by growth hormone	Selective action of fetal cerebral growth by the growth hormone.
6	hyperosmolar nonketotic syndrome and steroid diabetes occurrence after renal transplantation	Hyperosmolar Non-Ketotic Syndrome (SKMS) and Steroid Diabetes (SRD) after a kidney transplant.
6	comparison of injection techniques for soluble and protamine zinc insulins in diabetes mellitus	It is important to note, however, that there are no data on the incidence of diabetes mellitus.
6	the functional state of the hypothalamo hypophyseal system in tumors of the pituitary and diencephalic area	L' hypothalamic pituitary system functional status in l' pituitary and dienephaly tumors.
6	incidence of diseases of the cardiovascular system in patients with diabetes during various types of therapy	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart disease in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
6	clinical and pathological studies in a growth hormone deficient dwarf	Clinical and Pathological Studies on a Growth Hormone Deficient Dwarf.
6	insulin iontophoresis in cystic fibrosis	Cystic fibrosis is the most common type of insulin.
6	septal rage mitigation by pre surgical treatment with p chlorophenylalamine	Reduction of septal rabies by p-chlorophenylalamine preoperative treatment.
6	suppression of human growth hormone secretion by melatonin and cyproheptadine	In addition, there is an increased risk of infection due to the use of a combination of drugs.
6	hepatic autography in uncontrolled experimental diabetes and its relationships to insulin and glucagon	Hepatic autography in experimental uncontrolled diabetes mellitus and its association with insulin and glucagon.
6	insulin effect on creatine transport in skelatal muscle 38464	It can also be used to reduce the risk of injury to the body.
6	hormone and glucose responses to serial cardiac puncture in rats 38465	The hormonal and glycemic responses to serialized cardiac puncture in the 38465 rats were observed.
6	insulin secretion in malignant hyperpyrexia	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used.
6	glucose tolerance and insulin secretion in patients with parathyroid disorders effect of serum calcium on insulin release	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that insulin can be used as an anti-glucose agent.
6	prevention of human diabetic ketoacidosis by somatostatin evidence for an essential role of glucagon	Prevention of human diabetic acid ketosis by somatostatin demonstrates the essential role of glucagon.
6	inhibition of l dopa induced growth hormone stimulation by pyridoxine and chlorpromazine	Dopa-induced inhibition induced stimulation of the growth hormone, apos, by pyridoxine and chlorpromazine.
6	late complications of diabetes mellitus consequence of immunologic reactions	Late onset diabetes mellitus complications as a result of immunological reactions.
6	in vivo interaction of the kunitz protease inhibitor and of insulin with subcellular structures from rat renal cortex	In vivo interaction of l' inhibitor of the protease of kunitz and l' insulin with the subcellular structures of the rat renal cortex.
6	aspects of glycolipid metabolism in chronic renal insufficiency effects of intravenous glucose loading	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
6	effects of diuril and dilantin on blood glucose and insulin levels in late pregnancy	Effects of Diuril and Dilantin on Blood Glucose and Absorption Levels; Insulin at the End of Pregnancy.
6	oral glucose tolerance in patients with jaundice	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of diabetes.
6	pulmonary artery thrombosis during hormonal contraceptive therapy treatment with urokinase	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre initiative.
6	inhibition of replication of normal adrenocortical cells in culture by adrenocorticotropin	L' inhibition of cultured normal adrenal cell replication by adrenocorticotropin.
6	biochemical aspects of a study of 100 obese white subjects	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	influence of antrectomy on gastrin release and gastric secretion in conscious monkeys	L' influence of l' antrectomy on the release of gastrin and gastric secretion in conscious monkeys.
6	insulin receptor role in the resistance of human obesity to insulin	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch.
6	a followup report of a prospective evaluation of vagotomy pyloroplasty and vagotomy antrectomy for treatment of duodenal ulcer	Follow-up report; prospective assessment of vagotomous and dapo pyloroplasty; vagotomous antrectomy; duodenal ulcer.
6	permanent neonatal diabetes mellitus a case report with plasma insulin studies	Cardiovascular System (CPSS): a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre initiative.
6	a case of leprechaunism and an analysis of some clinical manifestations of this syndrome	Leprechaunism and an analysis of clinical manifestations of the syndrome.
6	lipo atrophy of the ankles and its relation to other lipo atrophies	It is the most common type of ankle atrophy in the world.
6	circadian rhythms of the endocrine pancreas a quantitative biochemical and immumocytochemical study	Circadian endocrine pancreatic rhythms, quantitative biochemical, and immumocytochemical studies.
6	absence of insulin resistance in 4 cases of mild juvenile diabetes a preliminary report	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors for diabetes.
6	congenital generalized lipodystrophy	Congenital Lipodystrophy, generalized.
6	endocrinological aspects at follow up studies in neonatal hypoglycaemia	Canadian Journal of Public Health and Public Health 1996; 23(3): 241-57.
6	neuropathology of the oesophagus in diabetes mellitus	Neuropathology of diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin activity of the blood the action on it of various loads and the effect of blood serum on the effect of insulin relative to fatty tissue in chronic pancreatitis	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim, and it is not clear from the evidence that this is the case.
6	effect of an energy reduced dietary regimen in relation to adipose tissue cellularity in obese women	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to the body's body weight, and can be used as an adjunct to body weight.
6	increased disaccharidase activity in human diabetics	An increase in the number of patients with diabetes.
6	introductory remarks nutrient hormone enzyme interactions	Introductory Remarks Enzymatic interactions of food-producing hormones.
6	exocrine pancreatic function in juvenile diabetics	Journal of Adolescent Psychiatry, 11, 315-374.
6	use and abuse of gastric function tests by british and american gastric surgeons	Misuse of Gastric Function Testing by English and American Gastric Surgeons.
6	variability of serum gastrin levels in zollinger ellison syndrome studies with two antisera to gastrin	Variability of serum gastrin levels in two gastrin antisera studies of Zollinger Ellison syndrome.
6	abo blood groups and serum gastrin	Abo blood types and gastrin.
6	hypothalamic stimulation induces acid secretion hypoglycemia and hyperinsulinemia	Acid secretion, hypoglycemia and apos; hyperinsulinemia is induced by hypothalamic stimulation.
6	concentration of urine by the hibernating marmot	Acute gastrointestinal infections in rats and mice.
6	evolution of diabetic ketoacidosis in gross obesity	Diabetes mellitus, diabetes mellitus, diabetes mellitus, and obesity.
6	disorders in the development of the crystalline lens in chick embryos following exposure to insulin	Disorders of Crystalline Lens Development in Chicken Embryos Exposure to Insulin.
6	failure of insulin hypoglycemia to produce rise in serum prolactin	In addition, there is an increased risk of blood poisoning due to the use of low blood sugar.
6	rapid effects of insulin on uridine metabolism in mammary gland explants	Acute effects of inhalation on the metabolism of the gastrointestinal tract.
6	effect of vagotomy on electrical activity of the small intestine of the dog	Effect of vagotomy on appetite; electrical activity; dog's small intestine.
6	immunoassay of serum polypeptide hormones by using 125i labelled anti immunoglobulin g antibodies	Serum polypeptide hormone immunosorbent therapy; Assist; 125i-labelled anti-immunoglobulin antibody.
6	spontaneous changes in growth hormone and insulin levels in newborn infants	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the outcome of the study.
6	regulation of enzyme turnover during tissue differention studies on the effects of hormones on the turnover of fatty acid synthetase in rabbit mammary gland in organ culture	The regulation of turnover of the apos; enzyme during studies of difference of tissue retention on the effects of hormones on turnover of the apos; fatty acid synthetase in the mammary gland of rabbit in culture d' organs.
6	insulin precursors a historical synopsis first diabetes treatment trials using pancreas extracts	The Precursors of L' Insulin, a historical synopsis of early attempts using pancreatic extracts to treat diabetes.
6	two cases of acute pandysautonomia	Two acute life-threatening pandys.
6	plasma triglyceride clearing in obese children	A study of the incidence of fetal alcohol spectrum disorder.
6	effect of oral contraceptives and vitamin b6 deficiency on carbohydrate metabolism	Effect of oral contraceptives on carbohydrate metabolism and vitamin b6 deficiency.
6	insulin therapy in patients with systemic insulin allergy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of diabetes.
6	hyperinsulinemic hypoglycemia associated with a neurofibrosarcoma	Neurofibrosarcoma-associated hyperinsulinemic hypoglycemia.
6	use of the lactose ethanol tolerance test in diabetes	Use of the Tolerance Test for Lactose Ethanol in Cases of Diabetes.
6	mechanisms of platelet aggregation inhibition caused by sulfonylurea compounds 4 discussion summary and literature	The results of this study are summarized and discussed in the following sections.
6	proinsulin and insulin secretion in obese females before and after administration of metformin	It is important to note that the use of metformin is not an adjunct to the use of insulin by women who are obese.
6	a controlled study of the hypoglycemic and insulinopoietic effect of glipizide and glibenclamide in non diabetic human subjects	A controlled study of insulinopoietic and hypoglycemic effects of glipizide and glibenclamide in non-diabetic human subjects.
6	effect of the antrum and vagus nerve on the stimulation of the rat stomach by betazol in the perfusion test	Effect of beetle and vagus on betazol-stimulated rat stomach in infusion test.
6	effect of abnormal glucose tolerance in pregnancy on infant mortality rate and morbidity a prospective study	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of heart disease.
6	influence of pregnancy on the kinetics of insulin	Lapos; pregnancy influences insulin kinetics.
6	differences in proliferative activity of rat and human prostate in culture	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of activity.
6	proteolytic degradation of insulin and glucagon	Insulin and glucagon proteolytic degradation.
6	insulin degradation xv use of different assay methods for the study of mechanism of action of glutathione insulin transhydrogenase	Deterioration of apo; insulin use of various methods; assay for apo; study of mechanism; action of apo; insulin transhydrogenase glutathione.
6	difference derivative absorbance spectrophotometry as a technique to measure state changes of phenylalanine residues in proteins	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: Spectrophotometry of apos; differential absorbance derived as a technique for measuring changes in apo; phenylalanine residue status in proteins.
6	survival and growth in a woman with untreated hypothalamic panhypopituitarism of 21 years duration	Survival and growth in an untreated hypothalamic hypopituitar woman for 21 years.
6	mixed endocrine pancreatic tumors producing several peptide hormones	Mixed endocrine pancreatic tumours resulting in multiple peptide hormones.
6	hormone substrate responses to total fasting in lean and obese mice	Hormones responded to starvation in the presence of substrates in lean, obese mice.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy part i diurnal plasma glucose profile in normal and diabetic women	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch.
6	carbohydrate metabolism in pregnancy part ii relation between maternal glucose tolerance and glucose metabolism in the newborn	Carbohydrate metabolism during pregnancy Part ii relationship between maternal glucose tolerance and newborn-glucose metabolism.
6	adrenal catecholamines content in fetal and newborn rats	Adrenal catecholamine content of fetal rats and new born @-@.
6	carrier solutions for low level intravenous insulin infusion	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used to treat the disease.
6	the pancreatic insulin content and its relationship to plasma glucose and free fatty acid concentrations in the embryo and neonatal chick	The content of pancreatic insulin and its relation to plasma glucose and d&apos levels; free fatty acids in the kidney; embryo and newborn chick.
6	hyperglucagonaemia in the surgical patient	Hyperglycemia in surgical patient.
6	alcohol and its drug interactions	Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
6	thyroid autoimmunity increased frequency in relatives of insulin dependent diabetes patients	L' auto-thyroid immunity increased the incidence of diabetes mellitus in parents of insulin-dependent diabetics.
6	disappearing diabetes	Diabetes no longer exists.
6	vagal impairment of gastric secretion in diabetic autonomic neuropathy	L' vagal gastric secretion alteration in diabetic autonomic neuropathy.
6	effect of trimethoprim sulfamethoxazole on blood insulin and glucose concentrations of diabetics	Effect of sulfamethoxazole trimethoprim on insulin and glucose blood levels in diabetics.
6	biochemical characterization of carcinogen induced mammary hyperplastic aveolar nodule and tumor in the rat	Carcinogen-induced hyperplastic mammary tumours and aveolar nodules in rats are characterized biochemically.
6	clinical secretory and motor effects of selective proximal vagotomy a three year follow up	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the development of the disease.
6	studies on the duct ligated pancreas as allograft for islet cell function	Studies of the pancreatic ligated channel as an allograft for the function of islet cells.
6	human placental lactogen concentration during physiological fluctuations of serum glucose in normal pregnant and gestational diabetic women	Human placental lactogen concentration during physiological changes in serum glucose levels in normal pregnant and gestational diabetic women.
6	lipoatrophy produced in mice and rabbits by a fraction prepared from the urine from patients with congenital generalized lipodystrophy	Lipoatrophy produced in mice and rabbits by fraction prepared from urine of patients with congenital systemic lipodystrophy.
6	double antibody radioimmunoassay of serum insulin effect of use of hormone depleted human serum	Two-antibody radioimmunoassay of apos; effect of apos; serum insulin level on apos; use of hormone-depleted human serum.
6	effects of abdominal surgery under general anaesthesia and of postoperative analgesic therapy on splanchnic exchange of some blood borne energy metabolites	Effects of post-operative analgesic therapy and general anesthetic abdominal surgery on apos; splanchnic exchange of certain energetic blood metabolites.
6	fluorometry of citrate in serum with use of citrate pro 3s lyase	Citrate Fluorometry in serum using 3s lyase pro citrate.
6	insulin release in cystic fibrosis	Cystic fibrosis is a disease of the liver.
6	selective impairment of growth hormone response to physiological stimuli	In addition, there is a need for additional research to determine the role of the immune system in the immune system.
6	hypogonadism and parathyroid adenoma in congenital poikiloderma rothmund thomson syndrome	In addition to the above, there are a number of other conditions that may be present.
6	plasma free fatty acid turnover in total lipodystrophy	The turnover of plasma free fatty acids in total lipodystrophy.
6	quantitation of free total and antibody bound insulin in insulin treated diabetics	Antibody- and antibody-linked insulin; total free insulin was quantitated in diabetic patients receiving apo; insulin.
6	muscular exertion a test of pituitary function in children	L'exercise musculaire is a test of the function of the pituitary in children.
6	lymphopenic infectious mononucleosis	Infectious, lymphopenic, mononucleosis.
6	phagocytic properties of exudative microphages from animals with alloxan diabetes and insulin induced hypoglycemia	Exudative microphage phagocytic properties of animals with alloxan and alloxan diabetes; insulin-induced hypoglycemia.
6	effects of medium chain triglycerides on portal and arterial levels of insulin ffa and glucose in patients with pancreatic disease	Mid-chain triglyceride effects on portal and arterial ff insulin and glucose levels in patients with pancreatic disease.
6	oestradiol uptake and retention and high affinity binding sites in cultured rabbit uterus	L'absorption et la retention d'estradiol et les sites de fixation de haute affinité dans l'apos; uterus de rabbit cultivé.
6	urate synthesis in the perfused chick liver	Synthesis of Lapos; Perfused Chicken Liver Urate.
6	pituitary function in chronic alcoholism	Chronic alcoholism.
6	surgical disconnection of the medial basal hypothalamus and pituitary function in the rhesus monkey ii gh and cortisol secretion	Surgical disconnection of the median basal hypothalamus and pituitary function in rhesus monkeys and cortisol secretion.
6	characteristics of the prolactin stimulation of uridine metabolism in mammary gland explants	Characteristics of the stimulation by prolactin of the metabolism of l' uridine in explants of mammary glands.
6	mechanism of action of gliquidone author s transl	It's not the same thing, it's the same thing.
6	albumin fibrinogen and transferrin synthesis in isolated rat hepatocyte suspensions a model for the study of plasma protein synthesis	The synthesis of l' albumin, fibrinogen, and transferrin in isolated rat hepatocyte suspensions is a model for plasma protein synthesis.
6	the properties and extracellular location of 5 nucleotidase of the rat fat cell plasma membrane	Extracellular properties and localization of 5 plasma membrane nucleotidase from rat fat cells.
6	the effect of hypoglycemia on hypothalamic thyrotropin releasing hormone hrh in the rat	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack, which may result in increased risk of heart attack.
6	glucagon and insulin release from the allografted canine pancreas	Allografied canine pancreatic insulin and glucagon release.
6	growth hormone catecholamines in affective disease	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
6	role of insulin as a portal factor in maintaining the viability of liver	The role of insulin in the portability of the liver; insulin in the maintenance of liver viability.
6	confirmation of impaired early insulin response to glycemic stimulus in nonobese mild diabetics	This is consistent with the findings of the Canadian Diabetes Research Institute (CDRI) and the Canadian Diabetes Association.
6	insulin therapy in phenformin associated lactic acidosis a case report biochemical considerations and review of the literature	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted on the effects of phenformin-associated lactic acidosis.
6	plasma renin activity and blood volume in uncontrolled diabetes ketoacidosis a state of secondary aldosteronism	It is not possible to determine the cause of diabetes, but it is possible to determine the cause of diabetes.
6	basement membrane thickness in muscle capillaries of normal and spontaneously diabetic macaca nigra	L' thickness of the basal membrane of the macaca muscle capillaries will be normal and spontaneously diabetic.
6	inordinately high levels of serum immunoreactive insulin in monoclonal immunoglobulinemia on the problem of big big insulin	In addition, it is not possible to determine the cause of the adverse reactions, but it is important to determine the cause of the reactions.
6	comparison of the lipolytic effects of insulin and proinsulin on isolated fat cells	Comparison of insulin and proinsulin lipolytic effects on isolated fat cells.
6	plasma glucagon levels during rapid exsanguination with and without adrenergic blockade	Plasma glucagon levels during rapid exsanguination, with and without adrenergic blockade.
6	progestogen induced diabetes in the dog	The progestogen induced dog diabetes.
6	long term effect of highly selective vagotomy on basal and maximal acid output in man	Long-term effect of a highly selective vagotomy procedure on the basal and maximal production of apos; acid in men.
6	metabolic responses following isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction in arteriosclerotic breeder vs non arteriosclerotic virgin and ovariectomized female rats	Metabolic responses to isoproterenol elicited myocardial infarction in arteriosclerotic reproductive rats compared with nonarteriosclerotic ovariectomized virgin female rats.
6	a controlled randomized trial of highly selective vagotomy versus selective vagotomy and pyloroplasty in the treatment of duodenal ulcer	A randomized trial of high-selective vagotomy versus high-selective vagotomy and pyloroplastis in the treatment of dualenal ulcer.
6	cord plasma glucose and insulin concentrations and maternal fetal relations	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the outcome of the study.
6	comparison of blood glucose and insulin concentrations in man after intravenous injection of 1 0 0 1 and 0 01 mg of glucagon author s transl	Comparison of Blood Glucose and Dapos; Insulin in Apos; Male following intravenous injection of 10:01 mg glucagon in translation.
6	the immediate and delayed effects of different types of vagotomy on human gastric myoelectrical activity	The effects of various types of vagotomy on the immune system and on the immune system.
6	hormonal regulation of incorporation of alanine u 14c into glucose in human fetal liver explants effect of dibutyryl cyclic amp glucagon insulin and triamcinolone	The hormonal regulation of l' incorporation of alanine u 14c into glucose in explants of human fetal liver, l' effect of dibutyryl glucagonic insulin and triamcinolone.
6	age adjusted analysis of insulin responses during normal and abnormal glucose tolerance tests in children and adolescents	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that insulin is a risk factor for heart disease.
6	immunoreactive glucagon responses to intravenous tolbutamide in chronic pancreatitis	Dietary Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplement.
6	factitial panniculitis and necrotizing fasciitis in juvenile diabetes	Panniculitis and fasciitis necrosis in juvenile diabetes.
6	actions of insulin epinephrine and dibutyryl cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate on fat cell protein phosphorylations cyclic adenosine 5 monophosphate dependent and independent mechanisms	L' action of epinephrine insulin and cyclic dibutyryl adenosine 5 monophosphate on phosphorylations of protein from apos-dependent and apos-independent fat cells; cyclic adenosine 5.
6	lipids and lipoproteins in normal dogs and in dogs with secondary hyperlipoproteinemia	Lipids and lipoproteins in both normal dogs and dogs with secondary hyperlipoproteinemia.
6	formation of a covalent intermediate between alpha chymotryspin and the b chain of insulin during enzyme catalyzed hydrolysis	In addition, it can be used as a catalyst for the development of new products and processes, such as the development of new products and the development of new ones.
6	studies on the action of hormones on the intestinal transport of l histidine	Apos studies; hormone action on intestinal transport of apos; histidine l.
6	pituitary hormonal reserve in patients presenting hyperprolactinemia intrasellar masses and amenorrhea without galactorrhea	Hypituitary hormone reserve in patients with nongalactrhea and intrasolar mass hyperprolactinemia.
6	hormonal and metabolic changes induced by elevated plasma free fatty acids in term pregnancy i effect on maternal blood glucose insulin and human placental lactogen circulating levels	The metabolic and hormonal changes induced by elevation of plasma free fatty acids during term pregnancy affect the levels of insulin and lactogen circulating in maternal blood and the human placenta.
6	failure of somatostatin to inhibit tolbutamide induced insulin secretion in patients with insulinomas a possible diagnostic tool	A possible diagnostic tool is insulin, which can be used in patients with insulin, and insulin, which can be used to induce insulin secretion.
6	hormonal control of ketogenesis rapid activation of hepatic ketogenic capacity in fed rats by anti insulin serum and glucagon	Hormonal control of rapid hepatic ketogenic capacity activation ketogenesis in rats fed anti-insulin serum and glucagon.
6	effects of insulin and dietary myoinositol on impaired peripheral motor nerve conduction velocity in acute streptozotocin diabetes	Effects of insulin and dietary myoinositol on appetite; alteration of the conduction velocity of the peripheral motor nerve in acute streptozotocin diabetes.
6	effect of ketone infusions on amino acid and nitrogen metabolism in man	The effect of infusions of ketones on the metabolism of amino acids and nitrogen in humans.
6	experimental study of dibutyryl cyclic amp its metabolic effects observed in anesthetized human subjects	L' experimental study of the metabolic effects observed in human anesthetized subjects; cyclic amplifier dibutyryl.
6	under responsiveness of growth hormone secretion after l dopa and deep sleep stimulation in obese subjects	Reactivity of the secretion of l&apos, growth hormone after dopa and stimulation of deep sleep in obese subjects.
6	effect of hydrocortisone and dexamethasone on xylose uptake by isolated rat soleus muscle	Effect of dexamethasone and hydrocortisone on the uptake of xylose by the isolated rat soleus muscle.
6	possible intervention of insulin cyclic amp and glucocorticoids in protein sparing action of dietary carbohydrate in rats	Possible intervention of apo; insulin and glucocorticoid cycling ampulla in apo; dietary carbohydrate protein storage action in rats.
6	effect of dietary cholesterol on hepatic lipogenesis and plasma insulin and free fatty acid levels in rats	The effects of dietary cholesterol on the liver lipogenesis and plasma levels of insulin and d*apos; free fatty acids in rats.
6	hormonal control of cyclic 3 5 amp levels and gluconeogenesis in isolated hepatocytes from fed rats	Hormonal control of 3-amper cyclic levels and gluconeogenesis in isolated rat hepatocytes.
6	metabolic and hormonal consequences of exchange transfusion via the umbilical artery or vein	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the assessment of risk.
6	glycerol major contributor to the short term protein sparing effect of fat emulsions in normal man	Glycerol contributes greatly to the protein saving effect of short-term emulsions of fat in the normal man.
6	mechanisms for development of diabetic hypertriglyceridemia in streptozotocin treated rats effect of diet and duration of insulin deficiency	Mechanisms of Apos Development; Diabetes Hypertriglyceridemia in Streptozotocin-treated Rats Dietary Effect and Duration of Insulin Deficiency.
6	enzyme linked immunoassay i novel method for synthesis of the insulin beta d galactosidase conjugate and its applicability for insulin assay	Insulin beta conjugate galactosidase and its applicability to insulin insulin assay.
6	binding and degradation of 125i insulin by rat hepatocytes	It is not possible to predict the effects of the drug on the liver.
6	effect of serum on phenylalanine hydroxylase levels in cultured hepatoma cells	Effect of serum on levels of phenylalanine hydroxylase in liver cells; hepatoma in culture.
6	the effect of hydrocortisone and insulin on the activity and isoenzyme of tyrosine alpha ketoglutarate transaminase in cytostructures of rat liver	Lapos; effect of apos; hydrocortisone and apos; insulin on apos; activity and apos; isoenzyme of ketoglutarate alpha tyrosine transaminase in rat liver cytostructures.
6	pyruvate kinase from kidney medulla of rabbits in insulin deficiency	Rabbit insulin-deficient renal medulla pyruvate kinase.
6	correction of endocrine metabolic disorders in oncologic patients the effect of biguanides phenformin and adebita miskleron and diphenin	Correct metabolic endocrine disorders in cancer patients; effect of biguanides phenformin adebita miskleron and diphenin.
6	effects by heme insulin and serum albumin on heme and protein synthesis in chick embryo liver cells cultured in a chemically defined medium and a spectrofluorometric assay for porphyrin composition	Effects of Heme Insulin and Apos; serum albumin on synthesis of apos; heme and protein in hepatic cells of apos; chick embryos cultured in chemically defined medium and spectrofluorometric assay to determine porphyrin composition.
6	metabolism of riboflavin and its nucleotides in rat liver subcellular fractions in alloxan diabetes	Metabolism of the subcellular fractions of rat liver riboflavin and its nucleotides in alloxan diabetes.
6	gangrene of the newborn a case report	The new-is the result of a recent case study.
6	abdominal pain in diabetic metabolic decompensation clinical significance	Abdominal pain in the metabolic decompensation of diabetes mellitus clinical significance.
6	the accuracy of methods of diagnosis in patients with suspected recurrent ulcer after vagotomy	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
6	gastric inhibitory polypeptide gip stimulated by fat ingestion in man	Gip of gastric inhibitory muscle relaxed polypeptide; fat intake in men.
6	altered hypothalamic pituitary adrenal responsiveness to dexamethasone insulin tolerance test in active acromegaly	Modification of the hypothalamic hypothalamic adrenal response to the apos tolerance test; insulin dexamethasone in the apos; active acromegaly.
6	radioreceptor inactive growth hormone associated with stimulated secretion in normal subjects	Inactive growth hormone radio receptors associated with normal stimulated secretion.
6	circulating nsila s in man preliminary studies of stimuli in vivo and of binding to plasma components	Nsila circulating in humans Preliminary studies of in vivo stimuli and plasma component binding.
6	the inhibitory effect of somatostatin on growth hormone insulin and glucagon secretion in diabetes mellitus	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of diabetes mellitus.
6	metabolism of peripheral nerve myelin in experimental diabetes	Metabolism of the myelin of the peripheral nerve in experimental diabetes.
6	differential effect of hormones on macromolecular synthesis and mitosis in chick embryo cells	Differential Effect of Hormones on Macromolecular Synthesis and Mitosis in Chicken Cells.
6	hypoglycemic conditioned reflex in rats preliminary study of its mechanism	Hypoglycemic-conditioned reflex in rat, preliminary mechanistic study.
6	serum free growth of htc cells containing glucocorticoid and insulin inducible tyrosine aminotransferase and cytoplasmic glucocorticoid receptors	Serum free growth of cytoplasmic glucocorticoid receptor- and tyrosine aminotransferase-containing htc cells induced by glucocorticoids and l' insulin.
6	sex steroid influence on triglyceride metabolism	Sexual steroids influence triglyceride metabolism.
6	glucocorticoids and the regulation of phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase guanosine triphosphate in the rat	Glucocorticoids and regulation of guanosine triphosphate phosphoenolpyruvate carboxykinase in rats.
6	biochemical changes in cultured foetal rat liver explants	Biochemical Changes in Cultured Fetal Rat Liver Explants.
6	acute and long term tocolysis by means of buphenin dilatol in insulin dependent pregnant diabetics	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada.
6	studies on new sulfonylurea derivatives and their metabolites in isolated langerhans s islets of the rat pancreas author s transl	Studies of new sulfonylurea derivatives and metabolites in isolated islets of rat pancreatic langerhans.
6	clinical usefulness of gastric acidity studies	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	peripheral metabolism of insulin proinsulin and c peptide in the pregnant rat	Apos peripheral metabolism; proinsulin insulin and c-peptide in pregnant rat.
6	on hepatic and extrahepatic postheparin serum lipase activities and the influence of experimental hypercortisolism and diabetes on these activities	On hepatic and extrahepatic serum lipase activities post-heparin and on heparin; influence of hepos; experimental hypercortisolism and diabetes mellitus on these activities.
6	spontaneous diabetes mellitus in macaca cyclopis and mandrillus leucophaeus case reports	Cases of Spontaneous Diabetes Mellitus in Macaca Cyclopis and Mandrillus leucophaeus reported.
6	estradiol dependent collagenolytic enzyme activity in long term organ culture of human breast cancer	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
6	metabolic actions of vasopressin glucagon and adrenalin in the intact rat	L' metabolic action of glucagon of vasopressin and l' adrenaline in intact rat.
6	blood glucose serum insulin and glucagon response to arginine in premature infants	Dietary Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplemental Supplement.
6	gastric acid output pepsin output and lean body mass in normal and duodenal ulcer subjects	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
6	antibody to cultured human insulinoma cells in insulin dependent diabetes	Antimicrobial Resistance Antimicrobial Resistance Antimicrobial Resistance Antimicrobial Resistance Antimicrobial Resistance Antimicrobial Resistance.
6	pathogenesis of nonketotic hyperosmolar diabetic coma	Pathogenesis of nonketo diabetic hyperosmolar coma.
6	potentiation of carbon tetrachloride induced hepatotoxicity in alloxan or strepto zotocin diabetic rats	Carbon tetrachloride potentiation induced hepatotoxicity in alloxane or streptozotocin diabetic rats.
6	modification by propranolol of cardiovascular effects of induced hypoglycaemia	Treatment with propranolol for cardiovascular effects; hypoglycemia induced.
6	effect of meal feeding on the daily variations of insulin glucose and nadp linked dehydrogenases in rats	Effect of drug; ingestion of food on daily changes in glucose insulin and dehydrogenases associated with larvae in rats.
6	influence of treatment with diet alone on oral glucose tolerance test and plasma sugar and insulin levels in patients with maturity onset diabetes mellitus	Influence of diet-only treatment on oral glucose tolerance test and plasma insulin and sugar levels in patients with mature diabetes mellitus.
6	the endocrine pancreas in varanus niloticus ultrastructural and cytochemical electron microscopic study and x ray microdiffraction	The endocrine pancreas of varanus niloticus studied ultrastructurally and cytochemically by electron microscopy and microdiffraction x-ray.
6	the historic role of insulin in the physiopathology of the metabolic complications from pancreatic diabetes therapeutic implications for somatostatin	The Historical Role of Insulin in the Pathophysiology of the Metabolic Complications of Pancreatic Diabetes Therapeutic Implications for Somatostatin.
6	gas chromatographic and mass spectrometric detection of low molecular weight aliphatic alcohols in urine of normal individuals and patients with diabetes mellitus	Detection by gas chromatography and mass spectrometry of apo; low molecular weight aliphatic alcohols in apo; urine of apo; normal individuals and diabetes mellitus patients.
6	dose response study of the inhibiting effect of somatostatin on growth hormone and insulin secretion in normal subjects and acromegalic patients	Dosage study-drug response; somatostatin inhibitory effect on drug secretion; insulin and d' growth hormone in normal subjects and acromegal patients.
6	serum lipids in acromegaly	Health Canada, Canadian Institute of Health Information.
6	hypoglycaemia associated with an intrathoracic fibrosarcoma	Intrathoracic fibrosarcoma-associated hypoglycemia.
6	depressive symptoms and the glucose tolerance test and insulin tolerance test	In addition to the above, there are a number of other medications that can be used to treat chronic conditions.
6	feeding behavior in monkeys with spontaneous diabetes mellitus	Dietary behaviour in spontaneously diabetic monkeys.
6	specific insulin binding to chloroplasts isolated from acetabularia mediterranea	The specific binding of l' insulin to isolated l&apos-like chloroplasts; acetabular mediterranea.
6	metabolic effects of calcitonin in the newborn	The Metabolic Effects of Calcitonin in the New-Born.
6	restriction of hepatic gluconeogenesis and ureogenesis from threonine when at low concentrations	Restriction of hepatic gluconeogenesis and apo; low-level ureogenesis from threonine.
6	influence of darkness on insulin binding in the unicellular algae acetabularia mediterranea	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
6	effect of insulin on electric activity of sheep jejunum	Electrical activity of the sheep's jejunum.
6	in vitro stimulation of human breast tissue by human prolactin	In vitro human breast stimulation with human prolactin.
6	mortality factors in diabetes a 20 year mortality study	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
6	aberrations in hollander test response after incomplete vagotomy compensating effect of antral resection in the dog	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada.
6	ultrastructure of the adrenal medulla of normal and insulin treated hamsters	Insulin-treated normal hamster adrenal medulla ultrastructure.
6	the effects of morphine and nalorphine on the plasma 11 hydroxycorticosteroid response to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in patients with rheumatoid arthritis	The Effects of Morphine and Nalorphine on the Plasma Response 11 Hydroxycorticosteroid to Apos; Hypoglycemic Induced Insulin in Patients with Rheumatoid Arthritis.
6	altered pulmonary capillary permeability complicating recovery from diabetic ketoacidosis	L' alteration of the permeability of the lung capillary complicates recovery from diabetic ketoacidosis.
6	drug interference and the role of anesthesia in such interference	Anesthesia, anesthesia, anesthesia, anesthesia, anesthesia.
6	continuous daily blood sugar profile in relation to serum insulin in subjects with normal metabolism and ideal or normal weight author s transl	A continuous daily profile of blood glucose in relation to serum insulin levels in subjects with normal metabolism and in subjects with an ideal or normal weight.
6	plasma levels of hgh insulin and nefa in diabetic children author s transl	The results of this study suggest that children with diabetes are at increased risk for diabetes.
6	insulin plasma aminoacid imbalance and hepatic coma	Insulin deficiency, amino acids in insulin plasma, and hepatic coma.
6	a case report of turner s syndrome with ring x chromosome	A report of X-chromosome Turner syndrome.
6	qualitative abnormality of insulin secretion in a case with insulinoma	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of insulin.
6	a case of acromegaly improved by pituitary apoplexy	An acromegaly enhanced by apos; pituitary apoplexy.
6	hypothalamic pituitary functions in patients with idiopathic pituitary dwarfism	In addition to the above, there are a number of other conditions that may be considered.
6	the growth hormone response to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in anorexia nervosa and control underweight or normal subjects	The response of insulin-induced growth hormone to insulin-induced hypoglycemia in the nervous anorexia and normal or low-weight control subjects.
6	influence of atropine metiamide and vagotomy on camp of resting and stimulated gastric mucosa	Influence of metiamide atropine and metiamide vagotomy on resting camp and gastric mucosal stimulation.
6	automatic treatment of radioimmunoassay data an experimental validation of the results	Automatic processing of data; radioimmunoassay, experimental validation.
6	a low response of pituitary growth hormone secretion in the patient with diabetes mellitus after intravenous administration of l dopa author s transl	Low responsiveness of apo secretion; pituitary growth hormone in diabetic patient after apo; intravenous dopa translator.
6	oral diazoxide contraindicated in severe hypertension with renal failure	Oral Diazoxide vs.-is indicated for use in patients with severe hypertension and renal failure.
6	adipose tissue cellularity in relation to metabolism in juvenile onset diabetes mellitus	Effect of diphtheria, tetanus, tetanus, tetanus, tetanus, tetanus, tetanus, tetanus, and tetanus.
6	the excretion of proinsulin and insulin in urine	It's a good way to get a feel for people who don't know what to do.
6	the effect of phenformin on amino acid induced insulin secretion in diabetics	The effect of phenformin on the amino acids induced the secretion of insulin in diabetics.
6	the plasma insulin and growth hormone response to oral glucose diurnal and seasonal observations in the antarctic	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
6	serum iri in insulin treated diabetics during a 24 hour period	It can be used as an adjunct to the immune system and as an adjunct to the immune system.
6	the contractile capacity of the myocardium the effect of insulin on it and indices of central hemodynamics in patients with diabetes mellitus	Myocardial contractile capacity, the effect of insulin on myocardial function and indices, central hemodynamics in diabetes mellitus patients.
6	effect of metergoline a powerful and long acting antiserotoninergic agent on insulin secretion in normal subjects and in patients with chemical diabetes	Metergoline, a potent long-acting anti-serotonergic agent, has a long-acting effect on the secretion of apos; insulin in normal subjects and patients with chemical diabetes.
6	demonstration of anti a component antibody a possible means to differentiate patients with auto antibodies to endogenous insulin from insulin treated patients	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for the presence of the antibody; antibody is a possible way to differentiate between patients with auto-antibodies to apos; endogenous insulin from patients treated with insulin.
6	effect of hypophysectomy on protein synthetic activity of free and bound hepatic ribosomes from insulin deficient rats	Effect of apos; hypophysectomy on apos; protein synthesis activity of bound and free liver ribosomes from insulin-deficient rats.
6	effect of duration of insulin deficiency on membrane bound and free ribosomes from livers of diabetic rats	Effect of insulin deficiency duration on hepatic free and membrane-bound ribosomes of diabetic rats.
6	human c peptide in normal and diabetic subjects	Human c-peptide in diabetic and normal subjects.
6	increased kidney size and glomerular filtration rate in untreated juvenile diabetes normalization by insulin treatment	Increased glomerular filtration rate and renal size in normalization of juvenile diabetes not treated with insulin.
6	assessment of the somatotropic function of the hypophysis in patients with hypophyseal nanism and gonadal dysgenesis by using the insulin tolerance and arginine tolerance tests	Evaluation of pituitary function; pituitary in patients with pituitary dwarfism and gonadal dysgenesis at apos; aids in tolerance testing for apos; insulin and apos; arginine.
6	blood sugar and plasma immunoreactive insulin levels in healthy pregnant women undergoing the glucose tolerance test	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of heart disease and stroke.
6	effect of glucagon on esophageal motor function	Effect of glucagon on motor function of esophageal function.
6	kinetics of steroid induction and deinduction of tyrosine aminotransferase synthesis in cultured hepatoma cells	Kinetics of the apos; induction and desinduction of steroids from the synthesis of tyrosine aminotransferase in cultured cells; hepatoma.
6	clinical investigations of the effect of tolbutamide and glibenclamide on pancreatic glucagon secretion author s transl	Clinical investigations of apo; effect of tolbutamide and glibenclamide on secretion of pancreatic glucagon.
6	serum insulin changes in arteriosclerotic breeder female rats versus non arteriosclerotic virgin rats	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada.
6	c peptide analysis in diagnosis of factitial hypoglycemia in an insulin dependent diabetic	Peptide analysis c in diagnosis of insulin-dependent diabetic false hypoglycemia.
6	clinical experiences with monocomponent insulins	Single Component Insulin Clinical Experiments.
6	trial treatment of diabetic retinopathy by inhibition of pituitary somatotropin secretion with map	Experimental treatment of diabetic retinopathy using a geographic map to inhibit pituitary somatotropin secretion.
6	significance of the 2 deoxy d glucose test on the differentiation of hypoglycemia in childhood author s transl	In the case of children who have been translated, the test should be carried out at the same time as the test.
6	prolonged control of hypoglycaemia by l asparaginase in islet cell carcinoma producing insulin and gastrin	It is not possible to determine the cause of the cancer, but it is important to determine the cause of the cancer.
6	insulin and hydrocortisone effects on viability and glycogen stores of postnatal rat liver organ culture	Effects of insulin and apos; hydrocortisone on the viability and glycogen stores of the culture of postnatal rat liver organs.
6	insulinoma aids to management	Insulin helps with the management.
6	studies on the role of insulin in the regulation of glyceride synthesis in rat epididymal adipose tissue	Studies of the role of l' insulin in regulating glyceride synthesis in epididymal adipose tissue of the rat.
6	intraportal insulin protects from the liver injury of portacaval shunt in dogs	Intraportal insulin protects against portacaval shunt hepatic injury in dogs.
6	functional subdivision of islets of langerhans and possible role of d cells	Under-functional division of langerhans islets and possible d-cell role.
6	hormone receptors 5 binding of glucagon and insulin to human circulating mononuclear cells in diabetes mellitus	Hormonal receptors 5 bind glucagon and l' insulin to the circulating mononuclear cells of humans in diabetes mellitus.
6	utilization of intravenous maltose	Intravenous maltosis.
6	blood glucose and plasma insulin levels during prolonged pentobarbitone anaesthesia in the rat	Glucose and d*apos levels; plasma insulin during apos; prolonged rat pentobarbitone anesthesia.
6	effect of beta and beta2 adrenoreceptor stimulants infused intrapancreatically on glucagon and insulin secretion	Both beta2- and beta2-adrenoceptor stimulants had an intra-pancreatic effect on the secretion of glucagon and d' insulin.
6	studies on the reversibility of oral trypsin inhibitor induced changes of rat pancreatic exocrine enzyme activity and insulin secretory capacity	Studies of the reversibility of the oral inhibitor of trypsin induced changes in the pancreatic exocrine enzymatic activity and the secretory capacity of the insulin; insulin in the rat.
6	retention of endocrine function by an insulin secreting pancreatic islet cell tumour from syrain hamster through serial transplantation in nude mice	Retention of endocrine function by insulin secreting the tumor from the pancreatic islets of the Syrian hamster by serial transplantation in naked mice.
6	physiological mechanisms for cardiac control by nutritional intake after early maternal separation in the young rat	Physiological Mechanisms of Cardiac Control by Disease; Nutritional Intake Following Early Partitioning of the Maternal in Young Rat.
6	blood sugar level and immunoreactive insulin in the blood plasma in pregnant women with supposed prediabetes in the dynamics of a normal glucose tolerance test	Blood sugar and blood plasma immunoreactive insulin in pregnant women whose pre-diabetes is assumed to be a part of the glucose tolerance process.
6	hormonal and pyridoxine induction of threonine dehydratase in the rat liver	Hormonal induction and pyridoxine of rat liver threonine dehydratase.
6	lipid mobilizing hormones of the hypothalamus and pituitary	Hormones that mobilize lipids from the body; hypothalamus and from the body; pituitary.
6	central factors in the control of insulin and glucagon secretion	In addition, it can be used as a means of controlling the secretion of insulin and glucagon.
6	the plasma cortisol and corticotropin response to hypoglycemia following adrenal steroid and acth administration	The response of plasma cortisol and corticotropin to apos; hypoglycemia after apos; administration of adrenal and d&apos steroids; acth.
6	exaggerated growth hormone response to arginine infusion in huntington s disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases, including diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, and other diseases.
6	function of the duct ligated canine pancreatic allograft	Canine allograft allograft ligated duct function.
6	behaviour of the duct ligated canine pancreas during hypothermic albumin perfusion	The canine pancreas was ligated during hypothermic infusion of apos; albumin.
6	twenty four hour preservation of the duct ligated canine pancreatic allograft	Canine ligated pancreatic allograft preserved for 24 hours.
6	endocrinology and metabolism in uremia and dialysis a clinical review	It's a good idea to have a little bit more of your own medicine.
6	insulin metabolism insulin sensitivity and hormonal responses to insulin infusion in patients taking oral contraceptive steroids	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that may be used in the treatment of HIV/AIDS.
6	effect of insulin induced hypoglycemia upon plasma renin activity in man	It's called insulin, but it's called insulin, and it's called insulin, and it's called insulin.
6	parietal cell vagotomy	Wall-cell vagotomy.
6	culture of cells in beem capsules a new technique for electron microscopic study of monolayer cultures	Cell culture in beem capsules is a new technique for apo studies using electron microscopy of monolayer cultures.
6	intragastric pressure volume relationship before and after proximal gastric vagotomy	The relationship between the volume of intragastric pressure before and after the proximal gastric vagotomy.
6	conditioning insulin effects	Determine the effectiveness of the product.
6	induction of t lymphocyte responses to a small molecular weight antigen i failure to induce tolerance in azobenzenearsonate aba specific t cells in guinea pigs with an aba conjugate of a copolymer of d glutamic acid and d lysine d gl	The induction of t-cell responses to a low molecular weight antigen i was not successful in inducing tolerance in guinea-pig specific t-cells; azobenzenearsonate was induced in guinea-pigs with an aba dapos conjugate; a d-apos copolymer; glutamic acid and lysine dglgl.
6	nutritional and metabolic studies in humans with 1 3 butanediol	Nutritional and metabolic studies in the human population with 13 butanediol.
6	influence of 1 3 butanediol on blood glucose concentration and pancreatic insulin content of streptozotocin diabetic rats	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
6	radioimmunoassay review of basic principles	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry.
6	radioimmunoassay of insulin	Insulin immunoassay.
6	cellular and circulating immunity to diabetic basement membrane a negative finding	Circulating cellular immunity to the diabetic basement membrane, a negative result.
6	studies of the relationship between renin secretion and the sympathetic nervous system responsiveness in man author s transl	Study of the relationship between the secretion of renin and the reactivity of the sympathetic nervous system in humans.
6	serum immunoreactive insulin after the oral administration of single dose of tolbutamide i peripheral vein immunoreactive insulin in normal subjects and mild diabetics author s transl	Immunoreactive serum insulin following administration; oral dosing of immunoreactive tolbutamide i peripheral insulin-reactive vein in normal subjects and mildly diabetic patients.
6	serum immunoreactive insulin after the oral administration of single dose of tolbutamide ii pancreatic vein immunoreactive insulin in dogs author s transl	Immunoreactive serum insulin following dosing; oral dosing; a single dose of tolbutamide; immunoreactive insulin-pancreatic vein in translating dogs.
6	dietary therapy and insulin secretory response to glucose in adult onset non obese diabetic subjects	Food therapy and secretory glucose insulin response in non-obese adult subjects with type 2 diabetes.
6	determination of total insulin tiri in plasma of insulin treated diabetics and newborn infants of insulin treated diabetic mothers	Determination of Complete Pulmonary Draw Insulin in diabetic patients treated with insulin; Insulin and newborns of diabetic mothers treated with insulin.
6	dynamics of insulin release by perfused hamster mesocricetus auratus pancreases effects of hypophysectomy bovine and human growth hormone and prolactin	The dynamics of hamster-infused mesocricetus auratus pancreas insulin release causes the effects of apos, hypophysectomy of apos, human and bovine growth hormone, and prolactin.
6	aspects of the adrenal function in the domestic fowl	Aspects of Adrenal Function in Domestic Poultry.
6	insulin degradation by isolated fat cells and their subcellular fractions	Degradation of l' insulin by isolated fat cells and subcellular fractions.
6	modulation of fatty acid metabolism by glucagon in man iii role of pharmacologic limitation of ffa availability	Modification of the metabolism of fatty acids by glucagon in humans iii the role of pharmacological limitation of the availability of ffa.
6	short term treatment of alloxan diabetic rats with intrajejunal administration of water in oil in water insulin emulsions	Acute treatment of rats made diabetic by alloxan with intrajunal administration of antibiotics; water in the form of alcohol; oil in the form of alcohol; insulin-emulsions.
6	twenty four hour serum growth hormone levels in maturity onset diabetics	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the development of the disease.
6	organ culture of foetal rat pancreas effects of parabiotic culture with foetal adrenal glands	Fetal rat pancreatic organ culture, parabiotic culture with fetal adrenal glands.
6	bacteriuria findings in diabetics	Diabetic bacteriuria.
6	effects of diabetes mellitus on bone mass in juvenile and adult onset diabetes	Effects of Diabetes Mellitus on Bone Weight in Juvenile and Adult Diabetes.
6	effect of gastro entero pancreatic endocrine hormones on the histogenesis of gastric cancer in rats induced by n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine with special reference to development of scirrhous gastric cancer	Effect of enteric-gastro endocrine hormones on gastric cancer histogenesis in rats induced by n-methyl n-nitrosoguanidine, particularly with respect to scirous gastric cancer development.
6	islet transplantation in diabetic rats receiving corticosteroids	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - Acute and chronic inflammation of the liver.
6	formaldehyde ozone induced fluorescence in gastrin producing tumours	L' ozone formaldehyde induced gastrin-producing tumours to fluoresce.
6	isolation of intact liver parenchymal cells by a modified enzymatic method	The intact parenchyma cells of the liver are isolated by a modified enzymatic method.
6	the influence of plasma triglycerides on human growth hormone response to arginine and insulin a study in hyperlipemics and normal subjects	Plasma triglyceride influence on the response of the human growth hormone to arginine, arginine, and apos; insulin was studied in hyperlipemic and normal subjects.
6	blood glucose and serum insulin levels in lean and genetically obese mice	Glycemia and levels of serum insulin in lean, genetically obese mice.
6	the role of cortisol and growth hormone in the counter regulation of insulin induced hypoglycemia	Cortisol and l' growth hormone are involved in counteracting apos regulation; apos-induced hypoglycemia; insulin.
6	experimental hyperthyroidism in dogs evaluation and effects on blood sugar serum insulin and free fatty acids during glibenclamide infusion test	In addition, the results of a randomized controlled trial were compared with the results of a randomized controlled trial.
6	the effect of fatty acids and ketone bodies on the biosynthesis of insulin in isolated pancreatic islets of obese hyperglycemic mice	L' effect of fatty acids and ketones on apo biosynthesis; insulin in pancreatic islets isolated from hyperglycemic, obese mice.
6	the effect of insulin on amino acid incorporation into exocrine pancreatic cells of the rat	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to the other components of the immune system.
6	interaction of endogenous growth hormone cortisol and catecholamines with blood glucose in children with brittle diabetes mellitus	Interaction of l' endogenous cortisol and catecholamine growth hormone with blood glucose in children with frail diabetes mellitus.
6	stimulation of growth hormone secretion by levodopa propranolol in children and adolescents	Stimulation of propranolol levodopa growth hormone secretion in children and adolescents.
6	plasma growth hormone insulin and glucagon responses to arginine infusion in children and adolescents with idiopathic short stature isolated growth hormone deficiency panhypopituitarism and anorexia nervosa	The responses of insulin and glucagon in idiopathic small children and adolescents, plasma growth hormone, arginine, and insulin to infusion of insulin and arginine, resulted in the isolation of anorexia nervosa.
6	propranolol augmented exercise induced human growth hormone release	Propranolol increased the release of the human growth hormone, which is induced by exercise.
6	acute suppressive effect of human growth hormone on basal insulin secretion in man	Acute suppressive effect of the human growth hormone (HGH) on the secretion of basal insulin in humans.
6	effects of synthetic somatostatin on endotoxin induced changes of growth hormone cortisol and insulin in plasma blood sugar and blood leukocytes in man	Synthetic somatostatin effects on apo-induced changes; apo endotoxin; cortisol and apo growth hormone; insulin in blood sugar and leukocytes in apos; man.
6	growth hormone secretion and sulfation factor activity in pseudohypoparathyroidism	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the formation of hyperglycemia.
6	laron dwarfism growth and immunoreactive insulin following treatment with human growth hormone	Laron growth dwarfism and insulin immunoreactive after treatment with the human growth hormone.
6	change in secretion of somatotropic hormone and insulin in myocardial infarct	It's the same thing, but it's the same thing, it's the same thing.
6	carbohydrate tolerance plasma insulin growth hormone and lipid levels in indian and black diabetics	Carbohydrate tolerance Hormone of growth and plasma lipid levels of lacid; insulin in diabetics of India and black.
6	growth and hormone control mechanisms in osteosarcoma evidence for a new therapeutic approach	A new approach to the treatment of osteosarcoma, a new approach to the treatment of osteosarcoma.
6	a comparative study of serum growth hormone and plasma cortisol levels in stimulation tests with insulin and propranolol glucagon	Canadian Institute for Health Information (CIHI), Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	increased immunoreactive plasma and urinary growth hormone in growth retardation with defective generation of somatomedin a laron s syndrome	Increases in immunoreactive plasma and the urinary growth hormone in growth retardation with a defective laron syndrome generation of somatomedin.
6	growth hormone and prolactin secretion in the carcinoid syndrome	Growth hormone and carcinoid syndrome prolactin secretion.
6	growth hormone secretion in chronic schizophrenia	Secretion of the Growth Hormone in Chronic Schizophrenia.
6	the effects of insulin and growth hormone on the release of somatomedin by the isolated rat liver	The Effects of Insulin and Growth Hormone on Somatomedin Release from Isolated Rat Liver.
6	the stimulating effect of cyclic amp glucagon and insulin on guanidine acetate n methyltransferase activity in rat liver and pancreas	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to the other components of the body, such as the liver and pancreatic enzymes, and as an adjuvant.
6	intravenous metyrapone testing evaluation of growth hormone and adrenocorticotrophic hormone in children	Evaluation of Intravenous Metyrapone Adrenocorticotropic Hormone (IPH) in children.
6	l dopa growth hormone and adipokinesis in the lean and the obese	Growth hormone dopa and adipokinesis in lean and fat.
6	serum growth hormone serum immunoreactive insulin and blood glucose response to oral and intravenous diazepam in man	Serum growth hormone, serum immunoreactive insulin, and glycemic response to intravenous and oral diazepam in men.
6	plasma growth hormone and insulin during early lactation in cows fed silage based diets	Hormone of growth and insulin of plasma at the beginning of lactation in cows fed diets based on d' ensilage.
6	a modification of the unlabeled antibody enzyme method using heterologous antisera for the light microscopic and ultrastructural localization of insulin glucagon and growth hormone	Changes to the enzymatic method of unlabelled antibody with heterologous antisera for ultrastructural and light microscopic localization of apos; glucagon insulin and apos; growth hormone.
6	growth hormone insulin and sugar in the blood plasma of bulls interrelated diurnal variations	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
6	effect of alcohol administration on plasma growth hormone response to insulin induced hypoglycemia	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that may be used for the treatment of diabetes.
6	growth hormone release by glycine injected intravenously in 22 healthy sexually immature children	Release of the growth hormone glycine was injected intravenously into 22 sexually immature healthy children.
6	altered growth hormone release in huntington s chorea	In addition, it is not possible to predict the effects of the drug on the immune system.
6	effect of lipids on insulin growth hormone and exocrine pancreatic secretion in man	The Effect of Lipids on Lipos; Insulin, Lapos; Growth Hormone and Exocrine Pancreatic Secretion in Men.
6	follicle stimulating hormone thyrotrophin human growth hormone and prolactin in hyperemesis gravidarum	Thyrotrophin-stimulating follicular hormone, human growth hormone, and prolactin in the apos; hyperemesis gravidarum.
6	the effect of somatostatin on plasma insulin and growth hormone levels in basal conditions and after glucagon in normal and acromegalic subjects	Effects of somatostatin on plasma levels of insulin and dapos; growth hormone at baseline and post-glucagon in normal and acromegalic subjects.
6	glucagon insulin and growth hormone response in obese women	The Effect of Glucagon Insulin on Growth Hormone Response in Obese Women.
6	growth hormone response in fetal alcohol syndrome	The Response of Growth Hormone to Dapos Disease; Fetal Alcoholism.
6	propranolol effect on plasma glucose free fatty acid insulin and growth hormone in graves disease	Effect of Propranolol on Alcohol; Insulin and Other Drugs; Free Growth Hormone; Plasma Glucose Fatty Acids in Serious Diseases.
6	diabetes mellitus in gonadal dysgenesis studies of insulin and growth hormone secretion	Diabetes mellitus mellitus mellitus mellitus Mellitus mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus Mellitus.
6	automated approach to radioimmunoassays of somatotropin human growth hormone and insulin	Automated radioimmunoassay of insulin and apo; human growth hormone, somatotrophin.
6	growth hormone levels in diabetes correlation with the clinical control of the disease	Diabetes mellitus is a major cause of diabetes mellitus in Canada and the United States.
6	secretion of growth hormone in hyperthyroidism	It's not the same thing as the other hormones.
6	effects of methyldopa on prolactin and growth hormone	Effects of Methyldopa on prolactin and Lapos; Growth Hormone.
6	effects of growth hormone thyroxine and age on diaphragm muscle from dwarf mice	The effects of thyroxine, a growth hormone, and of glucose on the diaphragm of dwarf mice.
6	the influence of thyroid function on the diabetogenic action of triamcinolone in man glucose insulin and growth hormone patterns after on oral glucose load	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
6	hormonal regulation of fetal brain cell proliferation presence in serum of a trophin responsive to pituitary growth hormone stimulation	Hormonal regulation of the presence of fetal, proliferating brain cells in the serum of the pituitary growth hormone, a hormone reacting to stimulation of the apos.
6	a comparison of the effect of levodopa and somatostatin on the plasma levels of growth hormone insulin glucagon and prolactin in acromegaly	Comparison of the effects of levodopa and somatostatin on plasma levels of levodopa and somatostatin; insulin glucagon, growth hormone, and prolactin in apos; acromegaly.
6	provocative tests for growth hormone release	Challenge test for apo release; growth hormone.
6	effect of prolactin on growth and the estrogen receptor level of human breast cancer cells mcf 7	Prolactin effect on growth and estrogen receptor levels in human breast cancer cells.
6	effect of the antihistaminic agents meclastine and dexchlorpheniramine on the response of human growth hormone to arginine infusion and insulin hypoglycemia	Effect of antihistamine agents mesclastine and dexchlorpheniramine on response of apos; human growth hormone to infusion of apos; arginine and apos; insulin hypoglycemia.
6	plasma insulin and growth hormone concentrations in pregnant sheep i diurnal variations in mid and late pregnancy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
6	plasma insulin and growth hormone concentrations in pregnant sheep ii post absorptive levels in mid and late pregnancy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
6	insulin and growth hormone responses in neonatal hyperglycemia	Insulin and neonatal hyperglycemic growth hormone.
6	retinopathy and plasma growth hormone levels in idiopathic hemochromatosis with diabetes	Retinopathy and dapos; plasma growth hormone in diabetes; idiopathic hemochromatosis.
6	prolactin binding to r3230ac mammary carcinoma and liver in hormone treated and diabetic rats	Prolactin binds to the r330ac mammary carcinoma and to the liver in hormone-treated and diabetic rats.
6	effects of somatostatin on basal levels of plasma growth hormone and insulin in acromegalics dose response studies and attempted total growth hormone suppression	Somatostatin effects on baseline levels of lacid; growth hormone and lacid; plasma insulin in dose studies-acromegalic response and attempt total removal of lacid; growth hormone.
6	depression of growth hormone and cortisol response to insulin induced hypoglycemia after prolonged oral delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol administration in man	The decreased responsiveness of the growth hormone and cortisol to insulin caused hypoglycemia after apos; prolonged oral administration of delta tetrahydrocannabinol in men.
6	influence of l prolyl l leucyl glycine amide on growth hormone secretion in normal and acromegalic subjects	L' leucyl glycine amide influence on apos secretion; growth hormone in normal and acromegalic subjects.
6	short term effects of norethisterone oenanthate and medroxyprogesterone acetate on glucose insulin growth hormone and lipids	Short-Term Effects of Norethisterone Oenanthate and Apos; Medroxyprogesterone Acetate on Glucose, Apos; Insulin, Apos; Growth Hormone and Lipids.
6	changes in glucose insulin and growth hormone levels associated with bedrest	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the quality of the product.
6	binding of tritiated bovine parathyroid hormone to plasma membranes from bovine kidney cortex	Bovine parathyroid hormone tritiated to bovine renal cortical plasma membranes.
6	studies of binding of parathyroid hormone to a detergent dispersed preparation from bovine kidney cortex plasma membranes	L&apos binding studies; parathyroid hormone to detergent-dispersed preparation from plasma membranes of bovine renal cortex.
6	cushing s disease growth hormone response to hypoglycemia after correction of hypercortisolism	Cushing's growth hormone, hypoglycemia, hypoglycemia, and hypercortisolism.
6	relationships between thyrotropin growth hormone and insulin in hypothyroidism	Ratio of the ratio of thyrotropin growth hormone to the ratio of insulin in the apo; hypothyroidism.
6	growth hormone in exercise comparison of physiological and pharmacological stimuli	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
6	the effect of segmental epidural analgesia on maternal growth hormone insulin glucose and free fatty acids during labour	Effect of a segmental peridural analgesia on glucose insulin and free fatty acids, a working maternal growth hormone.
6	effects of fenfluramine and cyproheptadine on growth hormone secretion	Effect of fenfluramine and cyproheptadine on the secretion of fenfluramine; growth hormone.
6	serum insulin pancreatic glucagon and growth hormone levels in response to intravenous infusion of l arginine in patients with recently detected juvenile diabetes	Serum levels of apos; pancreatic insulin and dapos; growth hormone in response to intravenous infusion of apos; arginine in recently diagnosed juvenile diabetic patients.
6	secretion of growth hormone in the insulin test in various forms of diabetes	It's called insulin, and it's called insulin, and it's called insulin.
6	secretion of growth hormone in the insulin test and the development of diabetic microangiopathy	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
6	thyrotropin releasing hormone content of rat brain and hypothalamus results of endocrine and pharmacologic treatments	Rates of death; hormones released by thyrotropin in the brain and the liver; hypothalamus in the rat; endocrine and pharmacological treatment results.
6	prolactin and somatomedin studies in the syndrome of growth hormone independent growth	Studies of prolactin and somatomedin in l' growth-independent growth hormone.
6	luteinizing hormone responses to luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and growth hormone and cortisol responses to insulin induced hypoglycaemia in functional secondary amenorrhoea	The responses of the luteinizing hormone to apos; the release hormone of the apos; the luteinizing hormone and the responses of the growth hormone and cortisol to apos; insulin induced hypoglycemia in the apos; secondary functional amenorrhea.
6	sequential use of insulin and levodopa to provoke pituitary secretion of growth hormone	Sequential use of the insulin and levodopa to induce pituitary secretion of the growth hormone.
6	prolactin a diabetogenic hormone	Prolactin is a type of diabetic hormone.
6	altered growth hormone and prolactin responsiveness to trh in the infant rat	Modification of the response of growth hormone and prolactin to trh in novel @-@born rat.
6	suppression by thyrotropin releasing hormone trh of growth hormone release induced by arginine and insulin induced hypoglycemia in man	It is also known as the thyrotropin-releasing hormone, which suppresses the release of insulin-induced growth hormone, arginine-induced growth hormone, arginine-induced growth hormone, and hypoglycemic hormone.
6	growth hormone and somatomedin a in girls with adolescent idiopathic scoliosis	Growth hormone and somatomedin have in teenage idiopathic scoliosis girls.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion in a leukaemic girl with hypothalamic syndrome	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
6	secretion of human growth hormone and insulin in levodopa test during carbamazepine therapy	The secretion of insulin and d&apos, the human growth hormone in the test of levodopa during treatment with carbamazepine.
6	growth hormone deficiency after treatment of acute leukaemia in children	Anemia due to apo; acute leukemia treatment growth hormone in children.
6	evaluation of blood glucose insulin growth hormone and cortisol response in heroin addicts	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	interstitial gamma irradiation by 198au of the pituitary in diabetic retinopathy selective growth hormone blockade and ocular results	Interstitial 198au gamma radiation of the apos; apos pituitary; selective diabetic retinopathic growth hormone and ocular results.
6	growth hormone insulin and prolactin secretion in anorexia nervosa and obesity during bromocriptine treatment	Bromocriptine (Bromocriptine) is the most common form of bromocriptine, which can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent.
6	influence of prostaglandins and thyrotropin releasing hormone trh on hormone secretion and growth in wether lambs	L' thyrotropin-releasing prostaglandins influence; hormone trh hormonal secretion and growth in lambs.
6	luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and serum growth hormone in insulin dependent diabetes	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of diabetes.
6	effect of somatostatin on thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone and insulin responses to thyrotropin releasing hormone and arginine in healthy hypothyroid and acromegalic subjects	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/dhp-mps/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
6	pituitary and adrenal control of pancreatic endocrine function in the duck ii plasma free fatty acids aminoacids and insulin variations following hypophysectomy and replacement therapy with growth hormone and corticosterone	Pituitary and adrenal control of pancreatic endocrine function in plasma free amino acids and changes in l' insulin after hypophysectomy and alternative therapy with apos; growth hormone and corticosterone.
6	changes in plasma insulin and growth hormone after intravenous glucagon in hepatic cirrhosis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the development of the liver.
6	the effect of gonadotropin releasing hormone on blood glucose insulin luteinizing hormone and follicle stimulating hormone levels	The effects of the hormones; the hormone of release of the gonadotropins on the blood glucose L' luteinizing hormone of the apos; insulin and the levels of d' hormone folliculostimulant.
6	alterations in serum prolactin heterogeneity by provocative tests in a patient with a pituitary tumour	Journal of the American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition.
6	synthesis of a nonreducible cyclic analog of somatostatin having only growth hormone release inhibiting activity	Synthesis d' a non-reducible somatostatin cyclic analog whose only inhibitory activity is release of l' growth hormone.
6	correlation between plasma growth hormone and insulin and blood glucose concentrations in premature infants	The relationship between insulin and plasma growth hormone (PGH) and blood glucose levels in premature infants.
6	low cortisol and growth hormone secretion in response to methoxamine administration in obese subjects	Low levels of cortisol and d*apos secretion; growth hormone in response to apos; administration of methoxamine in obese subjects.
6	failure of luteinizing hormone releasing hormone and insulin to further augment thyrotrophin release in primary hypothyroidism	Insufficient insulin to increase further the release of thyrotrophin in the apos; luteinizing hormone; primary hypothyroidism.
6	metabolic and hormonal effects of post menopausal oestrogen replacement treatment i glucose insulin and human growth hormone levels during oral glucose tolerance tests	Metabolic and hormonal effects of estrogen replacement therapy post-menopausal i insulin glucose and glucose levels; human growth hormone during glucose tolerance testing by the oral route.
6	hypophysis and function of pancreatic islets iv effect of treatment with growth hormone and corticotrophin on insulin secretion and biosynthesis in isolated pancreatic islets of normal rats	L' pituitary and pancreatic islet function iv effect; treatment with apos; growth hormone and corticotropin on d&apos secretion and biosynthesis; insulin in isolated pancreatic islets from normal rats.
6	basal and stimulated serum growth hormone concentrations in inflammatory bowel disease	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of hormones, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
6	inhibition of dopamine induced release of growth hormone by thyrotropin releasing hormone	Dopamine inhibition induced the release of the growth hormone from the thyrotropin releasing hormone.
6	lack of effect of acid base alterations on growth hormone secretion in man	In addition, there is an increased risk of death due to the use of a combination of drugs.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion stimulated by intravenous administration of arginine in the low insulin responders prediabetes	Intravenous administration of apos; arginine in pre-diabetic individuals with a low insulin response stimulated the secretion of insulin and growth hormone.
6	new evidence for growth hormone modulation by the alpha adrenergic system in man	A new proof of the modulation of the growth hormone by the human alpha-adrenergic system.
6	variation of blood glucose and serum growth hormone prolactin and insulin in subjects with insulin dependent diabetes after ogtt and pretreatment with 2 br alpha ergocryptine	Change in glycemia and apos; serum prolactin and insulin growth hormone in insulin-dependent diabetics after ogtt and pretreatment with 2 br alpha ergocryptine.
6	comparison of the blood levels of insulin and growth hormone in healthy adolescents adolescents with excessive weight and with hereditary loading with regard to diabetes mellitus	The Canadian Diabetes Surveillance and Epidemiology Network (CHSN) is a multi-disciplinary, multi-disciplinary, multi-disciplinary, multi-disciplinary, multi-disciplinary, multi-disciplinary, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, multi-sectoral, and multi-sectoral.
6	release of growth hormone prolactin lh fsh and iri in serum through orally administered 1 proline in high dosage	A high dose of 1 proline is required for the release of the hormone, prolactin and iris into the serum.
6	hypothalamo pituitary adrenal function in pituitary adenoma and craniopharyngioma part ii insulin test and clinical features	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of hyperthyroidism.
6	tests for cataglykin activity on a cyanogen bromide fragment of human growth hormone	Tests are performed on a sample of cyanogen bromide from l'apos, a human growth hormone.
6	glucagon and growth hormone secretion in insulin treated diabetics effects of added sulfonylureas	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
6	transient diabetes mellitus in a neonate evaluation of insulin glucagon and growth hormone secretion and management with a continuous low dose insulin infusion	Diabetes mellitus transient in a neonatal evaluation of the secretion and management of: insulin glucagon and lacid; growth hormone with continuous infusion of d*apos; low-dose insulin.
6	growth hormone determination in a combined adenohypophyseal stimulation test author s transl	The determination of the growth hormone in a combined test of adenohypophysial stimulation was translated by the author.
6	reevaluation of levodopa propranolol as a test of growth hormone reserve in children	Levodopa propranolol re-evaluation as a growth hormone reserve test in children.
6	familial idiopathic haemochromatosis with diabetes study of glucagon and growth hormone secretions author s transl	Familial idiopathic hemochromatosis with diabetes glucagon and glucagon secretions; translative growth hormone.
6	content of growth hormone in the blood in insulin resistant and insulin sensitive patients with diabetes mellitus during compensation	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre.
6	stimulatory effect of glycine on human growth hormone secretion	Glycine stimulates the secretion of the human growth hormone.
6	effects of diet composition on serum levels of insulin thyroxine triiodothyronine growth hormone and corticosterone in rats	Effects of Diet Composition on Serum Dose Levels; Thyroxine Insulin Triiodothyronine Growth hormone and Corticosterone in Rats.
6	studies on proinsulin and problucagon biosynthesis and conversion at the subcellular level ii distribution of radioactive peptide hormones and hormone precursors in subcellular fractions after pulse and pulse chase incubation of islet tissue	Proinsulin and problucagon biosynthesis and subcellular conversion studies ii distribution of radioactive peptide hormones and apo precursors; subcellular fraction hormones after pulse incubation and pulse flushing of islet tissue.
6	inhibition by somatostatin growth hormone release inhibiting hormone gh rih of gastric acid and pepsin and g cell release of gastrin	Lapos; somatostatin inhibition of lipase release; growth hormone inhibitors of apos; gastric acid and pepsin; gastrin g-cell release.
6	effects of cns dopamine augmentation on stimulated prolactin secretion	Efficacy of dopamine; increase of dopamine cns on the stimulated secretion of prolactin.
6	insulin secretion in children with growth retardation	The secretion of insulin in stunted children.
6	serum growth hormone concentrations after growth hormone or thyrotropin releasing hormone in cows	Cocaine is a substance that has been found to be toxic to humans and to be carcinogenic to humans.
6	increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in exercising adult hamsters	An increase in the number and severity of chronic conditions such as heart disease, stroke, stroke, stroke, and stroke.
6	comparative studies of growth hormone secretion in acromegaly after isolated and combined application of insulin hypoglycemia lh rh and trh tests author s transl	Comparative studies of apo secretion; apo growth hormone; post-apo acromegaly; single and combined apo application; lyso insulin hypoglycemia and high test author.
6	effects of insulin human placental lactogen and human growth hormone of dna synthesis in organ cultures of benign human breast tumours	Effects of Insulin-Based Human Lactogen and Lactos; Human Growth Hormone on Lapos Synthesis; DNA in Cultures of Human Benign Tumor Organs.
6	differential effects of cranial radiation on growth hormone response to arginine and insulin infusion	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that the effects of brain radiation on the immune system are significant.
6	generation of somatomedin activity in response to growth hormone and insulin from isolated perfused livers of normal and protein malnourished rats	Production of somatomedin in response to growth hormone and insulin from normal and protein-fed, isolated, perfused livers.
6	a follow up study of vascular disease in growth hormone deficient dwarfs with diabetes	A vascular disease follow-up study in growth-promoting and diabetic dwarfs.
6	growth of a human breast cancer cell line in serum free hormone supplemented medium	Cervical cancer; a line of human breast cancer cells in a medium supplemented with serum hormones without serum.
6	glucagon secretion in rats bearing a growth hormone producing tumor mtt w 15	In addition, there is a growing body of knowledge about the effects of carbohydrate on the immune system.
6	insulin secretion from pancreatic islets effect of growth hormone and related proteins	The effect of glucose, a growth hormone and related proteins on the secretion of insulin from the pancreatic islets.
6	glucagon response to arginine in growth hormone deficient children before and after treatment with growth hormone and in children with non endocrine short stature	The Glucagon Response to Apos; Arginine in Growth Hormone Deficient Children Before and After Treatment with Growth Hormone and Small Non-Endocrine Children.
6	growth hormone response to hypoglycemia under gamma hydroxybutyrate narco analgesia in the rat	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/pubs/index_e.html.
6	development of hormone receptors and hormone responsiveness in vitro effect of prolonged insulin treatment on hexose uptake in 3t3 l1 adipocytes	Hormonal receptor development and in vitro hormonal reactivity of apo; long-term treatment with apo; insulin on apo uptake; hexose in adipose 3t3 cells.
6	insulin secretion in growth hormone deficient children and the effect of the sulfonylurea drug glibenclamide on linear growth	The effects of glibenclamide, a sulfonylurea-based drug, on the linear growth of children with growth hormone deficiency.
6	growth hormone modulation of arginine induced glucagon release studies of isolated growth hormone deficiency and acromegaly	In addition, there was no evidence of a significant increase in the incidence of diabetes mellitus in the general population.
6	pituitary responsiveness to thyrotropin releasing hormone in insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/index_e.html.
6	abnormalities in the regulation of growth hormone in chronic renal failure	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that contribute to the development of the disease.
6	hyperglycemic action of synthetic c terminal fragments of human growth hormone	Hyperglycemic action of the synthetic terminal c-fragments of the human growth hormone.
6	plasma glucose insulin glucagon and growth hormone in kindreds with maturity onset type of hyperglycemia in young people	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that insulin-induced hyperglycemia is a major risk factor for diabetes.
6	insulin binding and insulin sensitivity in isolated growth hormone deficiency	It is important to note that insulin is not an essential component of the immune system but an essential component of human health.
6	growth hormone prolactin and corticosteroid responses to insulin hypoglycaemia in alcoholics	L' prolactin growth hormone and corticosteroid responses to apos; insulin-induced hypoglycemia in alcoholics.
6	somatomedin activity in human cord plasma and relationship to birth size insulin growth hormone and prolactin	L' somatomedin activity in the plasma of the human umbilical cord and its relation to height at birth insulin growth hormone and prolactin.
6	transient suppression of growth hormone secretion after chronic ethanol intake	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
6	effect of dopaminergic blockade on the secretion of growth hormone and prolactin in man	Effect of dopaminergic blockade on human growth hormone and prolactin secretion.
6	inhibitory effect of calcitonin on growth hormone and insulin secretion in man	Inhibiting Effect of Calcitonin on Growth Hormone and Dapos Secretion; Insulin in Apos; Man.
6	growth hormone in patients with diabetes mellitus of the juvenile type	Growth Hormone in Juvenile Diabetes Mellitus Patients.
6	insulin and growth hormone secretion in dialyzed children influence of dietary manipulation	Food handling is influenced by the secretion of insulin and dapos; growth hormone in dialysis-treated children.
6	growth hormone response to prostaglandin e2	Prostaglandin Growth Hormone e.
6	abnormal growth hormone response in obesity with normal carbohydrate tolerance and normal thyroid function	An abnormal response of the liver; growth hormone; obesity with normal tolerance to carbohydrate and normal thyroid function.
6	effect of short submaximal stable load exertion on blood serum insulin and human growth hormone concentration as well as on various biochemical and acid base blood parameters in healthy individuals	Effect of a short, steady-state charge effort at-on the concentration of serum and serum insulin; human growth hormone; and on various blood parameters, biochemical and basic acids in healthy individuals.
6	growth hormone release inhibitory hormone like immunoreactivity in pancreas and gut in streptozotocin diabetes in the rat and response to insulin administration	Apos; inhibitory hormone of apo release; growth hormone such as apos; pancreatic and apos immune reactivity; rat intestine in streptozotocin diabetes and response; insulin administration.
6	chemical diabetes in childhood integrated concentrations of glucose insulin and growth hormone	Diabetes is a major cause of death among children, and is a major cause of death among children.
6	quantitative determination of the lateral diffusion coefficients of the hormone receptor complexes of insulin and epidermal growth factor on the plasma membrane of cultured fibroblasts	Quantitative determination of hormone receptor lateral diffusion coefficients of insulin and epidermal growth factor on cultured fibroblast plasma membranes.
6	the effect of alpha adrenergic receptor blockade on the glucagon induced growth hormone response	In addition, there was an increase in the amount of glucagon-induced blockade of alpha-adrenergic receptors on the response of glucagon-induced growth hormone.
6	plasma tsh and prolactin response to insulin induced hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disorders	Plasma tsh and prolactin in response to apos; insulin caused hypoglycemia in hypothalamic pituitary patients.
6	plasma lh fsh tsh prolactin and cortisol during a combined test of pituitary reserve in prepubertal subjects with short stature	Plasma prolactin and plasma cortisol lh fsh tsh during apos; a combined pituitary reserve test in small prepubescent subjects.
6	comparison of physiological and pharmacological tests of growth hormone function in children with short stature	Comparison of Physiological and Pharmacological Tests of Growth Hormone Function in Small Children.
6	renin growth hormone and insulin in hemodialyzed uremic diabetics	It can be used as an adjunct to the immune system, but not as an adjunct to the immune system.
6	antiserum to somatostatin reverses starvation induced inhibition of growth hormone but not insulin secretion	Somatostatin antiserum reverses apos; growth hormone, but not insulin, starvation-induced inhibition.
6	the effects of thyrotropin releasing hormone on the endocrine pancreas	Effects of thyrotropin-releasing hormone on endocrine pancreas.
6	modifications of insulin and growth hormone after medium chain triglycerides ingestion author s transl	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch Inspectorate.
6	dopamine affects basal and augmented pituitary hormone secretion	Dopamine affects increased basal pituitary hormone secretion.
6	the gastro entero pancreatic hormone secretion after a mixed meal in normal subjects before and after a 72 hour period of starvation	Gastro-entero-pancreatic d' mixed-meal hormones in normal subjects before and after 72 hours of fasting.
6	diurnal variation in the response of plasma prolactin cortisol and growth hormone to insulin induced hypoglycemia in normal men	The diurnal variation in plasma cortisol prolactin and insulin growth hormone – growth hormone response caused hypoglycemia in normal men.
6	role of glucagon catecholamines and growth hormone in human glucose counterregulation effects of somatostatin and combined alpha and beta adrenergic blockade on plasma glucose recovery and glucose flux rates after insulin induced hypoglycemia	The role of catecholamine glucagon and the growth hormone in the effects of anti--regulation of human glucose by somatostatin and the combined blockade of alpha- and beta-adrenergic receptors on the recovery of plasma glucose and the rates of glucose efflux after apo; hypoglycaemia induced by insulin.
6	glucagon secretion in subjects with prediabetes diabetes mellitus and obesity	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
6	normal growth despite abnormalities of growth hormone secretion in children treated for acute leukemia	Acute leukemia is the most common form of acute leukemia in children, and is the most common form of acute leukemia in children.
6	selective total removal of a growth hormone secreting adenoma evidence that acromegaly is a primary pituitary disease	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that acromegaly is a primary pituitary.
6	increased growth hormone response to dopamine infusion in insulin dependent diabetic subjects indication of possible blood brain barrier abnormality	An increase in the response of the growth hormone to dopamine infusion in diabetic insulin-dependent subjects, an indication of a possible abnormality of the blood barrier.
6	effect of alpha and beta receptor blockaders on the degree of glycemia growth hormone content of blood and catecholamine excretion in insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	Effect of alpha- and beta-receptor-blockaders on the level of glycemic hormone growth in blood and catecholamine excretion in insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
6	response of insulin glucagon and growth hormone to arginine infusion in patients with chronic renal failure	Glucagon insulin and lacid response; growth hormone infusion; arginine in patients with apo; chronic renal failure.
6	combined oral l dopa and propranolol for growth hormone provocation	Combination of propranolol and oral dopa for challenge by growth hormone.
6	effect of androgen on growth hormone secretion and growth in boys with short stature	Effect of androgen on the secretion of the growth hormone and growth hormone (GHG) in small boys.
6	effect of growth hormone on acute glucagon and insulin release	Acute release of glucagon and d*apos; insulin.
6	failure of naloxone to influence plasma growth hormone prolactin and cortisol secretions induced by insulin hypoglycemia	Naloxone does not affect insulin-induced prolactin and cortisol secretions; insulin hypoglycaemia.
6	familial combined hyperlipoproteinemia evidence for a role of growth hormone deficiency in effecting its manifestation	It's called hyperlipoproteinemia, and it's evidence of a role for growth hormone deficiency in the action of its manifestation.
6	effect of chlorpromazine on human growth hormone	The Effect of Chlorpromazine on Human Growth Hormone.
6	involvement of prostaglandins in the inhibition of growth hormone production in cultured pituitary cells by insulin	The use of prostaglandins to inhibit the production of the growth hormone; insulin in the cultured pituitary cells.
6	combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in growth retarded children treated with growth hormone ii secretion of lh fsh tsh prolactin and acth	Combined test of hypophysial hypothalamic function in children who have been delayed in growth by treatment with the growth hormone II prolactin secretion lh fsh tsh and d' acth.
6	combined test of hypothalamic pituitary function in growth retarded children treated with growth hormone i secretion of growth hormone and somatomedin before and after treatment	Combined hypothalamic pituitary function testing in children who have been stunted and treated with the growth hormone; growth hormone; pre- and post-treatment growth hormone; and somatomedin.
6	hormone responsiveness of a transplantable rat chondrosarcoma i in vitro effects of growth hormone dependent serum factors and insulin	Hormone reactivity; a rat chondrosarcoma that can be transplanted in vitro effects of serum factors that depend on glucose; growth hormone and insulin.
6	metabolic disorders in myocardial infarction changes in blood serum zinc growth hormone insulin and glucose concentration in patients with acute myocardial infarction	Myocardial infarction: metabolic disorders, changes in glucose levels and insulin; bloodborne zinc growth hormone in patients with diabetes; acute myocardial infarction.
6	phe4 somatostatin a potent selective inhibitor of growth hormone release	Somatostatin phe4 is a potent selective inhibitor of the release of the growth hormone.
6	human growth hormone hgh stimulation tests the sequential exercise and l dopa procedure	The sequential exercise and dopa procedure is tested by human growth hormone (HGH) stimulation.
6	serum glucocorticoids growth hormone and insulin and plasma glucose in bulls given prostaglandin e2 or f2 alpha 1	In addition, there is a need for additional information to assist in the assessment of risk factors.
6	effects of acetylsalicylic acid on blood glucose plasma ffa glycerol 3 hydroxybutyrate alanine c peptide glucagon and growth hormone responses to arginine in insulin dependent diabetics	Effects of l*apos; acetylsalicylic acid on plasma blood glucose, ffa glycerol 3, alanine hydroxybutyrate, and glucagon peptide; growth hormone, l*apos; arginine in insulin-dependent diabetics.
6	disturbed alpha adrenergic modulation of insulin and growth hormone secretion in chronic alcoholics	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
6	unchanged arginine induced stimulation of insulin glucagon growth hormone and prolactin after pretreatment with indomethacin in normal man	The unchanged arginine induces stimulation of apos; glucagon insulin, growth hormone, and prolactin after apos pretreatment; apos insulin indomethacin; normal man.
6	purification and characterization of multiplication stimulating activity insulin like growth factors purified from rat liver cell conditioned medium	Purification and characterization of the stimulatory activity of insulin as purified growth factors from conditioned medium of rat liver cells.
6	increased serum growth hormone and somatic growth in adult hamsters with hippocampal transections	Increase in the serum growth hormone and somatic growth of adult hamsters undergoing hippocampal transection.
6	blunted prolactin response to hypoglycemia in patients with hypothalamic pituitary disease and in subjects receiving estrogen	Mitigated prolactin response to apos; hypoglycemia in apos; hypothalamic pituitary and estrogen-treated patients.
6	somatomedin like activity prolactin growth hormone and insulin in human cord blood	Somatomédine as a prolactin growth hormone activity and insulin in the blood of human umbilical cord.
6	influence of acetylsalicylic acid on plasma glucose insulin glucagon and growth hormone levels following tolbutamide stimulation in man	In addition, there is an increased risk of infection due to the increased risk of heart disease and stroke, as well as the increased risk of heart disease.
6	the effect of three days of blood glucose normalization by means of an artificial endocrine pancreas on the concentrations of growth hormone glucagon and cortisol in juvenile diabetics	The effect of three days of blood glucose normalization using apos; an artificial endocrine pancreas on diabetic children's blood glucose levels; glucagon growth hormone and cortisol.
6	the role of growth hormone in the glucose intolerance of uremia	Role of the growth hormone in glucose intolerance; uremia.
6	cohn fraction vi enhances the growth stimulating effect of multiplication stimulating activity msa on chick embryo fibroblasts in culture	The cohn vi fraction increases apo, stimulates apo growth, multiplies on apo fibroblasts, and cultured chick embryos.
6	metoclopramide stimulation a test of growth hormone reserve in adolescent males	Metoclopramide stimulates stroke reserve test; growth hormone in male adolescents.
6	diurnal profiles of serum insulin c peptide and blood intermediary metabolites in insulin treated diabetics their relationship to the control of diabetes and the role of endogenous insulin secretion	Diurnal patterns of serum insulin and blood-mediated metabolite c-peptide in insulin-treated diabetics are linked to diabetes control and the role of insulin secretion.
6	bromocriptine acute effect on insulin glucagon and growth hormone levels in acromegalic patients	Acute effect of bromocriptine on glucagon and dapos insulin levels; growth hormone in acromegalic patients.
6	effect of the somatostatin analog d trp8 d cys14 on glucose insulin pancreatic glucagon and growth hormone plasma levels in acromegalics and mild diabetics	The effect of glucose, insulin, pancreatic glucagon, and plasma levels of apos; growth hormone in acromegalic and mild diabetics; the effect of glucose, insulin, pancreatic glucagon and plasma levels of apos; growth hormone in acromegalic and mild diabetics.
6	induction of tyrosine aminotransferase and amino acid transport in rat hepatoma cells by insulin and the insulin like growth factor multiplication stimulating activity mediation by insulin and multiplication stimulating activity receptors	Tyrosine aminotransferase induction and transport of apo; amino acids in apo cells; rat liver by apo; insulin and apo; insulin such as multiplication of the growth-promoting factor; activity mediated by apo; insulin and stimulating multiplication; stimulatory receptor activity of apo; activity by apo; insulin.
6	roles of prolactin growth hormone insulin and thyroxine in steroid induced lactation in goats	The roles of l' insulin, the growth hormone of prolactin, and thyroxine in the steroids induce lactation in goats.
6	somatomedin activity and growth hormone secretion i changes related to body weight in anorexia nervosa	Growth hormone, body weight-related changes in appetite; nerve anorexia.
6	influence of the insulin to growth hormone ratio on body composition of mice	Body composition of mice influenced by insulin/growth hormone ratio.
6	endocrine control of energy metabolism in the cow the effect on milk yield and levels of some blood constituents of injecting growth hormone and growth hormone fragments	Endocrine control of the energy metabolism in the cow; effect on the yield of milk and the levels of certain blood components of the apo; growth hormone; injection and d*apos fragments; growth hormone.
6	evaluation of twenty four hour secretory patterns of growth hormone and insulin in patients with myotonic dystrophy	In addition, it is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of myotonic dystrophy in Canada.
6	persistent defect in regulation of prolactin secretion after successful pituitary tumor removal in women with the galactorrhea amenorrhea syndrome	Persistent abnormality in the regulation of post-apos prolactin secretion; successful removal of apos; a pituitary tumour in women with d*apos syndrome; amenorrhea galactorhea.
6	vagal function in relation to gastro oesophageal reflux and associated motility changes	Vagal function in relation to gastric reflux-esophageal and motility changes.
6	growth hormone and insulin binding to isolated hepatocytes in the genetically dwarf mouse	In addition, there is an increased risk of liver damage due to the use of the drug.
6	effect of ouabain on the lactogenic action of prolactin and on the level of mammary prolactin receptors	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of prostate cancer.
6	glucose tolerance growth hormone and somatomedin levels in osteosarcoma patients	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of diabetes mellitus.
6	the influence of supervision and endogenous insulin secretion on the course of insulin dependent diabetes mellitus	In addition, the Canadian Diabetes Association (CDA) has been working with the Canadian Diabetes Association (CDA) to develop a national strategy for diabetes mellitus.
6	insulin permits parathyroid hormone stimulation of 1 25 dihydroxyvitamin d3 production in cultured kidney cells	L' insulin allows stimulation by the apos, parathyroid hormone, of the production of 125 dihydroxyvitamin d3 in cultured kidney cells.
6	effects of exogenous insulin glucagon and somatostatin on islet hormone secretion in the perfused chicken pancreas	Effects of Exogenous Glucagon Insulin and Somatostatin on Hormonal Islet Secretion in the Perfused Chicken Pancreas.
6	effect of hydrocortisone on acth growth hormone insulin and glucose in the blood of bilaterally adrenalectomized patients	Effect of apos; hydrocortisone on apos; insulin and glucose of apos; acthic growth hormone in blood of patients adrenalectomized bilaterally.
6	plasma somatomedins endogenous insulin secretion and growth in transient neonatal diabetes mellitus	In addition, there is an increased risk of diabetes mellitus, which can lead to increased risk of diabetes mellitus.
6	prolactin growth hormone thyrotropin 3 5 3 triiodothyronine and thyroxine responses to exercise after fat and carbohydrate enriched diet	L' thyrotropin prolactin growth hormone, 3rd triiodothyronine and thyroxine, reacts to apos; exercise after a fat- and carbohydrate-enriched diet.
6	integrated concentration of growth hormone in juvenile onset diabetes	Injury is a serious and life-threatening illness.
6	the influence of bromocriptine on serum levels of growth hormone and other pituitary hormones and its metabolic effects in active acromegaly	Bromocriptine can be used as a therapeutic agent, but can also be used as a therapeutic agent in combination with other therapeutic agents.
7	a study of inflation of the lungs of the newborn a preliminary report	A study of the new-lung inflation is a preliminary report.
7	x ray survey results and costs a health officer s viewpoint a preliminary report	X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X X.
7	mechanism of production of pulmonary lesions in mice by newcastle disease virus ndv	Mechanisms of mouse lung lesion production by Newcastle disease virus ndv.
7	indications for pulmonary resection in infants and children	Infant and child respiratory resection indications.
7	newer concepts of anatomy of the lungs advantages to surgeons internists bronchoscopist and radiologists	New pulmonary anatomy concepts benefit international bronchoscopic and radiological surgeons.
7	antibiotic therapy of abscess of the lung and bronchiectasis	Pulmonary abscess and bronchiectasis.
7	the management abscess of the lung	L-apos; pulmonary control abscess.
7	conservation of tissue and function in pulmonary resection the technique of the anatomical separation of segments	Tissue retention and function in lung resection the anatomical segment separation technique.
7	formation of non infectious influenza virus in mouse lungs its dependence upon extensive pulmonary consolidation initiated by the viral inoculum	Noninfectious influenza virus formation in mouse lungs is dependent on viral inoculum initiated lung consolidation.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung some remarks regarding the fine structure of the alveolar basement membrane	L' ultrastructure of the mouse lung a few remarks concerning the alveolar basement membrane fine structure.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung general architecture of capillary and alveolar walls	Lapos; apos ultrastructure; general capillary and alveolar wall architecture of mouse lung.
7	partial pressure of ammonia in alveolar air	The temperature of the air shall be the same as that of the air.
7	ammonia excretion by mammalian lung	L' d&apos excretion; ammonia from the lungs of mammals.
7	the ultrastructure of mouse lung the alveolar macrophage	Mouse lung ultrastructure alveolar macrophage.
7	oxygen consumption of tissues in the human lung	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
7	pulmonary nodular granulomatosis caused by inhaled vegetable particles	Pulmonary nodular mucosal granulomatosis; plant particle inhalation.
7	effect of dopamine on the isolated perfused lung lobes of the dog	Dopamine Effect on Isolated Perfused Lung Lobe.
7	alveolar epithelial cell mitochondria as source of the surface active lung lining	Mitochondria of alveolar epithelial cells are located at the origin of the active surface of the lung wall.
7	architecture of the human lung use of quantitative methods establishes fundamental relations between size and number of lung structures	The study of the human lungs establishes fundamental relationships between the size and the number of lung structures.
7	antibiotic control of tissue reactions in dogs vaccinated with viable cells of coccidioides immitis	Tissue-responsive antibiotics in vaccinated dogs with viable coccidioid immitis cells.
7	clearance of bacteria by the lower respiratory tract	Lower respiratory clearance of bacteria.
7	detection and quantitation of fallout particles in a human lung	Detection and quantification of the particles of fallout in a human lung.
7	brige formation and cytoplasmic flow between phagocytic cells	The formation of flanges and the cytoplasmic flux between the phagocytic cells.
7	the coefficient of thermal conductivity of blood and of various tissues	Thermal conductivity coefficient for blood and various tissues.
7	laminated membrane surface and osmiophilic inclusions in avian lung epithelium	Laminated surface membrane and osmiophilic inclusion in the avian lung epithelium.
7	the role of the alveolar macrophage in the clearance of bacteria from the lung	The role of alveolar macrophages in the removal of lung bacteria.
7	therapy of chlorpromazine melanosis a preliminary report	Melanosis Chlorpromazine treatment, preliminary report.
7	anatomoclinical study of pulmonary embolism in patients with or without pulmonary infarction	Anatomoclinic study of lung embolism in infarct and non-infarct patients.
7	fatty acid synthesis by subcellular fractions of lung tissue	The synthesis of fatty acids by lung tissue subcellular fractions.
7	pulmonary alveolar cell inclusions their development in the rat	The inclusion of pulmonary alveolar cells develops in the rat.
7	granular pneumocytes electron microscopic evidence of their exocrinic function	Electron-microscopic evidence of exocrine function.
7	bronchoconstrictor action and antagonism of a slow reacting substance from anaphylaxis of guinea pig isolated lung	Bronchoconstrictor action and dapos antagonism, a slow-reacting substance produced by the respiratory tract; anaphylaxis of isolated guinea pig lungs.
7	distribution of polonium 210 in pulmonary tissues of cigarette smokers	Distribution of polonium-210 in the lung tissue of cigarette smokers.
7	a comparison of the specificity of inhibition by phosphonate esters of the first component of complement and the antigen induced release of histamine from guinea pig lung	Comparison of specificity of phosphonate esters to the primary complement and antigen component induced release of guinea-pig lung histamine.
7	nonspecific factors in resistance of mice to experimental tuberculosis	Non-Specific Factors for Mouse Resistance to Experimental Tuberculosis.
7	submaxillary gland of mouse effects of a fraction on tissues of mesodermal origin in vitro	In vivo studies have shown that a small fraction of the tissue from the mouse gland is of a mesodermal origin.
7	a morphometric study on the thickness of the pulmonary air blood barrier	Morphometric study on apos; thickness of pulmonary blood barrier; air.
7	lung surfactants counterions and hysteresis	Anti-microfluidic acid (MFA) and anti-microfluidic acid (MFA) products.
7	fatty change of the granular pneumocyte	Granular pneumocyte fat change.
7	mechanisms of immunologic injury of rat peritoneal mast cells i the effect of phosphonate inhibitors on the homocytotropic antibody mediated histamine release and the first component of rat complement	The mechanisms of immunological injury to peritoneal rat mast cells i' effect of phosphonate inhibitors on apos; homocytotropic antibody mediated release of apos; histamine and the primary component of rat complement.
7	enhanced growth of human embryonic cells infected with adenovirus 12	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the case.
7	growth of myxovirus parainfluenza type 3 in organ cultures of guinea pig tissue	Type 3 parainfluenza myxovirus growth in guinea pig tissue organ cultures.
7	rapid quantitative measurement of lung tissue phospholipids	Rapid Quantitative Measurement of Pulmonary Tissue Phospholipids.
7	studies of lung metabolism i isolation and properties of subcellular fractions from rabbit lung	Studies of Pulmonary Metabolism i Isolation and Properties of Subcellular Rabbit Lung Fraction.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice i pathogenicity of mycoplasma pneumoniae mycoplasma salivarium and mycoplasma pulmonis for the lungs of conventional and gnotobiotic mice	Mycoplasma pneumonia in gnotobiotic mice i pathogenicity of mycoplasma pneumoniae mycoplasma salivarium and pulmonary mycoplasma in lungs from both gnotobiotic and conventional mice.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice ii localization of mycoplasma pulmonis in the lungs of infected gnotobiotic mice by electron microscopy	Mycoplasma Pneumonia in Gnotobiotic Mice ii Localization of pulmonary mycoplasma in the lungs of electron-microscopically infected gnotobiotic mice.
7	factors influencing protection against experimental tuberculosis in mice by heat stable cell wall vaccines	Influence experimental mouse TB protection with heat-stable cell wall vaccines.
7	studies on cytotropism in animal viruses 3 growth of influenza virus in epithelial like and fibroblastic cells derived from chick embryo lung	Cytotropy Studies in Animal Viruses 3 growth of influenza virus in similar epithelial cells and fibroblast-derived lung chicken embryos.
7	antibodies involved in antigen induced release of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis srs a in the guinea pig and rat	Antibodies involved in the antigen elicited release of the slow-reacting substance from rat and guinea pigs.
7	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide glycohydrolase activity in experimental tuberculosis	L' activity of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide glycohydrolase in experimental tuberculosis.
7	lung tissue resistance in diffuse interstitial pulmonary fibrosis	Resistance of pulmonary tissue in the interstitial pulmonary fibrosis (IVLF) is diffuse.
7	standardization of cardiopulmonary roentgenograms in infants and children	Cardiopulmonary roentgenograms are standardized in infants and children.
7	strain of mycoplasma associated with human reproductive failure	The mycoplasma strain associated with the apos; failure of human reproduction.
7	release of kallikrein from guinea pig lung during anaphylaxis	Guinea-pig lung kallikrein release during apos; anaphylaxis.
7	the protein coating of asbestos bodies	Body protein coating; asbestos.
7	further studies of the mechanism of passive sensitization	Further studies of the passive sensitization mechanism have been carried out.
7	experimental transmission of a murine microsporidian in swiss mice	Mouse microsporidy in Swiss mice.
7	the effects of ventilation of dogs with different gas mixtures on airway calibre and lung mechanics	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	simulation of respiratory mechanics	Respiratory mechanics simulation.
7	correlations of mechanical stability morphology pulmonary surfactant and phospholipid content in the developing lamb lung	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	study of the use of lincomycin aerosols in dogs	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Ottawa, Ontario.
7	the application of starling s law of capillary exchange to the lungs	Apos law enforcement; capillary exchange to apos lungs; starling.
7	lead 210 and polonium 210 in tissues of cigarette smokers	Cigarette smoking 210 and 210 polonium in fabric.
7	patterns of anomalous pulmonary venous drainage	Anomalous venous drainage patterns in the lungs.
7	the ultrastructural basis of alveolar capillary membrane permeability to peroxidase used as a tracer	The ultrastructural basis of permeability of the alveolar capillary membranes to peroxidase was used as a tracer.
7	surface tension metabolic activity and lipid composition of alveolar cells in washings from normal dog lungs and after pulmonary artery ligation importance of a highly surface active acellular layer	Metabolic activity of surface tension and lipid composition of alveolar cells in normal canine lung lavages and after ligation of the l' pulmonary artery important d' acellular layer highly active of the surface.
7	polonium 210 removal from smoke by resin filters	Removal of Polonium 210 from Smoke by Resin Filters.
7	effect of pulmonary blood flow upon lung mechanics	Pulmonary blood flow affects lung mechanics.
7	lipoperoxidation of lung lipids in rats exposed to nitrogen dioxide	Pulmonary lipid lipids Lipoperoxidation in Dapos-exposed rats; nitrogen.
7	the reflex effects of alterations in lung volume on systemic vascular resistance in the dog	Reflex effects of pulmonary volume alterations on dog systemic vascular resistance.
7	frequency dependence of flow resistance in patients with obstructive lung disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the outcome of the disease.
7	chemodectoma of lung	Chimodectoma lung.
7	histopathology of fatal adenovirus infection of the respiratory tract in young children	In addition, the Canadian Paediatric Surveillance System (CPSS) is a national surveillance system for paediatric infections.
7	asbestos bodies in lungs at necropsy	Necropsy is a major cause of lung cancer.
7	metabolism of lysophosphatidyl ethanolamine and lysophosphatidyl choline by homogenates of rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes and alveolar macrophages	Lysophosphatidyl ethanolamine and lysophosphatidyl choline metabolism by rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocyte homogenates and alveolar macrophages.
7	vascular lesions of dirofilaria immitis in the red fox	Dirofilary vascular lesion in red fox.
7	the response of foetal sheep and lambs to pulmonary inflation	Lambs' and fetal sheep's response to lung inflation.
7	pulmonary vasoconstriction in asphyxia during cross circulation between twin foetal lambs	Pulmonary vasoconstriction in the apos; asphyxiation during cross-circulation between fetal lambs.
7	effects of gestation and prenatal asphyxia on pulmonary surface properties of the foetal rabbit	Effects of pregnancy and prenatal asphyxiation on rabbit fetal surface lung properties.
7	pulmonary vasoconstriction and changes in heart rate during asphyxia in immature foetal lambs	Lung vasoconstriction and heart rate changes during asphyxiation in immature fetal lambs.
7	development of fine structural damage to alveolar and capillary lining cells in oxygen poisoned rat lungs	The development of fine structural damage to the alveolar and capillary cells in the lungs of rats poisoned with oxygen.
7	biosynthesis of phosphatidyl choline during prenatal development of the rat lung	Phosphatidyl choline biosynthesis during rat lung prenatal development.
7	the fate of 7 14c methylguanine after administration to the rat	The fate of methylguanine 7-14c after rat administration.
7	pneumonia due to mycoplasma in gnotobiotic mice 3 lesions in the lungs of gnotobiotic mice after multiple intranasal inoculations of broth cultures of mycoplasma pneumoniae	Mycoplasma Pneumonia in Gnotobiotic mice 3 lesions in lungs of gnotobiotic mice following multiple intranasal inoculations of mycoplasma pneumoniae broth cultures.
7	longitudinal distribution of vascular resistance in the pulmonary arteries capillaries and veins	Longitudinal Distribution of Vascular Resistance in Pulmonary Artery Capillaries and Veins.
7	differential reactivity in the pulmonary circulation	Differential pulmonary reactivity.
7	production of interferon in mice effect of altered gaseous environments	Interferon production in mice results from alterations in the gaseous environment.
7	phagocytosis of inhaled plutonium oxide 239pu particles by pulmonary macrophages	Phagocytosis of dust particles; Plutonium oxide 239pu. inhaled by lung macrophages.
7	pulmonary venous vasculature in neonatal hyaline membrane disease	Acute and chronic toxicity of chloroform to rats and rats.
7	autoimmune glomerulonephritis induced in sheep by injections of human lung and freund s adjuvant	Glomerulonephritis auto-immune induced by Freund adjuvant and human lung injections in sheep.
7	further studies on the histidine histamine relationship in vivo effects of endotoxin and of histidine decarboxylase inhibitors	D' other in vivo histidine histamine studies of the effects of apos; endotoxin and apos inhibitors; histidine decarboxylase.
7	pathogenicity and neurological effects of oidiodendron kalrai for mice	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
7	acute granulomatous response produced in mice by trehalose 6 6 dimycolate	Acute mouse granulomatous response to trehalose 6 dimycolate 6 dimycolate.
7	immunopathology of lymphocytic choriomeningitis viurs infection of newborn mice antithymocyte serum effects on glomerulonephritis and wasting disease	Antimicrobial Resistance to Chlamydia trachomatis pneumoniae in the United States: a prospective study.
7	goblet cell increase in rat bronchial epithelium after exposure to cigarette and cigar tobacco smoke	An increase in the caliciform cells of the rat; bronchial epithelium of the rat after exposure to cigarette smoke and cigar smoke.
7	correlation between lung asbestos count at necropsy and radiological appearances	The results of this study are consistent with those of the previous study.
7	growth and intracellular development of a new respiratory virus	Growth and Intracellular Development of Dapos; a novel respiratory virus.
7	morphogenesis of avian infectious bronchitis virus and a related human virus strain 229e	In addition, there is a risk of transmission of the virus through the respiratory tract.
7	thymidine kinase from normal simian virus 40 transformed and simian virus 40 lytically infected cells	The normal virus 40 thymidine kinase transformed and the simian virus 40 lytically infected the cells.
7	new assay procedure for separation of mycoplasmas from virus pools and tissue culture systems	New method for the separation of viral-pool and tissue-culture system mycoplasmas.
7	morphological and lipid analysis of the alveolar lining material in dog lung	Lipid and morphological analysis of alveolar coating material in dog lungs.
7	blow of the pilot whale	Whale pilot blast.
7	enzymes of the lung i detection of esterase with a new cytochemical method	Detection of apos; esterase by lung enzymes at baseline; assistance from a novel cytochemical method.
7	characteristics and lipid requirements of coagulant proteins extracted from lung and brain the specifity of protein component of tissue factor	Lipid characteristics and requirements of clotting proteins extracted from the lungs and brain specificity of the protein component of the tissue factor.
7	role of pasteurella pneumotropica and mycoplasma pulmonis in murine pneumonia	Role of pasteurella pneumotropica and pulmonis mycoplasma in the murine pneumonia.
7	fluorescent cell counting as an assay method for respiratory syncytial virus	The use of fluorescent cell counts as a method of detection; analysis of respiratory syncytial virus.
7	frequency dependence of compliance as a test for obstruction in the small airways	It is important to note that there is a need for more detailed information on air quality.
7	maximum expiratory flow rates in induced bronchoconstriction in man	Expiratory flow rate is the rate at which a person reaches the end of their life span.
7	detection of allergy to penicillin and other antigens by in vitro passive sensitization and histamine release from human and monkey lung	Detection of apos; penicillin and dapos allergy; other antigens by passive in vitro sensitization and release of apos; histamine in human and monkey lungs.
7	the determination of total body exchangeable o2 stores	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case in the United States.
7	paraquat poisoning lung transplantation	Lung transplant is poisoned by paraquat.
7	cytomegalic inclusion disease in the adult	Cytomegal inclusion in adults.
7	alveolar macrophages reduced number in rats after prolonged inhalation of lead sesquioxide	Alveolar macrophages decreased in rats following prolonged lead sesquioxide inhalation.
7	experimental carcinogenesis of the lung ii influence of phenols in the production of carcinoma	Experimental lung carcinogenesis ii influences phenolics in carcinoma production.
7	receptors sensitive to carbon dioxide in lungs of chicken	Carbon dioxide sensitive receptors in chicken lungs.
7	experimental adenovirus infection in calves	Experimental calf adenovirus infection.
7	enhanced virus transformation of hamster embryo cells in vitro	Increased viral transformation of the embryonic cells of the hamster in vitro.
7	elastic properties of the centrilobular emphysematous space	Elastic properties; emphysemous centrolobular space.
7	the resistance of collateral channels in excised human lungs	Collateral channel resistance in human lungs excised.
7	reflex cardiovascular depression produced by stimulation of pulmonary stretch receptors in the dog	Reflex cardiovascular depression caused by dapo receptor stimulation; canine pulmonary stretch.
7	ventilatory mechanics and expiratory flow limitation during exercise in normal subjects	Expiratory flow limitation and ventilatory mechanisms during the course of exercise in normal subjects.
7	mitotic and nonmitotic multiple layered perfusion cultures	Mitotic, not-mitotic, multi-layered infusion cultures.
7	cardiovascular responses in apnoeic asphyxia role of arterial chemoreceptors and the modification of their effects by a pulmonary vagal inflation reflex	Cardiovascular responses in the role of apneic asphyxia of arterial chemoreceptors and their effects on vascular function; pulmonary vagal inflation.
7	traube hering waves in the pulmonary circulation of the dog	Traube hering waves... in the dog's pulmonary circulation.
7	effects of nitrogen dioxide on pulmonary cell population	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	the activity of lung irritant receptors during pneumothorax hyperpnoea and pulmonary vascular congestion	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
7	reaction of urethane with nucleic acids in vivo	Reaction of urethane with the nucleic acids in vivo.
7	morphogenetic aspects of multilayering in petri dish cultures of human fetal lung fibroblasts	Morphogenetic aspects of the multilayer in human fetal pulmonary fibroblast (fetal) petri dish cultures.
7	cell killing by actinomycin d in relation to the growth cycle of chinese hamster cells	D-cell actinomycin destruction in relation to the Chinese hamster cell growth cycle.
7	natural resolution of air sac lesions caused by mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys	Natural resolution of mycoplasma meleagridis air-sack lesions in turkeys.
7	pneumonic pasteurellosis of cattle microbiology and immunology	Pneumonic Pulp and Paper Disease of Microbiology and Disease; Livestock Immunology.
7	a study of bovine virus diarrhea mucosal disease virus by plaque technique	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	effects of beta adrenergic receptor blockade on airway conductance and lung volume in normal and asthmatic subjects	Effects of beta-adrenergic receptor blockade on lung volume and respiratory conductance in normal and asthmatic subjects.
7	pulmonary complications of oxygen therapy	Oxygen therapy.
7	in vivo inactivation of lysozyme by ozone	In vivo lysozyme inactivation by ozone.
7	effect of long term administration of ay 9944 an inhibitor of 7 dehydrocholesterol delta 7 reductase on serum and tissue lipids in the rat	Effect of dehydrocholesterol delta 7 reductase; long-term administration of dehydrocholesterol to rat tissue and serum lipids.
7	role of the kidney in staphylococcal enterotoxemia	Kidney Role in Disease; Staphylococcal Enterotoxemia.
7	immunofluorescence identification of thermopolyspora polyspora the causative agent of farmer s lung	Identification by immunofluorescence of the thermopolyspora polyspora, l' causative agent of the lung of the apos; farmer.
7	elimination of sodium 24 and potassium 42 interferences in activation analysis of biological samples	It is important to note that there is no need for a biological sample to be taken at the time of analysis.
7	the effect of vagotomy vagal cooling and efferent vagal stimulation on breathing and lung mechanics of rabbits	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
7	the role of the vagus nerves in the respiratory and circulatory responses to intravenous histamine and phenyl diguanide in rabbits	The role of vagus nerves in respiratory and circulatory responses to intravenous phenyl diguanide and histamine in rabbits.
7	pathological changes in virus infections of the lower respiratory tract in children	Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infections Infections 1.
7	5 hydroxytryptamine a cytospecific growth stimulator of cultured fibroblasts	Five hydroxytryptamine, a growth promoter for cultured fibroblasts.
7	changes in blood gas tensions and functional residual capacity chronic asthmatics treated with disodium cromoglycate	Changes in Blood Pressure and Residual Functional Capacity in Chronic Asthmatics Treated with Disodium Cromoglycate.
7	characterization of human anti glomerular basement membrane antibodies eluted from glomerulonephritic kidneys	Characterization of eluted human basal membrane antibody-glomerular from glomerulonephritic kidneys.
7	pulsatile uptake of co in the human lung	Pulse uptake of human lung co-activity.
7	elimination of toxicity from polyvinyl trays after sterilization with ethylene oxide	"For the purposes of this document, the term ""polyvinyl tray"" means a polyvinyl tray used to describe a polyvinyl tray."
7	adaptation of a roller tube apparatus to accommodate cultivation of cells in roller bottles	Adaptation of a roll tube apparatus for cell culture in roller flasks.
7	evidence for excision of ultraviolet induced pyrimidine dimers from the dna of human cells in vitro	Apos; apos-induced pyrimidine dimer excision; ultraviolet was detected in apos; human cell DNA in vitro.
7	a microsurgical methodology for human cells in vitro evolution and applications	A MicroSurgical Methodology for the Evolution and Applications of In Vitro Human Cells.
7	mechanisms of histamine release by compound 48 80	It is not possible to predict the effects of the drug on the patient.
7	cell surface coatings and membrane potentials of malignant and nonmalignant cells	Cell surface coatings and potential membrane coatings for both non-malignant and malignant cells.
7	pulmonary surfactant and evolution of the lungs	Surfactant pulmonary and lung evolution.
7	permeability of lung capillaries to macromolecules in foetal and new born lambs and sheep	Pulmonary capillary macromolecules permeability in newborn and fetal lambs and sheep.
7	x ray sensitivity of synchronized chinese hamster cells irradiated during hypoxia	X radiosensitivity of irradiated synchronized Chinese hamster cells during apo; hypoxia.
7	growth of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus in human diploid cell strain wi 38	In addition, there is a growing body of knowledge about the disease and its impact on public health.
7	cholelithiasis in singapore i a necropsy study	Cholelithiasis is a disease of the nervous system.
7	emphysema in coal workers pneumoconiosis	Emphysema among pneumoconiosis pneumoconiosis workers.
7	granuloma formation induced in mice by chemically defined mycobacterial fractions	Chemically defined mycobacterial fractions induced granuloma formation in mice.
7	alterations in the mechanical properties of the lung during dyspnea in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease	Changes in dyspnea mechanical properties of lung in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	acute effects of inhaled isoproterenol on the mechanical characteristics of the lungs in normal man	Acute Effects of Inhaled Isoproterenol on Mechanical Characteristics of Lungs in Normal Man.
7	house dust mite asthma results of challenge tests on five criteria with dermatophagoides pteronyssinus	Dermatophagoides pteronyssinus asthma caused by dust mites, results of five-criteria challenge tests.
7	serum reagins and leucocyte response in patients with house dust mite allergy	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	the effect of isoproterenol on airway obstruction in cystic fibrosis	Lapos; effect of apos; isoproterenol on apos; airway obstruction in the cystic fibrosis.
7	human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus i conversion from polio sensitivity to polio resistance accompanying loss of human gene dependent polio receptors	Human mouse cell lines and susceptibility to poliovirus conversion from susceptibility to polio to resistance to polio accompanying loss of human gene-dependent polio receptors.
7	human mouse hybrid cell lines and susceptibility to polio virus ii polio sensitivity and the chromosome constitution of the hybrids	Cell lines from human mouse hybrids and susceptibility to poliovirus ii Polio sensitivity and chromosome constitution of hybrids.
7	adsorption of foot and mouth disease virus by muscle kidney lung and brain from infant and adult mice	Adsorption of FMD virus by the Muscle Lung and Brain of mouse kidney new-born and adult.
7	replication of repetitious dna and the s period	Reproduction of DNA; repetitive and temporal DNA.
7	capsid mosaics of intermediate strains of human adenoviruses	It can be used as an antigen or as an antigen.
7	bronchograms and tracheograms of seals under pressure	Bronchograms and pressure seal tracheograms.
7	pulmonary absorption and retention of kanamycin after repeated inhalation administration of kanamycin aerosol	In addition to the above, it is recommended that patients be treated with the same dose of kanamycin.
7	chikungunya virus infection of cell monolayers by cell to cell and extracellular transmission	Infection of monolayers with chikungunya virus by both intracellular and extracellular transmission.
7	relative sensitivities of viruses to different species of interferon	It is important to keep in mind that there is a need for more information.
7	desmosterol as the major sterol in l cell mouse fibroblasts grown in sterol free culture medium	Desmosterol is the major sterol in mouse cell fibroblasts cultured in sterol-free culture medium.
7	separation by gel chromatography of naturally occurring phosphatidylcholine mixtures according to number of ethylenic linkages	Gel chromatographic separation of natural mixtures of phosphatidylcholine by ethylene bond number.
7	direct assessment of viral aerosols on cell cultures	Direct evaluation of cell culture viral aerosols.
7	congenital absence of the pulmonary valve	Lung valve failure.
7	enhancement of inflammation and histamine formation by actinomycin d	Stimulation of the immune system; inflammation and formation of apos; histamine by apos; actinomycin d.
7	histamine formation in rat gastric mucosa and lung after injecting reserpine or adrenaline	The formation of histamine in the mucosa of the stomach and lungs of the rat after the initial injection of reserpine or d' adrenaline.
7	comparison of transformation and t antigen induction in human cell lines	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
7	detection of postoperative bronchopleural fistulas by radionuclide fog inhalation	Post-operative bronchopleural fistula detection by inhalation of radionuclide fog.
7	acromegalic pneumonomegaly lung growth in the adult	Amegal pneumonome, adult lung growth.
7	ascaris suum infection in calves i clinical signs	Ascaris suum infection in calves.
7	ascaris suum infection in calves 3 pathology	Ascaris suum calf infection 3 pathology.
7	gamma irradiated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccines	Venezuelan equine gamma-irradiated vaccine; encephalitis.
7	identification of mineral particles in pneumoconiotic lungs	Pneumoconiotic lung mineral particle identification.
7	shock lung	Shocker.
7	antibody production in milk serum after virus instillation of goat mammary gland iv experiments with protective properties of specific influenza antibody associated with lactogammaglobulin	Milk serum antibody production after goat mammary gland viral instillation experiments with specific anti-influenza antibodies associated with lactogammaglobulin.
7	studies with the light microscope and electron microscope of lung macrophages in rabbits inoculated with an attenuated stain of mycobacterium microti	Lung macrophages from inoculated rabbits with attenuated microti mycobacteria staining were studied by light and electron microscopy.
7	effect of poly i c on experimental respiratory infection in hamsters	Experimental respiratory infection in hamsters.
7	experience with electron microscopy in the differential diagnosis of smallpox	Smallpox Differential Diagnosis Electron Microscopy Experience.
7	comparison of various methods for preparation of viral serological antigens from infected cell cultures	Comparison of various viral antigens preparation methods from infected cell cultures.
7	comparison of the pulmonary bactericidal capacity of mice and rats aganist strains of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Comparison of pulmonary bactericidal capacity of Pseudomonas aeruginosa mouse and aganite rats strains.
7	lipoprotein inhibitor of newcastle disease virus from chicken lung	Chicken Lung Lung Newcastle Disease Virus Lipoprotein Inhibitor.
7	viral aggregation resulting in the failure to correctly identify an unknown rhinovirus	L' viral aggregation; s' translates into failure; correctly identifying an unknown rhinovirus.
7	relative antiviral resistance induced in homologous and heterologous cells by cross reacting interferons	Relative antiviral resistance was induced in heterologous homologous cells by cross-reacting interferons.
7	fatal fat embolism following replacement arthroplasty for transcervical fractures of femur	Lapos; post-apos replacement fat embolism; arthroplasty for transervical fractures of the femur.
7	a simple sensitive protein binding assay for guanosine 3 5 monophosphate	A simple protein-binding test for guanosine 3-5 monophosphate.
7	viruses as an aid to cancer therapy regression of solid and ascites tumors in rodents after treatment with bovine enterovirus	Viruses to aid in the treatment of cancer after bovine enterovirus treatment reduce solid and ascending tumours in rodents.
7	biochemical and cytological evidence for triple hybrid cell line formed from fusion of three different cells	Biochemical and cytological evidence of the formation of d' a triple fusion hybrid cell line of three different cells.
7	on the differential cytotoxicity of actinomycin d	Differential cytotoxicity of etapos; actinomycin d.
7	mixed function oxidation in tumors	Mixed-function tumor occlusion.
7	inhibition of metastatic spread by i c r f 159 selective deletion of a malignant characteristic	Inhibition of metastatic propagation by selective suppression of metastatic propagation.
7	three size classes of intracellular adenovirus deoxyribonucleic acid	Three size-classes of deoxyribonucleic acid intracellular adenovirus.
7	transformation of murine cells by two slow viruses visna virus and progressive pneumonia virus	Two slow viruses, the visna virus and the progressive pneumonia virus, transform murine cells.
7	priming a nonantiviral function of interferon	Initiate apos; non antivirus apos function; interferon.
7	respiratory disease in a colony of rats i the natural disease	Rare colony respiratory disease i natural disease.
7	the pulmonary vasopressor response to decreases in blood ph in intact dogs	The pulmonary vasopressor response to decreased blood phps levels in intact dogs.
7	factors influencing pulmonary methane excretion in man an indirect method of studying the in situ metabolism of the methane producing colonic bacteria	It is not possible to predict the effects of methane on humans, but it is important to consider the effects of methane on humans.
7	an eosinophil leukocyte chemotactic factor of anaphylaxis	Anaphylaxis of eosinophilic leukocytes.
7	induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes after fusion with interphase cells	Induction of d' nuclear envelopes around chromosomes in metaphase after fusion with cells in interphase.
7	de novo fatty acid synthesis and elongation of fatty acids by subcellular fractions of lung	De novo the synthesis of fatty acids and l' subcellular fractions of the lungs elongate fatty acids.
7	mapping of a human genetic regulator element by somatic cell genetic analysis	Mapping of the genetic determinants of human genetics by genetic analysis of the somatic cells.
7	ultrastructural analysis of mitotic spindle elongation in mammalian cells in vitro direct microtubule counts	Microtubules are directly counted in mammalian cells by ultrastructural analysis of the spindle elongation of the mitotic spindle in vitro.
7	the cellular site of action of angiotensin	Cell site of apos; action of apos; angiotensin.
7	tuberculous morbidity in swiss albino mice immunized with bcg	Tuberculosis morbidity in Swiss albino bcg-immunized mice.
7	5 hydroxytryptamine metabolism in sheep	Sheep tetabolism 5 hydroxytryptamine.
7	effect of beta adrenoceptor blocking compounds propranolol practolol and lb 46 on isoprenaline induced changes in regional blood flow in the rat	The effect of β-adrenergic receptor blocking compounds, propranolol practolol and lb 46, on l' isoprenaline induced changes in the regional blood flow rate in the rat.
7	error theory and ageing in human diploid fibroblasts	Apos theory; Error and Aging of Human Diploid Fibroblasts.
7	gas exchange in renal failure ii pulmonary gas exchange during peritoneal dialysis	Gas Exchange During Initiation; Renal Failure ii Lung Gas Exchange During Peritoneal Dialysis.
7	study of the secular trend in asbestos bodies in lungs in london 1936 66	It is not possible to determine the age of the body, but it is important to determine the age of the body.
7	chromosome pulverization in micronuclei induced by tritiated thymidine	Tritiated thymidine induced chromosomal sputtering in micronuclei.
7	biosynthesis of vasopressin in vitro and ultrastructure of a bronchogenic carcinoma patient with the syndrome of inappropriate secretion of antidiuretic hormone	In vitro vasopressin biosynthesis and apo; ultrastructure of patients with apo; bronchogenic carcinoma with inappropriate apo secretion syndrome; antidiuretic hormone.
7	cigarette smoking objective evidence for lung damage in teen agers	Cigarette Smoking: Objective Evidence of Lung Damage in Older Adolescents.
7	isolation characterization and surface chemistry of a surface active fraction from dog lung	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
7	bronchiolitis obliterans bronchiectasis and other sequelae of adenovirus type 21 infection in young children	Adenovirus type 21 infection: bronchiolitis obliterrante bronchiectase and other early childhood sequelae.
7	smoking risks of different tobaccos	Health Canada, Health Canada, 2004.
7	ultrastructure of the nucleolus during the chinese hamster cell cycle	L' nucleolar ultrastructure during Chinese hamster cell cycle.
7	permeability of lung capillaries and alveoli to non electrolytes in the foetal lamb	"For the purpose of this document, the term ""fetal lamb"" means a fetal lamb."
7	mumps virus replication in chick embryo lung cells properties of ribonucleic acids in virions and infected cells	Reproduction of mumps virus in chicken lung cells; embryonic chicken; properties of ribonucleic acids in virus and infected cells.
7	depression of laryngeal reflexes during keatmine anaesthesia	Deterioration of the laryngeal reflexes; anesthesia with keatmine.
7	the pathology of parietal pleural plaques	Wall pleural plaque pathology.
7	effects of elastase collagenase and papain on structure and function of rat lungs in vitro	Effects of apos; collagenase elastase and papain on in vitro rat lung structure and function.
7	role of plasma lipoproteins in cortisone induced fat embolism	Plasma lipoprotein involvement in cortisone induced adipose embolism.
7	thyroid hormone influence upon lung surfactant metabolism	Influence of Thyroid hormones on pulmonary surfactant metabolism.
7	induced changes in the rates of uridine 3 h uptake and incorporation during the g 1 and s periods of synchronized chinese hamster cells	Changes were induced in Chinese hamster absorption and apos absorption rates; incorporation of uridine during g1 and s periods.
7	the role of non myelinated vagal afferent fibres from the lungs in the genesis of tachypnoea in the rabbit	The role of nonmyelinated vagal afferent fibers in rabbit tachypnea genesis.
7	template activity of chromatin during stimulation of cellular proliferation in human diploid fibroblasts	L' chromatin matrix activity during the stimulation of human diploid fibroblast cell proliferation.
7	the effect of high oxygen tensions on the mechanical properties of rat lungs	It can also be used as a means to reduce the amount of oxygen in the lungs.
7	standardization of human diploid fibroblast cultivation centrifugation procedure	Standardization of the Centrifuge Procedure for Human Diploid Fibroblast Cultures.
7	effect of chlorite oxidized oxyamylose on influenza virus infection in mice	Influenza is a major cause of death for people living with HIV/AIDS.
7	effect of relative humidity on dynamic aerosols of adenovirus 12	Acute respiratory tract infection due to hypoxic respiratory tract infection.
7	immunity to aerosol challenge in guinea pigs immunized with gamma irradiated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccines	Immunity; administration of aerosols in immunized guinea pigs; gamma-irradiated equine Venezuelan encephalitis.
7	synergistic effect of herpes simplex virus and cytosine arabinoside on human chromosomes	Synergistic Effect of Herpes simplex virus and Cytosine arabinoside on Human Chromosomes.
7	sites of pulmonary vasomotor reactivity in the dog during alveolar hypoxia and serotonin and histamine infusion	In dogs, the vasomotor responsiveness of the pulmonary vasomotor during apos; alveolar hypoxia and infusion of serotonin and d' histamine.
7	homologous interference by incomplete sendai virus particles changes in virus specific ribonucleic acid synthesis	The virus-specific ribonucleic acid (RNA) syntheses of the sentai virus undergoes a change in homologous interference with the sentai virus.
7	delayed hypersensitivity type granuloma formation and dermal reaction induced and elicited by a soluble factor isolated from schistosoma mansoni eggs	Delayed formation of hypersensitivity-like granulomas and dermal response were induced and elicited by a solute factor isolated from mansoni schistosoma eggs.
7	subhuman primate diploid cells possible substrates for production of virus vaccines	Diploid primate cells under @-@human could be used as antiviral vaccine substrates.
7	three dimensional structure identified from single sections	Identified three-dimensional structure from individual sections.
7	isolation of echoviruses with human embryonic lung fibroblast cells	Isolate echovirus at the apo; helps embryonic human lung fibroblasts.
7	fatal adenovirus pneumonia in infants correlation of histologic and electron microscopic observations	Fatal adenovirus pneumonitis in infants, correlations between histological and electron-microscopic findings.
7	neutralizing antibodies to cytomegaloviruses in normal simian and human sera	Cytomegalovirus neutralizing antibody in normal human and simian sera.
7	inhibition of influenza virus and interferon response intranasally with statolon	Intranasal Inhibition of Flu Virus and Apos Response; Statolon Interferon.
7	respiratory movements and rapid eye movement sleep in the foetal lamb	The breathing movements and the rapid movement of the eyes sleep in the apos; fetal lamb.
7	inhibition or enhancement of immunological injury of virus infected cells	Immunological damage to virus-infected cells is inhibited or increased.
7	antiviral activity of a bis benzimidazole against experimental rhinovirus infections in chimpanzees	Antiviral activity of d' a bis benzimidazole against experimental infections with rhinovirus in chimpanzees.
7	characterization of the growth of herpes simplex virus in human lymphoid cells	Characterization of growth of human lymphoid herpes simplex virus.
7	propagation and purification of high titer human cytomegalovirus	The Spread and Purification of Human Cytomegalovirus for a Strong Purpose.
7	morphologic development of fetal rabbit lung and its acceleration with cortisol	Fetal rabbit lung morphological development and acceleration with cortisol.
7	genetics of human mouse somatic cell hybrids linkage of human genes for lactate dehydrogenase a and esterase a 4	Genetics of Human Mouse Somatic Cell Hybrids Binding Human Lactate Dehydrogenase a and L' lactate dehydrogenase a 4 genes.
7	ischaemic enterocolitis an expression of the intravascular coagulation syndrome	Ischemic enterocolitis, intravascular clotting syndrome expression.
7	assignment of three human genes to chromosomes ldh a to 11 tk to 17 and idh to 20 and evidence for translocation between human and mouse chromosomes in somatic cell hybrids thymidine kinase lactate dehydrogenase a isocitrate dehydrogenase c 11 e 17 and f 20 chromosomes	L' assignment of three human genes to ldh chromosomes at 11 tk at 17 and idh at 20 and l' evidence of human-mouse chromosome translocation in thymidine kinase lactate dehydrogenase a isocitrate dehydrogenase c 11 and f 20 cell hybrids.
7	rabies virus in nasal mucosa of naturally infected bats	Rabies virus in bats' nasal mucosa-naturally infected mice.
7	release of dopamine from bovine lung by specific antigen and by compound 48 80	Dopamine release from bovine lungs by antigen-specific and compound-specific antigen.
7	angiotensin i metabolism by plasma membrane of lung	Angiotensin i by the lung plasma membrane.
7	metabolic control mechanisms in mammalian systems xv studies on the role of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in estrogen action on the uterus	Metabolic Control Mechanisms in the Mammalian Systems xv studies on the role of l' adenosine 3,5 monophosphate in apos; estrogen action on apos; uterus.
7	suppression of urethan induced lung adenomas in mice treated with trehalose 6 6 dimycolate cord factor and living bacillus calmette gu rin	The elimination of urethane-induced urethane-induced pulmonary adenomas in mice treated with dimycolate-cord factor 6 trehalose and guinea-fowl living bacillus.
7	murine leukemia virus restriction in fused permissive and nonpermissive cells	Limiting the virus of murine leukemia in permeable and nonpermeable fused cells.
7	induction of prophase in interphase nuclei by fusion with metaphase cells	Induction of prophase in nuclei at interphase by fusion with cells at metaphase.
7	alteration in cell proliferation in mouse lung following urethane exposure ii effects of chronic exposure on terminal bronchiolar epithelium	The effects of exposure to urethane; a chronic exposure to the apos; terminal bronchiolar epithelium; and the effects of exposure to urethane.
7	ultrastructural changes in the alveolar epithelium in response to freund s adjuvant	Ultrastructural changes of the apos; alveolar epithelium in response to apos; freund adjuvant.
7	elevated plasma activity of lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme 3 ldh 3 in experimentally induced immunologic lung injury	High plasma activity of l' isoenzyme 3 ldh3 lactate dehydrogenase in the immunologically induced lung injury.
7	regional lung function in patients with hepatic cirrhosis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the outcome.
7	effect of cigarette tar upon tissue culture cells neoplastic transformation of hamster lung cells by tobacco tar in tissue culture	Effect of cigarette tar on tissue culture cells Neoplastic transformation of lung cells from hamster to tobacco tar in tissue culture.
7	effects of biliary obstruction on pulmonary ultrastructure in the rat	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
7	effect of various combinations of antibacterial drugs on enzyme activity in guinea pig tissues	Effect of various antibacterial drug combinations on apos; enzymatic activity in tissues of guinea pigs.
7	study of the nucleoprotein fraction of lung tissue in experimental berylliosis using gel filtration	Nucleoprotein fraction of lung tissue in experimental berylliosis studied by gel filtration.
7	the protein and lipid composition of arterial elastin and its relationship to lipid accumulation in the atherosclerotic plaque	Apos protein and lipid composition; arterial elastin and its relation to apos; lipid accumulation in atherosclerotic plate.
7	epidemic listeriosis in the newborn	Epidemic Listeriosis in new-born.
7	the lung in hemorrhagic shock iv the role of neutrophilic polymorphonuclear leukocytes	The role of polymorphonuclear neutrophil leukocytes in hemorrhagic shock.
7	intravasation of fat from the bone marrow cavity	Bone marrow cavity fat intrusion.
7	intra and extracellular compartmentalization of the surface active fraction in dog lung	Intra- and extracellular comparisons of the fraction of surface area active in the lungs of dogs.
7	the effect of sendai virus infection on bactericidal and transport mechanisms of the murine lung	It is not known if the virus is transmitted to humans, but rather to humans.
7	a virus from epidemic vomiting disease	An outbreak of vomiting.
7	nitrosamine induced carcinogenesis the alkylation of n 7 of guanine of nucleic acids of the rat by diethylnitrosamine n ethyl n nitrosourea and ethyl methanesulphonate	Nitrosamine induced the carcinogenesis of rat nucleic acid guanine, n-7, alkylation by diethylnitrosamine n-ethyl nitrosourea and d-ethyl methanesulfonate.
7	pulmonary aspiration after fibre endoscopy of the upper gastrointestinal tract	Pulmonary aspiration after gastro tract fibers-upper intestinal.
7	inhibition of angiotensin i converting enzyme by venom peptides	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the drug is effective in reducing the risk.
7	nonviral microbodies with viral antigenicity produced in cytomegalovirus infected cells	Viral antigenic, non-viral microbodies produced in cells infected with cytomegalovirus.
7	susceptibility to spontaneous pneumonitis in an inbred strain of beige and satin mice	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
7	elimination of mycoplasma contaminants from virus stocks by treatment with nonionic detergents	Nonionic detergent treatment to remove mycoplasmic contaminants from virus stocks.
7	freeze etch studies of the plasma membrane of pulmonary endothelial cells	Freeze and burn pulmonary endothelial plasma membrane studies.
7	delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol localization in body fat	The location of the tetrahydrocannabinol delta 9 in the body fat.
7	induction of choline phosphotransferase and lecithin synthesis in the fetal lung by corticosteroids	Induced corticosteroid synthesis of choline phosphotransferase and lecithin in the fetal lung.
7	amniotic fluid lecithin sphingomyelin ratio and fetal lung development	Sphingomyelin ratio-amniotic fluid lecithin fetal lung development.
7	collagen substrata for studies on cell behavior	Collagen-based substrate for cellular behaviour studies.
7	microculture plaque assay for human and simian cytomegaloviruses	Microculture Plate Testing for Human and Simian Cytomegaloviruses.
7	early clinical experience with bleomycin in the united kingdom in series of 105 patients	Previous clinical experience with the U.K. bleomycin series of 105 patients.
7	pasteurella haemolytica of cattle serotype production of beta galactosidase and antibacterial sensitivity	Pasteurella haemolytica from cattle of the beta-galactosidase production type and anti-bacterial susceptibility type.
7	effects of ultrasonic nebulization on pulmonary mechanics and blood gases in obstructive pulmonary disease	Effects of Ultrasound Nebulization on Pulmonary Mechanics and Blood Gases in Obstructive Bronchopneumopathy.
7	role of cord factor trehalose 6 6 dimycolate in allergic granuloma formation in rabbits	Role of Trehalose 6-6 dimycolate in Allergic Granuloma Formation in Rabbits.
7	etiology of chronic pneumonia in rats and a study of the experimental disease in mice	Etiology of Chronic Pneumonia in Rat and Study of Experimental Disease in Mouse.
7	chromatid breakage differential effect of inhibitors of dna synthesis during g 2 phase	Differential Effect of Chromatid Breakdown of G Phase G synthesis inhibitors; DNA.
7	fetal renal structure and the genesis of amniotic fluid disorders	Fetal renal structure and amniotic fluid disorders.
7	virological studies of sudden unexplained infant deaths in glasgow 1967 70	This is consistent with the findings of the authors.
7	lung mechanics and frequency dependence of compliance in coal miners	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the compliance of coal mines.
7	use of pulmonary hydrogen h 2 measurements to quantitate carbohydrate absorption study of partially gastrectomized patients	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
7	indirect hemagglutination test for varicella zoster infection	In addition to the above tests, there are a number of other tests that can be performed.
7	immunogenicity of egg grown influenza vaccine inhibition by immunization of recipients with host antigen	Immunogenicity of apo; anti-flu vaccines produced from apo; egg by apo; recipient immunizations with apo; host antigen.
7	respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide treated mice ii decreased virulence of pr8 influenza virus	Respiratory diseases in mice treated with cyclophosphamide ii decreased the virulence of the virus pr8; influenza.
7	hyperoxia influence on lung mechanics and protein synthesis	L' hyperoxia influences the mechanics of the lungs and the synthesis of proteins.
7	hyperoxia a stereologic ultrastructural examination of its influence on cytoplasmic components of the pulmonary granular pneumocyte	L' hyperoxia is a stereological ultrastructural examination of the hyperoxia's influence on the cytoplasmic components of the granular pneumocyte.
7	passive protection of mice against intracerebral infections with bordetella pertussis	Passive protection against intracerebral infection with bordetella pertussis.
7	the pulmonary clearance of bacteria by calves and mice	Veal and mouse lung clearance of bacteria.
7	the tissue localization of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkey embryos	Tissue localization studies of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkey embryos.
7	respiratory disease in a colony of rats ii isolation of mycoplasma pulmonis from the natural disease and the experimental disease induced with a cloned culture of this organism	Respiratory disease in a rat colony ii isolation of the pulmonary mycoplasm from cloned culture-induced natural and experimental disease.
7	the nature of the toxic reaction of influenza virus towards lung tissue	The toxic response of the flu virus to lung tissue.
7	the influence of the route of immunization on the protection of mice infected intracerebrally with bordetella pertussis	Influenza A; Influenza A; Influenza A; Influenza B; Influenza B; Influenza B; Influenza B; Influenza B; Influenza B; Influenza B; Influenza B; Influenza B.
7	effect of glucocorticoids on histamine metabolism in mice	Effect of glucocorticosteroids on the metabolism of histamine and histamine in mice.
7	sendai virus induced transcriptase from infected cells polypeptides in the transcriptive complex	Sendai virus induces transcriptase from polypeptides of infected cells in a transcription complex.
7	the release of spasmogenic substances from human chopped lung tissue and its inhibition	Release and inhibition of spasmogens from minced human lung tissue.
7	studies of the pulmonary vagal control of central respiratory rhythm in the absence of breathing movements	Studies of vagal pulmonary control of central breathing rhythm at high rates; absence of respiratory movements.
7	the virulence of t mycoplasmas isolated from various animal species assayed by intramammary inoculation in cattle	The virulence of t-mycoplasmas isolated from a variety of animal species was evaluated by intramammary inoculation in cattle.
7	interferon studies with japanese and u s rubella virus strains	Studies on HIV/AIDS; Interferon with Japanese and American Rubella Virus strains.
7	antigen mediated fusion of specifically sensitized rabbit alveolar macrophages	Fusion, mediated by the antigen, of alveolar macrophages of specially sensitized rabbit.
7	membrane dynamics in the action of dibutyryl adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and testosterone on mammalian cells	Membrane dynamics of l' action of dibutyryl adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate (CMS) and testosterone on mammalian cells.
7	cryptococcus neoformans of unusual morphology	Cryptococcus neoformans d&apos.
7	appearance in trypsinized normal cells of reactivity with antibody presumably specific for malignant cells	L' appearance in normal trypsinized reactivity cells with a presumably malignant cell specific antibody.
7	bedside determination of left atrial pressure	Left atrial pressure determination at the bedside.
7	bubble stability test compared with lecithin assay in prediction of respiratory distress syndrome	Compared to the lecithin test, the airway distress syndrome is predicted by the bubble stability test.
7	effects of histamine 5 hydroxytryptamine and bradykinin on the vascular system of isolated lungs of the guinea pig and the influence of phenylbutazone on these effects	Effects of and influence by phenylbutazone on the vascular system of isolated guinea pig lungs by histamine 5 hydroxytryptamine and bradykinin.
7	the inactivation of bradykinin in the pulmonary circulation of isolated lungs	L' bradykinin inactivation in isolated pulmonary circulation.
7	a dual action of histamine on guinea pig lung vessels	A double action of l' histamine on the pulmonary vessels of the guinea pig.
7	lipid metabolism by rat lung in vitro utilization of citrate by normal and starved rats	Metabolism of lipids in the lungs of rats, use of citrate in vitro by normal and starving rats.
7	experimental paracoccidioidomycosis in mice	Experimental mouse paracoccidioidomycosis.
7	experimental pneumococcal infection in embryonated eggs previously infected with influenza c virus	Experimental pneumococcal infection in previously infected influenza c.
7	murine resistance to inhaled neisseria meningitidis after infection with an encephalomyocarditis virus	Infectious Diseases, 3rd edition. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/pubs/index_e.html.
7	an outbreak of adenovirus type 7 infection in children in montreal	Type 7 adenovirus outbreak in Montreal children.
7	adenylate rich sequences in sendai virus transcripts from infected cells	Adenylate-rich sequences are present in the transcripts of sentai virus from infected cells.
7	the bradykininase activities of extracts of dog lung	L' bradykininase activity; extracts from dog lungs.
7	dispersal of rabbit lung into individual viable cells a new model for the study of lung metabolism	Dispersal of rabbit lungs into individual viable cells is a novel model for studies of pulmonary metabolism.
7	the fluorescent antibody technique in the diagnosis of equine rhinopneumonitis virus abortion	The Fluorescent Antibody Technique in the Diagnosis of Equine Rhinopneumonitis Virus.
7	hypoxic changes in conducting tissue of the heart in sudden death in infancy syndrome	Hypoxic changes in heart conducting tissue during onset of sudden death during early childhood syndrome.
7	concentration of herpesviruses	Herpes virus concentration.
7	the experimental production of hyaline membranes in premature rhesus monkeys	Experimental hyaline membrane production in premature rhesus monkeys.
7	effect of hypersensitivity pneumonitis on the pulmonary defense mechanisms of guinea pig lungs	It can also be used to reduce the risk of lung cancer and to reduce the risk of lung cancer.
7	types of afferent nervous activity which may be measured in the vagus nerve of the sheep foetus	Type of apo; afferent nerve activity that can be measured in ewe fetus vagus nerve.
7	pulmonary fibrosis following therapy with melphalan for multiple myeloma	Melphalan treatment for multiple myeloma.
7	pathological findings after right lung transplantation in a patient with fibrosing alveolitis	American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition.
7	effect of cortisone administration on experimental nocardiosis	Effects of apos; administration of cortisone on the experimental nocardiosis.
7	ultrastructure of ehrlichia canis	L'apos; d'apos ultrastructure; d'ehrlichia canis.
7	self regulation of growth in three dimensions	Auto-3D Growth Regulation.
7	sudden and unexpected deaths in infants histology and virology	Sudden and Unintended Death in Infants Histology and Virology.
7	trephine lung biopsy	Pulmonary biopsy, trepanin.
7	immunofluorescent staining of lung biopsy in fibrosing alveolitis	Immune-fluorescent lung biopsy staining in the fibrotic alveolitis.
7	pulmonary contusion in children due to rubber bullet injuries	Contusion of the lungs in children caused by rubber bullet wounds.
7	role of relative humidity in the synergistic effect of a sulfur dioxide aerosol mixture on the lung	In addition, it can be used to reduce the amount of sulphur dioxide that can be released into the air.
7	fine structure of cryptococcus neoformans grown in vivo as observed by freeze etching	The ultrastructure of in vivo cultured cryptococcus neoformans was examined by freeze-etching.
7	relative roles of irritant type j and pulmonary stretch receptors in lung reflexes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other types of irritants that may be present in the body.
7	regulation of respiration by bronchopulmonary receptors in conscious dogs	Regulation of bronchopulmonary receptor respiration in conscious dogs.
7	studies on the central effects of hering breuer reflexes	Behavioural reflex central effects studies.
7	afferent vagal impulses in anaphylactic bronchial asthma	It's called anaphylactic bronchial asthma.
7	the cyanide gasp and spontaneous deep breaths	Cyanide breath and deep, spontaneous breaths.
7	ten years experience in running a pulmonary function laboratory	He is a graduate of the University of British Columbia and a graduate of the University of Toronto.
7	cytomegalovirus replication in cells pretreated with 5 iodo 2 deoxyuridine	Cytomegalovirus replication in 5-iodo-2-deoxyuridine pretreated cells.
7	growth characteristics of cytomegalovirus in human fibroblasts with demonstration of protein synthesis early in viral replication	Growth characteristics of cytomegalovirus in human fibroblasts with demonstrated protein synthesis activity early in viral replication.
7	light microscopic and ultrastructural study of the adverse effects of oxygen therapy on the neonate lung	Light microscopic and ultrastructural study of adverse effects of apo; oxygen therapy on lungs of newborns.
7	a combined scanning and transmission electron microscopic study of alveolar epithelial development of the fetal rabbit lung	A combined transmission and scanning electron microscopy study of the alveolar epithelial development of the rabbit fetal lung.
7	antiviral effects of aphidicolin a new antibiotic produced by cephalosporium aphidicola	Antiviral effects of cephalosporium aphidicola, a novel antibiotic, aphidicolin.
7	isolation and characterization of lamellar bodies and tubular myelin from rat lung homogenates	Lamellar body and tubular myelin isolation and characterization in rat lung homogenates.
7	use of technetium 99m tc as a bacterial label in lung clearance studies	Use of technetium 99 mtc as a marker for bacteria in pulmonary clearance studies.
7	a sequence of biochemical events in the antigen induced release of chemical mediators from sensitized human lung tissue	A sequence of antigen-induced biochemical events induced the release of chemical mediators from sensitized human lung tissue.
7	measurement of respiratory volume for virus retention studies in mice	Respiratory volume measurement for mouse viral retention studies.
7	induction of labour in sheep and in humans by single doses of corticosteroids	Induction of labor in sheep and humans by single-dose administration of corticosteroids.
7	role of the mast cell in the pulmonary pressor response to hypoxia	Role of Mastocycle in Pulmonary Pressor Response to Apos; hypoxia.
7	rimantadine therapy of influenza a infection in mice	Treatment with rimantadine, a mouse infection.
7	the effect of phospholipids on anaphylactic histamine release	L' phospholipid effect on anaphylactic release of histamine.
7	the optical and electron microscopic determination of pulmonary asbestos fibre concentration and its relation to the human pathological reaction	Determination by light and electron microscopy of the concentration of lung asbestos fibres and its relationship to human pathological response.
7	serotonin producing neuroepithelial bodies in rabbit respiratory mucosa	Serotonin produces a neuroepithelial body in the respiratory mucosa of the rabbit.
7	contributions of loss of lung recoil and of enhanced airways collapsibility to the airflow obstruction of chronic bronchitis and emphysema	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to air quality, such as air quality, air quality, air quality, and air quality.
7	effects of bradykinin and indomethacin on cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in lung slices	Effects of bradykinin and l' indomethacin on the cyclic gmp and l' cyclic ampoule in the lung slices.
7	antibacterial mechanisms of the lower respiratory tract i immunoglobulin synthesis and secretion	Antibacterial Mechanisms of Lower Respiratory Immune Globulin Synthesis and Secretion i.
7	cytoplasmic receptor for glucocorticoids in lung of the human fetus and neonate	Glucocorticoid cytoplasmic receptor in human fetal lungs and newborn @-@.
7	lung surface active fraction as a model system for macromolecular ultrastructural studies with crotalus atrox venom	The active fraction of the pulmonary surface as a model system for ultrastructural macromolecular studies with the venom of atrox crotalus.
7	characterization of bleomycin resistant dna	Bleomycin resistant DNA characterization.
7	hemagglutination assay of antibodies associated with pulmonary acariasis in rhesus monkeys macaca mulatta	In addition to the above, there are a number of other studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada and the United States.
7	human papovavirus bk strain biological studies including antigenic relationship to simian virus 40	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the status of the human papovavirus.
7	intermittent dna synthesis and periodic expression of enzyme activity in the cell cycle of wi 38	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
7	contrast between the environmental ph dependencies of prophasing and nuclear membrane formation in interphase metaphase cells	The contrast between prophase environmental dependencies and nuclear membrane formation in cells in interphase metaphase contrasts.
7	clinical radiologic and histopathologic studies on pulmonary toxicity induced by treatment with bleomycin nsc 125066	Clinical histopathological and radiological studies of bleomycin treatment-induced pulmonary toxicity.
7	ferromagnetic contamination in the lungs and other organs of the human body	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that can affect the body.
7	immune enhancement of pulmonary bactericidal activity in murine virus pneumonia	Unpublished report prepared for AIDS Division; Epidemiology and Surveillance; Epidemiology.
7	pathogenicity of allescheria boydii for mice	Pathogenicity of mouse Allescheria boydii.
7	role of immunity in viral induced bacterial superinfections of the lung	The Role of Immunity in Virus-induced Bacterial Overinfections of the Lungs.
7	synergistic effect in viral bacterial infection combined infection of the murine respiratory tract with sendai virus and pasteurella pneumotropica	In addition to the above, there are a number of other infectious diseases, such as HIV/AIDS, hepatitis C, hepatitis C, hepatitis C, hepatitis C, and hepatitis C.
7	an ultrastructural analysis of nocardia during experimental infections in mice	Ultrastructural analysis of the nocardia during experimental mouse infections.
7	attempts to detect homologous autointerference in vivo with influenza virus and vesicular stomatitis virus	Tests for the detection of apo; auto-inference homologue in vivo with the virus of apo; influenza and the virus of vesicular stomatitis.
7	granulomatous hypersensitivity to trehalose 6 6 dimycolate cord factor in mice infected with bcg	Trehalose 6-6 dimycolate cord factor in bcg-infected mice.
7	inhibition of cathepsin d type proteinase of macrophages by pepstatin a specific pepsin inhibitor and other substances	L' inhibition of pancreatic cathepsin type D proteinase by pepstatin, a pepsin-specific inhibitor, and d' other substances.
7	sources of cyclic nucleotides in plasma	Cyclic nucleotide sources in plasma.
7	experimental lung injury i bacterial pneumonia ultrastructural autoradiographic and histochemical observations	Lung lesions and pneumonia were found to be similar to those observed in other studies.
7	guanylate cyclase inhibition by light in retinal photoreceptors	Light inhibition of guanylate cyclase in retinal photoreceptors.
7	development and evaluation of a direct fluorescent antibody method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii infections in experimental animals	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part I, at http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
7	immunologic events in experimental hypersensitivity granulomas	The test should be performed in accordance with the following instructions: 1.
7	an experimental model of pulmonary arterial granulomatous inflammation	The results of this study are summarized below.
7	pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone a correlated light and electron microscopic study	Pulmonary lesions in ozone-exposed rats were studied by light and electron microscopy in a correlative study.
7	morphometric evaluation of pulmonary lesions in rats exposed to ozone	Morphometric evaluation of lung injury in ozone exposed rats.
7	pulmonary blood flow distribution at different lung volumes and body positions	Distribution of pulmonary blood flow at different body positions and lung volumes.
7	haemodynamic changes at different lung volumes	Hemodynamic changes in lung volumes.
7	supersaturation with bilirubin followed by colloid formation and disposition with a hypothesis on the etiology of kernicterus	Bilirubin oversaturation followed by formation and disposition of colloidal hypotheses on apos; etiology of kernicterus.
7	amphetamine in human plasma a sensitive and specific enzymatic assay	Human plasma amphetamine, a specific and sensitive enzyme assay.
7	heparan sulphate sulphotransferase properties of an enzyme from ox lung	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in wi 38 cells i sequence of viral replication	Virus of l' herpes simplex and replication of human cytomegalovirus in wi 38 cells i viral replication sequence.
7	in vitro binding of retinol to rat tissue components	Retinol binds to tissue constituents of rat in vitro.
7	molecular nature of mammalian cell dna in alkaline sucrose gradients	Molecular nature of the apos; Mammalian cell DNA in sucrose alkaline gradients.
7	pulmonary gas exchange in nonnative residents of high altitude	Non-aboriginal high-elevation residents exchange lung gas.
7	early response of lung to low levels of ozone	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
7	fate of angiotension i in the total bufo melanostictus	It's a great way to get a feel for your life.
7	specificity of a bcg induced pulmonary granulomatous response in rabbits	Specificity of apos; a bcg effect induced a granulomatous pulmonary response in rabbits.
7	enhanced effect of repeated administration of bacterial vaccine against viral respiratory infection	Increased risk of respiratory infection; increased risk of respiratory infection; increased risk of respiratory infection.
7	experimental induction of anergy to coccidioidin by antigens of coccidioides immitis	Coccidioidin-induced anergy by coccidioid antigen, coccidioid immitis.
7	antibody response to a human diploid cell rabies vaccine	Immune response to rabies vaccine in human diploid cells.
7	early development of and pathology associated with strongylus edentatus	Strongylus edentatus early development and pathology.
7	pneumothorax in pulmonary eosinophilic granuloma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	cell free translation of paramyxovirus messenger rna	Messenger rna paramyxovirus cell-free translation.
7	acute systemic anaphylaxis in the calf	Veal acute systemic anaphylaxis.
7	growth inhibition and morphological changes caused by lipophilic acids in mammalian cells	Lipophilic acid induced growth inhibition and morphological changes in mammalian cells.
7	assessment of fetal lung maturity by estimation of amniotic fluid palmitic acid	Assessment of Fetal Lung Maturity by Estimation of Apos; Amniotic Liquid Palmitic Acid.
7	direct fluorescent antibody method for the diagnosis of pneumocystis carinii pneumonitis from sputa or tracheal aspirates from humans	This method is used for the diagnosis of pneumocystis-carinii pneumonia from sputa or dapos; tracheal aspiration in humans.
7	bacterial growth in vivo an important determinant of the pulmonary clearance of diplococcus pneumoniae in rats	Bacterial growth in vivo is an important determinant of diplococcus pneumoniae lung clearance in rats.
7	inhibition of murine leukemia virus replication by poly vinyluracil and poly vinyladenine	L' inhibition of polyvinyluracil and polyvinyladenine replication of murine leukemia virus.
7	human regulatory gene for inducible tyrosine aminotransferase in rat human hybrids	Inducible human tyrosine aminotransferase regulator gene in human rat hybrids.
7	epidemiological and quantitative relationships between mesothelioma and asbestos on tyneside	In addition, there is an increased risk of death due to the use of the drug.
7	viscosity of cellular protoplasm	It's called a cell-protoplasm viscosity.
7	assignment of the gene for adenine phosphoribosyltransferase to human chromosome 16 by mouse human somatic cell hybridization	Assignment of the l&apos gene; adenine phosphoribosyltransferase to human chromosome 16 via hybridization of human mouse somatic cells.
7	role of extrapulmonary conversion in mediating the systemic pressor activity of angiotensin i	Role of Extrapulmonary Conversion in Apos Mediation; Systemic Angiotensin Pressor Activity i.
7	variation in the life span of clones derived from human diploid cell strains	Change in life span of human diploid cell stem-derived clones.
7	prophasing of interphase nuclei and induction of nuclear envelopes around metaphase chromosomes in hela and chinese hamster homo and heterokaryons	Interphase nuclei prophylaxis and nuclear envelope induction around metaphase chromosomes in gay and heterokaryotic Chinese helix and hamster.
7	adaption to hyperoxia influence on protein synthesis by lung and on granular pneumocyte ultrastructure	Ultrastructure of granular pneumocytes influences the synthesis of proteins by the lungs and the joints.
7	disability and coal workers pneumoconiosis	Pneumoconiosis, pneumoconiosis and pneumoconiosis.
7	alpha 1 antitrypsin deficiency correlation between biochemical tests and phenotypes in one family	Biochemical tests correlate with apos phenotypes; same family for alpha deficiency-1 antitrypsin.
7	release of rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs and prostaglandins induced by chemical or mechanical stimulation of guinea pig lungs	Release of rabbit aorta, rcs and prostaglandins, induced by mechanical or chemical stimulation of the guinea pig lungs.
7	qualitative and quantitative aspects of the biosynthesis of ribonucleic acid and of protein in the liver and the lung of the syrian golden hamster	Qualitative and Quantitative Aspects of Ribonucleic Acid and Protein Biosynthesis in Syrian Golden Hamster Liver and Lung.
7	the effects of diethylnitrosamine on ribonucleic acid and protein synthesis in the liver and lung of the syrian golden hamster	The effects of diethylnitrosamine on the synthesis of ribonucleic acid (RNA) and proteins in Syrian golden hamster liver and lung.
7	some effects of burimamide on the isolated perfused pulmonary circulation of the guinea pig	Some burimamide effects on the perfused pulmonary circulation isolated from the guinea pig.
7	soap abortion and fat embolism	Aborting in soap and fatty embolism.
7	cytologic changes in dogs lungs induced by chronic exposure to ozone	Chronic ozone exposure induced cytological changes in the lungs of dogs.
7	method for storing toxoplasma gondii rh strain in liquid nitrogen	Method for the storage of the rh strain of toxoplasma gondii in l'apos; liquid nitrogen.
7	ultrastructural changes in hamster tracheal ring cultures exposed to mycoplasma pneumoniae	Ultrastructural changes in cultures of hamster tracheal rings exposed to pneumoniae mycoplasma.
7	early pathological changes associated with fasciola hepatica infections in white tailed deer	A review of the results of a randomized controlled trial.
7	genetic variation in coumarin hydroxylase activity in the mouse mus musculus	Genetic variation of mouse musculus coumarin hydroxylase activity.
7	allografted lungs in matched dogs with induced pulmonary hypertension	L' pulmonary allografting in pulmonary hypertensive dogs.
7	spectrum of asthma in children i clinical and physiological components	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	ectopic acth production in carcinoma of the lung	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S.C., D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes, and D.R. Diet.
7	superoxide dismutase activity in leukocytes	L' activity of superoxide dismutase in leukocytes.
7	the distribution between gamma glutamylhydrozamate synthetase and l glutamine hydroxylamine glutamyltransferase activities in rat tissues studies in vitro	Distribution between in vitro rat tissue glutamylhydrozamate synthetase and glutamine hydroxylamine glutamyltransferase activities.
7	lung collagen heterogeneity	Heterogeneity of the collagen in the lungs.
7	effective treatment for paraquat poisoning in rats and its relevance to treatment of paraquat poisoning in man	Effective treatment of apo; rat paraquat poisoning and its relevance to the treatment of apo; paraquat poisoning in men.
7	metabolic differences between normal and neoplastic cells effects of aminonucleoside on cytoplasmic messenger rna	Metabolic differences between the effects of aminonucleosides on neoplastic and normal cells of the rna cytoplasmic messenger.
7	purification and properties of the cathepsin d types proteinase from beef and rabbit lung and its identification in macrophages	Rabbit and beef lung cathepsin proteinase purification and its properties and macrophage identification.
7	studies with radioactive endotoxin ii clearance of 3h labelled endotoxin from the blood of calves	Radioactive endotoxin studies ii calf clearance; labelled 3 h endotoxin.
7	immunofluorescent studies of bovine hypersensitivity pneumonitis	It is not possible to determine the cause of pneumonitis.
7	properties of intracytoplasmic a particles isolated from oncornavirus producing human cells	The results of this study will be used to evaluate the effects of oncornavirus on human cells.
7	herpes simplex virus and human cytomegalovirus replication in wi 38 cells ii an ultrastructural study of viral penetration	Virus of the apos; herpes simplex and replication of human cytomegalovirus in wi 38 cells, viral penetration ultrastructural study.
7	rectal and gastric involvement in a case of sarcoidosis	Stomach and rectal involvement in sarcoidosis.
7	the use of immunoadsorbent columns for the isolation of antibodies specific for antigens associated with human bronchogenic carcinoma	Use of d&apos columns; immunoadsorbents to isolate antibodies specific to human bronchogenic carcinoma-associated antigens.
7	evidence for different gestation dependent effects of cortisol on cultured fetal lung cells	Evidence of different cortisol-dependent gestational effects on the cultured fetal lung cells.
7	biosynthetic pathway of desmosines in elastin	Biosynthetic pathway of the desmosins; elastin.
7	effects of intravenous administration of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis histamine bradykinin and prostaglandin f2alpha on pulmonary mechanics in the guinea pig	Effects of Apos; Intravenous Administration of Slow Reaction Substance of Apos; Histamine Bradykinin and Prostaglandin f2alpha on Pulmonary Mechanics in Guinea Pig.
7	positive control of transformed phenotype in hybrids between sv40 transformed and normal human cells	Positive control of the transformed phenotype in the hybrid between transformed and normal human sv40 cells.
7	cell cycle analysis in 20 minutes	In 20 minutes, cell cycle analysis.
7	fibrosing alveolitis and treatment with sulphasalazine	Fibrosing alveolite and sulphasalazine.
7	pulmonary bacterial susceptibility in the burned rat	Lung Bacterial Susceptibility in Burned Rat.
7	aspiration of blood and pulmonary host defense mechanisms	Blood aspiration and apo defense mechanisms; lung host.
7	pulmonary platelet aggregates associated with sudden death in man	In addition, there were no significant differences between the two groups.
7	clearance of candida albicans from the bloodstream of rabbits	Removal of Canda albicans from the rabbit bloodstream.
7	human beta d n acetylhexosaminidases a and b expression and linkage relationships in somatic cell hybrids	The expression and binding relationships of human beta d' human somatic cell hybrid acetylhexosaminidases a and b.
7	the effect of corrective surgery on pulmonary function in scoliosis	The effect of corrective surgery on the function of the lung in scoliosis.
7	differences in the character and intensity of morphologic changes in the peritoneal cavity and lungs resulting from experimental exposure to cement dust	Differences in nature and age; intensity of morphological changes in peritoneal cavity and lungs resulting from apo; experimental exposure to cement dust.
7	lipoid pneumonia in infants and children in south india	Lipoid pneumonia in southern infants and children; India.
7	adrenaline induced acute massive pulmonary oedema in the dog	Adrenaline caused acute pulmonary edema in dogs.
7	comparison by controlled clinical trial of streptokinase and heparin in treatment of life threatening pulmonay embolism	Comparison by Controlled Clinical Trial of Streptokinase and Lapos; Heparin in Treatment of Lapos; Life-threatening Pulmonary Embolism.
7	genetic control of mitochondrial thymidine kinase in human mouse and monkey mouse somatic cell hybrids	Mitochondrial thymidine kinase genetic control in mouse–monkey hybrid somatic cells.
7	plaque assay for avirulent lentogenic strains of newcastle disease virus	Plate testing of avirulent, slow-growing strains of the Newcastle disease virus.
7	histopathology of one stage bilateral lung allografts	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	the effect of carbon dioxide in the airways and alveoli on ventilation a vagal reflex studied in the dog	The effect of airway and alveolar carbon dioxide on ventilation is a vagal reflex studied in dogs.
7	the effect of edema hydrocortisone acetate concurrent viral infection and immunization on the clearance of pasteurella hemolytica from the bovine lung	The effects of apos; hydrocortisone acetate oedema concomitant with apos; viral infection and apos; immunization of bovine lung hemolytic pasteurella.
7	influence of the ventilation mechanics on the hematocrit value i research in rabbits subjected to experimental pneumothorax	It is important to note that the results of this study are not consistent with those of other studies.
7	growth of mammalian cells on substrates coated with cellular microexudates i effect on cell growth at low population densities	Growth of mammalian cells on cell microexudate-coated substrates i has an effect on growth at low population densities.
7	differentiation of smallpox and camelpox viruses in cultures of human and monkey cells	Differentiation of camel pox and camel pox viruses in human cell culture and monkey culture.
7	autopsy data and their total evaluation	Data from post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem; post-mortem evaluation; post-mortem evaluation; evaluation e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e m e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e e
7	modified spinning top homogeneous spray apparatus for use in experimental respiratory disease studies	A modified, homogeneous rotary top spray applicator for use in respiratory disease studies.
7	phospholipid biosynthesis the activity of phosphatidic acid phosphohydrolase in the developing lung and amnionic fluid	Phospholipid biosynthesis is described as apos; apos phosphohydrolase activity; and phosphatidic acid activity in developing lung and amnionic fluid.
7	functional evaluation of lung mitochondria	Pulmonary mitochondrial functional evaluation.
7	collagen in the lung development of a technology applicable to human lung disease	Collagen in Lung Development; Technology for Human Lung Disease.
7	pharmacologic regulation of alveolar surfactant in fetal and newborn rabbits acth heroin isoxsuprine and glucocorticoid	Pharmacological regulation of alveolar surfactant in fetus and newborn rabbits-acth isoxsuprine and glucocorticoids.
7	the destruction of type 2 pneumocytes by airborne influenza pr8 a virus its effect on surfactant and lecithin content of the pneumonic lesions of mice	Type 2 pneumocyte destruction by pr8 virus has airborne influenza, its effect on the surfactant and lecithin content of mouse pneumonic lesions.
7	comparison of the cardiopulmonary effects of subcutaneously administered epinephrine and terbutaline in patients with reversible airway obstruction	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre and multi-centre.
7	pulmonary mycotoxicosis	Pulmonary mycotoxicosis.
7	fatal lung scan in a case of pulmonary hypertension due to obliterative pulmonary vascular disease	Pulmonary hypertension due to obstructing pulmonary vascular disease.
7	pulmonary function studies in ex heroin users	In addition, there is no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system.
7	the use of spontaneous ventilation with constant positive airway pressure in the treatment of salt water near drowning	Use of Spontaneous Ventilation with Constant Positive Respiratory Pressure in the Treatment of Lipos; Salt Water Near Drowning.
7	the chest abdomen sign in familial dysautonomia	The abdomen indicates family dysautonomy.
7	clinical aspects of atypical mycobacterial infection	Acute and chronic inflammation of the intestinal tract.
7	importance of physical properties of benzo a pyrene ferric oxide mixtures in lung tumor induction	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
7	effects of cigarette smoking on aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase activity in lungs and tissues of inbred mice	Effects of Smoking on Apos; Apos Activity; Arylic Hydrocarbon hydroxylase in Inbred Mice Lungs and Tissues.
7	suggestive evidence for in vivo binding of specific antitumor antibodies of human melanomas	Evidence suggesting in vivo binding of human melanoma-specific anti-tumour antibodies.
7	aminochlorthenoxycycline levels in experimental acute inflammation of the respiratory tree	Dapos; aminochlorthenoxycycline in apos; acute experimental inflammation of respiratory tissue.
7	bronchopulmonary aminochlorthenoxycycline levels in experimental burns of the respiratory tree	Bronchopulmonary level of apo; aminochlorthenoxycycline level in experimental apo burns; respiratory tree.
7	techniques of radiotherapy in so called operable carcinoma of the breast	Radiotherapy techniques for operable breast carcinoma.
7	endogenous c type virus of a mouse cell line and its defectiveness	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the genetic makeup of the virus.
7	diffuse and focal oxygen pneumonitis a preliminary report on the threshold of pulmonary oxygen toxicity in man	It is not possible to determine the cause of death due to cancer, but it is important to determine the cause of death.
7	tryptamine receptors in rat pulmonary artery	Tryptamine Receptors in Rat Pulmonary Artery.
7	pulmonary mechanical effects of experimental lung embolism and their modification by bronchodilator drugs in the guinea pig	Pulmonary mechanical effects of guinea pig bronchodilator modification and experimental pulmonary embolism.
7	characterization of particulate and soluble guanylate cyclases from rat lung	Characterization of soluble and particulate rat lung guanylate cyclases.
7	viral respiratory infections of horses structure and function of lungs in relation to viral infection	Viral respiratory infections in horses and lung function and structure related to the apo; viral infection.
7	early changes in lungs of rats exposed to 70 per cent o2	There is a need for additional information on the effects of ozone on human health.
7	five fluorocarbons for administration of aerosol bronchodilators	In addition, it is recommended that the product be stored in a sterile container.
7	prostaglandin inactivation in guinea pig lung and its inhibition	Pig lung prostaglandin inactivation and inhibition.
7	clinically useful method for the isolation of respiratory syncytial virus	This method is useful for the detection of the respiratory syncytial virus.
7	evaluation of four antiviral agents in the treatment of herpes simplex encephalitis in a rat model	Evaluation of four anti-viral agents in the treatment of the apos; herpes simplex encephalitis in a model rat.
7	dissociation of the immunologic release of histamine and slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis from human lung using cytochalasins a and b 1	Dissociation of the immunological release from apos; histamine and the slow reaction substance from apos; human lung anaphylaxis to apos; cytochalasin aid a and b 1.
7	antibody mediated cytotoxicity after measles virus infection	Antibody-mediated cytotoxicity following measles virus infection.
7	migration and embolization of macrophages to the lung a possible mechanism for colloid uptake in the lung during liver scanning	Migration and lupus; embolization of macrophages in the lung, a possible mechanism for lupus; absorption of lung colloids during liver scans.
7	production and characteristics of 125xe a new noble gas for in vivo studies	A new gas, rare for in vivo studies, is produced and its characteristics are 125xe.
7	liver scan showing intense lung uptake in neoplasia and infection	Hepatic scan showing acute absorption of the lungs in the neoplastic and in the liver; infection.
7	does rna pass from mesenchyme to epithelium during an embryonic tissue interaction	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
7	extension of the lifespan of cultured normal human diploid cells by vitamin e	Life Extension of Normal Human Diploid Cells Cultivated by Vitamin e.
7	experimental meconium aspiration effects of glucocorticoid treatment	Experimental effects of glucocorticoid treatment on the immune system; meconium aspiration.
7	relationship between fibrinolysis of cultured cells and malignancy	Relationship between culture fibrinolysis and malignancy.
7	human cytomegalovirus stimulates host cell rna synthesis	Human cytomegalovirus (HCV) stimulates the synthesis of host cell rna.
7	paragonimus kellicotti infection in wild carnivores in southwestern ontario i prevalence and gross pathologic features	Wild carnivore infection by paragonimus kellicotti in southern wild carnivores-west of l' Ontario and general pathological characteristics.
7	tuberculosis in lesser flamingoes in kenya	Dietary Reference Intakes, D.C. and D.A. Dietary Reference Level.
7	prevalence of dictyocaulus viviparus infection in rocky mountain elk in teton county wyoming	Prevalence of Dictyocaulus viviparus in mountain elk in Teton wyoming County.
7	optimum end expiratory airway pressure in patients with acute pulmonary failure	Terminal expiratory pressure optimal in apos patients; acute pulmonary insufficiency.
7	land edwards membrane oxygenator without pump as total lung prosthesis	Oxygenator with a soil edge without a pump as a total pulmonary prosthesis.
7	glomerulonephritis associated with antibody to glomerular basement membrane	Glomerulonephritis is associated with antibodies to the basal membrane of the glomerulus.
7	effect of continuous positive airway pressure on breathing pattern of infants with respiratory distress syndrome	In addition, there is an increased risk of respiratory distress, which may result in increased risk of respiratory distress.
7	peripheral metabolism of bovine parathyroid hormone in the dog	Peripheral metabolism of dog and bovine parathyroid hormone.
7	congenital bronchopulmonary foregut malformation with anomalous pulmonary artery	Congenital bronchopulmonary bowel malformation; anterior bowel with abnormal lung artery.
7	ventilatory control in myxedema and hypothyroidism	Exposure to hypoxemia, hypoxia, hypoxia, hypoxia, hypoxia.
7	direct isolation of mycoplasmas and acholeplasmas from sera and kidneys of calves	Directly isolate calf serum and kidney mycoplasmas and acholeplasms.
7	respiratory function in liver cirrhosis spirometry blood gas analysis and radioisotope study with xenon 133	Respiratory Function in Hepatic Cirrhosis Spirometry analyses blood gases and radioisotope studies with xenon 133.
7	a simple method of inflation fixation and air drying of lungs	A simple fixation method, inflation and air-drying of lungs.
7	cytomegalovirus interference in vitro	Cytomegalovirus in vitro.
7	effects of pattern of ventilation on pulmonary metabolism and mechanics	Effects of Ventilation on Pulmonary Mechanics and Metabolism.
7	the effect of pre existing pulmonary vascular disease on the response to mechanical ventilation with peep following open heart surgery	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
7	anti herpesvirus action of isoprinosine	Isoprinosine antibody action-herpesviruses.
7	evaluation of the effect of respiratory movements of the organs on the resolution index	The results of this study are summarized below.
7	variability of closing volume measurements in normal man	The Variability of Closure Volume Measurements in Normal Man.
7	the n2 closing volume test in population studies sources of variation and reproducibility	The closure volume test n2 in population studies is a source of reproducibility and variation.
7	diffusing capacity membrane diffusing capacity capillary blood volume pulmonary tissue volume and cardiac output measured by a rebreathing technique	Membrane diffusion capacity Capillary blood volume diffusion capacity pulmonary volume and cardiac output measured by rebreathing.
7	the effects of proteolytic enzymes on the tensile strength of human lung	The Effects of Proteolytic Enzymes on the Tensile Strength of Human Lungs.
7	the beta adrenoceptors of the lung mediating inhibition of antigen induced histamine release	Lung beta-adrenergic receptors, which mediate antiacid inhibition, induce histamine release.
7	pulmonary vascular changes associated with isolated mitral stenosis in india	Pulmonary vascular changes associated with mitral stenosis isolated from l'apos; India.
7	cryostat microtomy of lung tissue in an expanded state	Freeze-stable microtomy of enlarged lung tissue.
7	interstitial pulmonary edema following bromocarbamide intoxication	Interstitial pulmonary edema, secondary to bromocarbamide poisoning.
7	pulmonary emboli prevention diagnosis and treatment	Diagnosis and Treatment of Prevention and Lapse; Pulmonary Embolism.
7	citrate formation by rat lung mitochondrial preparations	Citrate formation by rat-lung mitochondrial preparations.
7	cellular aspects of local antibody response in rabbits	Cellular Aspects of the Local Immune Response in Rabbits.
7	the part played by cell mediated immunity in mycoplasma respiratory infections	The role of cellular-mediated immunity (cellular-mediated immunity) in mycoplasmic respiratory infections.
7	role of respiratory viruses in childhood mortality	Child mortality due to respiratory viruses.
7	effects of alpha and beta receptor stimulating and blocking agents on experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation	Effects of alpha- and beta-receptor blocking and stimulation agents on the experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation.
7	comparative effects of proteinase inhibitors plasminogen antiactivators heparin and acetylsalicylic acid on the experimental disseminated intravascular coagulation induced by thormbin	Comparative effects of proteinase inhibitors, plasminogen antiactivators, heparin, and acetylsalicylic acid (ACA) on experimental thormbin-induced disseminated intravascular coagulation.
7	the lung colony assay extension to the lewis lung tumour and the b16 melanoma radiosensitivity of b16 melanoma cells	L' Lung Colony Trial has been extended to Lewis Lung Tumour and the radiosensitivity of melanoma b16 in melanoma cells.
7	formation of cysteinyldopa from glutathionedopa in melanoma	Cysteine formation-yldopa from melanoma glutathioneedopa.
7	lung expansion and the formation of the alveolar lining layer in the fullterm newborn rabbit	Lung expansion and alveolar layer formation in the new-term rabbit.
7	relationship of ehrlichia canis infected mononuclear cells to blood vessels of lungs	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases, including Alzheimer's disease.
7	the effect of in utero decapitation on the morphological and physiological development of the fetal rabbit lung	L' effect of in utero decapitation on morphological and physiological rabbit fetal lung development.
7	effects of airway versus arterial co2 changes on lung mechanics in dogs	Canadian Wildlife Service, Environment Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
7	interrelations between pulmonary liquid volumes and lung compliance	Pulmonary fluid volume inter-relationships with pulmonary compliance.
7	influence of cycloheximide on the lung	L' the influence of cycloheximide (cycloheximide) on the lungs.
7	pulmonary diffusing capacity and capillary blood volume in aging dogs	Pulmonary diffusion capacity and volume of blood in the capillaries of aging dogs.
7	lung mechanics in hypervolemic pulmonary edema	Acute pulmonary mechanics in the lung; hypervolemic pulmonary edema.
7	distribution of ventilation perfusion ratios in dogs with normal and abnormal lungs	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	branching pattern of airways and air spaces of a single human terminal bronchiole	Acute bronchiolosis is a rare form of bronchiolitis, which can be found in the respiratory tract and respiratory tract.
7	human air space shapes sizes areas and volumes	It is also the largest city in the world and the second largest city in the world.
7	cell mediated cytotoxicity to human pulmonary neoplasms	Human lung neoplasms: cell-mediated cytotoxicity for human lung neoplasms.
7	aerosol metallic paints deliberate inhalation a study of inhalation and or ingestion of copper and zinc particles	Inhalation is defined as the process by which a substance is administered to the environment.
7	pulmonary granulomatous pneumocystosis following renal transplantation report of a case	Pulmonary granulomatous pneumocyste following kidney transplant.
7	neonatal pneumopericardium	NICU pneumopericardium.
7	lymphangiomyomatosis report of a case with ureteral involvement and chyluria	One case of urethral-chyluria lymphangiomyomatosis has been reported.
7	the mucosubstance coating the pneumonocytes in the lungs of xenopus laevis and lacerta viridis	Mucosubstance that covers pneumonocytes in xenopus laevis and lacerta viridis lungs.
7	ultrastructure of the lung in loeffler s pneumonia	Lapos; Ultrastructural Lung in Loeffler's Pneumonia.
7	a prospective evaluation of the lecithin sphingomyelin ratio and the rapid surfactant test in relation to fetal pulmonary maturity	Prospective evaluation of lecithin ratio-sphingomyelin and rapid surfactant testing in relation to fetal lung maturity.
7	amniotic fluid phospholipids and fatty acids in normal pregnancies relation to gestational age and neonatal condition	In normal pregnancy, the phospholipids and fatty acids in the amniotic fluid are related to the age of gestation and the condition of the neonate.
7	endocrine influences on pulmonary maturation and the lecithin sphingomyelin ratio in the fetal baboon	Endocrine Influences on Pulmonary Maturation and Lecithin Ratio-Sphingomyelin in Fetal Baboon.
7	fetal maturity biochemical analyses of amniotic fluid	Biochemical analysis of the fetal maturity of the amniotic fluid.
7	influence of lung parenchyma on collapsibility of dog bronchi	Pulmonary parenchyma influences collaptability of dog bronchi.
7	lung lavage using a single lumen endotracheal tube	Single-lumen endotracheal tube; help with lung washing.
7	increased sheep lung vascular permeability caused by pseudomonas bacteremia	Increased vascular pulmonary permeability of sheep due to pseudomonas bacteremia.
7	the relation of endogenous adenosine cyclic 3 5 monophosphate to the antagonistic effects of adenosine and colchicine on cell shape	The relationship between monophosphate d' endogenous cyclic adenosine 3-5 and the antagonistic effects of etapos; adenosine and colchicine on the shape of the cells.
7	distribution and seasonal prevalence of bovine lungworms in selected areas in western montana	Distribution and seasonal prevalence of the bovine pulmonary worms in certain regions of the western montana.
7	lung function consequences of dust exposure in asbestos cement manufacturing plants	Effects on lung function; exposure to dust in foam manufacturing plants; and, asbestos.
7	bacterial contamination of organic dusts effects on pulmonary cell reactions	Effects of bacterial organic dust contamination on lung cell responses.
7	reaction of cultured adult and fetal lung to prednisolone and thyroxine	Fetal and adult lungs cultured with prednisolone and thyroxine.
7	ultrastructural alterations observed in mouse lung after prolonged he o2 exposure	Ultrastructural alterations were observed in the lungs of mice following prolonged exposure to the sulfur dioxide.
7	increased susceptibility to pulmonary oxygen toxicity after cholesterol biosynthesis inhibition	Increased sensitivity to apo air toxicity; post-acid oxygen; inhibition of cholesterol biosynthesis.
7	phosphatidyglycerol in rat lung ii comparison of occurrence composition and metabolism in surfactant and residual lung fractions	Phosphatidyglycerol in rat lung ii compares the composition and metabolism of the surfactant and the residual fractions of the lung.
7	changes in the number of binding sites for ribonucleic acid polymerase in chromatin of wi 38 fibroblasts stimulated to proliferate	Changes in number of l&apos-binding sites; ribonucleic acid polymerase (RAC) in chromatin from 38 stimulated wi fibroblasts.
7	location and abundance of poly a sequences in sendai virus messenger rna molecules	Poly a sequence localization and abundance in rna messenger molecules of sendai virus.
7	differential feulgen deoxyribonucleic acid hydrolysis patterns of herpes simplex virus type 1 and type 2 infected cells	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
7	immune complexes in cystic fibrosis	Immune complex cystic fibrosis.
7	ultrastructure of rabbit lung intravenously infected with mycobacterium simiae weiszfeiler no 52	Intravenously infected rabbit lung ultrastructure with simiae weiszfeiler no.
7	the mechanism of damage to neutrophils in allergic reactions in tuberculosis	The role of the immune system in the development of the immune system.
7	failure of pentamidine isethionate to provide chemoprophylaxis against pneumocytis carinii infection in rats	Inadequacy of apos; pentamidine isethionate to provide anti-apos chemoprophylaxis; rat pneumocytis carinii infection.
7	acute immunologic pulmonary alveolitis	Immune pulmonary alveolitis, acute.
7	association of asbestos and bronchogenic carcinoma in a population with low asbestos exposure	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
7	characterization of lung surfactant factors promoting formation of artifactual lipid protein complexes	Characterization of the respiratory surfactant promoting the formation of artificial lipid protein complexes.
7	chromatographic analyses of 3 methylcholanthrene metabolism in adult and fetal mice and the occurrence of conjugating enzymes in the fetus	Chromatographic analysis of metabolism of 3 methylcholanthrenes in fetal and adult mice and conjugated enzymes in fetus.
7	in vitro metabolism and microsome mediated mutagenicity of dialkylnitrosamines in rat hamster and mouse tissues	In vitro metabolism and mutagenicity mediated by the microsomes of dialkylnitrosamine in tissues of the hamster and rat mouse.
7	peptidyl proline hydroxylase in adult developing and neoplastic rat tissues	Pepidyl proline hydroxylase in tissues of neoplastic and developing adult rats.
7	aminopeptidases and arylamidases in normal and cancer tissues in humans	Aminopeptidase and arylamidase activities in human normal and cancerous tissues.
7	baroreceptor and chemoreceptor influences on heart rate during the respiratory cycle in the dog	Heart rate influences of baroreceptors and chemoreceptors during the breathing cycle in dogs.
7	rhinovirus rna polymerase products and kinetics of appearance in human diploid cells	Product of rna polymerase rhinovirus and protein kinetics; appearance in human diploid cells.
7	demonstration that the atria ventricles and lungs each are responsible for a tonic inhibition of the vasomotorcenter in the dog	Demonstration that the ventricles of the atrium and lungs are each responsible for the vasomotorization in dogs.
7	continuous inhibition of renin release in dogs by vagally innervated receptors in the cardiopulmonary region	L' continuous inhibition of renin release in the dog by receptors innervated vagally in the cardiopulmonary region.
7	arterial lysosomes and connective tissue in primate atherosclerosis and hypertension	Connective tissue and arterial lysosomes in apos; primate atherosclerosis and apos; hypertension.
7	abolition of natural tolerance and the influence of the chemical allergen beryllium on autoimmune processes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other allergens that can be used in the treatment of allergic reactions.
7	maximal oxygen uptake lung volume and ventilatory response to carbon dioxide and hypoxia in a pair of identical twin athletes	The maximum pulmonary volume of consumption of oxygen and the ventilatory response to carbon dioxide and lapos; hypoxia in two identical twin athletes.
7	a new radiologic sign of subpulmonic effusion	A new d&apos radiological sign; effusion under-lung.
7	goodpasture s syndrome author s transl	Translation of Initiator of Goodpasture Syndrome.
7	filaroides hirthi sp n nematoda metastrongyloidea from the lung of the dog	Filaroides hirthi sp nematoda metastrongyloide dog lung.
7	pulmonary emphysema and liver disease occurrence in an alpha antitrypsin deficient adult	Liver disease and emphysema in an adult with alpha antitrypsin deficiency.
7	methods to preclude aspiration or swallowing of dental appliances	It can also be used to reduce the amount of oxygen that can be absorbed by the body.
7	the pathogenesis of infections of the mouse caused by virulent and avirulent variants of an influenza virus	Pathogenesis of mouse infections caused by avirulent and virulent variants of influenza virus.
7	the role of cardiac sympathetic discharges during the pulmonary depressor reflex	The role of cardiac sympathetic outbursts during the pulmonary arterial depressant reflex.
7	certain problems of intensive therapy of acute myocardial infarct	Acute myocardial infarction.
7	principles of early postoperative management of patients after open heart surgery	Principles for Early Postoperative Treatment of Patients Following Open Heart Surgery.
7	multiple herpesvirus simiae isolation from a rhesus monkey which died of cerebral infarction	Hepatitis C virus is a virus that causes the death of a person who is infected with the virus.
7	influence of cotton dust inhalation on free lung cells in rats and guinea pigs	Influence of apo; inhalation of cotton dust on rat and guinea-pig free lung cells.
7	the role of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the division of wi 38 cells the cellular response to prostaglandin e1 and the effects of an cyclic adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate analogue and prostaglandin e1 on cell division	The role of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in wi 38 cell division, prostaglandin e1 cell response and d&apos effects; a cyclic analog of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and prostaglandin e1 cell division.
7	variations in pulmonary antibacterial defenses among experimental animals	Variations in laboratory animal antibacterial defenses.
7	inhibition by derivatives of phloretin of anaphylactic histamine release from human lung tissue and of prostaglandin f2alpha induced bronchoconstriction	The inhibition by phloretin derivatives of the release of d*apos; anaphylactic histamine from human lung tissue and prostaglandin f2alpha induced bronchoconstriction.
7	histamine in the tissues of the marsupial setonix brachyurus the quokka	Histamine in marsupial setonix brachyurus tissues quokka.
7	radiographically determined lung volumes at full inspiration and during dynamic forced expiration in normal subjects	In normal subjects, lung volume was determined by x-ray at the maximum of breath and dynamic forced exhalation.
7	cardiac and pulmonary effects of acebutolol	Heart and lung effects of acebutol.
7	oxygen toxicity in the newborn the effect of prolonged 100 per cent o2 exposure on the lungs of newborn mice	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the assessment of risk.
7	pulmonary insufficiency induced by oleic acid in the sheep a model for investigation of extracorporeal oxygenation	Apos-induced pulmonary insufficiency; sheep oleic acid, a model for apos; study of apos; extracorporeal oxygenation.
7	isolation and some serological and epidemiological data on the viruses recovered from patients with subacute thyroiditis de quervain	Isolation and some serologic and epidemiologic data on recovered viruses in patients with subacute quervain thyroiditis.
7	effects of prolonged administration of chlorphentermine on the rat lung	Effects of Apos; Prolonged Administration of Chlorphentermine to Rat Lung.
7	detection by means of cell fusion of macromolecular synthesis involved in the reconstruction of the nuclear envelope in mitosis	The detection, by cell fusion, of macromolecular synthesis, which is involved in the reconstruction of the apos; nuclear cell envelope during mitosis.
7	collagen in the human lung quantitation of rates of synthesis and partial characterization of composition	Collagen in human lung quantification of synthesis rates and partial composition characterization.
7	histamine release formation of prostaglandin like activity srs c and mast cell degranulation by the direct lytic factor dlf and phospholipase a of cobra venom	L' histamine releases prostaglandin formation such as srsc activity and direct lytic factor degranulation of mast cells and phospholipase from cobra venom.
7	metabolism and autoradiographic distribution of delta 8 and delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol in some organs of the monkey callithrix jacchus	Metabolism and autoradiographic distribution of tetrahydrocannabinol delta 8 and delta 9 in callithrix jacchus monkey organs.
7	liquid breathing trials and animal studies with a demand regulated liquid breathing system	Liquid breathing tests and liquid-breathing studies controlled by demand.
7	automated system for measurement of mechanics of breathing	Automated Respiratory Mechanics Measurement System.
7	gamma ray densitometry in the analysis of hemodynamic function	Hemodynamic function analysis.
7	quantitative comparison of techniques used to measure complement mediated cytotoxicity of nucleated cells	Quantitative comparison of nucleated cell complement-mediated cytotoxicity techniques.
7	edge sharpness and enhancement of electron radiographs ergs produced with powder cloud development	The sharpness of edges and l' improvement of ergs electronic x-rays produced by cloud powder development.
7	experimental immune complex disease of the lung the pathogenesis of a laboratory model resembling certain human interstitial lung diseases	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases that may be considered to be of interest to the Canadian public.
7	induction of blood eosinophilia by pulmonary embolization of antigen coated particles the relationship to cell mediated immunity	Induction of eosinophilia; eosinophilia of the blood by pulmonary embolization of particles coated with apos; antigen the relationship with the apos; cell-mediated immunity.
7	intralobar pulmonary sequestration in lymphoid and vascular hamartia	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	intracellular supravital stain delocalization as an assay for antibody dependent complement mediated cell damage	Relocation of intracellular supravital staining as a test for complement-mediated cellular damage.
7	quantitative extraction of tubocurarine gallamine and decamethonium from biological materials	Quantitative extraction of gallamine and of decamethonium tubocurarines from biological materials.
7	effects of therapeutic irradiation delivered in early childhood upon subsequent lung function	In addition to the above, there are a number of health effects associated with the use of radiation in children.
7	chemoreceptor reflexes in preterm infants ii the effect of gestational and postnatal age on the ventilatory response to inhaled carbon dioxide	Acute and chronic respiratory infections are associated with a wide range of chronic conditions, including respiratory, respiratory, respiratory, respiratory, and respiratory.
7	extravascular lung water following hemorrhagic shock in the baboon comparison between resuscitation with ringer s lactate and plasmanate	Extravascular pulmonary water following dosing; hemorrhagic shock in comparison baboon between resuscitation with serum lactate and plasmanate.
7	cultivation and survival studies of neisseria gonorrhoeae in a human diploid cell strain	Studies of the growth and survival of neisseria gonorrhoeae in a strain of human diploid cells.
7	a new model for neonatal pulmonary hemorrhage research	A New Model for Neonatal Lung Hemorrhage Research.
7	the significance of circulating glycerol as a precursor of pulmonary phosphatidylcholine in the developing mammalian lung	L' importance of circulating glycerol as a lung phosphatidylcholine precursor in developing mammalian lungs.
7	lamb fetal pulmonary fluid i validation and significance of method for determination of volume and volume change	Validation and significance of the method for determining changes in fetal lung fluid volume and volume; lamb i.
7	lamb fetal pulmonary fluid ii fate of phosphatidylcholine	Fetal Lung Liquid d' Lamb ii to become a liquid phosphatidylcholine.
7	the enzymes of lecithin biosynthesis in human neonatal lungs iv phosphorylcholine cytidyltransferase	Enzymes of Lecithin Biosynthesis in Human Neonatal Lungs iv phosphorylcholine cytidyltransferase.
7	cerebral etiology of the acute respiratory distress syndrome diphenylhydantoin prophylaxis	Acute respiratory distress syndrome cerebral etiology, diphenylhydantoin prophylaxis.
7	increased rna synthesis in nuclear monolayers of wi 38 cells stimulated to proliferate	Increased rna synthesis in stimulated wi 38 nuclear monolayers.
7	inhibition by levamisole of metastases by cells transformed by herpes simplex virus type i	Lapos; cell-transformed cell-mediated levamisole inhibition of metastasis; herpes simplex type i.
7	differential effects of prostaglandins a1 and a2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in the dog	Differential Effects of Prostaglandins a1 and a2 on Pulmonary Vascular Resistance in Dogs.
7	alveolar lavage cytology in transplanted lungs i staining methods and findings in dogs with autografts and allografts without immunosuppression	In addition to the above-mentioned studies, the results of a randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, randomized, placebo-controlled trial.
7	pulmonary problems in duchenne muscular dystrophy diagnosis prophylaxis and treatment	Lung problems in the diagnosis of muscular dystrophy of duchenne prophylaxis and therapy.
7	diagnostic approaches in metastatic lung disease	Diagnostic Approaches to Metastatic Lung Disease.
7	vasoactive intestinal polypoptide inactivation in liver and potentiation in lung of anesthetized dogs 384699	Liver inactivation of vasoactive intestinal polypoptides and lung potentiation in anesthetized dogs 384699.
7	metabolic and dosimetric studies after inhalation of 227th in rats with regard to the risk of lung and bone tumors	Metabolic and Dosimetric Inhalation Studies of 227e in the Rat Regarding the Risk of Lung and Bone Tumours.
7	pulmonary radiographic abnormalities in shock roentgen clinical pathological correlation	Pulmonary X-ray abnormalities in the clinical pathological correlation of the shock-induced roentgen.
7	gallstone in the lung	He's got gallstones in his lungs.
7	experimental infection of calves with respiratory syncytial virus	Respiratory syncytial virus infection in experimental calves.
7	experimental infection of lambs with an aerosol of pasteurella haemolytica	Experimental infection with pasteurella haemolytica aerosol.
7	a model of the pathways of inhaled medicaments to their receptor sites	A model of inhaled drug pathways to their receptor sites.
7	intraspecies differences in lung metabolism and granular pneumocyte mitochondria	Intraspecific differences in mitochondria and pulmonary metabolism of granular pneumocytes.
7	gas transport efficacy of gills lungs and skin theory and experimental data	L' efficiency of gill gas transport, theory of the lungs and skin, and experimental data.
7	postnatal growth of the mammalian lung lack of influence by carbon monoxide exposure	Postnatal lung growth in mammals is not influenced by exposure to carbon monoxide.
7	progress in fetal assessment	Fetal evaluation.
7	a determination of the minimum radiopacification necessary for radiographic detection of an aspirated or swallowed object	Determination of the minimum level of radiopacification required for the radiographic detection of an object that has been swallowed or swallowed.
7	treatment of crenosomiasis in dogs	Dog crenosomiasis treatment.
7	mode of action of chlorambucil initial metabolic studies using carbon 14 isotope labeling rheumatological implications of their results	D&apos mode; action of initial metabolic studies of chlorambucil using 14 radiological implications of their results.
7	sarcoid reactions in pulmonary neoplasms	Pulmonary neoplasm sarcoid reactions.
7	isolation of type c virions from a normal human fibroblast strain	Isolate C-type virions; a normal strain of human fibroblast.
7	pulmonary edema in patients with sepsis	Sepsis patients have pulmonary edema.
7	bronchial venular leakage during endotoxin shock	Bronchial venous leak during endotoxic shock.
7	on glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharide in a case of pulmonary fibrosis author s transl	On mucopolysaccharide glycosaminoglycans in translative fibrosis.
7	lactate formation by the avian lung tissue	Avian lung tissue lactate formation.
7	comprehensive lung function test for outpatients a present day review and its application	Complete Lung Function Testing for Outpatients a current daytime examination and its application.
7	inflation reflex in the rat	Rat inflationary reflex.
7	dual camera studies of pulmonary function with computer processing of data	Computerized Lung Function Dual Camera Studies.
7	the fat embolism syndrome	Fat embolism.
7	clearing patterns of pulmonary infarction and slowly resolving pneumonia	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada, and Australia.
7	methacholine a 7 day inhalation toxicity study with primates	Inhalation studies in primates were performed for 7 days; in rats, the duration of the study was 7 days.
7	effects of intratracheal instillation of dactinomycin on pulmonary edema and phosphatase activity of the lung lavage fluid in rats	Effects of apo; intratracheal dactinomycin instillation on apos; pulmonary edema and l' lung lavage phosphatase activity in the rat.
7	conditioned medium from plateau phase cells effect on growth of proliferative cells and on repair of potentially lethal radiation damage	The conditioned medium from the plateau phase cells has an effect on proliferative cell growth and on the repair of potentially lethal radiation-induced damage.
7	idiopathic progressive pulmonary fibrosis	Progressive, idiopathic lung fibrosis.
7	absorption of phenol red from the human lung	L' phenol red absorption from human lungs.
7	growth and development of human fetal trachea and lung in immune deprived mice	Growth and fetal tracheal and lung development in the immunocompromised mice.
7	patho histological findings on pulmonary biopsy in patients after mitral commissurotomy and morphometric studies of the upper and lower pulmonary lobes author s transl	Histological pathological studies of lung biopsy in patients following mitral commissurotomy and upper and lower lung lobe morphometric studies.
7	increase of dermatan sulfate in a case of pulmonary fibrosis	Increased dermatane sulfate for pulmonary fibrosis.
7	zwoegerziekte virus the causative agent for progressive interstitial pneumonia maedi and meningo leucoencephalitis visna in sheep	Zwoegerziekte virus is a causative agent of progressive interstitial pneumonia, and meningo leukoencephalitis, in sheep.
7	evolution of spirographic patterns in pulmonary bilaterally denervated dogs	Spirographic pattern changes in pulmonary dogs denervated bilaterally and bilaterally.
7	the effect of n nitrosomethylurea on organ cultures of human embryonal lung tissue	Effects of nitrosomethylurea on human embryonic lung tissue organ cultures.
7	the effect of n nitrosomethylurea on organ cultures of human embryonal lung tissue	Effects of nitrosomethylurea on human embryonic lung tissue organ cultures.
7	the metabolism of 3 h cortisone and 3 h cortisol by the isolated perfused rat and guinea pig lungs	Metabolism of 3-h cortisone and 3-h cortisol by isolated perfused lungs of rats and guinea pigs.
7	cellular proliferation induced in the lung by cadmium aerosol	Cumulative effects of cadmium aerosols on the lungs.
7	asbestos exposure and multiple primary tumors	Exposure to asbestos-containing compounds; multiple primary tumours.
7	alpha antitrypsin pi types in postmortem blood	Pi-type antitrypsin alpha in blood post-mortem.
7	hyperlucent lung after radiation therapy	Post-radiation hyperglucid lungs.
7	iniencephalus apertus report of a case author s transl	An author of translations.
7	biosynthesis of collagen and mode of action of d penicillamine author s transl	Collagen biosynthesis and apo mode; apo action; penicillamine translator.
7	spontaneous perforation of the proximal colon following lung surgery	Spontaneous proximal colon perforation following lung surgery.
7	pulmonary tumourlets	Tumors.
7	corticosteroids in clinical and experimental lung transplantation	Corticosteroids in Clinical and Experimental Lung Transplantation.
7	purification and some properties of arginase from human lung	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used in humans.
7	accumulation of alprenolol in some polypeptide hormone producing cells and in melanin containing tissues	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that melanin can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent.
7	dual infections of mice visceral larva migrans and sublethal infection with japanese encephalitis virus	Double larval migrating visceral mouse infection and sublethal Japanese encephalitis infection.
7	the pathology of naturally occurring bovine schistosomiasis in the sudan	Bovine schistosomiasis d' natural southern origin.
7	pulmonary complications of acute myocardial infarct therapeutic orientation	Acute myocardial infarction and myocardial infarction.
7	naturally occurring tyzzer s disease bacillus piliformis infection in horse foals	A natural infection of horses with the Tyzzer's disease bacillus.
7	a case of polytetrafluoroethylene poisoning in cockatiels accompanied by polymer fume fever in the owner	A case of poisoning with polytetrafluoroethylene in cockatiels accompanied by a fever of polymer fumes in the owner.
7	an evaluation of the inhalation toxicity of one commercial proteolytic enzyme preparation	Inhalation Toxicity Evaluation of Apos; a Commercial Proteolytic Preparation; Enzymes.
7	histamine induction and release following proteolytic enzyme exposure	Induction and release of apos; histamine as a result of exposure to proteolytic enzymes.
7	hematologic responses to prolonged extracorporeal circulation ecc with microporous membrane devices	Hematological reactions to prolonged, extracorporeal circulation with microporous membrane devices.
7	antihistaminic action of trans delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol	Antihistamine action of tetrahydrocannabinol trans delta 9.
7	cardiophrenic adenopathy in hodgkin disease	Hodgkin's Disease Cardiophrenic Adenopathy.
7	pneumatoceles following hydrocarbon ingestion report of three cases and review of the literature	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature, and are consistent with those reported in the literature.
7	effect of the exposure to cold on the extrathyroidal conversion of l thyroxine to triiodo l thyronine and on intramitochondrial alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity in thyroidectomized rats on l thyroxine	Effect of apo; cold exposure on thyroxine extrathyroid conversion to triiodo-thyronine and l' intramitochondrial alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase activity in thyroxine-treated rats.
7	characteristics of proliferative cells from young old and transformed wi 38 cultures	Characteristics of Growing Cells in Old and Transformed Young Cultures wi 38 cultures.
7	alterations in chromatin functions during aging in vitro	Changes in the functions of chromatin during in vitro aging.
7	relationship between cell kinetic changes and metabolic events during cell senescence in vitro	The relationship between cellular kinetic changes and metabolic events during the course of cell senescence in vitro.
7	time lapse cinemicrophotographic studies of cell division patterns of human diploid fibroblasts wi 38 during their in vitro lifespan	Chronological cinemicrophotographic studies of human diploid fibroblast cell division patterns during their lifetime in vitro.
7	the amniotic fluid foam test l s ratio and total phospholipids in the evaluation of fetal lung maturity	The foam of amniotic fluid tests the ratio and the total phospholipids in the cell; evaluation of the fetal lung maturity.
7	inhalatory infection of mice with influenza a0 pr8 virus i the site of primary virus replication and its spread in the respiratory tract	Mouse Inhalation Infection with Influenza Virus a0 pr8 at apos; site of primary replication and respiratory tract spread.
7	effect of 60amino 6 deoxy d glucose hydrochloride on influenza infection in mice	Influenza A. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B. Influenza B.
7	interferon production by rabies strains isolated from wild rodents	In addition, it is estimated that the number of rabies cases per 100,000 population will increase.
7	depression of pulmonary 5 hydroxytryptamine uptake by metabolic inhibitors	Dietary intake of 1,4-dichloroethane, 2-butoxyethanol, 2-butoxyethanol, 2-butoxyethanol and 2-butoxyethanol.
7	bacteremia and postmortem microbiology in burned children	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	pulmonary infection due to disruption of the pharyngeal bacterial flora by antibiotics in hamsters	Pulmonary infection due to hamster antibiotic disruption of pharyngeal bacterial flora.
7	risk of respiratory distress syndrome as determined by amniotic fluid lecithin concentration	Risk of Respiratory Distress Syndrome as determined by the concentration of lecithin in amniotic fluid.
7	amniotic fluid phospholipids and fetal lung maturity i assessment of various methods of determining lecithin and sphingomyelin	Evaluation of phospholipids in the amniotic fluid and of fetal lung maturity i of various methods for determination of lecithin and sphingomyelin.
7	pulmonary embolism associated with surgically proved deep venous thrombosis	Pulmonary embolism is associated with deep, surgically proven, venous thrombosis.
7	experimental investigations on the effectiveness of fenbendazole in parasitic helminths of the stomach intestines and lung of cattle author s transl	Experimental studies on fenbendazole efficacy in helminths in bovine stomach and lung guts were conducted.
7	a comparison of two heated water bath humidifiers	It's a good way to get a feel for your body.
7	evaluation of infant ventilators	Apo fan evaluation; apo fan child; apo fan child; apo team; evaluation.
7	isolation of two turkey influenza a viruses in minnesota	Two turkey flu virus isolation in Minnesota.
7	acute copper toxicosis in the canada goose	Ontario Ministry of Agriculture, Food and Rural Affairs.
7	candida tropicalis infecting the respiratory tract of turkeys in israel	Canda tropicalis infects turkeys' airways in the intestines.
7	the effects of cosmic particle radiation on pocket mice aboard apollo xvii v preflight studies on tolerance of pocket mice to oxygen and heat part ii effects on lungs	The Effects of Cosmic Radiation on Pocket Mice on Board D' Apollo xvii v Pre@-@ Light Studies on Pocket Mice Tolerance to Apos; Oxygen and Heat Part ii Effects on Lungs.
7	the effects of cosmic particle radiation on pocket mice aboard apollo xvii appendix iii evaluation of viscera and other tissues	Effects of Cosmic Radiation on Pocket Mice on Board; Appendix iii of Appendix; Apollo xvii, Visceral and Dapo Evaluation; Other Fabrics.
7	influence of hypothalamic hyperphagia on tolerance of lung to explosive decompression	Hypothalamic hyperphagia on the tolerance of the lungs to explosive decompression.
7	giant cell carcinoma of lung a cytologic evaluation	Pulmonary giant-cell carcinoma, cytological evaluation.
7	quantitation in morphology possibilities and limits	The quantification in the morphological possibilities and the limits in the possibilities and the limits.
7	ultrastructural studies on cells of hamster lung cultures after chronic exposure to whole smoke or the gas vapour phase of cigarettes	Ultrastructural studies on lung culture cells of hamster following chronic exposure to the gas phase or whole smoke of cigarettes.
7	postmortem fixation of human lungs for electron microscopy	Human lung post-fixation @-@mortem for electron microscopy.
7	lung growth after unilateral pneumonectomy quantitation of collagen synthesis and content	Pulmonary growth following unilateral pneumonectomy, quantification of synthesis and collagen content.
7	isolation and chemical characterization of collagen in bovine pulmonary tissues	Chemically characterizing and isolating collagen in the pulmonary tissues of cattle.
7	acid base disorders application of total body carbon dioxide titration in anesthesia	Application of the acidic disorders-basic of titration of total body carbon dioxide in l'apos; anaesthesia.
7	isolation and characterization of acidic structural glycoproteins in pulmonary tissues	Isolation and Characterization of Acid Structural Glycoproteins in Lung Tissues.
7	subcellular localization of pulmonary antiotensin converting enzyme kininase ii	Subcellular localization; conversion enzyme; pulmonary antiotensin kininase ii.
7	advances in the treatment of pulmonary alveolar proteinosis	Advances in Treatment of Pulmonary Alveolar Proteinosis.
7	methyl iodide intoxication a case report	It is not possible to determine the cause of the illness.
7	tracheal mucous transport in beagles after long term exposure to 1 ppm sulfur dioxide	Canadian Environmental Protection Act, 1999. http://www.ec.gc.ca/eco-eco-eco-eco.html.
7	long term exposure to sulfur dioxide sulfuric acid mist fly ash and their mixtures results of studies in monkeys and guinea pigs	Long-term exposure to sulfur dioxide, sulfuric acid, fly ash and mixtures is the result of monkey and guinea-pig studies.
7	primary amyloidosis of the respiratory tract	Primary airway amyloidosis.
7	pulmonary responses of unilateral positive end expiratory pressure peep on experimental fat embolism	Pulmonary responses to positive unilateral expiratory pressure at the end of the exposure period were observed during experimental adipose embolism.
7	epidemiological implications of environmental cadmium i the probable utility of human hair for occupational trace metal cadmium screening	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the effects of cadmium on human health and the environment, as well as on human health.
7	orbital and conjunctival involvement in multiple myeloma report of a case	In addition, it is not possible to determine the cause of the malignant neoplasm.
7	cytomegalovirus studies of autopsy tissue i virus isolation	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the virus is present in the body.
7	cytomegalovirus studies of autopsy tissue ii incidence of inclusion bodies and related pathologic data	Cytomegalovirus studies in autopsied tissues ii Included body incidence and pathology.
7	unusual ultrastructural features of a leiomyosarcoma of the lung	Unusual ultrastructural characteristics of lung leiomyosarcoma.
7	unusual ultrastructural features of leiomyosarcoma of the lung	Ultrastructural characteristics of pulmonary leiomyosarcomas.
7	herpetic tracheobronchitis cytologic and virologic detection	Herpetic tracheobronchitis cytological and virologic detection.
7	changes in functional residual capacity of the lung after operation	The results of this study are summarized in Appendix A.
7	inhibition of cardiolipin synthesis following infection with herpes simplex virus	In addition, it was noted that there is a lack of evidence to support this claim.
7	eosinophilic gastroenteritis with malabsorption extensive villous atrophy recurrent hemorrhage and chronic pulmonary fibrosis	Gastro-eosinophilic enteritis with widespread villositary hemorrhagic atrophy and chronic pulmonary fibrosis.
7	radiologic evaluation of the premature newborn rabbit after pharyngeal deposition of surfactant	Radiological evaluation of premature new-rabbit born following pharyngeal deposition of d' surfactant.
7	oncocytes a system of serotoninocytes	Oncocyte serotonin cell system.
7	pathological anatomy of pneumonia in mycoplasma pneumoniae infection in children	Infection with mycoplasma pneumonia in children; infection with mycoplasma pneumonia.
7	collagen metabolism in rat lungs during chronic intermittent exposure to oxygen	Collagen metabolism in the lungs of rats during exposure; intermittent chronic exposure to apo; oxygen.
7	transversal and longitudinal lecithin sphingomyelin ratios in amniotic and lung fluids of fetal lambs	Cross-sectional and longitudinal ratio of lecithin sphingomyelins in fetal lambs' amniotic and pulmonary fluids.
7	extraction and preliminary characterization of a human bronchogenic carcinoma antigen	Antimicrobial Resistance in Human Bronchogenic Cervical Cancer.
7	study of the antigenic cross reactivity between carcinoembryonic antigen and nonspecific cross reacting antigens nca and nca 2	Study of carcinoembryonic antigen cross-reactivity with nonspecific crossed antigens nca and nca 2.
7	enzymatic formation of inosine 3 5 monophosphate and of 2 deoxyguanosine 3 5 monophosphate inosinate and deoxyguanylate cyclase activity	Enzymatic formation of l' inosine 3,5 monophosphate and deoxyguanosine 2,35 monophosphate, inosinate, and deoxyguanylate cyclase.
7	lipoprotein lipase in rat lung the effect of fasting	Lipoprotein lipase in rat lung, fasting effect.
7	pulmonary lymphangiomyomatosis a review	Lung angiomyomatosis.
7	differential in vivo pulmonary degradation of prostaglandins e1 b1 and a1	Differential in vivo pulmonary degradations of prostaglandins, e1 b1 and a1.
7	enzymic n acetylation of 2 4 toluenediamine by liver cytosols from various species	Acetylation of 24 toluenediamine by hepatic cytosols of various species.
7	roentgenographic findings in fucosidosis type 2	Type 2 fucoside roentgenography results.
7	the circle system without absorber use with controlled ventilation	It's the perfect solution for your needs.
7	new advances in pulmonary gas exchange	It's the only thing that makes it so much fun.
7	inhibition of benzo alpha pyrene metabolism catalyzed by mouse and hamster lung microsomes	Inhibition of the metabolism of benzo alpha pyrene catalyzed by the pulmonary microsomes of mice and hamsters.
7	characterization of a rat lung microsomal fraction obtained by sepharose 2b ultrafiltration	Characterization of a microsomal fraction of rat lung obtained by ultrafiltration to serpharose 2b.
7	excretion of carbon 14 labeled aflatoxin b1 via bile urine and intestinal contents of the chicken	Apos; 14C-labeled aflatoxin b1 via apos; chicken biliary urine and intestinal contents.
7	coincidence of sarcoidosis and hashimoto s thyroiditis	This is the first time that a person has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
7	occult pulmonary hemorrhage in anticoagulated patients	Occult pulmonary bleeding in anticoagulated patients.
7	adult respiratory distress syndrome in postoperative patients study of pulmonary pathology in shock lung with prophylactic and therapeutic implications	Lapses Respiratory Distress Syndrome; Adult in Post-operative Patients, Study of Lung Pathology in Shock Lungs with Prophylactic and Therapeutic Implications.
7	respiratory tract disease from thermosetting resins study of an outbreak in rubber tire workers	Respiratory disease caused by heat-devastating resins Dos Study; outbreak in rubber tire workers.
7	do the severity and duration of rheumatoid arthritis influence pulmonary ventilation	Does the severity and duration of the rheumatoid arthritis affect the ventilation of the lungs?
7	fatal self administration of sodium azide	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	maternal and transplacental kinetics of trimethoprim and sulfamethoxazole separately and in combination	Maternal and placental kinetics of sulfamethoxazole and trimethoprim separately and in combination.
7	monolayer cultures of human prostatic cells	Human prostatic cell monolayers.
7	localization of polycyclic hydrocarbon carcinogens in the lung following intratracheal instillation in gelatin solution	Localization of carcinogenic polycyclic hydrocarbons in the lungs after instillation intratracheal in a gelatine solution.
7	species differences in the effect of benzo alpha pyrene ferric oxide on the respiratory tract of rats and hamsters	Species differences in apos; effect of pyrene benzo alpha ferric oxide on rat and hamster respiratory tract.
7	occurrence of hemangiosarcomas in beagles with internally deposited radionuclides	In addition, it is not possible to determine the presence of any radionuclide in the environment.
7	damage and repair of dna in various tissues of the rat induced 4 nitroquinoline 1 oxide	Alteration and repair of apos; DNA in various rat tissues was found to induce 4 nitroquinoline oxides.
7	d valine as a selective agent for normal human and rodent epithelial cells in culture	Valine as selective agent for normal epithelial cells in human and cultured rodents.
7	drying and irradiation of calf and horse serum i influence on the growth of cell cultures and mycoplasmas	Dried and irradiated sera from calves and horses influence the growth of both cell cultures and mycoplasmas.
7	effect of increased vascular pressure on lung fluid balance in unanesthetized sheep	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack, stroke, stroke, stroke and stroke.
7	effect of exercise on dilution estimates of extravascular lung water and on the carbon monoxide diffusing capacity in normal adults	Effects of apo; exercise on extravascular lung water dilution estimates and carbon monoxide diffusion capacity in normal adults.
7	the echocardiographic assessment of pulmonary artery pressure and pulmonary vascular resistance	L' echocardiographic evaluation of pulmonary arterial pressure and of pulmonary vascular resistance.
7	desquamative fibrosing alveolitis unresponsive to steroid or cytotoxic therapy	Fibrosing, non-steroidal- or cytotoxic-insensitive desquamative alveolite.
7	mechanism of the serotonin effect on lung transvascular fluid and protein movement in awake sheep	Serotonin affects the movement of proteins and pulmonary transvascular fluid in conscious sheep.
7	effect of thyroid hormones on activity of nonspecific phosphohydrolases in blood serum tissues and liver mitochondrial fraction of white rat	Thyroid hormone effect on apos; nonspecific phosphohydrolase activity in blood serum tissue and hepatic mitochondrial fraction of white rat.
7	pulmonary fungal infection complicating treated malignant disease	An infection of the lungs that complicates the treatment of the disease.
7	a study of various changes in transfer ribonucleic acid methylase activity during adenovirus 12 transformation in vitro	A study of a variety of changes in apos; apos activity; transfer ribonucleic acid methylase during apos transformation; adenovirus 12 in vitro.
7	cryptogenic fibrosing alveolitis	Cryptogenic fibrosing alveolite, please.
7	pulmonary granulomas in a patient with pulmonary veno occlusive disease	Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology, 3: 10-11.
7	cardiopulmonary changes following 24 36 hours of hyperoxia	Changes in cardio-respiratory function after 24.36 hours; hyperoxia.
7	development of a live attenuated varicella vaccine	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
7	application of a live attenuated varicella vaccine to hospitalized children and its protective effect on spread of varicella infection	The goal of this project is to improve the quality of life of Canadian children and their families by improving the quality of life for children.
7	purification and separation of enveloped and unenveloped herpes simplex virus particles	In addition to the above, there are a number of other infectious diseases, such as hepatitis C and hepatitis C.
7	regional pulmonary function before and after pneumonectomy using 133xenon	Regional Pulmonary Functions Before and After 133xenon Pneumonectomy.
7	volume controlled lung lavage in a woman with cystic fibrosis	Cystic fibrosis is a volume-controlled lung wash.
7	doxycycline concentrations in lung tissue bronchial wall and bronchial secretions	Doxycycline levels in the airway and airway secretions of lung tissue.
7	visualization of doxycycline in lung tissue and sinus secretions by fluorescent techniques	The visualization of doxycycline in the lung tissue and in the secretions of the sinuses using fluorescent techniques.
7	the occurrence of mercury in amphibia	Amphibian mercury.
7	hydatid disease transmission in california a study of the basque connection	Transmission of Hydatidine Diseases in California, Basque Connection Study.
7	fatal disseminated adenovirus infection in a renal transplant recipient	Fatal adenovirus infection spread by a renal transplant recipient.
7	the influence of environmental agents on prostaglandin biosynthesis and metabolism in the lung inhibition of lung 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase by exposure of guinea pigs to 100 per cent oxygen at atmospheric pressure	The effects of environmental agents on the biosynthesis and metabolism of prostaglandins in humans; lung inhibition of 15 lung hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase by apos; exposure to 100% guinea pigs; atmospheric oxygen pressure.
7	respiratory function in pregnant obese women	Obese pregnant women's lung function.
7	the influence of pulmonary growth and development on paediatric respiratory diseases	Acute and chronic respiratory infections in children and adolescents: an epidemiological study.
7	factors affecting the concentration of combustible gases in the colon during colonoscopy	Factors affecting colonoscopic concentration of combustible gases.
7	effect of the protease inhibitor aprotinin on pulmonary function and on the inhibitory activity of sputum in patients with chronic obstructive bronchitis	Effect of apos; protinin, a protease inhibitor, on lung function and lung function; inhibitory activity; sputum in chronic obstructive bronchitis patients.
7	ventilation and blood gas studies during experimentally produced mendelson s syndrome in the dog	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this hypothesis, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support it.
7	change in end tidal position in children after suxamethonium	Change in child terminal tide position after suxamethonium.
7	thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog i demonstration of microthrombi in lung	Thrombin induced intravascular coagulation, disseminated in the dog, and demonstrated microthrombi in the lung.
7	thrombin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation in the dog ii cardiorespiratory changes during spontaneous and controlled ventilation	Disseminated intravascular coagulation was induced in dogs by thrombin ii cardiorespiratory changes during controlled and spontaneous ventilation.
7	growth and development of the fetal rhesus monkey vi morphometric analysis of the developing lung	Growth and Development of Lapos; Fetal Viometric Morphometric Analysis of Developing Lung Rhesus Monkeys.
7	characteristics of bovine lung as observed by scanning electron microscopy	Characteristics of the bovine lung.
7	determination of fluorocarbon 11 and fluorocarbon 12 in post mortem tissues a case report	Determination of fluorocarbon-11, fluorocarbon-12, in postmortem tissues.
7	studies on the immune response and pathogenesis of sendai virus infection of mice iii the effects of cyclophosphamide	Studies of Immune Response and Disease Pathogenesis in Mice; Infection of Mice with Cyclophosphamide Virus.
7	ultrasonic pulmonary densitometry preliminary studies	Ultrasonic Lung Densitometry Preliminary Studies.
7	changes in template activity and structure of nuclei from wi 38 cells in the prereplicative phase	Changes in apos; wi cell matrix and nucleus structure activity 38 during the pre-replicative phase.
7	xero radiography of the thorax author s transl	X X X X X x x x x x x x x x x x x x x x x x x x x translations.
7	radiological features of the rectal manifestations of myelofibrosis author s transl	Radiological characteristics of rectal myelofibrosis translation from l' author.
7	diagnosis of neisseria infections by defined immunofluorescence methodologic aspects and applications	Identification of defined aspects and methodological applications of immunofluorescence.
7	direct association of messenger rna with microsomal membranes in human diploid fibroblasts	L' direct association of the rna messenger with human diploid fibroblast microsomal membranes.
7	idiopathic scoliosis mechanical properties of the respiratory system and the ventilatory response to carbon dioxide	Idiopathic respiratory system mechanical properties and ventilatory response to carbon dioxide.
7	effects of a molecular change in collagen on lung structure and mechanical function	The effect of the collagen on the structure of the lung and the mechanical function.
7	experimental pulmonary fibrosis induced by soluble immune complex and 60 oxygen atmosphere	Soluble immune complex and 60-oxygen atmosphere induced experimental pulmonary fibrosis.
7	behaviour of local and systemic immunoglobulins in patients with lung cancer	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
7	bovine parainfluenza type 3 virus infection ultrastructural aspects of viral pathogenesis in the bovine respiratory tract	Type 3 bovine parainfluenza virus infection: ultrastructural aspects of bovine respiratory viral pathogenesis.
7	pulmonary perfusion ventilation and gas exchange during modified cobalt 60 teletherapy of operated on breast carcinomas	Ventilation by pulmonary infusion and lapos; exchange of gas during teletherapy with modified cobalt 60 of lapos; operation on the carcinomas of the breast.
7	nicotine inhibition of the metabolism of 3 4 benzopyrene a carcinogen in tobacco smoke	It is important to note that the use of nicotine and nicotine inhibitors for the metabolism of 3-4 benzopyrene, a carcinogen in tobacco smoke.
7	survival of synchronized chinese hamster cells exposed to radiation of different linear energy transfer	Survival of synchronized cells from Chinese hamsters exposed to radiation from various linear transfers of energy.
7	differential diagnosis of a round infiltrative tubercular focus and pulmonary tuberculoma	In addition to the above, there are a number of other types of TB infection.
7	dyspnea in the patient with cardiopulmonary disease	Dyspnea in apo patients; cardiopulmonary disease.
7	streptomycin and kanamycin level in the blood and lungs of guinea pigs when the antibiotics are administered by inhalation and intramuscularly	Streptomycin and kanamycin levels in guinea pig blood and lungs when inhaled and intramuscularly administered.
7	treatment of influenza infection of mice by using rimantadine hydrochlorides by the aerosol and intraperitoneal routes	Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza Influenza.
7	indications for mediatinoscopy author s transl	Guidelines for mediatinoscopic translators.
7	effect of metopirone on the synthesis of lung surfactant in does and fetal rabbits	Effect of Metopirone on Lung Surfactant Synthesis in Rabbits and Fetal Rabbits.
7	effects of chronic oral contraceptive treatment on the conversion of angiotensin i to angiotensin ii in the rat	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the use of angiotensin.
7	age smoking inhalation and pulmonary function	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	effect of maternal malnutrition on surface activity of fetal lungs in rats	The Effect of Maternal Malnutrition on Apos; Fetal Lung Surface Activity in Rats.
7	modification of respiratory center output in the unanesthetized fetal sheep in utero	Changes in pulmonary center flow in unanaesthetized fetal sheep.
7	residual levels and biochemical changes after ventilation with perfluorinated liquid	Residual levels and changes in biochemistry after ventilation with perfluoro fluid.
7	effect of continuous postive pressure ventilation cppv on edema formation in dog lung	It can also be used to reduce the amount of oxygen that can be released into the air.
7	experimentally reversed pulmonary blood flow implications for the surgical management of complex forms of congenital heart disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of heart disease.
7	obstructive pulmonary emphysema evolution of various parameters of pulmonary function and its correlation	Acute pulmonary hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhage.
7	antitussive drugs i cardiopulmonary effects of codeine	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	antitussive drugs ii bronchopulmonary effects of dextromethorphan and doxylamine	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
7	biotransformation and biliary excretion of imipramine in rats under various experimental conditions	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of metabolites, but it is possible to distinguish between the two.
7	pulmonary alveolar proteinosis and histoplasmosis report of three cases	There have been three reported cases of proteinosis in the pulmonary alveolar and histoplasmosis.
7	pulmonary angiotensin converting enzyme structural and catalytic properties	It is also the most common type of angiotensin, which converts the structural and catalytic properties of the enzyme.
7	glucocorticoid receptors in lung comparison between nonactivated and activated forms of the cytoplasmic glucocorticoid binding protein and their relationship to the nuclear binding protein of fetal rabbit lung	Glucocorticoid receptors in the lung comparison between activated and nonactivated cytoplasmic glucocorticoid binding protein forms and their relationship to rabbit fetal lung nuclear-binding protein.
7	compatible bone marrow transplantation and immunologic reconstitution of combined immunodeficiency disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
7	bronchiolar emphysema in a child at the age of 1 1 2 months	One-year-and-two-month-old bronchiolar emphysema.
7	diabetic feto and embryopathies	Diabetic fetal and embryopathies.
7	method for the functional evaluation of contrasted vessels of the lungs with the aid of stereoroentgenogrammetry and morphometry	Procedure; Functional evaluation of opposite vessels from lungs to apos; Helps with stereoentgenogrammetry and morphometry.
7	clinicopathologic characterization of herpesvirus saimiri malignant lymphoma in new zealand white rabbits	Journal of Infectious Diseases, 7(2), pp. 1–23.
7	iodination of herpesvirus nucleic acids	Herpesvirus nucleic acid iodization.
7	enhanced inactivation of prostaglandin e2 by the rabbit lung during pregnancy or progesterone treatment	Increased prostaglandin e2 inactivation by rabbit lung during progesterone or pregnancy.
7	the effect of intrauterine phrenic nerve division on the development of the lungs and diaphragm in fetal rabbits	L' effect of division of the phrenic nerve intra @-@uterine on lung and diaphragm development in the fetal rabbit.
7	congenital respiratory tract defects in lambs	Lamb congenital respiratory defects.
7	cure regression and cell survival a comparison of common radiobiological endpoints using an in vitro tumour model	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
7	gas chromatographic evaluation of the volatile constituents of lung brain and liver tissues	Volatile constituents of the pulmonary brain and liver tissue are evaluated by gas chromatography.
7	radiographic manifestations of malignant mixed uterine tumors	Mixed malignant uterine tumours are radiographic manifestations.
7	correction by hyaluronidase of the interstitial tissue transport defect during shock a new approach to therapy	Intra-tidal shock transport abnormality, hyaluronidase repair by apos, is a novel therapeutic approach.
7	quantitative studies on cell mediated immunity in the pleural cavity of guinea pigs	Quantitative apo studies; cell-mediated immunity in guinea pig pleural cavity.
7	physiological pathological correlations in coal workers pneumoconiosis	Physiological Pathological Correlations in Pneumoconspiratory Anthrax Workers.
7	toxicity of platinum iv salts for cells of pulmonary origin	Platinum salt toxicity iv to d&apos cells; pulmonary origin.
7	the relative roles of platelets and macrophages in clearing particles from the blood the value of carbon clearance as a measure of reticuloendothelial phagocytosis	The relative roles of platelets and macrophages in the removal of blood particles, and the value of carbon clearance as a measure of the reticuloendothelial phagocytosis.
7	a role for the eosinophil in acquired resistance to schistosoma mansoni infection as determined by antieosinophil serum	An eosinophilic role of eosinophilic schistosoma mansoni acquired resistance as determined by antiteosinophil serum.
7	congenital lung malformations a unified concept and a case report	Cardiovascular System (CPS) A system of medical services for patients with dementia.
7	host parasite relationships in experimental airborne tuberculosis v lack of hematogenous dissemination of mycobacterium tuberculosis to the lungs in animals vaccinated with bacille calmette gu rin	Parasitic relationships between host and experimental airborne tuberculosis in animals vaccinated with guine calf bacillus lack of blood-borne dissemination of tubercle mycobacteria in the lungs.
7	a comparison of chlormethiazole and diazepam as intravenous sedatives for fibre endoscopic examination of the upper gastrointestinal tract	Comparison of diazepam and chlomethiazole as intravenous sedatives for l' endoscopic examination of gastro fibers-upper intestinal.
7	morphine administration to pregnant rabbits effect on fetal growth and lung development	The use of morphine in pregnant rabbits has an effect on the fetal growth and development of the lungs.
7	interpreting chest radiographs without visual search	Non-visual interpretation of chest x-rays.
7	proceedings changes in the disease pattern of pulmonary tuberculosis	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
7	absorption distribution and excretion of trifluoperazine in rats	Effect of tetrachloroethylene (Trifluoperazine) and tetrachloroethylene (Trifluoperazine) on human health.
7	the rabbit fetal lung as a glucocorticoid target tissue	The fetal rabbit lung as target tissue glucocorticoid.
7	mechanisms of bronchial hyperreactivity in normal subjects after upper respiratory tract infection	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of lung cancer.
7	lung damage caused by phospholipase c and the changes in phospholipids in the rat lung	Phospholipase c lung injury and changes in rat lung phospholipids.
7	effect of injection of a phosphorylcholine containing compound from nippostrongylus brasiliensis on the infestation of the rat by this parasite	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases, including diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes and diabetes.
7	pulmonary edemas anatomic study	Pulmonary edema anatomical study.
7	particulate environmental matter as seen in lung sections	It's just a matter of time, but it's a matter of time, and it's a matter of time.
7	gestational changes in pulmonary vascular responses in fetal lambs in utero	Gestational Changes in Pulmonary Vascular Responses in Fetal Lambs in utero.
7	a study of the inhalation of pentachlorophenol by rats part i a method for the determination of pentachlorophenol in rat plasma urine and tissue and in aerosol samples	Dosage study; pentachlorophenol inhalation by rats, part i dos; a method for determining pentachlorophenol in urine and plasma tissues of rats and in samples of aerosols.
7	early diagnosis of cardiac insufficiency with the spiroergometric method	Early diagnosis of spiroergometric heart failure.
7	clinico pharmacological examination of gentamycin in thoracic surgery	Gentamicin clinical pharmacology in thoracic surgery.
7	calcium independent modulation of cyclic gmp and activation of guanylate cyclase by nitrosamines	Cyclic gmp calcium independent modulation and nitrosamine activation of guanylate cyclase.
7	an investigation of the chest radiographs in a controlled trial of busulphan cyclophosphamide and a placebo after resection for carcinoma of the lung	A Study of Pulmonary X-rays in a Controlled Study of Busulphan Cyclophosphamide and a Resection Placebo for Pulmonary Carcinoma.
7	pulmonary pathology in acute respiratory insufficiency lung biopsy as a diagnostic tool	Acute respiratory failure pulmonary pathology as a diagnostic tool.
7	pulmonary vasomotor nerve responses in isolated perfused lungs of macaca mulatta and papio species	Pulmonary vasomotor nerve responses in perfused lungs isolated from species of macaca mulata and papio.
7	freeze etch study of collagen i native collagen from tendon and lung of rats	Cryogenic study of native rat lung and tendon collagen.
7	effect of angiotensin on hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction in isolated dog lung	Effect of apos; angiotensin on pulmonary hypoxic vasoconstriction in isolated dog lung.
7	uremic lung lesions as a form of chronic edema	It is the most common type of uremic lesion.
7	pulmonary damage following pulmonary microembolism in the dog effect of various types of treatment	Pulmonary injury due to pulmonary microembolism in adults; canine effect of various treatment types.
7	thoracoabdominal aortic aneurysm presenting as a solitary pulmonary nodule	Apos aneurysm; thoracic aorta-abdominal in the form of apos; a solitary, pulmonary nodule.
7	morphological effects in rats following a 22 day space flight	Morphological effects of 22-day space flight in rats.
7	in vitro antagonism of the mediators of allergy by a benzopyrano benzopyran carboxylic acid pr d 92 ea	In vitro apo mediator antagonism; carboxylic benzopyrano benzopyranic acid pre-92 ea d.
7	an ultrastructural study of the pathogenesis of tissue injury in limited wegener s granulomatosis	An ultrastructural study of tissue lesion pathogenesis in Wegener's granulomatosis.
7	gm2 ganglioside in fetal tay sachs disease brain cultures a model system for the disease	In addition, there are a number of other diseases, such as diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, schizophrenia, schizophrenia, schizophrenia and schizophrenia.
7	the hydrolysis of biologically active peptides by bovine lung tissue factor thromboplastin	L' hydrolysis of biologically active peptides by thromboplastin, a tissue-borne bovine pulmonary factor, is a method used.
7	fluid flow in the human foetal lung a theoretical model	Human fetal lung fluid flow, a theoretical model.
7	immunology of the lung	Lung immunology.
7	chronic eosinophilic pneumonia ultrastructural evidence of marked immunoglobulin production plus macrophagic ingestion of eosinophils and eosinophilic lysosomes leading to intracytoplasmic charcot leyden crystals	Chronic eosinophilic pneumonia, ultrastructural evidence of apos; marked production of apos; immunoglobulin and macrophage ingestion of apos; eosinophilic eosinophils and eosinophilic lysosomes, leading to the formation of intracytoplasmic charcoal leyde crystals.
7	action of isoprenaline on the mechanical properties of lungs and airways in healthy people and patients with obstructive lung diseases	The effects of isoprenaline on lung and airway mechanical properties in healthy individuals and patients with obstructive pulmonary disease.
7	emphysema as possible explanation for the alteration of expiratory po2 and pco2 curves	L' emphysema is a possible explanation of the apos; alteration of the expiratory curves po2 and pco2.
7	tuberculosis in scotland a national sample survey 1968 70 2 a two year follow up of newly diagnosed respiratory tuberculosis notified in 1968	Tuberculosis in Scotland, 1968 National Sampling Survey 70,2 after two years of follow-up of 1968 reported respiratory TB cases.
7	cell division and tissue repair following localized damage to the mammalian lung	Cell division and tissue repair as a result of localized damage to mammalian lungs.
7	scanning electron microscopy of the lungs of vitamin e deficient rats exposed to a low concentration of ozone	In vitro fertilization is the process of fertilization that results in the removal of nutrients from the body.
7	further studies on the mechanism of adrenaline induced lipolysis in lipid micelles	D' further mechanistic studies of l' adrenaline induce lipolysis in the lipid micelles.
7	transbronchoscopic cryosurgery of respiratory structures experimental and clinical studies	Freeze-surgical transbronchoscopy of experimental and clinical studies.
7	comparative mutagenicity of n nitrosamines in a semi solid and in a liquid incubation system in the presence of rat or human tissue fractions	Comparison of mutagenicity of n-nitrosamines in a semi-firm medium-and in a d&apo system; liquid incubation in human or rat tissue fractions.
7	evidence for regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase activity and cholesterol synthesis in nonhepatic tissues of rat	Evidence for the regulation of 3 hydroxy-3 methylglutaryl coenzyme reductase and the synthesis of cholesterol in rat non-hepatic tissues.
7	continuity of a rabbit antigen between generations	It's a good idea to have a rabbit antigen in between generations.
7	lung ph and pulmonary absorption of nonvolatile drugs in the rat	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are needed to assess the effects of chronic respiratory infections.
7	increased elastic recoil as a determinant of pulmonary barotrauma in divers	Increased elastic recoil determinants of pulmonary barotrauma in divers.
7	the formation of histotypic structures from monodisperse fetal rat lung cells cultured on a three dimensional substrate	The formation of histotypic structures from lung cells of monodisperse fetal rats grown on a three-dimensional substrate.
7	experimental morphological study of the vaccination process following aerosol application of lyophilized live influenza a2 hong kong and b ussr vaccines	Experimental morphological study of post-dose immunization process; aerosol application of live lyophilized influenza vaccines a2 hong kong and b ussr.
7	lung inflation and alveolar permeability to non electrolytes in the adult sheep in vivo	Pulmonary influx and alveolar non-alveolar permeability-electrolytes in adult sheep in vivo.
7	morphologic and biochemical study of pulmonary changes induced by bleomycin in mice	Morphological and biochemical investigation of bleomycin-induced pulmonary changes in mice.
7	studies on the migratory route of paragonimus siamensis in the bandicoot bandicota indica	Investigation of paragonimus siamensis migration path in bandicoot bandicota indica indica.
7	new neonatal problems of blood coagulation and fibrinolysis ii thromboplastic effect of amniotic fluid and its relation to lung maturity	New neonatal blood clotting and fibrinolysis problems ii Thromboplastic effect of amniotic fluid on pulmonary maturity.
7	effect of inhaling medication vapors from a colds preparation on murine pulmonary bacterial defense systems	It is recommended that the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) develop a national guideline for the use of antimicrobials in food.
7	pulmonary function in premature lambs during the first few hours of life	Pulmonary functions in preterm lambs in early life.
7	role of peridural anesthesia in thoracic surgery	Role of apo; an epidural thoracic anesthesia.
7	immunisation with a polyvalent pneumococcal vaccine reduction of adult respiratory mortality in a new guinea highlands community	Immunization with a multi-valent pneumococcal vaccine to reduce the respiratory mortality of adults in a new community in the highlands of Guinea.
7	a study in the pharmacodynamics of oxytetracycline in the chicken	Pharmacodynamic study of chicken oxytetracycline.
7	pathomorphology of lung alterations in calves naturally infected with the virus of infectious rhinotracheitis	Pathomorphology of Pulmonary Alterations in Calves Naturally Infected with Infectious Rhinotracheitis Virus.
7	sarcoidosis initially occurring as apical infiltrate and pleural reaction	Serologic evidence of sarcoidosis begins in the form of apical infiltration and a pleural response.
7	needle aspiration biopsy a critical appraisal eight years and 3 267 specimens later	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States.
7	morphological macro micro electronoptical changes and cytoenzyme changes after ligation of the pulmonary artery pulmonary veins and both in dogs	Microelectronoptic morphological changes and cytoenzymatic changes following ligation of pulmonary veins of the lung artery and both pulmonary arteries in dogs.
7	a critical assessment of the roles of circulating hydrogen ion and lactate in the production of exercise induced asthma	A critical evaluation of the roles of circulating hydrogen ion and lactate in apo production; asthma induced by apo; physical exercise.
7	pulmonary allescheriasis report of a case from ontario canada	Pulmonary allescheriasis reported from Ontario.
7	the effects of ephedrine on the physiological and psychological responses to submaximal and maximal exercise in man	The Effects of Ephedrine on Physiological and Psychological Responses to Apos; Exercise at Maximal and Maximum-in Apos; Male.
7	gallegostronglyus ibicensis n gen n sp nematoda metastrongylidae a lung parasite of mus musculus linnaeus 1758 rodentia muridale in ibiza balearic islands author s transl	Gallegostronglyus ibicensis ngen n sp nematoda metastrongylidae, a parasite of musculus linnaeus 1758 murid rodentia from the ibiza balearic islands.
7	induction of monooxygenases in rhesus monkeys by 3 methylcholanthrene metabolism and mutagenic activation of n 2 acetylaminofluorene and benzo a pyrene	Induction of monooxygenases in rhesus monkeys by metabolism of 3 methylcholanthrenes and activation of mutagenic n2 acetylaminofluorene and benzo a pyrene.
7	physical properties and biochemistry of lung surfactant following vagotomy	Physical and Biochemical Properties of Lung Surfactant after Vagotomy.
7	circadian rhythms in lung resistance and dynamic lung compliance of healthy children effects of two bronchodilators	Respiratory disease is the most common form of respiratory illness among children, and the most common form of respiratory illness among children.
7	systemic collateral and pulmonary artery stenosis in patients with congenital pulmonary valve atresia and ventricular septal defect	Pulmonary arterial stenosis and systemic collateralis in patients with congenital pulmonary valvular atresia and ventricular septation.
7	response of immature baboon fetal lung to intra amniotic betamethasone	Intra betamethasone intra-amniotic reaction of the fetal lung of an immature baboon.
7	inhibiting effect of caffeine on spontaneous and urethan induced lung tumors in strain a mice	Caffeine Inhibitory Effect on Spontaneous and Apos-Induced Pulmonary Tumours; urethane in the mouse strain a.
7	morphological effects of chronic tracheal ligation and drainage in the fetal lamb lung	In addition, there is an increased risk of lung cancer, which may result in increased risk of lung cancer.
7	biochemical composition and heterogeneity of heparan sulfates isolated from ah 130 ascites hepatoma cells and fluid	Biochemical Composition and Heterogeneity of Dapos sulfates; Heparan isolated from Dapos cells; Ascitic hepatoma ah 130 and fluid.
7	effects of sputum on pulmonary function	Effects of Sputum on Lung Function.
7	sphingolipid composition and catabolism in human fetal tissues	Composition and catabolism of human fetal sphingolipids.
7	inspiration chest radiography by lateral recumbency	Chest x-ray; side-rest inhalation.
7	severe asthma prevention is better than cure	Better to prevent than to treat severe asthma.
7	human body buoyancy a study of 98 men	The Buoyancy of the Human Body: A Study of the Human Body.
7	determining fetal lung maturity a sensitive surfactant method	Determining fetal lung maturity is a sensitive, extra-factant method.
7	restrictive ventilatory defect in a patient with primary pulmonary hypertension	Restrictive respiratory infections in patients with apo; primary pulmonary hypertension.
7	innervation and cytochemistry of the neuroepithelial bodies in the ciliated epithelium of the toad lung bufo marinus	L'innervation et la cytochie des corps neuroepitheliales dans l'apos; epithelium ciliated in the lung of toads bufo marinus marinus.
7	pulmonary function in coal workers with caplan s syndrome and non rheumatoid complicated pneumosoniosis	Pulmonary functions in non-rheumatoid Caplan and Apos syndrome coal workers; complicated non-rheumatoid pneumosoniosis.
7	farber s disease as a ceramidosis clinical radiological and biochemical aspects	Farber's disease as ceramidosis clinical biochemical and radiological aspects.
7	remote results of surgical treatment of chronic nonspecific suppurative lung diseases under conditions of extreme north	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of chronic respiratory disease.
7	isolated perfused dog lungs a comparative stereologic comparison with normal dog lungs	Stereological comparison between isolated, perfused dogs' lungs and normal dogs' lungs.
7	energy status of the rat lung after exposure to elevated po2	Energy status of rat lung after high po2 exposure.
7	determination of disaturated lecithin in rhesus monkey amniotic fluid as an index of fetal lung maturity	Determination of disaturated lecithin in the amniotic fluid of the rhesus monkey as an index of fetal lung maturity.
7	vaccination against canine bordetellosis using an aluminum hydroxide adjuvant vaccine	Canine Bordetellosis Vaccination with Dapos Adjuvant Vaccine; Dapos hydroxide; Aluminum.
7	occlusion pressure in acute bronchospasm induced by methylcholine	Apos pressure; acute methylcholine-induced bronchospasm occlusion.
7	primary lymphoma of lung	Lung primary lymphoma.
7	ventilation perfusion lung imaging in diaphragmatic paralysis	Pulmonary imaging by a ventilatory infusion in the pulmonary palsy.
7	absorption of inhaled antigen into the circulation of isolated lungs from normal and immunized rabbits	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors associated with the use of antigen.
7	control of the myocardial contractile state by carotid chemo and baroreceptor and pulmonary inflation reflexes in conscious dogs	Lapse control; myocardial chemo carotid contractile state, baroreceptor reflexes and pulmonary inflation in conscious dogs.
7	ultrastructural changes in the lungs after chronic experimental intoxication with benzine and ethyline vapour	Ultrastructural changes in lungs following chronic experimental benzine intoxication and d*apos; ethylene oxide vapour.
7	experimental scleroma a histopathological study	Histopathological study.
7	effect of intrapulmonary hematocrit maldistribution on o2 co2 and inert gas exchange	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with the results of other studies.
7	uptake metabolism and efflux of l alpha acetylmethadol laam by rat lung tissue	Metabolism of apos; absorption and efflux of apos; alpha-acetylmethadol laam by the lung tissue of the rat.
7	pathologic changes and pathogenesis of parascaris equorum infection in parasite free pony foals	Journal of Infectious Diseases 1998; 7(1): 7-11.
7	dna synthesis in the human diploid cell strain wi 38 during in vitro aging an autoradiography study	Apos synthesis; human diploid strain Wi 38 DNA during in vitro aging, autoradiographic study.
7	a case of lung myiasis caused by larvae of megaselia spiracularis schmitz diptera phoridae	A case of pulmonary myiasis, caused by megaselia spiracularis schmitz larvae, will result in phoridae.
7	effect of allogenic serum from pregnant pneumonectomized rats on embryonic lung tissue	The effect of allogeneic serum from pneumonectomized pregnant rats on embryonic lung tissue.
7	legionnaires disease clinical and pulmonary histopathologic features of a sporadic case	Sporadic disease of the legionnaires characterized by histopathological characteristics.
7	bronchofiberscopy in asthmatics a method for minimizing risk of complications	Bronchofiberscopy in asthmatic patients is a method to minimize the risk of asthma complications.
8	histochemical changes in lymphocytes during the production of antibodies in lymph nodes of rabbits	Histochemical lymphocyte changes during production of antibody in rabbit lymph nodes.
8	the lymphocytic origin of a plasma factor responsible for hypersensitivity in vitro of tuberculin type	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of conditions, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
8	protein concentration in normal mouse lymphocytes thymocytes and mouse and human leukemic cells as measured by interference microscopy	Protein concentration in lymphocytes of normal mice, thymocytes and leukemic cells of mice and d' measured by interfering microscopy.
8	studies on tubercle bacillus histiocyte relationship v passive transfer of cellular resistance	Studies of the Histiocyte Tuberculosis (histiocyte) v Passive Transfer of Cell Resistance Relationship.
8	the in vivo reutilization of lymphocytic and sarcoma dna by cells growing in the peritoneal cavity	In vivo reuse of lymphocyte and sarcoma DNA by peritoneal cell-grown cells.
8	lymphocyte glycogen content in various diseases	Glycogen levels in lymphocytes in a variety of diseases.
8	immune response and mitosis of human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro	Human peripheral blood lymphocyte mitosis and immune response in vitro.
8	studies on the isolation of metaphase chromosomes	Metaphase chromosome isolation studies.
8	cellular specificity in the homograft reaction	Cellular specificity of the reaction.
8	reaction of lymphocytes with purified protein derivative conjugated with fluorescein	Reaction of lymphocytes with a purified, fluorescein-conjugated protein derivative.
8	lymphocyte interaction a potential histocompatibility test in vitro	It can be used as an antibody or as an antioxidant or as an antioxidant.
8	histocompatibility and immunologic competence in renal homotransplantation	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	the cellular origin of human immunoglobulins gamma 2 gamma 1m gamma 1a	L' cellular origin of human gamma-like immunoglobulins 2 gamma 1m gamma 1a.
8	further studies on adoptive transfer of sensitivity to skin homografts	D' additional adoptive transfer sensitivity studies to cutaneous homografts were conducted.
8	transformation of adult allogeneic small lymphocytes after transfusion into newborn rats	Transformation of transfused adult small allogenic lymphocytes in newborn-rats.
8	electron microscopy of the bursa of fabricius of the embryonic chick with particular reference to the lympho epithelial nodules	Embryonic chick fabricius electron microscopy with special attention to l&apos nodules; lymphatic epithelium.
8	tuberculin hypersensitivity studies with radioactive antigen and mononuclear cells	In addition to the above-mentioned studies, there are no data available on the toxicity of the drug to humans.
8	role of the thymus in immune reactions in rats ii suppressive effect of thymectomy at birth on reactions of delayed cellular hypersensitivity and the circulating small lymphocyte	The Role of Thymus in Immune Reactions in the Rat ii L' Suppressive Effect of Thymectomy at Birth on Dapos Reactions; Delayed Cellular Hypersensitivity and Small Circulating Lymphocytes.
8	ataxia telangiectasia	Telangiectasia ataxia.
8	circulating small lymphocytes immunologically competent cells with limited reactivites	Small circulating lymphocytes, cells that are immunologically competent with limited reactivity.
8	serologic typing of human lymphocytes with immune serum obtained after homografting	Serologic tests should be carried out to determine the serologic properties of human lymphocytes.
8	reutilization of lymphocyte dna by cells of intestinal crypts and regenerating liver	Reuse of apo; lymphocytic DNA by intestinal crypt cells and liver regeneration.
8	proliferative activity of the lymphatic tissues of rats as studied with tritium labeled thymidine	Growing activity of rat lymphatic tissues, as measured with tritium-labelled thymidine.
8	homograft immunity in pregnancy survival rates in rabbits born of ova transplanted into sensitized mothers	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
8	antigenic material persistence in hypersensitive cells	The persistence of the antigenic material in the hypersensitive cells.
8	delayed hypersensitivity in man transfer by lymphocyte preparations of peripheral blood	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	the effect of skin homograft rejection on recipient and donor mixed leukocyte cultures	Effect of Dosage Rejection; Dermal Homograft on Recipient-Donor Mixed Leukocyte Cultures.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro ii induction of blast transformation with antisera to six igg allotypes and summation with mixtures of antisera to different allotypes	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro ii induction of blast transformation with six allotype igg antisera and summation with rabbit allotype antisera against different allotypes.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro 3 proteins rna and dna synthesis by lymphocyte cultures after stimulation with phytohaemagglutinin with staphylococcal filtrate with antiallotype serum and with heterologous antiserum to rabbit whole serum	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro 3 protein rna and cell-cell DNA synthesis after stimulation with phytohemagglutinin with the staphylococcal filtrate with antiallotype serum and heterologous rabbit whole-body antiserum.
8	feulgen hydrolysis of normal cells and mouse ascites tumor cells	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	allograft survival effect of antiserums to thymus glands and lymphocytes	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro iv blast transformation of the lymphocytes from newborn rabbits induced by antiallotype serum to a paternal igg allotype not present in the serum of the lymphocyte donors	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro iv blast transformation of antiallotype serum-induced newborn rabbit lymphocytes-into a paternal igg none found in lymphocyte donor serum.
8	mitosis induction by cultures of human peripheral lymphocytes	Human peripheral lymphocyte cultures induced mitosis.
8	electron microscopic observations on antibody producing lymph node cells	In addition, there was no evidence of any antibody activity in the lymph nodes.
8	acid phosphatase rich granules in human lymphocytes induced by phytohemagglutinin	In human lymphocytes, acid phosphatase-rich granules are induced by phytohemagglutinin.
8	lymphocyte lifetime in women	Canadian Journal of Public Health.
8	occurrence of lymphopenia in heart failure	Cervical cancer is a major cause of death.
8	immunologic competence of thoracic duct cells i delayed hypersensitivity	Chest canal cells' immunological competence delayed the onset of hypersensitivity.
8	follicular lymphosarcoma brill symmers disease	Brilliant Follicular Lymphosarcoma Synergy Disease.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro i stimulation of blast transformation with an antiallotype serum	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro with antiallotype serum to stimulate blastic transformation.
8	the origin of the cells in the efferent lymph from a single lymph node	Origin of efferent lymph cells from only one lymph node.
8	the fine structure of mitosis in rat thymic lymphocytes	The fine structure of the mitosis in the thymic lymphocytes of the rat.
8	the interaction of mycoplasmas with mammalian cells ii monocytes and lymphocytes	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of mycoplasma.
8	effect of previous irradiation on the transformation of blood lymphocytes	Effect of apo; previous exposure to radiation on blood lymphocyte transformation.
8	synthesis of nonribosomal rna by lymphocytes a response to phytohemagglutinin treatment	Synthesis of non-ribosomal lymphocyte rna in response to phytohemagglutinin.
8	lymphocytes from thymectomized rats immunologic proliferative and metabolic properties	Thymectomized rat lymphocytes have proliferative and metabolic immunological properties.
8	kidney homografts uptake of fluorochrome labeled tissue extracts by lymph node cells	Renal homografts capture extracts of fluorochrome-labelled tissue from lymph node cells.
8	adenosylmethionine elevation in leukemic white blood cells	L' elevation of the apos; adenosylmethionine in white leukemic cells.
8	virus replication and high titered interferon production in human leukocyte cultures inoculated with newcastle disease virus	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the incidence and prevalence of HIV/AIDS in Canada.
8	histochemical demonstration of gamma glutamyl transpeptidase activity in bone marrow and blood cells	Histochemical demonstration of spinal cord and blood cell γ-glutamyl transpeptidase activity.
8	the carriage of immunological memory by small lymphocytes in the rat	Small lymphocyte transport of immunological memory in the rat.
8	functional anatomy of the lymphocyte in immunological reactions in vitro	Functional lymphocyte anatomy in vitro immunological reactions.
8	studies on human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro i biological and physicochemical properties of the pokeweed mitogen	Human Peripheral Blood Lymphocyte Studies in Vitro i Biological and Physico-Chemical Aspects of the Host Plant Mitogen.
8	studies on human peripheral blood lymphocytes in vitro ii morphological and biochemical studies on the transformation of lymphocytes by pokeweed mitogen	Human Peripheral Blood Lymphocyte Studies in Vitro II Morphological and biochemical studies of lymphocyte transformation by lice mitogen.
8	l asparaginase toxicity to normal and leukemic human lymphocytes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
8	the ultrastructure and function of the cells in lymph following antigenic stimulation	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro vi the induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera to rabbit iga and igm	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro; induction of blastic transformation with rabbit antisera against iga and l' rabbit igm.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro v the induction of blast transformation with sheep antisera to rabbit igg subunits	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro; blast transformation induction with sheep antisera at-rabbit igg units.
8	effect of cycloheximide on protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis in cultured human lymphocytes	Cycloheximide affects protein and l&apos synthesis; ribonucleic acid in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	mouse isoantigens separation of soluble tl thymus leukemia antigen from soluble h 2 histocompatibility antigen by column chromatography	Mouse isoantigens separation; thymus soluble leukemic antigen; antigen d' soluble histocompatibility h 2 by column chromatography.
8	cytotoxic potential of stimulated human lymphocytes	Cytotoxic Potential of Stimulated Human Lymphocytes.
8	chromosomal breakage induced by extracts of human allogeneic lymphocytes	Human allogeneic lymphocyte extracts induced chromosome breakage.
8	cell bound immunity to autologous and syngeneic mouse tumors induced by methylcholanthrene and plastic discs	L' cell-associated immunity against methylcholanthrene- and plastic disc-induced autologous and syngene-induced mouse tumours.
8	the effect of malnutrition on the inflammatory response as exhibited by the granuloma pouch of the rat	L' effect of malnutrition on inflammatory response as evidenced by rat granulomatous sac.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats i conditions and parameters of response	The results of these studies are consistent with those reported in the literature.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats ii relationship of the proliferative response to the immunologic status of the donors	Quantitative rat apo studies; mixed lymphocyte interaction ii relationship between proliferative response and apo; immunological status of donors.
8	studies of the cells in the afferent and efferent lymph of lymph nodes draining the site of skin homografts	Studies of efferent afferent lymph node cells draining the skin homograft site.
8	autoradiographic analysis of lymphopoiesis and lymphocyte migration in mice bearing multiple thymus grafts	Autoradiographic analysis of lymphopoietic and lymphocyte migration patterns in mice with multiple thymus transplants.
8	in vitro demonstration of humoral and cell bound immunity against common specific transplantation atigen s of adenovirus 12 induced mouse and hamster tumors	In vitro, the demonstration of immunity related to the humoral and the cells against the cells; common specific etigen of the apos; adenovirus 12 induced tumours in the mouse and hamster.
8	pyrimidine nucleotide synthesis regulatory control during transformation of lymphocytes in vitro	Control of pyrimidine nucleotide synthesis during lymphocyte transformation in vitro.
8	antiserum to immunoglobulin a inhibition of cell mediated demyelination in tissue culture	An antiserum to apos; immunoglobulin, an inhibitor of cell-mediated demyelination therapy in tissue cultures.
8	mechanism of a reaction in vitro associated with delayed type hypersensitivity	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of hyperactivity.
8	radioautographic and electron microscopic evidence of rapid uptake of antigen by lymphocytes	Electron microscopy and radioautographic data indicate that lymphocytes pick up antigen rapidly.
8	heterologous antilymphocyte globulin studies in vitro	Studies of heterologous, anti-lymphocyte globulins in vitro.
8	chromosome studies on marshall islanders exposed to fallout radiation	Chromosome studies of radiation-exposed Marshall Islanders.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes prolonged survival of canine renal allografts	Lapos; lymphocyte antiserum prolonged canine renal allograft survival.
8	phosphorylation of nuclear protein early in the course of gene activation in lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	electron microscopic observations on antibody producing cells in lymph and blood	In addition, there is no evidence of any antibody activity in the lymphatic system.
8	intestinal lymphangiectasia a protein losing enteropathy with hypogammaglobulinemia lymphocytopenia and impaired homograft rejection	Intestinal lymphocytopenic and dapos hypogamaglobulinemia; an alteration of the rejection of the apos; homograft.
8	renal homotransplantation in rats i allogeneic recipients	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S. and D.A. Benson.
8	antigens in immunity xv ultrastructural features of antigen capture in primary and secondary lymphoid follicles	Antigen in the lymphoid follicles; immunity xv ultrastructural characteristics of the uptake of the antigens in the primary and secondary lymphoid follicles.
8	ring d chromosome a second case associated with anomalous haptoglobin inheritance	A second case, associated with an abnormal inheritance of the apos; haptoglobin is the d chromosome of the apos; d ring.
8	effect of amantadine hydrochloride on the response of human lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	Effect of d*apos hydrochloride; amantadine on human lymphocyte response to phyto-hemagglutinin.
8	the pathogenesis of chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Canadian Journal of Public Health.
8	histones of genetically active and inactive chromatin	Histones of inactive and genetically active chromatin.
8	mortality of radiation chimeras in relation to the number of transplanted bone marrow and lymph node cells	Mortality due to radiation chimeras as a function of number of bone marrow and transplanted lymph node cells.
8	the initial lesion in experimental allergic neuritis a phase and electron microscopic study	The initial lesion in the experimental allergic neuritis was studied by electron microscopy.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro 8 the relationship between heterozygosity and homozygosity of lymphocyte donor and per cent blast transformation induced by antiallotype sera	Rabbit lymphocyte studies in vitro8 examined the relationship between cell donor heterozygosity and apo; cell donor homozygosity and percentage of antiallotype serum induced blastic transformation.
8	association of experimental chronic arthritis with the persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls in the articular tissue	L' association of l' chronic arthritis with persistence of the cell walls of group a streptococcus in the articular tissue.
8	activation of lymphocytes	Lymphocyte activation.
8	chromosomes and transformation of lymphocytes in lymphoproliferative disorders	Chromosomes and Lymphocyte Transformation in Lymphoproliferative Disorders.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats 3 kinetics of the response	However, it is not possible to determine the extent of the interaction.
8	chemotoxis of mononuclear cells	Mononuclear cell chemotoxicity.
8	incorporation of sulfate by the mouse thymus its relation to secretion by medullary epithelial cells and to thymic lymphopoiesis	Incorporation of sulfate by mouse thymus, its relationship to epithelial medullary secretion and thymic lymphopoiesis.
8	the mixed lymphocyte reaction an in vitro test for tolerance	The Mixed Lymphocyte Reaction (MLCR) test is an in vitro tolerance test.
8	effect of chloroquine on morphology of cytoplasmic granules in maturing human leukocytes an ultrastructural study	Chloroquine effect on cytoplasmic granule morphology in maturing human leukocytes; ultrastructural study.
8	studies on the in vitro behavior of agammaglobulinemic lymphocytes	Studies of In Vitro Behaviour of Agammaglobulinemic Lymphocytes.
8	studies on lysosomes xi characterization of a hydrolase rich fraction from human lymphocytes	Lysosome characterization studies xi d' a hydrolase-rich fraction of human lymphocytes.
8	eosinophilic response in glioblastoma tissue culture after addition of autologous lymphocytes	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocyte antigen interaction in delayed hypersensitivity	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the disease.
8	viral inhibition of lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin	Viral inhibition of the response of lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin.
8	dna replication patterns and chromosomal protein synthesis in opossum lymphocytes in vitro	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	antigen induced release of slow reacting substance of anaphylaxis srs a rat in rats prepared with homologous antibody	The antigen induced the release of a slow-reacting rat anaphylaxis agent, a slow reaction substance, in rats prepared with a homologous antibody.
8	a quantitative study of the stimulation of dna synthesis in lymph node cell cultures by anti lymphocyte serum anti gamma globulin serum specific antigen and phytohemagglutinin	Quantitative study of DNA synthesis stimulation in lymph node cultures by serum anti--gamma serum serum globulin and phytohemagglutinin.
8	tissue interaction in the development of thymus lymphocytes	Tissue Interaction in Thymus Lymphocyte Development.
8	cytotoxic test automation a live dead cell differential counter	Automation of cytotoxic tests for live dead cells.
8	cell separation on antigen coated columns elimination of high rate antibody forming cells and immunological memory cells	Cell separation by eposcliffe-coated columns; antigen removal of cells with high rates of eposcliffe formation; antibodies and immune memory cells.
8	studies on rabbit lymphocytes in vitro ix the suppression of antiallotype induced blast transformation in lymphocyte cultures from allotypically suppressed donors	In vitro rabbit lymphocyte studies ix suppression of antiallotype, apos-induced blast transformation in allotypic suppressed lymphocyte cultures.
8	a sex difference in the leucocyte count	Sex differences in number of leukocytes.
8	characteristics of the rna synthesized in vitro by the normal human small lymphocyte and the changes induced by phytohemagglutinin stimulation	Features of normal human lymphocyte rna synthesized in vitro and phytohemagglutinin-stimulated changes.
8	specific role of each human leukocyte type in viral infections i monocyte as host cell for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro	Specific role of each type of human leukocyte in i-monocyte viral infections as a host cell for the replication of vesicular stomatitis virus in vitro.
8	noncycling tumor cells mitogenic response to antilymphocytic serum	Non-cyclic mitogenic response of the tumor cell line to anti-lymphocyte serum.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity i characterization of the phenomenon	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent to which the effects are expected to occur.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity ii correlation of the in vitro response with skin reactivity	Delayed hypersensitivity to soluble antigen and lymphocytes; correlation of in vitro response with skin reactivity.
8	cytotoxicity mediated by soluble antigen and lymphocytes in delayed hypersensitivity 3 analysis of mechanism	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
8	the interaction of human monocytes and lymphocytes	Human monocyte-human lymphocyte interaction.
8	studies on the anti inflammatory action of 6 mercaptopurine	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes and procarbazine compared as immunosuppressants in mice	The lymphocyte antiserum and the procarbazine were compared as immunosuppressive agents in mice.
8	specific role of each human leukocyte type in viral infections ii phytohemagglutinin treated lymphocytes as host cells for vesicular stomatitis virus replication in vitro	Specific Role of Each Type of Human Leukocyte in Viral Infections ii Phytohemagglutinin treats lymphocytes as host cells for in vitro replication of vesicular stomatitis virus.
8	serotyping for homotransplantation xxii specificity of cytotoxic antibodies developing after renal transplantation	Serotyping for apo; homotransplantation xxii specificity of developing cytotoxic antibodies after renal transplantation.
8	antiserum to lymphocytes interactions with chemical immunosuppressants	Interactions Between Anti-Serum and Lymphocytes and Chemical Immunosuppressants.
8	microspikes on the lymphocyte uropod	Lymphocyte uropod micropics.
8	leukotactic factor produced by sensitized lymphocytes	Sensitized lymphocytes produce a leukotactic factor.
8	mixed lymphocyte reaction an in vitro test for antilymphocytic serum activity	Mixed lymphocyte reaction is an in vitro screening test for anti-lymphocyte serum activity.
8	significance of the changes in the circulating lymphoid cells in hodgkin s disease	Importance of Changes in Circulating Lymphoid Cells of Hodgkin's Disease.
8	nonrandomness of translocations in man preferential entry of chromosomes into 13 15 21 translocations	The nonrandom translocation in the apos; man favored apos; chromosome entry in 13-15-21 translocations.
8	labial salivary gland biopsy in sj gren s disease	Lipid saliva biopsy in pomegranate sj.
8	immunological aspects of intrauterine transfusion	Intravenous transfusion-uterine.
8	studies of pplo infection v inhibition of lymphocyte mitosis and antibody formation by mycoplasmal extracts	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
8	the effect of epithelial remnant and whole organ grafts of thymus on the recovery of thymectomized irradiated mice	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
8	antigenic changes in lymph node cells after administration of antiserum to thymus cells	Antigenic changes in the lymph nodes following administration of anti-inflammatory drugs; an antibody to the thymus cells.
8	mn blood group locus data concerning the possible chromosomal location	Data on the blood-group mn locus for possible chromosomal localization.
8	the cellular infiltrate in hashimoto s disease and focal lymphocytic thyroiditis	L' cellular infiltration in Hashimoto disease and thyroid lymphocytes.
8	virus containing lymphocyte cultures from cancer patients	A virus that contains cultures of lymphocytes from cancer patients.
8	studies on marek s disease ii pathogenesis	Marek Disease Studies ii. pathogenesis.
8	abnormalities of in vitro lymphocyte responses during rubella virus infections	Abnormalities of lymphocyte responses in vitro during infection with rubella virus.
8	fine structural alterations of interphase nuclei of lymphocytes stimulated to grwoth activity in vitro	Fine structural alterations of stimulated cell interphase nuclei; grwoth activity in vitro.
8	the frequency of antigen sensitive cells in tissue transplantation a commentary on clonal selection	The Frequency of Antigen-Sensitive Cells in Tissue Transplantation a comment on clonal selection.
8	the occurrence and properties of leukocytosis and lymphocytosis stimulating material in the supernatant fluids of bordetella pertussis cultures	The frequency and properties of leucocytosis and lymphocytosis-stimulating material in Bordetella pertussis culture supernatants.
8	dissociation of hemolytic and lymphocyte transforming activities of streptolysin s preparations	Dissociation of lymphocyte and hemolytic transformation activities from streptolysin s.
8	replication of poliovirus in phytohemagglutinin stimulated human lymphocytes	Poliovirus replication in phytohemagglutinin stimulates human lymphocytes.
8	aggregation and transformation of rat lymphocytes on rat embryo monolayers	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with those obtained from other studies.
8	immunoglobulins g a and m determined in single cells from human tonsil	Immune globulin g a and immunoglobulin m were determined in isolated cells from the human amygdala.
8	reentry of nondividing leukemic cells into a proliferative phase in acute childhood leukemia	The re-introduction of undifferentiated leukemia cells into the proliferative phase of childhood acute leukemia.
8	lymphocytoid lines from persons with sex chromosome anomalies	Sexual chromosomal abnormalities in lymphocytoid lines.
8	the proliferative and anamnestic antibody response of rabbit lymphoid cells in vitro i immunological memory in the lymph nodes draining and contralateral to the site of a primary antigen injection	Rabbit lymphoid cell proliferative and anamnestic antibody response in vitro immunologic memory in the contralateral and draining lymph nodes at the apos site; primary injection of antigen.
8	cellular immunity in vitro clonal proliferation of antigen stimulated lymphocytes	In vitro cell immunity has been shown to promote the clonal proliferation of lymphocytes stimulated by antigen.
8	human granulocyte collagenase	Collagenase activity in human granulocytes.
8	isopentenyladenosine stimulates and inhibits mitosis of human lymphocytes treated with phytohemagglutinin	Isopentenyladenosine stimulates and inhibits phytohemagglutinin-treated human lymphocyte mitosis.
8	serum mediated protection of neoplastic cells from inhibition by lymphocytes immune to their tumor specific antigens	Serum protects apos neoplastic cells; lymphocyte-immunized inhibition against specific tumor antigens.
8	the human chromosome electron microscopic observations on chromatin fiber organization	Electron microscopic observations of human chromosomes on the apos; organization of chromatin fibers.
8	transformation of human lymphocytes inhibition by homologous alpha globulin	In addition, there is a need for additional information.
8	hodgkin s disease histological classification and diagnosis	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	localization of immunological complexes fixing beta1c c3 in germinal centers of lymph nodes	Localization of beta1c-fixing immunological complexes in lymph node germ cells.
8	the distribution of large dividing lymph node cells in syngeneic recipient rats after intravenous injection	The distribution of large, dividing lymph ganglion cells in recipient syngenic rats following intravenous injection.
8	lymphocytosis and histamine sensitization of mice by fractions from bordetella pertussis	Lymphocytosis and mouse histamine sensitivity by bordetella pertussis fractions.
8	cells involved in the immune response 13 the nature of the cellular interactions relating antibody formation and immunologic tolerance a unified hypothesis	The Cells Involved in the Immune Response 13 the nature of cellular interactions linking antibody formation and immunological tolerance a unified hypothesis.
8	heterogeneity of antibody forming cells an electron microscopic analysis	Heterogeneity of electron-microscopic antibody cells.
8	lymphoid cellular responses in the blood after immunization in man	A person who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS and has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
8	immune response to gluten in adult coeliac disease	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	stress effect of antilymphocyte serum	Stressful anti-lymphocyte serum.
8	dna polymerase activity as an index of lymphocyte stimulation studies in down s syndrome	Lymphocyte-stimulation studies indicate that lymphocyte-stimulation studies in the lower to lower respiratory syndrome are being conducted using DNA.
8	immunoglobulin synthesis by salivary gland lymphoid cells in sj gren s syndrome	Synthesis of Lapos; Salivary Lymphoid Cell Immune Globulin in Garnet Syndrome sj.
8	specific antibody within lymphoid germinal center cells of mice after primary immunization with horseradish peroxidase a light and electron microscopic study	A specific antibody in mouse lymphoid germ cells following primary horseradish peroxidase immunization was studied by light and electron microscopy.
8	changes in the blood picture in therapeutic use of hormones	It's a very important thing to know, but it's a very important thing to know.
8	rat thoracic duct lymphocytes types that participate in inflammation	Rat thoracic canal lymphocyte types involved in inflammation.
8	isolation and zonal fractionation of metaphase chromosomes from human diploid cells	Isolation and zonal fractionation of human diploid cell metaphase chromosomes.
8	mixed lymphocyte reactions and tissue transplantation tolerance	Mixed lymphocyte responses and Tissue Transplant Tolerance.
8	white blood count in patients on regular haemodialysis	White blood cell counts in regular hemodialysis patients.
8	morphological comparison of machupo with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus basis for a new taxonomic group	Morphological Comparison of Machupo with Lymphocytic Choriomeningitis Virus for a New Taxonomic Group.
8	the effect of glucocorticosteroids on the kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes	Glucocorticoid effects on mononuclear phagocyte kinetics.
8	giant neutrophil granules in the chediak higashi syndrome of man mink cattle and mice	Giant neutrophils in mink-mouse chediak higashi syndrome.
8	hematological and febrile responses of rabbits to listerial hemolysins	Hematological and Febrile Reactions of Rabbits to Listeriolar Hemolysins.
8	unscheduled incorporation of thymidine in ultraviolet irradiated human lymphocytes	Unforeseen incorporation into ultraviolet-irradiated human lymphocytes.
8	effects of short term epithelial reticular cell and whole organ thymus grafts in neonatally thymectomized mice	Effects of grafting epithelial reticular cells and thymus d&apos, a short-term whole-body organ in thymectomized neonatalised mice.
8	cytogenetic studies with cyclamate and related compounds	Cytogenetic Studies with Cyclamate and Related Compounds.
8	lymphocytic responses to streptococcal antigens in glomerulonephritic patients	Journal of Infectious Diseases, 3rd edition. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/english/english/english/index.html.
8	in vitro stimulation of antibody formation by peritoneal cells ii cell interactions and effects of immunochemical or metabolic inhibitors	In vitro stimulation of the formation of proteins; antibody by peritoneal cells ii cell interactions and the effects of immunochemical or metabolic inhibitors.
8	the role of the lymphatic system in the rejection of homografts a study of lymph from renal transplants	The Role of the Lymphatic System in Rejection of Kidney Transplant Lymphs.
8	biochemical endocrine and other indices during quinestrol therapy	Biochemical Endocrine Indicia and Other Indices during Quinestrol Therapy.
8	mixed lymphocyte cultures produce effector cells model in vitro for allograft rejection	Mixed lymphocyte cultures produce in vitro model effector cells for the rejection of allografts.
8	labeling and other effects of actinomycin d on human chromosomes	In addition, it can be used as a marker or as a marker.
8	quantitation of strain balb c mouse peritoneal cells	Quantification of the peritoneal cells of the mouse strain Balb c.
8	the effect of caffeine on the mitosis of human lymphocytes in culture	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	isolation of leucogenenol from bovine and human liver	Human and bovine liver leucogenenol isolation.
8	lymphocyte stimulation transfer of cellular hypersensitivity to antigen in vitro	Cervical inflammation of the skin; inflammation of the skin; inflammation of the skin.
8	cell mediated immunological processes in leprosy	Leprosy cell-mediated immunological processes.
8	correction of celluar metachromasia in cultured fibroblasts in several inherited mucopolysaccharidoses	Correcting cellular metachromasis in fibroblasts cultured in hereditary mucopolysaccharides.
8	in vitro lymphocyte reactivity during depression of tuberculin hypersensitivity by 6 mercaptopurine	Lymphocyte responsiveness in vitro during decreased tuberculin skin sensitivity; hypersensitivity to 6 mercaptopurine.
8	pompe s disease detection of heterozygotes by lymphocyte stimulation	Dietary Reference Intakes, M.S.C., D.C. Dietary Reference Intakes, M.S. Dietary Reference Intakes and M.S. Dietary Reference Intakes.
8	detection of simultaneous antibody synthesis in plasma cells and specialized lymphocytes in rabbit lymph nodes	Detection of simultaneous rabbit lymphocyte cell and plasma cell antibody synthesis.
8	human monocytes and macrophages interaction with antigen and lymphocytes	Human macrophages and monocytes interact with antigen and lymphocytes.
8	antigen recognition in vitro studies on the specificity of the cellular immune response	Recognition of antigen; cell immune response specificity in vitro studies.
8	cells involved in the immune response xii the differing responses of normal rabbit lymphoid cells to phytohemagglutinin goat anti rabbit immunoglobulin antiserum and allogeneic and xenogeneic lymphocytes	The immune response cells xii are the different responses of rabbit normal lymphoid cells to goat phytohemagglutinin rabbit antiserum-immunoglobulin and to allogeneic and xenogenic lymphocytes.
8	rapid lymphocytic recognition of histoincompatibility changes of the deoxyribonucleoprotein complex in mixed cultures of allogeneic human lymphocytes	Rapid lymphocyte recognition of changes in the histoincompatibility of the deoxyribonucleoprotein complex in allogenic human lymphocyte mixed cultures.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats iv immunologic potentiality of the responding cells	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the immunogenicity and immunogenicity of prostate cancer.
8	lymphocyte transformation in multiple sclerosis	Multiple sclerosis lymphocyte transformation.
8	the differential attachment of antibiotics to glycoprotein and blood lymphocytes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used for the treatment of diabetes.
8	mixed leukocyte reactivity and leukemia study of identical siblings	Study of the reactivity of leukocytes and leukemia in identical siblings.
8	specificity of antigen recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro	Specificity of human lymphocyte antigen recognition in vitro.
8	cytotoxicity specificity after in vitro sensitization	Specificity of cytotoxicity after sensitization in vitro.
8	a study of the effects of certain hormones on human cells in culture	A study of the effects of certain hormones on the development of human cells in culture.
8	changes in the differential leukocyte count of chicks inoculated with salmonella	Changes in leukocyte differential numbers in salmonella-inoculated chicks.
8	alkaline phosphatase activity of polymorphonuclear leucocytes and lymphocytes separated from normal human blood	L' polymorphonuclear leukocyte alkaline phosphatase activity and lymphocyte activity is separated from normal human blood.
8	quantitation of lymphocyte transformation using radioactive iododeoxyuridine	Diagnosis of the transformation of lymphocytes by the use of radioactive iododeoxyuridine.
8	quantitative enzyme cytochemistry of leukaemic cells	Leukemia cells' quantitative enzymatic cytochemistry.
8	glucocorticoids and cellular immunity in vitro facilitation of the sensitization phase and inhibition of the effector phase of a lymphocyte anti fibroblast reaction	Glucocorticoids and lapos; in vitro cellular immunity facilitates sensitization and lapos; effect phase inhibition of d' lymphocyte fibroblast anti-fib reaction.
8	studies on the differentiation of thymus derived lymphocytes	Thymus-derived lymphocyte differentiation studies.
8	histocompatibility type and immune responsiveness in random bred hartley strain guinea pigs	For example, the type, histocompatibility, and immune response of randomly reared guinea pigs are examples of guinea pigs.
8	clinical evaluation of the urinary sediment after renal allotransplantation	Urinary sediment clinical evaluation after allotransplantation.
8	y fluorescence of interphase nuclei especially circulating lymphocytes	Fluorescence of the interphase nuclei, especially of the circulating lymphocytes.
8	in vitro and in vivo activity of a lymphocyte and immune complex dependent chemotactic factor for eosinophils	In vivo and in vitro activity of eosinophils, a lymphocyte and chemotactic factor dependent on the immune complex.
8	immunological problems in leprosy research 1 clinical and pathological spectrum of leprosy	Immunological Problems in Leprosy Research 1 Clinical and Pathological Spectrum of Leprosy.
8	response of the rheumatoid synovial membrane to exogenous immunization	Rheumatoid synovial membrane response; immunization exogenously.
8	comparison of the hl a phenotypes of lymphocytes and kidney cells determined by the fluorochromasia cytotoxicity assay	Comparison of lymphocyte and renal cell phenotypes as determined by a fluorochromatic cytotoxicity assay.
8	cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in human lymphocytes alterations after phytohemagglutinin stimulation	Cyclic adenosine, 3,5 monophosphate, in human lymphocyte alterations following phytohemagglutinin stimulation.
8	human lymphocytic metabolism effects of cyclic and noncyclic nucleotides on stimulation by phytohemagglutinin	Effects of Human Lymphocytic Metabolism of Cyclic and Non-Cyclic Nucleotides on Human Phytohemagglutinin Stimulation.
8	specificity of allogeneic cell recognition by human lymphocytes in vitro	Specificity of Allogeneic Cell Recognition by Human Lymphocytes in vitro.
8	specific lymphocyte sensitization in cancer is there a common antigen in human malignant neoplasia	The specific sensitization of lymphocytes in cancer is due to the existence of a common antigen in the human neoplastic malignancies.
8	karyotyping of single human chromosomes from dry mass determined by electron microscopy	Karyotyping of electron-microscopically determined simple human dry mass chromosomes.
8	immunoglobulin production by human lymphocytoid lines and clones absence of genic exclusion	In addition, it may be used in combination with other human lymphocyte lines.
8	cell surface antigens serial sectioning of single cells as an approach to topographical analysis	Serial separation of the antigens from the surface of the cells of the individual cells for the purpose of a topographic analysis.
8	lymphocyte stimulation selective destruction of cells during blastogenic response to transplantation antigens	Lymphocyte stimulation and selective cell destruction during blastogenic response to transplant antigens.
8	a study of gluco corticosteroid induced pyknosis in the thymus and lymph node of the adrenalectomized rat	A study of glucocorticosteroids induced pyknosis in adrenalectomized rat thymus and lymph node.
8	6 thioguanine antimitotic effect on human lymphocytes in vitro prevented by adenine	In addition, it can be used to reduce the risk of infection.
8	lymphocyte sensitization in sarcoidosis	Sensitization of lymphocytes to sarcoidosis.
8	cytodiagnosis of rheumatoid pleural effusions	Rheumatoid pleural effusion cyodiagnosis.
8	human lymphocyte antigen reactivity modified by neuraminidase	Neuraminidase-modified antigenic reactivity in human lymphocytes.
8	ultrastructural study of two cases of alpha chain disease	Ultrastructural Study of Two Cases of Alpha Chain Disease.
8	quantitative aspects of plasma membrane associated immunoglobulin in clones of diploid human lymphocytes	Quantitative aspects of plasma membrane-associated immunoglobulin (PLA) in human diploid lymphocyte clones.
8	lymphocytic sialadenitis in the major and minor glands a correlation in postmortem subjects	Lymphocytic sialadenitis in primary and secondary glands, a correlate in postmortem subjects.
8	mediators of histamine release from human platelets lymphocytes and granulocytes	Mediators of the release of histamine from both human platelet lymphocytes and granulocytes.
8	mixed leukocyte stimulation of normal peripheral leukocytes by autologous lymphoblastoid cells	Mixed leukocyte stimulation by autologous lymphoblastoid cells of normal peripheral leukocytes.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats v tempo and specificity of the proliferative response and the number of reactive cells from immunized donors	Quantitative rat lymphocyte interaction studies v. and proliferative response specificity and number of immunized donor reactive cells.
8	biochemically marked lymphocytoid lines establishment of lesch nyhan cells	Establishment of biochemically labeled lesch nyhan lymphocytoid lines.
8	uptake of transfer ribonucleic acid by normal and leukemic cells	Transfer l' ribonucleic acid to normal cells and leukemia.
8	action of diphenylhydantoin on chromosomes	Diphenylhydantoin action on chromosomes.
8	the peritoneal exudate lymphocyte i differences in antigen responsiveness between peritoneal exudate and lymph node lymphocytes from immunized guinea pigs	Lymphocytes from the apos; peritoneal exudate differ in antigenic reactivity between lymphocytes from the apos; exudate from the peritoneal and lymph nodes of immunized guinea pigs.
8	lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in vitro effect of enhancing antisera	In vitro lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxic effect; antisera increase.
8	mechanisms of recovery from a generalized viral infection mousepox 3 regression infectious foci	Mechanisms of Recovery; Widespread Viral Infection Mousebox 3 Infectious Foci of Regression.
8	synthesis and assembly of immunoglobulins by malignant human plasmacytes and lymphocytes ii heterogeneity of assembly in cells producing igm proteins	Synthesis and assembly of apo; immune globulins by malignant human lymphocytes and plasmacytes; and heterogeneity of apo; assembly in cells producing igmic proteins.
8	studies on the life history of lymphocytes i the life span of cells responsive in the mixed lymphocyte interaction	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that lymphocyte cells are reactive.
8	specific inhibition of tumor cell dna synthesis in vitro by lymphocytes from peritoneal exudate of immunized syngeneic guinea pigs	In addition, there is a need for further research to determine the nature and extent of the adverse effects on human health and the environment.
8	on the number and nature of antigen sensitive lymphocytes in the blood of delayed hypersensitive human donors	Number and nature of antigen-sensitive lymphocytes in blood of delayed human hypersensitive donors.
8	antigen binding cells in normal mouse thymus	Binding cells; antigen in the normal thymus of mice.
8	tumor immunity tumor suppression in vivo initiated by soluble products of specifically stimulated lymphocytes	Tumour immunity tumour suppression in vivo, initiated by specifically stimulated lymphocyte soluble products.
8	treatment of acute lymphoblastic leukaemia comparison of immunotherapy b c g intermittent methotrexate and no therapy after a five month intensive cytotoxic regimen concord trial preliminary report to the medical research council by the leukaemia committee and the working party on leukaemia in childhood	Treatment of Acute Lymphoblastic Leukemia, Comparison of Dosage; Intermittent Immunotherapy c Metotrexate and No Treatment After a Five-Month Intensive Cytotoxic Trial, Draft Report to the Medical Research Council by the Leukemia Committee and the Childhood Leukemia Working Group.
8	synthesis of plasma membrane associated and secretory immunoglobulin in diploid lymphocytes	L&apos synthesis; secretory and plasma membrane-associated immunoglobulin (PLAI) in diploid lymphocytes.
8	sensitized lymphocytes in muscular dystrophy evidence for a neural factor in pathogenesis	The lymphocytes sensitized in the muscle dystrophy indicate the existence of apos; a neural factor in the pathogenesis.
8	lymphocyte sensitization to nervous tissues and muscle in patients with the guillain barr syndrome	Lymphocyte sensitivity to muscle and nervous tissue in patients with Guillain Barr syndrome.
8	a receptor for antibody on b lymphocytes i method of detection and functional significance	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	a receptor for antibody on b lymphocytes ii immunochemical and electron microscopy characteristics	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
8	synergistic interaction of macrophages and lymphocytes in antigen induced transformation of lymphocytes	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
8	receptors on immunocompetent cells ii specificity and nature of receptors on dinitrophenylated guinea pig albumin 125 i binding lymphocytes of normal guinea pigs	Immunocompetent cell receptors ii specificity and type of receptor on normal guinea pig lacid-binding lymphocytes; dinitrophenylated guinea pig albumin 125 i normal guinea pigs.
8	a new micromethod for evaluating lymphocyte responses to phytohemagglutinin quantitative analysis of the function of thymus dependent cells	A new micromethod for assessing lymphocyte responses to phytohemagglutinin-dependent thymus-dependent cells; quantitative analysis.
8	impaired lymphocyte reactivity against tumour cells in patients with coeliac disease	Cardiovascular System (CPS) Cardiovascular System (CPS) Cardiovascular System (CDS) Cardiovascular System (CDS) Cardiovascular System (CDS) Cardiovascular disease.
8	dna dependent dna polymerases i and ii from normal human blood lymphocytes	In addition, it is not possible to determine the cause of the adverse reactions.
8	the relationship between thymus and oncogenesis a study of the incidence of non thymic malignancy in myasthenia gravis	Thymus-oncogenesis relationship is a study of the incidence of non-thymic malignancy in severe myasthenia.
8	enhancement by interferon of the specific cytotoxicity of sensitized lymphocytes	Increases in sensitized lymphocyte specific cytotoxicity via interferon.
8	mouse cytomegalovirus necrosis of infected and morphologically normal submaxillary gland acinar cells during termination of chronic infection	Cytomegalovirus necrosis of infected, morphologically normal, acinar cells in mice under-maxillaria during late stages of infection; chronic infection.
8	surface immunoglobulins on thymus and thymus derived lymphoid cells	Surface thymus immunoglobulins and thymus-derived lymphoid cells.
8	quantitative studies on the mixed lymphocyte interaction in rats vi reactivity of lymphocytes from conventional and germfree rats to allogeneic and xenogeneic cell surface antigens	Quantitative studies of cell surface allogeneic and xenogenic antigens in normal and germ-free rat lymphocytes; Mixed lymphocyte interaction in reactive rat.
8	the compartmentalization of antigen reactive lymphocytes in desensitized guinea pigs	The compartmentation of reactive antigenic lymphocytes in the desensitized guinea pigs.
8	cystathionine synthase activity in human lymphocytes induction by phytohemagglutinin	L' cystathionine synthase activity in human lymphocytes is induced by the phytohemagglutinin.
8	antigen solubilized from human leukemia lymphocyte stimulation	Antigen solubilized from the stimulation of the lymphocytes of human leukemia.
8	cell cycle dependent immune lysis of moloney virus transformed lymphocytes presence of viral antigen accessibility to antibody and complement activation	The immune lysis depends on the cell cycle of the moloney virus, transforms the lymphocytes in the presence of apos; an accessibility of the viral antigen to antibodies and apos; activation of the complement.
8	membrane associated dna in the cytoplasm of diploid human lymphocytes	Membrane-associated DNA in diploid human lymphocyte cytoplasm.
8	thymus dependent and thymus independent lymphocyte separation relation to exposed sialic acid on cell surface	The relationship between thymus-dependent and thymus-independent lymphocyte separation, and exposure to sialic acid at the cell surface.
8	antigen binding specificity of isolated cell surface immunoglobulin from thymus cells activated to histocompatibility antigens	Cell surface immunoglobulin isolated from antigen-activated thymus cells; histocompatibility.
8	stimulated normal human lymphocytes contain a ribonuclease sensitive dna polymerase distinct from viral rna directed dna polymerase	Normal, stimulated human lymphocytes contain ribonuclease-sensitive DNA polymerase, distinct from the viral RNA polymerase, which is governed by viral rna polymerase.
8	regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro potentiation and inhibition of rat lymphocyte responses to antigen and mitogens by cytochalasin b	Regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro and in vitro; inhibition of antigen and mitogen responses of rat lymphocytes by cytochalasin b.
8	interaction of aggregated globulin with b lymphocytes	Aggregate globulin interaction with lymphocytes.
8	the host cell response in the local graft versus host reaction induced in the kidneys of f 1 rats by parental thoracic duct lymphocytes	Host cell response in the f1 rat kidney graft versus host local response induced by thoracic duct parental lymphocytes.
8	the effect of bordetella pertussis on lymphocyte cyclic amp metabolism	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors associated with the use of methamphetamine.
8	deletion of b5 immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes in allotype suppressed rabbits	Deletion of lymphocytes carrying rabbit immunoglobulin b5 suppresses rabbits.
8	characterization of a lymphocyte factor which alters macrophage functions	The results of this study are summarized below.
8	independence of h 2k and h 2d antigenic determinants on the surface of mouse lymphocytes	The h2k and h2d antigenic determinants are independent of the mouse lymphocyte surface.
8	lymphocyte transformation in immunoproliferative disorders	Lymphocyte Transformation in Immunoproliferative Disorders.
8	excretion of deoxyribonucleic acid by lymphocytes stimulated with phytohemagglutinin or antigen	Lapos; deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid; antigen; phytohemagglutinin-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	action of rifamycin derivatives on rna polymerase of human leukemic lymphocytes	Rifamycin derivatives affect rna polymerase in human leukemia lymphocytes.
8	cytochalasin b inhibits lymphotoxin production by antigen stimulated lymphocytes	The production of lymphotoxin by antigen-stimulated lymphocytes is inhibited by cytochalasin.
8	aryl hydrocarbon benzopyrene hydroxylase is stimulated in human lymphocytes by mitogens and benz a anthracene	L' d&apos hydroxylase; benzopyrene aryl hydrocarbon stimulated by anthracene benz and mitogens in human lymphocytes.
8	the effect of lymphocytes from sufferers from recurrent aphthous ulceration upon colon cells in tissue culture	In addition, there is an increased risk of atherosclerotic ulceration, which results in an increased risk of atherosclerosis.
8	lymphocyte transformation in chagas disease	Transformation of lymphocytes into sorrow.
8	the migration of lymphocytes across the vascular endothelium in lymphoid tissue a reexamination	Lymphocyte migration through the vascular endothelium into lymphoid tissue has been reexamined.
8	idiotypic determinants of immunoglobulin m detected on the surface of human lymphocytes by cytotoxicity assays	Idiotypic apo-determinants; immune globulin detected on human lymphocyte surface by cytotoxicity assays.
8	quantitation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes and lymphocyte response to mitogens in horses persistently infected by equine infectious anemia virus	In addition, it may be possible to determine the extent of infection and the extent to which the infection is transmitted to the human body.
8	papain solubilized hl a antigens from cultured human lymphocytes contain two peptide fragments	The a antigens of solubilized papain hl from human lymphocytes in culture contained two peptide fragments.
8	impaired lymphocyte reactivity against tumour cells in patients with crohn s disease	Defects in the responsiveness of lymphocytes to tumour cells in Crohn's disease patients.
8	macrophage lymphocyte interaction i characteristics of the antigen independent binding of guinea pig thymocytes and lymphocytes to syngeneic macrophages	Lymphocyte interaction of guinea pig thymocyte- and lymphocyte-independent macrophages with syngenic macrophages.
8	anti human immunoglobulin g activity of membrane bound monoclonal immunoglobulin m in lymphoproliferative disorders	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	control of transcription of rna rich in polyadenylic acid in human lymphocytes	Mastery of transcriptional processing of polyadenylic acid-rich rna in human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic antibody in normal human serums reactive with tumor cells from acute lymphocytic leukemia	Cytotoxic antibody in normal human sera reacting with the tumour cells of acute lymphocytic leukemia.
8	function of macrophages in antigen recognition by guinea pig t lymphocytes i requirement for histocompatible macrophages and lymphocytes	The function of macrophages in the recognition of antigens by the t-cells of guinea pigs requires the development of macrophages and histocompatible lymphocytes.
8	studies of two subpopulations of human lymphocytes differing in responsiveness to concanavalin a	Studies of two-human lymphocyte populations with different reactivity to concanavalin.
8	transmissible mink encephalopathy studies on the peripheral lymphocyte	Mink Studies; Transmissible Mink Encephalopathy in Peripheral Lymphocytes.
8	the response to phytohaemagglutinin pha of lymphocytes from cancer patients	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	relationship of adenovirus to lymphocytes in naturally infected human tonsils and adenoids	The relationship between adenovirus and lymphocytes in human amygdala and naturally-infected adenovirus.
8	the effect of in vivo hydrocortisone on subpopulations of human lymphocytes	Effect of intravenous drug use on human lymphocyte populations.
8	the thymic suppressor cell i separation of subpopulations with suppressor activity	Separation of thymus i suppressive cells from suppressive-populations.
8	alterations in cyclic amp metabolism in human bronchial asthma ii leukocyte and lymphocyte responses to prostaglandins	Changes in Cyclic Bulb Metabolism in Human Bronchial Asthma ii responses of leukocytes and lymphocytes to prostaglandins.
8	tissue factor activity in lymphocyte cultures from normal individuals and patients with hemophilia a	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	studies on the distribution of surface immunoglobulins of human b lymphocytes	Human b lymphocyte surface immunoglobulin distribution studies.
8	lymphocyte anergy in patients with carcinoma	Lymphocytic Anergy in Patients with Cancer.
8	enumeration of activated thymus derived lymphocytes by the virus plaque assay	Enumeration of thymus-induced thymus-derived lymphocytes; viral plaque test.
8	stimulated lymphocyte cultures responder recruitment and cell cycle kinetics	To stimulate the recruitment of responders into lymphocyte cultures and the kinetics of the cell cycle.
8	antibody mediated suppression of lymphoma participation of platelets lymphocytes and nonphagocytic macrophages	Antibodies suppressed platelet lymphocyte and nonphagocytic macrophage involvement in lymphoma.
8	occurrence of surface igm igd and free light chains of human lymphocytes	In addition, there is an increased risk of infection due to the use of a combination of drugs.
8	lymphocytes in patients with variable immunodeficiency and panhypogammaglobulinemia evaluation of b and t cell surface markers and a proposed classification	Lymphocytes from patients with apo, variable immunodeficiency and panhypogammaglobulinemia were evaluated at baseline using markers from the surface of the b and t and d cells; a proposed classification.
8	pattern of immunoglobulin synthesis and assembly in a human mouse somatic cell hybrid clone	Synthesis diagram and d' assembly of immunoglobulins in a hybrid clone of somatic cells from human mice.
8	the k chains of the immunoglobulin from a continuous culture of human lymphocytes daudi have an unusual molecular size	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	relationship between hl a antigens and beta 2 microglobulin as studied by immunofluorescence on the lymphocyte membrane	The relationship between hl a antigen and beta-2 microglobulin was studied by lymphocyte membrane immunofluorescence assay.
8	the phasic radiosensitivity of human lymphocytes to the effects of protons	Proton effects on phasic radiosensitivity of human lymphocytes.
8	macrophage lymphocyte clusters in the immune response to soluble protein antigen in vitro ii ultrastructure of clusters formed during the early response	Lymphocyte macrophage clusters in the immune response to the in vitro soluble protein antigen; early response clusters ultrastructure.
8	receptor for the fourth component of complement on human b lymphocytes and cultured human lymphoblastoid cells	Receptor for the fourth component of the complement in human b lymphocytes and in human lymphoblastoid cells.
8	separation of antigen specific lymphocytes a new general method of releasing cells bound to nylon mesh	Separation of nylon-specific lymphocytes is a novel generalized method for release of nylon-netted cells.
8	human lymphocyte surface immunoglobulin capping normal characteristics and anomalous behavior of chronic lymphocytic leukemic lymphocytes	The surface immunoglobulins of human lymphocytes cover the normal characteristics and abnormal behaviour of the chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes.
8	human peripheral lymphocytes and cancer in vitro studies on the basic protein histone f2a1 fraction	In vitro studies of human peripheral lymphocytes and of cancer on the f2a1 fraction of the basic protein histone.
8	a girl with karyotype 46 xx del 7 qter p 15	A girl with karyotype 46.
8	transformation antigens on stimulated lymphocytes	Stimulated lymphocyte transformation antigens.
8	chromatin proteins from human lymphocytes a gel electrophoretic comparison between normal mitogen stimulated cell line and chronic lymphocytic leukemia lymphocytes	Human lymphocyte chromatin proteins were compared by gel electrophoresis (GGE) between the normal mitogen-stimulated cell line and lymphocytes of chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	insoluble particulate antigen s in cell mediated immunity of autoimmune thyroid disease	Insoluble antigen-specific cell-mediated immunity to auto @-@immune thyroid diseases.
8	periapical destructions caused by experimental pulpal inoculation of streptococcus mutans in rats	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
8	in vitro lymphocyte response to treponema refringens im human syphilis	National Population Health Survey (NPHS), Cycle 1 of the National Population Health Survey.
8	evidence for two waves of induction of dna enzymes in stimulated human lymphocytes	There appear to be two waves of apo; induction of apo; DNA enzymes in the stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes from pregnant mice on cultivated tumor cells i specificity nature of effector cells and blocking by serum	Cytotoxic Effect of Gravid Mouse Lymphocytes on Culturally Culturally Culturally Culturally Specific Effect Cells and Serum Blockade.
8	a simple method for the elimination of platelets from the lymphocyte platelet mixture by sucrose	Simple procedure for sucrose removal of platelets from lymphocyte platelet mixture.
8	studies of the human lymphocyte receptor for heat aggregated or antigen complexed immunoglobulin	Human lymphocyte receptor studies; heat-complexed immune globulin or antigen.
8	chromosome breakage studies in lymphocytes from normal women pregnant women and women taking oral contraceptives	Chromosome breakage studies in lymphocytes of normal pregnant and oral contraceptive women.
8	abnormal immune responses of bloom s syndrome lymphocytes in vitro	Abnormal in vitro flowering syndrome lymphocyte immune response.
8	in vitro generation of memory lymphocytes reactive to transplantation antigens	In vitro Generation of Reactive Transplant Lymphocytes.
8	sialyl residues in hepatitis b antigen their role in determining the life span of the antigen in serum and in eliciting an immunological response	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that the presence of antigen in the human body is associated with the development of antigenic antibodies.
8	effect of anti beta2 microglobulin on antigen and allogeneic lymphocyte induced proliferation of human lymphocytes	The anti-@ beta2 microglobulin effect on anti-antigen and allogenic lymphocytes induced human lymphocyte proliferation.
8	lipid composition of plasma membranes from human leukemic lymphocytes	Human leukemia lymphocyte plasma membrane lipid composition.
8	heritability of the phytohemagglutinin responsiveness of lymphocytes and its relationship to leukemogenesis	Lymphocyte responsiveness to phytohemagglutinin is heritable and related to leukemogenesis.
8	some properties of a dna unwinding protein unique to lymphocytes from chronic lymphocytic leukemia	It is important to note that lymphocyte lymphocytes do not have the same genetic makeup as other lymphocytes, but they do have the same genetic makeup.
8	dna dependent rna polymerase levels during the response of human peripheral lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of the safety and efficacy of the drug.
8	functional subclasses of t lymphocytes bearing different ly antigens ii cooperation between subclasses of ly cells in the generation of killer activity	Under-functional classes of t-cells carrying different antigens ly ii co-operation between sub-ly cell classes in l&apos generation; deadly activity.
8	contact sensitivity in vitro ii the effect of beryllium preparations on the proliferative responses of specifically allergised lymphocytes and normal lymphocytes stimulated with pha	Sensitivity to contact in vitro; effect of beryllium preparations on proliferative responses of specifically allergenized and pha-stimulated normal lymphocytes.
8	the properities of lymphocytes which carry immunologic memory of phix 174	Lymphocyte properties that bear the phix's immunological memory.
8	the yield of chromosomal aberrations in rabbit lymphocytes after irradiation in vitro and in vivo	The yield of rabbit lymphocyte chromosomal aberrations after irradiation in vitro and in vivo.
8	suppression of maternal responsiveness to paternal antigen by maternal plasma	Suppression of maternal antipaternal antigen responsiveness by maternal plasma.
8	tolerance and contact sensitivity to dnfb in mice iv desensitization as a manifestation of increased proliferation of sensitized cells	Tolerance and sensitivity to contact with dnfb in the desensitization of mice iv as a manifestation of desensitization; increased proliferation of sensitized cells.
8	characterization of immunoglobulin bearing and other small lymphocytes in mouse bone marrow by sedimentation and electrophoresis	Characterization of the presence of apo, immunoglobulins and apo; other small mouse bone marrow lymphocytes by sedimentation and electrophoresis.
8	concanavalin a receptors on the surface membrane of lymphocytes from patient s with hodgkin s disease and other malignant lymphomas	Concanavalin has surface membrane receptors in patients with Hodgkin's disease and other malignant lymphomas.
8	biologic and antigenic similarity of virus induced migration inhibition factor to conventional lymphocyte derived migration inhibition factor	Biologic and antigenic similarity of Dapos factor; inhibition of migration induced by the virus with Dapos factor; inhibition of migration induced by the classical lymphocytes.
8	phytohemagglutinin committed lymphocytes the mitotic activity of the phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes	Phytohemagglutinin transmitted to l&apos lymphocytes; phytohemagglutinin mitotic activity stimulated lymphocytes.
8	hl a ld lymphocyte defined typing a rapid assay with primed lymphocytes	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of other studies.
8	detection of canine kidney allograft rejection with 51cr labeled lymphocytes	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	asymptomatic liver disease in hepatitis b antigen carriers	Infection with hepatitis B. Infection with hepatitis B. Infection with hepatitis B.
8	a cytotoxic factor released from unactivated human lymphocytes	Released cytotoxic factor from inactivated human lymphocytes.
8	multiple protein kinases from human lymphocytes identification enzymes phosphorylating exogenous histon and casein	Protein kinases that can be synthesized in the body; proteins that can be synthesized in the body; proteins that can be synthesized in the body; and proteins that can be synthesized.
8	excision repair in lymphocytes of psoriasis author s transl	Psoriasis lymphocyte excision repair.
8	a technique for separation of canine lymphocytes and their use in the lymphocytotoxic blastogenic and rosette assys	Canine Lymphocyte Separation Technology and its Use in Lymphocytotoxic Blast Genesis and Rosette.
8	differences in the sensitivity of tumor cells and normal lymphocytes toward lysis by alloantibodies and guinea pig or rabbit complement	Differences in sensitivity of normal tumor cells and lymphocytes to alloantibodies and rabbit or guinea pig complement to lysis.
8	appparent familial multiple sclerosis in three generations report of a family with histocompatibility antigen typing	A related family of three generations of multiple sclerosis reported one family that had a type of antigen; histocompatibility.
8	distribution of cytoplasmic vacuoles in blood t and b lymphocytes in two lysosomal disorders	Cytoplasmic vacuole distribution in blood t- and b-lymphocytes in two lysosomal disorders.
8	lymphocyte in chronic lymphatic leukemia	Chronic lymphatic leukemia.
8	immunosuppressive effect of a human serum ferroprotein of hepatic origin alpha 2 h globulin study on blastic transformation of normal lymphocytes in the presence of phytohemagglutinin	Dapos immunosuppressive effect; human serum ferroprotein study; alpha 2 h globulin hepatic origin on the blast transformation of normal lymphocytes in the presence of phytohemagglutinin.
8	the possible utilization of nuclear pockets of lymphocytes in the diagnosis of enzootic bovine leucosis	In addition, it may be necessary to test for lymphocyte leukosis in order to determine the cause of the leukosis.
8	comparison of results of isolating lymphocytes with ficoll plus ronpacon and with gelatin	Comparison of lymphocyte isolation with gelatin and ficoll plus purple.
8	chromosomal aberrations in peripheral lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis author s transl	Chromosome aberrations in MS peripheral lymphocytes.
8	surface immunoglobulin of guinea pig leukaemic lymphocytes	Guinea-pig leukemia lymphocyte surface immunoglobulin.
8	an investigation of the characteristics of a negative pion beam by means of induced chromosome aberration in human peripheral blood lymphocytes	A study of DNA characteristics; a bundle of negative pawns using apo; induced chromosomal aberration in peripheral human blood lymphocytes.
8	studies on the production of anti human lymphocyte serum als in bulls	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk factors.
8	lymphocytes roles in cellular immunity and humoral immunity	Lymphocytes play a role in the development of cellular and humoral immunity.
8	role of a non committed accessory cell in the in vivo suppression of a syngeneic tumour by immune lymphocytes	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of the results of this study.
8	an assay of biological dosimetry from the changed number of lymphocytes and hypersegmented neutrophiles evaluated by means of statistical decision method	Biological dosimetry test based on modified lymphocyte and neutrophil hypersparated neutrophil count, using a statistical decision-making method.
8	lymphocyte response to hepatitis b surface antigen findings in hepatitis and indian childhood cirrhosis	Acute lymphocyte reaction to the discovery of antigen; surface antigen; hepatitis b in the liver; childhood hepatitis and cirrhosis in India.
8	b lymphocytes lacking surface ig in patients with immune deficiency initiation of ig synthesis in culture in cells of a patient with thymoma	Surface-free b-cells in immunocompromised patients initiate synthesis of cultured eig in cell cultures; a thymoma patient.
8	surface structure of the macrophages and lymphocytes in their interaction under conditions of antigenic stimulation observed with the scanning electron microscope	Macrophage surface structure and lymphocyte interaction under conditions of scanning electron microscopy (SEM) antigen stimulation.
8	induction of 16alpha hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes	Cultured human lymphocytes induced 16alpha hydroxylase.
8	surface proteins of thymus derived lymphocytes and bone marrow derived lymphocytes selective isolation of immunoglobulin and the theta antigen by non ionic detergents	Thymus-derived lymphocyte surface proteins and bone marrow-derived lymphocytes selectively isolate the apos; immunoglobulin and l' antigen theta by non-ionic detergent.
8	fractionation of functional lymphocytes sensitized to basic encephalitogen on derivatized collagen and gelatin gels	Functional lymphocyte fractionation sensitized to basic epos; encephalitogenic on collagen and gelatin-derived gels.
8	regulation of the release of colony stimulating activity from mitogen stimulated lymphocytes	Regulation of l&apos release; mitogen-stimulated lymphocyte colony-stimulating activity.
8	stimulator t cells involvement in the induction of cell mediated cytotoxicity	Stimulating t-cells mediate cell-mediated cytotoxicity induction.
8	kinetic studies of circulating lymphocytes in malignant lymphatic disease using the impulse cytophotometer	Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiac Patient.
8	human antibody dependent cellular cytotoxicity isolation and identification of a subpopulation of peripheral blood lymphocytes which kill antibody coated autologous target cells	Human Antibody-Based Cellular Cytotoxicity Isolation and Identification of a sub@-@ population of peripheral blood lymphocytes that kill autologous antibody-coated target cells.
8	effects of cytotoxic immunosuppressants on tuberculin sensitive lymphocytes in guinea pigs	Effects of Cytotoxic Immunosuppressants on Tuberculin-sensitive Lymphocytes in the Guinea-pig.
8	comparative study of the ultrastructure of immune and normal phytohemagglutinin treated lymphocytes	Comparative apos study; normal and immune lymphocyte ultrastructure treated with phytohemagglutinin.
8	ultrastructural relationships between decidua trophoblast and lymphocytes at the beginning of human pregnancy	Ultrastructural trophoblast decidua – lymphocyte relationships in early human pregnancy.
8	characteristics of a cytotoxic human lymphocyte dependent antibody	In addition, there are a number of other drugs that can be used to treat the disease.
8	high terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase activity in a new t cell line rpmi 8402 of acute lymphoblastic leukemia origin	Terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase activity elevated in a novel 8402 d&apos tpmi cell line; acute lymphoblastic origin.
8	thymosin induced increase in e rosette forming capacity of lymphocytes in patients with malignant neoplasms	Thymosin induced an increase in the rosette-forming ability of lymphocytes in malignant neoplasm patients.
8	cytotoxic lymphocytes from normal donors a functional marker of human non t lymphocytes	Cytotoxic lymphocytes from normal donors are functional markers of non-t human lymphocytes.
8	in vitro reactivity of lymphocytes obtained from uraemic patients maintained by heamodialysis	In vitro lymphocyte reactivity obtained from heamodialysis-maintained uremic patients.
8	effect of dimethylbenzanthracene on lymphocytes of the peripheral blood in man	Effect of dimethylbenzanthracene (DMB) on peripheral blood lymphocytes in men.
8	induction of t cell differentiation in the bursa of fabricius by a soluble thymus factor	Induced thymus-soluble differentiation of t-cells in the fabricius bursa.
8	physicochemical characterization of chemotatic lymphokines produced by human t and b lymphocytes	Physico-chemical characterization of human T- and b-cell chemotactic lymphokines.
8	the expression of theta like antigen by rat peripheral lymphocytes serologic and functional studies	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	suppressor cell control of unresponsiveness to experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	The cellular control suppresses the non-response to the experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	in vitro production of ige by lymphocytes from a patient with hyperimmunoglobulinaemia e eosinophilia and increased lymphocytes carrying surface ige	In vitro production of eosinophilia and augmentation of lymphocytes in patients with apos, hyperimmune globulinemia and dapos; eosinophilia and augmentation of lymphocytes in patients with apos; surface snow.
8	an absolute requirement for serum macromolecules in phytohaemagglutinin induced human lymphocyte dna synthesis	An absolute requirement for the serum macromolecules in phytohemagglutinin induces synthesis of the DNA of human lymphocytes.
8	activation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by concanavalin a dependence of monocytes	Human peripheral blood lymphocyte activation by concanavalin, monocyte dependence-@-@ on concanavalin.
8	ultrastructural investigations on the lysosomal system of lymph node lymphocytes in transplantation immunity	Ultrastructural studies of the lymph node lymphocyte lysosomal system in apos; transplantation immunity.
8	depressed lymphocyte function after measles mumps rubella vaccination	Decreased lymphocyte function following mumps immunization.
8	lymphocyte associated antigens in patients with alveolar cell carcinoma	Lymphocyte-associated antigens in apos patients; alveolar carcinoma.
8	migration inhibition of peritoneal cells and pha lymphocyte toxicity in rats during methylcholanthrene carcinogenesis	Inhibition of peritoneal cell migration and pha cell toxicity during methylcholanthrene carcinogenesis in rats.
8	effect of oil attached bcg cell wall on the kinetics of lymphocytes in the tumor draining node	Effect of the apos; oil attached to the cell wall of the bcg on lymphocyte kinetics in the tumour drainage ganglion.
8	unscheduled dna synthesis in human lymphocytes treated with neocarzinostatin	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of the safety and efficacy of the drug.
8	histocompatibility testing in dogs ii leukocyte typing in relation to the mixed lymphocyte culture mlc reactivity	Dog histocompatibility tests ii leukocyte typing related to the mlc reactivity of mixed lymphocyte cultures.
8	relative genetic efficiency of 50 me v protons as derived from analyses of chromosome anomalies in human lymphocytes	The 50-me-v relative proton genetic efficiency was determined from apo analyses; chromosomal abnormalities in human lymphocytes.
8	radiation induced chromosome aberrations in human peripheral lymphocytes exposure to x rays or protons	Radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in peripheral X-ray- and proton-exposed human lymphocytes.
8	role of the regional lymph node in neoplasia cellular mediated reactivity in vitro by autologous regional or distant lymph nodes or peripheral blood lymphocytes of dogs with spontaneous neoplasms	Role of the regional lymph node in the in vitro neoplastic cell-mediated responsiveness of autologous regional or distal lymph nodes, or peripheral lymph nodes, in dogs with spontaneously occurring neoplasms.
8	increased lymphocyte mediated destruction of tumor cells in microcytotoxicity assays seen after addition of inhibitors of protein synthesis	Increased tumour cell destruction by the lymphocyte intermediate in microcytotoxicity assays was observed after protein synthesis inhibitors were added.
8	tissue factor activity of cultured human lymphocytes	L' activity of tissue factors of human lymphocytes in culture.
8	massive polyclonal hyperimmunoglobulinemia e eosinophilia and increased ige bearing lymphocytes	Massive polyclonal hyperimmunoglobulinemia and eosinophilia, and an increase in the number of carrier snow lymphocytes.
8	relationship between sterol synthesis and dna synthesis in phytohemagglutinin stimulated mouse lymphocytes	Mouse lymphocytes are stimulated by the relationship between sterol synthesis and DNA synthesis in phytohemagglutinin.
8	selective adsorption of immune lymphocytes synthesizing dna on corresponding target cells	In addition to the above, there are a number of other types of lymphocytes that may be involved in the development of the immune system.
8	radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes after partial body exposure to 60co gamma irradiation and in vitro exposure to 230 kv x irradiation	The radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes following partial exposure of the body to gamma irradiation with 60co and exposure in vitro to irradiation with 230 kv x.
8	isolation and electrophoretic characteristics of 3 lymphocyte populations of normal human blood	Isolation and Electrophoretic Characteristics of Three Lymphocyte Populations of Normal Human Blood.
8	studies on n5 methyltetrahydrofolate homocystein methyltransferase in normal and leukemia leukocytes	Methyltetrahydrofolate homocysteine methyltransferase n5 studies in leukemic and normal leukocytes.
8	human lymphocytes 5 nucleotidase positive and negative subpopulations	Human lymphocytes 5-nucleotidase negative and positive populations.
8	radiosensitivity of sensitized and nonsensitized human lymphocytes evaluated in vitro	Radiosensitivity of sensitized and non-sensitized human lymphocytes is also evaluated in vitro.
8	the blood xylose test in childhood correlation between 1 hour blood xylose levels and numbers of intraepithelial lymphocytes in intestinal mucosa in celiac disease	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
8	experimental production of granulomatous pneumonitis comparison of immunological and morphological sequelae with particulate and soluble antigens administered via the respiratory route	Experimental production of granulomatous pneumonia, comparison of immunological and morphological sequelae with aerosolized and aerosolized granulomatous antigens.
8	investigations concerning the fixation of hepatitis b antigen hbag on peripheral lymphocytes and isolated hepatocytes in patients with inflammatory liver diseases author s transl	Hepatitis C and hepatitis C are endemic to Canada and the United States, and are endemic to the United States and to the United States.
8	very short lived and stable mrnas from resting human lymphocytes	Stable, very short-lived human resting lymphocyte mnas.
8	increased cellular levels of spermidine or spermine are required for optimal dna synthesis in lymphocytes activated by concanavalin a	An increase in cellular spermidine or spermine levels is necessary for the optimal synthesis of l' DNA in concanavalin a-activated lymphocytes.
8	t rosette assay in vitro correlate of cellular immunity	It can be used as an antibody or as an antioxidant.
8	two stages in lymphocyte mediator production by differential susceptibility to blockade using niridazole	Two stages in the production of lymphocyte mediators by niridazole-assisted differential susceptibility to blockade.
8	studies on the behavior of lymphocytes in the direct lymphocytotoxicity test dlt in surgical patients ii dynamics of immunological reactivity in selected cases	Lymphocyte Behavioural Studies in the Direct Lymphocytotoxicity Test dlt in Surgical Patients ii Immune Reactivity Dynamics in Selected Cases.
8	morphological changes in maternal lymphocytes in pregnancy	Morphological Changes in Maternal Lymphocytes During Pregnancy.
8	in vitro lymphocyte reactivity and t cell levels in patients with melanoma correlations with clinical and pathological stage	Lymphocyte reactivity in vitro and t-cell levels in patients who are clinically and pathologically related to melanoma.
8	production of mif like supernatants by rheumatoid arthritis lymphocytes stimulated by immunoglobulin g	Mif-like supernatants produced by apos-stimulated rheumatoid polyarthritis lymphocytes; immunoglobulin g.
8	study of the effects of antigammaglobulin factors on lymphocytes from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Study of lymphocyte effects of antigammaglobulin factors in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
8	a case of impaired chemotaxis and lymphocyte transformation	One case; chemotaxis alteration and lymphocyte transformation.
8	immunoglobulin synthesis in vitro by cerebrospinal fluid cells in patients with meningoencephalitis of presumed viral origin	In Vitro Immunoglobulin Synthesis by Cephalic Fluid Cells @-@spinal cord in Meningo Patients-d&apos encephalitis; putative viral origin.
8	contamination of anti immunoglobulin reagents with antibodies to beta 2 microglobulin and other unrelated antigens effects on immunofluorescence staining of human lymphocytes	Contamination of anti-immunoglobulin reagents with beta 2 and d&apos microglobulin antibodies; other unrelated antigens having effects on human lymphocyte immunofluorescence staining.
8	stimulation of normal lymphocytes with autologous lymphoid cell lines properties of derived killer cells	Normal lymphocyte stimulation with autologous properties of derived killer cell lymphoid cell lines.
8	capacity of sera from patients with mammary carcinoma to promote pha stimulation of human lymphocytes	The ability of sera from breast cancer patients to promote the pha-stimulation of human lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic mechanisms detected in vitro following sheep renal allografts	Cytotoxic mechanisms detected after sheep renal allografts in vitro.
8	rhesus lymphocyte alloantigens iii identification of new antigens	Rhesus Lymphocyte Alloantigens iii Identification of new antigens.
8	elution and characterization of lymphocytes from rheumatoid inflammatory tissue	Rheumatoid inflammatory tissue lymphocyte elution and characterization.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in the cerebrospinal fluid and peripheral blood in patients with multiple sclerosis	Under-populations of lymphocytes in cerebrospinal fluid-spinal cord and peripheral blood in MS patients.
8	quantitative studies of lymphocytes and other cell populations in the bone marrow of neonatally thymectomized c3h mice	Quantitative Studies of Lymphocytes and Dapos; Other Cellular Populations in Bone Marrow of Neonatal Thymectomized Mice.
8	in vitro effect of methylprednisolone on protein synthesis of activated canine thymus derived lymphocytes	Effect of methylprednisolone on canine thymus-derived protein synthesis in vitro.
8	the assessment of histocompatibility by mixed lymphocyte reaction as measured by the macrophage electrophoretic mobility mem test	It is important to note that the results of this study are not consistent with those of other studies.
8	anti hl a7 lymphocyte dependent antibody	Lymphocyte-dependent antibody-hl a7.
8	direct cell mediated lympholysis by peripheral blood lymphocytes from renal allograft recipients	Direct cell-mediated lymphocyte cell-mediated lympholysis of peripheral kidney transplant recipients.
8	ultrastructural comparison of the cell coat in normal and chronic lymphocytic leukaemic blood lymphocytes by concanavalin a labelling and cationic staining	Ultrastructural apo comparison; normal and chronic leukemic lymphocyte cell cell cell cell cell cell cell envelope by concanavalin, labelling and cationic staining.
8	morphological studies on allergen induced blast transformation of sensitized lymphocytes	Morphological studies of allergens induced sensitized lymphocytes to undergo blastic transformation.
8	correlation between incorporation of myo 2 3h inositol into the phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes and disability degree stage and duration of multiple sclerosis	Apos correlation; myo 2 h inositol incorporation into lymphocyte phosphatidylinositol and degree of apos stage; multiple sclerosis disability and duration.
8	the fine structure of the lymphocyte nucleus under conditions of phytohaemagglutinin stimulation	Lymphocyte nucleus fine structure under phytohemagglutinin-stimulated conditions.
8	in vitro dna synthesis in lymphocytes from turkeys vaccinated with lasota tc and inactivated newcastle disease vaccines	In vitro synthesis of DNA from turkey lymphocytes using inactivated Newcastle disease (NAD) vaccines and lasota tc.
8	increased lymphocyte atp ase activity in patients with carcinomas of the oral cavity and larynx	Cervical cancer is a major risk factor for the development of cancer, and is a major cause of death.
8	anitroxide sterol derivative potently modifies cholesterol biosynthesis by normal and neoplastic guinea pig lymphocytes	The sterol derivative of l&apos, anitroxide, strongly modifies the cholesterol biosynthesis of guinea pig lymphocytes, both normal and neoplastic.
8	influence of serum blocking factors on cancer patients undergoing immunotherapy	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the outcome of the disease.
8	damaged dna in lymphocytes of aplastic anemia	In addition, there was a significant increase in the number of cases.
8	decrease and altered distribution of human t antigen on chronic lymphatic leukemia cells of t type suggesting a clonal origin	Decreased and altered human antigen distribution on T-type chronic lymphatic leukemia cells, suggesting clonal origin.
8	cellular composition of the nipple aspirate specimen of breast fluid i the benign cells	The most common type of silicone gel-filled breast implant is silicone gel-filled breast implants.
8	dna synthesis of lymphocytes in hyperthyroid and euthyroid subjects effect of 131i therapy on hyperthyroidism	Lymphocyte DNA Synthesis in Hyperthyroid and Euthyroid Hyperthyroid Subjects Dosage 131i; hyperthyroidism.
8	electronmicroscopic and immunohistochemical studies on human lymphocytes	Human lymphocyte immunohistochemistry and electron microscopy studies.
8	influence of prednisone and cytostatics on human blood b t and o lymphocytes in diseases	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are needed to determine the effects of prednisone and cytostatics on human lymphocytes in disease.
8	antibody dependent and direct lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in patients on hemodialysis	Lymphocyte-mediated, antibody-dependent cytotoxicity in hemodialysis patients.
8	the influence of polymorphonuclear leukocytes and macrophages on the growth of lymphocytes and fibroblasts in vitro	L' influence polymorphonuclear leukocytes and macrophages on lymphocyte and fibroblast growth in vitro.
8	intracellular immunoglobulin production in vitro by lymphocytes from patients with hypogammaglobulinaemia and their effect on normal lymphocytes	The production of intracellular immunoglobulins in vitro by lymphocytes of patients with hypogamaglobulinemia and their effects on normal lymphocytes.
8	investigations of the t and b cells and the hemopexin carrying lymphocytes in cases of porphyria cutanea tarda author s transl	Examination of t-cells, b-cells, and hemopexin-carrying lymphocytes for cutane porphyria was delayed.
8	immunologic heterogeneity of the lymphocyte surface in various diseases	Immunological surface heterogeneity of lymphocytes in disease.
8	co operation between macrophages and a factor from lymphocytes in tumor lysis in vitro	Macrophage cooperation with a lymphocyte factor in in vitro tumor lysis.
8	mixed lymphocyte reactivity of human lymphocytes primed in vitro i secondary response to allogenic lymphocytes	Human lymphocyte mixed reactivity initiated in vitro he secondary response to allogenic lymphocytes.
8	analysis of human thymocyte subpopulations using discontinuous gradients of albumin precursor lymphocytes in human thymus	Analysis of sub-populations of human thymocytes at baseline; aid in discontinuous gradients of lymphocytes precursor to the apos; albumin in human thymus.
8	separation of complement dependent and lymphocyte dependent cytotoxic activity in human sera	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility that the drug may be used in combination with other drugs.
8	participation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes in the production of macrophage migration inhibitory factor	Participation of lymphocytes carrying immunoglobulins in the production of the factor inhibiting the migration of macrophages.
8	determination of the nucleolar coefficient in lymphocytes in chemotherapeutically treated patients with ovarian carcinoma	Nucleolar factor determination in lymphocytes from chemotherapeutic-treated ovarian carcinoma patients.
8	effect of cyclic nucleotides on the transformation and proliferation of lymphocytes	Cyclic nucleotide effects on lymphocyte transformation and proliferation.
8	reactivity of lymphocytes from patients with syphilis towards t pallidum antigen in the leucocyte migration and lymphocyte transformation tests	Syphilis patients' lymphocyte reactivity towards the antigen pallidum in leukocyte migration and lymphocyte transformation tests.
8	inhibition of haemopoietic stem cells by syngeneic lymphocytes treated with antilymphocyte serum	L' hematopoietic stem cell inhibition by syngenic lymphocytes treated with anti-lymphocyte serum.
8	experimental murine leprosy 8 ultrastructural features of the inflammatory exudate and bacterial morphology in c3h and c57bl mice after foot pad inoculation with mycobacterium lepraemurium	Experimental murine 8 ultrastructural characteristics of c3h and c57bl mice; inflammatory exudate and bacterial morphology after inoculation of lepraemurium mycobacteria into plantar pads.
8	the response of lymphocytes to phytohaemagglutinin in women with pre eclampsia	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	plasma inhibitors of lymphocyte response to phytohaemagglutinin in children with recurrent infections	Injury is a result of a combination of a number of factors, including physical, chemical, chemical, biological, biological, and social factors.
8	t and cr lymphocyte profile in leprosy and the effect of treatment	In addition, there is an increased risk of hepatitis C infection.
8	the rate of sister chromatid exchanges parallel to spontaneous chromosome breakage in fanconi s anemia and to trenimon induced aberrations in human lymphocytes and fibroblasts	The sister chromatid exchange rate parallels spontaneous chromosome breakage in the apos; fanconi anemia and trenimon-induced aberrations in human lymphocytes and fibroblasts.
8	effect of cortisol on the ultrastructure of normal leukemic and cultured human lymphocytes	The effect of cortisol on the ultrastructure of normal human lymphocytes, both in culture and in leukemia.
8	lymphocyte stimualtion by a mammary carcinoma assoicated glycoprotein	Lymphocyte stimulation by glycoprotein-specific breast carcinoma.
8	effect of blood serum from schizophrenic patients and from normal donors on dna synthesis in lymphocytes	Effect of serum from normal and schizophrenic donors on DNA synthesis in lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic action of immune lymphocytes on adherent cells macrophages of autologous system lymph nodes during delayed hypersensitivity	The cytotoxic action of immune cells on the macrophages of adherent cells of autologous lymph nodes during apo; delayed hypersensitivity.
8	mesenchymal reaction and serum glycoprotein concentration in chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis	Serum glycoprotein concentration and mesenchymal reactivity in liver; chronic hepatitis and cirrhosis.
8	tumour associated lymphocyte cytotoxicity superimposed on spontaneous cytotoxicity in melanoma patients	Tumour-associated cytotoxicity of lymphocytes superposes spontaneous melanoma cytotoxicity.
8	sequential in vitro reactivity of lymphocytes from melanoma patients receiving immunotherapy compared with the reactivity of lymphocytes from healthy donors	In vitro sequential responsiveness of immunotherapy-treated melanoma patients' lymphocytes is comparable to the responsiveness of healthy donors' lymphocytes.
8	in vitro monitoring of cadaver kidney donor pretreatment by lymphocyte culture	In vitro monitoring of pre-treatment of cadaveric kidney donors by lymphocyte culture.
8	spontaneous rosette formation by lymphocytes differential effect of cytochalasin b on thymocytes and thymus related peripheral blood lymphocytes in the guinea pig	Spontaneous formation of apos; a rosette by lymphocytes has a differential effect of cytochalasin b on the thymocytes and peripheral blood lymphocytes related to the thymus in the guinea pig.
8	appearance of epstein barr virus nuclear antigen in human cordblood lymphocytes	In addition, it is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is possible to determine the cause.
8	mixed lymphocyte culture stimulatory and responding capacity of lymphocytes from patients with lymphoproliferative diseases	Lymphocytes from lymphoproliferative patients have the ability to stimulate and respond to a mixed lymphocyte culture.
8	immunological studies in patients with chronic active hepatitis cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes to autochthonous liver cells grown in tissue culture	Immunological studies in patients with active chronic hepatic cytotoxic lymphocyte activity on indigenous hepatic cells cultured in tissue culture.
8	the immunological capacity of peripheral lymphocytes in a blast transformation system using frozen stored cells	Peripheral lymphocyte immunological capacity in an explosion transformation system using stored frozen cells.
8	binding of c reactive protein to antigen induced but not mitogen induced t lymphoblasts	Reactive protein c binding to n&apos antigen-induced t-lymphoblasts is not mitogenic.
8	secondary cytotoxic allograft responses in vitro ii differentiation of memory t cells into cytotoxic t lymphocytes in the absence of cell proliferation	Secondary reactions; cytotoxic allografts in vitro ii differentiation of memory t-cells into cytotoxic t-cells in vitro; lack of proliferation.
8	diamond blackfan syndrome lymphocyte mediated suppression of erythropoiesis	Diamond Blackfan Lymphocyte Syndrome Mediating Erythropoiesis.
8	ultrastructural and immunofluorescent studies of the replication of herpesvirus saimiri in cultured lymphocytes of infected owl monkeys	Ultrastructural and immunofluorescent studies of saimiri herpesvirus replication in cultured infected owl monkey lymphocytes.
8	cell mediated lympholysis in vitro independence of mixed lymphocyte reactions and t cell mitogen responses from the in vitro generation of cytotoxic effectors in primary immunodeficiency diseases	Mixed lymphocyte reactions and responses of t-cell mitogens to in vitro generation of d' cytotoxic agents in primary immunodeficiency diseases.
8	immunological responsiveness of frozen thawed human lymphocytes	Immunologic Reactivity of Frozen and Thawed Human Lymphocytes.
8	quantitation of immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes and the lymphocyte response to pha in experimental pyelonephritis	The quantification of immunoglobulin-carrying lymphocytes and lymphocyte pha response in experimental pyelonephritis.
8	effect of vincristine on sister chromatid exchanges of normal human lymphocytes	Effect of vincristine treatment on sister chromatid exchange in normal human lymphocytes.
8	elaboration of pyrimidine specific nucleosidases by human lymphoblastoid cells of established cultures	Pyrimidine-specific nucleosidase development by established culture human lymphoblastoid cells.
8	immunologic mechanisms in hepatitis b assayed by antigen binding lymphocytes	Immunologic mechanisms of the immune system; hepatitis b tested by the lymphocyte-binding antigen.
8	studies on the lymphocytes of sheep i recirculation of lymphocytes through peripheral lymph nodes and tissues	Sheep lymphocyte studies in lymph nodes and peripheral lymphatic tissues.
8	studies on the lymphocytes of sheep ii some properties of cells in various compartments of the recirculating lymphocyte pool	Sheep lymphocyte studies ii certain cellular properties in different lymphocyte recirculation pool compartments.
8	lymphocyte stimulation by soluble subcellular fractions	Stimulation of lymphocytes by subcellular soluble fractions.
8	marrow grafts between canine litter mates homozygous or heterozygous for lymphocyte defined histocompatibility antigens	Canine litter marrow transplants are homozygous or heterozygous for antigenic apo; histocompatibility is defined by lymphocytes.
8	suppressor cell activity after concanavalin a treatment of lymphocytes from normal donors	Suppressive cell activity following concanavalin treatment of normal donor lymphocytes.
8	binding of components of the properdin system to cultured human lymphoblastoid cells and b lymphocytes	The binding of the propellin system components to cultured human lymphoblastoid cells and to b lymphocytes.
8	membrane permeability in normal human lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphatic leukaemia	Membrane permeability in normal human lymphocytes and chronic lymphatic leukemia lymphocytes.
8	antibody dependent direct cytotoxicity of human lymphocytes ii studies on peripheral blood lymphocytes synovial fluid cells and sera from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Direct Antibody-Dependent Cytotoxicity of Human Lymphocytes ii Studies of synovial fluid cells from peripheral blood lymphocytes and sera from rheumatoid arthritis patients.
8	surface immunoglobulins of lymphocytes in plasmacytoma v the effect of rna rich extract from mouse plasmacytoma mopc 104e on the immune response	Lymphocyte surface immunoglobulins in the plasmacytome; effect of apos; rich extract of mopc 104 plasmacytome of mouse on immune response.
8	inhibition of macrophage lymphocyte interaction by cytochalasin b during antigen recognition by t lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that macrophages and lymphocytes interact with each other during the recognition of apos.
8	lymphoid cell subpopulations ii characterization of cell populations responsible for syngery in the mixed lymphocyte interaction	Sub--lymphoid cell populations ii Mixed lymphocyte interaction, characterization of syntax-causing cell populations.
8	t lymphocyte enriched murine peritoneal exudate cells i a reliable assay for antigen induced t lymphocyte proliferation	Cell-enriched murine lymphocytes; peritoneal peritoneal exudate a reliable measure of cell proliferation induced by antigen.
8	effect of anti ia sera on mixed lymphocyte reaction in mice	Effect of anti-ia antisera on the reaction of mixed lymphocytes in mice.
8	adoptive transfer of tumor immunity between twins by in vitro immunized nodal macrophages and lymphocytes reversal of serum enhancement	In vitro immunized node macrophages and lymphocyte reverse transplants are the most effective means of preventing the spread of the disease.
8	terminal transferase in human bone marrow lymphocytes	Terminal Transferase in Human Bone Marrow Lymphocytes.
8	lack of synergistic effect between x ray and uv irradiation on the frequency of chromosome aberrations in pha stimulated human lymphocytes in the g1 stage	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that the effects of UV irradiation on the frequency of chromosomal aberrations in pha cells are likely to be significant.
8	ferritin synthesis in lymphocytes polymorphs and monocytes	Polymorphic lymphocyte and monocyte ferritin synthesis.
8	the blocking effect of conditioned media from tumour cell cultures on the lysis of target cells by immune lymphocytes and macrophages	L' blocking effect of media conditioned from tumor cell cultures on target cell lysis by immune cells and macrophages.
8	long term effects of radiation of t and b lymphocytes in peripheral blood of patients with hodgkin s disease	Long-term Effects of Radiation from T and B Lymphocytes in the Peripheral Blood of Patients with Hodgkin's Disease.
8	the lysosomal enzymes of lymphocytes in the premature and the term infant	Lysosomal lymphocyte enzymes in preterm and term infants.
8	activation of purified human t cells by mitogens diminished mitogen induced deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in human t cells compared with autologous peripheral blood lymphocytes	L' activation of mitogen-purified human t-cells decreased mitogen-induced deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in human t-cells compared with peripheral autologous lymphocytes.
8	reactive and nonreactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis i possible role of macrophage lymphocyte interactions	Reactive and non-reactive lymphocytes in lymphocytes; experimental allergic encephalomyelitis he possible role of macrophage-lymphocyte interactions.
8	acridine orange fluorescence cytochemistry for detecting lymphocyte immunoreactivity	Orange Acridine, Fluorescence Cytochemistry to Detect Lymphos; Lymphocyte Immunoreactivity.
8	some properties of the mitogenic factor induced in human lymphocytes under the influence of phytohemagglutinin	Certain properties of mitogenic factor (MfF) are induced in human lymphocytes under the influence of phytohemagglutinin.
8	effect of crude and purified hcg on lymphocyte blastogenesis	Effect of purified crude hcg on lymphocyte blastogenesis.
8	epstein barr nuclear antigen ebna carrying lymphocytes in human palatine tonsils	The nuclear antigen, epstein barr ebna, carries lymphocytes in the tonsils of the human palatine.
8	variables and specificity of in vitro lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in human melanoma	The Variables and Specificity of In Vitro Lymphocyte-mediated Cytotoxicity in Human Melanoma.
8	separation of populations of sensitized lymphoid cells into fractions inhibiting and fractions enhancing syngeneic tumor growth in vivo	Separation of sensitized lymphoid cell populations into inhibitory and growth-promoting syngenic tumor fractions in vivo.
8	isolation and partial characterization of agf 1 a rat lymphocyte membrane antigen	Partial isolation and characterization of agf 1, a membrane lymphocyte antigen rat.
8	an improved quantitative plaque assay for lymphocytes bearing antigen specific cell receptors	Improved plate-based quantitative assay for cell-specific antigen receptor-positive lymphocytes.
8	sequential studies of lymphocytes neutrophils and serum proteins during prednisone treatment	Sequential neutrophil and serum protein studies of prednisone-treated lymphocytes.
8	identification of camp dependant protein kinases in human lymphocytes	Identification of human lymphocyte camp-dependent protein kinases.
8	leucocyte migration inhibitory activity of concanavalin a stimulated human lymphocytes modification by dipyridamole lysine acetylsalicylate and heparin	The inhibition of leukocyte migration by concanavalin stimulated the modification of human lymphocytes by dipyridamole acetylsalicylate and heparin.
8	the use of nylon fibre as a method of separating human lymphocyte subpopulations	Using nylon fiber as substrate separation method-human lymphocyte populations.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in normals and patients with rheumatoid arthritis and ankylosing spondylitis	Under-lymphocyte populations in normal subjects and patients with ankylosing spondylosing arthritis and rheumatoid arthritis.
8	long term maintenance in vitro of human t cells by repeated exposure to the same stimulator cells differences when using repeated stimulation in allogeneic mixed leukocyte culture and when using stimulation with autologous lymphoblastoid cells	Long-term in vitro maintenance of human t-cells by repeated exposure to the same stimulatory cells, when used in a mixed allogeneic culture of leukocytes and when used in conjunction with autologous lymphoblastoid cells.
8	massive invasion of fetal lymphocytes into the mother s blood at induced abortion	Massive fetal lymphocyte invasion into the mother's blood during pregnancy; induced abortion.
8	secondary responses of human lymphocytes to alloantigens in vitro	Secondary Reactions of Human Lymphocytes to Alloantigen in Vitro.
8	inhibition by anti beta2 microglobulin antisera of responder cells and not of stimulator cells in the mixed lymphocyte reaction	L' inhibition by microglobulin anti-beta2 antisera of reactive and non-stimulatory cells in the mixed-cell lymphocyte response.
8	cytotoxic antibody complicating platelet support in acute leukemia response to chemotherapy	Cytotoxic antibody that complicates the platelet support system in the acute leukemic response to chemotherapy.
8	c1 and human platelets decrease in chronic lymphocyte leukemia effect of lymphocytes	In humans, lymphocyte lymphocytes have been found to be more effective in preventing lymphocyte leukemia.
8	failure of nitrous oxide to inhibit transformation of lymphocytes by phytohemagglutinin	It can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent to inhibit the transformation of lymphocytes by phytohemagglutinin.
8	expression and segregation of hl a antigens in d98 ah 2 by lymphocyte and fibroblast hybrids	Lymphocytes and hybrid fibroblasts express and segregate hl a antigen in d98 ah 2.
8	lymphocyte abnormalities in mycosis fungoides	Mycosis fungal lymphocyte abnormalities.
8	occurrence of lymphocytotoxic lymphocytes and antibodies after corneal transplantation	Lymphocytosis is a major risk factor for the development of diabetes.
8	differences in free fatty acid and glucose metabolism of human blood neutrophils and lymphocytes	Differences in the metabolism of free fatty acids and human blood glucose in neutrophils and lymphocytes.
8	in vitro proliferative reactions by lymphocytes from both responder and low responder mice to t g a l	Responder and low-response mice lymphocyte proliferative responses in vitro.
8	studies of intestinal lymphoid tissue i electron microscopic evidence of blast transformation in epithelial lymphocytes of mouse small intestinal mucosa	Intestinal lymphoid tissue studies by electron microscopy of mouse mucosal epithelial lymphocyte transformation; small intestine.
8	relation of antigen binding cells to immunological memory	Relationship between antigen-binding cells and immunologic memory.
8	observations in vitro regarding the mechanism of the cell destruction by stimulated lymphocytes	In vitro observations on the mechanism of stimulated lymphocyte cell destruction.
8	lymphocyte surface attached immunoglobulins in some clinical conditions	The immunoglobulins were bound by the surface of the lymphocytes under certain clinical conditions.
8	the influence of sequential chemotherapy and radiotherapy on mitogen induced lymphocyte transformation in patients with acute lymphoblastic leukemia	L' influence of chemotherapy and sequential radiotherapy on mitogen-induced lymphocyte transformation in acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
8	the effect of changes in dose rate on the yield of chromosome aberrations in human lymphocytes exposed to gamma radiation	L' effect of dose rate changes on chromosome aberration yield in gamma-exposed human lymphocytes.
8	unusual intranuclear filaments in the circulating lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis and optic neuritis	Unusual intranuclear filaments in circulating lymphocytes of MS patients and optic neuritis.
8	accelerated expulsion of adult trichinella spiralis in mice given lymphoid cells and serum from infected donors	Accelerated expulsion of adult trichinella spiralis from lymphoid cell and serum mice from infected donors.
8	origin of lymphoid lines established from mixed cultures of cord blood lymphocytes and explants from infectious mononucleosis burkitt lymphoma and healthy donors	Origin of lymphoid lines from mixed umbilical cord blood lymphocyte and dapos cultures; infectious burkitt lymphoma mononucleosis explants and healthy donors.
8	antigenic structure of phytohemagglutinin stimulated mouse lymphocytes using specific antisera	The antigenic structure of phytohemagglutinin stimulates mouse lymphocytes by using specific antisera.
8	t and b cells and cell mediated immunity in mycosis fungoides	Cells and cell-mediated immunity in mycosis fungi.
8	nucleoli of lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of patients with bronchogenic lung and gastrointestinal cancer	Lymphocyte peripheral blood nucleoli from patients with bronchogenic lung or gastro-intestinal cancer.
8	kinetics of intraepithelial lymphocytes in the small intestine of thymus deprived mice and antigen deprived mice	Intraepithelial lymphocyte kinetics in the small intestine of thymus-deprived and antigen-deprived mice.
8	evidence for suppressor cell activity associated with induction of herpesvirus saimiri induced lymphoma	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
8	the effect of intrauterinely injected lymphocytes prepared from sensitized or non sensitized guinea pigs on the ultrastructure of rat fetal membranes visceral yolk sac	Effect of apos; intra-uterine injection of prepared lymphocytes from sensitized or unsensitized guinea pigs; ultrastructure of visceral yolk membranes of rat fetuses.
8	demonstration of nucleotide pyrophosphatase and phosphohydrolase activities in normal lymphocyte of balb c mice and absence of these activities in yc8 tumor cells and in lymphocytes of animals with yc8 lymphoma	Demonstration of nucleotide pyrophosphatase and phosphohydrolase activities in normal lymphocytes of Berber mice and their absence in lymphocytes of infected animals; lymphoma yc8.
8	in vitro response of bovine thoracic duct lymphocyte to phytohaemagglutinin following adult thymectomy	In vitro reactivity of the bovine thoracic canal lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin following an adult thymectomy.
8	cytotoxic activity of human lymphocyte plasma membranes	L' cytotoxic activity of the plasma membranes of human lymphocytes.
8	double stranded ribonuclease activity in human lymphocyte nuclei	In human lymphocyte nuclei, double-stranded ribonuclease activity.
8	in vitro lymphocyte stimulation by wart antigen in man	In vitro apos lymphocyte stimulation; human warts antigen.
8	in vitro transforming activity of ebv i establishment and properties of two ebv strains m81 and m72 produced by immortalized callithrix jacchus lymphocytes	In vitro transformative activity of l' establishment of ebv i and properties of two m81 and m72 ebv produced by immortalized jacchus callithrix lymphocytes.
8	cytotoxic lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis	Infectious mononucleosis cytotoxic lymphocytes.
8	inhibitory activity of medium dialyzed transfer factor on lymphocyte blastogenesis	Dialyzed medium transfer factor inhibitory activity on lymphocyte blastogenesis.
8	a comparison of in vitro cell mediated reactivity against syngeneic tumor cells by various lymphoid cell populations from bacillus calmette gu rin tumor cured tumor sensitized tumor bearing and normal inbred guinea pigs	Comparison of the in vitro cell-mediated responsiveness to syngenetic tumor cells by various populations of lymphoid cells of the gu rin bacillus calmette, a tumour-susceptible tumour, and of normal inbred guinea pigs.
8	genetic control of interindividual variations in the inducibility of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in cultured human lymphocytes	Genetic control of interindividual changes in apo; apo inducibility; hydroxylase of aryl hydrocarbons in cultured human lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte subpopulation in neoplastic and non neoplastic thymus and in blood of patients with myasthenia gravis	Under-lymphocyte population in the neoplastic and non-neoplastic thymus and blood of severe myasthenia.
8	concanavalin a activated suppressor cells in normal human peripheral blood lymphocytes	Concanavalin is an activated suppressant of normal, peripheral human blood lymphocytes.
8	the repair of x ray induced chromosomal damage in trisomy 2 and normal diploid lymphocytes	X-ray repair resulted in chromosomal damage to normal trisomic 2 and diploid lymphocytes.
8	control of pyrimidine biosynthesis in human lymphocytes inhibitory effect of guanine and guanosine on induction of enzymes for pyrimidine biosynthesis de novo in phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes	Control of pyrimidine biosynthesis in human lymphocytes, guanine and guanosine inhibitory effect on apos; induction of apos; enzymes for de novo pyrimidine biosynthesis in phytohemagglutinin stimulated lymphocytes.
8	permanent lymphoid lines from genetically marked lymphocytes success with lymphocytes recovered from frozen storage	Permanent lymphoid lines of lymphocytes successfully labelled with recovered frozen storage lymphocytes.
8	the influence of dissolved oxygen on the mitogen responses of mouse lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	a sensitive micromethod for generating and assaying allogeneically induced cytotoxic human lymphocytes	A sensitive micro-method for the generation and testing of allogeneically induced cytotoxic human lymphocytes.
8	humoral sensitization in parous women cytotoxic antibodies to non hl a antigens	Cytotoxic antibodies are used to sensitize pregnant women to non-hl a non-hl antigens.
8	suppressor function of peripheral blood mononuclear cells in normal individuals and in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus	Peripheral blood mononuclear cell suppressive functions in normal individuals and patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
8	the migration of lymphocytes across specialized vascular endothelium i the entry of lymphocytes into the isolated mesenteric lymph node of the rat	Lymphocyte migration in lymphocytes; specialized vascular endothelium; lymphocyte entry into isolated rat mesenteric lymph node.
8	cell mediated cytotoxicity against measles virus in sspe ii analysis of cytotoxic effector cells	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk factors.
8	natural cytotoxic reactivity of human lymphocytes against a myeloid cell line characterization of effector cells	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk factors.
8	bidirectional amplification of macrophage lymphocyte interactions enhanced lymphocyte activation factor production by activated adherent mouse peritoneal cells	In mice, lymphocyte activity was increased by two-way amplification of macrophage–lymphocyte interactions, and by activation of lymphocytes by adherent peritoneal cells.
8	rosette plaques with lymphoid cells from heterozygous rabbits ani hapten antibody forming cells displaying either one or both b locus surface allelic markers	Rosette plates containing heterozygous rabbit lymphoid cells and anti-apos; hapten antibodies formed cells showing one or both allelic surface markers of the locus b.
8	effect of lectins on the levels of camp and cgmp in guinea pig lymphocytes early responses of lymph node cells to mitogenic and non mitogenic lectins	Effect of lectins on camp and cgmp levels in guinea pig lymphocytes, early lymph node cell responses to mitogenic and non-mitogenic lectins.
8	specific positive and negative selection of rat lymphocytes reactive to strong histocompatibility antigens activation with alloantigens in vitro and in vivo	Positive and negative specific selection of lymphocytes from rats reacting to high activation of the antigens d' histocompatibility by alloantigen in vitro and in vivo.
8	cell mediated immune response in vitro i the development of suppressor cells and cytotoxic lymphocytes in mixed lymphocyte cultures	Cell-mediated immune response in vitro, i.e. suppressive cell and cytotoxic lymphocyte development in mixed-cell cultures.
8	factor b of the alternative complement pathway on human lymphocytes	Factor b of human lymphocyte complement alternative pathway.
8	t cell deficiency in patients with autoimmune hemolytic anemia warm type	T cell carcinoma in apos patients; hemolytic-hot hemolytic immune auto hemolytic anemia.
8	presence of alpha 2 macroglobulin on the membrane of peripheral human blood lymphocytes a new lymphocyte maker	The presence of macroglobulin alpha 2 on peripheral human blood lymphocyte membranes is a new factor in lymphocytes.
8	peripheral lymphocytes in paraproteinemia	Paraproteinemic peripheral lymphocytes.
8	5 nucleotidase activity in leukaemic lymphocytes	Nucleotidase activity is 5 in leukemic lymphocytes.
8	the effects of therapeutic irradiation on lymphocytes and immunity	Cervical cancer is a major cause of death in Canada.
8	collagenase production by rheumatoid synovial cells stimulation by a human lymphocyte factor	Collagenase production by human lymphocyte-mediated stimulation of synovial rheumatoid cells.
8	free ribosomes in physiologically nondividing cells human peripheral lymphocytes	In addition, there is an increased risk of infection.
8	cytochemical characteristics of nucleic acids in the peripheral blood lymphocytes of patients with multiple sclerosis	Cytochemical Characteristics of Nucleic Acids in Peripheral Blood Lymphocytes of Multiple Sclerosis Patients.
8	quantitative ultrastructural autoradiographic studies of iodinated plasma membranes of lymphocytes during segregation and internalization of surface immunoglobulins	Quantitative ultrastructural autoradiographic studies of Iodinated lymphocyte plasma membranes during cell segregation and l' internalization of surface immunoglobulins.
8	cytotoxic activity of rheumatoid and normal lymphocytes against allogeneic and autologous synovial cells in vitro	Cytotoxic activity of normal and rheumatoid lymphocytes against synovial autologous and allogeneic lymphocytes in vitro.
8	b t and null lymphocytes in newborn infants and their mothers	B-cells and lymphocytes null in newborn-and their mothers.
8	interaction of c reactive protein with lymphocytes and monocytes complement dependent adherence and phagocytosis	In addition, the protein is reactive with lymphocytes and monocytes, and the protein is reactive with lymphocytes and monocytes.
8	tolerance and contact sensitivity to dnfb in mice vi inhibition of afferent sensitivity by suppressor t cells in adoptive tolerance	Tolerance and sensitivity to dnfb-contact in the vi mouse, inhibition of the afferent sensitivity by t-suppressive cells in the adopted tolerance.
8	t lymphocyte precursors i synergy between precursor and mature t lymphocytes in the response to concanavalin a	Precursors of concanavalin a induced synergism between t-cells and t-cells.
8	lymphocyte nucleoli activation as a marker of autoimmune disorder development i observation in nzb mice	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support it.
8	natural cytotoxic reactivity of rat lymphocytes against syngeneic gross virus induced lymphoma	Rat lymphocyte natural cytotoxic reactivity against macroscopic syngenic virus induced lymphoma.
8	lymphocyte plasma membranes vi surface antigens of lymphocytes in chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Plasma membranes from lymphocyte surface antigenic viocyte cells in chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	spontaneous interaction in vitro between lymphocytes and syngeneic peritoneal macrophages of mice	Spontaneous in vitro interaction between mouse lymphocytes and syngenetic peritoneal macrophages.
8	different effects of phytohemagglutinin activated lymphocytes and their culture supernatants on macrophage function	Different effects of phytohemagglutinin-activated lymphocytes and their culture-grown supernatants on macrophage function were also observed.
8	mg2 and ca2 stimulated atpase at the outer surface of human peripheral lymphocytes and hematopoietic cell lines correlation between enzyme activity and immunoglobulin secretion	Gm2 and ca2 stimulated human peripheral lymphocyte external surface atpase and hematopoietic cell lines correlated with apos; enzymatic activity and immunoglobulin secretion.
8	hemihypotrophy in a girl with a translocation t 13q 7p	Hemihypotrophy in a t 13q 7p translocation.
8	lymphocyte cytotoxicity in alcoholic hepatitis	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	normal lymphocyte function in the presence of delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol	Normal lymphocyte function in delta 9 tetrahydrocannabinol.
8	immunofluorescent staining of the surfaces of lymphocytes in suspension from patients with dengue hemorrhagic fever	Immunofluorescent staining of suspended lymphocyte surfaces in hemorrhagic dengue patients.
8	fate of antibodies bound to lymphocyte surface i study with complement dependent cytotoxicity indirect immunofluorescence and radiolabelled antibodies	The fate of antibody bound to the i-surface of lymphocytes was studied with complement-dependent cytotoxicity, l' indirect immunofluorescence, and radiolabeled antibodies.
8	effect of supernatant from pha stimulated lymphocyte culture on blastic transformation of peripheral blood lymphocytes in healthy controls and patients with chronic lymphatic leukemia	The effect of pha supernatant stimulated lymphocyte culture on peripheral blood lymphocyte blast transformation in healthy controls and chronic lymphatic leukemia patients.
8	characterization of lymphocyte inhibition by supernatants of crowded lymphocytoblasts	Characterization of the apos; inhibition of lymphocytes by over-crowded lymphocytoblast supernatants.
8	interaction of k lymphocytes with myeloma proteins of different igg subclasses	K-cell interaction with various myeloma proteins under-d&apos classes; igg.
8	role of t lymphocytes in the humoral immune response iii lack of influence of antigen charge on the isotype and charge of antibody	Role of T-cells in humoral immune response in the absence of antibody; influence of antigenic load on the apos; isotype and antibody load.
8	sequential examination of lymphocyte proliferative capacity in patients with malignant melanoma receiving bcg immunotherapy	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that lymphocyte proliferation may occur in patients with melanoma.
8	establishment in continuous culture of a new type of lymphocyte from a burkitt like malignant lymphoma line d g 75	The Canadian Lymphocyte Surveillance System (CLSS) is a multi-year, multi-year, multi-year, multi-year, multi-year initiative.
8	suppressor cells in homograft tolerant rats	Cells that are suppressive in sucker-tolerant rats; homograft.
8	in vitro induction of tumor specific immunity ii activation of cytotoxic lymphocytes to murine oncofetal antigens	In vitro, immunotherapy; tumour-specific immunity ii, immunotherapy; cytotoxic lymphocyte activation to mouse oncofetal antigens.
8	in vitro lymphocyte immunization to cultured human tumor cells parameters for generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes	In vitro immunization of lymphocytes against parameters of human cell cultures for cytotoxic lymphocyte production.
8	differentiation of lymphoid cells b cell as a direct target and t cell as a regulator in lipopolysaccharide enhanced induction of immunoglobulin production	The differentiation of b lymphoid cells as the direct target and t cells as the regulator in lipopolysaccharide increases the apos; induction of apos production; immunoglobulins.
8	inhibition of antigen and mitogen induced human lymphocyte proliferation by gold compounds	It was found that the antigen and the mitogen induced the proliferation of human lymphocytes by the compounds of l'apos; gold.
8	lymphocytes hla antigens expressivity after neuraminidase treatment author s transl	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that neuraminidase is an effective antigen expression.
8	role of suppressor cells in antibody induced inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions	Mixed lymphocyte reactions were inhibited by the role of suppressive cells in the antibodies.
8	altered lymphocyte reactivity in rheumatoid arthritis	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
8	5 nucleotidase in different populations of mouse lymphocytes	Five nucleotidases from different mouse lymphocyte populations.
8	lymphocyte response in patients with head and neck cancer effect of clinical stage and radiotherapy	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
8	lymphocyte locomotion i the initiation velocity pattern and path of locomotion in vitro	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of cells, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
8	lymphocyte locomotion ii the lymphocyte traffic over the post capillary venules analysed by phase contrast microscopy of thin sections of rat lymph nodes	Lymphocytic locomotion ii Lymphocytic movement at-above capillary venules post-capillary was analyzed by rat lymph node thin section phase contrast microscopy.
8	cell partition a simple test for lymphocyte sensitisation	Cell sharing A simple lymphocyte sensitization test.
8	primary in vitro antibody response from human peripheral blood lymphocytes	Primary In Vitro Immune Response of Human Peripheral Blood Lymphocytes.
8	studies on the glycolipids of sheep thymus and of normal and concanavalin a stimulated sheep peripheral lymphocytes	Sheep thymus and normal concanavalin and concanavalin glycolipid studies stimulated peripheral sheep lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of eb virus transformation of non adherent human lymphocytes by co cultivation with adult fibroblasts	L' Eb virus inhibition of non-adherent human lymphocyte transformation by co-culture with adult fibroblasts.
8	electron microscopic evidence for phagocytic properties of human peripheral mononuclear cells cultured with pha	Electron microscopic evidence of the phagocytic properties of peripheral human mononuclear cells grown with pha.
8	capability of lymphocytes stimulated in vitro with phytohemagglutinins to accomplish the graft versus host reaction	The ability of stimulated lymphocytes in vitro to perform the graft versus host response with phytohemagglutinins.
8	enzymatic and immunologic activity of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis	Enzymatic and immunological activity during chemical carcinogenesis.
8	b and t lymphocytes in man iii b t and null lymphocytes in multiple sclerosis	It is important to note that these studies are not based on the results of the study.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by cholinergic receptor in myasthenia gravis	Lymphocyte stimulation in severe myasthenia by cholinergic receptor.
8	complement dependent immunoglobulin g receptor function in lymphoid cells	The g-receptor function of lymphoid cells; complement-dependent immunoglobulin.
8	the blocking by autologous serum of maternal cell mediated immune reactions to placental antigen	Autologous serum blocking of mother cell-mediated immune responses to the placental antigen.
8	reaction of lymphocytes to phytohemagglutinin in vitro in hereditary microspherocytosis	Lymphocyte response to phytohemagglutinin in hereditary microspherocytosis.
8	advantages of cryoperserved lymphocytes for sequential evaluation of human immune competence i mitogen stimulation	The results of this study are shown to be consistent with those reported in the literature.
8	inhibition of lymphocyte blastogenesis by plasma of patients with minimal change nephrotic syndrome	L' inhibition of lymphocytic blastogenesis by plasma in patients with minimal lymphocytic nephrotic syndromes.
8	leukocyte inhibiting factor lif production from human lymphocytes stimulated by bacterial lipopolysaccharides	Leukocytes that inhibit the production of life factors from bacterial lipopolysaccharide-stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	detection of t cell lymphoma associated antigens on cord blood lymphocytes and phytohemagglutinin stimulated blasts	Detection of lymphoma-associated antigens on phytohemagglutinin and cord blood lymphocytes stimulated the explosions.
8	cell electrophoretic analysis of lymphocytes and polymorphonuclear cells from patients with rheumatoid arthritis	Cellular Electrophoretic Analysis of Lymphocytes and Polymorphonuclear Cells from Patients with Rheumatoid Arthritis.
8	cytokine inhibition of dna synthesis effect on cyclic adenosine monophosphate in lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
8	human lymphocytes as target cells in a metabolizing test system in vitro for detecting potential mutagens	Human lymphocytes as the target cells in an in vitro metabolism test system to detect potential mutagens.
8	globulin producing cells in cultures of blast transformed lymphocytes in vitro	Globulin-producing cells in explosion-transformed lymphocyte cultures in vitro.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by antigen in microplate cultures absence of an effect of transfer factor in vitro	The effect of antigen on lymphocyte stimulation in microplate cultures was not observed; however, the effect of antigen on the in vitro transfer factor was noted.
8	the stimulation of lymphocytes by chondrocytes in mixed cultures	Lymphocyte stimulation by chondrocytes in the mixed cultures.
8	properties of blast cells in control cultures of human blood lymphocytes preliminary note	The results of these studies should be compared to those of other studies.
8	membrane characteristics of established human t and b cell lines cross reactivity of human t antigenic determinants with peripheral lymphocytes of non human primates and the presence of mlc antigens on cultured t cell lines	The membrane characteristics of established human t- and b-cell lines cross-reacted the reactivity of human t-antigenic determinants with non-human primate peripheral lymphocytes and the presence of mlc-antigen in cultured t-cell lines.
8	assessment of the functional activity of human lymphocytes in malignant disease by the local graft versus host reaction in rats and the t rosette forming cell test	Evaluation of apo; human lymphocyte functional activity in malignant disease by local graft vs. host response in rats and rosette cell formation test.
8	the stimulation of lymphocytes by nucleus pulposus in patients with degenerative disk disease of the lumbar spine	Nuclear Pulposus Lymphocyte Stimulation in Apos patients; a degenerative lumbar spinal disc disease.
8	comparative study of the effect of haloperidol and maptil on the karyotype and immunoproliferative response of lymphocytes	Comparative apo study; effect of haloperidol and maptil on karyotype and lymphocyte immunoproliferative response.
8	rosette formation by human t and b lymphocytes in the presence of adrenergic and cholinergic drugs	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of drugs, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
8	modulating effects of levamisole nsc 177023 on human lymphocyte response in vitro	Modulatory effects of nsc 177023 levamisole on the response of human lymphocytes in vitro.
8	influence of radiotherapy on lymphocyte stimulation	The effect of radiation therapy on the stimulation of lymphocytes.
8	cell free media of mixed lymphocyte cultures augmenting sensitization in vitro of mouse t lymphocytes against allogeneic fibroblasts	Mixed lymphocyte culture cell-free media increasing in vitro sensitization of mouse t-cells to allogeneic fibroblasts.
8	effects of concanavalin a and a succinylated derivative on lymphocyte proliferation and cyclic nucleotide levels	The effects of the drug substance on lymphocyte proliferation and cyclic nucleotide levels.
8	t b and k cells in autoimmune thyroid disease	T-b and k-cells in auto-infectious thyroid diseases.
8	study of lymphocyte subpopulations in normal humans and patients with systemic lupus erythematosus by fractionation of peripheral blood lymphocytes on a discontinuous ficoll gradient	Study of sub-@-@ lymphocyte populations in normal humans and lupus erythematosus patients disseminated by peripheral blood lymphocyte fractionation along a discontinuous strand of ficolls.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in human malnutrition cytotoxic and suppressor cells	Under-populations of lymphocytes in suppressive and cytotoxic cells of human malnutrition.
8	specific sensitization of lymphocytes to tumor antigens by co cultivation with peritoneal cells exposed to such antigens	Specific sensitization of lymphocytes to tumour antigens by co-culture with exposed peritoneal cells.
8	cell mediated immune response to gonococcal antigen in uro arthritis reiter s disease a inhibition of migration of sensitised human lymphocytes b lymphocyte transformation in vitro measured by 14c thymidine uptake	The cell-mediated immune response to antigen-induced arthritis re-emphasizes a human lymphocyte migration inhibition sensitized to in vitro lymphocyte transformation measured by apo; thymidine absorption 14c.
8	t lymphocyte number and function and the course of hepatitis b in hemodialysis patients	Number and function of lymphocytes and liver; evolution of hepatitis in patients with hemodialysis.
8	mitogen induced membrane changes and cell proliferation in t lymphocyte subpopulations	Membrane changes and cell proliferation were induced by mitogen in sub@-@t lymphocyte populations.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes by allogeneic lymphocytes and lymphoblasts in the presence of anti hla antisera	Allogeneic lymphocytes and lymphoblasts stimulate lymphocytes in the presence of anti-hla antisera.
8	differential cytotoxicity of activated lymphocytes on allogeneic and xenogeneic target cells iii species specificity of lymphocyte target cell recognition in vitro	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that lymphocyte cell specificity is a function of the specificity of the cell substrate.
8	the systemic production of cytotoxic lymphoid cells in corneal allograft reaction 1 a quantitantitative study utilizing 51chromium release assay	Systemic cytotoxic lymphoid cell production in reaction 1 of corneal allograft, a quantitative study using a 51chromium release test.
8	separate ia like determinants in human lymphocytes and macrophages	Factors such as human lymphocyte and macrophage determinants are distinct.
8	thyroid antigen stimulates lymphocytes from patients with graves disease to produce thyroid stimulating immunoglobulin tsi	In addition, the lymphocyte is stimulated by the thyroid antigen, which stimulates the lymphocytes of patients with apos; a serious disease to produce apos; immunoglobulin stimulates the thyroid tsi.
8	effect of 2 mercaptoethanol on the in vitro response of sensitized bovine peripheral blood lymphocytes to anaplasma antigen	Mercaptoethanol 2 affects the in vitro response of Dapos antigen-sensitized bovine peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	atypical t cells in rheumatoid synovial membranes	Atypical t-cells in synovial rheumatoid membranes.
8	dissociation of blastogenic factor production and lymphocyte transformation of guinea pig lymphocytes stimulated with tuberculin ppd	Disassociation of tuberculin-pd-stimulated Guinea pig lymphocyte production and lymphocyte transformation.
8	in vitro activation of mouse macrophages by rat lymphocyte mediators	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States.
8	chromosome aberration yields induced in human lymphocytes by 15 mev electrons given at a conventional dose rate and in microsecond pulses	Chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes are induced by conventional dose-rate 15 mev electrons and microsecond pulses.
8	change in specific antigen binding by rabbit lymphocytes during immunization with human serum albumin	Change in binding of apo; rabbit lymphocyte specific antigen during apo; immunization with apo; human serum albumin.
8	a simple method for the cryopreservation of human lymphocytes at 80c	Simple human lymphocyte cryopreservation method at 80 c.
8	ultrastructural study of so called curvilinear bodies and fingerprint structures in lymphocytes in late infantile amaurotic idiocy	Curvilinear body and structure ultrastructural study; fingerprinting in apo lymphocytes; late childhood amaurotic idiocyte.
8	t lymphocyte shifts in patients with melanoma and bronchogenic carcinoma author s transl	In addition to the above, there is a need for a comprehensive assessment of the safety and efficacy of the drug.
8	responsiveness of lymphocytes to soluble extracts of prostatic tumors and abrogation by serum blocking factor s	Lymphocyte reactivity to prostatic tumor soluble extracts and abrogation by serum blocking factors.
8	hyperacute rejection of a kidney allograft may be caused by cytotoxic lymphocytes	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of the safety and efficacy of these products.
8	myasthenia gravis mitotic activity of thymus dependent and blood lymphocytes	Myasthenia gravis thymus- and blood lymphocyte-dependent mitotic activity.
8	fate of foreign dna taken up by tonsillar lymphocytes	The foreign DNA that is absorbed by the tonsil lymphocytes.
8	a simplified one step procedure for the simultaneous determination of complement receptor lymphocytes and lymphocytes with membrane bound immunoglobulins	A simplified one-step procedure for the simultaneous determination of lymphocytes from complement receptors and lymphocytes with membrane-bound immunoglobulins.
8	enzymatic activity of blood lymphocytes experimental tsutsugamushi fever in mice	Blood lymphocyte enzyme activity, experimental mouse tsutsugamushi fever.
8	chronic lymphocytic leukemia correlation of clinical course and therapeutic response with in vitro testing and morphology of lymphocytes	Acute lymphocyte leukemia is a symptom of the liver, which is a function of the body's ability to function.
8	bloom s syndrome iv sister chromatid exchanges in lymphocytes	Flowering syndrome exchange of sister chromatids in lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes from patients with coeliac disease by a subfraction of gluten	Lymphocyte stimulation in CD patients by a sub@-@ gluten fraction.
8	cytotoxic activity of lymphocytes to bronchogenic carcinoma cells in patients with lung cancer	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre.
8	regulation of low density lipoprotein receptor activity in freshly isolated human lymphocytes	The regulation of l' receptor activity of low-density lipoproteins in freshly isolated human lymphocytes.
8	does the pro inflammatory factor in lymphocytes lpif explain the role of these cells in acute inflammation	Lymphocyte proinflammatory factor explains-t-it's role in acute inflammation?
8	ectogalactosyltransferase studies in fibroblasts and concanavalin a stimulated lymphocytes	Ectogalactosyltransferase in stimulated lymphocyte concanavalin and fibroblast.
8	lymphocyte differentiation in the rabbit thymus	Rabbit thymus lymphocyte differentiation.
8	cell mediated destruction of human leukemic cells by mhc identical lymphocytes requirement for a proliferative trigger in vitro	In vitro proliferative elicitation requires cell-mediated destruction of human leukemia cells by identical mhc lymphocytes.
8	cell mediated immune response in vitro ii the mechanism s involved in the suppression of the development of cytotoxic lymphocytes	In vitro cell-mediated immune response ii mechanism involved in suppression of cytotoxic lymphocyte development.
8	a study of the variable heavy chain vh region of membrane bound ig on human chronic leukemic lymphocytes	A study of the vh variable heavy chain region of the membrane linked ig to human chronic leukemia lymphocytes.
8	expression of alloantigens ly 5 and ly 6 on cytotoxic effector cells	Expression of ly-5 and ly-6 alloantigens on effector cytotoxic cells.
8	sequential proliferation induced in human peripheral blood lymphocytes by mitogen ii suppression by pha activated cells	Sequential proliferation induced by mitogenii suppression by pha-activated cells in human peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	genetic studies in inbred rats viii the production of xenoantisera against ag b histocompatibility antigens	Genetic studies in inbred rats have been carried out to determine the production of xenoantiomers against apo-antigen; ag-compatibility.
8	antigen induced locomotor responses in lymphocytes	The antigenic response induced locomotor responses in lymphocytes.
8	activity and intracellular localization of lysosomal acid phosphatase in lymphocytes from patients with hodgkin s disease plasma cell myeloma and primary polycythemia	Lysosomal acid phosphatase activity and intracellular localization in lymphocytes of patients with apo; a plasma myeloma of Hodgkin's and dapos' disease; primary polycythemia.
8	production of the second component of complement by human monocytes stimulation by antigen activated lymphocytes or lymphokines	Production of the second complement component by stimulation of human monocytes by antigen- or lymphokine-activated lymphocytes.
8	t cell variant of chronic lymphocytic leukaemia with chromosome abnormality and defective response to mitogens	Chronic lymphocytic leukemia t-cell variant with chromosomal abnormalities and a deficient mitogen response.
8	the chromosomal radiosensitivity of lymphocytes from the chimpanzee pan troglodytes	Chimpanzee lymphocyte chromosomal radiosensitivity.
8	leukocyte inhibitory factor lif production from lymphocytes stimulated by leucogenenol	In addition, there is an increased risk of liver damage due to the presence of leukocytes.
8	effect of sera from patients with graves disease on the e rosette function of normal lymphocytes	Effect of serum on normal lymphocyte function in patients with diabetes mellitus.
8	lymphocyte sensitization in childhood solid tumours and lymphoblastic leukaemia measured by electrophoretic mobility test	Lymphocyte sensitization in solid childhood tumours and electrophoretic mobility test-measured lymphoblastic leukemia.
8	preparation of mononuclear cell subpopulations from normal human peripheral blood	Preparation of sub-mononuclear cell populations from peripheral normal human blood.
8	lymphocyte like cells of the tunicate pyura stolonifera binding of lectins morphological and functional studies	Stoloniferous pyura tunicate lymphocyte cells bind to lectins in morphological and functional studies.
8	cytophotometric characterization of cortical and medullary lymphocytes in the chicken bursa and thymus	Cytophotometric characterization of the cortical and medullary lymphocytes in the chicken bundle and the thymus gland.
8	epithelium and associated lymphocytes of developing human fetal appendix electron microscopic study	Epithelium and associated lymphocytes in the developing human fetal appendage.
8	in vitro studies on the mechanism of acquired resistance to tuberculous infection ii the effects of the culture supernatants of specifically stimulated sensitized lymphocytes on the growth of tubercle bacilli within macrophages	In vitro studies on the mechanism of acquired resistance to tuberculosis infection ii the effects of specifically stimulated sensitized lymphocyte culture supernatants on tuberculosis growth in macrophages.
8	cytotoxic antibodies to cultured melanoma cells in the sera of melanoma patients	Cytotoxic antibody for melanoma cell cultures in serum from melanoma patients.
8	concanavalin a and the production of bovine leukemia virus antigen in short term lymphocyte cultures	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
8	the effect of cyproheptadine on the chromosomes of human lymphocytes in vitro	Cyproheptadine affects human lymphocyte chromosomes in vitro.
8	virus receptors on lymphocytes	Lymphocyte viral receptors.
8	human lymphocyte subpopulations involved in mlc and cml	Under-mlc and cml human lymphocyte populations.
8	in vitro reactivity of human lymphocytes after cryopreservation using a programmed cooling device	Human lymphocyte reactivity in vitro after cryopreservation at apo; assistance from a programmed cooling device.
8	specific affinity fractionation of lymphocytes using glass or plastic bead columns	Lymphocyte-specific affinity to epithelium; specific affinity of lymphocytes to epithelium; use of glass or plastic beads.
8	in vitro effect of thymosin on t lymphocyte rosette formation in rheumatic diseases	Effect of Thymosine in Vitro on Formation of T-cell Rosettes in Rheumatic Diseases.
8	lack of restimulation by non hla antigens in primed lymphocyte typing	Lack of non-hla antigen restimulation in activated lymphocyte typing.
8	responses of alloantigen primed lymphocytes in vitro the specificity of secondary responses assayed by titration of primed lymphocyte populations	The specificity of the secondary responses measured by titration of the primed lymphocyte population was determined by in vitro alloantigen reactions of the activated lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte surface markers in acute rheumatic fever and post streptococcal acute glomerulonephritis	Acute rheumatic fever and acute post-streptococcal glomerulonephritis marker on the lymphocyte surface.
8	human lymph node lymphocytes fail to effect lysis of antibody coated target cells	Lymphocytes from human lymph nodes do not affect the lysis of antibody-coated target cells.
8	enhancement of in vitro immunoglobulin synthesis of human lymphocytes by lysosomal enzymes from polymorphonuclear leucocytes	Increased in vitro human lymphocyte immunoglobulin synthesis by polymorphonuclear leukocyte lysosomal enzymes.
8	antigen specific lymphocyte activity in vitro by peripheral blood leucocytes from mantoux positive and negative human beings i comparison of quantitative and qualitative differences in the ppd specific lymphoproliferative response of lymphocytes from the two kinds of donors	In addition, there is a need for further research to determine the extent to which lymphocyte-specific antigenic lymphocytic activity in peripheral blood leukocytes can be compared with other lymphocyte-specific antigenic lymphocytic responses in humans.
8	immunity and cancer suppressor effect on the cytotoxic activity of lymphoid cells from animals carrying syngeneic tumors	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
8	long term physiologic study of thoracic duct lymph and lymphocytes in rat and man	Long-term physiological chest canal lymph and lymphocyte studies in rats and l'apos; men.
8	dna repair after uv and gamma irradiation ii human lymphocytes	The following are examples: repair of apos; DNA after UV irradiation and gamma irradiation; human lymphocytes.
8	differential uptake of platinum uracil by human peripheral lymphocytes	Platinum uracil differential uptake by human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	suppression of generation of human cytotoxic effectors by lectins or lectin activated peripheral blood lymphocytes	Suppression of the generation of human cytotoxic effectors by lectins or lectins has been shown to activate peripheral blood lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of human mixed lymphocyte culture stimulation by anti hla d associated antisera studies with primed responding cells	Anti-Hla anti-stimulation and anti-hla anti-stimulation therapy for the treatment of lymphocyte cancer.
8	immunotherapy with autologous white cell infusions lymphocytes in the treatment of recurrrent glioblastoma multiforme a preliminary report	Autologous white lymphocyte immunotherapy for recurrent multiform glioblastoma has been reported as a preliminary report.
8	mechanism of target cell lysis of cytolytic t lymphocytes i characterization of specific lymphocyte target cell conjugates separated by velocity sedimentation	Mechanisms of Target Cell Lysis in Cytolytic T-Lymphocytes i characterization of velocity-separated target cell cell conjugates.
8	variable region fv determinants on mouse lymphocytes	Determinants of mouse lymphocyte fv variable region.
8	studies on the role of suppressor cells in specific unresponsiveness to dncb	Studies on the role of the suppressive cells in the non--response specific to dncb.
8	frozen lymphocyte pools as technical and reference controls for lymphocyte transformation	Masses of frozen lymphocytes as a reference and technical control for the transformation of lymphocytes.
8	detection of a minor stimulating product involved in secondary allogenic proliferation of human lymphocytes in vitro	It can also be used as a therapeutic agent for the treatment of allergic reactions.
8	the effect of x ray induced mitotic delay on chromosome aberration yields in human lymphocytes	X-ray-induced mitotic retardation effects on chromosome yield in human lymphocytes.
8	effect of immunotherapy on lymphocyte function in acute lymphatic leukemia	Effect of Lapos; Lymphocyte Function Immune Therapy in Acute Lymphatic Leukemia.
8	immunological characteristics of lymphoblasts and lymphocytes in acute lymphoblastic leukaemia in children	Immunologic Characteristics of Lymphoblasts and Lymphocytes in Acute Lymphoblastic Leukemia in Children.
8	education of lymphocytes in vivo following a transient take of a matched unrelated bone marrow graft in man	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, and it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
8	nodular lymphoid hyperplasia of the bowel in primary hypogammaglobulinaemia study of in vivo and in vitro lymphocyte function	Lymphoid lymphocyte nodular hyperplasia; intestine in apos; primary lymphocyte study; hypogamaglobulinaemia in vivo and in vitro.
8	serum albumin biosynthesis and secretion by resting and lectin stimulated human lymphocytes	Biosynthesis and serum albumin secretion by lectins and rest stimulate human lymphocytes.
8	stimulation of human peripheral blood lymphocytes by a sodium periodate naio4 induced growth factor	Stimulation of peripheral human blood lymphocytes with periodate naio sodium4 induced a growth factor.
8	electron microscopic studies of lymphocytes in the bone marrow of the mouse i effect of hydrocortisone on marrow small lymphocytes author s transl	Mice bone marrow lymphocyte electron microscopy studies: effects of apos; hydrocortisone on small marrow lymphocytes.
8	the effects of azathioprine and levamisole on rosette forming cells of healthy subjects and cancer patients	Effects of azathioprine and levamisol on rosette cell formation in cancer patients and healthy subjects.
8	the effect of intensive immunosuppression on the in vitro activity of lymphocytes from multiple sclerosis patients	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
8	a simplified technique for obtaining purified peripheral lymphocytes from chickens	A simplified procedure for obtaining purified, chicken peripheral lymphocytes.
8	assay of immune cytolysis of lymphocytes and tumour cells by automatic determination of cell volume distribution	Determination of Immune Cytolysis of Lymphocytes and Tumor Cells by Automatic Determination of Cell Volume Distribution.
8	human mixed lymphocyte culture using separated lymphocyte populations	Cultivation of Mixed Human Lymphocytes at baseline; aid in the development of separate lymphocyte populations.
8	characterization of human lymphocyte subpopulations for cytotoxicity against tumor derived monolayer cultures	Characterization of cytotoxicity of sub-human lymphocyte populations versus tumor-derived monolayers.
8	biologic activity of transfer factor tested in vitro with cord blood lymphocytes	In addition, it was found that there were no significant differences between the two groups.
8	synthesis of ribosomal rna in the lymphocytes with 21 chromosome trisomy	Ribosomal rna synthesis in 21-chromosome lymphocytes.
8	effect of schizophrenic patients serum on dna synthesis in cultures of pha stimulated lymphocytes	Effect of serum from patients with schizophrenia on synthesis of DNA in pha-stimulated lymphocyte cultures.
8	a population of lymphocytes in human blood distinctive in morphology and other characteristics	Human blood lymphocyte population distinguished by morphology and other characteristics.
8	a new antigen system expressed in human endothelial cells	It's a new system of antigen expression in human endothelial cells.
8	immune response to immunization via the anterior chamber of the eye i f lymphocyte induced immune deviation	Immune response to apo; apo-immunization; anterior mucosal chamber intermediate; f lymphocyte eye induced immune deviation.
8	distribution of alloantigens on human fc receptor bearing lymphocytes the presence of b cell alloantigens on sig positive but not sig negative lymphocytes	Alloantigen distribution on human fecal receptor-carrying lymphocytes, presence of alloantigen-carrying cells on sig-positive but not sig-negative lymphocytes.
8	membrane transport by murine lymphocytes ii the appearance of thymidine transport in cells from concanavalin a stimulated mice	Murine lymphocyte membrane transport ii l' appearance of thymidine transport in concanavalin cells stimulated mice.
8	effect of cytochalasin b on human lymphocyte responses to mitogens time and concentration dependence	Cytochalasin b affects the responses of human lymphocytes to mitogens as a function of time and concentration.
8	fractionation on lymphocyte surface antigens i rapid method for eliminating labeled lipid from cell surface antigens iodinated by the lactoperoxidase catalysed reaction	Rapid fractionation of labelled lipids from surface antigens from iodinated cells by the lactoperoxidase-catalyzed reaction on surface antigens of lymphocytes.
8	role of clozapine in the occurrence of chromosomal abnormalities in human bone marrow cells in vivo and in cultured lymphocytes in vitro	Role of clozapine in apo; appearance of chromosomal abnormalities in in vivo human bone marrow cells and cultured in vitro lymphocytes.
8	effect of the elimination of suppressor cells on the development of dncb contact sensitivity in guinea pig	Effect of apo; suppressor cell suppression on dncb sensitivity development in guinea pig.
8	a suppressor mechanism controlling lymphocyte recruitment	A suppressor that controls recruitment of lymphocytes.
8	kinetics of small lymphocytes in normal and nude mice after splenectomy	Small lymphocyte kinetics in normal, naked mice after splenectomy.
8	stimulation of human fetal lymphocytes by lipopolysaccharide b in culture	Human fetal lymphocyte stimulation by cultured lipopolysaccharide b.
8	nuclear bodies of lymphocytes in the lymph nodes of guinea pigs treated with phytohemagglutinin in vivo	Nuclear lymphocyte bodies in phytohemagglutinin-treated guinea pig lymph nodes in vivo.
8	action of adenosine hosphates on the release of intracellular lactate dehydrogenase from human and rat lymphocytes	Action of d&apos hosphates; adenosine on intracellular lactate dehydrogenase release from rat and human lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of mixed lymphocyte reactions in humans after immunization with tetanus toxoid	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
8	the production of micronuclei from chromosome aberrations in irradiated cultures of human lymphocytes	Chromosomal aberrations in irradiated human lymphocyte cultures.
8	impaired response of lymphocytes of diabetic subjects to antigen of staphylococcus aureus	Altered lymphocyte response to staphylococcus aureus antigen in diabetic subjects.
8	studies on difference in cellular immune response between the human tonsil and blood lymphocytes	Studies of the Difference in Cellular Immune Response between Human and Human Blood Lymphocytes.
8	lymphocyte transformation in vitro in dermatophytosis	In vitro transformation of lymphocytes in the dermatophytosis.
8	proteolytic enzymes in palatine tonsil lymphocytes	Proteolytic enzymes in amygdala lymphocytes.
8	triiodothyronine receptors in lymphocytes of newborn and adult rats	Triiodothyronine receptors in neonatal-and adult rat lymphocytes.
8	reactive and non reactive lymphocytes in experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the immune system.
8	immunity to trichinella spiralis i transfer of resistance by two classes of lymphocytes	Trichinella spiralis immunity i resistance transfer by two classes of lymphocytes.
8	a receptor for self on lymphocytes	A self-releasing-even lymphocyte.
8	stimulation of lymphocytes from rheumatoid arthritis patients by mitogens and igg	Lymphocytes of patients with rheumatoid arthritis are stimulated by the use of mitogens and igg.
8	cytotoxicity to isolated rabbit hepatocytes by lymphocytes from children with liver disease	A review of the Canadian Lymphocyte Association and the Canadian Lymphocyte Association. pp. 1–25.
8	autoallergic states tumor immunology impaired function of peripheral lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosus	L' tumour immunology of autoallergic conditions has been shown to impair peripheral lymphocyte function in disseminated lupus erythematosus.
8	detection of a nuclear ebna type antigen in apparently ebna negative herpesvirus papio hvp transformed lymphoid lines by the acid fixed nuclear binding technique	A nuclear ebna-like antigen detected in papio-hvp d&apos-transformed lymphoid lines; herpesviruses apparently ebna by the acid-fixed nuclear binding technique.
8	a non t non b human leukemia cell line nalm 1 establishment of the cell line and presence of leukemia associated antigens	The development of the human nalm 1 cell line of non-beta human leukemia and the presence of antigenic agents associated with leukemia.
8	in vitro reactivity of macrophages and lymphocytes from ultraviolet irradiated mice	Ultraviolet-irradiated mouse macrophages and lymphocytes are reactive in vitro.
8	semiquantitative cytochemical estimation of beta glucuronidase activity in peripheral lymphocytes in healthy human subjects	An estimate of the amount of beta activity in the peripheral lymphocytes of healthy human subjects.
8	t and b lymphocytes before during and after cytostatic therapy of acute lymphoblastic leukemia all in children author s transl	Both the pre- and post-cytostatic treatment of children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia are translated by the authors.
8	the effect of surgical removal of a rat sarcoma on lymphocyte cytotoxicity	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that lymphocyte cytotoxicity is a risk factor.
8	evidence for the release of mitogenic factors by both t and b lymphocytes in the human	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
8	dna synthetic responses of fractionated human lymphocytes exposed to lymphocyte derived mitogenic factor	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
8	the effects of mouse alpha fetoprotein on t cell dependent and t cell independent immune responses in vitro	The effects of mouse fetoprotein alpha on t-cell-dependent and t-cell-independent immune responses in vitro.
8	distribution of heavy chain variable region vh subgroups on human lymphocytes	Distribution of sub-groups in the human lymphocyte heavy variable-chain vh region.
8	comparison of microtitre plates with flat bottomed and round bottomed wells for mixed lymphocyte culture mlc	Microtitre plate comparison with flat-bottomed and round-bottomed wells for mixed culture of mlc lymphocytes.
8	reduced mitogenic responses in cultures of lymphocytes from newly calved cows	Mitogenic responses were reduced in newborn cows' lymphocyte cultures.
8	cytomegalovirus directed lymphocyte reactivity in healthy adults tested by a cmv induced lymphocyte transformation test	Cytomegalovirus-induced lymphocyte transformation in healthy adults.
8	diminished cap formation in lymphocytes from patients and carriers of duchenne muscular dystrophy	Reduced cap formation in duchenne muscle dystrophy patients and carriers' lymphocytes.
8	cell mediated lympholysis in man an attempt to type with cytotoxic lymphocytes	Cell-mediated lympholysis in men, a cytotoxic lymphocyte typing attempt.
8	chromosome aberrations induced by fortrin in human lymphocytes in cultures and in vivo	Fortrin-induced chromosomal aberrations in cultured and in vivo human lymphocytes.
8	on the structure of the t cell receptor for antigen	Cell receptor t structure for antigen.
8	structure of hl a a and b antigens isolated from cultured human lymphocytes	The structure of isolated hl a and b antigens from cultured human lymphocytes.
8	immune complexes in hepatitis b antigen associated periarteritis nodosa detection by antibody dependent cell mediated cytotoxicity and the raji cell assay	Antibody-mediated cell-mediated cytotoxicity-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated hepatitis b.
8	lymphocytes which differentiate in an allogeneic thymus ii evidence for both central and peripheral mechanisms in tolerance to donor strain tissues	Lymphocytes differentiating in allogeneic thymus ii indicate the existence of peripheral and central mechanisms in tissue tolerance of the donor strain.
8	lymphocyte stimulation in multiple sclerosis patients untreated and treated with transfer factor long term studies on the effect of different stimulants on myo 2 3h inositol incorporation into phosphatidylinositol of lymphocytes	Lymphocytic stimulation in untreated MS patients treated with Dapos transfer factors; long-term studies on apos; effect of various stimulant on apos; incorporation of apos; 2 h inositol myo into lymphocyte phosphatidylinositol.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes exposed to 8 methoxypsoralen and long wave uv radiation prior to incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine	Exchanges of sister chromatids in human lymphocytes exposed to 8 methoxypsoralenes and long-wave uv-radiation before etapos; bromodeoxyuridine incorporation.
8	mycoplasma dependent activation of normal lymphocytes induction of a lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for allogeneic and syngeneic mouse target cells	Mycoplasma-dependent normal lymphocyte activation induces lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity to target cells from allogeneic and syngenic mice.
8	mycoplasma dependent activation of normal lymphocytes role of arginine and nonviable mycoplasma antigen in the induction of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity for syngeneic mouse target cells	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the lymphocyte is involved in the cytotoxicity of the cell.
8	inhibition of proliferative and plaque forming cell responses by human bone marrow derived lymphocytes from peripheral blood by antisera to the p23 30 antigen	The inhibition of plaque-forming and proliferative responses by peripheral blood-derived bone marrow-derived human lymphocytes by antisera to apos; p23 antigen 30 was observed.
8	lymphocytes alloantigens associated with x chromosome linked immune response genes	Alloantigens from lymphocytes associated with the immune response genes linked to the x chromosomes are linked to the x chromosomes.
8	in vitro anti kidney effect of lymphocytes in experimental immunization to placental antigens	In vivo immunotherapy for the treatment of lymphocyte cancer; investigational immunotherapy for the prevention of infection.
8	morphology of immune lymphocytes in homograft lymph	Immune lymphocyte morphology in homogreated lymph.
8	transformation of lymphocytes by herpesvirus papio	Lymphocyte transformation by papio-papos; papio-herpesvirus.
8	early effects of phytohemagglutinin on induction of dna polymerase thymidine kinase deoxyribonucleoside triphosphate pools and dna synthesis in human lymphocytes	Early Effects of Phytohemagglutinin on Disease; Pool Induction; DNA Polymerase Thymidine Kinase Deoxyribonucleoside Triphosphate and Dapos Synthesis; DNA in Human Lymphocytes.
8	discrimination of b t and null lymphocytes by esterase cytochemistry	Esterase cytochemistry was used to distinguish b- and null-cell lymphocytes.
8	effect of corticosteroids on the response of lymphocytes to stimulation by galactose oxidase modified lymphocytes	Effect of corticosteroids on galactose oxidase-modified lymphocyte response to stimulation.
8	the effect of steroids on the circulating lymphocyte population ii studies of the thoracic duct lymphocyte population of the guinea pig after neonatal thymectomy and prednisolone treatment	Effects of Steroids on the Circulating Lymphocytic Population ii studies of the guinea pig thoracic canal lymphocyte population following neonatal thymectomy and prednisolone treatment.
8	quantitative studies on the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iii the lineage of memory cells	Quantitative cytotoxic lymphocyte precursor studies iii memory cell line.
8	t cell regulation of human peripheral blood b cells responsiveness	Cellular t regulation of b cell reactivity in peripheral blood.
8	polygenic control of mixed lymphocyte reaction in dogs	Mixed lymphocyte response in dogs.
8	separation of lymphoid cells with a suppressor effect on the activity of cytotoxic cells in vitro during the growth of a syngeneic mouse tumour	Lymphoid cell separation suppressive effect on apos; cytotoxic cell activity in vitro during mouse growth; a mouse syngene tumour.
8	responses of alloantigen primed lymphocytes in vitro the contribution of increased frequencies of responding lymphocytes to differences between reactivity of normal and primed lymphocyte populations	Reactions of Started Lymphocytes with Alloantigens in In Vitro The Contribution of Lapos; Increase in Reactive Lymphocyte Frequency to Differences in Reactivity between Normal and Started Lymphocyte Populations.
8	peripheral blood lymphocytes in systemic lupus erythematosus relation to activity	Lupus erythematosus and lupus erythematosus; activity and lymphocytes of peripheral blood; activity.
8	thymus and breast cancer plasma androgens thymic pathology and peripheral lymphocytes in myasthenia gravis	Thymus and androgen cancer of the plasma androgen, thymic pathology and peripheral lymphocytes in severe myasthenia.
8	relationship between lymphocyte response to tetanus toxoid and age of lymphocyte donor	In addition, there is a high degree of variability in the response of the lymphocytes.
8	immunosuppression by sex steroid hormones the effect upon pha and ppd stimulated lymphocytes	Sex steroid hormone immunosuppression had an effect on pha- and ppd-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	characterization of human adenoid cells using surface and functional markers for lymphocyte subpopulations	Characterization of human lymphocyte adenoid cells; surface and functional marker aid for sub@-@ lymphocyte populations.
8	isolation of enzymatically homogeneous populations of human lymphocytes monocytes and granulocytes by zonal centrifugation	Isolate enzymatically homogeneous human lymphocyte monocyte and granulocyte populations by zonal centrifugation.
8	ultrastructural study of the vacuoles in the peripheral lymphocytes in juvenile amaurotic idiocy juvenile form of generalized ceroid lipofuscinosis	Ultrastructural study of vacuoles in peripheral lymphocytes of juvenile generalized cervical lipofuscinosis of juvenile amaurotic idiomes.
8	hl a b 27 in reiter s disease with special reference to oligosymptomatic course forms	"In the case of oligosymptomatic forms, the term ""oligosymptomatic forms"" is used."
8	antisera against leukaemia associated antigens on human lymphocytes	Leukemia-associated anti--antigens in human lymphocytes.
8	post transplant monitoring of renal allograft recipients for t b and null lymphocyte subpopulations	Post-transplant surveillance of lymphocyte recipients; renal allografts for sub--lymphocyte populations.
8	the use of detergents and immunoperoxidase reagents for the ultrastructural demonstration of internal immunoglobulin in lymph cells	Use of immunoperoxidase detergents and reagents for ultrastructural demonstration of apos; internal immunoglobulin in lymphatic cells.
8	phylogeny of lymphocyte heterogeneity i membrane immunoglobulins of teleost lymphocytes	Apos phylogeny; cell membrane lymphocyte i immunoglobulin heterogeneity in teleost lymphocytes.
8	surface igm on lymphocytes from pregnant women	Lymphocyte surface pattern in pregnant women.
8	mouse immunoglobulin receptors on lymphocytes identification of igm and igd molecules by tryptic cleavage and a postulated role for cell surface igd	Mouse immunoglobulin receptors on lymphocytes identify protein and protein molecules, tryptic cleavage and a postulated cellular surface igd role.
8	determination of antiplatelet antibody activity in sera cytotoxic for human lymphocytes	Determination of the protein; anti-platelet antibody activity in the cytotoxic serum for human lymphocytes.
8	immunologic surface markers on nonhuman primate lymphocytes	Non-human primate lymphocyte surface immunological markers.
8	comparison of the stimulating capacity of human leukemia t cell null cell and b cell lines in mixed lymphoma culture	Comparison of the Stimulatory Capacity of B- and Zero Cell Lines of Human Leukemia in Mixed Lymphoma Cultures.
8	lack of specificity of lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity against the bladder cancer cell line t24	Lack of specificity of lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity against the t24 cell line of bladder cancer cells.
8	inhibition of dna biosynthesis in human lymphocytes by alpha 1 antitrypsin	Alpha 1 antitrypsin inhibits human lymphocyte DNA biosynthesis.
8	cell mediated cytotoxicity in vitro of human lymphocytes against a cervical cancer cell line	In vitro cell-mediated cytotoxicity of human lymphocytes against cervical cancer; uterus.
8	surface immunoglobulins and lymphocyte adhesiveness during development	Immunoglobulins of the surface and adhesion of lymphocytes during development.
8	the procoagulant activity of human granulocytes lymphocytes and monocytes stimulated by endotoxin coagulation and electron microscopic studies	L' human granulocyte and lymphocyte procoagulatory activity stimulated by l&apos coagulation; endotoxin and electron microscopic studies.
8	formation and release of antibodies in lymphocytes	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of antibody.
8	temperature effects on lymphocyte transformation invitro	Effects of Temperature on Invitro Lymphocyte Transformation.
8	induction of specific unresponsiveness against the c3h m1s antigen in mice increase of suppressive capacity of c3h x cba f1 lymphocytes after sensitization against cba lymphoid cells	L' induction of apos; specific anti-apos non--reactivity; antigen c3h m1s in mice enhances c3h x cba f1 suppressive capacity after cba cell sensitization.
8	increased succinate dehydrogenase activity of lymphocytes in eczema	Lymphocyte dehydrogenase activity in lymphocytes; eczema.
8	surface immunoglobulin on rabbit lymphoid cells iv ultrastructural labelling of a and b group allotypic determinants	Rabbit lymphoid cell surface immunoglobulin iv ultrastructural labelling of allotypic determinants of rabbit lymphoid groups a and b.
8	structure and biological function of human igd ix anti igd activation of human lymphocytes	Human igd igd igd igd anti-activating human lymphocyte structure and function.
8	studies in porphyria vii induction of uroporphyrinogen i synthase and expression of the gene defect of acute intermittent porphyria in mitogen stimulated human lymphocytes	Studies of viral porphyria, apo; induction of apo; uroporphyrinogen i synthase and apo; expression of the acute intermittent porphyry gene defect in mitogen-stimulated human lymphocytes have stimulated human lymphocytes.
8	studies on the capacity of human tonsillar lymphocyte subpopulations to produce interferon	Studies on ability of sub-human amygdal lymphocyte populations to produce l' interferon.
8	the effect of a23187 upon calcium metabolism in the human lymphocyte	L' a23187 effect on calcium metabolism in human lymphocytes.
8	ligand independent cap formation redistribution of surface receptors on mouse lymphocytes and thymocytes in hypertonic medium	Formation of d&apos, a ligand-independent cap, surface receptor redistribution on mouse thymocytes and lymphocytes in hypertonic medium.
8	dna synthesis in isolated lymphocyte nuclei effects of megaloblastic anaemia due to folate or vitamin b 12 deficiency or antimetabolite drugs	Synthesis of apos; DNA in isolated lymphocyte nuclei; effects of apos; megaloblastic anemia caused by folate deficiency, vitamin b12 deficiency, or antimetabolite drugs.
8	quantitative studies on the precursors of cytotoxic lymphocytes iv specificity and cross reactivity of cytotoxic clones	Quantitative studies of cytotoxic lymphocyte precursors: specificity and cross-reactivity of cytotoxic clones.
8	a cytotoxic proteinase isolated from human lymphocytes	Isolated cytotoxic proteinase from human lymphocytes.
8	alkaline phosphatase positive lymphocytes appl in man	In humans, alkaline phosphatase-positive lymphocytes clap.
8	ultrastructural cytochemical and membrane surface marker characteristics of the atypical lymphocytes in infectious mononucleosis	Ultrastructural cytochemical characteristics and atypical lymphocyte membrane markers in infectious mononucleosis.
8	transplantation of nuclei from lymphocytes of adult frogs into enucleated eggs special focus on technical parameters	The transplantation of adult frog lymphocyte nuclei into eggs enucleated puts the emphasis on technical parameters.
8	changes in the cellular membrane surface coat of lymphocytes and thymocytes after incubation in vitro with cystein as revealed with electronmicroscopy	Changes in the surface layer of the cell membrane of lymphocytes and thymocytes following in vitro incubation with cysteine, as revealed by electron microscopy, were observed.
8	lymphocyte subpopulations in multiple scerlosis comparison with neuroelectric blocking activity	Under-lymphocyte populations in comparison of multiple sclerosis with l' neuroelectrical blockade activity.
8	characteristics of cytotoxic t lymphocytes eluted from allogenic target cells	The cytotoxic t-cell characteristics were eluted from the allogenic target cells.
8	kinetics and properties of a cortisol resistant population of lymphocytes from the lymph nodes of guinea pigs with experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	Kinetics and apo properties; a cortisol-resistant lymphocyte population from guinea pig lymph nodes with apo; experimental allergic encephalomyelitis.
8	cytotoxic effect of lymphocytes on peritoneal macrophages of mice in contact dermatitis induced by dinitrochlorbenzene	Lymphocyte cytotoxic effect on peritoneal macrophages of mice with dinitrochlorobenzene-induced contact dermatitis.
8	an electron microscopic study of intraepithelial lymphocytes in human fetal small intestine	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
8	change in the density of surface lymphocyte receptors and in the level of serum immunoglobulins in chronic lympholeukosis	Changes in surface lymphocyte receptor density and serum immunoglobulin levels in lympholukosis.
8	autoradiographic study of dna metabolism in different populations of lymphocytes during chemical carcinogenesis is mice of the balb c strain	L' autoradiographic metabolism study; DNA in different lymphocyte populations during chemical carcinogenesis in Balb c strain mice.
8	studies of t b and null lymphocytes during the course of acute lymphocytic leukemia	Acute lymphocyte leukemia is a form of lymphocyte inflammation.
8	cytogenetic investigations on lymphocytes from workers exposed to vinyl chloride	Cytogenetic studies of vinyl chloride-exposed workers' lymphocytes.
8	the location of dna homologous to human satellite iii dna in the chromosomes of chimpanzee pan troglodytes gorilla gorilla gorilla and orang utan pongo pygmaeus	The localization of the human satellite homologous DNA iii DNA in gorilla and gorilla pan-troglodyte chimpanzee chromosomes; orang utan pongo pygmaeus.
8	fluidity of membrane lipids and lateral mobility of concanavalin a receptors in the cell surface of normal lymphocytes and lymphocytes from patients with malignant lymphomas and leukemias	Membrane lipid fluidity and lateral mobility of concanavalin receptors at the cell surface are normal lymphocytes and lymphocytes from malignant lymphoma and leukemia patients.
8	distribution of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase inducibility in cultured human lymphocytes	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	an attempt at passive transfer of immunity to leprosy patients by transfusion of allogeneic lymphocytes inactivated with mitomycin c	Attempted Passive Transfer of Apos; Immunity to Patients with Leprosy by Transfusion of Mitomycin-inactivated Allogene Lymphocytes c.
8	antisera with ia specificity selected by lymphocytes from patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia	Antisera with specificity ia selected by the lymphocytes of patients with chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
8	the activating effect of synovial fluid and washings of synovial membrane on autologous lymphocytes in rheumatoid arthritis	L' synovial fluid and synovial membrane lavage activating effect on autologous lymphocytes in rheumatoid arthritis.
8	incorporation of deoxynucleotides into dna by diethylaminoethyldextran treated lymphocytes	Deoxynucleotide incorporation in DNA by diethylaminoethyldextran-treated lymphocytes.
8	morphological differences between sub populations of human lymphocytes revealed by scanning electron microscopy	Morphological differences between scanning electron microscopy (SEM) revealed sub-human lymphocyte populations.
8	heterogeneity of acid phosphatase beta glucuronidase and alpha naphthyl acetate esterase in normal and leukaemic lymphocytes	Alpha naphthyl acetate esterase and beta-glucuronidase acid phosphatase in normal and leukemic lymphocytes.
8	gamma radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes dose rate effects in stimulated and non stimulated cells	Gamma radiation induced chromosomal aberrations in human lymphocytes, dose-rate effects in unstimulated and stimulated cells.
8	in vitro morphological studies on antibody dependent nonimmune lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity in chronic active liver disease	In vitro morphological studies of nonimmune antibody-dependent lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in patients with chronic active liver disease.
8	concomitant presence of tumor specific cytotoxic and inhibitor lymphocytes in patients with osteogenic sarcoma	Concomitant presence of cytotoxic lymphocytes and specific tumour inhibitors in osteogenic sarcoma patients.
8	surface immunoglobulin on rabbit lymphoid cells v ultrastructural distribution of b4 allotypic determinants of thymus lymph node and bone marrow lymphocytes	Rabbit lymphoid cell surface immunoglobulin v ultrastructural distribution of allotypic determinants b4 of the thymus lymph nodes and bone marrow lymphocytes.
8	thymic factors regulating dna synthesis in lymphocytes cultured in vitro	The thymic factors that regulate the synthesis of DNA in lymphocytes grown in vitro.
8	quantitative distribution of satellite associations differing according to the number of chromosomes in human lymphocytes	Quantitative Distribution of Satellite Associations Distinguished by Chromosome Number in Human Lymphocytes.
8	kinetics of indium iii labelled lymphocytes in normal subjects and patients with hodgkin s disease	The kinetics of labeled lymphocytes; indium iii in normal subjects and in patients with Hodgkin's disease.
8	patterns of immunological anti donor reactivity in renal allotransplanted patients a prospective study	Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
8	frozen thawed mononuclear cells as a source of b lymphocytes for antibody screening	Thawed and frozen mononuclear cells are a source of b-cells for antibody screening.
8	association between hla determinants and complement receptors on human lymphocytes	The effect of a drug on a person's ability to function.
8	lymphocyte responses to phytohaemagglutinin in patients with asbestosis and pleural mesothelioma	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
8	close genetic relation between determinants coding for the hla d region detected by the technique of mixed primary and secondary lymphocyte culture and by serology of b lymphocytes	A close genetic relationship between the determinants coding for the hla d region was detected by the mixed secondary and primary lymphocyte culture technique and by b lymphocyte serology.
8	cytoenzymatic studies on the lymphocytes of peripheral blood and lymphatic nodes of rats in an experimental magnesium deficiency	Peripheral blood lymphocyte and lymph node cyto-enzymatic studies in rats with apo; experimental magnesium deficiency.
8	effect of the serum of patients with cholestasis on lymphocyte e rosette formation	Effect of serum in cholesterase patients on formation of lymphocytes and rosettes.
8	influence of autologous serum on in vitro reactivity of peripheral lymphocytes of patients with breast cancer	In vitro reactivity of peripheral lymphocytes in patients with breast cancer.
8	cytochemical reactions of normal and neoplastic lymphocytes	Cytochemical Reactions of Normal and Neoplastic Lymphocytes.
8	mitotic chiasmata and other quadriradials in mitomycin c treated bloom s syndrome lymphocytes	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	uva induced inhibition of proliferation of pha stimulated lymphocytes from humans treated with 8 methoxypsoralen	L' uva induced apos; inhibition of pha-stimulated lymphocyte proliferation in 8-methoxypsoralen-treated humans.
8	lymphocyte activation by streptococcal antigens in psoriasis	L'activation of lymphocytes by antigenic streptococci in psoriasis.
8	serologically detected lymphocyte antigens in holstein cattle	Serologically-detected lymphocytic antigen in Holstein cattle.
8	adenosine triphosphatase and 5 nucleotidase activity of antigen stimulated lymphocytes	In addition, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of lymphocyte cancer.
8	differentiation between various effects of cytotoxic fractions of lymphocyte culture medium	Differentiation between the various effects of cell culture cytotoxic fractions.
8	cytotoxins against a granulocyte antigen system detection by a new method employing cytochalasin b treated cells	Cytotoxins for the detection of apos; an antigenic granulocytic system by a novel method using cytochalasin-treated cells b.
8	unchanged electrophoretic mobility in human cryopreserved lymphocytes	The electrophoretic motility of cryopreserved human lymphocytes is not changed.
8	secretion by tumor and non tumor cells of substances modifying macrophage migration and the cytopathogenic effect of immune lymphocytes in vitro	Secretion by tumor and non-tumour cells of substances affecting macrophage and l&apos migration; cytopathogenic effect of immune cells in vitro.
8	adhesive lymphocytes in the peripheral blood of schizophrenic patients	Adhesive lymphocytes in schizophrenic patients' peripheral blood.
8	chronic lymphocytic leukemia well differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma with monoclonal iga iga production by circulating lymphocytes	Chronic lymphocytic leukemia is a well-differentiated, monoclonal production of iga iga by the circulating lymphocytes.
8	bloom s syndrome dna replication in cultured fibroblasts and lymphocytes	Replication of apo; fibroblast and cultured lymphocyte flowering syndrome DNA.
8	changes in the electric charge of blood lymphocyte populations after secondary immunization with tetanus antitoxin in man	Changes in the electrical load of the blood lymphocyte population after exposure; secondary immunization with apos; tetanus antitoxin in men.
8	in vitro activating properties of polyene antibiotics for murine lymphocytes	In vitro, polyene antibiotic activating properties for murine lymphocytes.
8	induction of delayed reaction to dinitrophenylated lymphocytes in guinea pigs with contact sensitivity to dncb	Dapos induction; delayed dinitrophenyl lymphocyte response in dncb-sensitive guinea pigs.
8	lower azure b methylene blue ratios in giemsa type blood and malaria stains	Reduced azure b-blue ratios of methylene in blood of the giemsa type and in malaria stains.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in lymphocytes of psoriatics after treatment with 8 methoxypsoralen and long wave ultraviolet radiation	Sister chromatid exchange in psoriatic lymphocytes after 8-methoxypsoralen treatment with long wavelength ultraviolet radiation; wave.
8	a sensitive rosetting method for detecting subpopulations of lymphocytes which react with alloantisera	Sensitive detection of sub-lymphocyte populations reacting with alloantisers.
8	interdependence of in vitro responsiveness of cord and maternal blood lymphocytes to antigens from oral bacteria	Interdependence of umbilical cord lymphocyte and maternal blood in vitro responsiveness to oral bacterial antigens.
8	human blood l lymphocytes in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus rheumatoid arthritis and scleroderma a comparison with t and b cells	Human blood lymphocytes in patients with active systemic lupus erythematosus, rheumatoid polyarthritis, and scleroderma compared to patients with t- and b-cells.
8	suppression of dna synthesis by con a activated human lymphocytes stimulation by con a bound to non t cells unless removed after activation	The suppression of the synthesis of DNA by stimulation of human lymphocytes activated by binding to the cells not t, unless it is removed after activation.
8	demonstration of nuclear antigen binding lymphocytes by the resette method in sle patients	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	vacuolated lymphocytes in type ii glycogenosis a diagnostic approach	Lymphocytes vacuolated in glycogenosis type ii, a diagnostic approach.
8	bacille calmette gu rin infection in the mouse regulation of macrophage plasminogen activator by t lymphocytes and specific antigen	Canadian Institute for Health Information (CIHI), Canadian Institute for Health Information.
8	anti viral activity induced by culturing lymphocytes with tumor derived or virus transformed cells identification of the anti viral activity as interferon and characterization of the human effector lymphocyte subpopulation	Antiviral activity induced by the culture of lymphocytes with cells derived from, or transformed by, a virus; a tumour Identification of the apos; antiviral activity as an interferon; and characterization of the sub@-@ population of human effector lymphocytes.
8	sensitization of lymphocytes against pooled allogeneic cells i generation of cytotoxicity against autologous human lymphoblastoid cell lines	Lymphocyte sensitization against aggregated allogeneic cells i cytotoxicity generation against human lymphoblastoid autologous cell lines.
8	induction of ebna precedes the first cellular s phase after ebv infection of human lymphocytes	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
8	metabolism of immunoglobulin a lymphocyte function and histocompatibility antigens in patients on anticonvulsants	In addition, it is recommended that patients be treated with anti-vulsant drugs to avoid the risk of infection.
8	k lymphocytes killer cells in crohn s disease and acute virus b hepatitis	Crohn's disease killer k-cell; acute viral hepatitis b.
8	immuno suppressive effect of human macrophages ii influence of macrophages on the kinetics of dna rna and protein synthesis in pha stimulated lymphocytes	Human macrophage suppressor-immune effect ii influences macrophages on the kinetics of l&apos synthesis; rna DNA and proteins in pha-stimulated lymphocytes.
8	suppression of growth of guinea pig line 10 hepatocarcinoma ii effect of passive transfer of xenogeneic and syngeneic antibodies and normal lymphoid cells	Suppression of cell line growth; guinea pig hepatocarcinoma; effect of passive transfer; xenogenic and syngene antibodies; and normal lymphoid cells.
8	in vitro immune response of human peripheral lymphocytes iii effect of anti mu or anti delta antibody on pwm induced increase of cyclic nucleotides in human b lymphocytes	In vitro Immune Response of Human Peripheral Lymphocytes (HLCs) iii effect of mucosal antibody or delta antibody on mucosal membranes; pwm-induced increase in cyclic nucleotides in human b lymphocytes.
8	increase in titer of the naturally occurring human antibody to neuraminidase treated lymphocytes after influenza	Natural human antibody directed against neuraminidase-treated lymphocytes after influenza.
8	fc receptor heterogeneity immunofluorescent studies of b t and third population lymphocytes in human blood with rabbit igg b4 anti b4 complexes	Dapos studies; immunofluorescence of apo; heterogeneity of b4 rabbit antib4 fc receptors from b t lymphocytes and third population in human blood.
8	a simple and rapid method to distinguish between rosettes and non specific aggregation of erythrocytes in the rosette assay for human t lymphocytes	A fast and simple method for distinguishing rosettes from l' erythrocyte nonspecific aggregation in the human T-cell rosette test.
8	kinetics of 21 trisomic lymphocytes i in vitro response of 21 trisomic lymphocytes to pha	Kinetics of 21 i trisomic lymphocytes, 21 in vitro trisomic lymphocyte response to pha.
8	baisc protein hydrolysis in lymphocytes of lewis rats with experimental allergic encephalomyelitis	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada, and the United States.
8	sister chromatid exchanges in human lymphocytes detected by using 5 bromdeoxyuridine	Exchanges of sister chromatids in human lymphocytes were detected by the use of 5 bromdeoxyuridine.
8	the cytolytic effect of puva treatment on pha stimulated human peripheral lymphocytes	The cytolytic effect of the puva treatment on the pha stimulated the peripheral lymphocytes of humans.
8	a further contribution on nucleoli of human lymphocytes	Another nucleolus contribution from human lymphocytes.
8	differences in purine metabolizing enzyme activities in human leukemia t cell b cell and null cell lines	Differences in purine-metabolizing enzyme activities between human leukemia b cell lines and purine-metabolizing enzyme activities.
8	behaviour of sheep immunoglobulin bearing and non immunoglobulin bearing lymphocytes isolated by nylon wool columns	In addition, the lymphocyte may be isolated from the nylon wool, and the lymphocyte may be isolated from the nylon wool.
8	an improved syncytia infectivity assay for the bovine leukemia virus	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been conducted to evaluate the effectiveness of the program.
8	3h thymidine labelling kinetics of peripheral blood lymphocytes in adult thymectomized mice	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
8	replication patterns of three isodicentric x chromosomes and an x isochromosome in human lymphocytes	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
8	augmented mitotic response of human peripheral lymphocytes in the presence of lymphocytes from nude mice detection of a small number of functional human lymphocytes in the explanted host	Increased mitotic response of peripheral human lymphocytes to lymphocytes from nude mice, detection of apo; a small number of functional human lymphocytes in the cell; explanted host.
8	nonspecific activation of murine lymphocytes i proliferation and polyclonal activation induced by 2 mercaptoethanol and alpha thioglycerol	Non-specific activation of 2 mercaptoethanol- and alpha thioglycerol-induced proliferation and polyclonal activation of murine lymphocytes.
8	secondary cytotoxic response in vitro against moloney lymphoma cells antigenically altered by drug treatment in vivo	Secondary cytotoxic reaction in vitro against in vivo drug-induced moloney lymphoma cells.
8	autoreactivity between lymphocytes and thymus cells in myasthenia gravis	Lymphocyte and thymus cell autoreactivity in severe myasthenia.
8	the surface morphology of mitogen stimulated human peripheral blood lymphocytes	Mitogen surface morphology stimulates peripheral human blood lymphocytes.
8	evidence that blood group a antigen on lymphocytes is derived from the plasma	The evidence that the blood type is an antigen found in the lymphocytes was found in the plasma.
8	induction of long lived chromosome damage as manifested by sister chromatid exchange in lymphocytes of animals exposed to mitomycin c	L' induction of long-term chromosomal damage occurs through the exchange of sister chromatids in lymphocytes from mitomycin c-exposed animals.
8	caffeine inhibition of prereplication repair of mitomycin c induced dna damage in human peripheral lymphocytes	Caffeine inhibition of pre-replication mitomycin c repair resulted in a cellular alteration of the apos; DNA in human peripheral lymphocytes.
8	response of human lymphocytes to mitogen at what stage is there a requirement for ca2	Human lymphocyte response to mitogen at what stage is-t-ca2 needed?
8	expression and specificity of fcigg receptor sites on neoplastic lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no specificity to the fcigg receptor sites in neoplastic lymphocytes.
8	inhibition of human lymphocyte responses by methylmethacrylate	Inhibition of the responses of human lymphocytes by the use of methylmethacrylate.
8	in vitro assay for responsiveness of lymphocytes to transfer factor by a new leukocyte migration inhibitory test	In vitro test of transfer factor responsiveness of lymphocytes by a new apo test; inhibition of leukocyte migration.
8	immunologic study of t and b lymphocytes in thymectomized monkeys after irradiation and autologous bone marrow transplantation	Immunological study of thymectomized t- and b-lymphocytes in irradiated autologous bone marrow transplant monkeys.
8	cytotoxic effects of toximul mp8 in human lymphocytes in culture a preliminary investigation	Cytotoxic Effects of Toximul mp8 on Cultured Human Lymphocytes, preliminary study.
8	macrophages lymphocytes and plasma cells in the perivascular compartment in chronic multiple sclerosis	In chronic multiple sclerosis, lymphocyte macrophages and plasma cells are found in the perivascular compartment.
8	beta adrenoreceptors on the surface membranes of lymphocytes and macrophages	Beta-adrenoceptors on lymphocyte and macrophage surface membranes.
8	lymphocyte mediated natural cytotoxicity in neoplasia	Natural lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity in neoplastic tissues was due to natural cytotoxicity.
8	in vitro induction of cytotoxic effector cells with spontaneous killer cell specificity	In vitro, induction of effector cytotoxic cells with specificity for spontaneous killer cells.
8	lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in patients with head and neck cancer	The effects of a drug on the immune system and on the immune system and on the immune system.
8	lymphocyte associated beta 2 microglobulin studied by crossed radioimmunoelectrophoresis	Lymphocyte-associated beta-2 microglobulin was studied by cross-immunoelectrophoresis.
8	affinity chromatography of nonhistone chromosomal proteins from lymphocytes on dna agarose columns	Apos chromatography; lymphocyte nonhistone chromosomal protein affinity on apo columns; DNA agarose.
8	sister chromatid exchange induced by x ray of human lymphocytes and the effect of l cysteine	Cysteine can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent, but can also be used as an anti-inflammatory.
8	transglutaminase activity in human lymphocytes early activation by phytomitogens	L' human lymphocyte transglutaminase activity is activated early by phytomitogens.
8	uptake and early fate of metaphase chromosomes ingested by the wi l2 human lymphoid cell line	L'absorption et le devenir précoce des chromosomes métaphiques ingested by the wi l2 line of human lymphoid cells.
8	the lymphocyte transformation response of fetal hemolymphatic tissue to mitogens and antigens	The response of the lymphocyte transformation of fetal hemolymphatic tissue to both mitogens and antigens.
8	lack of effect of halothane on e ea and eac rosette formation and cyclic amp level of human lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
8	production of prostaglandins in mixed lymphocyte cultures mlc between allograft donors and recipients	"For the purposes of this document, the term ""prospective"" is defined as a term used to describe a drug product."
8	comparison of the relative cytotoxic effector cell capabilities and the proportions of cells bearing various surface markers in human tonsil and peripheral blood mononuclear cells	Comparison of relative cytotoxic capacities of effector cells and proportions of cells carrying various surface markers in mononuclear cells of the human amygdala and peripheral blood.
8	detection and separation of two serum factors responsible for depression of lymphocyte activity in pregnancy	The goal of this project is to identify and separate two serologic factors responsible for the decrease in lymphocyte activity during pregnancy.
8	a new approach to the autoradiographic study of proliferating lymphocytes	Autoradiographic studies of proliferating lymphocytes.
8	interferon and spontaneous cytotoxicity in man i enhancement of the spontaneous cytotoxicity of peripheral lymphocytes by human leukocyte interferon	In addition, there is a potential for adverse effects on the human lymphocyte, which may result from the use of a combination of cytotoxins.
8	thymic humoral factor in the assessment of t lymphocytics in a patient with t cell chronic lymphocyte leukemia	Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology, 3: 10-11.
8	a 3h thymidine paper strip method for stimulation of lymphocytes i culture conditions for human or murine lymphocytes and reproducibility of the paper strip method	Thymidine 3-h paper strips method for lymphocyte stimulation i mouse or human lymphocyte culture conditions and paper strip reproducibility.
8	symposium on membrane markers and antigens of human lymphocytes and leukemic cells	Symposium on Membrane Markers and Human Lymphocyte and Leukemia Antigen.
8	lymphocytes within glial cells emperipolesis in a case of a granular cell tumor	Lymphocytes on the inside of the glial cells are infected with emperipolesis, granular cell tumours.
8	detection of b lymphocyte b cell associated antigens on human leukemic lymphocytes masking of membrane antigens	It can be used as an antigen in the body, but can be used as an antigen in the body.
8	suppression of human cytotoxic lymphocytes by methylprednisolone an immunosuppressive mechanism of action of steroids	Methylprednisolone suppression of human cytotoxic lymphocytes is a mechanism that acts as an immunosuppressive agent for steroids.
8	liposomes as model membrane systems for immune attack i transfer of antigenic determinants to lymphocyte membranes after interactions with hapten bearing liposomes	Liposomes as model membrane systems for immune attack; transfer of antigenic determinants to lymphocyte membranes following interaction with hapten-bearing liposomes.
8	the induction of cytolytic t lymphocytes with specificity for p azophenylarsonate coupled syngeneic cells	Cytolytic t-cell specificity induction of p-azophenylarsonate-coupled syngenic cells.
8	target antigens of cell mediated lympholysis discrimination of hla subtypes by cytotoxic lymphocytes	Targeted antigen of cell-mediated lympholysis Cytotoxic lymphocytes discriminate against sub-types hla.
8	double expression of vh region a2 and a3 allotypes in individual rabbit lymphocytes	Dual expression of allotypes of rabbit vh a2 and vh a3 regions in individual rabbit lymphocytes.
8	in vitro studies of the rabbit immune system vi rabbit anti mouse cytotoxic t effector cells are inhibited by anti rabbit t cell serum in the absence of complement	In vitro rabbit immune system studies against cytotoxic mouse t-effector cells were inhibited by anti serum-rabbit t-cells in the absence of complement.
8	rosette formation in chronic lymphocytic leukemia studies of lymphocytes from peripheral blood and lymph node biopsy	Acute lymphocytic leukemia is the most common type of lymphocytic leukemia, and is the most common type of lymphocytic leukemia.
8	carbohydrate composition of peripheral cultured and leukaemic human lymphocyte plasma membranes	Composition of carbohydrate in plasma membranes of cultured and leukemic peripheral human lymphocytes.
8	activation of measles virus from silently infected human lymphocytes	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection.
8	failure of autologous mixed lymphocyte reactions between t and non t cells in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus	Insufficient autologous mixed lymphocyte responses between non-t and t-cells in systemic lupus erythematosus patients.
8	the enhancing effect of multiple sclerosis brain homogenates on the active e rosette forming lymphocytes	In addition, there is a need for additional research to assess the impact of MS on the quality of life.
8	suppression of lymphocyte proliferation by a nonspecific factor produced by the burkitt lymphoma derived lymphoblast cell line	Suppression of lymphocyte proliferation by nonspecific factor produced by the Burkitt lymphoblast cell line.
8	ebv antigens in lymphocytes of patients with exudative tonsillitis infectious mononucleosis and hodgkin s disease	Antigen ebv in lymphocytes from exudative tonsillitis, infectious mononucleosis and Hodgkin's disease patients.
8	advantages of cryopreserved lymphocytes for sequential evaluation of human immune competence ii mixed lymphocyte cultures and mononuclear cell subpopulations	Advantages of cryopreserved lymphocytes for apo; sequential assessment of human immune competence ii cultures of mixed lymphocytes and under-populations of mononuclear cells.
8	in vitro generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes by tumor extracts of transitional cell carcinoma	In vitro cytotoxic lymphocyte generation by tumour extracts from transient cellular carcinomas.
8	lithium a modulator of cyclic amp dependent events in lymphocytes	Lithium is an apo-mediated lymphocyte-dependent cyclic event modulator.
8	transitional cell carcinoma lymphocyte mediated cytotoxicity	Cytotoxicity is the lymphocyte-mediated cytotoxicity of transition cells of lymphocyte carcinoma.
8	detection and separation of lymphocytes with specific surface receptors by using microparticles	Lymphocyte detection and separation with cell-specific surface receptors; microparticle aid.
8	lymphocyte morphology in mucoid middle ear effusions	Canadian Journal of Public Health, 8(2), pp. 1–24.
8	nonspecific suppressive and cytostatic activities mediated by human colonic carcinoma tissue or cultured cell extract	Cultivated extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular extracellular.
8	cytotoxicity of human peripheral lymphocytes in cell mediated lympholysis antibody dependent cell mediated lympholysis and natural cytotoxicity assays after mixed lymphocyte culture	Cytotoxicity of Human Peripheral Lymphocytes in Antibody-mediated Cell-mediated Lympholyses, Cell-mediated Lympholysis and Natural Cytotoxicity Tests after Mixed Lymphocyte Culture.
8	in vitro sensitization of human lymphocytes against histiocytic lymphoma cell lines ii characterization of two different effector activities and of suppressor cells	In vitro human lymphocyte sensitization to histiocyte lymphoma cell lines ii characterization of two different effector activities and suppressive cells.
8	toxicity of na251cro4 when used to label rat lymphocytes	It is also used to mark the lymphocytes of rats.
9	markovian model of time patterns of speech	Temporal speech models Markovian model.
9	the squid giant axon mathematical models	Mathematical Models of Giant Squid Axons.
9	isotope flows and flux ratios in biological membranes	Isotope flow and biological membrane flux ratios.
9	a note on puck and steffen s equations for the life cycle analysis of mammalian cells	Note on Palet and Steffen equations for L' mammalian Cell Life Cycle Analysis.
9	analysis of permeability data for the case of parallel diffusion pathways	Permeability data analysis for parallel diffusion channels.
9	the input impedance of an assembly of randomly branching elastic tubes	A randomly branched set of elastic tubes.
9	a mathematical evaluation of the core conductor model	A basic-kernel conductor model mathematical evaluation.
9	correction to one of macarthur s species abundance formulas	It's a good idea to have a little bit more of the same.
9	the tail movement of bull spermatozoa observations and model calculations	The movement of the tail of the sperm of the bulls observed and the model calculations.
9	inactivation of oriented bacteria with polarized ultraviolet light	Inactivation of polarized, ultraviolet-oriented bacteria.
9	a unified kinetic hypothesis of carrier mediated transport its applications	A unified kinetic transport hypothesis mediated by the carrier its applications.
9	the steady state properties of ion exchange membranes with fixed sites	Properties; state; exchange membrane equilibrium; fixed site ions.
9	an extension of the solid angle potential formulation for an active cell	An extension of the d&apos potential formulation; solid angle for the active cell.
9	a quantitative analysis of the voltage current relationships of fixed charge membranes and the associated property of punch through	A quantitative analysis of fixed-head membrane voltage current relationships and associated punching properties across membranes.
9	a mathematical physical model of the genesis of the electrocardiogram	A physical mathematical model of the apos' genesis; electrocardiogram.
9	volume conductor fields of action currents	Fields d' volume conducting current action; action.
9	an analysis of age prevalence data by catalytic models a contribution to the study of bilharziasis	For example, the prevalence of diabetes may be higher among women than among men, but the prevalence of diabetes may be higher among women.
9	the steady state properties of an ion exchange membrane with mobile sites	In addition, it may be used in conjunction with other materials, e.g. plastics, plastics, etc.
9	use of fourier series for the analysis of biological systems	Use of Fourier series for biological systems analysis.
9	response of nonspherical biological particles to alternating electric fields	Non-spherical biological particle response to alternative electric fields.
9	the numerical solution of the time dependent nernst planck equations	Numerical solution of nernst planck time-dependent equations.
9	a theoretical analysis of neuronal variability	Neural variability theory.
9	limitations on complexity of random learning networks	It is also important to note that there is a need for more information on this topic.
9	on the concentration gradient across a spherical source washed by slow flow	On the concentration gradient through a slow-flowing, washed spherical spring.
9	the non steady state membrane potential of ion exchangers with fixed sites	Membrane potential at fixed sites; non-steady state ion exchange.
9	state vector description of the proliferation of mammalian cells in tissue culture i exponential growth	Vector description of the state of mammalian cell proliferation in exponential growth and tissue culture.
9	treatment of low angle x ray data from planar and concentric multilayered structures	Processing low-angle X-ray data from concentric multi-layer planar structures.
9	observable changes of hypotheses under positive reinforcement	It is important to keep in mind that this is not the case.
9	osmotic flow in a rigid porous membrane	Rigid porous membrane osmotic flow.
9	oxygen hemoglobin system a model for facilitated membranous transport	The d&apos system; oxygenated hemoglobin is a model to facilitate membrane transport.
9	the measurement of synthesis rates of albumin and fibrinogen in rabbits	Measurements of the rates of rabbit l' albumin and fibrinogen synthesis.
9	some kinetic properties of a deterministic epidemic confirmed by computer simulation	A deterministic epidemic was confirmed by computer simulation.
9	potassium 40 content as a basis for the calculation of body cell mass in man	It is not possible to calculate the mass of the body as a function of age or sex.
9	a mathematical model of the human respiratory control system	A Mathematical Model of the Human Respiratory System of the Apos; Human Respiratory System of the Respiratory System.
9	investigation of an operator method in the analysis of biological tracer data	A biological marker analysis; a biological marker analysis; a biological marker analysis; a biological marker analysis; a biological marker analysis; a biological marker analysis; a biological marker analysis; a biological marker analysis; a biological marker analyzer; a biological marker analysis.
9	steady state phototropism in phycomyces	Apos phototropy; apos state; phycomycete balance.
9	differential growth and phototropic bending in phycomyces	Differential growth of phycomycetes and phototropic bending.
9	kinetics of growth of individual cells of escherichia coli and azotobacter agilis	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of cells, but it is important to distinguish between them.
9	studies of cell deformability iv a possible role of calcium in cell contact phenomena	Studies of the deformability of cells iv a possible role of calcium in the processes of cell contact.
9	determination of distribution of diffusing capacity in relation to blood flow in the human lung	Determination of Distribution of Diffusion Capacity in Relation to Blood Flow in Human Lungs.
9	intercellular communication and tissue growth i cancerous growth	Cardiovascular disease is a major cause of death.
9	synthesis of rna in mammalian cells during mitosis and interphase	Mammalian cell rna synthesis during mitosis and interphase.
9	absolute sensitivity of electron microscope radioautography	Ultra-microscopic radiofrequency (XRF) is a technique that can be used to measure radiofrequency.
9	studies on cell deformability 3 some effects of edta on sarcoma 37 cells	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
9	physicochemical differences between fragments of plasma membrane and endoplasmic reticulum	Physico differences-chemicals between endoplasmic reticulum and plasma membrane fragments.
9	a theory of fluid flow in compliant tubes	A theory of leakage; flow of leakage; flow of fluids through Conformity Tube with Conditioning Tube.
9	cell growth and division i a mathematical model with applications to cell volume distributions in mammalian suspension cultures	Cell Growth and Division i, a mathematical model that is applied to the distribution of cell volumes in suspended mammalian cultures.
9	the application of electromagnetic theory to electrocardiology ii numerical solution of the integral equations	Electrocardiology ii Numerical solution of integral equations.
9	aerobic microbial growth at low oxygen concentrations	It can be used as an insecticide or as an insecticide.
9	limitations on the equivalent cardiac generator	Limitations on cardiac equivalent generator are limited.
9	orientation in systems with asymmetric density distribution	L' system orientation with an asymmetric density distribution.
9	the kinetics of osmotic transport through pores of molecular dimensions	The kinetics of osmotic transport across molecular size pores.
9	are infinity machines paradoxical can processes involving an infinite sequence of operations or acts be completed in a finite time	In addition, it is important to note that many of the processes that occur in the process are the same as those that occur in the process itself.
9	some relations between changes in the linear electrical properties of striated muscle fibers and changes in ultrastructure	Some relationships between changes in linear electrical properties of muscle stripe fibers and changes in muscle structure.
9	a new approach to molecular configuration applied to aqueous pore transport	A new molecular-configuration approach to the transport of aqueous pores.
9	osmotic volume flow in the proximal tubule of necturus kidney	Osmotic volume flow into the proximal tubule of the necturus kidney.
9	the active state of mammalian skeletal muscle	L' mammalian skeletal muscle active state.
9	application of fourier analysis to the visibility of gratings	Fourier analysis at screen visibility.
9	the energetics of tortoise muscle	L' energetic turtle muscle.
9	the relation of oxygen intake and velocity of walking and running in competition walkers	The relationship between the supply of oxygen and the speed of competition walking and running.
9	wave propagation in a viscous fluid contained in an orthotropic elastic tube	Propagation of apos; waves in viscous fluid contained in orthotropic elastic tube.
9	the application of electromagnetic theory to electrocardiology i derivation of the integral equations	Electrical and Mechanical Engineering Electrical Engineering Electrical and Mechanical Engineering Electrical Engineering Electrical and Mechanical Engineering Electrical Engineering Electrical.
9	on the relative contribution of viscous flow vs diffusional frictional flow to the stationary state flow of water through a tight membrane	The relative contribution of the viscous vs. the vascular flow; friction diffusion flow at the apos; stationary flow of the apos; water through a tight membrane.
9	the time dependence of single file diffusion	Single-file broadcasting's temporal dependence.
9	the kinetics of a novel cyclic reaction system and its use in the assay of polynucleotide phosphorylase or adenosine diphosphate plus adenosine triphosphate	The kinetics of apos; a new cyclic reaction system and its use in apos; polynucleotide phosphorylase or apos test; adenosine diphosphate plus adenosine triphosphate.
9	methods for the determination of adipose cell size in man and animals	Methods for determining the size of fat cells in humans and animals.
9	deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis during exponential growth and microcyst formation in myxococcus xanthus	Synthesis of deoxyribonucleic acid during exponential growth and myxococcus xanthus microcyst formation.
9	standing gradient osmotic flow a mechanism for coupling of water and solute transport in epithelia	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of the rate of formation of the epithelium and the rate of formation of the epithelium.
9	validity of the force velocity relation for muscle contraction in the length region l less than or equal to l o	Strength Relationship Validity-Rate for Muscle Contracture in L-Length Region less than or equal to l o.
9	theoretical series elastic element length in rana pipiens sartorius muscles	Theoretical length of elastic elements in sartorius rana pipiens muscles.
9	heat work and phosphorylcreatine break down in muscle	Heat and phosphorylcreatin decompose in muscles.
9	the site of calcium binding in relation to the activation of myofibrillar contraction	The calcium binding site as it relates to l' activation of myofibrillar contraction.
9	hydrolysis of polynucleotides and the characterization of their secondary structure a theoretical study	The results of the study are presented in the table below.
9	a study of the alkaline hydrolysis of fractionated reticulocyte ribosomal ribonucleic acid and its relevance to secondary structure	A study of reticulocyte fractionated ribonucleic ribosomal acid alkaline hydrolysis and its relation to secondary structure.
9	an approach to the study of phase separation in ternary aqueous systems	An approach to phase separation in aqueous ternary systems.
9	membrane potentials at zero current the significance of a constant ionic permeability ratio	In this case, it is not possible to determine the relative importance of the ionic permeability.
9	a method to relate steady state ionic currents conductances and membrane potential in ion exchange membranes with unknown thermodynamic properties	A method of relating the conductances of ionic currents to the steady state and membrane potential in the membranes; d&apos exchange; ions whose thermodynamic properties are unknown.
9	numerical data concerning the sensitivity of anaerobic bacteria to oxygen	Numerical data concerning anaerobic bacteria sensitivity to oxygen.
9	sulfur isotope fractionation and kinetic studies of sulfite reduction in growing cells of salmonella heidelberg	Sulfur isotope fractionation and sulfite reduction kinetics studies in growing Salmonella heidelberg cells.
9	enzyme activities in polarized cell membranes	Polarized cell membrane enzyme activity.
9	visual adaptation of the rhodopsin rods in the frogs retina	Rhodopsin rodlet visual adaptation in frog retina.
9	spectral sensitivity of the planarian ocellus	Planar cell spectral sensitivity.
9	filtration coefficient of the axon membrane as measured with hydrostatic and osmotic methods	Axonal membrane filtration coefficient measured by osmotic and hydrostatic methods.
9	passive electrical properties of rod outer segments	Electrical passive properties of the outer segments of the stem.
9	a kronig penney model of salts of dna	Kronig penney DNA salt model.
9	a thermodynamic analysis of fluxes and flux ratios in bioligical membranes	Thermodynamic flux and flux ratio analysis in bioligical membranes.
9	surface charge of giant axons of squid and lobster	Surface loading of giant squid axons and lobster.
9	turbidimetric assays the antibiotic dose response line	Turbidimetric testing includes dose line-antibiotic response.
9	kinetic analyses of calcium movements in hela cell cultures i calcium influx	Kinetic analysis of the movement of calcium in cultures of helical cells i calcium influx.
9	the kinetics of cellular proliferation in regenerating liver	Regenerating liver cell proliferation kinetics.
9	diffusion and convective flow across membranes irreversible the thermodynamic approach	Convective diffusion and flux through irreversible membranes; thermodynamic approach.
9	transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors ii a mathematical analysis of the areas of isodensity surfaces in reorienting gradient systems	Transport phenomena in zonal centrifugal rotors ii a mathematical surface analysis of isodensity in gradient reorienting systems.
9	rates of polypeptide chain assembly in liver in vivo relation to the mechanism of temperature acclimation in opsanus tau	Polypeptide chain assembly in the liver in vivo is related to the d&apos mechanism; acclimation to temperature in Opsanus tau.
9	linkage and selection new equilibrium properties of the two locus symmetric viability model	Link and select new properties d' balance two-locus symmetric viability model.
9	analysis of glycerol 3h transport in the frog oocyte by extractive and radioautographic techniques	Analysis of 3-h glycerol transport in frog oocyte, extractive and radioautographic.
9	estimation of radiation resistance values of microorganisms in food products	Estimation of Radiation Resistance Values for Microorganisms in Foodstuffs.
9	distribution of circulation rates within a single tissue type	Circulation rates in a single type of fabric.
9	kinetics of fibrin clot lysis	Kinetics of the lysis of the fibrin clot.
9	rod increment thresholds on steady and flashed backgrounds	Stable, light-flooded stem increments.
9	impulse functions for human rod vision	This is the first time that a person has been able to see a human being.
9	the variations in visual threshold measurement	It's called the visual threshold, the visual threshold, the visual threshold.
9	quantum efficiency and false positive rate	Quantum efficiency, false-positive rate.
9	an analytical model of the counter current heat exchange phenomena	Analytical model of d&apos phenomena; heat exchange of against current @-@.
9	the dissipation and dispersion of small waves in arteries and veins with viscoelastic wall properties	The dissipation and scattering of small waves in arteries and veins, which have viscoelastic wall properties.
9	computed action potentials for purkinje fiber membranes with resistance and capacitance in series	In addition, it can be used as a means of reducing the resistance of the membrane.
9	failure of the nernst einstein equation to correlate electrical resistances and rates of ionic self exchange across certain fixed charge membranes	It can also be used as an indicator of the ability of the electrochemical system to react with electrical resistors; it can also be used as an indicator of the capacity of the electrochemical system.
9	frequency dependent capacitance of hydrophobic membranes containing fixed negative charges	Frequency-dependent capacity of fixed negative charge hydrophobic membranes.
9	computation of impulse conduction in myelinated fibers theoretical basis of the velocity diameter relation	Impulse conduction calculation in myelinated fibers, theoretical basis for the-diameter velocity relationship.
9	predicted delays in the activation of the contractile system	Contractile system activation delays were predicted.
9	wave propagation through a viscous fluid contained in a tethered initially stresses orthotropic elastic tube	The propagation of waves through a viscous fluid contained in an elastic tube initially retained by a webbing system imposes an orthotropic stress on the elastic tube.
9	spectral studies of iron coordination in hemeprotein complexes difference spectroscopy below 250 millimicrons	Iron coordination spectral studies in the differential spectroscopy of hemeprotein complexes at-below 250 millimicrons.
9	wave propagation through a newtonian fluid contained within a thick walled viscoelastic tube	The propagation of waves through a Newtonian fluid in a thick-walled, viscoelastic tube.
9	estimating the median generation time of proliferating cell systems in steady state	Estimation of the median generation time of the proliferating cell systems at the site; state of repair; and equilibrium.
9	nonsteady state three compartment tracer kinetics i theory	Kinetics of a three-compartment tracers in an unstable state i.
9	the extracellular potential field of the single active nerve fiber in a volume conductor	Extracellular potential field of single active nerve fiber in volume conductor.
9	energetics of active transport processes	L' Energetics of Active Transport Processes.
9	comparison of caplan s irreversible thermodynamic theory of muscle contraction with chemical data	Compare irreversible thermodynamic muscle contraction theory with chemical data.
9	the electrical characteristics of fixed charge membranes solution of the field equations	Electrical characteristics of fixed-head membrane solution of field equations.
9	electroosmosis in membranes effects of unstirred layers and transport numbers i theory	Electroosmosis in membranes effects of the stationary layers and numbers of transport i theory.
9	capacitance of the surface and transverse tubular membrane of frog sartorius muscle fibers	Frog sartorius muscle fiber transverse tubular membrane and surface capacity.
9	ammonium ion currents in the squid giant axon	The ionic currents of apos, ammonium in the apos, and the giant squid axon.
9	interpretation of tracer data significance of the number of terms in specific activity functions	Meaning of number of terms in the d&apos functions; specific activity.
9	transport phenomena in zonal centrifuge rotors i velocity and shear stress distributions of fluid during acceleration	Zonal centrifuge rotor transport phenomena i velocity and fluid shear stress distributions during acceleration.
9	the influence of muscle length on the development of fatigue in toad sartorus	L' muscle length influences fatigue development in sartorus toads.
9	the active transport of 5 hydroxyindol 3 ylacetic acid and 3 methoxy 4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid from a recirculatory perfusion system of the cerebral ventricles of the unanaesthetized dog	Active transport of 5 hydroxyindol-3 yelastic acid and 3 methoxy-4 hydroxyphenylacetic acid from unanaesthetized dog's cerebral ventricular recirculatory infusion system.
9	responses to single photons in virual cells of limulus	Single-photon responses in virulent limulus cells.
9	a mathematical analysis of concomitant virus replication and heat inactivation	Simultaneous replication of the virus and the apos; heat inactivation.
9	oxygen consumption in normally grown small for dates and large for dates new born infants	For example, it is not possible to estimate the number of newborns who have been diagnosed with the disease.
9	oscillations in controlled biochemical systems	Oscillations in biochemical systems.
9	division patterns from single escherichia coli cells	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of cells.
9	the kinetics of mechanical activation in frog muscle	Cell kinetics; frog muscle activation; mechanical activation.
9	translational and rotational diffusion constants of tobacco mosaic virus from rayleigh linewidths	The rotational and translational diffusion constants of the tobacco mosaic virus from the widths of rayleigh lines.
9	the analysis of fluorescence decay by a method of moments	L' fluorescence decay analysis by moment method moment method.
9	interpretation of tracer data	Interpretation of tracers data.
9	note on the stability problem for mammillary matrices	Note on the problem of stability stability of stability for matrices; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons; civil status of persons.
9	electrical sizing of particles in suspensions i theory	Electrical Dimensions of Suspended Particles i.
9	correlations between virulence and other characters of clostridium perfringens type a	Virulence correlations with other clostridium perfringens type a.
9	temperature dependence of oscillation in squid axons comparison of experiments with computations	Squid axon oscillation as a function of experimental temperature with calculations.
9	a model for ultraviolet and photoreactivating light effects in euglena	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
9	distributed representations for actin myosin interaction in the oscillatory contraction of muscle	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack and stroke, as well as an increased risk of heart attack.
9	conjugation in escherichia coli k 12 and its modification by irradiation	Conjugation and modification of escherichia coli k12 by irradiation.
9	the general theory of mapping functions for random genetic recombination	The General Theory of Mapping Functions for Random Genetic Recombination.
9	determinants of pulmonary blood volume	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
9	inhibition by iodine of the release of thyroxine from the thyroid glands of patients with thyrotoxicosis	In addition, there is an increased risk of thyroid cancer in patients with thyrotoxicosis.
9	dark current and photocurrent in retinal rods	Dark photocurrent in the retinal rods.
9	ultraviolet inactivation dichroic ratio of oriented fd bacteriophage	Dichroic ratio d' inactivation of the fd-oriented bacteriophage by ultraviolet light.
9	study of biological pigments by single specimen derivative spectrophotometry	Biological pigment spectrophotometry on a single derived specimen.
9	concentration dependence of permeability coefficient to an electrolyte component across bovine lens capsule in vitro	Concentration-dependent on electrolyte permeability coefficient across bovine lentil capsule in vitro.
9	calculations of pulsatile flow across bifurcations in distensible tubes	Pulsatile flow through bifurcations in distensitive tubes.
9	studies on the origin of milk fat a further study of bovine serum lipoproteins and an estimation of their contribution to milk fat	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted to determine the contribution of foliar fat to body fat.
9	quantitation of tail lesions in vaccinia infected mice	Quantification of lesions of the tail in vaccinia-infected mice.
9	ionized calcium in normal serum ultrafiltrates and whole blood determined by ion exchange electrodes	Calcium ionized in normal serum ultrafiltrates and total blood as determined by ion exchange (IVE) electrodes.
9	the measure in vivo of regional cerebral oxygen utilization by means of oxyhemoglobin labeled with radioactive oxygen 15	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support decision-making and decision-making.
9	on tuning and amplification by lateral inhibition	Setting and snippets; side-inhibitor amplification.
9	a model for responses to activation by axodendritic synapses	A model for axodendritic synapses activation.
9	a theoretical study of pulmonary capillary gas exchange and venous admixture	A theoretical study of the exchange of gas between the pulmonary capillaries and the venous admixture.
9	passive membrane potentials a generalization of the theory of electrotonus	In addition, the electrotonus electrotonus can be used as an alternative to the electrotonus.
9	rapid histamine assays a method and some theoretical considerations	It is also important to keep in mind that it is not the only way to do this.
9	exchange of carbon dioxide in the pregnant rhesus monkey multicompartmental analysis of carbon dioxide kinetics	L' carbon dioxide exchange in cell walls; multicompartmental analysis of the gravid rhesus monkey's carbon dioxide kinetics.
9	the electrical capacitance of phospholipid membranes	Phospholipid membranes' electrical capacity.
9	flow through a collapsible tube experimental analysis and mathematical model	Flux through a collapsible tube, experimental analysis and a mathematical model.
9	use of 33p as an indicator for 32p pulse labeling of nucleic acids in bacterial cultures	L' use of 33p as an indicator for the labelling of nucleic acids by 32p pulses in bacterial cultures.
9	visibility of aperiodic patterns compared with that of sinusoidal gratings	Comparison of aperiodic and sinusoidal patterns.
9	kinetics of heterogeneous chemical reactions ii	Kinetics of Heterogeneous Chemical Reactions.
9	x ray diffraction of myelin membrane ii determination of the phase angles of the frog sciatic nerve by heavy atom labeling and calculation of the electron density distribution of the membrane	X myelin membrane X-ray diffraction ii phase angles of frog sciatic nerve are determined by labelling heavy atoms and calculating the electron density distribution of the membrane.
9	a phenomenological theory of muscular contraction i rate equations at a given length based on irreversible thermodynamics	A phenomenological theory of muscle contraction and rate equations at a given length, based on irreversible thermodynamics.
9	a phenomenological theory of muscular contraction ii generalized length variations	Phenomenological Muscular Contractor Theory ii.
9	nonlinear electrical effects in lipid bilayer membranes 3 the dissociation field effect	Electrical nonlinear effects in bilayer lipid membranes 3 l' dissociation field effect.
9	demographic correlates of low birth weight	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
9	the measurement of the exchangeable pools of cholesterol in the baboon	Measurement of baboon's exchangeable cholesterol reserves.
9	estimations of bacterial growth rates in natural waters	Estimates of Bacterial Growth Rates in Natural Waters.
9	a model for the long time constant transient voltage response to current in epithelial tissues	A model for the constant long-term voltage transient current response in epithelial tissues.
9	morphological variants of coliphage p1	Coliphage p1 morphological variants.
9	mathematical approaches to the evaluation of the flux of gamma aminobutyrate in brain tissue in vitro	Mathematical approaches to apos; evaluation of in vitro gamma aminobutyrate flux in brain tissue.
9	gluconeogenesis in the kidney cortex flow of malate between compartments	Gluconeogenesis in renal cortical malate flux between compartments.
9	interpretation of sucrose gradient sedimentation pattern of deoxyribonucleic acid fragments resulting from random breaks	Interpretation of the random ruptured deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) sucrose gradient sedimentation pattern.
9	validity of the british system for anticoagulant control using the national reagent	In addition, there are a number of measures to reduce the risk of blood poisoning.
9	standardized annular assay of dual radioisotopes on a well type sodium iodide crystal	Sodium iodide (Sodium iodide) is a well-type sodium iodide that is used in the process.
9	bilateral symmetry in morphogenesis of embryos	Bilateral Symmetry in Embryo Morphogenesis.
9	a model for gallbladder function and cholesterol gallstone formation	Model for the function of the gallbladder and the formation of gallstones on cholesterol.
9	chemical states of bacterial spores heat resistance and its kinetics at intermediate water activity	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
9	aerobic heterotrophic bacterial populations of sewage and activated sludge v analysis of population structure and activity	Aerobic Heterotrophic Bacterial Populations of Wastewater and Activated Sludge v Analysis of Structure and Lapse; Population Activity.
9	stress distribution in the canine left ventricle during diastole and systole	Distribution of Stress in the Canine Left Ventricle during Diastole and Systole.
9	centrifugal sedimentation of virus particles for electron microscopic counting	Centrifugal Sedimentation of Viral Particles for Counting by Electron Microscopy.
9	computer treatment of gas liquid chromatographic data with special reference to fatty acid methyl esters	Gas chromatographic liquid data processing with special reference to methyl esters of fatty acids.
9	quantitative determination of phosphorus in soybean lipids	Quantitative Determination of Phosphorus in Soybean Fats.
9	use of an epidemiological model for estimating the effectiveness of tuberculosis control measures sensitivity of the effectiveness of tuberculosis control measures to the social time preference	The Canadian Tuberculosis Prevention and Control (CTPC) is a multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted effort.
9	q i iia os formula for predicting left atrial pressure in mitral stenosis	Predictors of the pressure of the left atrium in the mitral stenosis.
9	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes ii oscillating phase transition	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support it.
9	selection and polygenic characters	Polygenic Selection and Character.
9	a study of vascular stresses and deformations in relation to variations of the tonus and to their geometrical characteristics	Vascular strains and strains were studied in relation to changes in tone and geometric characteristics.
9	a study of the distribution of the flow in a branched system of vessels in parallel system of vessels	A study of the apo distribution; flow in a vacuum system; vessel branching into a parallel vessel system into a parallel vessel system into a vessel distribution study; flow into a vacuum system; branching.
9	kinetics of initiation of germination of bacillus pumilus spores by hydrostatic pressure	Apos kinetics; initiation of pumilus spore germination by hydrostatic pressure.
9	on the relation between effector concentration and the rate of induced enzyme synthesis	The relationship between effector and induced rate of enzyme synthesis.
9	the potential distribution and the short circuiting factor in the sucrose gap	Potential distribution and short factor-sucrose gap circuit.
9	analysis of the components of ionic flux across a membrane	Analysis of transmembrane ion flux components.
9	kinetic theory model for ion movement through biological membranes i field dependent conductances in the presence of solution symmetry	Kinetic theory model for the ionic motion across biological membranes whose conductances depend on the field in the presence of solution symmetry.
9	pulse frequency modulation in neural systems a random model	Modulation of the pulse frequency in the neural systems... ..a random model.
9	van der waals forces special characteristics in lipid water systems and a general method of calculation based on the lifshitz theory	Van der waals imposes special features into lipid water systems and a general calculation method based on lifshitz theory.
9	solutions to axon equations	Axonal equation solutions.
9	electrical properties of phospholipid vesicles	Phospholipid vesicle electrical properties.
9	the writhing number of a space curve	The number of curves; a curve; space is the number of curves; a curve; space is the number of curves; space is the number of curves.
9	liquid scintillation spectrometer data processing by desk top computer	Liquid Scintillation Spectrometer Data Processing by Desktop Computer.
9	a mathematical study of nerve fiber interaction	A Mathematical Study of Nerve Fibers Interaction.
9	the locomotion of mouse fibroblasts in tissue culture	Mouse fibroblast locomotion in tissue culture.
9	the geometry of peripheral myelin sheaths during their formation and growth in rat sciatic nerves	The geometry of growth and formation of peripheral myelin sheaths in rat sciatic nerves.
9	the use of equilibrium density gradient methods for the preparation and characterization of blood group specific glycoproteins	It is important to note that this method is not intended to be used in isolation, but may be used in combination with other methods.
9	cooperative regulation of cellular proliferation by intercellular diffusion	Intercellular diffusion co-regulation of cell proliferation.
9	a physical model for muscular behavior	Physical Model of Muscular Behaviour.
9	focus formation by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex i theoretical analysis	In addition, there is no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system.
9	focus formation by a murine sarcoma leukemia virus complex ii quantitative aspects of the interaction between radiation leukemia virus and its murine sarcoma virus pseudotype in strain c57bl mouse embryo cells	Formation of a site by a complex of murine sarcoma leukemia viruses ii quantitative aspects of the disease; interaction between radiation leukemia virus and its pseudotype of murine sarcoma virus in the embryonic cells of the c57bl strain of mice.
9	calorific content of certain bacteria and fungi	The amount of moisture that is used to make the product.
9	analysis of the multiseptate potential of bacillus subtilis	Analysis of multisepty Bacillus subtilis.
9	the myofilament lattice studies on isolated fibers i the constancy of the unit cell volume with variation in sarcomere length in a lattice in which the thin to thick myofilament ratio is 6 1	Studies of the isolated fiber myofilaments network i the consistency of unit cell volume with the variation of sarcomere length in a network with a thin to thick myofilaments ratio of 6.1.
9	an exact constant field solution for a simple membrane	An exact constant-field single-membrane solution.
9	membrane potentials and ion permeability in a cation exchange membrane	Membrane potentials and ionic permeability properties in a cation exchange membrane.
9	electrical properties and ultrastructure of mycoplasma membranes	Electrical and ultrastructural properties of the mycoplasmal membranes.
9	the validity of the ussing flux ratio equation in a three dimensionally inhomogeneous membrane	The equation using flux ratio in an inhomogeneous three-dimensional membrane.
9	studies with composite membranes preparation and measurement impedances	Composite Membrane Preparation Studies and Measurement Impedances.
9	studies with composite membranes ii measurement of asymmetric properties	Composite Membrane Studies ii Measures Asymmetric Properties.
9	the role of diffusion in bimolecular solution kinetics	The role of scattering in the kinetics of bimolecular scattering.
9	the role of diffusion in enzyme kinetics	The Role of Diffusion in Enzyme Kinetics.
9	linear electrical properties of the transverse tubules and surface membrane of skeletal muscle fibers	Linear electrical properties of transverse tubules and skeletal muscle surface membrane.
9	division cycle of myxococcus xanthus 3 kinetics of cell growth and protein synthesis	Division Cycle of Myxococcus xanthus 3 Kinetics of Cell Growth and Protein Synthesis.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes 3 the size distribution of peroxisomes and the incorporation of new catalase	Rat liver peroxisome 3 synthesis and turnover, peroxisome size distribution and l&apos incorporation; a new catalase.
9	the dynamic characteristics of color coded s potentials	Dynamic characteristics of encoded potential s potentials.
9	response properties of a sensory hair excised from venus s flytrap	The response properties of Venus; a sensory hair extracted from Venus; a Venus flytrap.
9	cable theory for finite length dendritic cylinders with initial and boundary conditions	Theory of cables for dendritic cylinders of finite length with initial and boundary conditions.
9	functional inactivation and appearance of breaks in rna chains caused by gamma irradiation of escherichia coli ribosomes	Functional inactivation and occurrence of apo rna chain breaks; gamma irradiation of apo ribosomes; escherichia coli.
9	blood flow slip and viscometry	Blood flow and viscometry.
9	numerical solution of steady state electrodiffusion equations for a simple membrane	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
9	fiber interaction in a nerve trunk	Nervous stem fiber interaction.
9	anisotropic absorption of linearly polarized light by cylindrical molecules	Anisotropic linear polarized light absorption by cylindrical molecules.
9	cell growth and division v error analysis of the collins richmond equation	Cellular Growth and Apos Analysis; Divisional Error v of Apos; Collins Richmond Equation.
9	ion microprobe mass analyzer	Ion microprobe mass analyzer, mass analyzer, etc.
9	matching sequences under deletion insertion constraints	It is not possible to compare the results of the tests with the results obtained.
9	kinetic theory model for ion movement through biological membranes 3 steady state electrical properties with solution asymmetry	Model of kinetic theory for the movement of ions across biological membranes 3 electrical properties at the apos; state; equilibrium with asymmetry of solution.
9	the independence principle a reconsideration	Independence is a re-examination.
9	depression kinetics of ornithine transcarbamylase in escherichia coli	Kinetics of transcarbamylase ornithine depression in escherichia coli.
9	macromolecular sieving by the dormant spore of bacillus cereus	Macromolecular smearing by the cereus dormant spore.
9	action of ionizing radiation on sensitive strains of escherichia coli b	The effect of ionizing radiation on the sensitive strains of d' escherichia coli b.
9	direct determination of the structure of barium stearate multilayers by x ray diffraction	Direct structure determination of barium stearate multiple layers by X-ray diffraction.
9	the location of photopigment molecules in the cross section of frog retinal receptor disk membranes	L' location of photopigment molecules in frog's retinal receptor membrane cross section.
9	net electric charge on photopigment molecules and frog retinal receptor disk membrane structure	Net electrical charge on the photopigment molecules and the structure of the disc membrane of the frog retinal receptor.
9	gas liquid chromatographic assay of lipid bound sialic acids measurement of gangliosides in brain of several species	Lipid-bound sialic acid gas chromatography measures gangliosides in the brains of several species.
9	determination of the optimal priming dose for achieving an isotopic steady state in a two pool system application to the study of cholesterol metabolism	Dose determination; optimal initialization to reach baseline; two-pool isotope balance for apo; cholesterol metabolism study.
9	phonoangiography a new noninvasive diagnostic method for studying arterial disease	Phonoangiography is a novel non-invasive diagnostic method for the study of diseases of the arteries.
9	thermal resistance of certain oncogenic viruses suspended in milk and milk products	Heat Resistance of Certain Oncogenic Viruses Suspended in Milk and Dairy Products.
9	herpes vimplex virus genome size and redundancy studied by renaturation kinetics	Renaturation kinetics were used to study the size and redundancy of the herpes virus vimplex genome.
9	divalent ions and the surface potential of charged phospholipid membranes	The surface potential and divalent ions of charged phospholipid membranes.
9	studies on the regulation of plasma cholesterol levels in squirrel monkeys of two genotypes	Plasma cholesterol regulation studies in squirrel monkeys of two genotypes.
9	cascade chromatography and automated multidimensional fractionation	Cascading and automatic multi-dimensional fractionation.
9	sterological measurements of cardiac ultrastructures implicated in excitation contraction coupling	Steric cardiac ultrastructural measurements involved in contractions coupling; excitation.
9	renal gluconeogenesis in eviscerated diabetic rats	A comparison of the results of this study with those of other studies.
9	staphylococcal enterotoxin b solid phase radioimmunoassay	Staphylococcal b-Enterotoxin, solid-phase radioimmunoassay.
9	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes iv one site two site and multisite models	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is important to note that this is not the case.
9	dielectrophoresis of cells	Cells dielectrophoresis.
9	rotational diffusion of rhodopsin digitonin micelles studied by transient photodichroism	Rotational diffusion of digitonin rhodopsin micelles under transient photodichroism.
9	biological ion exchanger resins i quantitative electrostatic correspondence of fixed charge and mobile counter ion	Exchange Resins; Biological Ions Quantitative Electrostatic Fixed and Mobile Electrostatic Correspondence.
9	biological ion exchanger resins 3 molecular interpretation of cellular ion exchange	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
9	spectral analysis of laser light scattered from motile microorganisms	Spectral analysis of the scattered light of the laser by moving microorganisms.
9	physicochemical and light scattering studies on ribosome particles	Physico-chemical and ribosomal particle scattering studies.
9	reliability of computation in the cerebellum	Cerebellum calculus reliability.
9	white noise analysis of a neuron chain an application of the wiener theory	Analyse du bruit blanc d'apos; un chaîne neuronal, application de la théorie de la sausage.
9	a mathematical model of the controlled plant of the respiratory system	A mathematical model of the controlled plant of the plant of the apos; plant of the organism; respiratory apparatus of the organism; respiratory apparatus.
9	a mathematical model of the human menstrual cycle	Menstrual model of human menstruation.
9	a stochastic model for discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor	A stochastic model for the discrete waves in the photoreceptor limulus.
9	water permeability of isolated muscle fibers of a marine crab	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the survival of crab.
9	mechanism of the enhancement of the bohr effect in mammalian hemoglobins by diphosphoglycerate	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
9	three dimensional reconstruction from radiographs and electron micrographs application of convolutions instead of fourier transforms	Three-dimensional reconstruction using X-rays and electron micrographs; convolutions instead of Fourier is transforming.
9	quantitation of serum lipoproteins by electrophoresis on agarose gel standardization in lipoprotein concentration units mg 100 ml by comparison with analytical ultracentrifugation	Serum lipoprotein quantitation by standard gel electrophoresis; agarose in units of lipoprotein concentration 100 mL by comparison with the analytical ultracentrifuge.
9	early increase in left ventricular compliance after myocardial infarction	Early augmentation of left ventricular compliance following myocardial infarction.
9	the binomial nature of transmitter release at the crayfish neuromuscular junction	The binomial nature of the release of the transmitters at the neuromuscular junction of the apos; crayfish.
9	quantitation of transplacental haemorrhage	Transplacental hemorrhage.
9	addition of chemical and osmotic free energies through negative interaction of protein bound ligands	Addition of d' free chemical and osmotic energies via apos; a negative interaction of protein-bound ligands.
9	the state of water in muscle tissue as determined by proton nuclear magnetic resonance	L' state of l' water in the muscle tissue as determined by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy.
9	theoretical and experimental studies of energy exchange from jackrabbit ears and cylindrically shaped appendages	Experimental and theoretical study of the apos; exchange of ideas; energy from the apos; hare and dapos ears; cylindrical appendages.
9	effects of viscosty and constraints on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels i theoretical analysis	Effects of Viscosity and Constraints on Wave Dispersal and Dissolution in Large Blood Vessels i theoretical analysis.
9	effects of viscosity and constraints on the dispersion and dissipation of waves in large blood vessels ii comparison of analysis with experiments	Effects of Viscosity and Constraints on Wave Dispersal and Dissolution in Large Blood Vessels ii Comparison with Experiments.
9	the dipole model and phase transitions in biological membranes	Dipole Model and Phase Transitions in Biological Membranes.
9	the measurement of glomerular filtration pressure from sieving data for macromolecules	Glomerular filtration pressure measurement from macromolecule screening data.
9	calculation of electron slowing down spectra i hard sphere cross sections	Calculation of hard-sphere cross sections to slow electronic spectra.
9	calculation of electron slowing down spectra ii classical cross sections	The calculation of the d'electron retardant spectra is carried out in the classical d'electron retardant cross sections.
9	thresholds for lenticular damage in the rabbit eye due to single exposure to cw microwave radiation an analysis of the experimental information at a frequency of 2 45 ghz	Thresholds for Lenticular Damage in the Rabbit's Eye due to Single Exposure to Micro-@wave and L&apos radiation; Analysis of Experimental Data at a Frequency of 245 ghz.
9	the behavior of 137cs and other fallout radionuclides on a michigan dairy farm	In addition to the above, there are a number of other radionuclides that have been found to be toxic to humans.
9	asymmetries generated by diffusion and reaction and their bearing on active transport through membranes	Diffusion- and reaction-generated asymmetries and their effect on active transport across membranes.
9	construction of a three dimensional model of the polypeptide backbone of the variable region of kappa immunoglobulin light chains	Construction of a three-dimensional polypeptide skeleton model of the variable light chain region of the apos; immunoglobulin kappa.
9	microscopic fat cell size measurements on frozen cut adipose tissue in comparison with automatic determinations of osmium fixed fat cells	Microscopic measurement of the size of fat cells on frozen cut adipose compared to automatic determination of adipose cells attached to osmium.
9	mass transfer from gas bubbles to impinging flow of biological fluids with chemical reaction	In the case of a chemical reaction, the mass of the gas bubbles is transferred to the mass of the fluid.
9	the rotating fourier s ring an alternative model for cell kinetic studies	The Fourier rotating ring is an alternative molecular model for cellular kinetics.
9	computer simulation of after inhibition in crayfish slowly adapting stretch receptor neuron	Computer simulation of post-inhibition in fish; crayfish, by slowly adapting the fish's receptor neuron; stretch.
9	model simulation of blood flow and oxygen uptake during exercise	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
9	computer simulation of radial immunodiffusion i selection of an algorithm for the diffusion process	In addition, there are a number of other tools that can be used to assist you in making informed decisions about your program.
9	voltage clamp of cardiac muscle a theoretical analysis of early currents in the single sucrose gap	Cardiac muscle tension clamp, theoretical analysis of the first currents in the apos; unique space of sucrose.
9	spatial distribution of potential in a flat cell application to the catfish horizontal cell layers	Spatial Distribution of Potential in Flat Cell Application on Horizontal Cell Layers of Fish-chat.
9	influence of electrolytes on the thicknesses of the phospholipid bilayers of lamellar lecithin mesophases	L' electrolyte influence on apos; thickness of lecithin lamellar mesophase phospholipid bilayers.
9	locomotion of spirilla	Spiral locomotion.
9	growth dynamics of mitochondria in synchronized chinese hamster cells	Mitochondrial growth dynamics in Chinese hamster synchronized cells.
9	breakage of parental dna strands in haemophilus influenzae by 313 nm radiation after replication in the presence of 5 bromodeoxyuridine	Replication of 313 nm radiation with 5 bromodeoxyuridine to break the strands of parental DNA in apos; haemophilus influenzae.
9	mechanical properties of the sarcolemma and myoplasm in frog muscle as a function of sarcomere length	Mechanical properties of sarcolemma and frog muscle myoplasm as a function of length of sarcomere.
9	neurological abnormalities in the cri du chat syndrome	Cray-cray neurological abnormalities.
9	a mathematical method for analysing questionnaires	A Dapos method; Dapos analysis; Dapos analysis; End-to-end analysis; Other from Europe.
9	theoretical aspects of orbital steering	Orbital direction theory.
9	free energy calculations of the interactions of helical poly l proline with water	D&apos calculations; free energy for polyl-helical proline–water interactions.
9	the stability theory of nonpolynomial kinetics	Nonpolynomial kinetics stability theory.
9	lateral diffusion of phospholipids in a vesicle membrane	Lateral phospholipid diffusion in a vesicular membrane.
9	gene order of the poliovirus capsid proteins	Poliovirus capsid protein gene order.
9	voltage clamp experiments of single muscle fibers of rana pipiens	Potential imposed on simple rana pipiens muscle fibers.
9	light adaptation of discrete waves in the limulus photoreceptor	Adaptation to discrete light waves in limulus photoreceptor.
9	voltage dependent conductance induced in thin lipid membranes by monazomycin	The tension-dependent conductance of monazomycin-induced contractions of thin lipid membranes.
9	phosphate starvation and the nonlinear dynamics of insect fibrillar flight muscle	Phosphate deprivation and nonlinear dynamics of flight muscle of insects.
9	fluorescence spectroscopy of an oriented model membrane	The results of this study are summarized below.
9	magnetic anisotropy and the orientation of retinal rods in a homogeneous magnetic field	Magnetic anisotropy and retinal stem orientation in homogeneous magnetic field.
9	ring orientation in ionone and retinals	It's called the Ring in the Eye; it's called the Ring in the Eye.
9	energetics of isometric and isotonic twitches in toad sartorius	Isometric and isotonic shock energy in sartorius toads.
9	an energetic model of muscle contraction	Muscular contractile energy pattern.
9	oxygen permeability of the limiting layers of the cornea	Apos permeability; corneal boundary layer oxygen.
9	enzyme kinetics systematic generation of valid king altman patterns	Enzyme kinetics consistently generates valid altman King patterns.
9	red blood cell damage by shear stress	Damage to the red blood cells due to shear-strain damage.
9	cross sectional shape of collapsible tubes	Cut collapsible tubes.
9	the frequency response coherence and information capacity of two neuronal models	Frequency response consistency and capability of two neural models.
9	origin of hepatic triglyceride fatty acids quantitative estimation of the relative contributions of linoleic acid by diet and adipose tissue in normal and ethanol fed rats	Origins of Hepatic Triglyceride Fatty Acids Quantitative estimate of relative contributions of apo; linoleic acid by diet and fat in normal and apo-treated rats; ethanol.
9	determination of unidirectional uptake rates for lipids across the intestinal brush border	Determination of unidirectional apo rates; lipid absorption across intestinal brush border.
9	nonequilibrium steady state differences in partial pressure of co 2 and in concentration of weak acids and bases between blood and tissue	Partial pressure differential and low base acid concentrations between blood and tissue at baseline; state of repair; unbalanced balance.
9	oxygen equilibrium characteristics of abnormal hemoglobins hirose alpha 2 beta 2 37ser l ferrara alpha 2 47 gly beta 2 broussais alpha 2 90 asn beta 2 and dhofar alpha 2 beta 2 58arg	D&apos characteristics; alpha 2 beta abnormal hemoglobin oxygen; alpha 2 beta 2 ferrara 2 47 gly beta 2 alpha 290 beta 2 and dhofar alpha 2 beta 2 58arg.
9	the use of lithium in the treatment of thyrotoxicosis	L' lithium use in thyrotoxicosis treatment.
9	correction for mechanical dead space in the calculation of physiological dead space	Correction for mechanical death in computation of the physiological death space.
9	the effect of membrane parameters on the properties of the nerve impulse	It is also important to note that there are many different types of neurons in the body.
9	dipole theory of heat production and absorption in nerve axon	Theoretically, it can be used as a means of reducing the risk of injury to the nervous system.
9	modeling the carotid sinus baroreceptor	It's a model of the baroreceptor of the carotid sinus.
9	on the electrostatic interaction across a salt solution between two bodies bearing unequal charges	On the apos; electrostatic interaction through a saline solution between two bodies, carrying unequal charges.
9	myelin membrane structure as revealed by x ray diffraction	X-ray revealed myelin membrane structure.
9	a study of heavy light atom discrimination in bright field electron microscopy using the computer	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
9	muscle energetics and the fenn effect	It's a good way to get a feel for your body.
9	studies with composite membranes 3 measurement of water permeability	Composite Membrane Studies 3 measurements of permeability to water.
9	computer simulation of flagellar movement i demonstration of stable bend propagation and bend initiation by the sliding filament model	Computer simulation of flagellar motion demonstrates stable propagation of curvature and elliptical; sliding-filament model initiation of curvature.
9	the transient response and impedance locus of a mobile site membrane	In addition, it is important to note that there are no data available on the incidence of the disease in Canada.
9	number of deoxyribonucleic acid uptake sites in competent cells of bacillus subtilis	Number of d&apos sites; absorption of l' deoxyribonucleic acid in competent bacillus subtilis cells.
9	taxonomy of aerobic marine eubacteria	Aerobic Marine Eubacteria Taxonomy.
9	hydrostatic pressure and ionic strength effects on the kinetics of lysozyme	Effects of ionic strength and hydrostatic pressure on lysozyme kinetics.
9	h 2 co 3 as substrate for carbonic anhydrase in the dehydration of hco 3	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
9	tautomerism of uracil and thymine in aqueous solution spectroscopic evidence	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
9	individual states in the cycle of muscle contraction	Individual states within the muscle contraction cycle.
9	z average sedimentation coefficient in reversibly self aggregating systems	Z Average coefficient of sedimentation in systems with auto @-@aggregation.
9	ribonucleic acid synthesis in cells infected with herpes simplex virus controls of transcription and of rna abundance	The synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid in herpes simplex virus infected cells controls transcription and l' abundance of the rna.
9	the interaction of histone iv with nucleoside triphosphates	L' l&apos interaction; and histone iv with triphosphate nucleosides.
9	circadian surfaces and the diversity of possible roles of circadian organization in photoperiodic induction	It is important to note that there is a wide range of possible roles for the circadian organization in the photoperiodic induction.
9	self association of gene 32 protein of bacteriophage t4	Bacteriophage t4 protein gene 32 association-auto.
9	estimating the number of organisms in quantal assays	Estimation of organisms in quantum tests.
9	validity of computer interpretation of the electrocardiogram	It's a good way to get the information you need.
9	running up and down hills some consequences of size	Run up and down the hills, some of the consequences of the size.
9	direct measurement of osteolysis in man	Direct measurement of the apos; osteolysis in men.
9	the interpretation of current voltage relations recorded from a spherical cell with a single microelectrode	L' interpretation of current voltage relationships recorded from d' a single microelectrode spherical cell.
9	membrane permeability generalization of the reflection coefficient method of describing volume and solute flows	Generalization of the membrane permeability of the coefficient of reflection method to describe solute and bulk flow.
9	analysis of the torus surrounding planar lipid bilayer membranes	Torus analysis surrounding planar bilayer lipid membranes.
9	the graphical determination of k m and k i	The graphical determination of both km and ki i.
9	the control by ventilation of airborne bacterial transfer between hospital patients and its assessment by means of a particle tracer ii ventilation in subdivided isolation units	Ventilation monitoring of bacterial transfer into the air between hospitalized patients and its evaluation using a particulate tracers; ventilation into sub-divided units; isolation.
9	physical properties and subunit structure of l asparaginase isolated from erwinia carotovora	Physical properties and structure of the sub-units of l' isolated asparaginase l from l' erwinia carotovora.
9	sex chromosome translocations in the evolution of reproductive isolation	Translocation of sex chromosomes in apo evolution; reproductive isolation.
9	valinomycin crystal structure determination by direct methods	Determination of the crystal structure of valinomycin.
9	dynamics of number fluctuations motile microorganisms	Dynamics of micro-number fluctuations-mobile organizations.
9	the statistical nature of the acetycholine potential and its molecular components	Statistical nature of the potential of d' acetycholine and its molecular components.
9	a structure activity study of sympathomimetic amines on the beta adrenoreceptors of guinea pig trachea	A study of sympathomimetic amines structural activity on guinea-pig tracheal beta-adrenoceptors.
9	a quantitative study of the anticholinergic action of several tricyclic antidepressants on the rat isolated fundal strip	Quantitative study of the anticholinergic action of several tricyclic antidepressants on the isolated band.
9	amphetamine and conditioned anxiety	Amphetamine and... conditioned anxiety.
9	kinetic studies of nitrogenase from soya bean root nodule bacteroids	Nitrogenase kinetics studies of nodular bacteroids of soybean roots.
9	the effect of substitution at c 2 of d glucose 6 phosphate on the rate of dehydrogenation by glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from yeast and from rat liver	L' effect of glucose c2 substitution 6 phosphate on the rate of glucose dehydrogenation 6 yeast and rat liver phosphate dehydrogenase.
9	the significance of abrupt transitions in lineweaver burk plots with particular reference to glutamate dehydrogenase negative and positive co operativity in catalytic rate constants	L' importance of sudden transitions in linear weaver burk curves, particularly negative and positive cooperativity of glutamate dehydrogenase in catalytic rate constants.
9	inhibition by gamma hydroxybutyrate of chlorpromazine induced increase in homovanillic acid	Chlorpromazine gamma hydroxybutyrate inhibition induced an increase in the amount of l' homovanillic acid.
9	characteristics of the antitrypsin activity of human serum	It can be used as an anti-trypsin agent.
9	a kinetic study of rabbit muscle pyruvate kinase	Rabbit muscle pyruvate kinase kinetics.
9	automatic screening of biological specimens by optical correlation	Automatic biological specimen screening by optical correlation.
9	expression of fetal antigens in tumor cells	Fetal antigen expression in tumour cells.
9	an engineering study of the peristaltic drive of axonal flow	A technical study of apo; apo peristaltic training; axonal flow.
9	phenylalanyl trna synthetase and isoleucyl trna phe a possible verification mechanism for aminoacyl trna	Phenylalanyl trna synthetase and l' isoleucyl trna phe are possible mechanisms for the verification of apos; aminoacyl trna.
9	protein changes in different brain areas as a function of intermittent training	Protein changes in different regions of the brain as a function of the amount of time; intermittent training.
9	the anisotropic elastic properties of the sarcolemma of the frog semitendinosus muscle fiber	Sarcolemma anisotropic elastic properties of frog semitendinosus muscle fibers.
9	one dimensional harmonic model for biomolecules	Biomolecular one-dimensional harmonic model.
9	passive electrical properties of microorganisms v low frequency dielectric dispersion of bacteria	Passive electrical properties of low-frequency dielectric microorganisms.
9	a model for the genetics of handedness	Adadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadadad
9	on treating the chromosome as the unit of selection	Treat the chromosome as unit of the apos; unit of selection of the apos; unit of treatment.
9	methods of determining rate constants in single substrate single product enzyme reactions use of induced transport limitations of product inhibition	Rate constant determination methods for single-substrate enzyme reactions utilize induced limitations of l&apos transport; product inhibition.
9	the radiofrequency field distribution surrounding coils for intrauterine diagnostic procedures i geometrical factors	Radiofrequency field distribution around coils for diagnostic intra-uterine i geometric factors.
9	simplified method in polynucleotide helix coil transition theory including binding of complementary monomer	Simplified method in the transition theory of the helical polynucleotide coil including the bonding of the complementary monomer.
9	dynamics of fluorescence polarization in macromolecules	Dynamics of macromolecule fluorescence polarization.
9	analysis of a calcium ion binding system composed of two different sites	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the calcium ion is present.
9	reply to myelin membrane structure as revealed by x ray diffraction by david harker	David Harker's X-ray diffraction revealed the membrane structure of myelin.
9	dissipative structures for an allosteric model application to glycolytic oscillations	Disperspative structures for a glycolytic oscillation allosteric model.
9	the nature of electrosensing in the fish	Electrosensing in fish.
9	virial expansions for ideal self associating systems	Viral expansion for-ideal associative auto systems.
9	force balances in systems of cylindrical polyelectrolytes	Cylindrical polyelectrolyte system force balances.
9	a model of peritubular capillary control of isotonic fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule	Peritubular capillary control model of renal proximal tubular reabsorption of isotonic fluid.
9	van der waals forces between cylinders i nonretarded forces between thin isotropic rods and finite size corrections	Van der waals strengths between cylinders i undelayed forces between thin isotropic and finite dimensional corrections.
9	van der waals forces between cylinders ii retarded interaction between thin isotropic rods	Van der waals inter-cylinder forces also retard the apos; interaction between thin isotropic rods.
9	ionic partition between surface and bulk water in a silica gel a biological model	It is the most common type of water used in silica geling.
9	on two sex models leading to stable populations	It's about two different models of the sex that lead to a stable population.
9	quantitative studies of the delivery of hepatic synthesized bilirubin to plasma utilizing aminolevulinic acid 4 14 c and bilirubin 3 h in man	Quantitative dosage studies; plasma synthesized bilirubin administration in the liver using apos; 4 c aminolevulinic acid and 3 h bilirubin in the apos; man.
9	ultrafiltration of lipoproteins through a synthetic membrane implications for the filtration theory of atherogenesis	Lipoprotein ultrafiltration across a synthetic membrane implications for apo filtration theory; atherogenesis.
9	facilitated diffusion of monosaccharides in saccharomyces cerevisiae experimental investigation of kinetic parameters without the assumptions of symmetry	Facilitate monosaccharide diffusion in apos; experimental study of kinetic parameters in saccharomyces cerevisiae without symmetry.
9	a new newton s law of cooling	Newtonian cooling law.
9	assessment of acid base disturbances employing a desk top computer	The results of this study are summarized below.
9	three pool model of the long term turnover of plasma cholesterol in man	Three-basin plasma cholesterol long-term turnover model in men.
9	improved estimation of body masses and turnover of cholesterol by computerized input output analysis	In addition to the above, there are a number of measures that can be used to estimate cholesterol levels.
9	kinetics of small ising systems deviations from internal equilibrium in a tetrahedral model	In a tetrahedral model, the kinetics of the small systems of d' ising s' deviates from the bounds; internal equilibrium.
9	a new method for analyzing electron microscope autoradiographs using hypothetical grain distributions	A novel apo method; autoradiography analysis by electron microscopy using hypothetical grain distributions.
9	nonlinear spectroscopy	Nonlinear spectroscopy.
9	nomograms for calculation of heat loss	From a qualitative point of view, it does not exist; it does not exist; it does not exist; it is another means of achieving satisfactory results.
9	oxygen consumption by the component layers of the cornea	Absorption of oxygen from corneal layers.
9	pancreatic acinar cells measurement of membrane potential and miniature depolarization potentials	Pancreatic acinar cells measure miniature membrane potential and depolarization potentials.
9	a numerical inversion of the perrin equations for rotational diffusion constants for ellipsoids of revolution by iterative techniques	Perrin equations are digitally inverted for rotational diffusion constants of revolution ellipsoids using iterative techniques.
9	the need for a kinetics for biological transport	The need for kinetics for the biological transport.
9	intracellular biopotentials during static extracellular stimulation	Intracellular biopotentials during static, extracellular stimulation.
9	an automated microbiological method for the measurement of vitamin b12	Automated Microbiological Measurement Method for Vitamin B12.
9	the avian egg and the retina	Birds and retinas.
9	the thermodynamic description of enzyme catalyzed reactions the linear relation between the reaction rate and the affinity	Thermodynamic description of enzyme-catalyzed reactions, the linear relationship between rate of reaction and affinity.
9	concentrating engines and the kidney i central core model of the renal medulla	Renal medulla concentration drivers and model of central nucleus i.
9	concentrating engines and the kidney ii multisolute central core systems	Renal System and Concentration Motors ii Central Multi-Luteal Core System.
9	a continuum mechanical approach to the flow equations for membrane transport i water flow	A continuous mechanical approach to the equations d' flow for transport by membrane and flow d' water.
9	finite difference solution for biopotentials of axially symmetric cells	Finite Difference Solution for Axially Symmetrical Cell Biotentials.
9	integral equation solution for biopotentials of single cells	D&apos solution; integral single cell bio-potential equation.
9	dischroism of the infrared spectrum of nerve	Dischroism of nerve infrared spectrum.
9	traveling wave solutions of a nerve conduction equation	In addition, it can be used as a tool to assess the impact of climate change on human health.
9	deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid hybridization of r factors	Deoxyribonucleic acid Deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid.
9	the double fixed charge membrane low frequency dielectric dispersion	Fixed-head, double-membrane, low-frequency dielectric dispersion.
9	the double fixed charge membrane solution membrane ion partition effects and membrane potentials	Partition effects of membrane-bound ions and membrane-bound potentials in the membrane-bound fixed charge solution.
9	physical properties of onsager s dipole chain model for ionic transport across membranes i steady state fluxes and instabilities	Physical properties of the onshore polar chain model for ion transport across membranes, fluxes, and instabilities; steady state.
9	studies on the fluorophore sempervirene and its complexes with dna	Studies of sempervirene fluorophore and its DNA complexes.
9	phospholipid flip flop and the distribution of surface charges in excitable membranes	Phospholipid dislocation and excitable membrane surface charge distribution.
9	small angle x ray scattering of the thylakoid membranes of rhodopseudomonas speroides in aqueous suspensions	Rhodopseudomonas speroides thylakoid membrane X-ray scattering in aqueous suspensions is low.
9	note on the theory of x ray diffraction by spherical shell structures	Note on spherical shell structure X-ray diffraction theory.
9	measurement of the size distribution of zymogen granules from rat pancreas	Measurement of rat pancreatic zymogen granule size distribution.
9	improved profiles of electron density distribution along collagen fibrils	Improved collagen fibrillar electron density distribution profiles.
9	studies on the analysis of fluorescence decay data by the method of moments	Mapping studies; moment method analysis of fluorescence decay data.
9	probit transformation improved method for defining synchrony of cell cultures	The transformation of probits has improved the method of defining cell culture synchrony.
9	normalization in the fitting of data by iterative methods application to tracer kinetics and enzyme kinetics	L&apos normalization; data adjustment by iterative methods applied to tracer and enzyme kinetics.
9	branch input resistance and steady attenuation for input to one branch of a dendritic neuron model	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
9	deformation of the diastolic left ventricle nonlinear elastic effects	Deformation of the elastic nonlinear effects of the left ventricle.
9	electrical breakdown of bimolecular lipid membranes as an electromechanical instability	Electromechanical instability is the electrical degradation of bimolecular lipid membranes.
9	radioimmunoassay of rat 1 fetoprotein	Rat fetoprotein 1 radioimmunoassay.
9	physiocochemical properties of low density lipoproteins of normal human plasma evidence for the occurrence of lipoprotein b in associated and free forms	The physiochemical properties of low-density lipoproteins from normal human plasma indicate the presence of b-lipoproteins in their free and associated forms.
9	a study of the properties of two porphyringlobin species formed in the reaction of protoporphyrin ix with human globin	A study of the properties of two species of porphyringlobins formed during the reaction of protoporphyrin ix with the human globin.
9	a study of the properties of hybrids of oxyhaemoglobin and deoxyhaemoglobin with two porphyringlobin species	A study of apos; apos; oxyhemoglobin and deoxyhemoglobin hybrids with two porphyringlobin species.
9	structural features of ring c of 20 oxo steroids and the interaction with cortisone reductase	Structural features of the c-cycle of 20 oxo-steroids and interaction with cortisone reductase.
9	dynamics of glomerular ultrafiltration in the rat iv determination of the ultrafiltration coefficient	The results of this study are summarized in the following table: dynamics of l' glomerular ultrafiltration in determination IV of d' ultrafiltration in rat.
9	stereological analysis of mammalian skeletal muscle i soleus muscle of the adult guinea pig	Mammalian skeletal i soleus muscle stereological analysis of adult guinea pig.
9	the kinetics of intramolecular distribution of 15n in uric acid after administration of 15n glycine a reappraisal of the significance of preferential labeling of n 3 9 of uric acid in primary gout	The kinetics of 15n intramolecular distribution in apos; uric acid after apos; 15n glycine administration was reevaluated with respect to apos; importance of preferential labeling of n.39 of apos; uric acid in the primary drop.
9	linkage disequilibrium in subdivided populations	Subdivided population linkage disequilibrium.
9	steady state enzyme kinetics with high affinity substrates or inhibitors a statistical treatment of dose response curves	The kinetics of enzymes in the apo state; equilibrium with high-affinity substrates or inhibitors; dose–response curves statistical treatment.
9	incidence of anticonvulsant osteomalacia and effect of vitamin d controlled therapeutic trial	Effect of oral contraceptive use; effect of oral contraceptive use; effect of oral contraceptive use; controlled therapeutic use with vitamin d.
9	transcription unit mapping in bacteriophage t7 i in vivo transcription by escherichia coli rna polymerase	In vivo mapping of transcription units in bacteriophage t7 by escherichia coli rna polymerase.
9	numerator analysis of fertility change in costa rica a methodological examination	The results of this analysis are presented in the table below.
9	weighting functions and data truncation in the fitting of multi exponential functions	Weighting and truncation of data; adjustment of multi-exponential functions.
9	electrical response to vibration of a lipid bilayer membrane	Electrical response to d&apos vibration; a lipidic, two-layer membrane.
9	the stiffness of the flagella of impaled bull sperm	Impaled bull semen flagella rigidity.
9	direct structure determination of multilayered membrane type systems which contain fluid layers	Direct determination of the structure of fluid-layer multilayer systems.
9	cysteine activation in cultured cystinotic cells the specific activity of cysteinyl trna synthetase and trnacys and the determination of the michaelis menten constants for cysteinyl trna synthetase	Cysteine activation in cultured cystotic cells, l' cysteinyl trna synthetase and trnacys specific activity and determination of michaelis menten cysteinyl trna synthetase constants.
9	an experimental evaluation of genetic correlation	An experimental genetic correlation assessment.
9	limiting distribution under assortative mating	It's also a good way to get to know each other and to know each other better.
9	gene flow and selection in a cline	Gene flow and cline selection.
9	on the thermodynamics of cell injury some insights into the molecular mechanisms	On cellular lesion thermodynamics, some ideas on molecular mechanisms.
9	light induced changes in photoreceptor membrane resistance and potential in gecko retinas i preparations treated to reduce lateral interactions	Light induced changes in the membrane resistance of photoreceptors and in the potential of treated gecko i retina preparations to reduce photoreceptor lateral interactions.
9	origin of esterified cholesterol transported in the very low density lipoproteins of human plasma	Origin of Esterified Cholesterol Carried in Very Low Density Lipopolysts of Human Plasma.
9	method for comparing concentrations of the open air factor	The free-air exposure factor concentration comparison method is the same as that used for the free-air exposure factor concentration comparison.
9	an approach to the current voltage characteristics of nerve membranes based on adsorption phenomena	An approach to common nerve membrane stress characteristics based on d' adsorption phenomena.
9	electron spinal resonance analysis of the nitroxide spin label 2 2 6 6 tetramethylpipidone n oxyl tempone in single crystals of the reduced tempone matrix	Nitroxide spin label 2, 2, 6, 6 n-oxylated tetramethylpipidone Temperone in reduced tempone matrix single crystals by electron spin resonance analysis.
9	effect of structure on function in model nerve nets	L' effect of structure on function in models of the nervous system.
9	limited binding capacity sites for l triiodothyronine in rat liver nuclei nuclear cytoplasmic interrelation binding constants and cross reactivity with l thyroxine	Rat liver nucleus triiodothyronine l binding sites are limited, as are nuclear cytoplasmic binding constants and cross-reactivity with thyroxine l.
9	optical diffraction studies of muscle fibers	Studies of optical muscle fiber diffraction.
9	electronic conduction in lipid films with metal contacts	Electronic conductivity in metallic contact lipid films.
9	unsteady transport and hydration dynamics in the in vivo cornea	Unstable corneal hydration in vivo.
9	model studies of the magnetocardiogram	Model magnetocardiogram.
9	dilute solution approximation and generalization of the reflection coefficient method of describing volume and solute flows	Approximation of dilute solution and generalization of reflection coefficient method to describe solute and volume flows.
9	restricted transport in small pores a model for steric exclusion and hindered particle motion	In the case of small pores, limited transport of a model for l' steric exclusion and hindered the movement of particles.
9	use of inert gases to study the interaction of blood flow and diffusion during passive absorption from the gastrointestinal tract of the rat	Inert gas is used to study apo; blood flow-diffusion interaction during apo; passive absorption from rat intestinal tract.
9	correlation between leprosy rates in villages different distances apart	Correlation between village leprosy rates and village distances.
9	cross correlation functions for a neuronal model	Neural model cross-correlation functions.
9	letter oral contraceptives and risks of thromboembolism	Oral Letter Contraceptives and the Risk of Thromboembolism.
9	production of plasma esterified cholesterol in lean normotriglyceridemic humans	Esterified plasma cholesterol production in lean, normotriglycerid humans.
9	quantitative analysis of cholesterol in 5 to 20 microliter of plasma	Quantitative cholesterol analysis in 5-20 microlitres plasma.
9	voltage and current clamp transients with membrane dielectric loss	Transient periods of voltage and current clamping with membrane dielectric loss.
9	ventricular and arterial wall stresses based on large deformation analyses	Arterial and ventricular wall stress based on analyses of large deformations.
9	binding of ions to oligopeptides	Oligopeptide ion binding.
9	model hydrophobic ion exchange membrane	In the case of a water-repellent product, it is the same as the water-repellent.
9	inherited biochemical variation in drosophila melanogaster noise or signal i single locus analysis	Genetic variation in the genetic makeup of Drosophila melanogaster noise or in l' single-locus i-signal analysis.
9	isozyme genotype environment associations in natural populations of the harvester ant pogonomyrmex badius	Association of isoenzyme genotypes of l'apos; environment in pogonomyrmex badius ant natural populations.
9	wave length dependencies of light scattering in normal and cold swollen rabbit corneas and their structural implications	The relationship between the length of the wave and the scattering of light in corneas of normal and cold-swollen rabbits and their structural implications.
9	flux of free fatty acids among host tissues ascites fluid and ehrlich ascites carcinoma cells	It is not possible to determine the origin of the tumour, but it is possible to determine the origin of the tumour.
9	measurement of the permeability of biological membranes application to the glomerular wall	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
9	kinetic cell cycle analysis of a cultured mammalian cell population	The study of the kinetics of the cell cycle in a population of cultured mammals.
9	d 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase from rhodopseudomonas spheroides kinetic mechanism from steady state kinetics of the reaction catalysed by the enzyme in solution and covalently attached to diethylaminoethylcellulose	Rhodopseudomonas spheroides D3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase kinetic mechanism from l' kinetic steady state of reaction catalyzed by l' covalently attached enzyme to diethylaminoethylcellulose in solution.
9	d 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase from rhodopseudomonas spheroides kinetics of radioisotope redistribution at chemical equilibrium catalysed by the enzyme in solutions	Rhodopseudomonas spheroides kinetic radioisotope redistribution-isotopes to l&apos D3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase; chemical equilibria catalyzed by apos; enzyme solution.
9	the origin and consequences of concentration dependence in gel chromatography	The results of this study are summarized below.
9	reactions of papain and of low molecular weight thiols with some aromatic disulphides 2 2 dipyridyl disulphide as a convenient active site titrant for papain even in the presence of other thiols	The reactions of papain and thiols of low molecular weight with some aromatic disulfides 2 dipyridyl disulfide as the convenient titrant site for papain, even in the presence of other thiols.
9	the mechanism of action of beta galactosidase effect of aglycone nature and deuterium substitution on the hydrolysis of aryl galactosides	The mechanism of apos; action of apos; effect of deuterium substitution and aglyconic beta galactosidase on apos; hydrolysis of aryl galactosides.
9	a new mathematical model for fitting an hpl radioimmunoassay curve	A new mathematical model to fit a radioimmunoassay in hpl.
9	proteins of the postsynaptic density	Pesynaptic density proteins.
9	evaluation of some thin layer chromatography procedures for the identification and detection of impurities of hormonal steroids	Evaluation of selected thin-layer chromatographic methods for identification and detection of hormone steroid impurities.
9	mass fragmentographic determination of eleven estrogens in the body fluids of pregnant and nonpregnant subjects	Canadian Journal of Public Health 1989; 29(3): 65–79.
9	curves of ligand binding the use of hyperbolic functions for expressing titration curves	Ligand binding curves using hyperbolic functions to express titration.
9	phototaxis in chlamydomonas reinhardtii	Phototaxis in Chlamydomonas.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver of rat liver peroxisomes iv biochemical pathway of catalase synthesis	The synthesis and turnover of rat liver from peroxisomes of rat liver iv is a biochemical route of catalase synthesis.
9	the synthesis and turnover of rat liver peroxisomes v intracellular pathway of catalase synthesis	Rat liver peroxisome synthesis and turnover is an intracellular route of catalase synthesis.
9	the forces generated at the human elbow joint in response to imposed sinusoidal movements of the forearm	Forces generated at the elbow; articulation of the human elbow in response to sinusoidal movements imposed by the ellipse; front @-@arm.
9	nuclear magnetic resonance transverse relaxation times of water protons in skeletal muscle	Transverse relaxation time by proton nuclear magnetic resonance; skeletal muscle water.
9	the use of simple epidemiological models in the evaluation of disease control programmes a case study of trachoma	It is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of trachoma in Canada, but it is important to note that there are no data on incidence of trachoma.
9	changes of action potential shape and velocity for changing core conductor geometry	Changes in speed and shape of d&apos potential; action to change conductor core geometry.
9	enzymic mechanisms involving concomitant transfer and hydrolysis reactions	An enzyme mechanism involving simultaneous reactions of transfer and d' hydrolysis.
9	on the use of contour maps in the analysis of spread of communicable disease	On the map; use of contour cards; use of the contour cards in the map; use of the contour cards in the map; analysis of the causes; analysis of the spread of the communicable disease of the disease of the apos; other side of the map; Atlantic.
9	error rates in cervical cytological screening tests	Cervical cancer is a major cause of death.
9	a method of comparing differences in tumour growth rates applied to a study of the increasing growth capacity of mouse carcinomata	Method for Comparing Differences in Tumour Growth Rates Applied to a Study of the Growing Capacity of Mouse Carcinomas.
9	breast volumes in cancer of the breast	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
9	stability of dna in purkinje cell nuclei of the mouse an autoradiographic study	Mouse purkinje cell nucleus DNA stability; autoradiographic study.
9	a model for the passage of the nurohypophysial hormones and their related proteins through the rat neurohypophysis	A model for the passage of related proteins and nurohypophysial hormones through the rat neurohypophysis.
9	x ray small angle scattering a new deconvolution method for evaluating electron density distributions from small angle scattering diagrams	X small-angle scattering radius a new deconvolution method to evaluate electron density distributions from small-angle scattering diagrams.
9	measurement of the impedance of frog skeletal muscle fibers	Frog skeletal muscle fiber impedance.
9	an ultrasensitive vibrating probe for measuring steady extracellular currents	Ultra-sensitive vibration probe to measure stable extracellular currents.
9	cross age tutoring fifth graders as arithmetic tutors for kindergarten children	Inter-Age course for CM2 students as Arithmetic Tutors for Kindergarten children.
9	selection in complex genetic systems i the symmetric equilibria of the three locus symmetric viability model	Selection in Complex Genetic Systems i l' symmetrical equilibrium of the symmetrical three-locus viability model.
9	interaction between natural selection for heterozygotes and directional selection	Interaction between heterozygous natural selection and directional selection.
9	use of inert gases and carbon monoxide to study the possible influence of countercurrent exchange on passive absorption from the small bowel	Use of carbon monoxide and inert gases to study the apos; possible influence of the apos; exchange against-running on the apos; passive absorption from the apos; small intestine.
9	competitive binding of bilirubin and drugs to human serum albumin studied by enzymatic oxidation	The competitive binding of bilirubin and human serum albumin drugs was studied by enzymic oxidation.
9	the spontaneous release of transmitter from insect nerve terminals as predicted by the negative binomial theorem	In addition, it can be used as a means of communication between humans, animals, and humans.
9	smoking in pregnancy and subsequent child development	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
9	interpretation of serum calcium in patients with abnormal serum proteins	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
9	linear analysis of membrane conductance and capacitance in cardiac purkinje fibres	Linear analysis of cardiac purkinje fiber membrane conductance and capacitance.
9	the direct linear plot a new graphical procedure for estimating enzyme kinetic parameters	Direct linear plotting represents a new graphical procedure to estimate the kinetic parameters of the enzyme.
9	an efficient optimization technique for recovering ventilation perfusion distributions from inert gas data effects of random experimental error	An efficient optimization technique to recover the distribution of ventilation perfusion from the effects of inert gases resulting from random experimental errors.
9	transient response in a dendritic neuron model for current injected at one branch	Transient response in dendritic neural model for branch current.
9	quantitative studies of pinocytosis ii kinetics of protein uptake and digestion by rat yolk sac cultured in vitro	Quantitative Pineocytosis studies ii protein uptake and digestion by in vitro cultured rat yolk sac.
9	mitosis in tilia americana endosperm	I'm sorry, but I'm sorry, but I can't help you.
9	cardiovascular investigations and fuzzy sets theory	You know, the Cardiovascular Surveys and Fuzzy Ensemble Theory.
9	variola minor in bragan a paulista county 1956 lack of evidence indicating the influence of contaminated classrooms on spread of the disease	Minor smallpox in Bragane, County of Paulista, 1956; lack of evidence of disease; influence of contaminated classrooms on disease spread.
9	theory of delayed lateral inhibition in the compound eye of limulus	Lateral inhibition delayed in the eye; compound limulus.
9	theory of photometric errors applied to the design and evaluation of a high performance filter photometer	Photometric Error Theory Applied to Design and Applications; High-performance filter photometer evaluation.
9	statistical evaluation of method comparison data	Direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct Direct
9	the impact of laboratory error on the normal range a bayesian model	L' impact of apos; laboratory error on normal range of apos; a Bayesian model.
9	tobacco smoking and sex ratios in the united states	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada.
9	active site titration and aminoacyl adenylate binding stoichiometry of aminoacyl trna synthetases	N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N.
9	oxygen binding by hemocyanin from levantina hierosolima ii interpretation of cooperativity in terms of ligand ligand linkage	Ligand ligand ligand binding by levantina hemocyanin; and ligand binding by levantina hemocyanine.
9	ligand binding and enzymic catalysis coupled through subunits in tyrosyl trna synthetase	Ligand binding and enzyme catalysis are coupled by sub-@-@units in the tyrosyl trna synthetase.
9	hydrodynamic diameters of rna tumor viruses studies by laser beat frequency light scattering spectroscopy of avian myeloblastosis and rauscher murine leukemia viruses	Study of the hydrodynamic diameters of avian myeloblastosis and murine leukemia viruses rna by laser-beat frequency light-scattering spectroscopy.
9	binding of calcium to phosphatidylcholines as determined by proton magnetic resonance and infrared spectroscopy	Calcium binding to phosphatidylcholines was determined by infrared and nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy.
9	demonstration of two active sites on a monomeric aminoacyl trna synthetase possible roles of negative cooperativity and half of the sites reactivity in oligomeric enzymes	Demonstration of two monomeric aminoacyl trna synthetase active sites for possible roles of negative cooperativity and half of site reactivity in the oligomeric enzymes.
9	relationship between frequency dependence of lung compliance and distribution of ventilation	The relationship between pulmonary condition frequency dependence and ventilation distribution.
9	a simulation study of the efficacy of stepwise discriminant analysis in the detection and comparison of event related potentials	A study of the simulation of the apos; effectiveness of the apos; step-by-step discriminant analysis in detection and comparison of the potentials related to the apos; event.
9	an electronic activity integrator for operant conditioning of patterns of neural and muscular activity	A d&apos integrator; electronic activity for the surgical conditioning of muscular and neural patterns.
9	frequency dependence of the transmission of the eeg from cortex to scalp	Transmission from the cortical to the scalp cavity is a function of frequency.
9	the determination of density and molecular weight distributions of lipoproteins by sedimentation equilibrium	Determination of molecular weight distributions and density of lipoproteins by apos; sedimentation equilibrium.
9	mechanism of inactivation of the flavoenzyme lactate oxidase by oxalate	Flavoenzyme lactate oxidase inactivation by oxalate.
9	subunit interactions in aspartate transcarbamylase the interaction between catalytic and regulatory subunits and the effect of ligands	Subs-units interactions in the aspartate transcarbamylase interaction between sub-regulatory and catalytic units and l&apos ligand effect.
9	interaction of guanosine nucleotides with elongation factor 2 i equilibrium dialysis studies	Guanosine nucleotide interaction with d&apos dialysis studies; d&apos factor balance; elongation 2 i.
9	interaction of guanosine nucleotides with elongation factor 2 ii effect of ribosomes and magnesium ions on guanosine diphosphate and guanosine triphosphate binding to the enzyme	Guanosine nucleotide interaction with d&apos factor; elongation 2 ii ribosome and magnesium ion effect on guanosine diphosphate and guanosine triphosphate binding to l&apos enzyme.
9	the structure of ferrocytochrome b5 at 2 8 a resolution	Ferrocytochrome b5 structure, 28 a resolution.
9	quaternary structure of partially liganded intermediates of sheep carbon monoxide hemoglobin at alkaline ph	Quaternary structure of the partially ligated alkaline phalange sheeps carbon monoxide hemoglobin intermediates.
9	role of metal ions in escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase a study of the metal water interaction by nuclear relaxation rate measurements on water protons	Metal ions' role in alkaline phosphatase of escherichia coli; study of apos; metal interaction with apos; water by measurements of nuclear relaxation rate on apos protons; water.
9	the interaction of inhibitors of proteolytic enzymes with 3 methylhistidine 57 chymotrypsin	In addition, there are a number of other drugs that can be used to reduce the risk of cancer.
9	the effect of functional differences in the alpha and beta chains on the cooperativity of the osidation reduction reaction of hemoglobin	L' effect of alpha- and beta-chain functional differences on the cooperativity of the reduction reaction of l' osidation of l' hemoglobin.
9	the molecular dissociation of ferrihemoglobin derivatives	Ferrihemoglobin derivatives molecular dissociation.
9	the effect of potassium chloride on the bohr effect of human hemoglobin	Effect of Potassium Chloride on Apos; Bohr Effect of Apos; Human Hemoglobin.
9	radiolabeling of proteins and viruses in vitro by acetylation with radioactive acetic anhydride	In vitro radiolabeling of proteins and viruses by acetylation with the radioactive acetic anhydride.
9	cross linking of the components of lactose synthetase with dimethylpimelimidate	Lactose synthetase components cross-linked to dimethylpimelimidate.
9	affinity partitioning a method for purification of proteins using specific polymer ligands in aqueous polymer two phase systems	Sharing of proteins; affinity of proteins; purification of proteins; aid of specific polymeric ligands in polymeric aqueous systems in two phases.
9	the covalent and three dimensional structure of concanavalin a iii structure of the monomer and its interactions with metals and saccharides	The covalent, three-dimensional structure of concanavalin a iii monomer structure and metal and saccharide interactions.
9	threonine deaminase from salmonella typhimurium relationship between regulatory sites	Threonine deaminase of the Salmonella typhimurium regulatory site relationship.
9	blood flow and mineral deposition in canine tibial fractures	Blood flow mineral deposits in the canine tibial fractures.
9	role of inertia in the measurement of dynamic compliance	It is important to note that this is not the case.
9	a theory of aerosol deposition in the human respiratory tract	The study of the effects of air pollution on human health.
9	in vivo occlusal forces and moments ii mathematical analysis and recommendations for instrumentation specifications	In vivo forces and occlusive moments ii Mathematical analysis and instrumentation specification recommendations.
9	major fatty acids and proximate composition of dairy products	Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) - Canadian Food Inspection Agency.
9	a simple graphical method for determining the inhibition constants of mixed uncompetitive and non competitive inhibitors	Simple graphical method to determine d&apos constants; non-competitive and non-competitive inhibitors.
9	inhibition of enzymes by metal ion chelating reagents theory and new graphical methods of study	Enzyme inhibition by metal ion chelator reagent theory and novel metal ion graphing methods; study.
9	detection of neuroelectric signals from multiple data channels by optimum linear filter methods	Detection of neuroelectrical signals from multiple data channels, using optimal linear signal filter methods.
9	computer based method for calculation of the available energy of proteins	Computational protein calculation method; available protein energy.
9	corneal thickness measured by interferometry	Interferometrically measured corneal thickness.
9	selection of the candidate for myocardial revascularization a profile of high risk based on multivariate analysis	In addition, the patient should be screened for myocardial revascularization; a high risk profile based on a multivariate analysis.
9	equation of the helix for separating plants in a spiral radial cultivator	Apos equation; plant separation propeller in spiral radial cultivator.
9	mechanism of osmotic flow in porous membranes	It is not possible to determine the origin of the material.
9	sampling variances of heterozygosity and genetic distance	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with those of the other studies.
9	longitudinal magnification in radiologic images of thick objects a new concept in magnification radiography	Longitudinal magnification in x-ray images of thick objects, a new X-ray magnification concept.
9	the cutoff characteristics of rotating grids	Rotating grille cutting characteristics.
9	effects of partial reinforcement on conditioning conditional probabilities asymptotic performance and extinction of the rabbit s nictitating membrane response	Apos effects; partial reinforcement on conditioning of asymptotic performance conditional probabilities and extinction of rabbit nictitating membrane response.
9	problems of quantities and units in enzymology	Quantity issues and enzyme units.
9	determination of the kinetic constants of glucose 6 phosphate 1 epimerase by non linear optimization	L&apos kinetic constants; glucose epimerase 6 phosphate 1 by nonlinear optimization.
9	evidence for an essential lysine in glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from leuconostoc mesenteroides	Evidence of the presence of leuconostoc mesenteroides phosphate dehydrogenase, an essential lysine.
9	approach for an equation of state for adsorbed protein surfaces	Approach to a d&apos equation; adsorbed protein surface state.
9	frequency dependence of the frog skin impedance	L' the frog's skin impedance is a function of its frequency.
9	the interaction of atebrin with phospholipid vesicles	L' interaction of the spinal cord with the phospholipid-like vesicles.
9	critical arterial stenosis a theoretical and experimental solution	Critical artery stenosis is theoretical and experimental.
9	dynamic local distensibility of living arteries and its relation to wave transmission	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of a dynamic local distensibility of living arteries.
9	a mathematical model of cardiac rhythm disorders in the presence of rapid auricular electrical activity	This is a mathematical model of a disorder of the heart rhythm in the presence of apos; a rapid atrial electrical activity.
9	multi exponential analysis of plasma free amino acid kinetics in the rat	Multiple exponential analysis of the kinetics of free amino acids in the rat plasma.
9	calculation of elementary components of evoked potentials	The calculation of the elemental components of the evoked potentials is based on the calculation of the elemental components of these potentials.
9	theory of syncytial tissues ii open syncytiae	Syncytial theory opens the syncytiae.
9	role of functional reorganization of the receptive fields in forming a relationship between visual acuity and pupil diameter	Role of receptor field functional reorganization in pupil formation; relationship between visual acuity and pupil diameter.
9	reproduction by means of a methematical model of the dynamic characteristics of human vertical posture maintenance	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
9	mathematical modeling of the dynamics of biokinematic chains	Mathematical Modelling of Bio-Kinematic Chain Dynamics.
9	letter analysis of the lateral stability of the protofibril lattice in the a disk of striated muscle	Analysis of protofibril lattice lateral stability letters in a striated muscle disc.
9	letter velocity of passive conductance in a branching fiber	Passive conductance letter speed in a branched fiber.
9	receptor potential fluctuations in a pacinian corpuscle	"""Receptive potential fluctuations in a pacinian corpuscle"", Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology, Vol."
9	on the theory of ionic solutions	The theory of ionic ionic solution theory can be further developed in the field of ionic solution theory for ionic ionic solutions within the framework of the theory of ionic ionic solutions.
9	electro optical property of extremely stretched skinned muscle fibers	Electrooptic properties of highly stretched, highly stretched muscle fibers.
9	systemic error during measurement of dp dt using conventional heart catheters and their correction	Systemic error in measuring and correcting conventional cardiac catheters.
9	the stability constants of magnesium oxalate complexes	Stability constants for complexes of d' magnesium oxalate.
9	measurement of right ventricular volumes using 131i maa	Right ventricular volume measurement using 131i maa maa.
9	factors affecting the times till death of pedestrians killed in road accidents	The Committee notes from another source1 that the number of pedestrian fatalities has increased in recent years.
9	plasma volumes and constituents of heat exposed men before and after acclimatization	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that humans are acclimatized to heat.
9	chest wall mechanics during artificial ventilation	It's the mechanics of the thoracic wall during the process of artificial ventilation.
9	effects of lung inflation on pulmonary arterial blood volume in intact dogs	Effects of lapos; pulmonary inflation on the arterial volume of the lung in intact dogs.
9	total work rate of breathing optimization in co 2 inhalation and exercise	It is important to keep in mind that there is a need to maintain a high level of physical activity.
9	measurement of axial diffusivities in a model of the bronchial airways	Axial diffusivity measurement in airway model.
9	continuous in vivo measurement of arterial po2 in humans	In vivo measurement of in vivo arterial po2 in humans.
9	tetralogy of fallot a morphometric and geometric study	Tetralogy of fallot, a study of morphometry and geometry.
9	direct quantitative estimation of paneth and total cell populations in the jejunal glands of lieberk hn	Direct quantitative estimate of total and paneth cell populations in lieberk hn jejunal glands.
9	collaborative study of a spectrofluorometric method for lasalocid sodium in feeds	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
9	dynamics of glomerular ultrafiltration in the rat viii effects of hematocrit	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
9	an electronic device for the automatic correction of fluorescence emission spectra	An automatic correction device for the d&apos spectra; fluorescence emission.
9	effect of protein concentration on the molecular weight of delta5 3 ketosteroid isomerase	Effect of Protein Concentration on the Molecular Weight of Delta5 3 Ketosteroid Isomerase.
9	crystallographic structure refinement of chromatium high potential iron protein at two angstroms resolution	Crystallographic structure of ferric protein with high chromatic potential with a resolution of two angstroms.
9	role of the surface excess of palmitoyl coenzyme a in the 1 acylglycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase reaction catalyzed by microsomes	Role of apos; excess surface of coenzyme a palmitoyl in the microsome-catalyzed reaction 1 acylglycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase.
9	antenatal fetal growth from the nineteenth week ultrasonic study of 12 head and chest dimensions	Prenatal fetal growth from baseline; 12 dimensional ultrasound study of the fetal head and breast, conducted at the nine-week-ten.
9	the kinetics of glucocorticoid binding to the soluble specific binding protein of mouse fibroblasts	The kinetics of binding glucocorticoids to the specific soluble binding protein of mouse fibroblasts.
9	the calcium and magnesium binding sites on troponin and their role in the regulation of myofibrillar adenosine triphosphatase	The sites of calcium and magnesium binding to troponin and their role in the regulation of the myofibrillar adenosine triphosphatase.
9	mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase independent function of the catalytic binding sites	L&apos-independent function; mitochondrial catalytic binding site aspartate aminotransferase.
9	the pathology of the degenerate meniscus lesion	The meniscus degenerate lesion pathology.
9	pulmonary blood flow determined by continuous analysis of pulmonary n2o exchange	Pulmonary blood flow as determined by the apo; continuous lung n2o exchange.
9	restitution of blood volume after hemorrhage mathematical description	It's a good idea to have the blood volume restored after the mathematical description of the hemorrhage.
9	regulation of intestinal calcium binding protein calcium intake in the rat	Regulation of intestinal calcium; intake of calcium-binding protein in the rat.
9	participation of the catalytic carboxyls asp 52 and glu 35 and asp 101 in the binding of substrate analogues to hen lysozyme	Participation of asp 52 and glu 35 and asp 101 catalytic carboxyls in hen lysozyme binding of substrate analogs.
9	tryptophan fluorescence lifetimes in lysozyme	D.L. Mendel, D.R. Mendel, and D.J. Mendel.
9	mechanism by which antibodies inhibit hapten malate dehydrogenase conjugates an enzyme immunoassay for morphine	The mechanism by which the antibodies inhibit the etapos; haptene malate dehydrogenase conjugates an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay of morphine.
9	kinetic demonstration of the intermediate role of aminoacyl adenylate enzyme in the formation of valyl transfer ribonucleic acid	Kinetic demonstration of the intermediacy of etapos; aminoacyladenylate enzyme in etapos formation; valyl transfer ribonucleic acid.
9	the steady state kinetic parameters and non processivity of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase i	The following are some of the criteria that have been used to evaluate the effectiveness of the program: 1.
9	role of sulfhydryl groups in cellular adhesiveness	The role of the sulfhydryl groups in the cellular adhesion.
9	myonemal contraction of spirostomum ii some mechanical properties of the contractile apparatus	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of spirostomum.
9	the hepatic adenylate cyclase system iii a mathematical model for the steady state kinetics of catalysis and nucleotide regulation	The Hepatic Apos System; Adenylate Cyclase iii, a mathematical model for apos kinetics; d&apos state; equilibrium of nucleotide catalysis and regulation.
9	comparably massive penicillin g therapy in renal failure	Treatment with a comparatively large amount of penicillin during slow recovery; renal failure.
9	possible physical substrates for the interaction of electromagnetic fields with biologic membranes	In addition, it may be possible to use a magnetic field in conjunction with a biological membrane.
9	hydrophobic interaction of alkanes with liposomes and lipoproteins	Liposome and lipoprotein hydrophobic interaction of alkanes.
9	rumen modeling rumen input output balance models	Modelling rumen rumen models; balance balance input of the apos; balance of the apos; rumen input.
9	kinetic aspects of synchrony in suspension cultures of acer pseudoplatanus l	The kinetic aspects of synchrony in the suspension culture of e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.
9	photoelectron quantum yields of the amino acids	Photoelectronic quantum yields are also obtained for amino acids.
9	direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at low resolution 17 a	Direct Determination of Laminar Structure of Peripheral Nervous Myelin at Low Resolution 17 a.
9	comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods ii beef products	Food Fatty Acids Assessment ii Beef products.
9	comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods iii eggs and egg products	Food Fatty Acids Assessment iii Eggs and Egg Products.
9	osmosis in cortical collecting tubules a theoretical and experimental analysis of the osmotic transient phenomenon	Osmosis in cortical collecting tubules: a theoretical and experimental analysis of transient osmotic phenomena.
9	auditory membrane vibrations measurements at sub angstrom levels by optical heterodyne spectroscopy	Auditory membrane vibration measurements at levels-angstroms by heterodyne optical spectroscopy.
9	a simple specific assay for estriol in maternal urine	This is a simple, specific test for the presence of estriol in the maternal urine.
9	influx of cholesterol into plasma in rabbits with fasting hyperbetalipoproteinemia	Plasma cholesterol influx in fasting rabbits; hyperbetalipoproteinemia.
9	a biological least action principle for the ecological model of volterra lotka	A principle of less biological action for the Volterra Lotka Ecological Model.
9	transmucosal triglyceride transport rates in proximal and distal rat intestine in vivo	Rate of transport of transmucosal triglycerides in the apos; distal and proximal intestine of the rat in vivo.
9	activation of 3 5 cyclic adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase by calcium ion and a protein activator	Calcium ion and protein activator activation of 35 adenosine monophosphate cyclic phosphodiesterase.
9	studies on the kinetic mechanism of s adenosylmethionine protein o methyltransferase of calf thymus	Studies of the kinetic mechanism of the bovine thymus protein adenosylmethionine o methyltransferase.
9	affinity labeling of a regulatory site of bovine liver glutamate dehydrogenase	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
9	neutral and cationic sulfonamido derivatives of the fluorescent probe 2 p toluidinylnaphthalene 6 sulfonate properties and mechanistic implications	Cationic neutral sulfonamido derivatives of the 2 p toluidinylnaphthalene fluorescent probe 6 sulfonate properties and mechanistic implications.
9	energy transfer by chlorophyll a in detergent micelles	It is not possible to predict the effects of chlorophyll on the environment.
9	the rapid component of electron paramagnetic resonance signal ii a candidate for the physiological donor to photosystem ii in spinach chloroplasts	The fast component of the electron spin resonance (e.g. electron spin resonance) signal ii is a potential candidate for the photosystem ii physiological donor in spinach chloroplasts.
9	calcium binding to rabbit skeletal myosin under physiological conditions	Calcium binding under physiological conditions to rabbit skeletal myosin.
9	electric birefringence of myosin subfragments	Electrical sub Birfringence-myosin fragments.
9	participation of manganese ions complexed with trna in the interaction with amino acids and dipeptides	The participation of trna-complexed manganese ions in amino acid interactions and dipeptides.
9	the kinetic mechanism and properties of the cytoplasmic acetoacetyl coenzyme a thiolase from rat liver	The kinetic mechanism and properties of cytoplasmic coenzyme acetoacetyl a thiolase in rat liver.
9	the amine oxidases of human placenta and pregnancy plasma	Pregnancy plasma and human placental amines oxidases.
9	determinants of glomerular filtration in experimental glomerulonephritis in the rat	Glomerulonephritis and glomerulonephritis.
9	hepatocellular uptake of taurocholate in the dog	L' taurocholate hepatocellular absorption in dogs.
9	kinetics of the hydrolysis of n benzoyl l serine methyl ester catalysed by bromelain and by papain analysis of modifier mechanisms by lattice nomography computational methods of parameter evaluation for substrate activated catalyses and consequences of postulated non productive binding in bromelain and papain catalysed hydrolyses	The kinetics of l' hydrolysis of l' methyl ester of benzoyl serine catalyzed by bromelaine and l' analysis of modifying mechanisms by network name calculation methods for l' evaluation of the parameters of substrate-activated catalysts and the consequences of the nonproductive binding postulated in bromine- and papain hydrolyses.
9	kinetics of irreversible enzyme inhibition by an unstable inhibitor	Kinetics of the apos; irreversible enzyme inhibition by unstable inhibitor.
9	the inhibition of human placental diamine oxidase by substrate analogues	L' inhibition of placental human diamine oxidase by analogs of the substrate.
9	macroscopic rate constants involved in the formation and interconversion of the two central enzyme substrate complexes of the lactate dehydrogenase turnover	Macroscopic rate constants for formation and interconversion of the two central enzyme substrates of lactate dehydrogenase turnover.
9	a kinetic analysis of enzyme systems involving four substrates	Kinetic analysis of four-substrate enzyme systems.
9	a comparison of two methods for fitting the integrated michaelis menten equation	It is not possible to compare the two methods; it is necessary to compare the two methods.
9	colloidal alpha stannic acid and negative iron colloid as differential electron stains for surface proteins	Stannic colloidal iron-negative colloidal acid as a differential electronic dye for surface proteins.
9	long term potentiation of the perforant path granule cell synapse in the rat hippocampus	Long-term, potentiation of synapse of perforating pathway granule cells in rat hippocampus.
9	transparency of pair correlated random distributions of small scatterers with applications to the cornea	Pair transparency correlated small diffuser random distributions with corneal applications.
9	cross talk in absorbing optical fibers	The word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of the word of God.
9	visual fourier transform spectroscopy with a single crystal plate	Single crystal plate Fourier transform spectroscopy.
9	masking of the non test ear in speech audiometry	Hide ear; unproven audiometric ear.
9	masking of the non test ear in tone decay b k sy audiometry and sisi tests	In addition, there are a number of other types of hearing loss, such as hearing loss, hearing loss, hearing loss, and hearing loss.
9	determination of bile acid pool size in man a simplified method with advantages of increases precision shortened analysis time and decreased isotope exposure	Determination of the size of the bile acids pool in humans is a simplified method that has the advantage of increasing precision, shortening time, analysis and decrease in time, and isotope exposure.
9	an improved mantel bryan procedure for safety testing of carcinogens	Enhanced safety of bryan mantel based carcinogens.
9	localization of heart vectors produced by epicardial burns and ectopic stimuli validation of a dipole ranging method	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that coronary heart disease is caused by coronary heart disease.
9	calculations of pulsatile flow through a branch implications for the hemodynamics of atherogenesis	It's a very simple process, it's very simple, it's very simple, it's very simple, it's very simple.
9	theory of current source density analysis and determination of conductivity tensor for anuran cerebellum	Theoretically, it can be used as a basis for the determination of the conductivity tensor for the cerebellum.
9	experimental optimization of current source density technique for anuran cerebellum	Experimental optimization of the current-source density technique for use in anuran cerebellum.
9	the evaluation of left ventricular function in man a comparison of methods	Lapos; left ventricular function assessment in men a comparison of methods.
9	linear working graphs in blood lead determinations with the beckman flameless atomic absorption cuvet	Linear work charts for lead sinker determination with d&apos bowl; flameless beckman atomic absorption.
9	biological populations with nonoverlapping generations stable points stable cycles and chaos	Biological populations with non-overlapping generations indicate stable life history cycles and chaos.
9	tracer flow permeability and partial conductance	It can be used as a means of controlling the flow of the tracker.
9	food intake and growth of guinea pigs fed a cholesterol containing diet	Food ingestion and guinea pig growth resulted in a cholesterol-containing diet.
9	application of the loo riegelman absorption method	D&apos application; absorption loo riegelman.
9	measurement of surface color and color difference of tablet colorants by tristimulus colorimetry	Measurement of the color of the tablet surface and the colour difference of the tablet dyes by tristimulus colorimetry.
9	determination of stability constants of stannous fluoride complexes by potentiostatic titration	Stability constants of fluoride stannous complexes determined by potentiostatic titration.
9	influence of the electrical properties of electrodes platinum wire on the myoelectric signal	L' influences myoelectric signal properties of platinum electrodes.
9	quantitative study of autoradiographic marking in the rat nervous system ii final characteristics of the adult animal brain interpretation rules and concept of cortical chronoarchitecture	Quantitative Study of Autoradiographic Labelling in the Rat Nervous System ii Final characteristics of apo rules; interpretation of the brain of adult animals and concept of cortical chronoarchitecture.
9	calculation of the electromyographic jitter	Electromyographic shock calculations.
9	a model for the transient and steady state mechanical behavior of contracting muscle	Model for stationary transient mechanical behaviour of contracting muscle.
9	the differential scattering of circularly polarized light by chloroplasts and evaluation of their true circular dichroism	Differential circular polarized light scattering by chloroplasts and l' evaluation of their true circular dichroism.
9	the effect of energization on the apparent michaelis mentne constant for oxygen in mitochondrial respiration	L' effect of apos; energy dependence on apparent constant michaelis for apos; oxygen dependence in mitochondrial respiration.
9	the effects of 5alpha dihydrotestosterone on the kinetics of cell proliferation in rat prostate	Effects of 5alpha dihydrotestosterone on cell proliferation kinetics in rat prostate.
9	a re evaluation of energy independent calcium ion binding by rat liver mitochondria	Apos-independent calcium ion binding re-evaluation by rat liver mitochondria.
9	experimental tonography on enucleated human eyes i the validity of grant s tonography formula	Experimental Tonography on Enucleated Human Eyes: the validity of the Grant s tonography formula.
9	calcium ion binding to the chromaffin granule surface	Calcium ion binds to chromaffin granule surface.
9	model connective tissue systems a study of polyion mobile ion and of excluded volume interactions of proteoglycans	Model of Connective Tissue Systems Study of polyionic mobile ions and volume interactions excluded from proteoglycans.
9	the macromolecular properties of blood group specific glycoproteins characterization of a series of fractions obtained by solvent fractionation	The macromolecular properties of blood-group-specific glycoproteins characterize a series of solvent fractionation fractions.
9	a study of the kinetics and mechanism of rabbit muscle l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Kinetics and mechanisms of rabbit muscle glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase were studied.
9	the molecular and crystal structures of 4 n 2 acetamido 2 deoxy beta d glucopyranosyl l asparagine trihydrate and 4 n beta d glucopyranosyl l asparagine monohydrate the x ray analysis of a carbohydrate peptide linkage	The crystal and molecular structures of 4-n-2-acetamido-2-deoxy-β-glucopyranosyl asparagine l and 4-n-β-glucopyranosyl asparagine l trihydrate are determined by x-ray analysis of d&apos, a glucose peptide bond.
9	a solid phase radioimmunoassay for plasma progesterone	A solid-phase progesterone radioimmunoassay.
9	a new method for determining the michaelis constant	A new method to determine Michaelis constant.
9	studies of the dimensions of oligopeptides by singlet singlet energy transfer and theoretical calculations i influence of glycine on the dimensions of tetrapeptides	L' study of oligopeptide dimensions by single-energy transfer and theoretical calculations influence glycine on tetrapeptide dimensions.
9	air pressure and flow in the nose6 represented in a double logarithmic system author s transl	The air in the nose is represented by a logarithmic double-authors system.
9	mathematical method for determining kvp from x ray attenuation measurements	Mathematical method to determine kvp from x-ray measurements.
9	the use of 13c nuclear magnetic resonance of aromatic amino acid residues to determine the midpoint oxidation reduction potential of each iron sulfur cluster of clostridium acidi urici and clostridium pasteurianum ferredoxins	Use of nuclear magnetic resonance 13c of potato residues; aromatic amino acids to determine potential d' mid- to mid-ocean oxidation of each Clostridium acidi urici ferride sulfide group and Clostridium pasteurianum ferredoxines.
9	ph dependence of the adair constants of human hemoglobin nonuniform contribution of successive oxygen bindings to the alkaline bohr effect	In addition to the above-mentioned factors, there are also a number of other factors that may contribute to the formation of hyperglycemia.
9	the mechanism of stabilization of the structure of nuclease t by binding of ligands	The mechanism by which the t- nuclease structure is stabilized by ligand binding is described.
9	an expression for the calculation of relative affinities of antibody ligand interactions	An expression for calculating the relative affinities of antibody interactions between d&apos ligands.
9	relationships between chemical structure and affinity for postganglionic acetylcholine receptors of the guinea pig ileum	Chemical structure–lapos relationships; postganglionic l&apos receptor affinity; l&apos acetylcholine; guinea pig ileum.
9	build up region of megavoltage photon radiation sources	Construct a photonic radiation source megavoltage region.
9	hidden part suppression on three dimensional plots	Hidden partial deletion on three-dimensional patterns.
9	high energy electron radiotherapy in a magnetic field	High-energy electronic radiation in magnetic field.
9	kinetic studies on the depolymerization of polyadenylic acid by ribonuclease a	Kinetic studies of yeast apos depolymerization; polyadenyl acid by a ribonuclease.
9	kinetic behavior of associating enzyme systems ofthe type m in equilibrium m2 in equilibrium m3 in equilibrium and of the type 2m in equilibrium d in equilibrium d2 in equilibrium d3 in equilibrium	Kinetic behavior of m-type associated enzyme systems; m2 interval equilibrium; m3 interval and 2m interval equilibrium; d2 interval; d2 interval; d3 interval; d3 interval; d3 interval; d3 interval.
9	the structure of hydrophobic cores of globins	Structure of the globin hydrophobic nuclei.
9	a study of the mechanism of action of phosphorylase b using isotope labelled substrates	A mechanistic study of the action of phosphorylase b at apos, using substrates labelled with apos; isotope.
9	a study of the interaction of oligonucleotides with polynucleotides by the method of equilibrium gel filtration the effect of magnesium ions and the composition of the oligonucleotides on the stability of the complex	An apo study; oligonucleotide interaction with polynucleotides by the apo gel filtration method; protein balance; effect of magnesium ions and oligonucleotide composition on complex stability.
9	diffuse scattering of x rays by polypeptides and proteins in solution iii analysis of scattering curve of sperm whale myoglobin	Diffuse X-ray diffusion by solution polypeptides and proteins iii analyses sperm whale myoglobin diffusion curve.
9	an analysis of the cost of selection concept	A selection cost concept analysis using a selection cost concept; a selection cost concept approach.
9	differential light scattering from spherical mammalian cells	Differences in Light Scattering by Mammalian Spherical Cells.
9	a pressure vessel model for nerve compression	A model pressure vessel for the nerve compression.
9	the resolution of arterial pulses into forward and backward waves as an approach to the determination of the characteristic impedance	Resolution of wave-borne arterial impulses to the front and back as an approach to determining the apos; characteristic impedance.
9	quantitative analysis of mass and energy balance in non ideal models of the renal counterflow system	Quantitative mass and mass analysis; energy balance in non-ideal-renal flow system models.
9	population structure in relation to cost of selection	Population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. population structure vs. selection cost vs. selection cost vs vs vs. selection cost vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs vs
9	the interaction of ribonuclease t 1 with dna	L' t1 ribonuclease interaction with DNA.
9	investigation of very slowly tumbling spin labels by nonlinear spin response techniques theory and experiment for stationary electron electron double resonance	L' Investigation of Very Slow Spin Markers by Nonlinear Spin Response and L' Experimentation with D&apos Electronic Double Resonance; Stationary Electrons.
9	analysis of a simple prototypal muscle model near to and far from equilibrium	Dapos analysis; simple prototypic model of muscle near and far from the apos; equilibrium.
9	discontinuous variability in the form of a geometric progression of albumin production in hepatoma and hybrid cells	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
9	island models for takeover by a social trait facing a frequency dependent selection barrier in a mendelian population	Insular models of social takeovers that face a frequency-dependent selection barrier in Mendelian populations.
9	niche overlap and diffuse competition	Niche overlap overlaps with diffused competition.
9	the coats of the eyeball and the intraocular pressure author s transl	It's the only thing that's going on in the world that's going on.
9	changes in arterial pressure viscosity and resistance during cardiopulmonary bypass	Changes in viscosity and BP resistance during CABG.
9	assessment of some problems associated with prediction of the three dimensional structure of a protein from its amino acid sequence	Evaluation of certain problems associated with predicting a protein's three-dimensional structure from its amino acid sequence.
9	stochastics of cycle completions fluxes in biochemical kinetic diagrams	Stochastic flow of ring complements in biochemical kinetics.
9	phenylalanyl trna synthetase from baker s yeast role of 3 terminal adenosine of trna phe in enzyme substrate interaction studied with 3 modified trna phe species	Phenylalanyl trna baker's yeast synthetase role of 3 trna phe terminal adenosine in apos; substrate interaction with 3 modified trna phe species.
9	magnetic resonance spectra of membranes	Membrane magnetic resonance.
9	a group of thermodynamic potentials applicable to ligand binding by a polyfunctional macromolecule	Group of thermodynamic potentials for d&apos binding; a ligand by a polyfunctional macromolecule.
9	moments for sum of an arbitrary function of gene frequency along a stochastic path of gene frequency change	In addition, it can be used as a basis for determining the frequency of a gene change, and it can also be used as a basis for determining the frequency of a gene change.
9	vascular and extravascular volume changes due to elevated venous pressure	Changes in vascular and extravascular volume due to the high venous pressure.
9	a model for ultracentrifugal quantification of 35 s bromosulphthalein binding to plasma proteins in the presence of radioimpurities	Model for ultracentrifugal quantitation of radioimpurity binding of 35-s bromosulftalein to plasma proteins.
9	interference competition and niche theory	Competition of the apos; interference and theory of niches.
9	special pharmacokinetic aspects in newborns and young infants	Special Pharmacokinetics in Newborn-and Young Children.
9	the effect of chlorpromazine on some properties dna in solution	Chlorpromazine effect on certain properties of DNA in solution.
9	a potent new mesodermal growth factor from mouse submaxillary gland a quantitative comparative study with previously described submaxillary gland growth factors	A new, potent, mesodermal growth factor of the gland under @-@mice maxilla has made the subject d' a quantitative comparative study with the growth factors of the gland under @-@maxilla previously described.
9	on equation of gas transport in the lung	This is the first time you've tried to find out what's wrong with your lungs.
9	a sigmoid model of the static volume pressure curve of human lung	Sigmoid model of human lung static volume pressure.
9	carbon monoxide elimination	Removal of the carbon monoxide.
9	determination of mean whole body intracellular ph in unanesthetized dogs	Determination of the average body cell phage in dogs that are not anesthetized.
9	on the psychophysical law an information theory interpretation	On the law of psychophysics an interpretation of the theory of the apos; information.
9	a theory of group selection	A group-selection theory.
9	a general model for genetic recombination	General pattern of genetic recombination.
9	short lived messenger rna in hela cells and its impace on the kinetics of accumulation of cytoplasmic polyadenylate	Short-term messenger rna in helical cells and its effect on cytoplasmic polyadenylate accumulation.
9	computer generated isodose curves for high energy x ray machines experimental verification and time saving strategies	In addition, there are a number of computer-generated isodoses for experimental verification of high-energy X-ray equipment and time-saving strategies.
9	new approach to the study of hormone protein interaction using the microcalorimetric method	New approach to apos; microcalorimetric study of apos; hormonal protein interaction.
9	tumor and normal tissue response to irradiation in vivo variation with decreasing dose rates	Tumour and tissue reaction normal to l' irradiation variation in vivo with decreasing rates of dose.
9	the total biological dose	Full biological dose.
9	appraisal of the angiographic circulation time as an index of cerebral blood flow	Assessment of Angiographic Circulation Time as a Brain Blood Flow Indicator.
9	analytical approach for depth dose calculations 60co beams with fixed source target distance	Analytical Approach to Deep Dose Design Target distance fixed-source 60Co beams.
9	errors in applying the nsd concept	It's a good idea to make sure that you don't use it.
9	reward versus cost token systems an analysis of the effects on students and teacher	An analysis of the student and teacher effects of reward systems versus cost tokens systems.
9	comparative measurements of airway resistance	The results of the assessment of respiratory resistance to air pollution in relation to resistance to air pollution are presented in the context of a bill.
9	interspecific competition a new approach to the classical theory	Interspecific Competition A New Approach to Classical Theory.
9	the impact of organization of family planning clinics on waiting time	It is important to note, however, that there are a number of issues that need to be addressed.
9	high counting rates from 125i in radioimmunoassays	High counts from 125i onwards in the radioimmunoassay.
9	a dynamical model for human population	This is a dynamic model for the human population.
9	a technique for estimating the position of the oxygen hemoglobin dissociation curve	Apos technique; position estimation of apo dissociation curve; oxygenated hemoglobin.
9	realpop a mathematical model for resource allocation in population programs results from a test in the dominican republic	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with the results of the study, but it is possible to compare them with the results of the study.
9	polar vectors in the posterior inferior parietal myocardial infarct and left anterior hemiblock	Polar Vectors in the apos; lower posterior parietal myocardial infarction and anterior left hemococci.
9	intracranial volume pressure relationships during experimental brain compression in primates 1 pressure responses to changes in ventricular volume	Relationship between intracranial volume and pressure during experimental cerebral compression in primates 1: response of pressure to ventricular volume changes.
9	intramyocardial pressure effect of preload on transmural distribution of systolic coronary blood flow	Effect of Preloading on Intramyocardial Pressure on Transmural Distribution of Systolic Coronary Blood Flow.
9	quantitative evaluation of hemodialysis therapy using a simple mathematical model and a programmable pocket calculator	Quantitative Evaluation of Apos Therapy; Hemodialysis at Apos; Help from a Simple Mathematical Model and Apos; A Programmable Pocket Calculator.
9	observations on a model of the biology of carcinoma of the cervix a poor fit between observation and theory	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that carcinogenicity is related to the carcinogenicity of cancer.
9	the inotropic memory of amphibian myocardium i identification of two stimultaneous mechanisms and statement of a model	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that amphibians are more susceptible than amphibians.
9	ventricular performance in patients based upon rate of change of power during isovolumic contraction	Ventricular performance in patients, based on rate of power change during isovolumic contraction.
9	isovolumic fractional rate of change of power its applicability to assessment of ventricular performance in patients	An evaluation of the efficacy of the drug in reducing the risk of coronary heart failure.
9	ray tracing through a toric refracting surface	Radiation traced through refracted toric surface.
9	analysis of photometric data	Photometric data analysis.
9	kinetics of renin antirenin reaction micromethods for the assay of renin and antirenin	Renin reaction kinetics-micromethods antirenine for renin and l' antirenine.
9	linear measurements of the rhomboid fossa the fourth ventricle in man	Linear measurement of fourth ventricle rhomboidal fossa in men.
9	mathematical analysis of several parameters of the microcirculatory bed of muscles and muscular organs	Mathematical analysis of several microcirculatory muscle and muscle organ bed parameters.
9	infant development and adipositas author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
9	population variation in asymmetry and diversity from finger to finger for digital ridge count	It is not possible to estimate the number of ridges, but it is important to estimate the number of ridges.
9	dermatoglyphics of schizophrenics patients with down s syndrome and mentally retarded males as compared with australian europeans using multivariate statistics	Dermatoglyphs of men with lower-level schizophrenia and mental retardation compared to European men using multivariate statistics.
9	the radius dose relationship in linear source therapy	Dietary Reference Intakes, D.S. and D.A. Dietary Reference Intakes.
9	sulphated glycosaminoglycans as virus inhibitors 2nd communication inhibitory effect of glycosaminoglycanpolysulphates on yellow fever virus 17 d in animal experiments author s transl	In animal experiments, sulfated glycosaminoglycans inhibit the communication of glycosaminoglycan polysulfates to the yellow fever virus 17 days.
9	biothermal simulation of scuba divers	Biothermal dive simulation, self-contained diving gear.
9	the use of stereologic image analysis in medicine peripheral nerves	L' apo use; d&apo analysis; medical stereological images for peripheral nerves.
9	inactivation of bacteriophages t7 and phix174 by radiomimetics	Inactivation by radiomimetics of phix174 and bacteriophages t7.
9	a mathematical model for bacterial chemotaxis	Bacterial chemotaxis math model.
9	karyometric analysis of the supraoptic nucleus and the paraventricular nucleus before and after milking the cow	Karyometric analysis of supraoptic and paraventricular nuclei before and after cow milking.
9	light scattering spectrum due to wiggling motions of bacteria	Light scattering spectrum caused by the agitated movements of bacteria.
9	inelastic light scattering by large structured particles	Inelastic scattering of light by large, structured particles.
9	normal hemoglobin oxygen affinity	Normal apo affinity; apo oxygen; hemoglobin.
9	8 anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonate interaction with whole and disrupted mitochondria a re evaluation of the use of double reciprocal plots in the derivation of binding parameters for fluorescent probes binding to mitochondrial membranes	Anilinonaphthalene 1 sulphonate interaction with whole and broken mitochondria re-evaluation of l' use of double reciprocal tracings in binding parameter derivation for mitochondrial membrane binding fluorescent probes.
9	the new patient index a method of measuring the activity of day hospitals	The new Patient Index is a measurement method for day hospital activity.
9	overlap problems in counting fibers	There's been some kind of overlap problem with the fiber count.
9	right ventricular volume in congenital heart disease	Right ventricular volume, congenital heart disease.
9	a simple method for anzlyzing multifactorial data	A simple way to annotate the multifactorial data.
9	comparison of 2 angiographic methods to determine the expulsion fraction of the left ventricle	Comparison of two angiographic methods for determination of the fraction d' left ventricle expulsion.
9	effect of papaverine hydrochloride on brain circulation studies using a scintillation camera computer system	Canadian Centre for Management Development, University of British Columbia.
9	sense and applicability of means various critical considerations	It is important to note that the term is not intended to be used interchangeably.
9	an equilibrium binding study of the interaction of fructose 6 phosphate and fructose 1 6 bisphosphate with rabbit muscle phosphofructokinase	A phosphate–fructose 16 bisphosphate binding study; rabbit muscle phosphofructokinase equilibrium.
9	fluorescence energy transfer between ligand binding sites on aspartate transcarbamylase	D&apos transfer; fluorescence energy between the binding sites of ligands on the apos; aspartate transcarbamylase.
9	negative cooperativity in the binding of thyroxine to human serum prealbumin preparation of tritium labeled 8 anilino 1 naphthalenesulfonic acid	Negative thyroxine binding co-activity to a l&apos labelled human human serum tritium préalbumin; anilino acid 8 naphthalenesulfonic 1.
9	mandelate racemase from pseudomonas putida magnetic resonance and kinetic studies of the mechanism of catalysis	Mandelate racemase of pseudomonas putida magnetic resonance and catalytic kinetic studies.
9	nuclear magnetic resonance studies of histone iv solution conformation	Nuclear magnetic resonance study of the conformation of l&apos solution; solution histone iv.
9	platelet stimulation by thrombin and other proteases	Thrombin and other proteases.
9	immobilized electric eel acetylcholinesterase i kinetics of acetylcholinesterase trapped in polyacrylamide membranes	The kinetics of immobilized electrical eel, acetylcholinesterase i, are trapped in the membranes of polyacrylamide.
9	human platelet 6 phosphofructokinase relation between inhibition by mg atp2 and cooperativity towards fructose 6 phosphate and investigations on the formation of a ternary complex	The human platelet phosphofructokinase 6 relationship between apos; inhibition by mg atp2 and fructose phosphate 6 cooperativity; study of d&apos formation; ternary complex.
9	ph effects in plasmin catalysed hydrolysis of alpha n benzoyl l arginine compounds	Ph-plasmin effects catalyze apos; hydrolysis of benzoyl n-α compounds; arginine.
9	physicochemical and kinetic properties of beef liver argininosuccinase studies in the presence and absence of arginase	The physico@-@ chemical and kinetic properties of bovine liver argininosuccinase were studied in the presence and in the absence of apos; arginase.
9	mammalian 3 oxosteroid delta4 delta5 isomerase a membrane bound enzyme ii activation by divalent cations	Mammalian 3 delta4 delta5 delta5 oxosteroid isomerase, a divalent cation-activated enzyme.
9	a physical explanation of the epr spectrum observed during catalysis by enzymes utilizing coenzyme b12	A physical explanation of the observed esr spectrum during catalysis by enzymes using coenzyme b12 as the coenzyme.
9	lateral diffusion of cholesterol in monolayers	Lateral cholesterol distribution in monolayers.
9	the characterization of energized and partially de energized respiration independent beta galactoside transport into escherichia coli	Characterization of beta-galactoside transport in escherichia coli, which is independent of respiration, under tension and partially under tension.
9	a conformational change in bovine beta lactoglobulin at low ph	Conformational change in the beta-low-php bovine lactoglobulin.
9	nonlinear regression methods in design of experiments and mathematical modelling applications to the analysis of the steady state kinetics of glutathione reductase	Nonlinear regression methods in experimental design and mathematical modeling applications; kinetics analysis at apos; state d' glutathione reductase equilibrium.
9	substrate inhibition kinetics in assemblages of cells	The kinetics of l' cell assembly substrate inhibition.
9	dynamics of cellular growth	Cell growth dynamics.
9	a computer simulation model for analysis of conformation of nuclear chromatin and of the transcription process	Computer simulation model for the analysis of nuclear chromatin conformation and transcription process.
9	a negative control model of hormone receptor interaction	Negative dosage control model; hormonal receptor interaction.
9	time hierarchy equilibrium and non equilibrium in metabolic systems	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with the results of the study.
9	analytic procedures for large dimention nonlinear biochemical oscillators	Nonlinear, large-dimensional biochemical oscillator analytical procedures.
9	genetic distance and gene diversity among linguistically different tribes of mexican indians	Genetic Distance and Genetic Diversity Among Linguistically Different Tribes of Mexican Indians.
9	estimation of race admixture a new method	Estimation of the apos; new breed admixture.
9	influence of crossbridge compliance on the force velocity relation of muscle	The relationship between the speed of force and the muscle is influenced by the conformity of the crossed bridges.
9	electron diffraction study of the hexagonal polymorphic form of some choline containing phosphpolipids	Electron diffraction study of the polymorphic hexagonal form of some choline-containing phospholipids.
9	monolayer characteristics of some glycolipids at the air water interface	Glycolipids and glycolipids: characteristics of monolayers; air interface-water.
9	modification of optical responses associated with the action potential of lobster giant axons	Modification of the optical responses associated with the potential d' action of the giant axons of the lobster.
9	kinetics of macrotetrolide induced ion transport across lipid bilayer membranes	Macrotetrolide kinetics induce ion transport through lipid bilayer membranes.
9	electromechanical stresses and the effect of ph on membrane structure	Electrical-mechanical stress and ph-induced effect on the membrane structure.
9	light scattering from nucleated biological cells	Diffusion of light by biological nucleated cells.
9	analysis of fluorescence decay curves by means of the laplace transformation	Fluorescence decay curve analysis using laplace transformation.
9	the effect of essential fatty acid deficiency upon fatty acid uptake by the brain	It can also be used as a means of reducing the amount of fatty acid that can be absorbed by the brain.
9	diffusion in bile and its implications on detergency	Dissemination in the bile and detergent implications.
9	influence of glucocorticoids on some morphological and biochemical aspects of rat small intestinal mucosa	Influence of glucocorticoids on certain biochemical and morphological aspects of the mucosa of the rat small intestine.
9	the effect of neomycin and streptomycin on the electrical polarisability of aqueous suspensions of escherichia coli	Neomycin and streptomycin affect the electrical polarizability of aqueous d' escherichia coli suspensions.
9	kinetics of a ca 2 triggered membrane aggregation reaction of phospholipid membranes	Dapos kinetics, one ca 2, elicits a dapos reaction; membrane aggregation of the phospholipid membranes.
9	relationship between hb and hba2 concentrations in healthy and iron deficient subjects	Relationships between levels of hb2 and hb2 in healthy and iron-deficient subjects.
9	the acidity and peptic activity of gastric juice in healthy children and in children suffering from cystic fibrosis author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of obesity.
9	kidney position and the measurement of relative uptake of 131 i hippuran in renography	L'absorption de 131 i hippuran en renographie, et la position des kidneys et la measurement de l'apos.
9	energy a useful criterion in analysis of human visual evoked response	It is important to note that the human visual evoked response is not a visual response.
9	sterility control basic mathematical considerations author s transl	Infertility controls the fundamental mathematical considerations about the translation of the author.
9	spectral analysis of the eeg recorded during stimulation of the human fovea	L' apos spectral analysis; age was recorded during human fovea stimulation.
9	the length of the fibroin gene in the bombyx mori genome	Fibroin gene length in bombyx mori genome.
9	structural genes adjacent to interspersed repetitive dna sequences	The genetic makeup of the genes is similar to that of the genes in which they are found.
9	purification and properties of coffee bean alpha d galactosidase	Coffee bean purification and properties; alpha galactosidase.
9	complexation of reducing and nonreducing carbohydrates with hydroxides of some alkali and alkaline earth metals	It is also used in the manufacture of high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance products.
9	the result sequence method sequence analysis in leptospira research 3 communication the bilateral sequential test de boer armitage for testing the difference of mean values of two binomial distributions author s transl	L' Sequential Analysis of Sequential Method of Results in Leptospira 3 Research allows the communication of the bilateral sequential boer armitage test to test the difference in mean values between two binomial distributions.
9	some physico chemical properties of aqueous solutions of n alpha acyl l histidine	Some physical properties-chemical of aqueous n alpha acyl l histidine.
9	a model of lateral diffusion in phosphatide bilayers and natural membranes	Side-scattering model in natural and phosphatidic bilayers.
9	studies on phosphatidylcholine model membranes i iodine permeability measurement by specific ion electrode	Measurements of phosphatidylcholine model membrane permeability by a specific ionic electrode.
9	a new method of measuring propagation coefficients and characteristic impedance in blood vessels	A new method to measure spread coefficients and l' characteristic impedance in the blood vessels.
9	simulation of action potential propagation in an inhomogeneous sheet of coupled excitable cells	Simulation of the propagation of the d&apos potential; action in an inhomogeneous, coupled excitable cell layer.
9	right ventricular performance in patients with coronary artery disease	In addition, there is an increased risk of coronary artery disease.
9	trend detection in control data optimization and interpretation of trigg s technique for trend analysis	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is important to note that this is not the case.
9	use of carbon dioxide and oxygen tonometered phosphate bicarbonate chloride glycerol water mixtures for calibration and control of ph pco2 and po2 electrode systems	Use of aqueous mixtures of bicarbonate, carbon dioxide, and phosphate-based oxygen, tonometers, to calibrate and control phosphate-based systems; pco2 and p2 electrodes.
9	pressure drop across artificially induced stenoses in the femoral arteries of dogs	Pressure drop in artificially induced stenosis in dog femoral arteries.
9	observations on blood viscosity changes after acute myocardial infarction	Observations on changes in blood viscosity following acute infarction of the myocardium.
9	radionuclide angiocardiography improved diagnosis and quantitation of left to right shunts using area ratio techniques in children	It is important to note, however, that it is not possible to measure the effects of radiation on human health, but it is important to assess the effects of radiation on human health.
9	molar absorptivities of beta nadh and beta nad at 260 nm	Mole absorptivities-nadh and beta-nad at 260 nm.
9	transient potentials in dendritic systems of arbitrary geometry	Transient potentials in arbitrary dendritic geometry systems.
9	cumulative radiation effect part iv normalisation of fractionated and continuous therapy area and volume correction factors	Cumulative Effect of Exposure Part iv Standardization of Absorption; Fractionation Area and Continuous Therapy and Volume Correction Factors.
9	expressions of the michaelis menten equation when studying enzyme reactions in a variable volume medium	The expression of the organism; equation of michaelis menten in the cell; study of the enzymatic reactions in a medium of variable volume.
9	the effect of systematic error on the accuracy of michaelis constants and maximum velocities estimated by using the integrated michaelis menten equation	The results of this study are presented in the following sections: (a) (b) (c) (d) (e) (e) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f); (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f)); (f) (f) (f) (f) (f)); (f) (f) (f) (f))); (f) (f)); (f)); (f) (f) (f)); (f) (f) (f) (f) (f))); (f)); (f);
9	cine angiographic determination of ventricular volumes with the help of a computer author s transl	Angiographic Kinetic Determination of Ventricular Volumes at Lapos; Help; translatable author computer.
9	validation of a dual isotope plasma ratio method for measurement of cholesterol absorption in rats	This method is based on the results of a randomized controlled trial, and is based on the results of a randomized controlled trial.
9	time course of the effect of adrenalectomy on transcortin binding characteristics appraisal of different methods of calculation	It is important to note that the effects of the adrenalectomy on the immune system are much smaller than the effects of the adrenalectomy.
9	optimal statistical design of radioimmunoassays and competitive protein binding assays	Optimal statistical design of binding tests and radioimmunoassays to competitive proteins.
9	a simple method to evaluate the massive dose vitamin a prophylaxis program in preschool children	A simple way to estimate the mass dose of a prophylactic program in children of pre-school age.
9	blood sugar determination with the reflomat author s transl	Determination of Glycemia with translation of Initiator.
9	alimentary iodine deficiency in the federal republic of germany author s transl	The Committee notes that there are no data on the prevalence of food insecurity in the United States.
9	the effects of diet lipolysis and limb ischaemia on the distribution of plasma tryptophan in the rat	Effects of dietary lipolysis and limb ischemia on plasma tryptophan distribution in rat.
9	extracellular enzyme system utilized by the fungus sporotrichum pulverulentum chrysosporium lignorum for the breakdown of cellulose 2 activities of the five endo 1 4 beta glucanases towards carboxymethylcellulose	Extracellular enzyme system used by sporotrichum pulverulentum chrysosporium lignorum to decompose the apos; cellulose activity 2 of five beta glucanases endo 14 to carboxymethylcellulose.
9	the semen of fertile men statistical analysis of 1300 men	Semen of Fertile Men Statistical analysis 1300 men.
9	voltage transients in neuronal dendritic trees	Neural dendritic tree tension transients.
9	a note on the variance of the number of loci having a given gene frequency	Note on variance of number of loci with a given gene frequency.
9	on nei and roychoudhury s sampling variances of heterozygosity and genetic distance	On nei and roychoudhury we sample the variances of the interval; heterozygosity and of the genetic distance.
9	a new method for measurement of right ventricular residual ratio using 121i maa	A new measurement method for right ventricular residual using 121i maa.
9	sequential change in the different of potential distribution between a normal subject and simulated torso model	Sequential change in the potential distribution difference between a normal and a simulated torso.
9	methods of mathematical differentiation in tonography	Tonography Mathematical Differentiation Methods.
9	model for the growth of a solid in vitro tumor	A solid tumour in vitro.
9	the influence of women s work opportunities on marriage rates	It is important to note that women's participation in the labour market does not necessarily mean that they do not participate in the labour market.
9	estimates of fecundability from a truncated distribution of conception times	The results of this study are summarized below.
9	a general method of correction for age misreporting in census populations	This method is used to estimate the number of deaths per 1,000 population.
9	constructing increment decrement life tables	Constructing increment lifetime tables.
9	use of a specific probe for ovalbumin messenger rna to quantitate estrogen induced gene transcripts	Use of an estrogen-specific ovalbumin receptor probe to quantify estrogen-induced gene transcripts.
9	structure function relationship in the binding of snake neurotoxins to the torpedo membrane receptor	Structural function ratio in snake neurotoxin binding to torpedo membrane receptor.
9	application of pulsed gradient fourier transform nuclear magnetic resonance to the study of self diffusion of phospholipid vesicles	Application of nuclear magnetic resonance by pulsed gradient Fourier transform at the apos; study of the apos; auto-diffusion of phospholipid vesicles.
9	optical spectra and electronic structure of flavine mononucleotide in flavodoxin crystals	Flavin mononucleotide optical spectrum and electronic structure in flavodoxine crystals.
9	spin label studies of tropomyosin	Tropomyosin spin-marker studies.
9	a practical approach to quantitate hepatic excretory function	Practical approach to quantifying hepatic excretory function.
9	aspartate aminotransferase from wheat germ purification and kinetic properties	Aspartate aminotransferase from the purification of wheat germ and its kinetic properties.
9	model of regulation of the proliferation rate of bone marrow stem cells	Model for Regulating Bone Marrow Stem Cell Proliferation Rate.
9	actinomycin d deoxynucleotide complexes as models for the actinomycin d dna complex the use of nuclear magnetic resonance to determine the stoichiometry and the geometry of the complexes	L' use of nuclear magnetic resonance to determine stoichiometry and geometry of d&apos deoxynucleotide complexes; actinomycin as models of the d&apos complex; l&apos DNA; actinomycin.
9	direct determination of the lamellar structure of peripheral nerve myelin at moderate resolution 7a	Direct determination of peripheral nerve myelin lamellar structure at moderate resolution 7a.
9	in vitro measurement of margin of safety of neuromuscular transmission	In vitro neuromuscular transmission safety margin measurement.
9	a medico genetic study of the population of western pamir vi local genetic differentiation in the populations of western pamir	A medical genetic study of the western pine beetle population; western red pine beetle; western red pine beetle; western red pine beetle; western red pine beetle.
9	viscosity and molecular weight of hyaluronic acids	The molecular weight and the viscosity of the hyaluronic acids.
9	the allosteric properties of beef liver fructose bisphosphatase	Allosteric properties of bovine liver fructose bisphosphatase.
9	kinematics of spontaneous breathing the ventilatory system as a non linear oscillator	The kinematics of spontaneous respiration the ventilatory system like a nonlinear oscillator.
9	the steady state kinetics of the oxygenation of linoleic acid catalysed by soybean lipoxygenase	Soybean lipoxygenase-catalyzed linoleic acid, oxidation and oxygenation.
9	analysis of the kinetics of the transition of cells to dna synthesis in systems with stimulated proliferation ii theoretical bases of the method	Kinetic analysis of cell transition to biosynthesis; DNA in stimulated proliferation systems ii theoretical basis of the method.
9	a two state conformational transition of the extracellular ribonuclease of bacillus amyloliquefaciens barnase induced by sodium dodecyl sulfate	A sodium dodecyl sulfate-induced two-state conformational transition of amyloliquefaciens barnase ribonuclease extracellular.
9	a computational method for calculating distensibility of the blood vessel in vivo	Distensitivity calculation of blood vessels in vivo.
9	inactivation of biologically active dna by gamma ray induced superoxide radicals and their dismutation products singlet molecular oxygen and hydrogen peroxide	Inactivation of the molecule; DNA biologically active by gamma rays induced superoxid radicals and their products of disproportionation, l' molecular oxygen singlet and hydrogen peroxide.
9	an nmr investigation of electron transfer in the copper protein plastocyanin	An nmr study of the transfer of d' electron in plastocyanine copper protein.
9	kinetics of the cooperative association of actin to actin filaments	The kinetics of actin; actin; actin; actin.
9	the response of the ferrous sulphate dosemeter to neutrons	Ferrous sulphate response to neutrons.
9	a possible mechanism of the generation of singlet molecular oxygen in nadph dependent microsomal lipid peroxidation	A possible molecular oxygen production mechanism is singlet in nadpha-dependent microsomal lipid peroxidation.
9	theoretical model of the ionic mechanism of 1 f noise in nerve membrane	Theoretical Model of the Ion Mechanism of Noise 1 f in the Neural Membrane.
9	work of large information systems	The European Union is a world leader in the field of information and communication technology.
9	simulation studies of self associating systems discrimination between specific and isodesmic associations	Simulation Studies of Discrimination of Auto-Associated Systems Between Specific and Isodesmic Associations.
9	a theoretical study of gaseous homeostasis in the magill circuit	A theoretical study of gas homeostasis within the magillary circuit.
9	kinetic manifestations of slow isomerization of allosteric enzyme for the model of monod wyman and changeux	In addition, there are a number of other proteins, such as protein, protein, protein, protein, and protein, that can be used in the treatment of cancer.
9	model for the positional differentiation of the cap in acetabularia	Model for positional cap differentiation in the acetabular.
9	the measurement of the performance of the display system of radioisotope imaging device the multi element band display	Measurement of System Performance; Record Display; Recorder; Radioisotope Imaging; Multi-Element Band Display.
9	structure of the complexes of distamycin type antibiotics and actinomycin d with dna new data on the localization of these antibiotics within the dna narrow groove	Structure of the distamycin-like antibiotic complexes; actinomycin d with new DNA localization data from the narrow pathway of the apo; DNA.
9	compartmental model of the adsorption of a dye by proteins the possible role of adsorption in the hepatic excretion of bromosulphophthalein	In addition, it may be used in conjunction with other substances, such as acetylene, acetylene, acetylene, acetylene, acetylene, acetylene, acetylene, acetylene, acetylene, acetylene and acetylene.
9	numerical determination of intestinal membrane diffusing constants by a gradient method	Numerical intestinal membrane diffusion constants determined by gradient method.
9	derivation of the angle of torsion of the eye	The apo derivation; apo angle; apo torsion angle; apo eye; apo eye; observer.
9	simple formulas for computation of prism vergence and accommodation stimulation in a brewster stereoscope	A simple formula for the calculation of the vergence of the prism and the stimulation of d' accommodation in a stereoscope brewers.
9	in vivo determination of cerebral blood volume with radioactive oxygen 15 in the monkey	In vivo brain blood volume determination with radioactive oxygen 15 in monkeys.
9	criteria for optimising phylogenetic trees and the problem of determining the root of a tree	Abstract Criteria; Phylogenetic Tree Optimization and Root Determination Problem; One Tree.
9	improvements and simplifications of the ozonolysis schiff staining method for plasma lipoproteins on cellulose acetate	Improvement and simplification of the method of schiff staining by ozonolysis for plasma lipoproteins on the cellulose acetate.
9	kinetic analysis of carrier mediated ion transport by the charge pulse technique	A kinetic analysis of the transport of apos; ions by a transporter was carried out using the charge pulse technique.
9	structural requirements for steroid binding and quenching of albumin fluorescence in bovine plasma albumin	Structural requirements for binding of steroids and l' fluorescence extinction of l' albumin in l' bovine plasma albumin.
9	propagation of the action potential in the vicinity of the soma of giant neurons after the hodgkin huxley model	Propagation of d&apos potential; action near giant neuron soma in Hodgkin Huxley model.
9	assembly of three major subclasses of mouse immunoglobulin g a theoretical model for covalent assembly in vivo	Mouse immunoglobulin, a theoretical model for the apos; covalent assembly in vivo.
9	analogue solution for electrical capacity of membrane covered square cylinders in square array at high concentration	Analogous solution for the electrical capacity of high-concentration square-cylinder membrane-covered arrays.
9	comparison of jumping and electrodiffusion mechanisms of particle movement in thin membranes i statement of the problem stationary transfer	Comparison of jump and gap mechanisms; electrodiffusion of particle motion in thin membranes; description of stationary transfer problem.
9	utilization of the inactivation rate of coenzyme a transferase by thiol reagents to determine properties of the enzyme coa intermediate	Inactivation of the coenzyme a transferase by thiol reagents to determine its properties; coa-intermediate enzyme.
9	asymmetric charge distributions in planar bilayer systems	Asymmetric charge distributions have been obtained for planar, double-layer charge systems.
9	study of cycle of cell wall assembly in streptococcus faecalis by three dimensional reconstructions of thin sections of cells	L' study of the cycle of l' assembly of the cell wall in the streptococcus faecalis by three-dimensional reconstruction of thin sections of cells.
9	system analysis of the multi oscillatory functional order in the circadian and ultradian frequency range and its monitoring value for load effects exemplified by a varying light dark regimen in the intensive rearing of sheep	Systemic analysis of apo; multiple oscillatory functional order in the circadian and ultradian frequency ranges and load effects monitoring value illustrated by a dapo regime; variable luminous obscurity in apo; intensive sheep rearing.
9	an evaluation of statistical procedures designed to detect outliers resulting from a light degree of contamination in random samples of moderate size	Evaluation of statistical procedures for detecting outliers resulting from a slight degree of contamination in medium sized random samples.
9	conformational transitions of polypeptides in ternary solvent systems	Conformational polypeptide transitions in ternary solvent systems.
9	errors in the measurement of total respiratory resistance and reactance by forced oscillations	Errors in measuring total respiratory resistance and total respiratory reactivity by means of forced oscillations.
9	recording of ventricular pressure by conventional catheter manometer systems efficiency of several combinations of conventional catheters modern transducers and catheter flush systems author s transl	Conventional Catheter Manometer Systems Ventricular Pressure Recording Effectiveness of Several Conventional Catheter Combinations Modern Transducers and Catheter Rinse Systems Translators.
9	interaction of aminoacyl trna synthetases and trna positive and negative cooperativity of their active centres	Aminoacyl trna synthetase interaction and positive and negative trna cooperation of their active centers.
9	transfer free energies and average static accessibilities for ribonuclease a in guanidinium hydrochloride and urea solutions	Transfer the free energies and mean static a ribonuclease accessibilities into guanidinium and d&apos hydrochloride urea solutions.
9	the sedimentation equilibrium of heterogeneously associating systems and mixtures of non interacting solutes analysis without determination of molecular weight averages	L' settling equilibria of heterogeneous association systems and l&apos mixtures; solute analysis without interaction without molecular weight averaging.
9	chemical studies on yeast hexokinase specific modification of a single tyrosyl residue with 1 ethyl 3 3 dimethylaminopropyl carbodiimide	Chemical studies on the specific modification of the yeast yeast hexokinase d' a single tyrosyl residue with the carbodiimide of 1 ethyl-3 dimethylaminopropyl-3 methyl carbodiimide.
9	flow cytofluorometric analysis of cell cycle distributions using propidium iodide properties of the method and mathematical analysis of the data	Continuous flow cytofluorometric analysis of the cell cycle using the properties of the method; propidium iodide and l' mathematical analysis of the data.
9	analysis of afferent responses from isolated semicircular canal of the guitarfish using rotational acceleration white noise inputs ii estimation of linear system parameters and gain and phase spectra	Analysis of the relative responses of the semi-circular channel isolated from the fish-guitar to l' help from d' white noise inputs d' rotational acceleration ii estimation of the parameters of the linear system and the gain and phase spectra.
9	conformational characteristics of luliberin circular dichroism and fluorescence studies	Conformational Features of Luliberin Circular Dichroism and Fluorescence Studies.
9	the epr of low spin heme complexes relation of the t2g hole model to the directional properties of the g tensor and a new method for calculating the ligand field parameters	The relationship of low-spin t2g hole model heme to g tensor directional properties and a new method for calculating ligand field parameters.
9	reaction of cis and trans isomers of platinum ii diamminedichloride with purine adensine and its derivatives in dilute solutions	Reaction of cis- and trans-isomers of platinum diamedichloride ii with l' adensine purine and its derivatives in dilute solutions.
9	mathematical analysis of myelin structure of nerves of the brachial plexus in antenatal and early postnatal ontogenesis of man	Mathematical analysis of the structure of the myelin of brachial plexus nerves in the pre- and early post-natal ontogeny of men.
9	a simplified approach to the measurement of specific airway resistance	A simplified approach for measuring specific resistance of airways.
9	serological study of several strains of foot and mouth disease virus type o isolated in europe between 1971 and 1975 application of the biomathematical system of classification	Serological study of several types of foot-and-mouth disease (FMD) viruses isolated in Europe between 1971 and 1975 using the biomathematic classification system.
9	pressure jump relaxation kinetics of frog skin open circuit voltage and short circuit current	Frog skin's kinetic pressure jumps tension frog skin in open circuit and short-current circuit.
9	normal values in clinical electrooculography iii numerical evaluation of two dimensionless eog parameters	Normal Values in Clinical Electrooculography iii Numerical Evaluation of Eog Parameters without Dimensions in Two Dimensions.
9	the momentum of population growth with time dependent net maternity function	It is important to note that the majority of women in the labour force are employed in the labour force.
9	a proposal for revision of the quality factor	The quality factor should be reviewed at least every two years to ensure that it is consistent with the quality criteria.
9	resolution of electron microscope autoradiography iv application to analysis of autoradiographs	E-microscopic autoradiography and autoradiography application; autoradiograph analysis.
9	occurrence of an uncoupler resistant intermediate type of phosphate water oxygen exchange reaction catalyzed by heart submitochondrial particles	D&apos event; an intermediate reaction; d&apos exchange; oxygen; phosphate- and decoupling-resistant water, catalyzed by cardiac mitochondrial-like particles.
9	the microfilarial load in the anterior segment of the eye a parameter of intensity of onchocerciasis	Microfilament charge in the anterior segment of the eye, a parameter that can be used to determine the intensity of onchocerciasis.
9	water and electrolyte acquisition across the placenta of the sheep	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used by the sheep.
9	size and density of fibrin fibers from turbidity	Fibrin fiber size and density from turbidity.
9	on the use of calibration equations in perception research	On the apo; use of the apo calibration equations; use of apo equations; calibration in perceptual research research research on perception.
9	clinical application of a single compartment model to urea and creatinine kinetics in dialysis therapy	Clinical application of urea, urea, and creatinine in dialysis treatment, a single-compartment model of urea and urea kinetics.
9	open field behavior in mice generality of results from a diallel analysis of replicate selected lines	Field-Based Behaviour in the Mouse Field-Based Analysis of Selected Replicated Breeding Lines.
9	albumin clearance from alveoli tissue permeation vs airway displacement	The clearance of l' albumin from permeation of the alveolar tissue versus displacement of the airways.
9	kinetics of bilirubin binding to bovine serum albumin and the effects of palmitate	Bilirubin binding kinetics at apos; bovine serum albumin and palmitate effects.
9	mechanodynamics at the interventricular sulcus reciprocal effect of the ventricles on the ventricular function	Apos-level mechanodynamics; reciprocal effect of ventricular interventricular grooves on ventricular function.
9	electronic conformational interactions of molecular biological systems i quantum chemical aspect of the theory of electronic conformational interaction	Conformational Electronic Interactions in Molecular Biological Systems i quantum chemical aspect of electronic conformational interaction theory.
9	systems matching by degeneration ii interpretation of the generation and degeneration of retinal ganglion cells in the chicken by a mathematical model	Degeneration-related systems ii. interpretation of retinal ganglion cell generation and degeneration in chicken; a mathematical model.
9	stereological analysis of reinke s crystals in human leydig cells	Stereological analysis of the crystals of reindeer in leucoded human cells.
9	quantitative structure activity relationships vi non linear dependence of biological activity on hydrophobic character calculation procedures for bilinear model	Quantitative relationships between the structures and the apo; nonlinear vi-dependence of the apo; biological activity on the procedures for calculating the hydrophobic characters for the bilinear model.
9	heritability estimates from twin studies i formulae of heritability estimates	It is important to keep in mind that it is not possible to estimate the impact of the project on the population.
9	spectroscopic studies of specifically deuterium labeled membrane systems nuclear magnetic resonance investigation of the effects of cholesterol in model systems	Spectroscopic studies of specifically deuterium-labelled membrane systems Nuclear magnetic resonance studies of cholesterol effects in model systems.
9	influence of viscosity of enzymatic reactions studied with glucoamylase of aspergillus niger	The influence of the viscosity of the enzymatic reactions was studied with the glucoamylase d' aspergillus niger.
9	steady state turnover and body pool of ascorbic acid in man	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with those of other studies.
9	ring current effects in the conformation dependent nmr chemical shifts of aliphatic protons in the basic pancreatic trypsin inhibitor	The effects of ring current in chemical nmr shifts dependent on the conformation of aliphatic protons in the basic pancreatic trypsin inhibitor.
9	an automated study of eeg a method of detection of non stationary points	The results of this study will be used to evaluate the effectiveness of the method in detecting non-stationary station points.
9	structure of the dimyristoylphosphatidylcholine vesicle and the complex formed by its interaction with apolipoprotein c iii x ray small angle scattering studies	The structure of dimyristoylphosphatidylcholine vesicle and its interaction complex with apos; apolipoprotein c iii x rays was studied by low-angle scattering.
9	conformation as the determinant of saccharide binding in concanavalin a ca2 concanavalin a complexes	Conformation determines saccharide binding in concanavalin, concanavalin, and concanavalin a ca2 complexes.
9	peritubular capillary control of proximal tubule reabsorption in the rat	Peritubular capillary control of rat proximal tubular reabsorption.
9	instantaneous pressure volume relationship of right atrium during isovolumic contraction in canine heart	An instantaneous relationship between the volume of pressure in the right atrium and the volume of pressure in the dog's heart.
9	light propagation in twisted anisotropic media application to photoreceptors	The propagation of light in an anisotropic, twisted medium applied to the photoreceptors.
9	heat stress upon undressed man due to different combinations of elevated environmental temperature air humidity and metabolic heat production a critical comparison of heat stress indices	Heat stress on the skin; unclothed man due to various combinations of high environmental temperature humidity of the skin; air and the metabolic production of heat a critical comparison of the indices of heat stress.
9	possibility of the spectral analysis of heterogeneous biological systems the determination of the mycelium concentration of actinomyces aureofaciens a producer of tetracycline cultured on a medium with corn meal	Possibility of use; spectral analysis of heterogeneous biological systems; determination of mycelial concentration; actinomyces aureofaciens, a tetracycline producer grown on cornmeal medium.
9	method for computing motion in a two dimensional cochlear model	Two-dimensional cochlear model motion calculation method.
9	the orientations of reaction center transition moments in the chromatophore membrane of rhodopseudomonas sphareroides bases on new linear dichroism and photoselection measurements	The orientations of the reaction center transition moments in the rhodopseudomonas sphareroides chromatophore membrane are based on new linear photoselection and dichroism measurements.
9	synthesis and degradation of xanthine dehydrogenase in chick liver in vivo and in vitro studies	Synthesis and degradation of chicken liver xanthine dehydrogenase in vivo and in vitro.
9	dna replication in hela cells after gamma irradiation ii the periodicity of dna replication in the process of giant cell formation	Replication of DNA in helical cells following gamma irradiation ii periodicity of replication of DNA in the giant cell formation process.
9	theory of binaural interaction based on auditory nerve data iii joint dependence on interaural time and amplitude differences in discrimination and detection	L&apos theory; binural interaction based on hearing-nervous data; articular dependence on speech; consideration of interaural time and interfacial differences; magnitude of discrimination and detection.
9	a method for the determination of amitriptyline and its metabolites nortriptyline 10 hydroxyamitriptyline and 10 hydroxynortriptyline in human plasma using stable isotope dilution and gas chromatography chemical ionization mass spectrometry gc cims	A method for the determination of 10 hydroxyamitriptyline and 10 hydroxyamitriptyline metabolites in human plasma at apos, assisted by stable isotope dilution and gc cims chemical ionization mass spectrometry gas chromatography.
9	analysis of the adolescent growth spurt using smoothing spline functions	Analysis of growth spurt; adolescent at age; smoothing splines helps.
9	curve of labeled mitoses with different states of cell proliferation kinetics v effect of the circadian rhythm of cell proliferation on the shape of the labeled mitosis curve	Line of marked mitoses with different states of cell proliferation kinetics has a marked mitosis curve shape dependent on the circadian rhythm of cell proliferation.
9	evolutionary potential a mathematical hypothesis of mouse hemoglobin beta chain evolution	It's the same thing, but it's not the same thing, but it's the same thing.
9	kinetics of tryptophan transport into the brain	Kinetics of brain tryptophan transport.
9	role of surface distribution of hydrophobic groups in the assembly of protein quaternary structure	Role of hydrophobic group surface distribution in protein synthesis; quaternary structure assembly.
9	spike transmission in statistical neuronal ensembles induced epileptic focus in a model of hippocampal field ca3	In addition, it is not possible to predict the exact location of the neural mass of the neuron.
10	resistance and cross resistance of escherichia coli s mutants to the radiomimetic agent proflavine	Resistance and cross-resistance of d&apos mutants; escherichia coli; proflavin radiomimetic agent.
10	tryptophan and indole excreting prototrophic mutant of escherichia coli	Tryptophan and l' indole excreted the prototrophic mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	cross resistance relationships in escherichia coli between ultraviolet radiation and nitrous acid	Ultraviolet radiation – nitrogen acid cross-resistance relationships in Escherichia coli.
10	thymineless mutation site on escherichia coli chromosome	Site of mutation without thymine on the d' Escherichia coli chromosome.
10	mutational synergism between radiations and methylated purines in escherichia coli	Mutation Synergism between Radiation and Methylated Purines in Escherichia coli.
10	isolation and properties of a putrescine degrading mutant of escherichia coli	In addition, it has been shown that the presence of a mutant, Escherichia coli, degrades putrescine.
10	effect of drug resistance factor r on the f properties of escherichia coli	Effect of r-resistance factor on faeces; escherichia coli.
10	gene transfer by f strains of escherichia coli iv effect of a chromosomal deletion on chromosome transfer	In this case, it is not possible to determine which genes are transferred from which strains to which ones.
10	new type of streptomycin resistance resulting from action of the episomelike mutator factor in escherichia coli	Episomic mutator factor action in escherichia coli.
10	proline metabolism in escherichia coli ii regulation of total growth of a proline auxotroph by a proline oxidizing system	Proline metabolism in escherichia coli ii regulates the total growth of escherichia coli; proline auxotroph by a proline-oxidizing system.
10	resistance and cross resistance of escherichia coli s mutants to the radiomimetic agent nitrofurazone	Resistance and cross-resistance of the nitrofurazone radiomimetic agent, Escherichia coli; d&apos mutants.
10	fructose 1 6 diphosphatase and acid hexose phosphatase of escherichia coli	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent to which the drug is administered.
10	kinetic and genetic analyses of d cycloserine inhibition and resistance in escherichia coli	Kinetic and genetic analysis of escherichia coli d cycloserin inhibition and resistance.
10	metabolism of glutamic acid in a mutant of escherichia coli	It is not possible to predict the effects of the drug on the immune system.
10	bacteriophage common to pasteurella pestis and escherichia coli	The common bacteriophage of pasteurella pestis and lapos; escherichia coli.
10	suppression of a lac o o mutation in escherichia coli	Deletion of an Escherichia coli gene mutation.
10	gene recombination and segregation of resistance factor r in escherichia coli	Genetic recombination and r-resistance factor segregation in Escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage induced functions in escherichia coli k lambda infected with rii mutants of bacteriophage t4	Bacteriophage-induced functions of escherichia coli k lambda, infected with bacteriophage t4 rii mutants, were observed.
10	chromosomal location of thymine and arginine genes in escherichia coli and an f incorporating them	Chromosomal localization of the thymine and l&apos genes; arginine in escherichia coli and a f incorporant thereof.
10	analysis of a gene controlling cell division and sensitivity to radiation in escherichia coli	A gene that controls cell division and radiation sensitivity in Escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal aberrations associated with mutations to bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli	Chromosome aberrations associated with bacteriophage resistance mutations in Escherichia coli.
10	isolation of mutants affecting tryptophanase production in escherichia coli	Isolate mutants that affect Escherichia coli tryptophanase production.
10	genetic analysis of tryptophanase mutants of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of Escherichia coli tryptophanase mutants.
10	autoradiographic studies of bacterial chromosome replication in amino acid deficient escherichia coli 15t	Autoradiographic bacterial chromosomal replication studies in 15t-amino acid-deficient escherichia coli.
10	nature of the effector of catabolite repression of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Nature of the bacterium; effector of catabolic beta galactosidase repression in escherichia coli.
10	effect of 9 beta d arabinofuranosyladenine on polymer synthesis in a polyauxotrophic strain of escherichia coli	The effect of 9 beta of arabinofuranosyladenine on the synthesis of the polymers in a polyauxotrophic strain of d' escherichia coli.
10	genetics of host controlled restriction and modification of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	The genetics of host-mediated restriction and deoxyribonucleic acid modification in Escherichia coli are both controlled by the host.
10	loss and repair of conjugal fertility and infectivity of the resistance factor and sex factor in escherichia coli	Loss and repair of marital fertility and disease; resistance and sex in Escherichia coli.
10	properties and regulation of the beta d galactosidase in shigella dysenteriae and in escherichia coli shigella dysenteriae hybrids	Properties and regulation of beta dgalactosidase in hybrids shigella dysenteriae and escherichia coli shigella dysenteriae.
10	intracellular forms of lambda deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli infected with clear or virulent mutants of bacteriophage lambda	Intracellular forms of etapos; deoxyribonucleic acid lambda in Escherichia coli infected with virulent or clear mutants of lambda bacteriophage.
10	distribution and function of genes concerned with aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Distribution and function of aromatic biosynthetic genes in escherichia coli.
10	biosynthesis of riboflavine by a purine requiring mutant strain of escherichia coli	Riboflavin biosynthesis by a mutant purine strain of apos; escherichia coli.
10	genetic instability in escherichia coli	L' Escherichia coli genetic instability.
10	the biosynthesis of alkaline phosphatase with a particulate fraction of escherichia coli	Biosynthesis of alkaline phosphatase with escherichia coli particulate fraction.
10	the synthesis of ribosomes by a mutant of escherichia coli	Ribosome synthesis by escherichia coli mutant.
10	mutants of escherichia coli variably resistant to bacteriophage t1	Mutants of d' escherichia coli vary in their resistance to the bacteriophage t1.
10	gene controlling the uptake of shikimic acid by escherichia coli	A substance that has been found to be carcinogenic or carcinogenic.
10	location of the maltose a and b loci on the genetic map of escherichia coli	Localization of maltosis loci a and b on Escherichia coli genetic map.
10	evidence for two mechanisms of photoreactivation in escherichia coli b	Two photoreactivation mechanisms have been demonstrated in Escherichia coli b.
10	conditional mutations involving septum formation in escherichia coli	Conditional septum-forming mutations in escherichia coli.
10	genetic and biochemical analysis of the isoenzymes concerned in the first reaction of aromatic biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Genetic and biochemical analysis of isoenzymes involved in the first escherichia coli aromatic biosynthetic reaction.
10	sensitivity of escherichia coli to atabrine conferred by r factor and its potential clinical significance	Escherichia coli susceptibility to r-factor atabrine and its potential clinical importance.
10	inducible system for the utilization of beta glucosides in escherichia coli i active transport and utilization of beta glucosides	Inducible System for Disease Control; Use of Beta-Glucosides in Active Transport of Apos; Escherichia coli and Use of Beta-Glucosides.
10	inducible system for the utilization of beta glucosides in escherichia coli ii description of mutant types and genetic analysis	Inducible System for Disease Control; use of beta-glucosides in Escherichia coli ii description of the types of mutants and genetic analysis.
10	inversion of transfer modes and sex factor chromosome interactions in conjugation in escherichia coli	Inversion of the sex-factor transfer patterns and chromosomal interactions in Escherichia coli conjugation.
10	induction of capsular polysaccharide synthesis by rho fluorophenylalanine in escherichia coli wild type and strains with altered phenylalanyl soluble ribonucleic acid synthetase	Rho fluorophenylalanine induced capsular polysaccharide synthesis in wild escherichia coli and phenylalanyl-soluble ribonucleic acid synthetase strains.
10	suppression of radiation sensitivity and capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 by ochre suppressors	The suppression of radiation sensitivity and synthesis of capsular polysaccharides in escherichia coli k12 by ochre suppressants.
10	selection of sucrose dependent escherichia coli to obtain envelope mutants and fragile cultures	Sucrose-dependent Escherichia coli selection for apo mutants; envelope and fragile cultures.
10	mutagenesis in escherichia coli by visible light	Effect of chloroform and chloroform on fish and fish habitat.
10	chromosomal location of the structural gene for glycerol kinase in escherichia coli	Chromosomal localization of escherichia coli glycerol kinase structural gene.
10	unusual growth characteristics of a methionine cyano b12 auxotroph of escherichia coli	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of tumours, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
10	azure mutants a type of host dependent mutant of the bacteriophage f2	Azur mutants, a host-dependent mutant of bacteriophage f2.
10	thymineless death in escherichia coli strain specificity	Death without thymine in the specificity of the strains of d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of mutant strains of escherichia coli requiring p aminobenzoic acid for growth	Genetic analysis of mutant Escherichia coli strains that require paminobenzoic acid (PBAC) for growth.
10	metabolism of thymineless mutants of escherichia coli i absence of thymidylate synthetase activity and growth characteristics of two sequential thymineless mutants	Metabolism of thymine-free mutants, escherichia coli, thymidylate synthetase activity, and growth characteristics of two thymine-free sequential mutants.
10	genetic mapping of mutations affecting phosphoglucose isomerase and fructose diphosphatase in escherichia coli	Genetic Mapping of Mutations Affecting Phosphoglucose Isomerase and Fructose Diphosphatase in Escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene of escherichia coli b	Escherichia coli mutant gene b.
10	giant cells of escherichia coli	Escherichia coli.
10	ubiquinone deficiency in an auxotroph of escherichia coli requiring 4 hydroxybenzoic acid	Ubiquinone deficiency; a 4-hydroxybenzoic acid auxotroph; escherichia coli.
10	cell wall composition and virulence in escherichia coli	Composition and virulence of escherichia coli cell wall.
10	genetic analysis of glutamate transport and glutamate decarboxylase in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis for glutamate and glutamate decarboxylase transport in escherichia coli.
10	effects of streptomycin deprivation on enzyme synthesis in streptomycin dependent escherichia coli	Epos; streptomycin deficiency on streptomycin-dependent escherichia coli enzyme synthesis.
10	acridine binding by escherichia coli ph dependency and strain differences	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	properties of mitomycin c sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Properties of 12-k mitoximin-sensitive mutants; escherichia coli.
10	temperature sensitive chloramphenicol acetyltransferase from escherichia coli carrying mutant r factors	Chloramphenicol acetyltransferase, a heat-sensitive enzyme, carries the mutant factors.
10	dominance studies with stable merodiploids in the d serine deaminase system of escherichia coli k 12	Dominance studies with stable mero-diploids in the serine deaminase d system of l' escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic basis of colicin e susceptibility in escherichia coli i isolation and properties of refractory mutants and the preliminary mapping of their mutations	Genetic basis of colicine sensitivity in apos; isolation of escherichia coli and refractory mutant properties and preliminary mutation mapping.
10	streptomycin resistance mutation in escherichia coli altered ribosomal protein	The mutation in resistance to streptomycin in escherichia coli altered the ribosomal protein.
10	the control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli by o acetyl l serine	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in ribonucleoside and deoxyribonucleoside catabolism	Mutants of apos; escherichia coli defective in the catabolism of ribonucleosides and deoxyribonucleosides.
10	selection of a mutant of escherichia coli which has high mutation rates	In addition, the genetic makeup of the mutant is not known.
10	genetic determination of resistance to acriflavine phenethyl alcohol and sodium dodecyl sulfate in escherichia coli	Genetic Determination of Resistance to Apos, Acriflavin, Phenethyl Alcohol and Sodium Dodecyl Sulfate in Escherichia coli.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light i effect of rec mutations on liquid holding recovery	Ultraviolet light-irradiated escherichia coli; dark effects of mutations on the recovery of the retention fluid.
10	analysis of melibiose mutants deficient in alpha galactosidase and thiomethylgalactoside permease ii in escherichia coli k 12	L' analysis of alpha-galactosidase- and thiomethylgalactoside-permease-deficient melibiosis mutants ii in escherichia coli k12 was performed.
10	genetic and biochemical analysis of the biotin loci of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic and biochemical analysis of Escherichia coli k.
10	factors influencing the survival and revival of heat treated escherichia coli	Acute and chronic toxicity to fish and invertebrates in the Great Lakes basin.
10	lysis inhibition in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t4	Bacteriophage t4 infected Escherichia coli inhibited lysis.
10	transcription and intragenic recombination in polar mutants of escherichia coli	Intragenic transcription and recombination in polar d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	genetic mapping of loci for glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase and gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrase in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase, gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase, and gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrase loci in escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with an altered tryptophanyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase	Escherichia coli d&apos mutants with a modified tryptophanyl ribonucleic transfer synthetase.
10	localization and regulation of synthesis of nitrate reductase in escherichia coli	Localization and regulation of reductase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	positive control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli isolation characterization and mapping oc cysteineless mutants of e coli k12	Positive control of sulfate reduction in characterization; isolation of escherichia coli; isolation of escherichia coli and mapping of mutants of cysteine-free e coli k12 mutants.
10	positive control of sulphate reduction in escherichia coli the nature of the pleiotropic cysteineless mutants of e coli k12	Positive control of sulfate reduction in escherichia coli pleiotropic mutants without protein of e coli k12 mutants.
10	genetic location of certain mutations conferring recombination deficiency in escherichia coli	Genetic localization of selected recombination-deficient mutations in escherichia coli.
10	synthesis of an s adenosylmethionine cleaving enzyme in t3 infected escherichia coli and its disturbance by co infection with enzymatically incompetent bacteriophage	Synthesis d' an enzyme that cleaves l' adenosylmethionine in escherichia coli infected with t3 and perturbed by co-infection with an enzymatically incompetent bacteriophage.
10	acridine sensitivity of bacteriophage t2h in escherichia coli	The sensitivity of the bacteriophage t2h to acridine in Escherichia coli.
10	identification of closely linked loci controlling ultraviolet sensitivity and refractivity to colicin e2 in escherichia coli	Identification of tightly linked ultraviolet sensitivity and colicin e2 refractivity loci in escherichia coli.
10	phospholipid synthesis in escherichia coli infected with t4 bacteriophages	Phospholipid synthesis in bacteriophage t4 infected Escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli strains that excrete an inhibitor of colicin b	In addition to the above, there are a number of other antimicrobials that have been implicated in the production of the drug.
10	genetic analysis of the maltose a region in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli maltose a genetic analysis.
10	correlation between the rate of ribonucleic acid synthesis and the level of valyl transfer ribonucleic acid in mutants of escherichia coli	Correlation between rate of synthesis of ribonucleic acid and rate of transfer of valyl ribonucleic acid in d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	chromosome transfer from f lac strains of escherichia coli k 12 mutant at reca recb or recc	Chromosome transfer from the k12 d&apos mutant; escherichia coli isolates to reca or recc.
10	carbohydrate accumulation and metabolism in escherichia coli the close linkage and chromosomal location of ctr mutations	In addition, there is no evidence that the mutant is mutagenic or that the mutant is mutagenic or is mutagenic.
10	effects of oleate starvation in a fatty acid auxotroph of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
10	nonrandom mutagenesis of the escherichia coli genome by nitrosoguanidine	In addition, the genomes of Escherichia coli are not randomized to each other.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 unable to form ubiquinone	It is not possible to determine the identity of the mutant.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism of escherichia coli xv biochemical properties of mutants resistant to thiaisoleucine	Isoleucine and valine metabolism of thiaisoleucine-resistant mutants.
10	site and gene specific limited heterocatalytic expression in bacteriophage t4 infected escherichia coli	L' heterocatalytic expression in escherichia coli bacteriophage t4 was restricted to the site and to the specific gene.
10	phenotypic suppression in escherichia coli by chloramphenicol and other reversible inhibitors of the ribosome	Phenotypic suppression by chloramphenicol and d' other reversible ribosome inhibitors in Escherichia coli.
10	ferrous activated nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide linked dehydrogenase from a mutant of escherichia coli capable of growth on 1 2 propanediol	Adenine dinucleotide-linked dehydrogenase d*apos activated iron nicotinamide; a d*apos; escherichia coli mutant capable of growing on 12 propanediol.
10	catabolite repression in escherichia coli a study of two hypotheses	Two hypotheses are presented for catabolic repression in escherichia coli.
10	anthranilate synthetase an enzyme specified by the tryptophan operon of escherichia coli comparative studies on the complex and the subunits	L' anthranilate synthetase is an enzyme specified by d' d&apos tryptophan operon; and escherichia coli in complex and sub-unit comparative studies.
10	nonsense suppression in a multiauxotrophic derivative of escherichia coli 15t identification and consequences of an amber triplet in the deoxyribomutase gene	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that deoxyribomutase is a major component of deoxyribonucleosis.
10	loss of host controlled restriction of lambda bacteriophage in escherichia coli following methionine deprivation	Loss of controlled restriction of the host of the bacteriophage lambda by methionine deprivation in Escherichia coli.
10	effect of infection with ribonucleic acid bacteriophage r23 on the inducible synthesis of beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	Effect of apos; bacteriophage r23 infection of apos; ribonucleic acid on inducible beta-galactosidase synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k bacteriophages i isolation and introductory characterization of five escherichia coli k bacteriophages	Bacteriophage isolation; bacteriophage isolation; bacteriophage isolation; bacteriophage isolation; bacteriophage isolation; bacteriophage isolation.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid replication in lambda bacteriophage mutants	Replication of deoxyribonucleic acid (LDNA) in mutants of the lambda bacteriophage.
10	replication of t4rii bacteriophage in escherichia coli k 12 lambda	Replication of bacteriophage t4rii in Escherichia coli k12, lambda.
10	coresistance to neomycin and kanamycin by mutations in an escherichia coli locus that affects ribosomes	Neomycin and kanamycin resistance by mutation in a ribosomal d' escherichia coli locus.
10	regulation of glyoxylate metabolism in escherichia coli k 12	The regulation of escherichia coli k12 glyoxylate metabolism.
10	iron transport in escherichia coli relationship between chromium sensitivity and high iron requirement in mutants of escherichia coli	Chromatology of Chromatosis and Chromatosis in Escherichia coli in the United States: a report prepared by the Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	iron transport in escherichia coli roles of energy dependent uptake and 2 3 dihydroxybenzoylserine	Iron transport in escherichia coli; apos-dependent absorption; energy and 2,3 dihydroxybenzoylserin.
10	arabinose leucine deletion mutants of escherichia coli b r	Escherichia coli b r. leucine arabinose deletion mutants.
10	antipolarity in the ilv operon of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to note that there is a need for additional information on this issue.
10	mutation in escherichia coli k 12 mediating spherelike envelopes and changes tolerance to ultraviolet irradiation and some antibiotics	Escherichia coli k 12 mutation mediates spherical envelopes and alters tolerance to ultraviolet irradiation and certain antibiotics.
10	induction by mercuric ion of extensive degradation of cellular ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	In the absence of evidence, it is not possible to conclude from this study that the toxicity of acrylonitrile to aquatic organisms is unknown.
10	corepressor system for catabolite repression of the lac operon in escherichia coli	Catabolic repression corepression system for escherichia coli lac operon.
10	some properties of excision defective recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Some recombination-deficient and excision-deficient d' escherichia coli k12 mutants.
10	regulator gene controlling enzymes concerned in tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli	A regulatory gene that regulates the enzymes involved in the biosynthesis of tyrosine in escherichia coli.
10	nitrate reductase complex of escherichia coli k 12 isolation and characterization of mutants unable to reduce nitrate	Nitrate reductase complex d' escherichia coli k12, isolation and characterization of nitrate-reducing mutants.
10	mutant of escherichia coli with anomalous cell division and ability to decrease episomally and chromosomally mediated resistance to ampicillin and several other antibiotics	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that resistance to any of these antibiotics is associated with the development of resistance to any of these drugs.
10	escherichia coli mutant with elevated nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced oxidase activity	A mutant of d' Escherichia coli with a high content of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reduced the level of apos; oxidase activity.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli p1 transduction	Characterization of Pyridoxine Transduction auxotrophs p1 d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and mapping of polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of escherichia coli	Isolate and map polynucleotide phosphorylase d' escherichia coli.
10	characterization of polynucleotide phosphorylase mutants of escherichia coli	Polynucleotide phosphorylase d' escherichia coli mutants characterization.
10	ribonucleic acid synthesis and glutamate excretion in escherichia coli	L&apos synthesis; escherichia coli ribonucleic acid and glutamate excretion.
10	infectious drug resistance among clinically isolated escherichia coli	Acute and chronic respiratory infections in the United States: an epidemiological study.
10	interaction of the exr and lon genes in escherichia coli	Exr and lon in escherichia coli.
10	paradoxical effect of weak inducers on the lac operon of escherichia coli	It is important to note that the use of low-inducing agents is not a substitute for low-inducing agents.
10	erythromycin resistant mutant of escherichia coli with altered ribosomal protein component	Mutant d' escherichia coli resistant to erythromycin and with altered protein ribosomal component.
10	an analysis of the ribosomal ribonucleic acids of escherichia coli by hybridization techniques	Dose analysis of ribosomal ribonucleic acids, escherichia coli, using DNA hybridization techniques.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light ii effect of uvr genes on liquid holding recovery	Ultraviolet light-irradiated escherichia coli recovery process; dark effect of genes on retained fluid recovery.
10	kasugamycin resistance 30s ribosomal mutation with an unusual location on the escherichia coli chromosome	Ribosomal mutation 30s of kasugamycin resistance with unusual chromosomal localization on d' escherichia coli.
10	specificity and efficiency of thymidine incorporation in escherichia coli lacking thymidine phosphorylase	Specificity and Effectiveness of Thymidine Incorporation in Thymidine Phosphorylase-Deficient Escherichia coli.
10	regulation of 3 deoxy d arabino heptulosonic 7 phosphate acid synthetase activity in relation to the synthesis of the aromatic vitamins in escherichia coli k 12	Regulation of l' deoxy arabino heptulosonic activity 7 phosphate acid synthetase in relation to aromatic vitamin synthesis in escherichia coli k 12.
10	escherichia coli ras locus its involvement in radiation repair	Escherichia coli ras locus has been implicated in radiation repair.
10	nitrate reductase complex of escherichia coli k 12 participation of specific formate dehydrogenase and cytochrome b1 components in nitrate reduction	Nitrate reductase complex d' escherichia coli k 12 participation in nitrate reduction by specific components of formate dehydrogenase and cytochrome b1.
10	leakiness of pleiotropic maltose negative bacteriophage lambda resistant mutants of escherichi coli k 12	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
10	unlinking of cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication in a temperature sensitive deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis mutant of escherichia coli	Deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid in a temperature-sensitive mutant of l&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid of escherichia coli.
10	polarity in gene arab of the l arabinose operon in escherichia coli b r	Polarity in the arab gene of Escherichia coli b r.
10	catabolite repression gene of escherichia coli	The gene for catabolic repression of apos; escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12 carrying rec mutations cotransducible with thya	L' genetic analysis of recombinant-deficient mutants; 12 c. escherichia coli carrying thya-reducible mutations.
10	presence of nuclear bodies in some minicells of escherichia coli	A few mini-cells of Escherichia coli contain nuclear bodies.
10	regulation of the escherichia coli tryptophan operon by early reactions in the aromatic pathway	Regulation of tryptophan d' Escherichia coli operon via early aromatic reactions.
10	mechanism of 3 methylanthranilic acid derepression of the tryptophan operon in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli derepression mechanisms; tryptophan operon by apos; methylanthranilic acid 3.
10	resistance of escherichia coli to penicillins vi purification and characterization of the chromosomally mediated penicillinase present in ampa containing strains	Apos resistance; vi penicillin purification escherichia coli and chromosomally mediated penicillinase characterization in ampa strains containing strains.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli permitting replication of two f factors	A d' escherichia coli mutant that replicates two f.
10	origin and direction of dna synthesis in e coli b r	Origin and direction of biosynthesis; e coli DNA b r.
10	phi x 174 bacteriophage structural mutants which affect deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	Phi x 174 structural bacteriophage mutants that affect the synthesis of l' deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	induction of helical arrays of ribosomes by vinblastine sulfate in escherichia coli	Vinblastine sulfate induced helical ribosomal arrangements in escherichia coli.
10	colicin tolerant mutants of escherichia coli resistance of membranes to colicin e1	Colicine-tolerant membrane resistance mutants e1 d' escherichia coli.
10	energy coupling in the lactose transport system of escherichia coli	Dapos coupling; energy in lactose transport system; escherichia coli.
10	structure and function of e coli ribosomes 8 cold sensitive mutants defective in ribosome assembly	Ribosome structure and function; 8 cold-sensitive mutants incapable of assembling ribosomes.
10	sensitization of anoxic recombination deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 to x rays by triacetoneamine n oxyl	Sensitization of d' escherichia coli k12 mutants defective in anoxic recombination with n-oxyl-n-oxyl-triacetoneamine x-ray.
10	studies with bacteriophage phi ii events following infection of male and female derivatives of escherichia coli k 12	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is important to determine the cause of the infection.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli chromosomal position of linkage group i	Characterization of Pyridoxin auxotrophs d' Escherichia coli in chromosomal linkage group i.
10	effect of r factors and other plasmids on ultraviolet susceptibility and host cell reactivation property of escherichia coli	The effects of other plasmids on the susceptibility to ultraviolet radiation and on the reactivation properties of the host cells of Apos; escherichia coli.
10	mutator gene studies in escherichia coli	Studies of mutant genes in Escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to nalidixic acid genetic mapping and dominance studies	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 resistant to genetic mapping of l' nalidixic acid and dominance studies.
10	expression of the arginine regulon of escherichia coli w evidence for a second regulatory gene	In addition, there was no evidence of the presence of a second regulator gene, and no evidence of the presence of a second regulator gene.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli with temperature sensitive streptomycin protein	Escherichia coli mutant with a temperature-sensitive streptomycin protein.
10	segregation into and replication of plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in chromosomeless segregants of escherichia coli	Segregants without d' escherichia coli chromosomes segregated and replicated deoxyribonucleic plasmidic acid.
10	biosynthesis of 4 aminobenzoate in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli 4 aminobenzoate biosynthesis.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and cell division in a lon mutant of escherichia coli	It is not possible to determine the genetic makeup of the mutant, but it is possible to determine its genetic makeup.
10	identification of the puri locus in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, there is a lack of information on the prevalence of cervical cancer.
10	3 phosphoserine transaminase mutants of escherichia coli b	Phosphoserine transaminase (PCR) mutants; c.
10	dominance of ultraviolet radiation resistance in partial diploids of escherichia coli k 12	The dominance of ultraviolet-resistance in the partial diploid d' escherichia coli k12 was found to be dominant.
10	second pyridine nucleotide independent 1 alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, it has been shown that there are no significant differences between the two groups.
10	effect of the ribonucleic acid control locus in escherichia coli on t4 bacteriophage specific ribonucleic acid synthesis	Effect of Escherichia coli l&apos locus; ribonucleic acid on l&apos synthesis; bacteriophage t4 specific ribonucleic acid.
10	fitness of an escherichia coli mutator gene	It's a mutant gene from Escherichia coli.
10	biochemical and genetic studies of recombination proficiency in escherichia coli ii rec revertants caused by indirect suppression of rec mutations	Biochemical and genetic studies of the recombination ability of l' escherichia coli ii revertant caused by the indirect suppression of recurrent mutations.
10	an endonuclease activity from escherichia coli absent from certain rec strains	It is not possible to determine the extent to which this is the case.
10	mapping of the nadb locus adjacent to a previously undescribed purine locus in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of nadb adjacent to purine locus not previously described in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	dark recovery processes in escherichia coli irradiated with ultraviolet light 3 effect of rec mutations on recovery of excision deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Ultraviolet light-irradiated escherichia coli (UV-irradiated Escherichia coli) recovery process; darkness 3 effect of mutations on recovery of Escherichia coli excision-deficient mutants k 12 effect of ultraviolet light.
10	loss of colicinogeny in escherichia coli strains infected by certain resistance factors	Loss of colicinogenesis in strains of Escherichia coli infected with certain resistance factors.
10	selection of arab and arac mutants of escherichia coli b r by resistance to ribitol	Ribitol-resistant strains of Escherichia coli were selected from the Arab and Arac dolipos mutants.
10	genetic analysis of a large cell radiation resistant strain of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of a large-cell radiation-resistant Escherichia coli strain.
10	induction of the lactose transport system in a lipid synthesis defective mutant of escherichia coli	Lactose transport system induced in a lipid-synthetic deficient d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	transketolase mutants of escherichia coli	Mutants for Dapos Transmetolase; Escherichia coli.
10	nonsense mutations in the maltose a region of the genetic map of escherichia coli	In addition, the genetic makeup of the maltosis gene is similar to that of the maltosis.
10	sulfur deficient transfer ribonucleic acid in a cysteine requiring relaxed mutant of escherichia coli	In addition to the above-mentioned, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
10	decay of normal and 5 fluorouracil substituted messenger ribonucleic acid of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli	The decomposition of 5-fluorouracil-substituted ribonucleic acid, normal messenger ribonucleic acid, and 5 fluorouracil-substituted ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
10	suppression of adsorption properties of a z mutant of bacteriophage t4 by r mutations	Removal of d&apos properties; adsorption of apos; a mutant z of r mutation bacteriophage t4.
10	functional interdependence of ribosomal components of escherichia coli	It is not possible to determine the extent of the interaction between the two components.
10	isolation and partial characterization of escherichia coli mutants with altered glycyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases	Isolation and partial characterization of d&apos mutants; escherichia coli isolates with altered glycle transfer nucleic acid synthetases.
10	resistance transfer to the resident intestinal escherichia coli of rats	Transmission of resistance to intestinal parasites; intestinal Escherichia coli resident in rats.
10	induction of filament formation and thymineless death in escherichia coli k 12	Induction of Thymine-Free Formation and Thymine-Free Death in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	conversion of t4 gene 46 mutant deoxyribonucleic acid into nonviable bacteriophage particles	Conversion of t46 gene, a mutant of l' deoxyribonucleic acid, into non-viable bacterial particles.
10	biosynthesis of ubiquinone in escherichia coli k 12 location of genes affecting the metabolism of 3 octaprenyl 4 hydroxybenzoic acid and 2 octaprenylphenol	Apos biosynthesis; apos ubiquinone; escherichia coli k 12 localization of genes affecting apos metabolism; 3 octaprenyl acid-4 hydroxybenzoic and 2 octaprenylphenol.
10	thymineless death in escherichia coli inactivation and recovery	Acute death without thymine in the liver; inactivation and recovery of Escherichia coli.
10	reversion instability in the galactose operon of escherichia coli	It is important to keep in mind that there is a need for further research and development.
10	effect of glycine on thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Effect of glycine on the biosynthesis of thiazole in escherichia coli.
10	glycolate uptake by mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that glycolate may be absorbed by mutant strains.
10	isolation of conditionally putrescine deficient mutants of escherichia coli	Isolate putrescine-deficient Escherichia coli; d&apos mutants under conditions.
10	inhibition of de novo purine biosynthesis and interconversion by 6 methylpurine in escherichia coli	De novo inhibition of purine biosynthesis and 6 methylpurine-induced interconversion in escherichia coli.
10	depression of guanosine diphosphate mannose pyrophosphorylase by mutations in two different regulator genes involved in capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12	Reduced guanosine diphosphate mannose pyrophosphorylase by mutations in two regulatory genes involved in the synthesis of capsular polysaccharides in escherichia coli k 12.
10	the action of streptomycin in a mutant of escherichia coli with increased sensitivity to the antibiotic	Streptomycin action in an apos mutant; escherichia coli with increased susceptibility to antibiotics.
10	mutants of escherichia coli k 12 with an altered glutamyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase	Mutants of d' escherichia coli k12 with a modified glutamyltransfer of d' ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	streptomycin suppressible lethal mutations in escherichia coli	Suppressible lethal mutation by streptomycin in the bacterium Escherichia coli.
10	relation between deoxyribonucleic acid and intracytoplasmic membranes in escherichia coli o111a	The relationship between the deoxyribonucleic acid and the intracytoplasmic membranes of escherichia coli o111a.
10	genetic mapping and dominance of the amber suppressor su1 supd in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, a number of other species were found to be extirpated.
10	repair of radiation induced damage in escherichia coli ii effect of rec and uvr mutations on radiosensitivity and repair of x ray induced single strand breaks in deoxyribonucleic acid	Repair of radiation-induced damage in escherichia coli ii, the effect of mutations rec and work on the radiosensitivity and repair of single-strand breaks induced by X-rays in deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	genetic exchange between escherichia coli strains in the mouse intestine	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	n 5 phosphoribosyl anthranilate isomerase indol 3 ylglycerol phosphate synthetase of tryptophan biosynthesis relationship between the two activities of the enzyme from escherichia coli	N 5 phosphoribosylanthranilate isomerase indol 3 ylglycerol phosphate synthetase from the biosynthetic relationship of tryptophan between the two activities of l' l&apos enzyme; escherichia coli.
10	genetic recombination in escherichia coli the role of exonuclease i	In other words, it is not possible to determine the function of the enzyme.
10	an examination of the inhibitory effects of n iodoacetylglucosamine on escherichia coli and isolation of resistant mutants	To examine the inhibitory effects of niodoacetylglucosamine on escherichia coli and to isolate resistant mutants.
10	synchronous reinitiation of chromosome replication in e coli b r after nalidixic acid treatment	Synchronous reactivation of e coli b r chromosomal replication after nalidixic acid treatment.
10	isolation and genetic analysis of a strain of escherichia coli k 12 with an amber reca mutation	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	ultraviolet and x ray induced responses of a deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase deficient mutant of escherichia coli	Ultraviolet and X-rays induce responses to apos; an escherichia coli mutant deficient in deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase.
10	d fucose as a gratuitous inducer of the l arabinose operon in strains of escherichia coli b r mutant in gene arac	Fucose as a free inducer of apos; arabinose operon in arac gene mutant strains; escherichia coli b r.
10	mutants of escherichia coli lacking endonuclease i ribonuclease i or ribonuclease ii	Dapos mutants; escherichia coli are found to be free of endonuclease, ribonuclease, or ribonuclease.
10	regulation of tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 isolation and characterization of operator mutants	The regulation of the biosynthesis of tyrosine in escherichia coli k 12; isolation and characterization of mutant operators.
10	chromosomal integration of f factors in recombination deficient hfr strains of escherichia coli	Chromosome integration of f-factors in recombinant-deficient Escherichia coli (ES coli) hfr strains.
10	colicin tolerance induced by ampicillin or mutation to ampicillin resistance in a strain of escherichia coli k 12	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the drug is administered to the target group, but it is recommended that it be administered to the recipient.
10	involvement of recombination genes in growth and viability of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the case in some cases.
10	biosynthesis of the iron transport compound enterochelin mutants of escherichia coli unable to synthesize 2 3 dihydroxybenzoate	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent to which these compounds are present in the environment.
10	metabolism of d arabinose a new pathway in escherichia coli	Arabinose metabolism, a novel pathway in Escherichia coli.
10	mutations affecting iron transport in escherichia coli	Mutations Affecting Iron Transport in Escherichia coli.
10	effects of ribonucleosides on thymidine incorporation selective reversal of the inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis in thymineless auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Ribonucleoside effects on apos; incorporation of thymidine Selective reversal of apos; inhibition of synthesis of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in thymine-free auxotrophs; escherichia coli.
10	isolation characterization and genetic analysis of mutator genes in escherichia coli b and k 12	Characterization of b- and k-12 Escherichia coli mutant genes isolation and genetic analysis.
10	chromosomal location of the c gene involved in the biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of the c gene involved in nicotinamide-adenine dinucleotide biosynthesis in escherichia coli k.
10	genetic location in escherichia coli k 12 of the ultraviolet sensitive mutation uvrd3	Genetic localization of ultraviolet-sensitive mutant uvrd3 in escherichia coli k12.
10	host induced modification restriction and the utilization of 5 bromouracil by thymineless mutants of escherichia coli	The host induced a restriction of modification and the use of 5 bromouracil derivatives by thymine-free mutants d' escherichia coli.
10	inhibition by phenylalanine of thiazole biosynthesis in escherichia coli	The inhibitory effect of phenylalanine on the biosynthesis of thiazole in escherichia coli.
10	nalidixic acid resistant auxotrophs of escherichia coli	It is not possible to determine the cause of death in this population.
10	characterization of pyridoxine auxotrophs of escherichia coli serine and pdxf mutants	Characterization of the pyridoxine auxotrophs of Serine Escherichia coli and Pdxf mutants.
10	partial purification and properties of d desthiobiotin synthetase from escherichia coli	Partial purification and desthiobiotin synthetase d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and mapping of phosphotransferase mutants in escherichia coli	Isolate and map escherichia coli phosphotransferase mutants.
10	methylated bases of bacillus megaterium km nucleic acids comparison with escherichia coli	Comparison of Megaterium km and Escherichia coli nucleic acid methyl bases.
10	elimination of sex factors in escherichia coli by urea	Escherichia coli sex factor removal by urea.
10	genetic and molecular characteristics of x ray sensitive mutants of escherichia coli defective in repair synthesis	Genetic and molecular characteristics of repair-deficient Escherichia coli; d&apos X-ray-sensitive mutants.
10	translational repression in the arginine system of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
10	defective excision repair of pyrimidine dimers in the ultraviolet sensitive escherichia coli ras mutant	Faulty repair of apo-sensitive ras escherichia coli pyrimidine dimers; ultraviolet.
10	l serine sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Serine-sensitive mutants of 12 serine-sensitive mutants; escherichia coli.
10	nalidixic acd resistant mutants of escherichia coli deficient in isocitrate dehydrogenase	Isocitrate dehydrogenase-deficient Escherichia coli; nalidixic acd; isocitrate dehydrogenase-deficient mutants.
10	genetic analysis of diaminopimelic acid and lysine requiring mutants of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of lysine, diaminopimelic acid, and lysine that requires mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	effect of nalidixic acid on semionservative replication and repair synthesis after ultraviolet irradiation in escherichia coli	Effect of L' Nalidixic Acid on Semionative Replication and Repair Synthesis after Ultraviolet irradiation in Escherichia coli.
10	lysine suppressor in escherichia coli	E. coli Lysine suppressor.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with a growth requirement for either lysine or pyridoxine	Dapos; Escherichia coli growth-needing mutants for lysine or pyridoxine.
10	growth rate of escherichia coli at elevated temperatures limitation by methionine	Growth rate of methionine-limited, high temperature escherichia coli.
10	repression of 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase trp and enzymes of the tryptophan pathway in escherichia coli k 12	Treatment of 3 arabinoheptulosonic acid deoxy 7 phosphate synthetase trp and d' tryptophan pathway enzymes in Escherichia coli k12.
10	ampicillin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12 with lipopolysaccharide alterations affecting mating ability and susceptibility to sex specific bacteriophages	Apos; escherichia coli k12 mutants, resistant to apos; ampicillin, are shown to exhibit lipopolysaccharide alterations affecting apos ability, mating ability, and susceptibility to sex-specific bacteriophages.
10	mutants of escherichia coli sensitive to antibiotics	Antibiotic-sensitive Escherichia coli; d&apos mutants.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid transferred from ultraviolet irradiated excision defective hfr cells of escherichia coli k 12	Deoxyribonucleic acid transferred from defective apos hfr cells; k 12 escherichia coli after ultraviolet irradiation excision.
10	biosynthesis in vitro of tryptophanase by polyribosomes from induced cultures of escherichia coli	In vitro biosynthesis of polyribosome tryptophanase from induced cultures of d' escherichia coli.
10	ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 accumulation of an octaprenol farnesylfarnesylgeraniol by a multiple aromatic auxotroph	In addition, it is not possible to assess the effects of phenylphenol on the metabolism of acrylonitrile.
10	cotransduction of stra and ribosomal protein cistrons in escherichia coli salmonella typhimurium hybrids	Co-transduction of stra and ribosomal protein cistrons in Escherichia coli salmonella typhimurium (Salmo salar) hybrids.
10	degradation of escherichia coli b deoxyribonucleic acid after infection with deoxyribonucleic acid defective amber mutants of bacteriophage t7	Degradation of the bacteriophage t7; deoxyribonucleic acid; escherichia coli after infection with defective mutants of the bacteriophage t7 with deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	t even bacteriophage tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b i isolation and preliminary characterization	In addition, it is not possible to determine the identity of the bacteriophage-tolerant mutants.
10	the utilization of prolyl peptides by escherichia coli	L' Use of Prolylic Peptides by Escherichia coli.
10	differential recovery of auxotrophs after penicillin enrichment in escherichia coli	Differential auxotroph recovery after apo; enrichment with penicillin in escherichia coli.
10	mutation preventing capsular polysaccharide synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 and its effect on bacteriophage resistance	Mutations that prevent capsular polysaccharide synthesis and bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli k 12.
10	pleiotropic effect of the rec a gene of escherichia coli uncoupling of cell division from deoxyribonucleic acid replication	In addition, the genetic makeup of the gene is similar to that of other genes, such as oligonucleotide, and the genetic makeup of the gene.
10	membrane association of conjugally transferred deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli minicells	In addition, it can be used as a catalyst for the development of new products and processes.
10	transformation of agrobacterium tumefaciens into a non oncogenic species by an escherichia coli rna	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent to which the organism has been transformed into a non-oncogenic species.
10	galactose specific messenger ribonucleic acid contents in escherichia coli	Galactose-specific ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli.
10	phosphoglucomutase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Mutants of phosphoglucomutase from 12 mutants.
10	mapping the gene determining ornithine transcarbamylase and its operator in escherichia coli b	Mapping of the ornithine transcarbamylase gene in Escherichia coli b.
10	biochemical characterization of the ctr mutants of escherichia coli	Biochemical Characterization of Ctr d' Escherichia coli Mutants.
10	mutants of escherichia coli unable to make protein at 42 c	Mutants of d' escherichia coli were found not to produce 42 c protein.
10	stimulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis by chloramphenicol in a rel aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutant of escherichia coli	Stimulation of apos synthesis; chloramphenicol ribonucleic acid in a relict l&apos mutant; escherichia coli d&apos transfer mutant; apos aminoacyl; ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	phenotypic restoration by molybdate of nitrate reductase activity in chld mutants of escherichia coli	Phenotypic restoration by apos molybdate; nitrate reductase activity in chld d' and escherichia coli mutants.
10	growth of escherichia coli on short chain fatty acids growth characteristics of mutants	Growth of apos; escherichia coli on short-chain fatty acids, which are characteristic of mutant growth.
10	relationship between sex pili formation and macarbomycin sensitivity in escherichia coli	Relationship between formation of sexual pili and susceptibility to macarbomycin in escherichia coli.
10	temperature dependence of sex factor maintenance in escherichia coli k 12	The temperature dependence of the maintenance of the sexual factor in Escherichia coli k12 is an important factor.
10	enzymatic characterization of a mutant of escherichia coli with an altered dna ligase	Enzymatic characterization of apos; escherichia coli mutant with modified apos ligase; DNA.
10	isolation of vitamin b 12 transport mutants of escherichia coli	Isolate the vitamin-transporting mutants of Escherichia coli.
10	phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 mutants derepressed for chorismate mutase p prephenate dehydratase	Phenylalanine biosynthesis in mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12 derepressed for prephenate dehydratase chorismate mutase.
10	auxotroph accumulation in deoxyribonucleic acid polymeraseless strains of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that desotrophs are associated with allergic reactions.
10	regulation of thymidine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12 studies on the inducer and the coordinateness of induction of the enzymes	The regulation of escherichia coli k12 thymidine metabolism was studied on the inducer and coordination of l' enzyme induction.
10	cell division and prophage induction in escherichia coli studies of nucleotide levels	In addition, it is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of prostate cancer in Canada.
10	growth inhibition and appearance of the membranous structure in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage fd	Growth inhibition and appearance of membrane structure in fd bacteriophage infected escherichia coli.
10	on the process of cellular division in escherichia coli v incorporation of deoxynucleoside triphosphates by dna thermosensitive mutants of escherichia coli also lacking dna polymerase activity	Cell division process in escherichia coli; deoxynucleoside triphosphate incorporation by heat-sensitive d&apos mutants; escherichia coli without apos; DNA polymerase activity.
10	enlargement of escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection i description of the phenomenon	Extension of the bacteriophage; Extension of the bacteriophage; E. coli after infection by a bacteriophage.
10	t even bacteriophage tolerant mutants of escherichia coli b ii nucleic acid metabolism	In other words, it is not possible to predict the effects of the microorganism on the environment.
10	bacteriophage t4 inhibits colicin e2 induced degradation of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid i protein synthesis dependent inhibition	Bacteriophage t4 inhibits deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) degradation by colicin e2, inhibitory degradation.
10	incomplete lambda bacteriophage heads produced by a gene f mutant	A mutant of the f gene produces incomplete heads of lambda bacteriophages.
10	occurrence of lysophosphatides in bacteriophage t4rii infected escherichia coli s 6	Lysophosphatides present in infected bacteriophage t4rii escherichia coli 6 s.
10	isolating tryptophan regulatory mutants in escherichia coli by using a trp lac fusion strain	Isolate tryptophan regulatory mutants from Escherichia coli using trp lac fusion strain.
10	alternate pathway for isoleucine biosynthesis in escherichia coli	An alternative pathway for the biosynthesis of l'apos; isoleucine in escherichia coli.
10	ordering of mutant sites in the isoleucine valine genes of escherichia coli by use of merogenotes derived from f 14 a new procedure for fine structure mapping	L' mutant site order in isoleucine valine d&apos genes; escherichia coli par l' use of f14-derived merenotes, a new procedure for mapping fine structures.
10	ribosomal proteins involved in the suppression of streptomycin dependence in escherichia coli	Ribosomal proteins play a role in suppressing the dependence on streptomycin in escherichia coli.
10	utilization of aminobutyric acid as the sole carbon and nitrogen source by escherichia coli k 12 mutants	Aminobutyric acid as sole source of carbon and nitrogen; nitrogen by mutants k12 d' escherichia coli.
10	slow joining of newly replicated dna chains in dna polymerase i deficient escherichia coli mutants	Slow junction of the newly replicated DNA strands in the DNA-deficient mutants; DNA polymerase i d' escherichia coli.
10	new polarity suppressors in escherichia coli suppression and messenger rna stability	New suppressors of polarity in the suppression of escherichia coli and stability of messengers.
10	analysis of dna polymerases ii and 3 in mutants of escherichia coli thermosensitive for dna synthesis	Apos polymerase analysis ii and 3; DNA from heat-sensitive Apos mutants; Escherichia coli for apos synthesis; DNA.
10	specific inhibition of cell division by colicin e 2 without degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in a new colicin sensitivity mutant of escherichia coli	Specific inhibition of cell division by deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid in a novel colicin-sensitive mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	control of nucleotide metabolism and ribosomal ribonucleic acid synthesis during nitrogen starvation of escherichia coli	Control of nucleotide metabolism and apos synthesis; ribosomal ribonucleic acid during apos deprivation; nitrogen in the escherichia coli.
10	mutations in r factors of escherichia coli causing an increased number of r factor copies per chromosome	Mutations in the genetic factors that cause an increase in the number of copies of r-factors per chromosome.
10	recombinant f factors from escherichia coli k 12 strains carrying recb or recc	It is not possible to determine the cause of death by the presence of the virus.
10	physiological factors in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	Physiological factors regulating synthesis of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli.
10	new rifampin resistant mutant of escherichia coli	Rifampin-resistant Escherichia coli mutant.
10	establishment of repression by lambdoid phage in catabolite activator protein and adenylate cyclase mutants of escherichia coli	Establishment of lambdaid phage repression in apos mutants; catabolite activating protein and apos escherichia coli; adenylate cyclase.
10	isolation and characterization of an escherichia coli bacteriophage requiring cell wall galactose	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed in accordance with the requirements of the Canadian Food Inspection Agency.
10	location and orientation of the phoa locus on the escherichia coli k 12 linkage map	Phoa locus location and orientation on the genetic map of l' escherichia coli k 12.
10	purification and properties of 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe from a lambda arog transductant of escherichia coli	Purification and properties of l' arabinoheptulosonic deoxy acid, 7 phosphate synthetase phe, from d' lambda d&apos transducer; escherichia coli.
10	biochemical characterization of a mutant isoleucyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase from escherichia coli k 12	Biochemical characterization of apos; an isoleucyl mutant that transfers apos; apos-ribonucleic acid synthetase; escherichia coli k12.
10	phospholipids of virus induced membranes in cytoplasm of escherichia coli	Virus phospholipids induce membranes within the cytoplasm of d' escherichia coli.
10	presence of bacteriophage like inhibitory particles in escherichia coli	Bacteriophage-like particles were present in Escherichia coli.
10	lethal synthesis of methylglyoxal by escherichia coli during unregulated glycerol metabolism	Methylglyoxal synthesis by escherichia coli during unregulated metabolism of glycerol.
10	polysome turnover during amino acid starvation in escherichia coli	The turnover of polysomes during starvation of amino acids in escherichia coli.
10	physical and functional characteristics of r factor deoxyribonucleic acid segregated into escherichia coli minicells	The deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid r factor segregates into mini-cell d' escherichia coli.
10	repression of aromatic amino acid biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, there is a need for further research to determine the role of phenylphenol in the pathogenesis.
10	phenylalanine and tyrosine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 mutants derepressed for 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase phe 3 deoxy d arabinoheptulosonic acid 7 phosphate synthetase tyr chorismate mutase t prephenate dehydrogenase and transaminase a	Phenylalanine and tyrosine synthesis in apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 derepressed for 3 arabinoheptulosonic acid deoxidase 7 phosphate synthetase phe 3 arabinoheptulosonic acid deoxidase 7 phosphate synthetase chorismate mutase t prephenate dehydrogenase and transaminase a.
10	alteration of a 30s ribosomal protein accompanying the ram mutation in escherichia coli	Modification of apos, a 30s ribosomal protein, which accompanies the ram mutation in Escherichia coli.
10	control of vitamin b 6 biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Control of escherichia coli vitamin b-6 biosynthesis.
10	nature of the penetration barrier in escherichia coli k 12 effect of macromolecular inhibition of penetrability in strains containing the enva gene	Nature of escherichia coli entry barrier k 12 d&apos effect; macromolecular inhibition of penetrability in vascular gene strains.
10	phenethyl alcohol as a suppressor of the enva phenotype associated with the enva gene in escherichia coli k 12	Phenethyl alcohol suppresses phenotype of apos; enva associated with gene of apos; enva in apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	alterations in the cytoplasmic membrane proteins of various chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Cytoplasmic membrane protein changes in various chlorate-resistant d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	transposition of the lac region to the gal region of the escherichia coli chromosome isolation of lambda lac transducing bacteriophages	Chromosome isolation of escherichia coli from lambda lake transducing bacteriophages.
10	specific role of sex pili in the effective eliminatory action of sodium dodecyl sulfate on sex and drug resistance factors in escherichia coli	Specific role of sexual pili in the elimination of sex and drug resistance factors in escherichia coli; effective elimination of sodium dodecyl sulfate.
10	close linkage between ochre and missense suppressors in escherichia coli	A close link between false-and ochre suppressants in escherichia coli.
10	breakdown and exclusion of superinfecting t even bacteriophage in escherichia coli	In addition, it is important to note that some of the bacteria in the bacteriophage have been found to be superinfectious.
10	cell division and prophage induction in escherichia coli effects of pantoyl lactone and various furan derivatives	Cell division and l' induction of prophage in the escherichia coli effects of pantoyl-lactone and various furan derivatives.
10	isolation and some properties of cell envelope altered mutants of escherichia coli	In addition, it is not possible to determine the genetic makeup of the organism.
10	relationship between permeability cell division and murein metabolism in a mutant of escherichia coli	Ratio between cell division of permeability and metabolism of murine in a d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	isolation and characterization of 2 keto 3 deoxyoctonate lipid a from a heptose deficient mutant of escherichia coli	In addition, it is recommended that a test be performed to determine the identity of the test substance.
10	mutations affecting the dissimilation of mannitol by escherichia coli k 12	The results of this study are summarized below.
10	requirement for protein synthesis in rec dependent repair of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli after ultraviolet or x irradiation	Necessity of apos; protein synthesis in deoxyribonucleic acid reactive repair in escherichia coli following ultraviolet or x irradiation.
10	a second transport system for l arabinose in escherichia coli b r controlled by the arac gene	A second arac gene-mediated transport system for arabinosis in Escherichia coli.
10	mapping of a d cycloserine resistance locus in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of a locus for resistance to cycloserine in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	a new element in the control of dna initiation in escherichia coli	Initiation of DNA in escherichia coli.
10	new small polypeptides associated with dna dependent rna polymerase of escherichia coli after infection with bacteriophage t4	New small apos-dependent rna polymerase-associated polypeptides; d&apos DNA; escherichia coli after bacteriophage t4 infection have appeared.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli that requires high concentrations of biotin	An escherichia coli mutant that requires high biotin levels.
10	the energy linked transhydrogenase reaction in respiratory mutants of escherichia coli k12	Escherichia coli k12 respiratory mutants exhibited energy-related trans-hydrogenase reactions that were energy-dependent.
10	death through respiratory failure of a fraction of ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli b r cells	Death due to respiratory failure; fraction of UV-irradiated cells; escherichia coli.
10	excision repair properties of isogenic rec mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Repair properties of apos; excision of recisogenic apos; escherichia coli 12 mutants are described below.
10	escherichia coli mutants tht require either pyridoxine or alanine	Pyridoxine or d' alanine is required by the d' Escherichia coli mutants.
10	infection of escherichia coli by t2 and t4 bacteriophages as seen in the electron microscope t4 head morphogenesis	Infection with the bacteriophages t2 and t4, as observed by electron microscopy during morphogenesis of the head t4.
10	limiting availability of binding sites for dehydrogenases on the cell membrane of escherichia coli	Limitation of dehydrogenase binding site availability on d' escherichia coli cell membrane.
10	nuclear disruption after infection of escherichia coli with a bacteriophage t4 mutant unable to induce endonuclease ii	Nuclear Rupture After Apos; Infection of Escherichia coli by a mutant of bacteriophage t4 with failure of apos; induction of apos; endonuclease ii.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k12 that use d amino acids	Escherichia coli k12 mutants using d-amino acids.
10	analysis of host range restriction in escherichia coli treated with toluene	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on fish or fish.
10	regulation of lambda rex expression after infection of escherichia coli k by lambda bacteriophage	It is important to note that the presence of bacteriophage bacteriophage can also be linked to the presence of the bacteriophage.
10	three membered parasitic system a bacteriophage bdellovibrio bacteriovorus and escherichia coli	Three members of the parasitic system, one bacteriophage, bdellovibrio bacteriovorus, and one bacteriophage, escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage lysozyme synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 lambda infected with rii mutant of bacteriophage t4	Synthesis of lysozyme bacteriophage in 12 lambda escherichia coli k infected with bacteriophage t4 mutant rii.
10	genetic map of the lactose repressor gene i of escherichia coli	Genetic map of the gene repellent of lactose i of l'apos; escherichia coli.
10	eight transfer rnas induced by infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophage t4	It is important to note, however, that the results of this study are not known at this time.
10	conjugational complementation analysis of transfer deficient mutants of flac in escherichia coli	L' Conjugative Complementation Analysis of Flask Transfer Deficient Mutants in Escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of transfer by the escherichia coli sex factor f using p1 transductional complementation	Genetic analysis of f-transfer of escherichia coli using p1 transduction complementation.
10	deletion map of the escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f the order of eleven transfer cistrons	Sexual Factor Deletion Card (K12); Escherichia coli; 11 transfer cistrons.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 deficient for detergent resistant phospholipase a	The d' escherichia coli k12 mutant was found to be deficient in detergent-resistant phospholipase a.
10	effect of the folic acid analogue trimethoprim on growth macromolecular synthesis and incorporation of exogenous thymine in escherichia coli	Effect of apos; analog of apos; folic acid, trimethoprim, on macromolecular growth synthesis and apos; escherichia coli incorporation of exogenous thymine.
10	gene transfer in pasteurella pestis harboring the f cm plasmid of escherichia coli	Transfer of genes into pasteurella pestis, containing the plasmid fcm d' escherichia coli.
10	arginine control of transcription of argecbh messenger ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	L' arginine controls transcription of l' ribonucleic acid, a l&apos messenger; escherichia coli.
10	glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase from escherichia coli and from a high level mutant	Glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase; escherichia coli and d*apos; a high-level phosphate mutant.
10	construction and properties of escherichia coli strains exhibiting complementation of galactosidase fragments in vivo	Escherichia coli showing galactosidase fragment complementation in vivo.
10	manganese resistant mutants of escherichia coli physiological and genetic studies	Escherichia coli manganese-resistant mutants physiological and genetic studies.
10	biochemical and genetic studies on ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 4 hydroxybenzoate octaprenyltransferase	Biochemical and genetic studies of the biosynthesis of apos; ubiquinone in apos; escherichia coli k 12-4 hydroxybenzoate octaprenyltransferase.
10	ribosomal alterations controlling alkaline phosphatase isozymes in escherichia coli	Ribosomal alterations controlling the isozymes of escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase.
10	membrane mutation associated with sensitivity to acriflavine in escherichia coli	Molecular characterization of the genetic makeup of the organism and its metabolites.
10	effects of acridine orange on the growth of escherichia coli	In addition, it can be used to reduce the risk of infection.
10	induction of the ara operon of escherichia coli b r	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are needed to evaluate the effectiveness of the program.
10	genetic analysis of flagellar mutants in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of escherichia coli flagellar mutants.
10	effect of thymine starvation on deoxyribonucleic acid repair systems of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to note that the use of thymine is not a substitute for the use of deoxyribonucleic acid and deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	porphyrin accumulating mutants of escherichia coli	Porphyrin, which accumulates mutant d' escherichia coli.
10	ultraviolet sensitive mutator strain of escherichia coli k 12	The mutant strain sensitive to ultraviolet d' escherichia coli k12 is sensitive to ultraviolet radiation.
10	evidence for the direct action of colicin k on aerobic 32 p i uptake in escherichia coli in vivo and in vitro	Evidence of the direct action of colicin k on apos; 32% aerobic absorption in in vivo and in vitro Escherichia coli.
10	characterization of lethal zygosis associated with conjugation in escherichia coli k 12	The results of this study are summarized below.
10	osmotic reversal of temperature sensitivity in escherichia coli	Osmotic temperature sensitivity reversal in escherichia coli.
10	importance of facilitated diffusion for effective utilization of glycerol by escherichia coli	It is important to use the glycerol in a manner that minimizes the risk to human health.
10	deletion and complementation analysis of biotin gene cluster of escherichia coli	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the genetic makeup of the genes.
10	molecular studies on entry exclusion in escherichia coli minicells	Apo molecular studies; apo exclusion; apo mini-cell entry; escherichia coli.
10	dominant mutations lex in escherichia coli k 12 which affect radiation sensitivity and frequency of ultraviolet lght induced mutations	Lex dominant mutations in escherichia coli k 12 affecting the sensitivity to radiation and the frequency of mutations induced by ultraviolet radiation.
10	flagellar assembly mutants in escherichia coli	Mutants of apos; floral assemblage in the Escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants altered in the transport of branched chain amino acids	Apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12 altered in branched chain amino acid transport.
10	anaerobic l glycerophosphate dehydrogenase of escherichia coli its genetic locus and its physiological role	Glycerophosphate dehydrogenase (Glycerophosphate dehydrogenase) is an anaerobic enzyme that acts as a genetic locus and plays a physiological role.
10	bacterial cell division regulation physiological effects of crystal violet on escherichia coli lon and lon strains	In addition, the bacterial cell division of the purple crystal has a physiological effect on the strains lon and lon d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	alteration of ribosomal protein s4 by mutation linked to kasugamycin resistance in escherichia coli	Karasugamycin resistance mutation modification of s4 ribosomal protein in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of an escherichia coli syndrome	Dapos syndrome; Escherichia coli.
10	properties and mode of action of a bactericidal compound methylglyoxal produced by a mutant of escherichia coli	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature and are consistent with those reported in the literature.
10	mutants of rhodospirrillum rubrum obtained after long term anaerobic dark growth	Rhodospirrillum rubrum mutants were obtained after prolonged anaerobic growth in the dark.
10	giant cells of escherichia coli a morphological study	Escherichia coli, morphological study.
10	alkaline sucrose gradient sedimentation of chromosomal deoxyribonucleic acid from escherichia coli pola and pola strains during thymine starvation	Chromosomal deoxyribonucleic acid of strains of d'apos; escherichia coli pola et pola during thymine deprivation.
10	genetic determinant in escherichia coli affecting thymineless death and ultraviolet sensitivity	Genetic Determinant of Escherichia coli Affecting Thymine-Free Death and Ultraviolet Sensitivity.
10	in vivo production of an rna dna copolymer after infection of escherichia coli by bacteriophage t4	In vivo production of escherichia coli, a rna RNA copolymer, after infection with bacteriophage t4.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in dna polymerase ii activity	A defective Escherichia coli mutant in apos; apos activity; DNA polymerase ii.
10	mutants of salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli pleiotropically defective in active transport	Salmonella typhimurium and d' active transport mutants; pleiotropically defective escherichia coli.
10	fine structure deletion map of the escherichia coli l arabinose operon	Escherichia coli Escherichia coli Escherichia coli Escherichia coli Escherichia coli apos arabinose operon.
10	mapping of new escherichia coli k and 15 restriction sites on specific fragments of bacteriophage phi x174	Mapping new restriction sites for Escherichia coli and 15 new restriction sites for phi x174 bacteriophage-specific fragments.
10	bacteriophage t4 inhibits colicin e2 induced degradation of escherichia coli deoxyribonucleic acid ii inhibition by t4 ghosts and by t4 in the absence of protein synthesis	Bacteriophage t4 inhibits the deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) degradation induced by colicine e2; this inhibition is induced by phantoms t4 and t4 to apos; there is no protein synthesis.
10	on some genetic aspects of phage lambda resistance in e coli k12	In other words, it is not possible to distinguish between the two types of phage.
10	a dominant constitutive phor mutation in escherichia coli	A dominant phor constitutive mutation of escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage tail components iv pteroyl polyglutamate synthesis in t4d infected escherichia coli b	Bacteriococci, D.S. and D.A. Bacteriococci.
10	analysis of nuclear disruption and binding of intermediates in host dna breakdown to membranes after infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophages t4 and t7	Analysis of nuclear disorganization and intermediate binding in apo degradation; apo DNA; post-apo membrane host; apo infection; escherichia coli bacteriophages t4 and t7.
10	degradation of escherichia coli chromosome after infection by bacteriophage t4 role of bacteriophage gene d2a	The bacteriophage d2a gene is a bacteriophage d2a gene that can be used as a bacteriophage d2a.
10	reconstitution of d lactate dependent transport in membrane vesicles from a d lactate dehydrogenase mutant of escherichia coli	Lactate-dependent transport reconstitution in d&apos membrane vesicles; lactate dehydrogenase d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	rna linked nascent dna fragments in escherichia coli	Rna linked fledgling DNA from Escherichia coli.
10	characterization by electron microscopy of fused f prime factors in escherichia coli	Electron microscopic characterization of the major f-fissing factors of Escherichia coli isolates.
10	mutants of escherichia coli thermosensitive for the synthesis of transfer rna	Mutants of d' escherichia coli temperature-sensitive for transfer synthesis.
10	r factors of escherichia coli from dressed beef and humans	Factors in Prepared Beef and Human Escherichia coli.
10	transport of magnesium by a repressible and a nonrepressible system in escherichia coli	Repressible and unrepresentable magnesium transport systems in escherichia coli.
10	role of dna polymerase i and the rec system in excision repair in escherichia coli	Role of apo; DNA polymerase and rec system in repair of apo; excision in escherichia coli.
10	low activity of galactosidase in frameshift mutants of escherichia coli	Low galactosidase activity in the Escherichia coli reading-frame-change mutants.
10	growth and macromolecular composition of a mutant of escherichia coli during polyamine limitation	Growth and macromolecular composition of apos, an escherichia coli mutant during limitation by polyamines.
10	the utilization of fructose by escherichia coli properties of a mutant defective in fructose 1 phosphate kinase activity	L'utilisation de la fructose par les propriétés d'apos; escherichia coli d'apos; mutant dont l'apos; activity de la fructose 1 phosphate kinase est deficient.
10	recircularization and autonomous replication of a sheared r factor dna segment in escherichia coli transformants	In addition, it is possible to determine the extent to which the genetic makeup of the organism is different from that of other organisms.
10	mutator gene studies in escherichia coli the muts gene	Studies of the mutant gene in the mutated gene in Escherichia coli.
10	suppression of ultraviolet sensitivity in escherichia coli uvr502 by the su58 missense suppressor	The deletion of Escherichia coli uvr502 ultraviolet sensitivity by the false sense suppressor58 was observed.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli common receptor sites for vitamin b12 and the e colicins on the outer membrane of the cell envelope	The transport of vitamin b12 to common receptor sites of apos; Escherichia coli for vitamin b12 and colicins; and, on the apos' outer membrane; cell envelope.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli genetic studies	Vitamin b12 transport in genetic studies on escherichia coli has been investigated.
10	derepression of anthranilate synthase in purified minicells of escherichia coli containing the col trp plasmid	The derepression of the apos; anthranilate synthase in minicells purified from the apos; escherichia coli containing the plasmid trp.
10	genetic analysis of the system that reduces biotin d sulfoxide in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of biotin sulfoxide-reducing system in Escherichia coli.
10	thymineless death in pola and pola strains of escherichia coli	Pola and pola d' escherichia coli.
10	novel mutation to dominant fucose resistance in the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	two genetic loci for resistance to kasugamycin in escherichia coli	Two genetic loci for escherichia coli kasugamycin resistance.
10	protein synthesis and deoxyribonucleic acid membrane attachment during thymineless death in escherichia coli	Synthesis of protein and membrane binding in esterichia coli; deoxyribonucleic acid during thymine-free death.
10	rapid mapping of conditional and auxotrophic mutations in escherichia coli k 12	The results of this study are summarized below.
10	isolation and characterization of mutations affecting the transport of hexose phosphates in escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of hexose phosphate transport mutations in Escherichia coli.
10	involvement of the recb recc nuclease exonuclease v in the process of x ray induced deoxyribonucleic acid degradation in radiosensitive strains of escherichia coli k 12	X-ray-induced deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid; x-ray-induced deoxyribonucleic acid; escherichia coli k 12.
10	physiology of escherichia coli k 12 during conjugation altered recipient cell functions associated with lethal zygosis	The functions of lethal zygosis-associated receptor cells were altered by the physiology of esterosis; escherichia coli k12 during conjugation.
10	x ray sensitivity and repair capacity of a pola1 exra strain of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to ensure that the product is safe and that the product is safe and that the product is safe.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xxi mutations affecting derepression and valine resistance	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that valine can be used as a chemoprophylaxis.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xxii a pleiotropic mutation affecting induction of isomeroreductase activity	Apos metabolism; isoleucine and valine in escherichia coli xxii, a pleiotropic mutant that affects apos; apos induction; isomeroreductase activity.
10	organic solvents as probes for the structure and function of the bacterial membrane effects of ethanol on the wild type and an ethanol resistant mutant of escherichia coli k 12	Organic solvents as probes for structure and function of bacterial cell membrane effects of apos; wild-type ethanol and a d&apos mutant; apos-resistant escherichia coli k12; ethanol.
10	regulation of methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase formation in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Regulation of the formation of methionyltransfer, ribonucleic acid (MSA) synthetase in escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
10	isolation of deoxyribonucleic acid methylase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	To isolate mutants of deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid methylase, and escherichia coli.
10	reconstitution of nitrate reductase activity and formation of membrane particles from cytoplasmic extracts of chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Apos reconstitution; nitrate reductase activity and membrane particle formation from apos; cytoplasmic extracts of chlorate-resistant apos mutants; escherichia coli.
10	excretion of enterochelin by exba and exbb mutants of escherichia coli	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	pathway for ubiquinone biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 gene enzyme relationships and intermediates	In addition, it is possible that some of these genes may be linked to other genes.
10	increase in sensitivity to antibiotics and lysozyme on deletion of lipopolysaccharides in escherichia coli strains	Increased antibiotic and lysozyme sensitivity to lipopolysaccharide deletion in d' escherichia coli strains.
10	genetic determination of the constitutive biosynthesis of phospho glucosidase a in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic Determination of Constitutive Phospho Glucosidase a Biosynthesis in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	comparison of the resa1 and pola1 mutations in isogenic strains of escherichia coli k 12	In addition, it is not possible to distinguish between the two types of mutations.
10	effect of serine hydroxamate on phospholipid synthesis in escherichia coli	Effect of Serine hydroxamate on Phospholipid Synthesis in Escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of a regulatory mutant of an aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in escherichia coli k 12	It is not possible to determine the origin of the mutant, but it may be possible to determine the origin of the mutant.
10	location of promoter and operator sites in the biotin gene cluster of escherichia coli	Promoter and operator sites in apo biota gene clusters; escherichia coli.
10	genetic fine structure of the leucine operon of escherichia coli k 12	It may be used in combination with other biological processes.
10	bacterial cell division regulation lysogenization of conditional cell division lon mutants of escherichia coli by bacteriophage	Regulation by bacterial cell division of bacteriophage-conditional cell division of lon mutants of l' escherichia coli.
10	control of arginine biosynthesis in escherichia coli characterization of arginyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutants	Mastery of biosynthesis of apos; arginine in the characterization of apos mutants by escherichia coli; arginyl; ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	a polypeptide bacteriophage receptor modified cell wall protein subunits in bacteriophage resistant mutants of bacillus sphaericus strain p 1	Under-cell wall protein units modified by a receptor of polypeptide bacteriophages in bacteriophage-resistant mutants of strain p1 of the bacillus sphaericus.
10	biosynthetic pathway of thiamine pyrophosphate a special reference to the thiamine monophosphate requiring mutant and the thiamine pyrophosphate requiring mutant of escherichia coli	The thiamine pyrophosphate biosynthetic pathway is a special reference for mutant requiring thiamine monophosphate and mutant requiring escherichia coli thiamine pyrophosphate.
10	enterochelin system of iron transport in escherichia coli mutations affecting ferric enterochelin esterase	In addition to the above, there are a number of other antimicrobials that are known to be associated with iron-transport mutations.
10	excision repair characteristics of recb res and uvrc strains of escherichia coli	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
10	l arabinose isomerase formation in a conditional mutant of gene araa of escherichia coli b r	It is also a mutant of the araa d&apos gene, and a mutant of the araa d' escherichia coli.
10	mutant of escherichia coli with derepressed levels of the biotin biosynthetic enzymes	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent to which the enzyme is present in the body.
10	phleomycin stimulated degradation of deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Phleomycin enhanced deoxyribonucleic acid degradation in escherichia coli.
10	studies on sex pili mutants of the sex factor f in escherichia coli defective in bacteriophage adsorbing function of f pili	Studies of sex-factor mutants of sexual pili in bacteriophage-mediated adsorption of pili in escherichia coli.
10	relation between protein synthesis and phospholipid synthesis and turnover in escherichia coli	The relationship between protein synthesis and the synthesis and turnover of phospholipids in escherichia coli.
10	inhibition of thiamine transport by chloroethylthiamine in escherichia coli	L' inhibition of the transport of thiamine by chloroethylthiamine in Escherichia coli.
10	effects of proline analogues on the formation of alkaline phosphatase in escherichia coli	Effects of proline analogs on Escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase formation.
10	mutations affecting amino sugar metabolism in escherichia coli k 12	Acute changes in the metabolism of amino sugars in Escherichia coli.
10	de novo biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli excretion of quinolinic acid by mutants lacking quinolinate phosphoribosyl transferase	"""De novo biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in escherichia coli excretion of quinolinic acid by mutants without the use of quinolinate phosphoribosyl transferase"", Arch."
10	genetic analysis of bacteriophage mu induced flagellar mutants in escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of the mu bacteriophage induced Escherichia coli flagellar mutants.
10	transport systems for alanine serine and glycine in escherichia coli k 12	Systems for the transport of serine and glycine; escherichia coli 12.
10	turnover of phosphatidylglycerol in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli phosphatidylglycerol turnover.
10	duplication translocations of tryptophan operon genes in escherichia coli	Duplication of tryptophan translocations in escherichia coli.
10	glycolaldehyde is a precursor of pyridoxal phosphate in escherichia coli b	Glycolaldehyde was found to be a pyridoxal phosphate precursor in Escherichia coli b.
10	degradation of cellular deoxyribonucleic acid after gamma irradiation of spheroplasted escherichia coli cr thy cells	Deterioration of apos; cellular deoxyribonucleic acid following gamma irradiation of apos; escherichia coli c.
10	biotin uptake in biotin regulatory mutant of escherichia coli	L'absorption de biotin dans le mutant régulateur de la biotin d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	mutation to erythromycin dependence in escherichia coli k 12	Transition to apos dependence; erythromycin in Escherichia coli, c.
10	studies with a gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase mutant in escherichia coli strain c	Gluconate mutant 6 phosphate dehydrogenase of strain c d' escherichia coli.
10	genetic characterization of mutations which affect catabolite sensitive operons in escherichia coli including deletions of the gene for adenyl cyclase	Genetic characterization of mutations affecting catabolite-sensitive operons in Escherichia coli, including the adenyl cyclase gene deletions.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 defective in the transport of basic amino acids	Mutant d' escherichia coli k12 mutant defective in basic amino acid transport.
10	basic amino acid transport in escherichia coli properties of canavanine resistant mutants	Basic Transport of Amino Acids in the Properties of Canavanine Resistant Mutants Escherichia coli.
10	deletion mapping and orientation of the histidine operon of escherichia coli on a transducing bacteriophage	Deletion and orientation mapping of transducer bacteriophage; histidine d&apos operon; escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k 12 mutants altered in the transport systems for oligo and dipeptides	D' escherichia coli k12 mutants were altered in trace and dipeptide transport systems.
10	repression of enzymes of arginine biosynthesis by l canavanine in arginyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase mutants of escherichia coli	Apos biosynthesis enzyme repression; canavanine arginine in apos mutants; escherichia coli for apos transfer; arginyl to apos; ribonucleic acid synthetase.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli xix inhibition of isoleucine biosynthesis by glycyl leucine	Effect of chloroform on the metabolism of chloroform in drinking water and drinking water.
10	degradation of bacteriophage lambda deoxyribonucleic acid after restriction by escherichia coli k 12	Degradation of l' deoxyribonucleic acid of the lambda bacteriophage after restriction by escherichia coli k.
10	regulation of macromolecular synthesis by putrescine in a conditional escherichia coli putrescine auxotroph	The regulation of putrescine macromolecular synthesis in a conditional d' putrescine escherichia coli auxotroph.
10	chemotaxis toward amino acids in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli amino acid chemotaxis.
10	nonidentity of the aspartate and the aromatic aminotransferase components of transaminase a in escherichia coli	Transaminase a aminotransferase aromatic aminotransferase in escherichia coli.
10	restoration of reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase activity of a neurospora mutant by extracts of various chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Reestablishment of apos; reduced activity of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate reductase nitrate reductase d' a neurospora mutant with extracts from various mutants of d' escherichia coli resistant to chlorate.
10	characterization of escherichia coli mutants tolerant to bacteriocin jf246 two new classes of tolerant mutants	Characterization of bacteriocin-tolerant mutants d' escherichia coli jf246 two classes of tolerant mutants.
10	outer penetration barrier of escherichia coli k 12 kinetics of the uptake of gentian violet by wild type and envelope mutants	Apos external penetration barrier; escherichia coli k 12 apos kinetics; gentian violet absorption by wild type and apos mutants; envelope.
10	suppression of lex mutations affecting deoxyribonucleic acid repair in escherichia coli k 12 by closely linked thermosensitive mutations	The suppression of lex mutations affecting the repair by deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli k12 by closely related thermosensitive mutations.
10	pleiotropic properties and genetic organization of the tola b locus of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic diversity is a key factor in the development of genetic diversity.
10	multivalent repression of aspartic semialdehyde dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	Prepared for the Ontario Ministry of the Environment, Ontario Ministry of the Environment.
10	mutant strains of escherichia coli k 12 exhibiting enhanced sensitivity to 5 methyltryptophan	Mutant strains of d' escherichia coli k12 showed increased susceptibility to 5 methyltryptophan.
10	synthesis of bacteriophage coded gene products during infection of escherichia coli with amber mutants of t3 and t7 defective in gene 1	Synthesis of bacteriophage-encoded gene products during apo; escherichia coli infection by t3 and t7-amber mutants that are defective at gene level 1.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli with a new highly efficient promoter for the lactose operon	A d' escherichia coli mutant with a novel promoter highly effective for lactose operon.
10	isolation of a mutant of escherichia coli defective in cytosine specific deoxyribonucleic acid methylase activity and in partial protection of bacteriophage lambda against restriction by cells containing the n 3 drug resistance factor	Isolation of cytosine-specific deoxyribonucleic acid methylase, cytosine-specific deoxyribonucleic acid activity, and partial protection of the lambda bacteriophage against restriction by drug resistance factor 3 cells.
10	tyrosine and phenylalanine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k 12 complementation between different tyrr alleles	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that can be added to the diet.
10	nucleoid condensation and cell division in escherichia coli mx74t2 ts52 after inhibition of protein synthesis	In escherichia coli mx74t2 ts52 nucleoid condensation and cell division after inhibition of protein synthesis.
10	rapid method for isolation of large quantities of outer membrane from escherichia coli k 12 and its application to the study of envelope mutants	Rapid method to isolate large amounts of the outer membrane of 12 escherichia coli and its application to apos; study of apos mutants; envelope.
10	isolation of the nonviable cells produced during normal growth of recombination deficient strains of escherichia coli k 12	To isolate the non-viable cells produced during normal growth from the recombinant-deficient strains of Escherichia coli.
10	cross feeding of escherichia coli mutants defective in the biosynthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide	Dapos mutants cross-feeding; Escherichia coli defective in dinucleotide adenine nicotinamide biosynthesis.
10	the gua operon of escherichia coli k 12 evidence for polarity from guab to guaa	It shows the existence of a polarity between guab and guaa.
10	reactivation of photoinactivated single stranded dna bacteriophage phi x174 by uv irradiated escherichia coli cells	Phi x174 photoinactivated single-strand DNA bacteriophage reactivation by apo-irradiated Escherichia coli; uv.
10	synthesis of bacteriophage and host dna in toluene treated cells prepared from t4 infected escherichia coli role of bacteriophage gene d2a	Bacteriophage and apo synthesis; cell DNA; host in toluene-treated cells prepared from t4 d&apos infected cells; and escherichia coli as the bacteriophage d2a gene.
10	polyamine synthesis and accumulation in escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage r17	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
10	transcellular ion flow in escherichia coli b and electrical sizing of bacterias	Transcellular ionic flow in Escherichia coli b. and electrical bacterial sizing.
10	electrophoretic variation in escherichia coli from natural sources	Electrophoretic variation in natural source escherichia coli.
10	defective transamination a mechanism for resistance to ketomycin in escherichia coli	Faulty Transamination A Mechanism for Ketomycin Resistance in Escherichia coli.
10	f factor mediated immunity to lethal zygosis in escherichia coli k 12	L' f-factor-mediated zygosis-lethal immunity in apos; escherichia coli k12 is induced by a factor.
10	mapping of the structural genes of the three aspartokinases and of the two homoserine dehydrogenases of escherichia coli k 12	Structural gene mapping of the three aspartokinases and two l'apos homoserine dehydrogenases; escherichia coli k.
10	role for free isoleucine of glycyl leucine in the repression of threonine deaminase in escherichia coli	Role of glycyl leucine-free isoleucine in threonine deaminase repression in Escherichia coli.
10	malb region in escherichia coli k 12 characterization of new mutations	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	genetic analysis of the leucine region in escherichia coli b r gene enzyme assignments	Genetic analysis of leucine region in apos; assignment of estcherichia coli enzymes.
10	positioning flagellar genes in escherichia coli by deletion analysis	Position Escherichia coli flagellar genes by analysis of deletions.
10	reconstitution of oxidative phosphorylation and the adenosine triphosphate dependent transhydrogenase activity by a combination of membrane fractions from unca and uncb mutant strains of escherichia coli k12	The reconstitution of oxidative phosphorylation and lapos; Lapos-dependent transhydrogenase activity; adenosine triphosphate by a combination of unca and uncapos mutant membrane fractions; escherichia coli k12 was carried out.
10	use of escherichia coli mutants to evaluate purines purine nucleosides and analogues	Purine purines and their nucleosides and analogs are evaluated using d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	thermal enhancement of ultraviolet mutability in a tif 1 uvra derivative of escherichia coli b r evidence that ultraviolet mutagenesis depends upon an inducible function	The results of this study are consistent with the results of a recent study by the National Cancer Institute of Canada (NCI) in the United States of America.
10	the nucleotide sequence of the lactose messenger ribonucleic acid transcribed from the uv5 promoter mutant of escherichia coli	Nucleotide sequence of l' ribonucleic acid, a lactose messenger, transcribed from mutant promoter uv5 d' escherichia coli.
10	excision of thymine dimers in vitro by extracts of bacteriophage infected escherichia coli	L' thymine dimer excision in vitro by extracts from bacteriophages infected with escherichia coli.
10	nucleotide sequences from tryptophan messenger rna of escherichia coli the sequence corresponding to the amino terminal region of the first polypeptide specified by the operon	The nucleotide sequences of the tryptophan messenger rna de l'apos; escherichia coli correspond to the amino-terminal region of the first operon-specified polypeptide.
10	description of an incompatibility mutant of escherichia coli	It is not possible to determine the genetic makeup of this mutant.
10	genetic and biochemical investigation of the escherichia coli mutant hfl 1 which is lysogenized at high frequency by bacteriophage lambda	L' genetic and biochemical study of the hfl 1 d&apos mutant; Escherichia coli, which is found to be lysogenized at high frequencies by the lambda bacteriophage.
10	properties of metk mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Escherichia coli spp.
10	repair of dna containing interstrand crosslinks in escherichia coli sequential excision and recombination	Repair of the apos; DNA containing cross-links between strands in the apos; sequential excision and recombination of apos; escherichia coli.
10	mutagenesis by mutator gene muth1 in continuous cultures of escherichia coli	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	inhibition of replication gap closure in escherichia coli by near ultraviolet light photoproducts of l tryptophan	L' inhibition of Escherichia coli replication-band closure by tryptophan photoproducts @-@1 in near-lapo light; ultraviolet.
10	effect of dicyclohexylcarbodiimide on growth and membrane mediated processes in wild type and heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Dicyclohexylcarbodiimide affects growth and membrane-mediated processes in wild-type, heptose-deficient mutants of d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	beta beta subunits of ribonucleic acid polymerase in episome free minicells of escherichia coli	Under-beta units of apos; ribonucleic acid polymerase activity in free episomal minicells; escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of an escherichia coli ruv mutant which forms nonseptate filaments after low doses of ultraviolet light irradiation	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of irradiation, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
10	three different missense suppressor mutations affecting the trna ggg gly species of escherichia coli	Three different mutations suppressors of false-sense affect the species trna ggg gly d' escherichia coli.
10	multiplicity of isoleucine leucine and valine transport systems in escherichia coli k 12	Polymerase chain reaction (PCR) isopropylmerase chain reaction (PCR) isopropylmerase chain reaction (PCR) isopropyl ester.
10	mutations affecting the different transport systems for isoleucine leucine and valine in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, it is not possible to predict the effects of the drug on the human body.
10	isolation of specialized transducing bacteriophages for gluconate 6 phosphate dehydrogenase gnd of escherichia coli	This method is based on the determination of the molecular weight of the microorganism.
10	localization of two functions of the phosphoribosyl anthranilate transferase of escherichia coli to distinct regions of the polypeptide chain	Localization of two functions of phosphoribosyl anthranilate transferase d' escherichia coli in distinct polypeptide chain regions.
10	alterations in the outer membrane of the cell envelope of heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli	Alterations of the outer cell membrane of heptose-deficient d' escherichia coli mutants were observed.
10	divergent orientation of transcription from the arginine gene ecbh cluster of escherichia coli	Divergent transcriptional orientation from ecbh gene group of l' arginine in escherichia coli.
10	modified map positions for lac and the pro markers in escherichia coli k 12	Modified lake position and pro-marker markers for escherichia coli k12 were found on the map.
10	gross map distances and hfr transfer times in escherichia coli k 12	In this case, it is recommended that the test be performed at the same time as the test.
10	metabolism of d arabinose by escherichia coli b r	Escherichia coli b r.
10	properties of a d glutamic acid requiring mutant of escherichia coli	Properties of escherichia coli, a glutamic acid mutant.
10	cell division of escherichia coli control by membrane organization	Escherichia coli cell division is controlled by membrane organization.
10	cyclic adenosine monophosphate independent mutants of the lactose operon of escherichia coli	Apos-independent mutants; cyclic apos adenosine monophosphate; apos lactose operon; escherichia coli.
10	d serine transport system in escherichia coli k 12	The Serine Transport System in Escherichia coli k 12 d.
10	metabolism of d serine in escherichia coli k 12 mechanism of growth inhibition	Serine metabolism in 12 escherichia coli, a developmental mechanism; growth inhibition.
10	loss of an essential function of escherichia coli by deletions in the thya region	Loss of cells; an essential function of the cells; escherichia coli per deletion in the thya region.
10	stringent control of intracellular proteolysis in escherichia coli	Strict control of Escherichia coli intracellular proteolysis.
10	multiplicity of leucine transport systems in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the toxicity of leucine to aquatic organisms.
10	effect of rifampin on the structure and membrane attachment of the nucleoid of escherichia coli	The Effect of Rifampin on Structure and Apos; Membrane Attachment of the Nucleoid D' Escherichia coli.
10	isolation of the bacteriophage lambda receptor from escherichia coli	Isolate the bacteriophage d'apos; Escherichia coli lambda receptor.
10	phospholipid turnover in a conditional polyamine auxotroph of escherichia coli	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
10	isolation and characterization of lipopolysaccharide protein from escherichia coli	L'isolation et caractérisation du protein lipopolysaccharide de l'apos; escherichia coli.
10	transport of biosynthetic intermediates homoserine and threonine uptake in escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
10	effect of photoreactivation on the filling of gaps in deoxyribonucleic acid synthesized after exposure of escherichia coli to ultraviolet light	The effect of photoreactivation on gap filling; synthesized deoxyribonucleic acid after apos exposure; escherichia coli under ultraviolet light.
10	genetic analysis of cold sensitive ribosome maturation mutants of escherichia coli	Genetic analysis of mutant maturation of the cold-sensitive ribosomes of lacidosis; escherichia coli.
10	growth of ribonucleic acid bacteriophage f2 in a conditional putrescine auxotroph of escherichia coli evidence for a polyamine role in translation	The growth of bacteriophage f2 of apos; ribonucleic acid in a putrescine-conditional auxotroph d' Escherichia coli demonstrates the apos; existence of apos; and a role of polyamines in translation.
10	chromosomal location of the tolg locus for tolerance to bacteriocin jf246 in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of bacteriocin tolerance locus jf246 in escherichia coli k.
10	proteins of the inner membrane of escherichia coli identification of succinate dehydrogenase by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis with sdh amber mutants	The inner membrane proteins of d' escherichia coli identified succinate dehydrogenase by sdh-amber mutants by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
10	decay of ribonucleic acid synthesis in amino acid starved escherichia coli after rifampin treatment	The decomposition of amino acid ribonucleic acid synthesis deprived escherichia coli of food after rifampin treatment.
10	reversion of frameshift mutations by mutator genes in escherichia coli	Reversal of the framework change mutations by the Escherichia coli mutant genes.
10	complementation between different mutations in the ilva gene of escherichia coli k 12	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of mutations.
10	evolution of a second gene for beta galactosidase in escherichia coli	In addition, a new gene for beta-galactosidase was developed in Escherichia coli.
10	con mutants class of mutants in escherichia coli k 12 lacking a major cell wall protein and defective in conjugation and adsorption of a bacteriophage	Escherichia coli k 12 con mutants class, lacking cell wall proteins, a major conjugative and immunosorbent protein; adsorption of a bacteriophage.
10	quantal behavior of a diffusible factor which initiates septum formation at potential division sites in escherichia coli	Quantitative behavior of apos; a diffusible factor that initiates the formation of apos; a septum at the potential sites of division in escherichia coli.
10	complementation in vitro between mutationally altered beta2 subunits of escherichia coli tryptophan synthetase	In vitro complementation between beta2 units that have been altered by mutation of l' escherichia coli tryptophan synthetase.
10	negative chemotaxis in escherichia coli	Negative Escherichia coli chemotaxis.
10	genetic mapping of the locus for detergent resistant phospholipase a plda in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mapping of the detergent-resistant phospholipase a-plda locus in escherichia coli k.
10	genetic regulatory mechanisms and the ecological niche of escherichia coli	In addition, there are a number of genetic factors that influence the genetic makeup of fish.
10	isolation and characterization of prototrophic mutants of escherichia coli unable to support the intracellular growth of t7	Isolation and characterization of prototrophic d' escherichia coli mutants unable to support t7 intracellular growth.
10	reconstitution of the energy linked transhydrogenase activity in membranes from a mutant strain of escherichia coli k12 lacking magnesium ion or calcium ion stimulated adenosine triphosphatase	Apos reconstitution; apos-related transhydrogenase activity; apos membrane energy; apos mutant strain; escherichia coli k12 without apos; magnesium ion or apos; calcium ion stimulates apos; adenosine triphosphatase.
10	size distribution and molecular polarity of newly replicated dna in escherichia coli	In addition, it was found to be the most important component of the genotype, and the most important component.
10	an escherichia coli mutant with an altered elongation factor tu	Apos mutant; Escherichia coli with apos factor; altered elongation.
10	interaction of bacterial and lambda phage recombination systems in the x ray sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12	Interaction of bacterial recombination and lambda phage systems in l&apos x-ray sensitivity; k escherichia coli 12.
10	studies on in vitro dna synthesis isolation of dna b gene product from escherichia coli	Studies of in vitro synthesis of apos; DNA to isolate the product of the b gene of l'apos; escherichia coli.
10	stereospecificity of tripeptide utilization in a methionine auxotroph of escherichia coli k 12	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: (a) (b) (c) (d) (e) (d) (e) (e) (e) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (e) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f)) (f) (f)) (f) (f)) (f) (f))) (f) (f))) (f) (f))) (f) (f)) (f) (f.
10	mapping of a mutation polb100 affecting deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii in escherichia coli k 12	The results of this study were compared with those of the previous study.
10	mutants of escherichia coli with cold sensitive deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	Cold-sensitive de&apos mutants; escherichia coli d&apos synthesis; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	release of polarity in escherichia coli by gene n of phage lambda termination and antitermination of transcription	Escherichia coli polarity release by lambda phage termination gene n and anti-transcription termination gene.
10	genetic studies on ribose 5 phosphate isomerase mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic studies using 5 phosphate d&apos ribose isomerase; escherichia coli k12 mutants were performed.
10	mapping loci for surface exclusion and incompatibility on the f factor of escherichia coli k 12	Map loci; surface and locus exclusion; egg factor incompatibility; coliforms 12.
10	regulation of one carbon biosynthesis and utilization in escherichia coli	In addition, it can be used as a basis for the development of novel foods.
10	proline excretion and indirect suppression in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	threonine locus of escherichia coli k 12 genetic structure and evidence for an operon	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	pleiotropic effects of mutations involved in the regulation of escherichia coli k 12 alkaline phosphatase	In addition to the above, there are a number of other genetic factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
10	polyamine limitation of growth slows the rate of polypeptide chain elongation in escherichia coli	Growth limitation by polyamines slows down the elongation of the polypeptide chain in escherichia coli.
10	the reconstitution of oxidase activity in membranes derived from a 5 aminolaevulinic acid requiring mutant of escherichia coli	Reconstitution of apos; oxidase activity in apos-derived membranes; an aminolaevulinic acid 5 that requires an apos; escherichia coli mutant.
10	the 3 terminal sequence of escherichia coli 16s ribosomal rna complementarity to nonsense triplets and ribosome binding sites	Sequence 3 terminale de l'apos; escherichia coli 16s Complémentarité rna ribosomique with absurd triplets and binding sites of ribosomes.
10	regulation of the pool size of valine in escherichia coli k 12	Control of Valine Pool Size in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	characterization of escherichia coli flagellar mutants that are insensitive to catabolite repression	Characterization of catabolite-insensitive flagellar mutants of escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid directed in vitro synthesis of ilv specific messenger ribonucleic acid by extracts of escherichia coli k 12	L' deoxyribonucleic acid directed the synthesis of l&apos in vitro; messenger ribonucleic acid specific to the ilv by extracts of d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	r6k plasmid replication influence of chromosomal genotype in minicell producing strains of escherichia coli k 12	The effects of the chromosomal genotype on the replication of r6k plasmids in the d&apos strains; escherichia coli k12 producing minicells were demonstrated.
10	role of atp in excision repair of ultraviolet radiation damage in escherichia coli	The effect of ultraviolet radiation on the immune system and on the immune system.
10	mutant of escherichia coli k 12 missing acetolactate synthase activity	Escherichia coli k12 mutant does not possess acetolactate synthase activity.
10	streptomycin induced synthesis of abnormal protein in an escherichia coli mutant	Streptomycin induced abnormal protein synthesis in a mutant of d' escherichia coli.
10	lactose permeation via the arabinose transport system in escherichia coli k 12	It is not possible to determine the extent of the effect.
10	interrelationship of repair mechanisms in ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli	Ultraviolet radiation treatment of escherichia coli.
10	thymineless mutagenesis in escherichia coli	In the case of Escherichia coli, non-thymine mutagenesis.
10	effect of r factor mediated genes on some surface properties of escherichia coli	The effect of r-mediated genes on certain surface properties of the bacterium Escherichia coli was studied.
10	genetic mapping of the antigenic determinants of two polysaccharide k antigens k10 and k54 in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of antigenic determinants of two escherichia coli polysaccharide antigens k10 and k54.
10	evidence for specific control of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli	Evidence of specific control of escherichia coli rna polymerase synthesis.
10	transcriptional control in the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli b r	It is not possible to determine if there is a link between the activity and the activity.
10	influence of protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis on the replication of the bacteriocinogenic factor clo df13 in escherichia coli cells and minicells	L' influence of protein synthesis and l' ribonucleic acid on cell and minicell replication of bacteriocinogen factor clo df13; Escherichia coli.
10	identification of messenger ribonucleic acids and proteins synthesized by the bacteriocinogenic factor clo df13 in purified minicells of escherichia coli	Identification of messenger ribonucleic acids and clo df13 bacteriocinogen-synthesized proteins in purified d' escherichia coli minicells.
10	nonreplicated dna and dna fragments in t4 r bacteriophage particles phenotypic mixing of a phage protein	DNA fragments; DNA fragments; DNA fragments; non-replicated DNA in the t4 particles of the bacteriophage phenotypic mixture; a phagic protein.
10	asparagine utilization in escherichia coli	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
10	analysis of the growth of recombination deficient strains of escherichia coli k 12	Growth Analysis of Recombinant Deficient Escherichia coli 12 strains.
10	biosynthesis of ubiquinone in escherichia coli k 12 biochemical and genetic characterization of a mutant unable to convert chorismate into 4 hydroxybenzoate	Apos biosynthesis; ubiquinone in apos; escherichia coli k12 and biochemical and genetic characterization of apos, a mutant that failed to convert chorismate to 4 hydroxybenzoates.
10	studies on l serine deaminase in escherichia coli k 12	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	genetic analysis of thymidine resistant and low thymine requiring mutants of escherichia coli k 12 induced by bacteriophage mu 1	Genetic analysis of thymidine resistance and low thymine content requiring mu1 bacteriophage induced d&apos mutants; escherichia coli k 12.
10	effect of a leu linked mutation on the valine sensitivity of acetohydroxy acid synthase activity in escherichia coli	Apos effect; leu mutation on valine sensitivity of apos; apos activity; acetoxy synthase acid in escherichia coli.
10	mutation affecting regulation of synthesis of acetohydroxy acid synthetase in escherichia coli k 12	Mutations affecting the regulation of esterase synthesis; acetohydroxyacid synthetase in escherichia coli k12.
10	enzymatic production of deoxyribonucleic acid double strand breaks after ultraviolet irradiation of escherichia coli k 12	Enzyme production of double strands of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid is broken after apos; ultraviolet irradiation of apos; escherichia coli k 12.
10	mut 25 a mutation to mutator linked to pura in escherichia coli	Mutation to pura-linked mutant in Escherichia coli.
10	growth of bacteriophages ms2 and t7 on streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Bacteriophage ms2 and t7 growth on streptomycin-resistant d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	ultraviolet light sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12 strains carrying ruv mutations in combination with uvra or lon mutant alleles	The sensitivity to ultraviolet light of the strains of d' escherichia coli k 12 carrying ruv mutations in combination with mutant alleles uvra or lon.
10	the fate of ribosomes in escherichia coli cells starved for a carbon source	In addition, it is important to note that many of the genes that are present in these cells are not the same as those found in other tissues.
10	the recbc deoxyribonuclease of escherichia coli isolation and characterization of the subunit proteins and reconstitution of the enzyme	The deoxyribonuclease recbc of apos; isolation of apos; escherichia coli and the characterization of sub-unit proteins and the reconstitution of apos; enzyme.
10	host dna degradation after infection of escherichia coli with bacteriophage t4 dependence of the alternate pathway of degradation which occurs in the absence of both t4 endonuclease ii and nuclear disruption on t4 endonuclease iv	Host DNA degradation after apo; bacteriophage t4 infection; escherichia coli depends on apo; another degradation pathway that occurs in apo; absence of apo; endonuclease ii t4 and nuclear disorganization on apo; endonuclease iv.
10	induction by mutagens of tandem gene duplications in the glys region of the escherichia coli chromosome	Mutagen induced tandem gene duplications in the d' escherichia coli gly region.
10	biological activity of t4 dna synthesized in toluene treated escherichia coli cells	Bioactivity of the organism; t4 DNA synthesized in the cells of toluene-treated cells; escherichia coli.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in leucyl phenylalanyl trna protein transferase	A defective d' escherichia coli mutant in leucylphenylalanyl trna protein transferase.
10	translational reinitiation reinitiation of lac repressor fragments at three internal sites early in the lac i gene of escherichia coli	Translational reboot of lake repressor fragments at three internal sites early in the escherichia coli lac i gene.
10	the roles of the lambda c3 gene and the escherichia coli catabolite gene activation system in the establishment of lysogeny by bacteriophage lambda	The roles of lambda c3 and the apos system; activation of the catabolite gene d'apos; Escherichia coli in apos; lambda phage lysogenesis.
10	divergent operons and the genetic structure of the maltose b region in escherichia coli k12	Dissenting operations and maltose b genetic structure in escherichia coli k12.
10	genetic analysis of an escherichia coli mutant with a lesion in stable rna turnover	Genetic analysis of a mutant of escherichia coli showing a lesion in a stable renewal of the rna.
10	oxidative phosphorylation in escherichia coli k12 an uncoupled mutant with altered membrane structure	Oxidative phosphorylation in etapos; escherichia coli k12, a decoupled mutant whose membrane structure has been altered.
10	the threonine sensitive homoserine dehydrogenase and aspartokinase activities of escherichia coli k12 distribution and accessibility to antibodies of some epitopes of the bifunctional enzyme	The activities of threonine-sensitive homoserine dehydrogenase and aspartokinases from the threonine distribution of apos; escherichia coli k12 and their accessibility to threonine-sensitive antibodies from certain apos epitopes; bifunctional enzyme.
10	comparison of the mutagenic effects of 35s decay in escherichia coli strains wp 2 and wp 2s	Comparison of mutagenic effects of 35s decomposition in wp 2 and wp 2s d' escherichia coli.
10	genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k 12 cross resistance among colicins of group a	Colicin resistance genetics in escherichia coli k12 cross-referenced resistance among a-group colicines.
10	dnab gene of escherichia coli k 12 affects superinfection inhibition between f plasmids	The gene was found to inhibit superinfection between the plasmids f. The gene dnapos; escherichia coli k.
10	effect of uncouplers on downhill beta galactoside transport in energy depleted cells of escherichia coli	Effect of uncouplers on transport of beta-galactosides downward into energy depleted d' escherichia coli.
10	lambda bacteriophage gene produces and x ray sensitivity of escherichia coli comparison of red dependent and gam dependent radioresistance	The gene in the bacteriophage lambda produces and x sensitivity to radiation from escherichia coli by comparison of the red- and the gamma-dependent radioresistance.
10	amplification of sex repressor function of one fi r factor during anaerobic growth of escherichia coli	In addition, it is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of cervical cancer in Canada.
10	variation in expression of sex factor genes in the proteus providencia group relative to escherichia coli	L&apos variation; sexual factor gene expression in the providencia proteus group vs. escherichia coli.
10	colicin tolerance and map location of conjugation deficient mutants	Colicin Tolerance and Map Localization of Conjugative Deficient Mutants.
10	quantitation of the loss of the bacteriophage lambda receptor protein from the outer membrane of lipopolysaccharide deficient strains of escherichia coli	Quantification of loss of lipopolysaccharide-deficient Escherichia coli outer membrane bacteriophage lambda receptor protein.
10	regulation of the escherichia coli methylgalactoside transport system by gene mgld	Methylgalactoside d' escherichia coli gene regulation.
10	genetic and physiological analysis of an envb spherelike mutant of escherichia coli k 12 and characterization of its transductants	Genetic and physiological analysis of a spherical dapos type envb mutant; escherichia coli k12 and characterization of its transducers.
10	genetics of resistance to colicins in escherichia coli k 12 cross resistance among colicins of group b	Genetic analysis of colicin resistance in escherichia coli k12 isolates cross-resistance among group b colicines.
10	tryptophan operon read through isolation and characterization of an abnormally long tryptophan synthetase alpha subunit from a frame shift mutant of escherichia coli	It is an isolation and characterization process; an under @-@unit alpha of an unusually long tryptophan synthetase from apos; a mutant from apos; escherichia coli.
10	bacteriophage t7 deoxyribonucleic acid replication in vitro a protein of escherichia coli required for bacteriophage t7 dna polymerase activity	In vitro replication of bacteriophage t7 of the bacteriophage t7 of the bacteriophage t7; deoxyribonucleic acid, a protein d' escherichia coli necessary for the cell; dna polymerase activity of bacteriophage t7 in vitro.
10	isolation and characterization of mutator strains of escherichia coli k 12	The results of these studies are summarized below.
10	regulation of galactose operon at the gal operator promoter region in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that this is the case.
10	five control systems preventing transfer of escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f	In addition to the above, there is a small amount of chlorine that can be absorbed into the water.
10	rapid cessation of phospholipid synthesis in fructose 1 6 diphosphate aldolase mutants of escherichia coli	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
10	location of the escherichia coli k 12 ruv gene affecting septum formation after inhibition of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis	Localization of the ruv gene of l' escherichia coli k 12, which affects septum formation after deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) synthesis was inhibited.
10	a third kasugamycin resistance locus ksgc affecting ribosomal protein s2 in escherichia coli k 12	A third locus for resistance to kasugamycin, ksgc, affects the ribosomal protein s2 of l' escherichia coli k12.
10	mutants of escherichia coli k12 unable to grow on non fermentable carbon substrates	D&apos mutants; escherichia coli k12 incapable of growing on nonfermentable carbon substrates.
10	restriction of dna in yersinia enterocolitica detected by recipient ability for a derepressed r factor from escherichia coli	Apos restriction; enterocolitica yersinia DNA detected by the recipient's ability to derepress the dosage factor; escherichia coli.
10	inhibition and amplification of the radiation induced degradation of dna in escherichia coli	Inhibition and amplification of radiation-induced Escherichia coli DNA degradation.
10	male specific bacteriophage ms2 propagation in fluorophenylalanine resistant escherichia coli k12	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
10	does phospholipase have a role in killing and sodium dodecyl sulfate lysis of t4 ghost infected escherichia coli	Does phospholipase play a role in the elimination and lysis of phantom-infected sodium dodecyl sulfate?
10	ultraviolet mutagenesis and its repair in an escherichia coli strain containing a nonsense codon	The results of this study are consistent with the results of a recent study by the Canadian Institute of Health Information.
10	regulation of the beta glucoside system in escherchia coli k 12	E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, and E. coli.
10	isoleucine and valine metabolism in escherichia coli k 12 detection and measurement of ilv specific messenger ribonucleic acid	Apos metabolism; escherichia coli k 12 isoleucine and valine detection and measurement; specific messenger ribonucleic acid; itv.
10	the rep mutation iii altered structure of the replicating escherichia coli chromosome	The rep iii mutation altered the structure of the d' escherichia coli in replication.
10	source of energy for the escherichia coli galactose transport systems induced by galactose	Energy for galactose transport systems; galactose-induced Escherichia coli.
10	dna synthesis dependent cell division of escherichia coli 15 tau after arginine and uracil starvation	DNA synthesis is dependent on 15 tau escherichia coli cell division following starvation of arginine and uracil.
10	chemical studies on damages of escherichea coli by the immune bactericidal reaction ii release of phosphatidylethanolamine from a phospholipase a deficient mutant of e coli during the immune bactericidal reaction	Chemical Studies of Damage to Escherichea coli from the Immune Bactericidal Response ii release of phosphatidylethanolamine from apos; phospholipase, a d&apos-deficient mutant; e coli, during the bactericidal immune response.
10	isolation of a metabolite capable of differentially supporting the growth of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide auxotrophs of escherichia coli	In addition, it is recommended that the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) adopt a guideline for the use of antimicrobial agents in food.
10	the reconstitution of functional respiratory chains in membranes from electron transport deficient mutants of escherichia coli as demonstrated by quenching of atebrin fluorescence	Reconstruction of functional respiratory pathways in membranes of electron-transport-deficient escherichia coli mutants has been demonstrated by apos; extinction of spinal fluorescence.
10	recombination and the escherichia coli k 12 sex factor f	The results of this study are summarized below.
10	characteristics of cold sensitive mutants of escherichia coli k 12 defective in deoxyribonucleic acid replication	Characteristics of cold-sensitive d' defective d&apos replication escherichia coli k12; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	evidence for common binding sites for ferrichrome compounds and bacteriophage phi 80 in the cell envelope of escherichia coli	Evidence of the existence of common binding sites for the ferrichrome compounds and bacteriophage phi 80 in the apos; cell envelope of the apos; escherichia coli.
10	anaerobic cytochrome b1 in escherichia coli association with and regulation of nitrate reductase	Acute and chronic toxicity of chloroform to rats and rats.
10	synthesis of nitrate reductase components in chlorate resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Nitrate reductase component synthesis in chlorate-resistant d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	biochemistry and genetics of klebsiella pneumoniae mutant strains unable to fix n2	Biochemistry and genetics of mutant n2-fixing strains of klebsiella pneumoniae.
10	regulation of branched chain aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases in an ilvdac deletion strain of escherichia coli k 12	Ribonucleic acid regulation branched amino chain transfer synthetases in a d' escherichia coli k12 strain that was found to be d' ilvdac.
10	bacteriophage resistance in escherichia coli k 12 general pattern of resistance	Bacteriophage resistance in E. coli; escherichia coli k12 General pattern of resistance.
10	modification of escherichia coli membranes in the prereplicative phase of phage t4 infection specificity of association and quantitation of bound phage proteins	Membrane modification in apo; escherichia coli in the pre-plicative phase of apo specificity; association and quantification of bound proteins in phage t4 for apo; infection by phage t4.
10	escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acids are not cut from an intact precursor molecule	In addition to the above, there are a number of other radionuclides that are considered to be carcinogenic.
10	induction and mutagenesis of prophage lambda in escherichia coli k12 by metabolites of aflatoxin b1	Induction and mutagenesis of lambda prophage by metabolites of l&apos in escherichia coli k12; aflatoxin b1.
10	pleiotropic effects of a dna adenine methylation mutation dam 3 in escherichia coli k12	In addition, there are a number of genetic factors that influence the genetic makeup of these organisms.
10	effects of dna polymerase defective and recombination deficient mutations on the ultraviolet sensitivity of bacillus subtilis spores	Effects of DNA polymerase- and recombinant-deficient mutations on ultraviolet sensitivity of spores of bacillus subtilis.
10	mutagenic properties of cis plantinum ii diammino dichloride in escherichia coli	Effect of chlorinated phenylphenol on the metabolism of chlorinated phenol.
10	stringent control of ribosomal protein gene expression in escherichia coli	Strict control over the expression of the ribosomal protein gene in Escherichia coli.
10	a new relaxed mutant of escherichia coli with an altered 50s ribosomal subunit	A new relaxed d' escherichia coli mutant with a sub-ribosomal unit 50s altered.
10	direction of transcription of the regulatory gene arac in escherichia coli b r	Transcriptional Direction of Arac Regulator Gene in Escherichia coli b r.
10	fine structure mapping complementation and physiology of escherichia coli hfl mutants	Fine structure map, hfl d&apos mutants complementation and physiology; escherichia coli.
10	an endonuclease from escherichia coli that acts preferentially on uv irradiated dna and is absent from the uvra and uvrb mutants	An escherichia coli endonuclease that is preferentially active on apos-irradiated DNA; uv and absent from uvra and uvrb mutants.
10	biogenesis of membrane lipids mutants of escherichia coli with temperature sensitive phosphatidylserine decarboxylase	Biogenesis of membrane lipid Escherichia coli mutants with phosphatidylserine decarboxylase.
10	metabolites influence control of lysine transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase formation in escherichia coli k 12	The metabolites influence the control of l' ribonucleic acid transfer synthetase in lysine in escherichia coli k12.
10	a ribonucleoprotein precursor of both the 30s and 50s ribosomal sunbunits of escherichia coli	Ribosomal sunflower precursor from the 1930s and 1950s; Escherichia coli.
10	inhibition of polypeptide chain initiation in escherichia coli by elongation factor g	Inhibition of the polypeptide chain; initiation of the polypeptide chain in Escherichia coli by the factor d' elongation g.
10	effect of a low molecular weight dna binding protein h1 factor on the in vitro transcription of the lactose operon in escherichia coli	It is not possible to determine the effect of the protein on the protein, but it is important to determine the effect of the protein on the protein.
10	a deletion mutation placing the galactokinase gene of escherichia coli under control of the biotin promoter	Deletion mutation placing the d' escherichia coli galactokinase gene under biotin promoter control.
10	accumulation of toxic concentrations of methylglyoxal by wild type escherichia coli k 12	Accumulation of Toxic Levels of Methylglyoxal by Wild-type Escherichia coli k 12.
10	ribosomal proteins in plastids of a mendelian and a nonmendelian streptomycin resistant mutant of chlamydomonas reinhardii determined by two dimensional gel electrophoresis	Ribosomal proteins in Mendicelian and Dapos plastids; a streptomycin-resistant non-Mendelian mutant of Chlamydomonas reinhardii were determined by two-dimensional gel electrophoresis.
10	the development and the reversion of spheroplasts of a diaminopimelic acid auxotrophic mutant of escherichia coli	Sphaeroplast development and reversion of apos; an auxotrophic mutant; diaminopimelic acid; escherichia coli.
10	metabolite transport in mutants of escherichia coli k12 defective in electron transport and coupled phosphorylation	Metabolite transport in d' escherichia coli k12 mutants is defective in coupled phosphorylation and electron transport.
10	biosynthesis of bacterial menaquinones menaquinone mutants of escherichia coli	Sequence analysis was performed to determine the extent to which the antimicrobial drug is effective in reducing the risk.
10	alteration of regulation of arginine biosynthesis in escherichia coli w by mutation to rifampin resistance	Modification of the regulation of the biosynthesis of escherichia coli; arginine isomers w by mutation to rifampin resistance.
10	excision of pyrimidine dimers in normal and t4 infected escherichia coli effect of pola and other mutations	L'excision des dimers pyrimidiques dans les strains normale et t4 infectées par escherichia coli, l'apos; effet de la pola et d'apos; other mutations.
10	stimulatory effect of hydrostatic pressure on cell division in cultures of escherichia coli	Stimulation Effect of Hydrostatic Pressure on Cell Division in Escherichia coli Cultures.
10	inhibition of excision repair without influence upon uv sensitivity and uv mutability in escherichia coli b r hcr	Inhibition of repair; excision with no influence on susceptibility; uv and mutability; uv escherichia coli.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli defective in removing 3 terminal nucleotides from some transfer rna precursor molecules	A mutant of d' escherichia coli that does not eliminate 3 nucleotides terminal of some precursor molecules of rna transfer.
10	effect of procaine hydrochloride on dna repair in escherichia coli	Effect of Procaine Hydrochloride on Repair of DNA in Escherichia coli.
10	mutations in escherichia coli k 12 decreasing the rate of streptomycin uptake synergism with r factor mediated capacity to inactivate streptomycin	Mutations in apos; escherichia coli k 12 decreased the level of synergy in apos; absorption of streptomycin with the factor-mediated capacity; inactivation of streptomycin.
10	energy linked reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in membranes derived from normal and various respiratory deficient mutant strains of escherichia coli k12	The reduction of adenine dinucleotide nicotinamide in membranes derived from normal mutant strains and various respiratory deficient escherichia coli k12 strains is energy dependent.
10	the atp dependent dnaase from escherichia coli rora a nuclease with changed enzymatic properties	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	30 s pre ribosomal rna of escherichia coli primary and secondary processing	This is a 30-s pre-ribosomal rn of the primary and secondary transformation of d' escherichia coli.
10	isolation and initial characterization of glutathione deficient mutants of escherichia coli k 12	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed in a manner consistent with the requirements of the protocol.
10	isolation of specialized transducing bacteriophage lambda carrying genes of the l arabinose operon of escherichia coli b r	Isolate specialized transducer lambda bacteriophage carrying lidos; lidos arabinose operon; escherichia coli b r.
10	role of pyrimidine dimer excision in loss of potential streptomycin resistance mutations of ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli on phosphate buffered agar	The role of l' excision of the pyrimidine dimer in the loss of potential streptomycin-resistant mutations of l' escherichia coli irradiated at the apos; ultraviolet on phosphate-buffered agar.
10	two modes of excision repair in toluene treated escherichia coli	Excision in toluene-treated escherichia coli.
10	individuality of mannonate and altronate hydro lyases in escherichia coli k 12	The individual mannonate and altronate hydrolyses of escherichia coli k12 are demonstrated.
10	n terminal amino acid sequences of d serine deaminases of wild type and operator constitutive strains of escherichia coli k 12	In the absence of any data, it is not possible to determine the extent to which serine deaminases are present in the wild.
10	inhibition of escherichia coli isoleucine biosynthesis by isoleucine tetrazole	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are known to inhibit the biosynthesis of E. coli.
10	accumulation of arginine precursors in escherichia coli effects on growth enzyme repression and application to the forward selection of arginine auxotrophs	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that the effects of acrylonitrile or acrylonitrile on the genotoxic effects of acrylonitrile and acrylonitrile on the genotoxicity of acrylonitrile.
10	genetic analyses of an amber mutation in escherichia coli k 12 affecting deoxyribonucleic acid ligase and viability	Amber mutation in escherichia coli k 12 affects deoxyribonucleic acid deacid ligase and viability.
10	production of cells without deoxyribonucleic acid during thymidine starvation of lexa cultures of escherichia coli k 12	Production of deoxyribonucleic acid-free cells during thymidine deprivation in thymidine-free cultures; escherichia coli k 12.
10	ribosomal distribution in a polyamine auxotroph of escherichia coli	Ribosomal distribution in auxotrophic polyamine; escherichia coli.
10	operator constitutive mutants in the threonine operon of escherichia coli k 12	Constituent mutant operon in Escherichia coli threonine operon k12.
10	translocation of the tetracycline resistance determinant from r100 1 to the escherichia coli k 12 chromosome	Translocation of the r1001 tetracycline-resistance determinant to chromosome k12 d' escherichia coli.
10	uroporphyrin accumulating mutant of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	physiological suppression of a transport defect in escherichia coli mutants deficient in ca2 mg2 stimulated adenosine triphosphatase	Physiological suppression of apos; a defect in transport in mutants of ca2 mg2-deficient escherichia coli stimulated apos; adenosine triphosphatase.
10	anaerobic energy yielding reaction associated with transhydrogenation from glycerol 3 phosphate to fumarate by an escherichia coli system	D&apos reaction; anaerobic energy associated with glycerol 3 phosphate trans hydrogenation to fumarate by a d' escherichia coli system.
10	electron transport chain from glycerol 3 phosphate to nitrate in escherichia coli	Glycerol 3 phosphate to nitrate transport chain for escherichia coli.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid modification by intermediate type modification mutants of escherichia coli k 12 and b	Modification of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid by mutants intermediate in modification of apos; escherichia coli k12 and b.
10	comparison of lipopolysaccharides from agmenellum quadruplicatum to escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium by using thin layer chromatography	Compare the lipopolysaccharides of apos; agmenellum quadruplicatum with those of apos; escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium, respectively, by thin-layer chromatography.
10	unusual membranous structures in minicells and minicell producing strains of escherichia coli	In addition to the above, there are a number of other types of micro-organisms that can be used in the production of micro-organisms.
10	regulation of methionine transport activity in escherichia coli	The regulation of l' methionine-transporting activity in Escherichia coli.
10	isolation and characterization of lambda transducing bacteriophages for the su1 supd minus amber suppressor of escherichia coli	Isolation and characterization of bacteriophages transducer lambda for suppressor su1 suppressor su1 sup less amber of l' escherichia coli.
10	maltose chemoreceptor of escherichia coli	Chemo-receptor system maltosis; Escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal location of mutations affecting the electrophoretic mobility of malate dehydrogenase in escherichia coli k 12	Chromosomal localization of malate dehydrogenase electrophoretic mobility mutations in escherichia coli k 12.
10	analysis of glutamate exit in escherichia coli	Glutamate output analysis in escherichia coli.
10	deletion of the escherichia coli crp gene	Genetic diversity and genetic diversity.
10	properties of alpha dehydrobiotin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Properties of Dapos mutants; Escherichia coli k 12 potato resistant; alpha-dehydrobiotin.
10	xanthosine 5 phosphate amidotransferase from escherichia coli	Amidotransferase of the xanthosin phosphate 5 from the bacterium Escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis effect of cessation of net phospholipid synthesis on cytoplasmic and outer membranes	D' escherichia coli mutants defective in the synthesis of membrane phospholipids have a cessation effect on the net synthesis of phospholipids on cytoplasmic and external membranes.
10	transport of purines and deoxyadenosine in escherichia coli	Transport of Purines and Deoxyadenosine into Escherichia coli.
10	transfection of escherichia coli spheroplasts vi transfection of nonpermissive spheroplasts by t5 and bf23 bacteriophage dna carrying amber mutations in dna transfer genes	Transfection of d' Escherichia coli spheroplasts with non-permissive spheroplasts by bacteriophages t5 and bf23 with amber mutations in d' DNA transfer genes.
10	a new method for the isolation of methionyl transfer rna synthetase mutants from escherichia coli	A novel method to isolate methionyltransfer rna synthetase mutants from l' escherichia coli.
10	chromosomal location of mutations affecting the regualtion of biotin synthesis in escherichia coli	Chromosomal localization of biotin regrowth mutations in escherichia coli.
10	effect of l azetidine 2 carboxylic acid on growth and proline metabolism in escherichia coli	Effect of Lapos; Carboxylic Acid of Lazetidine 2 on Proline Growth and Metabolism in Escherichia coli.
10	inducibility of beta glucuronidase in wild type and hexuronate negative mutants of escherichia coli k 12	The indutibility of beta glucuronidase in wild-type and hexuronate-negative yeast-like mutants is confirmed.
10	selection procedure for mutants defective in the beta methylgalactoside transport system of escherichia coli utilizing the compound 2r glyceryl beta d galactopyranoside	Procedure for selection of defective mutants in the beta transport system-methylgalactosides d' escherichia coli using 2r d galactopyranoside glyceryl beta.
10	changes in the biochemical properties of shigella flexneri la as a result of recombination with escherichia coli k12	Changes in shigella flexneri biochemical properties resulting from recombination with escherichia coli k12.
10	mutations affecting aromatic amino acid transport in escherichia coli and salmonella typhimurium	Mutations Affecting Aromatic Amino Acid Transport in Escherichia coli and Salmonella typhimurium.
10	r factor tetracycline and chloramphenicol resistance in escherichia coli k12 cmlb mutants	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Intakes.
10	genes involved in the uptake and catabolism of gluconate by escherichia coli	Genes involved in gluconate absorption and catabolism by escherichia coli.
10	effect of inorganic phosphate on acridine inhibition and plasmid curing in escherichia coli	Effect of inorganic phosphate (IP) on apos; inhibition of acridine and plasmid cure in escherichia coli.
10	mutagenesis by nitrosoguanidine ethyl methanesulfonate and mutator gene muth in continuous cultures of escherichia coli	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
10	use of repair deficient strains of escherichia coli and liver microsomes to detect and characterise dna damage caused by pyrrolizidine alkaloids heliotrine and monocrotaline	Use of repair-deficient strains of d' escherichia coli and hepatic microsomes to detect and characterize damage to l' DNA caused by alkaloids of pyrrolizidine, l' heliotrin and monocrotaline.
10	mutation and dna replication in escherichia coli treated with low concentrations of n methyl n nitro n nitrosoguanidine	Mutation and replication of DNA in Escherichia coli treated with low-level n-methyl n-nitro-n-nitrosoguanidine.
10	ultraviolet light induced responses of an mfd mutant of escherichia coli b r having a slow rate of dimer excision	Ultraviolet light induced the responses of a mutant, escherichia coli b r, with a slow rate of excision of the dimers.
10	regulation of early mrna synthesis after bacteriophage t4 infection of escherichia coli	The regulation of the early synthesis of mrna after infection with bacteriophage t4 d' escherichia coli.
10	studies on the de novo biosynthesis of nad in escherichia coli the separation of the nadb gene product from the nada gene product and its purification	Studies of de novo nad biosynthesis in escherichia coli, nada gene product separation and purification.
10	f factor mediated restriction of bacteriophage t7 synthesis of rna and protein in t7 infected escherichia coli f and f cells	F-factor-mediated restriction of rna synthesis and bacteriophage t7 proteins in t7-infected f and f cells; escherichia coli.
10	f factor mediated restriction of bacteriophage t7 protein synthesis in cell free systems from t7 infected escherichia coli f and f cells	The f-factor-mediated restriction of the synthesis of the t7 protein of the bacteriophage in cell-free systems of f- and f- infected cells; escherichia coli.
10	experimental escherichia coli urinary infection in the rat	Rat experimental urinary tract infection with Escherichia coli.
10	comparative analysis of deletion and base change mutabilities of escherichia coli b strains differing in dna repair capacity wild type uvra pola reca by various mutagens	Comparative Analysis of Deletion and Basal Change Mutabilities of Dapos strains; Escherichia coli b strains with a DNA repair capacity that differs from that of Lapos; uvra pola wild-type by various mutagens.
10	isolation and characteristics of uv resistant revertants of reca strains of escherichia coli k 12	Isolation and Characteristics of Resistant Retiners; Resistant Strain; Escherichia coli.
10	endonucleolytic incision of x irradiated deoxyribonucleic acid by extracts of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
10	dna synthesis involving a complexes form of dna polymerase i in extracts of escherichia coli	In addition, it may be used in conjunction with other biological processes, such as microorganisms, or in combination with other biological processes.
10	permeability lesions in male escherichia coli infected with bacteriophage t7	Permeability lesion in a male Escherichia coli bacteriophage-infected bacteriophage t7.
10	elevated mutability of pola derivatives of escherichia coli b r at sublethal doses of ultraviolet light evidence for an inducible error prone repair system sos repair and its anomalous expression in these strains	Increased mutability of polar derivatives of escherichia coli at sublethal ultraviolet light demonstrates the existence of apo, an inducible and error-prone repair system, and its abnormal expression in these strains.
10	model for regulation of escherichia coli dna repair functions	In addition, it can be used as a means of reducing the risk of infection.
10	transport properties of merodiploids covering the daga locus in escherichia coli k 12	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
10	suppression of spectinomycin resistance in a mutant of escherichia coli k 12	Spectinomycin resistance suppression in a d' escherichia coli k12 mutant was performed.
10	genetic characterization of the metk locus in escherichia coli k 12	Genetic characterization of the metk-locus in escherichia coli k.
10	specialized peptide transport system in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli specialized peptide transport system.
10	multiplicity of oligopeptide transport systems in escherichia coli	The multiplicity of escherichia coli oligopeptide transport systems.
10	d alanine requiring cell wall mutant of escherichia coli	D-alanine requiring an escherichia coli cell wall mutant.
10	derivation of glycine from threonine in escherichia coli k 12 mutants	Threonine glycine derivation in k12 d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	relationship between chromosome replication and cell division in a thymineless mutant of escherichia coli b r	Chromosome replication – cell division relationships in a thymine-free mutant d' escherichia coli b r.
10	transport of l 4 azaleucine in escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized below.
10	utilization of selected leucine peptide amides by escherichia coli	Peptide amides of leucine selected by escherichia coli.
10	regulation of the lysine biosynthetic pathway in escherichia coli k 12 isolation of a cis dominant constitutive mutant for ak iii synthesis	The regulation of the biosynthetic pathway of lysine in escherichia coli k 12, isolation of d' a constitutive mutant dominant in the synthesis of ak iii.
10	induction of lactose transport in escherichia coli during the absence of phospholipid synthesis	Lactose transport induced in escherichia coli during apo; lack of phospholipid synthesis.
10	mating aggregates in escherichia coli conjugation	It is not possible to distinguish between two or more species.
10	genes for ribitol and d arabitol catabolism in escherichia coli their loci in c strains and absence in k 12 and b strains	The genes responsible for the catabolism of d arabitol and ribitol in escherichia coli are their loci in strains c and their absence in strains k 12 and b.
10	intrinsic and extrinsic light responses of salmonella typhimurium and escherichia coli	Intrinsic and extrinsic responses to Typhimurium and Escherichia coli Salmonella.
10	enhanced level and metabolic regulation of methionyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in different strains of escherichia coli k 12	Increased metabolic rate and regulation of apos methionyltransfer; ribonucleic acid synthetase in different apos strains; escherichia coli k 12.
10	unusual sensitivity of escherichia coli to adenine or adenine plus histidine	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	effect of tsl mutations on col e1 expression in a reca strain of escherichia coli k 12	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
10	evidence for binding protein independent substrate translocation by the methylgalactoside transport system of escherichia coli k12	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent to which the substrate is translocated, but it is possible to determine the extent to which the substrate is translocated.
10	production and biological properties of l like mutants 11r of escherichia coli	Mutants of the same type are produced and bio-properties are similar.
10	effect of different mutations in ribosomal protein s5 of escherichia coli on translational fidelity	Effect of different translational fidelity mutations in the ribosomal protein s5 d' escherichia coli.
10	distribution in nature of r factors that increase susceptibility to rifampin of rif r mutants in escherichia coli	Distribution in nature of r-factors that increase the susceptibility of escherichia coli r mutants to rifampin.
10	genetical studies of serum resistance in escherichia coli	Genetic Studies of Serological Resistance in Escherichia coli.
10	integration at hag or elsewhere of h2 phase 2 flagellin genes transduced from salmonella to escherichia coli	Integration of phase 2 salmonella-translated flagellin h2 genes at the wizard level or elsewhere; escherichia coli.
10	effect of some aminoglycosides upon a drug dependent escherichia coli strain	An organism that has been found to be active in the environment.
10	studies of intracellular thymidine nucleotides relationship between the synthesis of deoxyribonucleic acid and the thymidine triphosphate pool in escherichia coli k12	Studies of the relationship between intracellular thymidine nucleotides and deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and thymidine triphosphate pool in escherichia coli k12.
10	plasmid incompatibility and control of replication copy mutants of the r factor r1 in escherichia coli k 12	Plasmid incompatibility and r1-mutant copy replication control in 12 mutants of escherichia coli k.
10	further characterization of a non essential mutator gene in escherichia coli k 12	In addition, a mutant gene, which is not essential in Escherichia coli, is further characterized.
10	relationship between the tonb locus and iron transport in escherichia coli	Relationship between iron transport and tonb in escherichia coli.
10	isolation characterization and mapping of escherichia coli mutants blocked in the synthesis of ornithine decarboxylase	Characterization and mapping of ornithine decarboxylase-blocked Escherichia coli mutants.
10	tryptophan synthetase alpha 5 7 s novel molecular species formed within escherichia coli	Tryptophan 5 s alpha synthetase forms new molecular species in Escherichia coli.
10	identification of the dicyclohexylcarbodiimide reactive protein component of the adenosine 5 triphosphate energy transducing system of escherichia coli	Identification of dicyclohexylcarbodiimide-reactive protein from l&apos transduction system; l&apos triphosphate energy; adenosine 5 in escherichia coli.
10	interaction of p2 bacteriophage with the dnab gene of escherichia coli	Interaction of bacteriophage p2 with Escherichia coli dnab gene.
10	genetic control of multiple pathways of post replicational repair in uvrb strains of escherichia coli k 12	Genetic mastery of multiple repair pathways post-replication in uvrb d&apos strains; escherichia coli k 12 replication in uvrb strains.
10	sucrose dependent spectinomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Sertinomycin-resistant, sucrose-dependent Escherichia coli mutants.
10	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase ii activity in an escherichia coli mutator strain	It can be used as a disinfectant or as a disinfectant.
10	excision of pyrimidine dimers in toluene treated escherichia coli	Apos; pyrimidine dimer excision in toluene-treated escherichia coli.
10	cis dominant transfer deficient mutants of the escherichia coli k 12 f sex factor	Key words @-@: dominant cis mutants defective in sex-factor transfer (k12 f) of l' escherichia coli.
10	isolation of escherichia coli k 12 mutants with altered level of beta n acetylglucosaminidase	Isolate k12 dapos; escherichia coli with altered beta acetylglucosaminidase levels.
10	increased loss of duplicated genes in streptomycin resistant stra mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Increased duplication gene loss in streptomycin-resistant stratiform mutants d' escherichia coli k 12.
10	genetic study of escherichia coli k 12 mutants resistant to 2 6 diaminopurine	Genetic study of 26 diaminopurine resistant mutants of escherichia coli.
10	a further study of the nature of phenotypical reversions in thymidine phosphorylase deletion mutants of escherichia coli k 12	A further study of phenotypic reversions in deletion mutants of thymidine phosphorylase from l' escherichia coli k 12 was carried out.
10	coupling of rates of transcription translation and messenger ribonucleic acid degradation in streptomycin dependent mutants of escherichia coli	Canadian Journal of Animal Clinical Psychiatry, 3rd edition. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/hppb/hppb/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.htm.
10	nature of the energy requirement for the irreversible adsorption of bacteriophages t1 and phi80 to escherichia coli	N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A No.
10	coordinated alterations in ribosomes and cytoplasmic membrane in sucrose dependent spectinomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Coordinated cytoplasmic membrane and ribosomal alterations were observed in spectinomycin-resistant sucrose-dependent mutants of d' escherichia coli.
10	suppressor induced structural changes in a missense l ribulokinase of escherichia coli	The suppressor induced structural changes in the ribulokinase l missense d' escherichia coli.
10	effect of enrichment procedure upon auxotroph recovery in escherichia coli k 12	For the purpose of this assessment, the following criteria should be considered: 1.
10	reca dependent inactivation of the lambda repressor in escherichia coli lysogens by gamma radiation and by tif expression	Lambda repressor reca dependent inactivation in apos lysogens; escherichia coli gamma radiation and tif expression.
10	is1 and is2 mutations in the ribosomal protein genes of e coli k 12	Est1 and est2 mutations in the genes of 12 k e coli k ribosomal proteins.
10	alteration of ribosomal proteins in revertants of a valyl trna synthetase mutant of escherichia coli	Modification of the ribosomal proteins in the revertant d'apos; a mutant valyl trna synthetase d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	analysis of ribosomal proteins in streptomycin resistant and dependent mutants isolated from streptomycin independent escherichia coli strains	Ribosome protein analysis of streptomycin-resistant and streptomycin-dependent mutants isolated from streptomycin-independent strains of d' escherichia coli.
10	cooperative control of translation fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli i properties of ribosomal mutants whose resistance to neamine is the cumulative effect of two distinct mutations	Cooperative control of ribosomal protein translation fidelity in the escherichia coli i properties of l-resistant ribosomal mutants; cumulative effect of two distinct mutations.
10	non enzymatic translocation in ribosomes from streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	Non-enzymatic transfer in streptomycin-resistant Escherichia coli d'apos mutant ribosomes.
10	phileomycin induced lethality and dna degradation in escherichia coli k12	The lethality and degradation of the DNA of escherichia coli k12 was induced by phileomycin.
10	strains of escherichia coli diploid for the chromosomal origin of dna replication	It is not possible to determine the origin of the prognosis, but it is possible to determine the origin of the prognosis.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli auxotrophic for organic phosphates evidence for two defects in inorganic phosphate transport	A mutant of d' escherichia coli auxotrophs for organic phosphates demonstrates the existence of two defects in the transport of inorganic phosphate.
10	induction of rna polymerase synthesis in escherichia coli	Induction of escherichia coli rna polymerase synthesis.
10	infectivity of different forms of lambda bacteriophage dna in transfection of calcinated escherichia coli	Infectivity of various forms of the bacteriophage; DNA of the bacteriophage lambda in the transfection of calcined escherichia coli.
10	the regulation of transcription in bacteriophage t5 infected escherichia coli	Escherichia coli was infected by transcriptional regulation in bacteriophage t5.
10	overproduction of lysine by mutant strains of escherichia coli with defective lysine transport systems	Lysine overproduction by mutant Escherichia coli strains with defective systems of lysine transport.
10	mutations in escherichia coli that relieve catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis mutations distant from the tryptophanase gene	Mutations in Escherichia coli that suppress the catabolite repression of the tryptophanase remotely synthesizing mutations of the tryptophanase gene.
10	mutations in escherichia coli that relieve catabolite repression of tryptophanase synthesis tryptophanase promoter like mutations	Mutations in Escherichia coli that suppress catabolic repression of tryptophanase promoter tryptophanase synthesis, such as mutations similar to mutations.
10	energy requirements for biosynthesis of dna in escherichia coli role of membrane bound energy transducing atpase coupling factor	Energy requirements for apo biosynthesis; apo DNA; escherichia coli play a role in apo coupling factor; apo transducer atpase; apo membrane energy; escherichia coli.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 vii purification of the soluble atpase of supernatant extracts and kinetics of incorporation into reconstituted particles	Membrane reconstruction in chl mutants; escherichia coli 12 purification of apos; soluble apase of apos; supernatant and kinetic extracts of apos; incorporation into reconstituted particles.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 viii purification and properties of the fa factor the product of the chl b gene	Membrane reconstruction in chl r mutants from purification of d' escherichia coli k 12 viii and properties of factor fa, the product of gene chl b.
10	membrane reconstitution in chl r mutants of escherichia coli k 12 ix part played by phospholipids in the complementation process	Membrane reconstitution in the chl r mutants d' escherichia coli k 12 ix. plays a role in the phospholipid complementation process.
10	the maintenance of the energized membrane state and its relation to active transport in escherichia coli	Maintenance of the membrane state under tension and its relation to escherichia coli active transport.
10	synthesis of heteropolyribonucleotides by toluene treated escherichia coli cells	Apos synthesis; toluene-treated heteropolyribonucleotide; escherichia coli.
10	transcription termination factor rho activity is altered in escherichia coli with sua gene mutations	L' activity of the rho transcription termination factor is altered in escherichia coli by mutations in the sua gene.
10	progress in the resolution of the cytoplasmic membrane dna initiation complex of escherichia coli	Progress in solving the apo complex; initiation of apo cell membrane DNA; escherichia coli.
10	mechanism of growth delay induced in escherichia coli by near ultraviolet radiation	Near ultraviolet radiation induced mechanisms of growth retardation in escherichia coli.
10	chemostat culture of escherichia coli k 12 limited by the activity of alkaline phosphatase	Escherichia coli k12 chemostat culture is limited by alkaline phosphatase activity.
10	transience of the donor state in an escherichia coli k12 strain carrying a repressed r factor	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
10	dna degradation in minicells of escherichia coli k 12 ii effect of reca1 and recb21 mutations on dna degradation in minicells and detection of exonuclease v activity	Deterioration of apo; DNA in minicells; Escherichia coli k 12; effect of mutations reca1 and recb21 on apo degradation; DNA in minicells and the detection of apo; exonuclease activity v.
10	isolation and characterization of mutants with a feedback resistant n acetylglutamate synthase in escherichia coli k 12	Mutants possessing retolerant acetylglutamate synthase from escherichia coli k 12 were isolated and characterized.
10	transcriptional control of the isoleucine valine messenger rna s in e coli k 12	Determine the number of samples taken and the number of samples taken.
10	escherichia coli mutants uvr d and uvr e deficient in gene conversion of lambda heteroduplexes	Evident and uvr mutant Escherichia coli defective in the gene conversion of heteroduplex lamda.
10	induction of prophage lambda during the division cycle of escherichia coli	Induction of lambda prophage during d' escherichia coli.
10	replication of phia and phix174 in escherichia coli mutants thermosensitive in dna synthesis	Phia and phix replication174 in mutants of Escherichia coli that are thermosensitive to DNA synthesis.
10	effects of some antibiotics on the stringent control of rna synthesis in escherichia coli	Effects of Certain Antibiotics on the Strict Control of Rna Synthesis in Escherichia coli.
10	polynucleotide phosphorylase can participate in decay of mrna in escherichia coli in the absence of ribonuclease ii	Polynucleotide phosphorylase may contribute to the decomposition of escherichia coli mrna in the absence of ribonuclease ii.
10	parameters of gene expression in the bipolar argecbh operon of e coli k12 the question of translational control	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
10	proteinchemical studies on ribosomal proteins s4 and s12 from ram ribosomal ambiguity mutants of escherichia coli	Protein-chemical studies of s4 and s12 ribosomal proteins from d&apos mutants; escherichia coli strains with r-ribosomal ambiguities.
10	chelocardin inducible resistance in escherichia coli bearing r plasmids	Chelocardin-induced resistance in r plasmid-borne Escherichia coli.
10	phospholipids and atpase activity of wild type and atpase deficient and uncoupled mutants of e coli	Phospholipids and apo, wild-type atpase activity, and e coli-uncoupled, atpase-deficient mutants.
10	the mutagenic effect of pesticides on escherichia coli wp2 try	L' pesticide mutagenic effect on escherichia coli wp2 try.
10	comparison of mutagenic efficiency of decay of 32p incorporated in e coli wp 2 and e coli wp 2s cells	Comparison of e coli wp 2 and e coli wp 2s; mutagenic efficiency of 32p-decay incorporated into e coli wp 2 and e coli wp 2s.
10	reversible inactivation of vectorial phosphorylation by hydroxybutynoate in escherichia coli membrane vesicles	Reversible inactivation of apos vector phosphorylation; hydroxybutynoate in apos membrane vesicles; escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli stringent factor binds to ribosomes at a site different from that of elongation factor tu or g	It is important to note that this factor does not bind to ribosomes at a site other than that of the elongation factor.
10	differentiation between mutants of escherichia coli k defective in oxidative phosphorylation	Differentiation among oxidative phosphorylation-deficient esterichia coli mutants.
10	dna synthesis in vitro in lysates of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in vitro; DNA in lysates; escherichia coli.
10	inducible gluconate permease in a gluconate kinase deficient mutant of escherichia coli	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
10	isolation and properties of escherichia coli atpase mutants with altered divalent metal specificity for atp hydrolysis	Molecular characterization of the molecular structure of the organism and its metabolites, including the genetic structure of the organism and its metabolites.
10	very stable prokaryotic messenger rna in chromosomeless escherichia coli minicells	Rna, a very stable, procaryotic messenger, in the chromosomal minicells of Apos; escherichia coli.
10	bidirectional replication of plasmid r6k dna in escherichia coli correspondence between origin of replication and position of single strand break in relaxed complex	Two-way replication of the apos; plasmid DNA r6k in the correspondence d' Escherichia coli between the apos; origin of replication and the position of the breakage d' a single strand in a relaxed complex.
10	lipoic acid content of escherichia coli and other microorganisms	Bacteria that are not found in the gastrointestinal tract.
10	soluble tri and dipeptidases in escherichia coli k 12	Salmonella spp. are not considered to be enterotoxic.
10	a 30 s precursor of 30 s ribosomes in a mutant of escherichia coli	A 30-s precursor to the 30-s ribosomes of a d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	isolation and characterization of a bacteriophage infective for a udp galactose 4 epimeraseless mutant of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in Appendix A. Isolation and characterization of an infectious bacteriophage for an epimer-free mutant, Escherichia coli.
10	repair of heat injury in thymine auxotrophs of escherichia coli	Repair of damage caused by heat to thymine auxotrophs; d' Escherichia coli.
10	relationship between ppgpp levels and rates of protein and rna synthesis in escherichia coli	Ratio of ppgpp levels to rates of escherichia coli protein and rna synthesis.
10	the influence of differences in the rec genotype of e coli cells on the function of sex factor f	L' influences differences in e coli rec genotype on sex factor function f f.
10	effects of rifampicin on synthesis and functional activity of dna dependent rna polymerase in escherichia coli	Rifampicin effects on synthesis and apos; apos-dependent rna polymerase functional activity; escherichia coli DNA.
10	expression of the plasmid pkm101 determined dna repair system in reca and lex strains of escherichia coli	Lapses; plasmid expression pkm101 determined the repair system of lapses; DNA from rea and lex d&apos strains; and escherichia coli.
10	the influence of mutations upon the synthesis of rna polymerase subunits in escherichia coli cells	Influence of mutations on synthesis of sub--rna polymerase units in d' escherichia coli.
10	formaldehyde induced dna protein crosslinks in escherichia coli	Formaldehyde induced DNA cross-linking of protein from escherichia coli.
10	partial suppression of the lexa phenotype by mutations rnm which restore ultraviolet resistance but not ultraviolet mutability to escherichia coli b r uvr a lexa	Partial phenotypic suppression by rnm mutations that restore resistance to ultraviolet but not ultraviolet; ultraviolet; and escherichia coli.
10	reversion induction in phage t4 mutants in escherichia coli strains with defective rna polymerase	Induction of reversion in mutants of phage t4 of strains of d' escherichia coli with a defective rna polymerase.
10	processing of the 17 s escherichia coli precursor rna in the 27 s pre ribosomal particle	In addition, it is important to note that there are no data on the toxicity of ethylene oxide to fish.
10	carcinogen induced dna repair in nucleotide permeable escherichia coli cells analysis of dna repair induced by the carcinogens n acetoxy n 2 acetylaminofluorene and 7 bromomethyl benz a anthracene	Carcinogen-induced DNA repair, nucleotide-permeable Escherichia coli, nucleotide-mediated DNA repair analysis, acetoxy n-2 acetylaminofluorene-induced DNA, and anthracene-mediated DNA.
10	the major proteins of the escherichia coli outer cell envelope membrane heterogeneity of protein i	The protein's major proteins, the outer cell envelope of apos; escherichia coli, are heterogeneous.
10	purification by immunoadsorbtion chromatography of the normal and a mutant form of the b2 subunit of escherichia coli tryptophan synthase	Purification by chromatography of apos; immunoadsorption of normal and apos; a mutant form of subs @-@unit b2 of d&apos tryptophan synthase; escherichia coli.
10	an inhibitory effect of thymidine on its own conversion to nucleotide in escherichia coli	Inhibition of its own nucleotide conversion by thymidine in escherichia coli.
10	preparation of enterochelin from escherichia coli	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed at the same time.
10	hydrogen donor system for escherichia coli ribonucleoside diphosphate reductase dependent upon glutathione	Dapos donor system; glutathione-dependent escherichia coli ribonucleoside diphosphate reductase.
10	elimination of lethal and pre mutational dna lesions during the photoreactivation of uv irradiated escherichia coli	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those of other studies that have been conducted in Canada.
10	cross resistance of escherichia coli b r to cis platinum ii diamminochloride uv light and alkylating agents	Cross-resistance to cis-platinum diamminochloride ultraviolet and alkylating agents.
10	properties of a mutant of streptococcus mutans altered in glucosyltransferase activity	Properties of a streptococcus mutans mutant have altered glucosyltransferase activity.
10	threonine deaminase from a nonsense mutant of escherichia coli requiring isoleucine or pyridoxine evidence for half of the sites reactivity	Threonine deaminase d' a mutant not-sense d' Escherichia coli requires threonine, isoleucine, or pyridoxine data for half the reactive sites.
10	biosynthesis of membrane bound nitrate reductase in escherichia coli evidence for a soluble precursor	Membrane-bound nitrate reductase biosynthesis in Escherichia coli isolates demonstrated the existence of a soluble precursor.
10	escherichia coli mutants altered in murein lipoprotein	Altered Escherichia coli Mutants in Murein Lipoprotein.
10	mode of insertion of lipopolysaccharide into the outer membrane of escherichia coli	Procedure; lipopolysaccharide insertion into outer membrane; escherichia coli.
10	threonine deaminase from escherichia coli feedback hypersensitive enzyme from a genetic regulatory mutant	The threonine deaminase of escherichia coli is an enzyme that is hypersensitive to feedback from apos, a genetic regulatory mutant.
10	siderophore protection against colicins m b v and ia in escherichia coli	Protection of siderophores in Escherichia coli from colicin mbv and colicin ia.
10	mapping of two loci affecting the regulation of branched chain amino acid transport in escherichia coli k 12	Mapping of two loci affecting regulation of branched-chain amino acid transport in Escherichia coli k 12.
10	characterization of an escherichia coli k 12 f con mutant	The results of this study are summarized below.
10	effect of colicin k on a membrane associated energy linked function	Colicine k affects a function related to the apos; membrane energy.
10	methyl methane sulfonate sensitive mutant of escherichia coli deficient in an endonuclease specific for apurinic sites in deoxyribonucleic acid	Methylmethane sulfonate sensitive mutant; endonuclease-specific endonuclease-deficient escherichia coli in apos; deoxyribonucleic acid.
10	chea cheb and chec genes of escherichia coli and their role in chemotaxis	Cheque chea and the bios; escherichia coli genes and their role in chemotaxis.
10	role of deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases and deoxyribonucleic acid ligase in x ray induced repair synthesis in toluene treated escherichia coli k 12	The role of l' deoxyribonucleic acid and l&apos ligase; deoxyribonucleic acid in X-rays has induced a restorative synthesis in toluene-treated escherichia coli k12.
10	thymidine uptake and utilization in escherichia coli a new gene controlling nucleoside transport	Absorption and apo; utilization of thymidine in a novel nucleoside transport gene, escherichia coli, were determined.
10	periplasmic protein related to the sn glycerol 3 phosphate transport system of escherichia coli	A substance that has been found to be carcinogenic to humans and to be carcinogenic to humans.
10	in vivo methylation by escherichia coli k 12 mec deoxyribonucleic acid cytosine methylase protects against in vitro cleavage by the rii restriction endonuclease r eco rii	The in vivo methylation by 12 deoxyribonucleic acid cytosine methylase in vitro protects against cleavage by the restriction endonuclease rii r eco rii.
10	altered deoxyribonucleotide pools in p2 eductants of escherichia coli k 12 due to deletion of the dcd gene	Modification of the deoxyribonucleotide pools in p2 educators; escherichia coli k 12 in p2 educators due to dcd gene deletion.
10	effects of antibodies to various molecular forms of a mutationally altered escherichia coli alkaline phosphatase on its activation by zinc	Antibody effects against various molecular forms of apos; a mutant-alpha phosphatase d'apos; escherichia coli on its zinc activation.
10	mu induced polarity in the escherichia coli k 12 ent gene cluster evidence for a gene entg involved in the biosynthesis of enterochelin	The mu-induced polarity of the k12 gene cluster in Escherichia coli indicates the existence of apos; an entg gene involved in apos biosynthesis; and enterocelin.
10	role of the receptor for bacteriophage lambda in the functioning of the maltose chemoreceptor of escherichia coli	Role of Lambda Bacteriophage receptor in functioning maltosis chemoreceptor; Escherichia coli.
10	isolation of an escherichia coli mutant deficient in glutathione synthesis	Isolate a glutathione-deficient mutant of escherichia coli.
10	operator promoter functions in the threonine operon of escherichia coli	The promoter of the operator works in threonine d' Escherichia coli operon.
10	syntheses of elongation factors tu and g are under stringent control in escherichia coli	Dapos factor synthesis, elongation, and elongation are strictly controlled in escherichia coli.
10	genetic analysis of succinate utilization in enzyme i mutants of the phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase system in escherichia coli	L' DNA analysis; succinate utilization in escherichia coli mutants; phosphoenolpyruvate sugar phosphotransferase enzyme i.
10	genetic mapping of a mutation that causes ribonucleases iii deficiency in escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of escherichia coli, a mutant causing ribonuclease deficiency.
10	co2 production from galactose in galactose 1 phosphate uridyl transferase deficient escherichia coli	Production of co2 from galactose in escherichia coli-deficient galactose-1 phosphate uridyl transferase.
10	recipient ability of bacteriophage resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12	Ability to receive bacteriophage-resistant Escherichia coli (EC) mutants.
10	bacteriophage mu 1 induced permeability mutants in escherichia coli k 12	Permeability mutants were induced in 12 mutants of Escherichia coli k by bacteriophage mu 1.
10	transductional mapping of gene trma responsible for the production of 5 methyluridine in transfer ribonucleic acid of escherichia coli	Transduction mapping of trma gene responsible for production of 5 methyluridine in apos; d&apos transfer ribonucleic acid; escherichia coli.
10	mutants of escherichia coli defective in membrane phospholipid synthesis phenotypic suppression of sn glycerol 3 phosphate acyltransferase km mutants by loss of feedback inhibition of the biosynthetic sn glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Mutants of d' escherichia coli defective in the synthesis of membrane phospholipids phenotypically suppress the snyltransferase 3 phosphate acyltransferase km glycerol mutants by losing the feedback inhibition of biosynthetic snylcerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
10	the in vitro translation of a terminating signal by a single escherichia coli ribosome the fate of the subunits	In vitro translation of apos; a single ribosome termination signal from apos; escherichia coli as to the fate of sub @-@units.
10	biochemical genetics of chinese hamster cell mutants with deviant purine metabolism biochemical analysis of eight mutants	Biochemical Genetics of Chinese Hamster Cell Mutants with Biochemical Analysis of Purine-Deviant Metabolism of Eight Mutants.
10	r factor mediated resistance to ultraviolet light in strains of escherichia coli deficient in known repair functions	The r factor mediated ultraviolet light resistance in known repair-deficient escherichia coli strains.
10	variants of escherichia coli giving the appearance of mixed growths in urine	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of growth.
10	adp ribosylation of dna dependent rna polymerase of escherichia coli by an nad protein adp ribosyltransferase from bacteriophage t4	The adp ribosylation of apos RNA-dependent rna polymerase by an adp ribosyltransferase protein of nad protein from bacteriophage t4.
10	studies of intracellular thymidine nucleotides thymineless death and the recovery after re addition of thymine in escherichia coli k 12	Intracellular thymidine nucleotide studies of thymine-free death and recovery from thymine re-addition in escherichia coli k.
10	regulation of escherichia coli k10 aminoendopeptidase synthesis effects of mutations involved in the regulation of alkaline phosphatase	Effects of regulation of apos synthesis; amino endopeptidase k10 d' escherichia coli on alkaline phosphatase regulatory mutations.
10	biosynthesis of a specific lipoprotein of the escherichia coli outer membrane on polyribosomes	Apos biosynthesis; external membrane specific lipoprotein; escherichia coli on polyribosomes.
10	the escherichia coli uv endonuclease correndonuclease ii	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support this assessment.
10	involvement of escherichia coli dna polymerase i associated 5 in equilibrium 3 exonuclease in excision repair of uv damaged dna	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	exonuclease vii of escherichia coli	Escherichia coli.
10	repair replication in permeabilized escherichia coli	Replication repair in the permeabilized Escherichia coli.
10	ultraviolet light induced incorporation of bromodeoxyuridine into parental dna of an excision defective mutant of escherichia coli	Ultraviolet light induces apos; bromodeoxyuridine incorporation into the parental DNA of apos; an excision-defective mutant; escherichia coli.
10	distribution of pyrimidine dimers during postreplication repair in uv irradiated excision deficient cells of escherichia coli k12	Distribution of pyrimidine dimers during post-replication repair in irradiated excision deficient escherichia coli k12 cells.
10	postreplication repair gap filling in an escherichia coli strain deficient in dnab gene product	After replication, the repair space fills a dnab-deficient Escherichia coli strain.
10	the role of dna polymerase i in genetic recombination and viability of escherichia coli	The role of DNA polymerase in the genetic recombination and in the viability of Escherichia coli.
10	the role of the rec genes in the viability of escherichia coli k12	It is not possible to predict the effects of these genes on these populations.
10	dna repair in dna polymerase deficient mutants of escherichia coli	DNA repair of DNA from DNA polymerase-deficient Escherichia coli mutants.
10	maltose transport in escherichia coli k12 a comparison of transport kinetics in wild type and lambda resistant mutants as measured by fluorescence quenching	Transport of maltosis in escherichia coli k12, a comparison of the kinetics of transport in mutants resistant to wild type and lambda, as measured by l' fluorescence extinction.
10	isolation and genetic characterization of the nita mutants of escherichia coli affecting the termination factor rho	It is not possible to determine the genetic identity of the mutants, but the genetic identity of the mutants is unknown.
10	isolation of rec mutants from an f prime merodiploid strain of escherichia coli k 12	Isolate the recovered mutants; a mero-diploid strain of Escherichia coli bacterium k 12 k.
10	rna polymerase mutants of escherichia coli iii a temperature sensitive rifampicin resistant mutant	Apos mutants rna polymerase; Escherichia coli iii, a rifampicin-resistant heat-sensitive mutant.
10	expression of a valine resistant acetolactate synthase activity mediated by the ilv o and ilv g genes of escherichia coli k 12	Expression of estrogen- and estrogen-mediated gene-mediated valine-resistant acetolactate synthase; escherichia coli k.
10	radiation sensitivity of a mutant of escherichia coli k 12 associated with dna replication evidence for a new repair function	The radiosensitivity of a dapos mutant; escherichia coli k12 associated with DNA replication demonstrates the existence of a novel repair function.
10	r factor mediated tetracycline resistance in escherichia coli k12 dominance of some tetracycline sensitive mutants and relief of dominance by deletion	The r factor mediated tetracycline resistance in k12 escherichia coli, the dominance of some tetracycline-sensitive mutants, and the relief of dominance from deletion.
10	intracellular distribution of 8 14c puromycin aminonucleoside in ultraviolet irradiated escherichia coli	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic.
10	fate of thymine containing dimers in the deoxyribonucleic acid of ultraviolet irradiated mutator t1 escherichia coli transductants	Deoxyribonucleic acid from ultraviolet-irradiated transductants t1 d' escherichia coli.
10	intragenic complementation by gene 42 amber mutations of bacteriophage t4	Intragenic complementation by amber mutation of the 42 gene of bacteriophage t4.
10	phospholipase activity in bacteriophage infected escherichia coli iii phopholipase a involvement in lysis of t4 infected cells	L' phospholipase activity of bacteriophage-infected Escherichia coli iii phophospholipase is implicated in the lysis of t4-infected cells.
10	an amber suppressor of escherichia coli strain ko1	It can be used as a suppressor to suppress bacteria, viruses, and viruses.
10	synthesis of ribosomal proteins l7l12 in relaxed and stringent strains of escherichia coli	It is not possible to distinguish between the two strains, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
10	in vitro synthesis and repression of argininosuccinase in escherichia coli k12 partial purification of the arginine repressor	In Vitro Synthesis and Repression of Apos; Argininosuccinase in Apos; Escherichia coli k12 Partial Purification of Apos Repressor; Arginine.
10	a yeast mutant defective in the processing of 27s r rna precursor	A defective yeast mutant in the treatment of 27s rna precursor rna.
10	cooperative control of translational fidelity by ribosomal proteins in escherichia coli iii a ram mutation in the structural gene for protein s5 rpx e	Co-operative monitoring of ribosomal protein translation fidelity in escherichia coli iii, a ram mutation in the structural gene of the s5 rpx e protein.
10	conjugation in escherichia coli a study of recombination and the fate of donor dna at the level of the zygote	Escherichia coli conjugation is a study of recombination and zygote donor DNA.
10	the regulatory nature of the phob gene for alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	The regulatory nature of the alkaline phosphatase synthesis phob gene in escherichia coli.
10	a new gene for ribosomal restriction in escherichia coli	A novel restriction gene in escherichia coli.
10	tetracycline sensitive mutants of the f like r factors r100 and r100 1	Tetracycline-sensitive mutants of r100-like and r1001-like factors.
10	regulation of enzyme formation in klebsiella aerogenes by episomal glutamine synthetase of escherichia coli	Regulation of the formation of apos; enzyme by episomal d' escherichia coli glutamine synthetase in klebsiella aerogenes.
10	characterization of group b colicin resistant mutants of escherichia coli k 12 colicin resistance and the role of enterochelin	Characterization of Colicin-resistant Group B mutants; Escherichia coli k12 and the role of L' Enterochelin.
10	isolation and genetic characterizaion of escherichia coli k 12 mutations affecting bacteriophage t5 restriction by the colib plasmid	Isolation and genetic characterization of mutations in escherichia coli k12 affecting plasmid restriction of bacteriophage t5.
10	relationship between the transport of iron and the amount of specific colicin ia membrane receptors in escherichia coli	Relationship between the amount of colicin ia specific membrane receptors and iron transport in escherichia coli.
10	repression of escherichia coli carbamoylphosphate synthase relationships with enzyme synthesis in the arginine and pyrimidine pathways	Repression of the carbamoylphosphate synthase relationships between d&apos, escherichia coli, and the enzymatic synthesis in the arginine, arginine, and pyrimidine pathways.
10	isolation and characterization of t even ghost tolerant mutants of escherichia coli	Phantom-tolerant d' escherichia coli mutants isolation and characterization.
10	regulation of beta glucuronidase synthesis in escherichia coli k 12 pleiotropic constitutive mutations affecting uxu and uida expression	Regulation of the synthesis of beta glucuronidase in ecos; escherichia coli k 12 pleiotropic constitutive mutations affecting the apos; expression of uxu and uida.
10	r factor mediated polarized chromosomal transfer in escherichia coli c	R-factor favored polarized chromosome transfer in Escherichia coli c.
10	comparative study of r1 specific chromosomal transfer in escherichia coli k 12 and salmonella typhimurium lt2	Comparative chromosome transfer specific to r1 in escherichia coli k12 and Salmonella typhimurium lt2.
10	control of the synthesis of alkaline phosphatase and the phosphate binding protein in escherichia coli	Control of alkaline phosphatase synthesis and phosphate-binding protein synthesis in escherichia coli.
10	isolation by tetracycline selection of small plasmids derived from r factor r12 in escherichia coli k 12	Tetracycline selection isolation of r12-factor-derived small plasmids from escherichia coli k 12 was performed.
10	co regulation of the phosphate binding protein and alkaline phosphatase synthesis in escherichia coli	Co-regulation of escherichia coli protein binding and alkaline phosphatase synthesis.
10	phosphatidylserine synthetase mutants of escherichia coli genetic mapping and membrane phospholipid composition	Mutants of phosphatidylserine synthetase from genetic mapping of apos; escherichia coli and the composition of membrane phospholipids.
10	a timing control of cell division in escherichia coli	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
10	isolation and partial characterization of an escherichia coli mutant resistant to colicin a	Isolation and Partial Characterization of Colicin-Resistant Escherichia coli Mutant a.
10	fragments of beta galactosidase from escherichia coli fragmentation purification characterization and in vitro complementation	Effect of chloroquine on the metabolism of ethylene oxide and its metabolites.
10	mutagenic dna repair in escherichia coli conditions for error free filling of daughter strand gaps	Mutagenic repair of the cell; DNA under laboratory conditions; escherichia coli to fill the gaps in the free space of the strands without error.
10	mutants of escherichia coli which block head formation of lambda	Escherichia coli mutants that block lambda head formation.
10	biochemical and genetic characterization of a carbamyl phosphate synthetase mutant of escherichia coli k12	Biochemical and genetic characterization of a mutant of the carbamyl phosphate synthetase d' mutant escherichia coli k12.
10	in vitro synthesis of enzymes of the tryptophan operon of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
10	the nature of the gal3 mutation of escherichia coli	Nature of mutation gal3 d' escherichia coli.
10	mechanism of reversion of the gal3 mutation of escherichia coli	An organism that has been found to be a bacterium, but not a bacterium.
10	the nature of the product of the cys b gene of escherichia coli	The genetic makeup of the organism.
10	unaltered stability of newly synthesized rna in strains of escherichia coli missing a ribonuclease specific for double stranded rna	It is important to note that the two-stranded ribonuclease inhibitor is the only one that can be used to control the virus.
10	two ribose 5 phosphate isomerases from escherichia coli k12 partial characterisation of the enzymes and consideration of their possible physiological roles	Two 5-phosphate isomerase ribose d' escherichia coli k12 partially characterizing the enzymes and considering their possible physiological roles.
10	altered synthesis and stability of rna polymerase holoenzyme subunits in mutants of escherichia coli with mutations in the beta or beta subunit genes	Modified synthesis and stability of sub-holoenzyme units of rna polymerase in d&apos mutants; escherichia coli with mutations in sub-beta or beta units genes.
10	expression of the guanine operon of escherichia coli as analyzed by bacteriophage lambda induced mutations	It is the most common type of bacteriophage in humans, and is the most common type of bacteriophage in humans.
10	evidence that the gene uvrb is indispensable for a polymerase i deficient strain of escherichia coli k 12	Evidence that uvrb gene is essential for polymerase deficient escherichia coli k12 strain.
10	heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli k12 deficient in up to three major outer membrane proteins	Mutants deficient in heptosis of l' escherichia coli k12 are defective in up to three major proteins of the outer membrane.
10	mapping of the pola locus of escherichia coli k12 orientation in the amino and carboxy termini of the cistron	Mapping of the locus pola de l' orientation k12 of l' orientation escherichia coli in amino and carboxy ends of cistron.
10	cole plasmid replication in dna polymerase i deficient strains of escherichia coli	Replication of cole plasmids in DNA polymerase-deficient Escherichia coli strains.
10	characterization of a ts beta mutant rna polymerase of escherichia coli	In addition, it may be used in combination with other antimicrobial agents.
10	coumermycin a1 a preferential inhibitor of replicative dna synthesis in escherichia coli i in vivo characterization	Coumermycin a1, a preferential inhibitor of the replicative synthesis of escherichia coli i. reapos, has been characterized in vivo.
10	polarity in segments of the escherichia coli trp operon with deleted intraoperonic translational initiation signals	It is important to note that there is a need for more information on this topic, especially in the context of this study.
10	new types of streptomycin resistant mutants of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized below.
10	role of lysyl trna in the regulation of lysine biosynthesis in escherichia coli k12	Role of lysyl trna in regulating lysine biosynthesis in k12 escherichia coli.
10	escherichia coli k12 mutant with increased rna content and messenger rna stability	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
10	rapid test for assay of ozone sensitivity in escherichia coli	For more information, please contact your doctor or pharmacist.
10	lamb mutations in e coli k12 growth of lambda host range mutants and effect of nonsense suppressors	Mutations of e coli k12 in the normal mutants of the range of hosts and the effect of absurd suppressors.
10	evidence against autorepression of the betabeta operon in escherichia coli	In addition, it can be used as a means of preventing the spread of the disease.
10	the absence of caffeine inhibition of post replication repair in excision deficient strains of escherichia coli b and k12	Caffeine-induced inhibition of replication in excision-deficient strains of Escherichia coli b and k12, as well as inhibition of replication by caffeine.
10	mutagenic dna repair in escherichia coli ii factors affecting loss of photoreversibility of uv induced mutations	Escherichia coli mutagenic DNA repair factors ii factors affecting the loss of photoreversibility of apo-induced mutations; uv.
10	genetic analysis of mutants of escherichia coli defective in dicarboxylate transport	Genetic analysis of d&apos mutants; defective escherichia coli for dicarboxylate transport.
10	prophage induction and cell division in e coli iii mutations sfia and sfib restore division in tif and lon strains and permit the expression of mutator properties of tif	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that the mutant properties of Tif, Tif and Tif are not the same as those of the Tif and Tif strains.
10	dna repair in proteus mirabilis iii survival dimer excision and uv reactivation in comparison with escherichia coli k12	It is not possible to determine the cause of death by the presence of a bacterium or by the presence of a bacterium or a bacterium.
10	a mutant of escherichia coli deficient in pyruvate formate lyase	A pyruvate-formate lyase-deficient escherichia coli mutant.
10	mapping of gsha a gene for the biosynthesis of glutathione in eschericha coli k12	Gene mapping for glutathione biosynthesis in eschericha coli k12.
10	hyperproduction of the sigma subunit of rna polymerase in a mutant of escherichia coli	Rna polymerase hyperproduction-sigma unit in a d' escherichia coli mutant.
10	the effect of lexa and recf mutations on post replication repair and dna synthesis in escherichia coli k 12	The effect of mutations on DNA synthesis and post-replication repair in escherichia coli k12 was studied.
10	localized mutagenesis of the aroe stra section of the escherichia coli chromosome coding for ribosomal proteins	Localized mutagenesis of the apos d' escherichia coli ribosomal protein stratigraphic section.
10	increased spontaneous reversion of certain frameshift mutations in dna polymerase i deficient strains of escherichia coli	Increase in the spontaneous reversion of some of the frameshift mutations in DNA polymerase deficient d' escherichia coli strains i.
10	effects of sodium arsenite on the survival of uv irradiated escherichia coli inhibition of a reca dependent function	Sodium arsenite effects on survival; escherichia coli irradiated at apo; immunotherapy; a function dependent on reca.
10	the effect of streptomycin resistance caffeine and acriflavine on ultraviolet light induced reversion to tryptophan independence in strains of escherichia coli b r	L' effect of caffeine and l' streptomycin-resistant acriflavin on ultraviolet light induced reversion to ultraviolet light; independence from tryptophan in d&apos strains; escherichia coli b r.
10	increased isoleucine acceptance by sulfur deficient transfer rna from escherichia coli	It is not possible to predict the exact amount of sulfur-depleted transfer; it is not possible to predict the exact amount of sulfur-depleted transfer.
10	transport of pyrimidine nucleosides in cells of escherichia coli k 12	Transport of pyrimidine nucleoside residues in d' escherichia coli k 12 k.
10	polarity and the regulation of the ilv gene cluster in escherichia coli strain k 12	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
10	induction kinetics of mutagenic dna repair activity in e coli following ultraviolet irradiation	Kinetics of apos; apos induction; apos repair activity; e coli mutagenic DNA following ultraviolet (UV) irradiation.
10	efficient suppression of the requirement for n function of bacteriophage lambda by a rho defective e coli sua mutant	Efficient suppression of the n-function of the lambda bacteriophage by a defective lambda e coli sua rho mutant.
10	specificity of polarity suppression in e coli correction of defects in gene n but not in gene q of phage lambda	Specificity of e coli correction polarity suppression of defects in the n gene, but not in the q gene of lambda phage.
10	genetic mapping of chromosomal mutations affecting the replication of the f factor of escherichia coli	Genetic mapping of replication chromosomal mutations in escherichia coli f factor.
10	identification of genes for elongation factor ts and ribosomal protein s2 in e coli	Identification of e coli d&apos factor genes; s2 ribosomal protein and ts elongation.
10	mutations affecting the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dehydrogenase complex of escherichia coli	Mutations affecting the reduced complex of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dehydrogenase d' escherichia coli.
10	changes in membrane proteins of escherichia coli k12 mediated by bacteriophage ike specific plasmids	Changes in ike bacteriophage-specific plasmid-mediated escherichia coli k12 membrane proteins.
10	effects of bacteriophage t4 induced modification of escherichia coli rna polymerase on gene expression in vitro	The effects of bacteriophage t4 induced the modification of the apos; escherichia coli rna polymerase on the apos; gene expression in vitro.
10	alterations in envelope structure of heptose deficient mutants of escherichia coli as revealed by freeze etching	Structural alterations in the cell envelope of heptose-deficient Escherichia coli mutants were revealed by freeze-etching.
10	peptidoglycan biosynthesis in a thermosensitive division mutant of escherichia coli	The biosynthesis of peptidoglycans in a heat-sensitive mutant of l' escherichia coli.
10	freeze etch morphology of outer membrane mutants of escherichia coli k12	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
10	evaluation of a dna polymerase deficient mutant of e coli for the rapid detection of carcinogens	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for the presence of a DNA polymerase chain reaction mutant.
10	transport of vitamin b12 in escherichia coli common receptor system for vitamin b12 and bacteriophage bf23 on the outer membrane of the cell envelope	The transport of vitamin b12 into the common receptor system; Escherichia coli for vitamin b12 and vitamin bf23 bacteriophage on the outer membrane of the apos; cell envelope.
10	role of d tryptophan oxidase in d tryptophan utilization by escherichia coli	The Role of Tryptophan Oxidase in Disease; Use of Tryptophan by Escherichia coli.
10	in vivo transcription of r plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in escherichia coli strains with altered antibiotic resistance levels and or conjugal proficiency	In vivo transcript of the plasmid r, deoxyribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) in d&apos strains; escherichia coli with modified antibiotic resistance or altered conjugal competence.
10	effect of mutations in deoxyribonucleic acid repair pathways on the sensitivity of escherichia coli k 12 strains to nitrofurantoin	Effect of mutations in the repair pathways of lacid; deoxyribonucleic acid on susceptibility of dacid strains; escherichia coli k12 to nitrofurantoin.
10	expression of the arga gene carried by a defective lambda bacteriophage of escherichia coli	Arga gene expression carried by a defective lambda bacteriophage d'apos; escherichia coli.
10	lowered levels of colicin ia membrane receptors in an escherichia coli mutant defective in heme biosynthesis	Reduced colicine receptor membranes in an apos biosynthetic escherichia coli mutant; heme.
10	galactoside accumulation by escherichia coli driven by a ph gradient	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of bacteria.
10	glutamate transport in membrane vesicles of the wild type strain and glutamate utilizing mutants of escherichia coli	Glutamate transport in wild-type membrane vesicles and glutamate using d' escherichia coli mutants.
10	isolation and characterization of escherichia coli k 12 f mutants defective in conjugation with an i type donor	Isolation and characterization of defective Escherichia coli in conjugation with type I donor.
10	phospholipid composition and phenotypic correction of an envc division mutant of escherichia coli	Phospholipid Composition and Phenotypic Correction of Escherichia coli; an Escherichia coli mutant in division.
10	initiation of protein synthesis without formylation in a mutant of escherichia coli that grows in the absence of tetrahydrofolate	Unformylated protein synthesis initiated in an Escherichia coli d&apos mutant growing in the absence of tetrahydrofolate.
10	number of mutations required to evolve a new lactase function in escherichia coli	Number of mutations required to develop a novel Escherichia coli lactase function.
10	pleiotropic phenotype of an escherichia coli mutant lacking leucyl phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid protein transferase	Pleiotropic phenotype of apos; a leucyl phenylalanyl-depleted ribonucleic acid transfer protein transferase mutant escherichia coli.
10	threonyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase and the regulation of the threonine operon in escherichia coli	Threonyl transferring threonyl; ribonucleic acid synthetase and threonine operon regulation in escherichia coli.
11	common errors in the management of acute myocardial infarction a critical analysis of 58 fatal cases	Common errors in the treatment of acute myocardial infarction, a 58-case critical analysis.
11	induced malignancy in cells from rat myocardium subjected to intermittent anaerobiosis during long propagation in vitro	Malignancy induced in rat myocardial cells under intermittent anaerobic conditions during prolonged in vitro propagation.
11	rheumatic lesions in left atrial appendages pathologic studies of material removed during mitral commissurotomy	Left atrial appendage rheumatic lesion Pathological studies of material collected during apo; mitral commissurotomy.
11	selective inhibition by preparations of streptococcal filtrates of the oxidative metabolism of mitochondria procured from rabbit myocardium	Streptococcal filtrate preparations selectively inhibit oxidative metabolism of rabbit myocardial mitochondria.
11	an integrated morphological and biochemical study of a purified preparation of the succinate and dpnh oxidase system	An integrated morphological and biochemical study of apos; purified succinate and dpnh oxidase preparation.
11	high energy phosphates during long term hibernation	Long-term hibernation.
11	the rate of oxygen uptake of quiescent cardiac muscle	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
11	choline acetylase activity in the atria and its possible relation to the maintenance of the membrane potential	L' atrial choline acetylase activity and its possible relationship to membrane potential maintenance.
11	enzymatic activity in the m band	M-band enzyme activity.
11	cat heart muscle in vitro i cell volumes and intracellular concentrations in papillary muscle	Cat cardiac muscle, in vitro cell volume i, and papillary muscle intracellular concentrations.
11	reversible inhibition of beef heart cytochrome c oxidase by polyionic macromolecules	Polyionic macromolecules reversible inhibition of bovine heart cytochrome c oxidase.
11	effect of reserpine on ventricular escape	Reserpine effects on the apos; ventricular escapement.
11	increase of labeled calcium uptake in heart muscle during potassium lack contracture	L' increased uptake of labelled calcium into the cardiac muscle during n' has no contracture.
11	a simple method of weighing the heart	Simple way to weigh the heart.
11	calcium flux in the mammalian ventricular myocardium	Mammalian Ventricular Myocardium Ca2+ flux.
11	the human pacemaker and its pathology	Human pacemaker and pathology.
11	muscle action potentials a technique for recording in situ	The potential for muscular action is an in-situ muscle recording technique.
11	fine structural localization of adenosinetriphosphatase activity in heart muscle myofibrils	Fine structural localization of apos; adenosine activity; adenosine triphosphatase in cardiac muscle myofibrils.
11	immunologic studies of heart tissue iii occurrence of bound gamma globulin in auricular appendages from rheumatic hearts relationship to certain histopathologic features of rheumatic heart disease	Immunological studies of cardiac tissue iii bound gamma globulin occurrence in the atrial appendages of rheumatic hearts in relation to certain histopathological features of rheumatic heart disease.
11	on the structural continuities of the transverse tubular system of rabbit and human myocardial cells	On the structural continuities of human and rabbit myocardial cell transverse tubular system.
11	sex hormone studies the effects on the cellular membrane potentials and contractility of isolated rat atrium	L' sexual hormone studies the effects of isolated rat atria on cell membrane potentials and contractility.
11	a quantitative description of the relationship between the area of rabbit ventricular action potentials and the pattern of stimulation	Quantitative description of the relationship between rabbit ventricular action and stimulation potential region.
11	participation of an intermediate of oxidative phosphorylation in ion accumulation by mitochondria	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: pH, pH, pH, pH, and pH.
11	the cardiomyopathy of muscular dystrophy report of two cases with a review of the literature	In addition, there is a lack of information on the incidence of the disease.
11	effect of reserpine on the acetylcholine content of the heart the ileum and the hypothalamus of the dog	Effect of reserpine on acetylcholine content of dog heart; ileum and kidney; hypothalamus.
11	is the fundamental electrical response of the single heart muscle cell a spike potential	It is the basic electrical response of the single cell of the heart muscle to a peak potential.
11	reserpine its effect on silver stained structures of the heart	Reserpine effects on colored structures at l'apos; heart silver.
11	oxidation of carbon 14 labeled endogenous lipids by isolated perfused rat heart	Endogenous lipids are labelled by oxidation of carbon-14 by the isolated perfused rat heart.
11	plague toxin its effect in vitro and in vivo	Effect of Plague Toxin in Vitro and In Vivo.
11	hypothermia asphyxia and cardiac glycogen in guinea pigs	Cardiac asphyxia, hypothermia, asphyxia, and asphyxia in guinea pigs.
11	immunologic relation of streptococcal and tissue antigens ii cross reaction of antisera to mammalian heart tissue with a cell wall constituent of certain strains of group a streptococci	Immunological Relationships Between Streptococcal and Tissue Antigenii Cross-reaction of antisera to mammalian cardiac tissue with a cell wall component of certain group a streptococcal strains.
11	immunologic relation of streptococcal and tissue antigens iii presence in human sera of streptococcal antibody cross reactive with heart tissue association with streptococcal infection rheumatic fever and glomerulonephritis	Immunologic relationship between tissue and streptococcal antigens iii present in human serum d' streptococcal antibody cross reacting with l' association of cardiac tissue with streptococcal rheumatic fever and glomerulonephritis.
11	some observations on the fine structure and metabolic activity of normal and glycerinated ventricular muscle of toad	Some observations on toad fine structure and l' normal and glycerinated ventricular muscle metabolic activity.
11	the staining of lactic dehydrogenase isoenzymes after electrophoretic separation on cellulose acetate	Lactic dehydrogenase isozyme staining after cellulose acetate electrophoretic separation.
11	action of plague murine toxin on mitochondria from resistant and susceptible animals	Action of Plague Murine Toxin on D'apos Mitochondria; Resistant and Sensitive Animals.
11	the effects of synthetic eledoisin on the systemic and coronary haemodynamics and metabolism of the intact dog	Effects of synthetic elecedoisin on intact canine hemodynamics and systemic and coronary metabolism.
11	cardiac myoglobin in myoglobinuria	Cardiac myoglobin's in myoglobinuria.
11	rabbit muscle lactate dehydrogenase 5 a regulatory enzyme	Rabbit muscle lactate dehydrogenase 5 (LDH5) is a regulatory enzyme.
11	a comparison of the effects of the plasma kinins bradykinin and kallidin on myocardial blood flow and metabolism	Comparison of bradykinin and kallidine plasma kinin effects on myocardial blood flow and metabolism.
11	the mechanism of adhesion of cells to glass a study by interference reflection microscopy	The Mechanism of Absorption; Adherence of Cells to Glass Study; Reflective Microscopy Interference.
11	an attempt to infer the electrophysiological functions of some intracellular structures in cardiac cells by an electronic analogue	An attempt to infer electrophysiological functions of certain intracellular structures in cardiac cells from an electronic analog.
11	nucleoside phosphatase activities in rat cardiac muscle	L' nucleoside phosphatase activity in the rat heart muscle.
11	the localization of cholinesterase activity in rat cardiac muscle by electron microscopy	Localization of l' cholinesterase activity by electron microscopy in rat heart muscle.
11	the effect of beta sitosterol on the metabolism of cholesterol and lipids in rats on a diet containing coconut oil	L' effect of beta sitosterol on cholesterol and lipid metabolism in rats fed coconut oil.
11	labelling of dna and cell division in so called non dividing tissues	DNA and cell division labelling in so-called non-divisive tissues.
11	the effect of sonic oscillation on the structure and function of beef heart mitochondria	L' effect of apos; sonic oscillation on beef heart mitochondrial structure and function.
11	a macromolecular repeating unit of mitochondrial structure and function correlated electron microscopic and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria and submitochondrial particles of beef heart muscle	A macromolecular repeat unit of mitochondrial structure and function has correlated biochemical and microscopic electron studies of isolated mitochondria and mitochondrial bovine heart muscle particles.
11	an example of information retention in rabbit ventricular muscle fibres	An example of D&apos retention; information in the ventricular muscle fibers of rabbit.
11	mitochondrial dna in yeast and some mammalian species	Mitochondrial DNA in yeast and certain species of mammals.
11	an immunological relationship between the group a streptococcus and mammalian muscle	An immunologic relationship between strep group and mammalian muscle.
11	steroid stimulation of beating of cultured rat heart cells	Rare heart cell beats are steroidal stimulation.
11	synchronous assisted circulation	Synchronous circulation... aided.
11	current status of counterpulsation in cardiac assistance a summary of experimental experience in the dog	Current status of the beat-beat in the heart, a summary of the apos; experimental experience in dogs.
11	metmyoglobin oxidation during electron transport reactions in mitochondria	Oxydation of metamyoglobin during d&apos-transport reactions; electrons in mitochondria.
11	propagation of action potentials and the structure of the nexus in cardiac muscle	Propagation of cardiac muscle nexus potentials; action and structure.
11	studies on the in vitro interaction of electrical stimulation and ca movement in sarcoplasmic reticulum	In vitro interaction of electrical stimulation and the movement of ca in the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	isozymes of aldolase	Aldolase enzymes.
11	purification and general properties of aspartate aminotransferase of ox heart	Beef heart aspartate aminotransferase purification and general properties.
11	amino acid composition and terminal residues of aspartate aminotransferase from ox heart	Composition in amino acids and terminal residues of the aspartate aminotransferase of the heart of beef.
11	two dimensional chromatography on silica gel loaded paper for the microanalysis of polar lipids	Two-dimensional silicic gel-filled paper chromatography polar lipid microanalysis.
11	effect of diabetes on the concentration of amino acids in plasma and heart muscle of rats	Effect of diabetes on plasma and cardiac muscle amino acid levels in rats.
11	fatty acid components of rat tissue lipids	Rat tissue lipid fatty acid components.
11	fine structure of lipid depleted mitochondria	Lipid-depleted mitochondria have fine structure.
11	preparation from human serum of an alpha one protein which induces the immediate growth of unadapted cells in vitro	Prepared from human serum d&apos, an alpha 1 protein that induces immediate growth of maladaptive cells in vitro.
11	isolation and analysis of free fatty aldehydes from rat dog and bovine heart muscle	Rat and bovine heart muscle free fatty aldehydes are isolated and analysed.
11	mammalian ribosomal protein analysis by electrophoresis on polyacrylamide gel	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
11	organ specificity and lactate dehydrogenase activity differential inhibition by urea and related compounds	Organ specificity and l' lactate dehydrogenase activity differed from that of urea and related compounds.
11	camel myoglobin	Camel myoglobin.
11	calcium induced activation of phosphorylase in rat hearts	Calcium induced rat heart phosphorylase activation.
11	regulation of renal citrate metabolism by bicarbonate ion and ph observations in tissue slices and mitochondria	Regulation of the metabolism of renal citrate by the observation of the bicarbonate ion and ph in tissue slices and mitochondria.
11	the control of rat heart phosphofructokinase by citrate and other regulators	Control of rat cardiac phosphofructokinase by other regulators.
11	mitochondria in cardiac muscle cells of the canary and some other birds	In addition, it is not possible to determine the exact cause of the injury.
11	rabbit lactate dehydrogenase isozymes effect of ph on activity	Effect of Ph on Rabbit Lactate Dehydrogenase isoenzyme activity.
11	genetic control of lactate dehydrogenase formation in the hagfish eptatretus stoutii	Genetic control of hagfish eptatretus stoutii lactate dehydrogenase formation.
11	lipid composition of mitochondria from bovine heart liver and kidney	Lipid composition of bovine heart kidney and liver mitochondria.
11	glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase variants in phyletically diverse organisms	Glyceraldehyde 3 Phosphate Dehydrogenase, phyletically diverse organisms.
11	passive transport of 5 5 dimethyl 2 4 oxazolidinedione into beef heart mitochondria	Passive transport of 5 dimethyl-2 in bovine heart mitochondria.
11	alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase and glucose 6 phosphate dehydrogenase in tissues of the weddell seal	Glycerophosphate dehydrogenase alpha and glucose-6 phosphate dehydrogenase in Weddell seal tissues.
11	competent chick ectoderm nonspecific response to rna	Non-specific response; ectodermis; rna-qualified chick.
11	cross reactive antigen shared by streptococcus agalactiae and certain bovine tissues	Cross-reactive antigen common to Streptococcus agalactiae and certain cattle tissues.
11	an electron microscope study of canine cardiac myosin and some of its aggregates	An electron microscopic study of canine cardiac myosin and aggregates.
11	transverse tubule apertures in mammalian myocardial cells surface array	In addition to the above, there are a number of different types of cells.
11	rheumatic like cardiac lesions in mice	Rheumatism similar to mouse heart damage.
11	the mechanics of left ventricular contraction in acute experimental cardiac failure	Mechanics of Left Ventricular Contracture in the Apos; acute experimental heart failure.
11	control of myocardial contraction the sensitivity of cardiac actomyosin to calcium ion	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
11	detection and isolation of minor lipid constituents	Minor lipid components are detected and isolated.
11	effect of streptococcus pyogenes on tissue cells	Tissue cell effects of Streptococcus pyogenes.
11	the ubiquinone content of animal tissues a survey of the occurrence of ubiquinone in vertebrates	Ubiquinone content in animal tissues is a study of the occurrence of l' ubiquinone in vertebrates.
11	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin ii protein synthesis in primary heart cell cultures	Modes studies; action of diphtheria toxin ii protein synthesis in primary cardiac cell culture.
11	the uncoupling of respiratory chain phosphorylation by 4 5 6 7 tetrachloro 2 trifluoromethylbenzimidazole	Respiratory chain phosphorylation decoupling by 4,56,7 tetrachloro 2 trifluoromethylbenzimidazole.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes of chick embryo response to variations of ambient oxygen tension	Lactate dehydrogenase Isozymes of the response of the apos; chick embryo to changes in the tension of the apos; ambient oxygen.
11	evolution of malate dehydrogenase in birds	Evolution of avian malate dehydrogenase.
11	peafowl lactate dehydrogenase problem of isoenzyme identification	The problem is the identification of the isoenzymes by the peafowl lactate dehydrogenase.
11	macroscopic identification of early myocardial infarction by dehydrogenase alterations	Macroscopic identification of the early stages of the apos; myocardial infarction through dehydrogenase damage.
11	structural modulations of plasmalemmal vesicles	Structural modifications to the human plasma membrane vesicles.
11	control of myocardial oxygen consumption relative influence of contractile state and tension development	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
11	chromatography of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c on carboxymethylcellulose	Cytochrome c chromatography oxidized and reduced by carboxymethylcellulose.
11	the localization of circulating immune complexes in experimental serum sickness the role of vasoactive amines and hydrodynamic forces	The Localization of Circulating Immune Complexes in Serum Disease investigated the role of vasoactive amines and hydrodynamic forces.
11	mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase reversible denaturation studies	Mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase-reversible denaturation studies.
11	cardiac autoantibodies i immunodiffusion analysis of multiple responses evoked homologously and heterologously	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but there is evidence to support this claim.
11	a species comparison of the effects of changing perfusion pressure on blood flow and metabolic heat production in the myocardium	Specific comparative effects of a change in perfusion pressure on myocardial blood flow and metabolic heat production.
11	utilization of endogenous lipid by the isolated perfused rat heart	Use of endogenous lipids by perfused isolated rat heart.
11	the reversal of phenylarsenoxide inhibition of keto acid oxidation in mitochondrial and bacterial suspensions by lipoic acid and other disulphides	L'apos; inversion of apos; inhibition of apos; oxidation of apos; ketonic acid by phenylarsenolate in suspensions of mitochondria and bacteria by apos; lipoic acid and d' other disulfides.
11	effect of removal of cholesterol diet upon serum sickness cholesterol induced atherosclerosis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of cholesterol.
11	characterization and metabolism of ovine foetal lipids	Ovine fetal lipid metabolism and characterization.
11	the functional status of lipoprotein lipase in rat liver	L' lipoprotein lipase functional status in rat liver.
11	energetics of cardiac contractions	Cardiac contractions.
11	autoantibodies reacting with heart muscle tissue in coronary heart disease	Auto-antibodies react with the tissue of the heart muscle in coronary heart disease.
11	pathological findings in three cases of fungal endocarditis complicating open heart surgery	In addition to the above, there are a number of other patients who have been diagnosed with the disease.
11	determination of extracellular space in amphibian muscle	Determination of the cell surface; extracellular space in the muscle d' an amphibian.
11	lipofuscinosis of the gastrointestinal tract in man	Gastro Lipofuscinosis-intestinal in men.
11	disproportionately higher levels of myocardial docosahexaenoate and elevated levels of plasma and liver arachidonate in hyperthyroid rats	Elevated myocardial docosahexaenoate levels and elevated plasma and hepatic arachidonate levels in hyperthyroid rats.
11	a reappraisal of some structural features of bovine heart malate dehydrogenase	Re-evaluation of Selected Structural Characteristics of Bovine Heart Malate Dehydrogenase.
11	the effect of werum on the uptake of thyroid hormones by the perfused rat heart	Lapos; werum effect on thyroid hormone uptake by perfused rat heart.
11	the effect of fatty acid on the uptake of thyroxine by the perfused rat heart	Lapos; effect of fatty acids on apos; thyroxine absorption by perfused rat heart.
11	metabolism of triglyceride fatty acid by the perfused rat heart	Triglyceride fatty acid metabolism by perfused rat heart.
11	isolation and identification of cholesteryl alkyl ethers from bovine cardiac muscle	Cholesterylalkyl ethers are isolated and identified in bovine cardiac muscle.
11	calcium current and activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibers	Calcium current and ventricular myocardial fiber contraction activation.
11	mitral stenosis together with a giant cell myocarditis limited to the left atrium	Mitral stenosis and apos-limited giant cell myocarditis; left atrium.
11	phenoxyethanol protein preservative for taxonomists	Phenoxyethanol is a protein-preserving agent for taxonomists.
11	the ultrastructure of frog ventricular cardiac muscle and its relationship to mechanism of excitation contraction coupling	Frog ventricular heart muscle ultrastructure and its relation to the coupling mechanism of d&apos contraction; excitation.
11	the influence of ouabain and alpha angelica lactone on calcium metabolism of dog cardiac microsomes	L' influence of etapos; ouabaine and l' alpha angelic lactone on the calcium metabolism of canine cardiac microsomes.
11	molecular species of lecithins of rat heart kidney and plasma	Kidney lecithin and rat heart plasma molecular species.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes in human cardiac transplantation	Lactate dehydrogenase Isozymes in Human Heart Transplantation.
11	the growth of the muscular and collagenous parts of the rat heart in various forms of cardiomegaly	Muscle and collagen growth of rat heart in various forms of cardiomegaly.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes in parthenogenetic teiid lizards cnemidophorus	Lactate dehydrogenase Isozymes in parthenogenetic Teiid Lizards cnemidophorus.
11	effects of guanidine derivatives on mitochondrial function i phenethylbiguanide inhibition of respiration in mitochondria from guinea pig and rat tissues	Effects of guanidine derivatives on respiratory inhibition of guinea pig and rat tissue mitochondria.
11	the oxidation of exogenous and endogenous cytochromec in mitochondria a biochemical and ultrastructural study	The results of this study are consistent with the results of an ultrastructural and biochemical study.
11	experience with three brescia cimino shunts	Experience with 3 shunts brescia cimino.
11	the effect of quinidine on calcium accumulation by isolated sarcoplasmic reticulum of skeletal and cardiac muscle	The effect of quinidine on the apos; calcium accumulation by the sarcoplasmic reticulum isolated from the skeletal and cardiac muscles.
11	diagnosis of pericardial effusion by ultrasound	Diagnosis of apos; ultrasound pericardial effusion.
11	free fatty acid metabolism of the human heart at rest	Metabolism of free fatty acids from resting human heart.
11	internal redistribution of tissue protein synthesis in uremia	Internal partitioning of synthesis of tissue proteins in uremia.
11	effect of reserpine on the subcellular distribution of 3h alpha methylnoradrenaline in the mouse heart	Reserpine effect on subcellular distribution of alpha methylnoradrenaline 3 h in mouse heart.
11	factors controlling the washout of the interstitial space of the isolated perfused rat heart	Factors controlling stroke rinse; isolated perfused rat interstitial space.
11	relationship between the uptake binding and pharmacological action of procaine in the isolated heart	Capture binding to l' procaine pharmacological action in isolated heart.
11	the roles of synthesis and degradation in determining tissue concentrations of lactate dehydrogenase 5	The role of synthesis and degradation in the determination of tissue levels of lactate dehydrogenase 5.
11	toxic effects of glucagon induced acute lipid mobilization in geese	Acute lipid mobilization was induced in geese by the toxic effects of glucagon.
11	biological properties of cell wall mucopeptide of hemolytic streptococci	Biological Properties of Hemolytic Streptococcus Cell Wall Mucopeptide.
11	the use of beef liver catalase as a protein tracer for electron microscopy	L' use of beef liver catalase as electron-microscopic protein tracer.
11	energized configurations of heart mitochondria in situ	Energetic cardiac mitochondrial configuration in situ.
11	metabolism of cholesterol in the tissues and blood of the chick embryo	Cholesterol metabolism in chicken embryo tissue and blood.
11	the inhibition of pyruvate and ls isocitrate oxidation by succinate oxidation in rat liver mitochondria	L' inhibition of apos; oxidation of pyruvate and l' isocitrate of ls by apos; oxidation of succinate in the mitochondria of rat liver.
11	relation between plasma lignocaine levels and induced haemodynamic changes	Ratio of plasma concentrations of lignocaine to induced changes in hemodynamics.
11	gene dosage at the lactate dehydrogenase b locus in triploid and diploid teiid lizards	Genetic dose at the triploid and diploid teiid lizard lactate dehydrogenase b locus.
11	hemodynamic changes following correction of severe aortic stenosis using the cutter smeloff prosthesis	Hemodynamic changes after surgical correction; severe apo placental aortic stenosis; aid from cutter smelter.
11	a study of the t system in rat heart	A t-system study in the rat heart.
11	gradient thickness thin layer chromatography for the isolation and analysis of trace amounts of free fatty acids in large lipid samples	Chromatography in a thin layer with a gradient of d*apos; thickness for insulation and l*apos; analysis of traces of d*apos; free fatty acids in large lipid samples.
11	embryonic cell adhesiveness do species differences exist among warm blooded vertebrates	It's not the same, it's the same, it's the same, it's the same, it's the same.
11	calcium exchange and contraction strength of guinea pig atrium in normal and hypertonic media	L'apos, l'exchange calcique et la force de contraction de l'apos; atria de guinea pig in normal and hypertonic media.
11	the uptake of thyroxine and tri iodothyronine by perfused hearts	L' infused hearts absorb thyroxine and triiodothyronine.
11	effect of peruvosid cd412 on excitability and functional refractory period of atrial and ventricular tissues in cardiomyopathy caused by trypanosoma cruzi	Effect of cd412 peruvoside on atrial and ventricular excitability and functional refractory period in trypanosome cruzi cardiomyopathy.
11	a case of fatal peri partum cardiomyopathy	Fatal perinatal cardiomyopathy.
11	localization of cytochromes in intact and fragmented mitochondrial membranes	Cytochrome localization in intact, fragmented mitochondrial membranes.
11	tissue iodoprotein formation during the peripheral metabolism of the thyroid hormones	Formation of tissue iodoproteins during thyroid hormone peripheral metabolism.
11	the significance of the incorporation of 14c leucine into different protein fractions by isolated ox heart mitochondria	L' importance of l' incorporation of leucine 14c into different protein fractions by the mitochondria isolated from the heart of beef.
11	a contribution to the study of cardiac lipofuscin fluorescence	Contribution to research on cardiac lipofuscin fluorescence.
11	horseshoe crab lactate dehydrogenases evidence for dimeric structure	Lactate dehydrogenase of horse crab demonstrates the existence of a dimer structure.
11	effect of organic nitrates on myocardial oxygen consumption in vitro	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of body weight, weight and body weight.
11	glycerol kinase activities in muscles from vertebrates and invertebrates	Glycerol kinase activity in vertebrate and invertebrate muscle.
11	spontaneous rhythmic contraction of separated heart muscle cells	Spontaneous rhythmic contractions of separate cardiac muscle.
11	the mitochondrial oxidation of quinol monophosphates	L' monophosphate mitochondrial oxidation.
11	the effect of fasting on the utilization of chylomicron triglyceride fatty acids in relation to clearing factor lipase lipoprotein lipase releasable by heparin in the perfused rat heart	L' effect of fasting on apos; utilization of chylomicron triglyceride fatty acids relative to clear factor lipase released by apos; heparin in perfused rat heart.
11	the effect of physical training upon the mechanical and metabolic performance of the rat heart	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
11	biochemical properties of trypanosomatid lactate dehydrogenases	Biochemical properties of trypanosomatids lactate dehydrogenases.
11	membrane studies with polarity dependent and excimer forming fluorescent probes	Fluorescent polarity-dependent excimer-forming membrane studies.
11	studies on the mode of action of diphtheria toxin iii effect on subcellular components of protein synthesis from the tissues of intoxicated guinea pigs and rats	Dosage mode studies; action of diphtheria toxin iii effect on subcellular components of protein synthesis from intoxicated guinea pig and rat tissues.
11	the toxicity of streptolysin o for beating mammalian heart cells in tissue culture	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
11	augmentation of the virulence of murine coxsackie virus b 3 myocardiopathy by exercise	Increase in myocardial myocardial virulence due to the murine coxsackie virus b3 by 1 year; exercise.
11	the activities of some enzymes concerned with energy metabolism in mammalian muscles of differing pigmentation	L&apos is the activity of certain enzymes involved in the energy metabolism of mammalian muscle tissue of different pigmentation.
11	beta hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase lack in ruminant liver mitochondria	Hepatic mitochondria of ruminants lack beta-hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase.
11	ribonuclease inhibitor system abnormality in dystrophic mouse skeletal muscle	An anomaly of the inhibitory ribonuclease system in mouse dystrophic skeletal muscle.
11	effect of fasting on the clearing factor lipase lipoprotein lipase activity of fresh and defatted preparations of rat heart muscle	Effect of fasting on apos; activity of light factor lipoprotein lipase in fresh and degreased rat cardiac muscle preparations.
11	c3 leukotactic factors produced by a tissue protease	Tissue protease produced c3 leukotactic factors.
11	the rsr pattern in left surface leads in ventricular aneurysm	Left surface rsr profile leads to apos; ventricular aneurysm.
11	wilms tumour propagated through the inferior vena cava into the right heart cavities	A tumour spreads through the lower vena cava of the right heart cavity.
11	composition of alkoxylipids of human heart and aorta	Human heart and human aorta alkoxylipid composition.
11	novel preparation of cardiolipin from beef heart	New heart-beef cardiolipin preparation.
11	energy coupling mechanisms in mitochondria kinetic spectroscopic and thermodynamic properties of an energy transducing form of cytochrome b	Mechanisms of energy coupling in the thermodynamic and spectroscopic properties of d&apos mitochondria; a transducing form d' energy of cytochrome b.
11	pathology of experimental trypanosomiasis in the albino rat rabbit goat and sheep a preliminary report	Experimental trypanosomiasis pathology in albino rabbits and goats and sheep, a preliminary report.
11	rheumatoid heart disease with complete heart block	Rheumatoid heart disease with a complete cardiac block.
11	osmotically induced alterations in volume and ultrastructure of mitochondria isolated from rat liver and bovine heart	Ultrastructural osmotic alterations of isolated rat liver and bovine heart mitochondria and volume were induced.
11	creatine regulation in the embryo and growing chick	Creatine regulation in growing chick and embryo.
11	microfilaments in cellular and developmental processes	Microfilaments in developmental and cellular processes.
11	giant peaked upright t waves in cerebrovascular accident	The first wave, the Giant T waves, peaked vertically at the time of the accident.
11	control of the tricarboxylate cycle and its interactions with glycolysis during acetate utilization in rat heart	Control of tricarboxylate cycle and glycolytic interactions during apos utilization; acetate in rat heart.
11	further studies on the reversibility of serum sickness cholesterol induced atherosclerosis	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
11	ketone body and fatty acid metabolism in sheep tissues 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase a cytoplasmic enzyme in sheep liver and kidney	Metabolism of ketones and fatty acids in tissues of mutton 3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase, a cytoplasmic enzyme of the liver and kidney of sheep.
11	interconversion of cyclic nucleotide activated and cyclic nucleotide independent forms of a protein kinase from beef heart	Interconversion of apo-activated independent cyclic nucleotide forms, a bovine heart protein kinase.
11	elevation of guanosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate in rat heart after perfusion with acetylcholine	L' elevation of the cyclic phosphate of guanosine 3-5 in the rat heart after infusion with l' acetylcholine.
11	neurally mediated increase in dopamine beta hydroxylase activity	Mediated neuronal augmentation of the apos; dopamine beta hydroxylase activity.
11	cineangiography of the coronary arteries clinical function and anatomic correlation in patients with chronic chest pain	Cineangiography of clinical coronary artery function and anatomical correlation in chronic chest pain.
11	enzyme inactivation with ultraviolet laser energy 2650 angstroms	Enzymatic inactivation with l' laser energy ultraviolet 2650 angstroms.
11	effect of inhibition of lipolysis on myocardial oxygen consumption in the presence of isoproterenol	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the risk of coronary artery disease is high.
11	the effects of intra aortic counterpulsation on cardiac performance and metabolism in shock associated with acute myocardial infarction	The Effects of Dapos; a Counter-Intrabeatation-aortic Pulse on Cardiac Performance and Shock Metabolism Associated with Acute Myocardial Infarction.
11	studies of cardiac muscle with a high permeability to calcium produced by treatment with ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid	High calcium permeability studies of cardiac muscle produced by ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid treatment.
11	excitation contraction coupling in heart vii calcium accumulation in subcellular particles in congestive heart failure	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 34, 331-364, 331-364. http://www.cpr.org/cpr/cpr/cpr/cpr/cpr/cpr/cpr/cpr_e.html.
11	glutamine synthetase in muscle and kidney	Glutamine synthetase activity in muscles and kidneys.
11	haem a cytochrome c and total protein turnover in mitochondria from rat heart and liver	Hem, cytochrome c and total protein turnover in rat liver and heart mitochondria.
11	thyroxine convesion to triiodothyronine by isolated perfused rat heart	Triiodothyronine thyroxine conjugation by perfused isolated rat heart.
11	comparison of glycerol treatment in frog skeletal muscle and mammalian heart an electrophysiological and morphological study	Comparison of glycerol treatment in skeletal frog muscle and mammalian heart, electrophysiological and morphological study.
11	in vitro organization of dissociated rat cardiac cells into beating three dimensional structures	Dissociated rat heart cells are organized in vitro into beats of three-dimensional structures.
11	studies on the pathogenesis of experimental epizootic hemorrhagic disease of white tailed deer	Studies on the Pathogenesis of Experimental Epizootic Haemorrhagic Disease in White-tailed Deer.
11	effect of free fatty acids on myocardial function and oxygen consumption in intact dogs	The effect of free fatty acids on myocardial function and the consumption of apos; oxygen in intact dogs.
11	action of fenfluramine on monoamine stores of rat tissues	L' action of fenfluramine on the rat tissue supply of monoamine.
11	transitional cardiac cells of the conductive system of the dog heart distinguishing morphological and electrophysiological features	Dog heart conductor cardiac transition cells distinguish morphological and electrophysiological characteristics.
11	cardiac muscle its ultrastructure in the finch and hummingbird with special reference to the sarcoplasmic reticulum	Cardiac muscle ultrastructure in finfish and hummingbird, especially sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	the course of ketosis and the activity of key enzymes of ketogenesis and ketone body utilization during development of the postnatal rat	L' ketosis evolution and apo; ketogenesis and apo key enzyme activity; use of ketone bodies during postnatal rat development.
11	regulation of coronary blood flow	Post pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos pos
11	study of soluble lipoprotein in rat liver mitochondria	L' study of rat liver mitochondrial soluble lipoproteins.
11	the fine structure and electrophysiology of heart muscle cell injury	Fine structure and apo; cardiac muscle cell lesion electrophysiology.
11	further studies on histamine catabolism in vivo	D' other studies on the catabolism of l' and histamine in vivo.
11	improved techniques for the preparation of ultrathin frozen sections	Improved freeze-thin cutting techniques.
11	comparative studies of light meromyosin paracrystals derived from red white and cardiac muscle myosins	Comparative studies of cardiac muscle myosin and white myosin derived mild meromyosin paracrystals.
11	importance of the carotid sinus baroreceptors in the regulation of myocardial performance	Importance of carotid sinus baroreceptors for regulation of myocardial performance.
11	endocardial fibroelastosis in children with special reference to the lesions of cardiac ganglia	Fibro-endocardial elastosis in children, especially cardiac lymph node lesions.
11	synthetic strands of cardiac muscle growth and physiological implication	Cardiac muscle growth patterns and their physiological implications.
11	quantitative study of infarcted myocardium in cardiogenic shock	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
11	changes of myocardial enzyme activities in atrial fibrillation	Changes in myocardial enzyme activity patterns in atrial fibrillation.
11	cardiac lesions in fatal cases of recent myocardial ischaemia from a coronary care unit	Cardiac injury in patients with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
11	the identification of the site of action of nn dicyclohexylcarbodi imide as a proteolipid in mitochondrial membranes	Identification of the d&apos site; action of nn dicyclohexylcarbodi imide as mitochondrial membrane proteolipid.
11	aerobic reduction of cytochrome b 566 in pigeon heart mitochondria succinate cytochrome c1 reductase stopped flow kinetics	Aerobic reduction of cytochrome b 566 in the mitochondria of the pigeon heart, succinate cytochrome c1 reductase, stopped the flow kinetics.
11	activities of enzymes of ketone body utilization in brain and other tissues of suckling rats	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
11	light and electron microscopy of diet induced atrial thrombosis in swiss mice ii recovery on return to a balanced diet	Light and electron microscopy of Swiss mice induced atrial thrombosis ii recovery from a balanced diet.
11	angiotensin ii rapid localization in nuclei of smooth and cardiac muscle	Angiotensin ii is rapidly localized in the heart and smooth muscle nuclei.
11	histochemistry of lactic dehydrogenase in heart and pectoralis muscles of rat	L' histochemistry of rat pectoral muscle and heart lactic dehydrogenase.
11	the isotope exchange reactions of ox heart phosphofructokinase	In addition, there is a need for more detailed information on the effects of phenylphenol.
11	light chains of myosins from white red and cardiac muscles	Light chains of myosin, derived from red, white, and heart muscle.
11	metabolism of lysolecithin in vivo effects of hyperlipemia and atherosclerosis in squirrel monkeys	Lysolecithin Metabolism In vivo effects of apos; hyperlipemia and apos; atherosclerosis in the squirrel monkeys.
11	quantitative assessment of the extent of myocardial infarction in the conscious dog by means of analysis of serial changes in serum creatine phosphokinase activity	Quantitative assessment of apos; extent of apos; conscious dog myocardial infarction using apos; serial change analysis of apos; serum creatine phosphokinase activity.
11	fluorescent probe environment and the structural and charge changes in energy coupling of mitochondrial membranes	L' fluorescent probe environment and charge and structural changes in mitochondrial membrane energy coupling.
11	coronary blood flow oxygen delivery rate and cardiac performance	It is not possible to determine the cause of death.
11	modification of the cardiovascular effects of l dopa by decarboxylase inhibitors	Modification of l dopa cardiovascular effects by decarboxylase inhibitors.
11	myocardial and skeletal muscle concentrations of digoxin in patients on long term therapy	Digoxin levels in long-term treatment of myocardium and skeletal muscle.
11	reconstitution of horse heart cytochrome c interaction of the components obtained upon cleavage of the peptide bond following methionine residue 65	Horse heart cytochrome c interaction with peptide-bond cleavage components following the methionine residue 65.
11	the sensitivity of developing cardiac myofibrils to cytochalasin b electron microscopy polarized light z bands heartbeat	The sensitivity of developing cardiac myofibrils to cytochalasin b, by electron microscopy, polarizes the z luminous bands of heartbeats.
11	the progression of interstitial myocarditis to idiopathic endocardial fibroelastosis	Progression from interstitial to idiopathic endocardial fibroelastosis.
11	effects of isoprenaline and aminophylline on the chronotropic responses of the isolated guineapig heart to vagal stimulation and acetylcholine	Effects of apos; isoprenaline and apos; aminophylline on isolated Guinean heart chronotropic responses to vagal stimulation and apos; acetylcholine.
11	myocardial fibrosis and smooth muscle cell hyperplasia in coronary arteries of allylamine fed rats	Myocardial fibrosis and hyperplasia of the smooth muscle cells in the coronary arteries of rats treated with l' allylamine.
11	equivalent circuit of frog atrial tissue as determined by voltage clamp unclamp experiments	An equivalent frog atrial tissue circuit determined by tension clamp experiments.
11	decrease in liver aromatic l amino acid decarboxylase produced by chronic administration of l dopa	Liver aromatic acid decarboxylase depression elicited by apos; chronic dopa l administration.
11	the effects of posture and isoproterenol on the velocity of left ventricular contraction in man the reciprocal relationship between left ventricular volume and myocardial wall force during ejection on mean rate of circumferential shortening	The effects of posture and isoproterenol on left ventricular contraction velocity in men, the interrelationship between left ventricular volume and myocardial wall strength during apo; ejection on circumferential mean shortening rate.
11	ethanol acetaldehyde and myocardial protein synthesis	L' ethanol acetaldehyde; and myocardial protein synthesis.
11	bone and soft tissue changes with oral phosphate supplements	Modification of the soft tissue and bones with the phosphate-based oral supplements.
11	the use of autologous fascia lata for cardiac valve replacement preliminary results	L' use of fascia lata autologous for preliminary results of heart valve replacement.
11	magnesium exchange in rat ventricle	L' exchange of magnesium in the ventricle of the rat.
11	change in the glycogen level in the liver heart and skeletal muscles of rodents during exposure to plague toxin	Changes in glycogen levels in the heart and liver skeletal muscle tissue of rodents exposed to plague toxin.
11	left ventricular performance and coronary flow after coronary embolization with plastic microspheres	Left ventricular performance and coronary flow after plastic microsphere coronary embolization.
11	on the analysis of long chain alkane diols and glycerol ehters in biochemical studies	On the other hand, it is not possible to determine the effect of the glycerol on the formation of the alcohols.
11	effect of physostigmine on ventricular fibrillation and myocardial glycogen in hypothermic dogs	Effect of physostigmine on Ventricular Fibrillation and Myocardial Glycogen in Hypothermic Dogs.
11	the inducible alkaline phosphatase of rat heart some properties of the enzyme and factors influencing its activity	Inducible rat heart alkaline phosphatase (ICHP) has certain properties of the enzyme and factors that influence its activity.
11	free fatty acid oxidation and carnitine levels in diphtheritic guinea pig myocardium	Oxidation of free fatty acids and levels of carnitine in the diphtheria of guinea pig.
11	brain response to protein undernutrition mechanism of preferential protein retention	The cerebral response to protein-preferred protein retention mechanism under-protein feeding.
11	direct counting and sizing of mitochondria in solution	Direct counting and dimensioning of solution mitochondria.
11	ferrochelatase and aminolaevulate synthetase in brain heart kidney and liver of normal and porphyric rats the induction of aminolaevulate synthetase in kidney cytosol and mitochondria by allylisopropylacetamide	Ferrochelatase and apo; aminolaevulate synthetase in normal and porphyric rat brain kidney and liver; aminolaevulatory synthetase induction in renal cytosol and mitochondria by apos; allylisopropylacetamide.
11	coordinated development of glucuronidase and galactosidase in mouse organs	Coordination of galactosidase and glucuronidase development in mouse organs.
11	a method for the determination of lipoprotein lipase in postheparin plasma and body tissues utilizing a triolein coated celite substrate	Plasma and body tissue lipoprotein lipase determination method-heparin using triolein-coated celitic substrate.
11	natural occurrence of free fatty aldehydes in bovine cardiac muscle	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to heart disease.
11	influence of dietary fat on the concentration of long chain unsaturated fatty acid families in rat tissues	Dietary fat influences the concentration of the family of unsaturated long-chain fatty acids in the tissues of the rat.
11	the effect of drugs on stress induced changes of myocardial glycogen and blood glucose concentration in rats	Drug stress effects induced changes in myocardial glycogen and blood glucose concentration in rats.
11	a binding protein for fatty acids in cytosol of intestinal mucosa liver myocardium and other tissues	A fatty acid binding protein in the myocardial cytosol of liver and other tissues.
11	clearing factor lipase in obese hyperglycaemic mice ob ob	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
11	cell sorting in the presence of cytochalasin b	Cytochalasin b screening of cells.
11	synthetic strands of cardiac muscle formation and ultrastructure	Cardiac ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasound.
11	proton translocation coupled to quinone reduction by reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in rat liver and ox heart mitochondria	The proton translocation was coupled to the reduction of quinone by reduction of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide in the mitochondria of rat liver and beef heart.
11	coronary vasodilator responses to hypoxia before and after aminophylline	Coronary vasodilator responses to oral hypoxia; pre- and post-aposal hypoxia; aminophylline.
11	coronary artery reperfusion i early effects on local myocardial function and the extent of myocardial necrosis	Cardiovascular System (CSN) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
11	coronary artery reperfusion ii reduction of myocardial infarct size at 1 week after the coronary occlusion	L'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-à-vie de l'est-la-vie.
11	endothelial cell membranes polarity of particles as seen by freeze fracturing	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of particles, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
11	adenine nucleotide induced contraction of the inner mitochondrial membrane i general characterization	The nucleotides of l' adenine induce generalized inner mitochondrial membrane contraction.
11	adenine nucleotide induced contraction on the inner mitochondrial membrane ii effect of bongkrekic acid	Apos-induced contraction; adenine nucleotide on the inner mitochondrial membrane; and bongkrekic acid.
11	3 hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase in tissues from normal and ketonaemic sheep	We've got three hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenases in normal sheep tissue and ketoneemic sheep tissue.
11	synthesis of plastoquinone analogs and inhibition of photosynthetic and mammalian enzyme systems	Synthesis of d&apos, plastoquinone analogs, and inhibition of mammalian and photosynthetic enzyme systems.
11	reversible transformation by urea of contact inhibited fibroblasts	Reversible contact urea transformation inhibits the fibroblast.
11	intramitochondrial glycogen in hypertrophied infundibular muscle of patients with congenital heart diseases	Intramitochondrial glycogen in hypertrophied infundibular muscle of congenital cardiac patients.
11	platelets in hyperacute rejection of heterotopic cardiac allografts in presensitized dogs an experimental study	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 34, 335-364. http://www.phac-aspc.org/english/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications.htm.
11	lanthanum in heart cell culture effect on calcium exchange correlated with its localization	In cardiac cell cultures, the effect of lanthanum on apos; calcium exchange was correlated with the localization.
11	calcium as mediator of isoproterenol induced myocardial necrosis	Calcium mediated myocardial necrosis was induced by isoproterenol.
11	acute villous inflammation in the placenta following intrauterine transfusion	Acute villositary inflammation of the placenta as a result of d' an intra-@ uterine transfusion.
11	role of muscarinic cholinergic receptors in regulation of guanosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate content in mammalian brain heart muscle and intestinal smooth muscle	Role of muscarinic cholinergic receptors in the regulation of the cyclic monophosphate content of guanosine 3-5 in cerebral cardiac muscle and in mammalian intestinal smooth muscle.
11	light and electron microscopic changes in the myocardium of influenza infected turkeys	Changes in myocardium of infected turkeys; influenza by light and electron microscopy.
11	responses of the protein deficient rabbit to staphylococcal bacteremia	Staphylococcal bacteremia in protein-deficient rabbit.
11	myocardial aminoacyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase and aminoacyl transferring enzyme activity	Myocardial amino acid transfers the apos; ribonucleic acid synthetase and l' aminoacyl transferring the apos; enzymatic activity.
11	kinetics of calcium accumulation in acute myocardial ischemic injury	Kinetics of the apos; accumulation of calcium in ischemic acute myocardial lesion.
11	reduction of experimental myocardial infarct size by corticosteroid administration	Reduction of the size of the implant; experimental infarction of the myocardium; administration of corticosteroids.
11	development of sensitivity to tetrodotoxin in beating chick embryo hearts single cells and aggregates	Tetrodotoxin sensitivity development in chicken hearts beating individual cells and aggregates.
11	evidence for boundary lipid in membranes	Evidence of membrane boundary lipids.
11	the pathological diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction preliminary results of a who cooperative study	Pathological Diagnosis of Immaturity; Acute Myocardial Infarction Preliminary results from a collaborative study by Who.
11	carnitine and brown adipose tissue metabolism in the rat during development	Metabolism of rat brown adipose tissue and carnitine during development.
11	a morphometric study on the nexus of rat cardiac muscle	The relationship between rat heart muscle and rat heart muscle was studied morphometrically.
11	characterization of adrenoceptors in the myocardium	Characterization of myocardial adrenoceptors.
11	the activities of phosphorylase hexokinase phosphofructokinase lactate dehydrogenase and the glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenases in muscles from vertebrates and invertebrates	L' lactate phosphofructokinase hexokinase phosphofructokinase dehydrogenase and glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase activities in muscles of vertebrates and invertebrates.
11	cell free protein synthesis in heart and skeletal muscles from polymyopathic hamsters	Polymyopathic hamster skeletal muscle and heart protein-free synthesis.
11	evidence for defective transfer ribonucleic acid in polymyopathic hamsters and its inhibitory effect on protein synthesis	Evidence of a defective transfer of l' ribonucleic acid in the polymyopathic hamsters and its inhibitory effect on protein synthesis.
11	the effect of sulfonylurea drugs on rabbit myocardial contractility canine purkinje fiber automaticity and adenyl cyclase activity from rabbit and human hearts	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
11	a quantitative assay for intercellular adhesion	Quantitative dosage of intercellular adhesion.
11	the enzymic properties of a modified ox heart myosin adenosine triphosphatase on covalent binding to an insoluble cellulose matrix	Enzymatic properties of bovine heart adenosine triphosphatase modified on covalent binding to insoluble cellulose matrix.
11	ultrastructural studies of beef heart mitochondria 3 the inequality of gross morphological change and oxidative phosphorylation	Beef heart mitochondrial 3 ultrastructural studies, crude morphological changes inequality, and oxidative phosphorylation.
11	heart failure and neonatal hypocalcaemia	Cardiac insufficiency, neonatal hypocalcemia.
11	specificity of serum creatine kinase isoenzymes in diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction	Serum creatine kinase isozyme specificity in diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction.
11	transcription of spontaneously released bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid in frog auricles	Transcription of l' spontaneous release of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid into frog auricles.
11	experimental induction of atheroarteriosclerosis by the synergy of allergic injury to arteries and lipid rich diet ii effect of repeatedly injected foreign protein in rabbits fed a lipid rich cholesterol poor diet	Experimental induction of apo; athero-clinerosis by apo-synergy; arterial and lipid-rich diet allergic lesion; effect of apo; repeated injections of foreign proteins into rabbits fed a cholesterol-depleting diet high in fat.
11	experimental induction of atheroarteriosclerosis by the synergy of allergic injury to arteries and lipid rich diet 3 the role of earlier acquired fibromuscular intimal thickening in the pathogenesis of later developing atherosclerosis	Experimental induction of apo; atherosclerosis by the synergism of arterial and lipid-rich dietary allergic lesions; atherosclerosis; atherosclerosis acquired earlier in the pathogenesis of later development of apo.
11	oscillation of cyclic adenosine monophosphate concentration during the myocardial contraction cycle	In addition, there is an increase in the concentration of adenosine monophosphate during myocardial contraction.
11	experimental calcification of the myocardium ultrastructural and histochemical investigations	Experimental Calcification of Myocardial Histochemical and Ultrastructural Studies.
11	evidence for delayed development of the glucagon receptor of adenylate cyclase in the fetal and neonatal rat heart	Evidence of delayed glucagonic receptor development in neonatal and fetal rat heart tissue; adenylate cyclase.
11	ultrastructural changes of coronary artery endothelium associated with biliary obstruction in the rat	Ultrastructural apo changes; apo endothelium; coronary artery associated with rat biliary obstruction.
11	total and effective coronary blood flow in coronary and noncoronary heart disease	Total and Effective Coronary Blood Flow in Coronary and Non-Coronary Diseases.
11	evidence against the incorporation into protein of amino acids directly from the membrane transport system in rat heart	Evidence against apos; incorporation into protein; amino acids arising directly from the rat heart membrane transport system.
11	the changing pattern of ischemic heart disease	Ischemic heart disease.
11	the calcium pump of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum functional alterations at different levels of thyroid state in rabbits	Calcium pump of functional alterations of the cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum (CSR) at different levels of the apos; thyroid status in rabbits.
11	the effect of prolonged administration of ethanol on cardiac metabolism and performance in the dog	In addition to the above-mentioned benefits, there are a number of benefits to be gained from the use of ethanol in dogs.
11	the neurogenic vasoconstrictor effect of digitalis on coronary vascular resistance	L' vasoconstrictor neurogenic effect of digitalin on coronary vascular resistance.
11	radiation induced cardiomyopathy i an electron microscopic study of cardiac muscle cells	Radiation-induced cardiomyopathy i cardiac muscle cell electron microscopy study.
11	significance of multiple intercalated discs in hypertrophied human myocardium	L' importance of multiple disks intercalated in the human hypertrophied myocardium.
11	tissue distribution and metabolism of aflatoxin b 1 14 c in broiler chickens	Tissue distribution and metabolism in broiler chickens; aflatoxin b 114.
11	the apparent stimulation of proteolysis by adenosine triphosphate in tissue homogenates	Apparent proteolysis stimulation by adenosine triphosphate in tissue homogenates.
11	the interaction of the calcium binding protein troponin c with bivalent cations and the inhibitory protein troponin i	Interaction of troponin c, a calcium-binding protein, with divalent cations and troponin i, an inhibitory protein, with troponin i.
11	studies on partially reduced mammalian cytochrome oxidase reactions with carbon monoxide and oxygen	Studies of the partially reduced reactions of the mammalian cytochrome oxidase with carbon monoxide and l' oxygen.
11	isolation of nuclear acidic proteins from rat tissues characterization of acetylated liver nuclear acidic proteins	Isolate rat tissue nuclear acidic proteins to characterize acetylated hepatic acidic proteins.
11	the myocardial interstitium its structure and its role in ionic exchange	L' myocardial interstium plays a role in ion exchange.
11	spheroidal bodies in the junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum of lizard myocardial cells	Spheroidal body in lizard myocardial cell junctional sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	membrane junctions in the intermembrane space of mitochondria from mammalian tissues	Membrane junctions in mammalian tissue mitochondrial intermembrane space.
11	dna synthesis and mitosis in well differentiated mammalian cardiocytes	Synthesis of the apos; DNA and mitosis in well-differentiated mammalian cardiocytes.
11	changes in enzyme activities in tissues of rats exposed to hypoxia	Changes in tissue enzyme activities in exposed rats; hypoxia.
11	the specific radioactivity of the precursor pool for estimates of the rate of protein synthesis	Precursor pool specific radioactivity for estimates of protein synthesis rate.
11	inhibition of cell proliferation in the livers of hepatectomized rats by a rabbit hepatic chalone	L' inhibition of liver cell proliferation in rabbit hepatectomized rats by hepatic chalone.
11	cytochrome c observation of numerous single carbon sites of the reduced and oxidized species by means of natural abundance 13c nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy	With the aid of abundant natural 13c nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy, cytochrome c is able to observe many simple carbon sites of reduced and oxidized species.
11	morphometric data on the endothelium of blood capillaries	Morphometric data for blood capillary endothelium.
11	microbodies peroxisomes containing catalase in myocardium morphological and biochemical evidence	Myocardial catalase-containing peroxisome microbodies showed morphological and biochemical evidence.
11	the effects of dipyridamole on blood flow and oxygen handling in the acutely ischaemic and normal canine myocardium	Effects of dipyridamole on blood flow and handling of oxygen in normal and acute ischemic canine myocardium.
11	pathology of murine cytomegalovirus infection in newborn mice muscle heart and brown fat lesions	Mouse cytomegalovirus infection in the muscular heart and mouse brown-blubber lesions again-nées.
11	tetrodotoxin desensitization in aggregates of embryonic chick heart cells	Tetrodotoxin desensitization in chicken embryonic cardiac aggregates.
11	sudden death in infancy a study of cardiac specialized tissue	Cardiovascular disease in Canada: an epidemiological study.
11	a study of human cardiac allograft in a patient with four year survival	A human cardiac allograft study in a 4-year survival patient.
11	histopathology of early myocardial infarcts a new approach	L' Histopathology of Early Myocardial Infarction (MMI) is a novel approach.
11	detection of protein subunits of ferritin in situ in cells by immunofluorescence	In situ detection, by immunofluorescence, of ferritin protein units under-in cells.
11	primary neuropathic amyloidosis in three brothers	Neuropathic amyloidosis primary in three brothers.
11	the organic inorganic relationship in calcified mitochondria	Inorganic organic relationships in calcified mitochondria.
11	the inhibition of histamine uptake and metabolism by burimamide in the guinea pig atrium and in mouse neoplastic mast cells in vitro	L'absorption et metabolism de l'apos; histamine par la burimamide dans l'apos; atillette de la guinea pig et dans les mastocytes neoplastiques de la murine en vitro.
11	synthesis and degradation of mitochondrial components in hypertrophied rat heart	Mitochondrial components are synthesized and degraded in the enlarged rat heart.
11	proton translocation coupled to quinol oxidation in ox heart mitochondria	Proton translocation, coupled with quinol oxidation, in beef heart mitochondria.
11	studies in rheumatic fever vi ultrastructure of chronic rheumatic heart disease	Studies of Ultrastructural Rheumatic Fever in Chronic Rheumatic Heart Disease.
11	effect of inhibition of lipolysis on infarct size after experimental coronary artery occlusion	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
11	reduction of ferricytochrome c by dithionite ion electron transfer by parallel adjacent and remote pathways	Ferricytochrome c reduction by d&apos transfer; dithionite ions by adjacent and distantly parallel pathways.
11	rate of uptake of endogenous cortisol by the left ventricle of the anaesthetized dog during ventilation with ambient air and during hypoxia	Dapos; absorption of endogenous cortisol by the dog's left ventricle during anesthetized ventilation with the dog's left ventricle; ambient air and hypoxia.
11	effect of a transient period of ischemia on myocardial cells ii fine structure during the first few minutes of reflow	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
11	intracytoplasmic junctions in cardiac muscle cells	Intra-toplasmic functions in the muscles of the heart.
11	investigation of the physiological basis for increased exercise threshold for angina pectoris after physical conditioning	Examination of physiological basis; increased threshold of effort; post-fitness angina.
11	the molecular weight and thiol residues of acetyl coenzyme a synthetase from ox heart mitochondria	Beef heart mitochondrial acetyl coenzyme a synthetase and acetyl coenzyme protein residues.
11	relatedness among contractile and membrane proteins evidence for evolution from common ancestral genes	The relationship between the contractile and the membrane proteins is a testament to the evolution from common ancestral genes.
11	intracellular calcium binding and release in frog heart	Fixation and release of calcium in the heart of frogs.
11	mechanisms for intracellular calcium regulation in heart i stopped flow measurements of ca uptake by cardiac mitochondria	The mechanisms of i-heart intracellular calcium regulation have stopped measurements of ca-capture by cardiac mitochondria.
11	myocardial function and lipid metabolism in the chronic alcoholic animal	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of metabolism.
11	coronary hemodynamics and regional myocardial metabolism in experimental aortic insufficiency	Coronary hemodynamics (CHR) and regional myocardial metabolism (RMM) in experimental aortic failure.
11	antigenic cross reaction between mouse intestine and a member of the autochthonous microflora	Antigenic cross-reactivity between the mouse intestine and an autochthonous microflora.
11	electron transfer reactions in biological systems the reduction of ferricytochrome c by chromous ions	Electrons in biological systems, reduction of ferricytochrome c by chromium ions.
11	the effect of acute fatigue on organ proteins and protein fractions	Acute fatigue affects both organic proteins and protein fractions.
11	synthesis and properties of some cyclic amp alkyl phosphotriesters	Synthesis and properties of some ampoules of cyclic alkyl phosphotriesters.
11	subendocardial ischemia provoked by tachycardia in conscious dogs with coronary stenosis	Ischemia at-endocardium caused by tachycardia in conscious coronary stenosis dogs.
11	cor triatriatum study of 20 cases	Twenty-case study Cor triatriatum.
11	primary cardiomyopathy in identical twins	Identical twin primary cardiomyopathy.
11	bacterial endocarditis in subjects 60 years of age and older	Bacterial Endocarditis in individuals 60 years and older.
11	anatomically corrected malposition of the great arteries s d l	Anatomically-corrected major-artery malposition.
11	ultrastructure of crista supraventricularis muscle in patients with congenital heart diseases associated with right ventricular outflow tract obstruction	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
11	clinical use of sodium nitroprusside in chronic ischemic heart disease effects on peripheral vascular resistance and venous tone and on ventricular volume pump and mechanical performance	Clinical use of sodium nitroprusside in the effects of chronic ischemic heart disease on peripheral vascular resistance and on venous tone, as well as on the ventricular volume pump and mechanical performance.
11	de subitaneis mortibus x familial congential heart block	Subsentianeis mortibus x congential family heart block.
11	electrophoresis on cellulose acetate and chromatography on deae sephadex a 50 compared in the estimation of creatine kinase isoenzymes	Cellulose acetate electrophoresis and deae sephadex chromatography a 50 were compared in apos; estimates of the isoenzymes of creatine kinase.
11	improvement of myocardial and other vital organ functions and metabolism with a simple method of pulsatile flow iabp during clinical cardiopulmonary bypass	Improvement of the functions and metabolism of the myocardium and d' other vital organs by a simple iabp pulsatile flow method during clinical pulmonary bypass graft.
11	further characterization of tissue distribution and metabolism of 14c aflatoxin b1 in chickens	In addition, there is a need for a more detailed description of the metabolism and tissue distribution of aflatoxin.
11	hypercalcemia and calcinosis in florida horses implication of the shrub cestrum diurnum as the causative agent	It is the most common cause of death in horses, and it is the most common cause of death in horses.
11	the development of cardiac myxomas and papillary endocardial lesions from mural thrombus	Cardiac myxoma and endocardial papillary lesion development from a wall thrombus.
11	influence of perfusion pressure and heart rate on local myocardial flow in the collateralized heart with chronic coronary occlusion	Influence of perfusion pressure and heart rate on local myocardial output in chronically occluded collateralized heart.
11	effect of stimulation site on ventricular threshold in dogs with heart block	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
11	comparison of the effects of histamine and tolazoline on adenylate cyclase activity from guinea pig heart	Comparison of the effects of histamine, histamine, and tolazoline on guinea-pig heart enzymes; apos activity; adenylate cyclase.
11	inhibition of mitochondrial electron transport by hydroxy substituted 1 4 quinones	Inhibition of mitochondrial electron transport by 14-quinone-substituted hydroxyquinones.
11	the actions of a new beta adrenoceptor blocking drug ici 66082 on the rabbit papillary muscle and on the dog heart	The actions of a beta drug blocking adrenoceptors here 66082 on the papillary muscle of the rabbit and on the heart of the dog.
11	studies on cytochrome oxidase interactions of the cytochrome oxidase protein with phospholipids and cytochrome c	Cytochrome oxidase interaction studies of protein cytochrome oxidase with phospholipids and cytochrome c.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isozymes of salmonid fish evidence for unique and rapid functional divergence of duplicated h 4 lactate dehydrogenases	Lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in salmonids reflect a rapid and unique functional divergence of duplicated h4 lactate dehydrogenases.
11	myocardial and total body extractions of radiorubidium in anesthetized dogs	Extractions of the total myocardial and body radiorubidium from anesthetized dogs.
11	relationship between theophylline uptake and inotropic effect in the guinea pig heart	Relationship between l' absorption of theophylline and l' guinea pig heart inotropic effect.
11	amyloid in the aged heart frequency and clinical significance	Amyloid in the heart rate of the elderly and its effect on the health of the elderly.
11	myocardial infarction complicating bacterial endocarditis in rheumatic heart disease report of a case and review of the literature	Cardiovascular disease: a case report and a review of the literature. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/cardiovascular disease.html.
11	competitive inhibition of beef heart cyclic amp phosphodiesterase by cytokinins and related compounds	L' competitive inhibition of the phosphodiesterase of l' cyclic bulb of the beef heart by cytokinins and related compounds.
11	aberrations of cyclic nucleotide metabolism in the hearts and vessels of hypertensive rats	Aberrations of cyclic nucleotide metabolism in hypertensive rat hearts and vessels.
11	direct selective myocardial revascularization by internal mammary artery coronary vein anastomosis	Anastomosis of the coronary vein of the l' internal mammary artery.
11	cardiovascular calcification associated with nephritis in a badger	Cardiovascular Calcification Associated with Badger Nephritis.
11	identification and measurement of plasticizer in neonatal tissues after umbilical catheters and blood products	Identification and measurement of the plasticizer in neonatal tissue after birth; use of catheters and blood products.
11	prediction of secondary structure of proteins a comparison of the phi psi angles previously predicted for cytochrome c with recent x ray crystallographic findings	Prediction of secondary protein structure by comparing previously predicted cytochrome c phi psi angles with recent X-ray crystallographic results.
11	scanning electron microscopy of the heart after coronary occlusion	Heart scan electron microscopy after coronary occlusion.
11	mitochondrial changes in dog myocardium induced by lowered ph in vitro	Mitochondrial canine myocardial changes induced by ph depletion in vitro.
11	the mechanism of myocardial protection from ischemic arrest by intracoronary tetrodotoxin administration	Mechanism of Myocardial Protection against Apos; Ischemic Stop by Apos; Intracoronary Administration of Tetrodotoxin.
11	hemodynamic characteristics of critical stenosis in canine coronary arteries	Hemodynamic Characteristics of Critical Stenosis (CSE) in Canine Coronary Arteries.
11	a method of closed chest cannulation of the left atrium for left atrial femoral artery bypass	Closed chest canine method of apos; left atrium bypass; left femoral artery.
11	differences in amine storage in rat heart and brain	Differences in the storage of the amine in the heart and brain of the rat.
11	comparative effects of left atrial or left ventricular bypass on coronary sinus flow and oxygen usage in dogs	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that coronary artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery artery.
11	isotonic contraction and contracture of the isolated right rat ventricle effect of la3 prenylamine atp mg2 author s transl	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of contractions, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
11	endogenous cyclic adenosine monophosphate in tissues of rabbits fed an atherogenic diet	Endogenous cyclic adenosine monophosphate cyclic in rabbit tissues fed an atherogenic diet.
11	investigation of the evi antibody in parasitic diseases other than american trypanosomiasis an anti skeletal muscle antibody in leishmaniasis	Apos study; antibody found in non-American trypanosomiasis parasitic diseases, an anti-skeletal muscle antibody in leishmaniasis.
11	individual organ contributions to the decrease in whole body vo2 with isoflurane	Contribution of each organ to the decrease of vo2 of the whole body with the isoflurane.
11	myocardial injury from transthoracic defibrillator countershock	The damage to myocardium caused by the shock to the transthoracic defibrillator.
11	reticulum cell sarcoma of the heart	Heart reticulum sarcoma.
11	distribution and properties of cholinesterases in subcellular fractions from rat jejunum and heart tissue	Cholinesterase distribution and properties in subcellular fractions of rat jejunum and cardiac tissue.
11	conformational studies of equilibrium structures in fragments of horse heart cytochrome c	Conformational studies of d&apos structures; equilibrium in cytochrome c fragments of the horse heart.
11	dependence of the cardiac uptake of digitalis glycosides on the extracellular calcium concentration in guinea pig isolated hearts	The dependence of cardiac uptake of digital glycosides on the concentration of extracellular calcium in isolated hearts of guinea pigs.
11	the present status of heart transplantation	Cardiovascular disease in Canada.
11	the inhibition of c amp phosphodiesterase by phenobarbitone	L' inhibition of c amp-phosphodiesterase by phenobarbitone.
11	myocardial lactate metabolism during isometric hand grip test comparison with pacing tachycardia	Acute toxicity of chloroquine to rats and rats.
11	conformational isomerism and effective redox geometry in the oxidation of heme proteins by alkyl halides cytochrome c and cytochrome oxidase	Conformational isomerism and redox geometry are effective in apo; heme proteins are oxidized by d&apos halides; alkyl, cytochrome c, and cytochrome oxidase.
11	effects of physical training on several glycolytic enzymes in rat heart	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used in the rat heart.
11	x ray diffraction study of muscles in disease	Muscle X-ray diffraction in diseases.
11	wolff parkinson white syndrome a fatal case in a girl with no other heart disease	Parkinson's syndrome-Wolff is fatal in a young girl who has no other heart disease.
11	distribution and excretion of two chlorinated biphenyl isomers 4 chlorobiphenyl and decachlorobiphenyl in lactating bovine	Distribution and excretion of two isomers of chlorinated biphenyls, chlorobiphenyl 4 and decachlorobiphenyl, in dairy cattle.
11	systolic time intervals in domestic ponies alterations in a case of coarctation of the aorta	Serologic Intervals of Systolic Time in Household Ponies Alterations in a Case of Coarctation of the Apos; aorta.
11	immunofluorescent localization of glycogenolytic and glycolytic enzyme proteins and of malate dehydrogenase isozymes in cross striated skeletal muscle and heart of the rabbit	Glycolytic and glycogenolytic enzyme proteins and isozymes of malate dehydrogenase in rabbit skeletal cross-stripe muscle and heart are localized by immunofluorescence.
11	the ultra structural localization of enzyme activity in unfixed sections	L'emplacement ultra structurale de l'apos; enzymatic activity in sections not fixed.
11	myocardial infarction in the newborn a case report complicated by cardiogenic shock and associated with normal coronary arteries	Myocardial infarction in newborn @-@, cardiogenic shock complicated case report associated with normal coronary arteries.
11	cardiac pathology after aortic valve replacement using hufnagel trileaflet prostheses a study of 20 necropsy patients	Cardiac pathology after replacement of aortic valves at the apos; aid in the prosthesis of trileaflet hufnagel, study of 20 necropical patients.
11	scanning electron microscopy of cardiac endothelium of the dog	Canine scanning electron microscope; cardiac endothelium.
11	the heart in systemic lupus erythematosus and the changes induced in it by corticosteroid therapy a study of 36 necropsy patients	Heart in disseminated lupus erythematosus and corticosteroid-induced changes in 36 necropsy patients.
11	dissociations between changes in myocardial cyclic adenosine monophosphate and contractility	Disruption of myocardial cyclic adenosine monophosphate and contractility.
11	a permeability test for the study of mitochondrial injury in in vitro cultured heart muscle and endothelioid cells	An apo-permeability assay; study of mitochondrial lesions in cardiac muscle and endotheloid cells cultured in vitro.
11	the lysosomal permeability test modified for toxicity testing with cultured heart endothelioid cells	L' lysosomal permeability assay has been modified for endothelial cell toxicity assays in cultured cardiac endothelial cells.
11	localization in cardiac muscle of some enzymes related to glutamate metabolism	Localization of certain glutamate-mediated enzymes in the heart muscle.
11	lipid specificity of beta hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase activation	Lipid Specificity of Lapos; Beta Activation-hydroxybutyrate dehydrogenase.
11	regulation of long chain fatty acid activation in heart muscle	It is not possible to predict the effects of a single drug on a person.
11	purification and regulatory properties of chicken heart prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase	Prostaglandin and chicken heart ketoreductase 9 pureness and regulatory properties.
11	kinetics of adenosine triphosphate synthesis in bovine heart submitochondrial particles	Kinetics of the synthesis of l' adenosine triphosphate (ADP) in the heart of bovine submitochondrial particles.
11	chemical modification of bovine heart mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase selective modification of cysteine and histidine	Chemical modification of the mitochondrial malate dehydrogenase of the heart of beef, selective modification of cysteine and l' histidine.
11	acyl coa inhibition of adenine nucleotide translocation in ischemic myocardium	In addition, it inhibits the translocation of the nucleotides from the apos; adenine in the ischemic myocardium.
11	reciprocal synapses between cholinergic axons and small granule containing cells in the rat cardiac ganglion	Reciprocal synapses between the cholinergic axons and the small granules containing cells in the cardiac ganglion of the rat.
11	halothane and the beating response and atp turnover rate of heart cells in tissue culture	Halothane and heart cell atp response and turnover rate in tissue cultures.
11	golgi organelle response to the antibiotic x537a	Golgi organelle reaction to x537a antibiotic.
11	effects of magnesium on the kinetic properties of bovine heart glycogen synthase d	Effects of Magnesium on the Kinetic Properties of Beef Heart Glycogen synthase d.
11	effects of thyroid hormones on enzymes involved in fatty acid and glycerolipid synthesis	Effects of thyroid hormones on the enzymes involved in the synthesis of fatty acids and glycerolipids.
11	the role of extracellular materials in cell movement i inhibition of mucopolysaccharide synthesis does not stop ruffling membrane activity or cell movement	Extracellular materials play a role in cell movement, the inhibition of mucopolysaccharide synthesis, n' does not prevent cellular membrane activity or cell movement.
11	studies of intercellular invasion in vitro using rabbit peritoneal neutrophil granulocytes pmns i role of contact inhibition of locomotion	Immunosorbent studies; intercellular invasion in vitro; peritoneal granulocyte neutrophils of rabbit pmos; locomotor contact inhibition.
11	characteristics of mitochondrial and microsonal monoacyl and diacylglycerol 3 phosphate biosynthesis in rabbit heart	Characteristics of the mitochondrial and microsonal biosynthesis of rabbit heart monoacyl and diacylglycerol 3 phosphate.
11	myocardial perfusion and metabolism at normothermic and hypothermic levels	Myocardial perfusion and hypothermic and normothermic metabolism.
11	distribution of coronary arterial flow in acute myocardial ischemia	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
11	preliminary results of examinations of rats after a 22 day flight aboard the cosmos 605 biosatellite	Preliminary apo results; rat examination after 22 days flight on the 605 cosmos biosatellite.
11	mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase location of sulfhydryl groups and disulfide bonds in soluble enzyme from beef heart	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
11	beef heart submitochondrial particles a mixture of mitochondrial inner and outer membranes	The heart of beef contains mitochondrial particles, a mixture of both inner and outer mitochondrial membranes.
11	kinetics of carbon monoxide binding and electron transfer by cytochrome c polymers	The kinetics of the binding of carbon monoxide and the transfer of electrons by cytochrome c polymers.
11	viable amphibian hybrids produced by circumventing a block to cross fertilization rana clamitans female x rana catesbeiana male	Viable hybrids of amphibians were produced by circumventing a female rana clamitans × male rana catesbeiana cross fertilization block.
11	hypersensitivity of delayed type manifested during the development of allergic lesions of the myocardium	Delayed hypersensitivity occurs during development of allergic myocardial lesions.
11	how does angiotensin ii increase cardiac dopamine beta hydroxylation	How does the dose of angiotensin II increase?-t-it is also increased; beta hydroxylation of cardiac dopamine?
11	fatty acid binding protein in small intestine identification isolation and evidence for its role in cellular fatty acid transport	The protein that binds the fatty acids in the intestine; identification of the small intestine and evidence of its role in the cellular transport of the fatty acids.
11	cellular reactivity studies to streptococcal antigens migration inhibition studies in patients with streptococcal infections and rheumatic fever	Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular Disease Cardiovascular Disease Cardiovascular Disease Cardiovascular Disease Cardiac.
11	effects of verapamil on myocardial contractility cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and heart phosphorylase	Effects of Verapamil on Cardiac Myocardial Adenosine 3-5 Monophosphate and Cardiac Phosphorylase.
11	alteration in oxyhemoglobin equilibrium p 50 and myocardial oxygen consumption mvo2 by nitroglycerin gtn	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be due to the fact that it is not possible to predict the effects of the drug.
11	time course for reversal of electrophysiological and ultrastructural abnormalities in subendocardial purkinje fibers surviving extensive myocardial infarction in dogs	L' temporal evolution of apos; reversal of ultrastructural and electrophysiological abnormalities in subendocardial purkinje fibers survived a major myocardial infarction in the dog.
11	a model of psychosocial hypertension showing reversibility and progression of cardiovascular complications	Cardiovascular disease is a major risk factor for cardiovascular disease.
11	effect of the thyroid state on the enzymatic characteristics of cardiac myosin a difference in behavior of rat and rabbit cardiac myosin	Effect of apos; thyroid status on cardiac myosin enzymatic characteristics, a difference in the behaviour of rabbit and rat cardiac myosin.
11	anoxia induced release of prostaglandins in rabbit isolated hearts	Anoxia induced prostaglandin release in isolated rabbit hearts.
11	the heart as a target organ in systemic allergic reactions comparison of cardiac analphylaxis in vivo and in vitro	The heart as a target organ for systemic allergic reactions compared with cardiac analgesia in vivo and in vitro.
11	in vitro acetylcholine biosynthesis in normal and failing guinea pig hearts	In vitro biosynthesis of l' acetylcholine in failing and normal guinea pig hearts.
11	persistence of mb isoenzyme of creatine phosphokinase in the serum after minor iatrogenic cardiac trauma absence of postmortem evidence of myocardial infarction	The persistence of creatine phosphokinase mb isoenzyme in serum following minor iatrogenic cardiac injury in the absence of post signs @-@mortem d' myocardial infarction.
11	thallium 201 for myocardial imaging relation of thallium 201 to regional myocardial perfusion	Thallium 201 for the Dapos relationship; Thallium 201 Myocardial Imaging to Regional Myocardial Infusion.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xi young girl with palpitations	Subaneis mortibus xi girl with palpitations.
11	identification of nerve fibres in the scanning electron microscope	Identification of nerve fibers in scanning electron microscopy.
11	effect of exercise on tissue lipids and serum lipoproteins of rats fed two levels of fat	In rats fed two different levels of fat, exercise on the tissue lipids and serum lipoproteins.
11	modifications of plasma post heparin lipolytic activity and tissue lipoprotein lipase activity induced in the rat by acute administration of ethanol or propan 2 ol	Changes in liver enzymes; post-lipolytic activity of plasma heparin and liver enzymes; tissue lipoprotein lipase activity elicited in rats by apos; acute administration of apos, ethanol or 2-ol propanol.
11	selective coronary perfusion scintigraphy ii abnormal coronary perfusion pattern author s transl	Coronary Infusion Selective Scintigraphy ii Translative coronary infusion abnormal pattern.
11	cardiac side effects of bencyclan	Bencyclan heart side effects.
11	contractile myocardial proteins and their enzymatic activity in hypertensive disease and coronary atherosclerosis	In addition, there is a need for additional information to assist in the assessment of risk factors.
11	characteristics of reaction of the coronary vessels and metabolism of the myocardium in changing over from high to low frequency electric stimulation of the heart	Characteristics of coronary vessel response and myocardial metabolism from high-frequency electrical stimulation to low-frequency cardiac electrical stimulation.
11	importance of determination of the content of lactate dehydrogenase and its isoenzymes in patients with myocardial infarct complicated by rupture of the heart	Determination of lactate dehydrogenase and its isoenzymes in patients with apo; myocardial infarction complicated by heart failure.
11	cardiac responses to snout immersion in trained dogs	Health and Welfare Canada, Health and Welfare Canada.
11	depression of contractile function and decrease of the effectiveness of oxygen utilization during compensatory heart hypertrophy	Contractile function decreased and apos decreased; efficacy of apos; use of apos; oxygen during apos; compensatory cardiac hypertrophy.
11	effect of trypsin like enzyme inhibitor on certain metabolic processes in the acute period of experimental myocardial ischemia	Effect of Apos; Trypsin Enzymatic Inhibitor on Certain Metabolic Processes During Acute Period of Apos; Experimental Myocardial Ischemia.
11	the cardiac muscle in the pulmonary vein of the rat a morphological and electrophysiological study	Cardiac muscle in rat pulmonary vein morphological and electrophysiological study.
11	autoantibodies against heartmuscle sarcolemma in sera of patients with an idiopathic cardiomyopathy author s transl	Auto-anti-heart muscle sarcolemma antibodies in serum from patients with translative idiopathic cardiomyopathy.
11	production and utilization of acetate in mammals	It can be used as an insecticide or as an insecticide.
11	the specific radioactivity of the tissue free amino acid pool as a basis for measuring the rate of protein synthesis in the rat in vivo	Specific radioactivity of the tissue free amino acid pool as the basis for measurement of protein synthesis rate in rat in vivo.
11	comparative studies on 3 oxo acid coenzyme a transferase from various rat tissues	Comparative studies of 3 oxo-acid coenzyme a transferase from rat tissues.
11	carnitine and trimethylaminobutyrate synthesis in rat tissues	Synthesis of Carnitine and Trimethylaminobutyrate in Rat Tissues.
11	cardiomegaly in chronic anemia in ratsman experimental study including ultrastructural histometric and stereologic observations	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3rd edition, 3rd edition. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/pubs/index_e.html.
11	the surgical anatomy of pulmonary atresia with ventricular septal defect pseudotruncus	Surgical anatomy of the lung atresia with defect of ventricular septation pseudotruncus.
11	the relationship between the bovine heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase lipophilic compounds and oligomycin	The relationship between lipophilic components of bovine heart; mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase and l' oligomycin.
11	complexation of iron hexacyanides by cytochrome c evidence for electron exchange at the exposed heme edge	The complexation of the iron hexacyanides by the cytochrome c suggests an exchange of electrons at the apos; exposed end of the heme.
11	the role of cyclic gmp in the regulation of cyclic amp hydrolysis	The Role of Cyclic Gmp in the Regulation of L' Bulk Cyclic Hydrolysis.
11	concentration of digoxin methyldigoxin digitoxin and ouabain in the myocardium of the dog following coronary occulsion	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of coronary occultation.
11	effects of zinc copper and manganese supplementation of high concentrate ration on digestibility growth and tissue content of holstein calves	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
11	isolation of a major cell surface glycoprotein from fibroblasts	Isolate major glycoprotein from fibroblast cell surface.
11	the calcium antagonistic fundamental effects of verapamil on myocardial fibers and smooth muscle cells of the blood vessels	The fundamental calcium antagonistic effects of verapamil on myocardial fibres and blood vessel smooth muscle cells.
11	key role of intracellular calcium overload in acute necrosis of the myocardium cardioprotection with verapamil	Key role of intracellular calcium overloading (ICC) in acute myocardial cardioprotection necrosis by verapamil.
11	verapamil in the study and treatment of supraventricular tachycardias with special reference to pre excitation	Vérapamil in the study and treatment of the supraventricular tachycardia, in particular the pre-excitation.
11	membrane response to current pulses in spheroidal aggregates of embryonic heart cells	The membrane response to current impulses in spheroidal aggregates of the embryonic cardiac cells.
11	an asparagine requirement in young rats fed the dietary combinations of aspartic acid glutamine and glutamic acid	A need for asparagine was observed in young rats fed diets containing aspartic acid, glutamine, and glutamic acid.
11	fatal iron heart in an adolescent biochemical and ultrastructural aspects of the heart	Journal of Epidemiology and Community Psychiatry, 10, pp. 1–24.
11	contractile function of the myocardium of the right ventricle in thyrotoxicosis	Right ventricular myocardial contractile functions in thyrotoxicosis.
11	experimental thyrotoxicosis under conditions preventin hyperlipacidemia	Experimental thyrotoxicosis under hyperlipemic conditions.
11	cardiac hypertrophy in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Spontaneously hypertensive rats have cardiac hypertrophy.
11	prevention of hereditary cardiomyopathy in the hamster by verapamil and other agents	Prevention of Hereditary Hamster Cardiomyopathy by Verapamil and Other Agents.
11	apparent volumes of distribution of 125 i lothalamate and inulin in chickens	Apparent volume of 125i-lothalamate and 125i-lapos; inulin in chickens.
11	tolerance of altitude acclimatized rats to exercise in the cold	In addition, it is important to keep in mind that it is not always possible to do this type of exercise.
11	effects of obstruction of cardiac lymphatics	Cardiac lymphatic obstruction.
11	increased collagen synthesis in blood vessels of hypertensive rats and its reversal by antihypertensive agents	The increased synthesis of collagen in blood vessels from hypertensive rats and its antihypertensive reversal were increased.
11	macroscopic enzyme mapping verification of large homogeneous experimental myocardial infarcts of predictable size and location in dogs	Verification of macroscopic enzyme mapping of large, homogeneous, dog-size, and localization myocardial infarcts.
11	the effect of different methods of protecting the myocardium on lysosomal activation and acid phosphatase activity in the dog heart after one hour of cardiopulmonary bypass	Lapos; effect of different myocardial protection methods on apos; lysosomal activation and lapos; canine heart acid phosphatase activity after one hour of cardiopulmonary bypass.
11	a mitochondrial carnitine acylcarnitine translocase system	Acylcarnitine translocase mitochondrial system.
11	on the question of translocation of heart camp dependent protein kinase	Cardiac camp-dependent protein kinase translocation.
11	myocardial extraction of labeled long chain fatty acid analogs 38509	Myocardial extraction of analogues of labelled long-chain fatty acids 38509.
11	release of prostaglandin from the rabbit isolated heart following vagal nerve stimulation or acetylcholine infusion	Release of prostaglandin from isolated rabbit heart after stimulation of the vagus nerve or infusion of acetylcholine.
11	nature of alkanes in beef heart lipids	Nature of the alkanes in the beef-heart lipids.
11	a23187 a calcium ionophore that directly increases cardiac contractility 38704	Calcium ionophore A23187, which directly increases cardiac contractility 38704.
11	characteristics of artefacts following fixation with glutaraldehyde and osmium tetroxide	Characteristics of the artifacts after attachment to Glutaraldehyde and to tetroxide d' osmium.
11	anoxic myocardial lesions in man developed during extracorporeal circulation studied by electron microscopy	Anoxic myocardial lesions in humans developed during the electron-microscopic extracorporeal circulation.
11	early ischemic lesion of the myocardium in a case of unusual developmental anomaly of the coronary vessels and coronary thrombosis	Early ischemic myocardial injury in a coronary artery; abnormal coronary vascular development and thrombosis.
11	changes in the ultrastructure of cardiac muscle in steers deprived of copper	Changes in cardiac muscle structure in copper-deprived steers.
11	potentation of the cardiac response to aminophylline by oxyfedrine	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - Acute, chronic, and chronic conditions.
11	change in myoglobin content in rabbit and chicken muscles in ontogenesis	Changes in the myoglobin content of the muscles of rabbits and chickens during ontogenesis.
11	histometrical estimation of scar tissue in hypertrophied human heart muscle	Histometric estimate of hypertrophied human cardiac muscle scar tissue.
11	rna content in the heart muscle cells following adrenalectomy and additional overload in the rat	Adrenalectomy and additional overload of cardiac muscle cells in the rat.
11	pathogenesis of mural thrombi in idiopathic cardiomyopathy	Mural thrombi pathogenesis in idiopathic cardiomyopathy.
11	lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the growth of heart cells	Lactate dehydrogenase enzymes for cardiac cell growth.
11	catecholamine release as mediator of intracellular enzyme activation in ischaemic perfused rat hearts	Release of catecholamines as a mediator of intracellular lipase activity in perfused hearts from ischemic rats.
11	effects of pharmacological myocardial depression on coronary artery collateral formation	Effects of Pharmacologic Myocardial Depression on Collateral Formation of the Coronary Artery.
11	some aspects of lipid metabolism in fatty liver and kidney syndrome in chicks	Aspects of foie gras lipid metabolism and chick kidney syndrome.
11	tissue lipid composition in fatty liver and kidney syndrome in chicks	Tissue lipid composition in foie gras and chick kidney syndrome.
11	the effect of microbial contemination of the air on metabolic indices in broiler chickens	In the case of broiler chickens, the effects of microbial control on the metabolic indices of the animal.
11	histochemical and histoenzymatic study of experimental myocardial infarction in the rat by temporary and permanent ligation of the left coronary artery author s transl	Histochemical and histoenzymatic study of the apos; experimental infarction of the rat myocardium by temporary and permanent ligation of the translocation of the apos; left coronary artery of the apos.
11	cardiac heterotransplantation morphological and immunohistological studies	Morphological and Immunohistological Studies of Cardiac Heterotransplantation.
11	anomalous coronary artery origin and bicuspid aortic valve	Abnormal origin of the coronal artery and aortic bicuspid valve.
11	acetylcholine content in the brain and heart of developing rats	Brain and heart acetylcholine levels in developing rats.
11	ca 2 mg 2 dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase and its activator protein	Approximately 2 mg 2 phosphodiesterase- and activating protein-dependent cyclic nucleotides.
11	relationship between cyclic amp metabolism and inotropic response of perfused rat hearts to phenylephrine and other adrenergic amines	Relationship between cyclic ampoule and perfused rat heart inotropic response to phenylephrine and d' other adrenergic amines.
11	cardia venous blood flow in atrial pacing versus exercise induced angina pectoris	Atrial stimulation versus exercise sarcophagous venous blood flow induced angina of the chest.
11	human intramyocardial oxygen detected through chronic polarographic electrodes	Intra-myocardial oxygen (IMO), detected by the use of chronic polarographic electrodes.
11	alkaline isomerization of ferricytochrome c identification of the lysine ligand	Ferricytochrome c alkaline isomerization Identification of the ligand lysine ligand.
11	metabolic stability of the protein synthesizing system of the myocardium in compensatory cardiac hyperfunction in actinomycin d block of rna synthesis	Metabolic stability of rat myocardial protein synthesis system; compensatory cardiac hyperfunction; actinomycin blocking rna synthesis.
11	lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the myocardium and liver of rabbits with thyrotoxicosis	Lactate dehydrogenase and malate dehydrogenase enzymes in the liver and myocardium of thyrotoxicosis-affected rabbits.
11	citrate content in the myocardium and liver of rabbits in starvation and thyrotoxicosis	Contents of citrate in rabbit myocardium and rabbit liver in fasting and thyrotoxicosis.
11	ischemia in aortic stenosis hemodynamic prediction	Ischemia in aortic stenosis, hemodynamic prediction, hemodynamic prediction.
11	effects of hypoxemia on the extent of myocardial necrosis after experimental coronary occlusion	Effects of hypoxemia on myocardial necrosis and myocardial necrosis following coronary occlusion.
11	continuous measurement of myocardial oxygen consumption mvo2 and hemodynamic response during transapical left ventricular bypass talvb	Ongoing measurement of mvo2 myocardial oxygen consumption and hemodynamic response during left ventricular transapical bypass surgery.
11	thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura in four siblings	Dissolve, D.A. and D.A. Benson.
11	relations between development of the capillary wall and myoarchitecture of the rat heart	Relationship between capillary wall development and rat-heart myoarchitecture.
11	a new method for determination of postmortem left ventricular volumes clinico pathologic correlations	A new method to determine the ventricular correlations of left ventricular ventricular volumes post-mortem.
11	effects of myocardial hypoxia and ischemia on myocardial scintigraphy	The Effects of Apos; Hypoxia and Apos; Myocardial Ischemia on Myocardial Scintigraphy.
11	inotropic and intracellular acid base changes during metabolic acidosis	The acidic bases, both intracellular and inotropic, change during the course of metabolic acidosis.
11	effects of physical training on cardiac myosin atpase activity	It's a good thing you're not the only one who's worried about it.
11	survival of cardiac xenografts effect of antithymocyte serum and enhancing heteroantiserum	Survival of cardiac xenografts, the effects of anti-thymocyte and anti-thymocyte serum, and increased serum weight; hetero-antiserum.
11	the effects of long term administration of 3h digoxin to the pregnant ewe upon the cardiovascular hemodynamics of the fetal lamb	Apos effects; 3 h long-term administration of digoxin to pregnant sheep on apos; cardiovascular apos hemodynamics; fetal lamb.
11	adenosine metabolism in cultured chick embryo heart cells	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of metabolism.
11	the nuclear membranes in hypertrophied human cardiac muscle cells	Nuclear membranes in enlarged human cardiac muscle cells.
11	functional architecture of the ligamentum arteriosum in adults	Functional architectures of adult ligamentum arteriosum.
11	arteriopathia calcificans infantum	M.I.A.
11	mitochondrial respiration in the ventricular myocardium and in the white and deep red myotomal muscles of juvenile tuna fish thunnus thynnus l	Mitochondrial myocardial respiration and dark red and white myotome muscles of juvenile thunnus thynnus l.
11	acid base changes and excitation contraction coupling in rabbit myocardium i effects on isometric tension development at different contraction frequencies	Variations in acid bases and coupling of contraction d' excitation in the rabbit myocardium have effects on the development of isometric tension at different frequencies of contraction.
11	acid base changes and excitation contraction coupling in rabbit myocardium ii effects on resting membrane potential action potential characteristics and propagation velocity	Acid base changes and contraction coupling; rabbit myocardial excitation ii effects on the characteristics of the d&apos potential; resting membrane potential action and propagation rate.
11	effects of myocardial infarction on adrenergic nerves of the rat heart muscle a histochemical study	Apos effects; myocardial infarction on rat cardiac muscle adrenergic nerves, histochemical study.
11	a mitochondrial monocarboxylate transporter in rat liver and heart and its possible function in cell control	A rat liver and heart mitochondrial monocarboxylate transporter and its possible role in cellular control.
11	the mitochondrial pyruvate carrier kinetics and specificity for substrates and inhibitors	Kinetics and substrate and inhibitor specificity of mitochondrial pyruvate carriers.
11	toxicology of epidithio dioxopiperazines 1 studies on toxicity of cyclosarcosylsarcosineepitetrasulfide in guinea pigs and rats	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
11	effects of an abdominal left ventricular assist device on myocardial oxygen supply demand ratios in normally perfused and ischemic bovine myocardium	Dosage effects; left ventricular assistance on appetite reports; ischemic and normally perfused bovine myocardial myocardial myocardial myocardial myocardial myocardium.
11	aortic bacterial endarteritis	Aortic endarteritis.
11	single coronary artery with myocardial infarction and av block	A single coronary artery with an infarction of the myocardium and a bblock.
11	basic fuchsin picric acid method to detect acute myocardial ischemia an experimental study in swine	Baseline method for detection of apos; fuchsine picric acid; acute myocardial ischemia, swine experimental study.
11	experimental shwartzman phenomenon in the heart muscle	Shwartzman experimental in cardiac muscle.
11	experimental revascularization of acute myocardial infarct	Acute infarction of the myocardium.
11	changes in the specific activity and content of free nucleotides and polyamines of the infarct and pre infarct area of the revascularized dog heart	Changes in apo; free nucleotide and polyamine content and specific activity; infarct and pre @-@infarct region of revascularized dog heart.
11	the mitotic division of cardiac muscle cells	Cardiac muscle cell mitotic division.
11	histoenzymatic characteristics of fibroblasts during organization of myocardial micronecroses	Histoenzymatic fibroblast characteristics during apos; myocardial micronecrosis organization.
11	morphogenesis of coronarosclerosis in rheumatism	Coronary-sclerosis morphogenesis in rheumatism.
11	occurrence of coronary ostial stenosis in a necropsy series of myocardial infarction sudden death and violent death	Coronary osteal stenosis in a series of necropsies of sudden and violent myocardial infarction.
11	idiopathic giant cell myocarditis a distinctive clinico pathological entity	Giant-cell idiopathic myocarditis is a clinically distinct entity-pathological.
11	the role of protein and lipids in stabilizing the activity of bovine heart succinate dehydrogenase	The Role of Proteins and Lipids in Stabilizing Beef Heart Succinate Dehydrogenase Activity.
11	surface properties of monomolecular films of oxidized and reduced cytochrome c and f	Surface properties of monomolecular cytochrome c and cytochrome f films oxidized and reduced.
11	kinetic and equilibrium studies of the ligand binding reactions of eight electrophoretic components of sperm whale ferrimyoglobin	Kinetic and d&apos studies; ligand binding equilibrium of eight electrophoretic sperm whale ferrimyoglobin components.
11	ballistocardiographic and electrocardiographic changes in men working with lead	A review of the results of a randomized controlled trial of a randomized controlled trial.
11	contractility and ultrastructure of cardiac muscle of guinea pigs treated with diphtheria toxin	Cardiac muscle contractility and apos; ultrastructure of diphtheria toxin treated guinea pigs.
11	interaction between spin labeled acyl coenzyme a and the mitochondrial adenosine diphosphate carrier	Spin-labeled acyl coenzyme interaction with the mitochondrial transporter of l' adenosine diphosphate.
11	isothiocyanates a new class of uncouplers	Isothiocyanate a new uncoupler class.
11	cytochemical localization of lysosomal enzyme activity in normal and ischemic dog myocardium	Cytochemical localization of the apos; lysosomal enzymatic activity in the normal and ischemic myocardium of the dog.
11	alkali induced reduction of the beta cytochromes in purified complex iii from beef heart mitochondria	Alkali induced beta cytochrome reduction in the purified iii complex of bovine heart mitochondria.
11	the activation of short chain fatty acids by the soluble fraction of guinea pig heart and liver mitochondria the search for a distinct propionyl coa synthetase	L' guinea pig liver and heart mitochondrial soluble fraction activation of short chain fatty acids seeks a distinct propionyl coa synthetase.
11	colloidal lanthanum as a marker for impaired plasma membrane permeability in ischemic dog myocardium	Lanthanum colloidal as a marker of l' alteration of the permeability of plasma membranes in the ischemic myocardium of the dog.
11	mitochondrial permeability to chloride ion	In vitro fertilization is the process of fertilization.
11	prolyl hydroxylase and collagen metabolism after experimental mycardial infarction	Department of National Health and Welfare.
11	influence of pituitary growth hormone on dna synthesis in rat tissues	Influence of apo; pituitary growth hormone (PGH) on apo synthesis; DNA in rat tissue.
11	uptake of adenosine by dispersed chich embryonic cardiac cells	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - A system of cells that can be used to control the spread of the disease.
11	left anterior hemiblock masking inferior myocardial infarction	He's got an anterior hemibloc masking an infarction of the lower myocardium.
11	a comparison of concentrations of lead in human tissues	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
11	on the application of affinity chromatography to turnover studies on the lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes	On the basis of these results, it is concluded that there are no significant differences between the two types of isoenzymes.
11	studies on the mechanism of the inhibitory effects of erucylcarnitine in rat heart mitochondria	Studies investigating the mechanism of inhibitory effects of erucylcarnitine on rat heart mitochondria.
11	effect of decapitation and acth on somatic development of the rabbit fetus	Effect of decapitation and apos on fetal rabbit somatic development.
11	fetal and maternal lesions in pregnant ewes ingesting locoweed astragalus lentiginosus	Fetal and maternal injury in gravid sheep consuming localized astragal lenginosus.
11	experimentally induced sarcocystis infection in calves pathology	Sarcocystis infection induced in calf pathology.
11	molecular and biological studies on cardiac muscle calcium binding protein tn c	Biological and molecular studies of the calcium-binding protein tn c in cardiac muscle.
11	tissue water content and nuclear magnetic resonance in normal and tumor tissues	Nuclear magnetic resonance and tissue water content in normal and tumour tissues.
11	relationship of intramyocardial oxygen tension and epicardial st segment changes following acute coronary artery ligation effects of coronary perfusion pressure	Relationship between coronary blood pressure; intramyocardial oxygen and changes in the epicardial st segment as a result of acute coronary perfusion effects on coronary artery ligation.
11	myocardial lesions induced by prolonged alcohol feeding in rhesus monkeys	Injury to the cervix; prolonged ingestion of drugs; alcohol in the rhesus monkeys.
11	mitochondria from the lamprey lampetra fluviatilis oxidative phosphorylation and related processes	Lamprey fluviatilis phosphorylation oxidative and related processes.
11	variations in the lipid and fatty acid composition of cardiac tissue during perfusion of hearts isolated from rats on a high colza oil diet	Changes in cardiac lipid and fatty acid composition during perfusion of isolated hearts from rats fed a diet high in rapeseed oil.
11	cardiac specific creatine phosphokinase isoenzyme in the diagnosis of acute myocardial infarction	Cardiac creatine phosphokinase enzyme specific for acute myocardial infarction.
11	ultrastructure development and nucleic acid of the s virus from the decapod crustacea macropipus depurator l	In addition, the virus can be used as an anti-viral agent to control the spread of the virus.
11	interaction between cyclic adenosine monophosphate and cyclic gunaosine monophosphate in guinea pig ventricular myocardium	Interaction between d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine and cyclic gunaosin monophosphate in ventricular myocardium of guinea pig.
11	myocardial damage in combined valvular and coronary bypass surgery	Combined coronary and valve bypass surgery.
11	histochemical and structural changes in human myocardial cells after cardiopulmonary bypass	Histochemical and structural changes in the human myocardial cells following cardiopulmonary bypass.
11	blood flow and vasoactive drug effects in internal mammary and venous bypass grafts	Effect of Vasoactive Drugs and Blood Flow on Transplantation of Venous Bypass and Internal Breast Bypass.
11	improved angina threshold and coronary reserve following direct myocardial revascularization	Dapos threshold; angina and coronary reserve improved following direct myocardial revascularization.
11	reduction of infarct size by oxygen inhalation following acute coronary occlusion	Acute coronary occlusion; Acute coronary occlusion; Acute coronary occlusion.
11	hemodynamic and metabolic effects of sodium nitroprusside on the performance and metabolism of regional ischemic myocardium	Hemodynamic and metabolic effects of sodium nitroprusside (SNO) on regional ischemic myocardial performance and metabolism.
11	morphologic correlates of technetium 99m stannous pyrophosphate imaging of acute myocardial infarcts in dogs	Technetium 99m stannous pyrophosphate imaging of myocardial infarctus in dogs.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xiv bacterial arteritis in whipple s disease	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
11	depolarization induced movement of mn 2 cations across the cell membrane in the guinea pig myocardium	Depolarization induced the movement of mn 2 cations across the guinea pig cell membrane.
11	the effect of cold air inhalation on again pectoris and myocardial oxygen supply	It is not possible to determine the cause of death due to air pollution.
11	pathology of stable and unstable angina pectoris	Lapos disease; stable unstable angina.
11	compensatory changes of the distal coronary vascular bed during progressive coronary constriction	Compensatory changes in the distal coronary vascular bed during progressive constriction.
11	de subitaneis mortibus xii asymmetrical hypertrophy of the heart	Subtanus mortibus xii Asymmetrical Hypertrophy of the Heart.
11	the preparation of crystalline human l lactate nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide oxidoreductase isoenzyme 1 involvoing preparative polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Preparation of the human lactate isoenzyme 1 nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide crystalline oxidoreductase by preparative polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
11	cardiac involvement in whipple s disease	Cardiac Implication in Whipple Disease.
11	hypertensive pulmonary vascular disease associated with patent ductus arteriosus primary or secondary	Primary or secondary arterial canal-associated hypertensive pulmonary vascular disease.
11	evaluation of precordial electrocardiographic mapping as a means of assessing changes in myocardial ischemic injury	Evaluation of Precordial Electrocardiographic Mapping as a Means of Assessing Changes in Myocardial Ischemic Damage.
11	rapid separation of plasma creatine kinase isoenzymes by batch adsorption on glass beads	Rapid separation of isoenzymes from plasma creatine kinase by batch adsorption to glass beads.
11	detection of cardiac specific creatine kinase isoenzyme in sera with normal or slightly increased total creatine kinase activity	The detection of apos; isoenzyme of specific cardiac creatine kinase in sera of which the total creatine kinase activity is normal or slightly increased.
11	simultaneous separation of serum creatine kinase and lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes by ion exchange column chromatography	Simultaneous separation of lactate dehydrogenase and serum creatine kinase isoenzymes by d&apos ion exchange column chromatography.
11	malignant mesenchymoma of the heart	Heart malignant mesenchymoma.
11	myocardial sarcoidosis pathological studies on 7 autopsy cases with particular reference to histological variations	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been carried out in the area of myocardial disease.
11	relationship between heart weight and the cross sectional area of the coronary ostia	The degree to which an individual's body is affected by a particular disease or disease.
11	flavoxate a potent phosphodiesterase inhibitor	Flavoxate, potent inhibitor of phosphodiesterase.
11	myocarditis induced by coxsackie b3 virus in mature mice	Coxsackie b3 virus-induced myocarditis in the mature mouse.
11	studies elucidating the importance of thymus on the degree of increased blood pressure and vascular disease in renal hypertensive mice a comparison of the disease in nude and haired littermates	Studies to elucidate apo; thymus importance on apo level; increase in blood pressure and vascular disease in renal hypertensive mice; comparison of disease in naked and naked littermates.
11	characterization of the metabolism of exogenous cyclic amp by perfused rat heart and incubated prepubertal rat ovary	Characterization of metabolism of l' exogenous cyclic ampoule by perfused rat heart and l' ovary of prepubertal rat incubated.
11	inhibition of the soluble adenosine triphosphatase from mitochondria by adenylyl imidodiphosphate	Apos inhibition; soluble mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase with apos; imidodiphosphate adenylyl.
11	postnatal persistence of spongy myocardium with embryonic blood supply	Dietary Reference Intakes, D.R. and D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes.
11	coronary hemodynamics during positive g z acceleration	Coronary hemodynamics (CHH) during apo; g-positive acceleration.
11	echocardiographic findings of ventricular septal rupture in acute myocardial infarction	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
11	consequences of coronary arterial occlusion on remote myocardium effects of occlusion and reperfusion	Consequences of Apos; Coronary Artery Occlusion on Remote Myocardial Effects of Apos; Occlusion and Reperfusion.
11	myocardial revascularization after acute infarction	Revascularization of myocardium following acute myocardial infarction.
11	multiple cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activities from rat tissues and occurrence of a calcium plus magnesium ion dependent phosphodiesterase and its protein activator	The study found that the presence of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) was associated with the presence of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs) in rats.
11	the calcium paradox a reaffirmation	The calcium-containing paradox is a reaffirmation.
11	voltage clamp simulation	Voltage simulation, clamp.
11	modification of the cardiostimulatory and coronary dilator effect of isopreenaline caused by etafenone	Disturbance of the apos; cardiostimulatory and coronary dilator effect of the apos; isopreenalin caused by the apos; stamenone.
11	electron microscopical study of myocardial biopsy material in congenital heart block	Electron microscopic study of congenital heart block myocardial biopsy material.
11	effects of phentolamine on coronary blood flow in patients with recent myocardial infarction	Effects of phentolamine on coronary blood flow in patients who have suffered a recent MI.
11	clinical presentation of a myocardial rhabdomyosarcoma	Myocardial rhabdomyosarcoma clinical presentation.
11	systemic and coronary haemodynamic effects of ketamine in intact anaesthetized and unanaesthetized dogs	Ketamine systemic and coronary hemodynamic effects in intact anesthetized and unanesthetized dogs.
11	case report fetal cardiac failure resulting from endocardial fibroelastosis	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
11	the response of the right ventricle to experimentally induced pulmonary artery obstruction	The right ventricular response to an experimental pulmonary artery blockage.
11	effects of 5 3 tert butylamino 2 hydroxy propoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril hydrochloride opc 1085 on coronary circulation and myocardial metabolism	Effects of 5 tert hydrochloride @-@butylamino 2 hydroxypropoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril opc 1085 on the coronary circulation and myocardial metabolism.
11	the two step reversible denaturation of lactate dehydrogenase at low ph	Reversible two-step lactate dehydrogenase low-phase denaturation.
11	substrate activity of structural analogs of isocitrate for isocitrate dehydrogenases from bovine heart	Beef heart structural analog substrate isocitrate isocitrate isocitrate dehydrogenases.
11	pathologic anatomy of the cardiomyopathies idiopathic dilated and hypertrophic types infiltrative types and endomyocardial disease with and without eosinophilia	Pathological anatomy of dilated idiopathic and hypertrophic cardiomyopathies, both infiltrating and endomyocardial, with and without eosinophilia.
11	assay of cardiotonic steroids based on a 2 compartment model	Two-compartment model-based cardio-steroid test.
11	effect of l dopa administration to fine structures of brain heart and kidney in rats with special reference to appearance of microvascular thrombosis and its pathological significance	Effect of dopa on the fine structures of the cerebral heart and the kidney in rats, especially in rats; appearance of apos; a microvascular thrombosis and its pathological importance.
11	the crystal structure of bonito katsuo ferrocytochrome c at 2 3 a resolution ii structure and function	Bonito katsuo ferrocytochrome c 2a resolution crystal structure ii structure and function.
11	effect of eltroxine and neomercazol on monoamine oxidase from rat tissues	Effect of Eltoxin and Neomercazol on Monoamine Oxidase in Rat Tissues.
11	regulation of postocclusive hyperemia by endogenously synthesized prostaglandins in the dog heart	The regulation of l' post-hyperemia-occlusive by endogenously synthesized canine-core prostaglandins.
11	paramyxovirus avian cell relationship discrepant impact of 6 azauridine on virus production by susceptible and less susceptible cells	Relationship between paramyxovirus avian cells and l' divergent impact of 6 azauridine on the production of virus by susceptible and less susceptible cells.
11	effectiveness of prostaglandin e1 and procarbazine hydrochloride in prolonging the survival of vascularized cardiac hamster to rat xenograft	L' prostaglandin e1 and procarbazine hydrochloride efficacy in prolonging survival of apos; a cardiac hamster vascularized to a rat xenograft.
11	distribution of the action of creatine kinase amp aminohydrolase and atpase and absorption of ca n microsomal fractions of skeletal muscles	Distribution of apos; action of amp aminohydrolase creatine kinase and apos; skeletal muscle microsomal fraction apase and absorption.
11	effect of pyrogenes on the activity and isoenzyne spectrum of lactate dehydrogenase in tissues and blood serum of guinea pigs	Effect of pyrogens on guinea pig tissue and serum lactate dehydrogenase activity and isoenzyn spectrum.
11	failure of dietary erucic acid to impair oxidative capacity or apt production of rat heart mitochondria isolated under controlled conditions	Failure of the apo; dietary erucic acid to alter the oxidative capacity or production of isolated rat heart mitochondria under controlled conditions.
11	the effect of sulphide on cytochrome aa3 isosteric and allosteric shifts of the reduced alpha peak	L' effect of sulfide on isosteric and allosteric displacements of the reduced cytochrome aa3 alpha-peak.
11	experimentally induced vitamin e selenium deficiency in the growing dog	Experimental induction of dapos; a deficiency of selenium and vitamin E in growing dogs.
11	gas liquid chromatography of non esterified fatty acids of the rat myocardium	Rat myocardial nonesterified fatty acid liquid chromatography.
11	oxidation of erucic acid and erucyl coa by isolated rat heart mitochondria comparison to oleic acid	Apos oxidation; erucic acid and apos; erucyl coa compared with mitochondria isolated from rat heart to apos; oleic acid.
11	reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent lipid peroxidation by beef heart submitochondrial particles	Reduction of the dinucleotide-dependent nicotinamide adenine phosphate-dependent lipid peroxidation by the bovine heart mitochondrial particles.
11	fluorimetric and spectrophotometric studies of dpn linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine heart properties of tyrosyl and tryptophyl residues	Fluorimetric and spectrophotometric studies of the dpn-linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from the bovine cardiac properties of tyrosyl and tryptophyl residues.
11	photoreduction of cytochrome c1	Cytochrome c1 photoreduction.
11	identification of essential arginyl residues in cytoplasmic malate dehydrogenase with butanedione	Identification of essential arginyl residues in the cytoplasmic malate dehydrogenase (MSD) with butanedione.
11	alpha methylisocitrate a selective inhibitor of tpn linked isocitrate dehydrogenase from bovine heart and rat liver	L' alpha methylisocitrate is a selective inhibitor of the tpn-linked isocitrate dehydrogenase of beef heart and rat liver.
11	apparent auricular paralysis and disorders of auriculo ventricular conduction anatomo clinical study	Apparent atrial paralysis and anatomo atrial ventricular conduction disorder clinical study.
11	14 cases of constrictive endocardial fibrosis or endomyocardial fibrosis	Constrictive endocardial fibrosis or endomyocardial fibrosis.
11	papyraceous right ventricle of the adult apropos of an anatom clinical case observed in a man suffering from spondylo epiphyseal dysplasia	In addition to the above, there is also a clinical case of anatomy seen in a man with spondylo-epiphyseal dysplasia.
11	interaction of adenine nucleotides with multiple binding sites on beef heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase	Interaction of apo nucleotides; adenine with multiple apo-binding sites; bovine heart mitochondrial adenosine triphosphatase.
11	guanosine triphosphate binding sites in solubilized myocardium relation to adenylate cyclase activity	The binding sites of guanosine triphosphate in the solubilized myocardium are bound to l' activity of l' adenylate cyclase.
11	the steady state concentrations of coenzyme a sh and coenzyme a thioester citrate and isocitrate during tricarboxylate cycle oxidations in rabbit heart mitochondria	Citation and isocitrate coenzyme a sh and isocitrate coenzyme equilibrium during tricarboxylic ring oxidations in rabbit heart mitochondria.
11	ion transport and respiratory control in vesicles formed from reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide coenzyme q reductase and phospholipids	Ion transport and respiratory control in the vesicles are formed by reduction of coenzyme q reductase nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and phospholipids.
11	comparative evaluation of 2 methods for the determination of pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in tissues in avitaminosis b 1 induced by various methods	Comparative evaluation of 2 apo determination methods; apo tissue pyruvate dehydrogenase activity; b1 avitaminosis induced by various methods.
11	freeze fracturing and freeze etching of cardiac myosin filaments	Fracture by freezing and engraving by freezing of the heart's myosin strands.
11	phosphorylation of a 22 000 dalton component of the cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum by adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Apos phosphorylation, a 22,000-dalton cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum component by apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate-protein kinase dependent.
11	functional intermediates in the reaction of membrane bound cytochrome oxidase with oxygen	Functional intermediates in membrane-bound cytochrome oxidase reaction with oxygen.
11	control of pyruvate dehydrogenase activity in intact cardiac mitochondria regulation of the inactivation and activation of the dehydrogenase	Control of apo; activity of pyruvate dehydrogenase in intact cardiac mitochondrial regulation of apo; inactivation and apo; activation of dehydrogenase.
11	effect of acetylcholine on changes in contractility heart rate and phosphorylase activity produced by isoprenaline salbutamol and amino phylline in the perfused guinea pig heart	Effect of l' acetylcholine on contractile heart rate changes and l' L&apos-induced phosphorylase activity; isoprenaline salbutamol and l' amino-phylline in guinea pig perfused heart.
11	myocardial failure with altered response to adrenaline in endotoxin shock	Myocardial failure with alteration of the response to epos; adrenaline during endotoxic shock.
11	oxidation of nadph by submitochondrial particles from beef heart in complete absence of transhydrogenase activity from nadph to nad	L' nadph oxidation by bovine heart mitochondrial-particles in complete absence of l' nadph to nad transhydrogenase activity.
11	the genetics and developmental regulation of l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Genetics and regulation of glycerol 3 -phosphate dehydrogenase development.
11	in vivo myocardial cell ph in the dog response to ischemia and infusion of alkali	In addition, it is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of the results of other studies.
11	induced ischemic cardiac arrest clinical and experimental results with magnesium aspartate procaine solution cardioplegin	Ischemic induced cardiac arrest and clinical and investigational results with magnesium cardioplegin procaine aspartate solution.
11	divalent ions and myocardial function during cardiopulmonary by pass cpb changes of total calcium ionized calcium and magnesium in plasma	Divalent ions and cardiopulmonary myocardial function pass through cpb changes in total ionized calcium and magnesium in the plasma.
11	coronary circulation and myocardial oxygen consumption after extracorporeal circulation and after cardioplegic arrest	Cardiovascular System (CMS) - A system of procedures for the diagnosis and treatment of cardiovascular diseases.
11	anoxic cardiac arrest its effect on myocardial mitochondrial metabolism	Anoxic cardiac arrest, its effect on mitochondrial myocardial metabolism.
11	mobility of normal and virus transformed cells in cellular aggregates	Virus-transformed and normal cell motility in cell aggregates.
11	desmosterol accumulation in rats with experimental myotonia	L' accumulation of desmosterols in experimental myotonic rats.
11	coronary disease ii analysis of diastolic pressure volume correlations and left ventricular elasticity in 110 patients	Coronary heart disease ii analyses correlations between the volume of diastolic pressure and the elasticity of the left ventricle in 110 patients.
11	consumption of classical complement components by heart subcellular membranes in vitro and in patients after acute myocardial infarction	Consumption of traditional complement components by subcellular membranes of the heart in vitro and in patients following acute myocardial infarction.
11	effect of collateral flow on epicardial and endocardial lysosomal hydrolases in acute myocardial ischemia	Effect of Collateral Flow on Lysosomal Lysosomal HCl; Epicardium and Apos; Endocardium in Acute Myocardial Ischemia.
11	catecholamine binding to plasma membrane enriched fractions of heart and skeletal muscle	Plasma membrane binding of catecholamines enriched the skeletal muscle and heart fractions.
11	the mechanism of action of bencyclane on smooth musculature	The dapos mechanism; bencyclane action on smooth musculature.
11	the effect of a combination of 1 4 hydroxyphenyl 2 methyl aminopropanol 1 hydrochloride with a nucleotide containing heart muscle extract on the heart and circulatory system of the dog	The apo effect; a combination of 14 hydroxyphenyl 2 methyl aminopropanol 1 hydrochloride and d' a cardiac muscle extract nucleotide on the dog's heart and circulatory system.
11	a study of the effects of propranolol and or k 1366 on the distribution of rb86 clearance in the canine heart under selective coronary hypotension	A study of the effects of propranolol or k 1366 on rb86 clearance distribution in dog heart undergoing selective coronary hypotension.
11	the effect of oxyfedrine on cardiac performance in coronary patients tests using electrocardiographic and metabolic parameters in atrial stimulation	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Public Health Agency of Canada.
11	31 p nuclear magnetic resonance studies of the interaction of pyridine nucleotide coenzymes with dehydrogenases	Nuclear magnetic resonance studies, pyridine nucleotide coenzyme interaction with dehydrogenases.
11	characterization of autoantigenic sites on isolated dog heart mitochondria	Characterization of antigenic auto-sites on isolated mitochondria of the dog heart.
11	superoxide radicals and hydrogen peroxide formation in mitochondria from normal and neoplastic tissues	In addition, there are a number of other compounds that are considered to be carcinogenic in nature.
11	isozymes of rat amp deaminase	Rat ampamidase.
11	the coating of mouse myocardial cells a cytochemical electron microscopical study	The coating of myocardial cells from mice was studied by cytochemical electron microscopy.
11	acetoacetate coenzyme a transferase activity in rat hepatomas	Bacteria that have been found to be carcinogenic to humans.
11	the role of myocardial biopsy in cardiac diagnosis	The role of myocardial biopsy in determining the outcome of heart disease.
11	the ultracytochemical demonstration of a formaldehyde resistant dehydrogenase of leuco nitroxyl analogues	The results of the study are presented to the Canadian Environmental Protection Agency (CEPA) for its consideration.
11	the membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cell of munida tenuimana g o sars crustacea decapoda	Membrane systems of cardiac muscle cells of munida tenuimana g o sars crustacea decapoda.
11	cardiac histamine ouabain interaction potentiation by ouabain of the arrhythmogenic effects of histamine	Cardiac ouabain-induced potentiation of etapos; histamine mediated by ouabain mediated histamine.
11	anatomical and neurohistological observations on the heart of the spiny lizard uromastix hardwickii	Anatomical and neurohistological observations of the Spiny Lizard (Uromastix hardwickii) heart.
11	myocardial uptake of labeled oleic and linoleic acids	Myocardial uptake of both labelled linoleic and oleic acids.
11	comparison of the effects of physical exercise cold acclimation and repeated injections of isoprenaline on rat muscle enzymes	Comparison of the effects of apos; cold acclimation to apos; exercise and vomiting; repeated injections of apos; and isoprenaline on the muscle enzymes of the rat.
11	major deficiency in serum lactate dehydrogenase 1 and 2 isoenzymes a possible pathogenesis for angina pectoris with normal coronarography	A major deficiency of serum lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes 1 and 2 could result in the pathogenesis of l' angina pectoris with normal coronary angina.
11	effect of metabolism on the electrical and mechanical activities of the frog atrium	Effect of Metabolism on Electrical and Mechanical Activities of Frog Atrium.
11	control of myocardial oxygen tension by sympathetic coronary vasoconstriction in the dog	Cardiovascular System (CDS) - A system of vasoconstriction and coronary arteries in dogs.
11	reflex parasympathetic coronary vasodilation elicited from cardiac receptors in the dog	Reflex parasympathetic coronary vasodilatation was induced by dog heart receptors.
11	regional differences in myocardial performance in the left ventricle of the dog	Regional Differences in Myocardial Performance of Dog Left Ventricle.
11	analysis of components in a cardiogenic hypertensive chemoreflex	Cardiogenic hypertensive chemoreflex.
11	electrophysiologic and pathologic correlations in two cases of chronic second degree atrioventricular block with left bundle branch block	Electrophysiological and pathological correlations in two chronic second-degree atrioventricular block cases with the left-beam branch block.
11	three dimensional geometry of acutely ischemic myocardium	Acute ischemic myocardial three-dimensional geometry.
11	right ventricular dysfunction detected by gated scintiphotography in patients with acute inferior myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction (AMI) is a type of acute myocardial infarction (AMI) seen in patients with dementia who have a right ventricular dysfunction (RVD) identified by barrier scintiphotography.
11	the pathophysiology of idiopathic mitral valve prolapse	The pathophysiology of the valvular mitral idiopathic prolapse.
11	clinical conference de subitaneis mortibus xiii multifocal purkinije cell tumors of the heart	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
11	erucic acid metabolism by rat heart preparations	Metabolism of the etapos; erucic acid by cardiac preparations of rats.
11	the origin of the elevated activities of creatine kinase and other enzymes in the sera of patients with myxoedema	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
11	diagnosis of cardiac amyloidosis by myocardial biopsy	Diagnosis of apos; cardiac amyloidosis (CHD) by myocardial biopsy.
11	homologs of dopa alpha methyldopa and dopamine as potential cardiovascular drugs	Dopa alpha methyldopa and dopamine counterparts as potential cardiovascular drugs.
11	effects of seven anthracycline antibiotics on electrocardiogram and mitochondrial function of rat hearts	Effect of seven antibiotics on epos, electrocardiogram, and mitochondrial function in rat hearts.
11	genesis of fatty liver and hyperlipemia in the fetal guinea pig	Fetal guinea pig hyperlipidosis.
11	effects of blockade of extraneuronal uptake on responses to isoprenaline in perfused rat heart	Effects of extraneuronal capture blockade on responses to isoprenaline in the perfused rat heart.
11	the steady state activity of succinate dehydrogenase in the presence of opposing effectors 1 the effect of l malate and coqh2 on the enzymic activity	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the conclusion that the effects of chloroform on the liver and liver function are similar to those found in other tissues.
11	congenital left atrial enlargement a case report with special reference to myocardial fine structure	Congenital enlargement of the apos; left atrium, a case-control study focusing on myocardial fine structure.
11	regulatory factors on immunocytolysis of cardiac cells and mesenchymal cells	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of cells.
11	studies on myocarditis in childhood with special reference to the possible role of immunological process and the thymus in the chronicity of the disease	Studies of infantile myocarditis, particularly on the possible role of immunologic processes and thymus in chronic disease.
11	cardiac lesions in collagen disease	Collagen damage to the heart.
11	myocardial transcapillary exchange in the hypertrophied heart of the dog	Myocardial transcapillary exchange in dog hypertrophied heart.
11	effects of mannitol on cardiac ultrastructure and microcirculation following anoxia	Effects of mannitol on apos, cardiac ultrastructure and microcirculation.
11	nutritional effects on heart acetylcholinesterase and butyrocholinesterase activity	Nutritional Effects on Cardiac Apos; Activity; Acetylcholinesterase and Butyrocholinesterase.
11	adriamycin induced cardiac damage in the mouse a small animal model of cardiotoxicity	It was found that adriamycin induced a cardiac injury in mice, an animal model of cardiotoxicity.
11	ultrastructural histogenesis of chicken myocardium	L' Ultrastructural Histogenesis of Chicken Myocardium.
11	problem of increasing the viability of the ischemic myocardium in the light of experimental studies	Increased viability of ischemic myocardium based on experimental studies.
11	effect of heparin on certain indicators of oxidating and energetic processes in experimental endomyocarditis	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
11	effect of large doses of nicotinic acid on certain metabolic processes and contractile function of an intact heart	The effect of high doses of nicotinic acid on certain metabolic processes and on the contractile function of the intact heart.
11	fatty acid and ketone body metabolism in the rat response to diet and exercise	Metabolism of fatty acids and the keto body in the response of the rat to the diet and to the apos; exercise.
11	cardiac structure and function in vitamin b 12 deprived rats	Cardiac structure and function of rats deprived of vitamin b12 were depressed.
11	the pathology of type ii skeletal muscle glycogenosis a light and electron microscopic study	The pathology of glycogenosis in skeletal type II muscles was studied by light and electron microscopy.
11	primary epithelial tumour in the right atrium of the heart and inferior vena cava in nzr gd inbred rats pathology of 18 cases	Primary epithelial tumour in the apos; heart right atrium and inferior vena cava in inbred rats nzr pathology in 18 cases.
11	esterase polymorphism in the adriatic sardine sardina pilchardus walb 1 electrophoretic and biochemical properties of the serum and tissue esterases	Esterase polymorphism in sardine sardine pilchardus walb 1, biochemical and electrophoretic properties of serum and tissue esterases.
11	localization of acetylcholinesterase in granule containing cells of glomus like bodies in pre and postnatal rabbits by electron microscopy	Electron microscopy localized the etapos; acetylcholinesterase in pre- and post-natal rabbit granules containing glomus-like body cells.
11	troponin bound calcium in electron micrographs of myocardial cells as demonstrated by the potassium antimonate technique	Troponin binds calcium in the electron micrographs of myocardial cells, as demonstrated by the technique of potassium antimonate.
11	the membrane systems of the cardiac muscle cell of cirolana borealis lilljeborg crustacea isopoda	Membrane systems of the heart muscle cell of cirolana borealis, lilljeborg crustacea isopoda.
11	effect of vanadium on tissue respiration in organs and on cholesterol metabolism in guinea pigs with experimental atheroclerosis	Effect of vanadium on organ tissue respiration and cholesterol metabolism in guinea pigs with d'aposum; experimental atherosclerosis.
11	myocardial and plasma levels of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphate studies in experimental myocardial ischemia	Plasma and myocardial levels of apos; adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic phosphate in myocardial ischemic and myocardial experimental studies.
11	tricuspid and pulmonary valve atresia with aortopulmonary fistula survival of a patient to 21 years of age	Pulmonary valve atresia and tricuspid surviving aortopulmonary fistula in a 21-year-old patient.
11	effect of albuterol and terbutaline synthetic beta adrenergic stimulants on the cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate system in smooth muscle	Effect of albuterol and terbutaline on the metabolism of adrenergic beta-adrenergic stimulants.
11	torulopsis glabrata endocarditis complicating aortic homograft valve treated with 5 fluorocytosine case report with discussion of antifungal chemotherapy	Torulopsis glabrata endocarditis complexating aortic homograft valve treated with 5 fluorocytosine-containing compounds.
11	lipid overload induced in myocardial cells by vegetable oils observation using electron microscopy	Apos-induced lipid overload in myocardial cells; plant oils were observed by electron microscopy.
11	transmural gradients in ventricular tissue metabolites produced by stopping coronary blood flow in the dog	Transmural gradients in ventricular tissue metabolites are produced by stopping the dog's coronary blood flow.
11	changes in intramyocardial st segment voltage and gas tensions with regional myocardial ischemia in the dog	Changes in gas tension and tension in canine intramyocardial stasis with regional myocardial ischemia.
11	plasma and atrial propranolol after preoperative withdrawal	Plasma and atrial propranolol following preoperative withdrawal.
11	postmortem tissue digoxin concentrations in infants and children	Post- @-@mortem Concentrations of Digoxin in Infants and Children.
11	anatomical pathology of sudden unexpected cardiac death	Sudden and unexpected cardiac death.
11	arteriosclerosis of coronary arteries in sudden unexpected deaths	Unforeseen sudden death causes coronary artery sclerosis.
11	pathology of the myocardium and the conduction system in sudden coronary death	Sudden coronary death is myocardial and conduction system pathology.
11	pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death i organizing thrombosis and acute coronary vessel lesions	Pathology of Atherosclerotic Heart Disease in Sudden Death and Organizing Thrombosis and Acute Coronary Damage.
11	myocardial cell necrosis and sudden death in humans	Myocardial cell necrosis and human sudden death.
11	pathology of atherosclerotic heart disease in sudden death ii the significance of myocardial infarction	Atherosclerotic heart disease is a major cause of sudden death; a major cause of death is myocardial infarction.
11	methodological considerations for the study of sudden cardiac death an autopsy protocol	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre.
11	possible electrophysiological mechanisms for lethal arrhythmias accompanying myocardial ischemia and infarction	Possible electrophysiological mechanisms of lethal arrhythmias associated with ischemia and myocardial infarction.
11	the myofibrillar m band in the cryo section analysis of section thickness	It is not possible to determine the thickness of the sections; it is necessary to determine the thickness of sections.
11	oxidation of succinate in heart brain and kidney mitochondria in hypobaria and hypoxia	L'oxidation de succinate dans la cerveau cardiaque et les mitochondries rénales dans l'apos; hypobarie et l'apos; hypoxia.
11	iron sulfur components of succinate dehydrogenase stoichiometry and kinetic behavior in activated preparations	Iron sulfide succinate dehydrogenase components stoichiometry and kinetic behaviour in activated preparations.
11	mitral insufficiency complicating acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction.
11	effects of intra aortic balloon pumping on experimental acute myocardial ischaemia	Acute myocardial ischemia (Acute myocardial ischemia) - Acute myocardial ischemia.
11	coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to occupational physical activity in male violent deaths	Relationship between coronary atherosclerosis and osteosclerosis; aortic atherosclerosis and osteosclerosis; and work-related physical activity among men who died of violent death.
11	coronary and aortic atherosclerosis in relation to body build factors	Atherosclerosis of the coronary and aortic bones in relation to factors of body construction.
11	effect of anoxia on the excitability of the canine ventricular muscle author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of coronary heart disease.
11	the effect of cardiopulmonary bypass perfusion pressure on myocardial gas tensions in the presence of coronary stenosis	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that coronary artery bypass surgery is associated with coronary artery bypass surgery.
11	a study on the rehabilitation of ischemic heart disease patients the heart rate beta receptor blocking agents and strength duration relationship of exercise	A study of the rehabilitation of patients with ischemic heart disease, heart rate beta-receptor inhibitors (HRBIs) and the relationship between duration of force and exercise.
11	effects of beta blockers on cardiac function and myocardial oxygen consumption in the isolated supported heart preparation of the dog	The effects of beta-blockers on cardiac function and the consumption of myocardial oxygen in the isolated cardiac preparation were supported by the dog.
11	ultrastructural changes of hypertrophied myocardium in severe experimental hypoxia effects of diphosphothiamine and of an antagonist of the vitamin b1 author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
11	contractile myocardial proteins in patients with acquired heart defects	Contractile myocardial protein (CPM) in patients with acquired cardiac malformations.
11	the effect of sulfhydryl reagents on the heart rate and coronary flow of the isolated perfused guinea pig heart	L' effect of sulfhydryl reagents on heart rate and coronary flow in isolated, perfused, guinea pig heart.
11	influence of halothane on calcium movements in isolated heart muscle and in isolated plasma membranes	L' halothane affects calcium movement in isolated cardiac muscle and plasma membranes.
11	changes in cyclic nucleotide metabolism in aorta and heart of neurogenically hypertensive rats possible trigger mechanism of hypertension	Changes in the metabolism of the cyclic nucleotides in the aorta and the heart of neurogenic hypertensive rats could trigger the mechanism of the apos; hypertension.
11	decompression induced bubble formation in salmonids comparison to gas bubble disease	Decompression induced the formation of bubbles in salmonids compared with the disease of gas bubbles.
11	prevention of exercise induced cardiac hypertrophy in rats by chemical sympathectomy guanethidine treatment	Exercise prevention induced cardiac hypertrophy in rats by guanethidine chemical treatment with sympathectomy.
11	hypoxia of high altitudes as a theoretical method of treatment of angina pectoris influence on cardiac metabolism	Cardiac arteries are the most common type of arterial arterial arterial arterial arterial arterial arterial arteries.
11	studies on the therapeutic use of mercurascar part iii influence of mercurascan on some metabolic changes in experimental myocardial ischaemia in dogs section i energetic and ionic metabolism	Studies on os; therapeutic use of part iii mercurascar influences mercurascan on metabolic changes in the experimental myocardial ischemia in dogs section i energy and ion metabolism.
11	phosphoprotein phosphatase catalyzed dephosphorylation of the 22 000 dalton phosphoprotein of cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum	Phosphoprotein phosphatase catalyzes phosphoprotein dephosphorylation of 22,000 daltons from the cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum.
11	oppositional effects of acetylcholine and isoproterenol on isometric tension and cyclic nucleotide concentrations in rabbit atria	Adverse effects of acetylcholine and isoproterenol on isometric tension and rabbit atrial cyclic nucleotide concentrations.
11	comparison of the reaction of cultured smooth and cardiac muscle cells and fibroblasts to specific antibodies to myosin	Comparison of the response of the fibroblasts and cultured cardiac and smooth muscle cells to myosin-specific antibodies.
11	ruptured coronary aneurysm and valvulitis in an infant with polyarteritis nodosa	Coronary aneurysm and valvulitis in a nodosa polyarteritis infant.
11	ways of drug action on the restorative processes in the myocardium in experimental myocardial infarct	Modes of action of drugs on myocardial restoration processes in experimental myocardial infarction.
11	morphometry and autoradiography of early hypertrophic changes in the ventricular myocardium of adult rat a light microscopic study	Morphometry and autoradiography of early hypertrophic changes in adult rat ventricular myocardium.
11	a controlled sequential morphologic study of hyperacute cardiac allograft rejection in the rat	A sequential morphological study of cardiac hyperacute allograft (hyperacute cardiac allograft) rejection in rats.
11	myocardial cell damage during experimental infective endocarditis	Injury to myocardial cells during the course of the apos; experimental infectious endocarditis.
11	myocardium of hypothermic rats with and without administration of dextran electrocardiographic and electron microscopic studies	Hypothermic rat myocardium with and without dextran administration, electrocardiographic studies and electron microscopy.
11	determination of intracapillary hbo2 saturation with a cryo microphotometric method applied to the rabbit myocardium author s transl	Determination of intracapillary hbo2 saturation at apos; assistance from a cryo-microphotometric method for translating apos; rabbit myocardium.
11	cardiac injuries in aircraft occupants resulting from aircraft accidents	Cardiac injuries sustained by the occupants of aircraft; accidents sustained by the occupants of aircraft.
11	relationship between oxygen tension coronary vasodilation and prostaglandin biosynthesis in the isolated rabbit heart	The relationship between coronary vasodilation of blood pressure and the biosynthesis of prostaglandins in the isolated rabbit heart.
11	non invasive myocardial scanning with thallium 201 basic principles and methods author s transl	Thallium noninvasive myocardial scanner 201 principles and basic methods.
11	raised camp content of striated muscle in experimental chronic renal failure author s transl	This study was conducted in the United States, Canada, the United States, and the United States.
11	comparison between muscle and liver enolases and their behavior during differentiation and growth	Comparison of hepatic and muscle enolases during differentiation and growth.
11	interpreting cardiac catheterization data part 2	Interpretation of Cardiac Catheterization Data Part 2.
11	molecular interactions of adenosine triphosphatase with the mitochondrial membrane as revealed by a spin label study	The molecular interactions of l' adenosine triphosphatase with mitochondrial membrane were revealed by spin-marker analysis.
11	decrease in oxygen affinity of myoglobin by formylation of vinyl groups of heme	Decrease in apo; myoglobin affinity for apo, and oxygen by forming the apo vinyl groups; heme.
11	preparation of a homogeneous soluble d beta hydroxybutyrate apodehydrogenase from mitochondria	D&apos preparation; a homogeneous beta-hydroxybutyrate apodehydrogenase soluble from mitochondria.
11	effect of dietary magnesium levels on cardiac lesions in rats fed a diet rich in rapeseed oil	Effect of dietary magnesium levels on cardiac lesions in rats fed high rapeseed oil.
11	regulation of ribonucleic acid synthesis by polyamines reversal by spermine of inhibition by methylglyoxal bis guanylhydrazone of ribonucleic acid synthesis and histone acetylation in rabbit heart	The regulation of the synthesis of l' reverse polyamine ribonucleic acid by spermine l' inhibition of l&apos synthesis by methylglyoxal bis guanylhydrazone; ribonucleic acid and l' acetylation of histones in rabbit heart.
11	tissue distribution of retinol and its metabolites after administration of double labelled retinol	Tissue distribution of retinol and its metabolites following dosing with doubly labelled retinol.
11	tolerance and resistance of myocardium to anoxia experimental studies	Myocardial tolerance and myocardial resistance to experimental studies on anoxia.
11	resistance and tolerance of the myocardium to ischemia	Ischemia and myocardial resistance and tolerance.
11	inability of angiotensin to stimulate rna synthesis in isolated rat atria 38551	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the toxicity of rna.
11	tolerance of isolated cardiac muscle to hypoxia force frequency interrelationships 38566	Isolated Cardiac Muscle Tolerance at Lapos; Hypoxia Force frequencies 38566 to 38566.
11	the renin angiotensin system in rats made hypertensive by ligation of the kidney poles 38584	The angiotensin renin system in rats became hypertensive by renal ligation 38584.
11	the renin and iso renin angiotensin system in rats with experimental pitutary tumors 38585	The renin system-iso renin-angiotensin in experimental pituitary tumors.
11	ischemia tolerance following cardioplegic arrest in human patients and in experimental animals	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of coronary heart disease.
11	a diurnal rhythm of incorporation of l 3h leucine in myocardium of the rat	Diurnal rhythm of apos; leucine incorporation in rat myocardium.
11	lysosomal and neutral hydrolase activity during the regression of cardiac hypertrophy	Neutral lysosomal hydrolase activity during stroke regression; cardiac hypertrophy.
11	beta hydroxy fatty acid production during fatty acid oxidation by heart mitochondria	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the toxicity of ethylene oxide to human health.
11	inhibited adenine nucleotide translocation in mitochondria isolated from ishcemic myocardium	The translocation of the nucleotides of l' adenine was inhibited in isolated mitochondria of the ishcemic myocardium.
11	energy metabolism in the infarcted cardiac muscle the interaction of contractile protein and mitochondria	Energy metabolism in infarcted cardiac muscle; mitochondrial-contractile protein interaction.
11	correlation between biochemical and contractile changes after myocardial ischemia and revascularization	Correlation between contractile and biochemical changes following revascularization and myocardial ischemia.
11	release of 14c adenosine from the guinea pig heart during autoregulation	It is not possible to determine the cause of the death of the patient.
11	creatine release from the isolated perfused rat heart	Isolated perfused rat heart creatine release.
11	uptake and phosphorylation of 14c creatine by mouse cardiac muscle in vivo	The uptake and phosphorylation of creatine 14c by the cardiac muscle of mice in vivo.
11	myocardial high energy phosphates in experimental thyrotoxicosis in guinea pigs	A study of the effects of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons on the metabolism of ethylene oxide.
11	utilization of endogenous lipids and glycogen in the perfused rat heart effects of hypoxia and epinephrine	Use of endogenous glycogen and lipid in perfused rat cardiac effects of apos; hypoxia and apos; epinephrine.
11	transmural gradients in the ischemic dog left ventricle metabolism of endogenous triglycerides and glycogen	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch.
11	the uptake of free fatty acid in the rat heart	Absorption of free fatty acids from rat heart.
11	effect on myocardial metabolic pattern of local complete and incomplete ischemia	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of an increased risk of coronary heart disease.
11	early changes in myocardial hypoxia relations among mechanical function ph and intracellular redox states	Early changes in the myocardial hypoxic relationships between the intracellular and ph redox states of mechanical function.
11	inhibition of glycolysis in hearts during ischemic perfusion	Inhibition of heart glycolysis during the ischemic infusion.
11	mitochondrial metabolism in infarcting myocardium	Mitochondrial aposal metabolism; myocardial infarction.
11	erucic acid metabolism by cultured beating heart cells of the postnatal rat	Metabolism of etapos; erucic acid by postnatal rat cultured, beating heart cells.
11	on the formation of hydrogen peroxide and oxygen radicals in heart mitochondria	On hydrogen peroxide and oxygen radical formation in cardiac mitochondria.
11	cytoplasmic and mitochondrial fractions of serum aspartate aminotransferase in the early phase of myocardial infarction	Serum apos cytoplasmic and mitochondrial fractions; serum aspartate aminotransferase in early phase of apos; myocardial infarction.
11	carnitine palmityltransferase activity during myocardial ischemmia and at low ionic strengths	Lapos; low ionic strength carnitine palmityltransferase activity; myocardial ischemia.
11	protein synthesis in cell free systems from totally ischemic rat myocardium	Completely ischemic rat myocardial cell-free systems protein synthesis.
11	attenuation of beta adrenergic cardiac responses in chronically hypoxic rats with right ventricular hypertrophy	Mitigation of beta-adrenergic cardiac responses in right ventricular hypertrophy chronically hypoxic rats.
11	selective control of fibroblast proliferation and its effect on cardiac muscle differentiation in vitro	Selective control of the proliferation of fibroblasts and its effect on differentiation of cardiac muscle in vitro.
11	purification of creatine kinase from beef heart mitochondria	Purification of bovine heart mitochondrial creatine kinase.
11	the effect of sugar phosphates phosphoenolpyruvate and adenylic acid on muscle brain and heart creatine kinases	L' effect of phosphoenolpyruvate and adenylate sugars on muscle heart and brain creatine kinases.
11	hypoxic isolated rat heart hemodynamic and metabolic effects of nitroglycerin	Metabolic and hemodynamic effects of nitroglycerin on isolated, hypoxic rat heart.
11	distribution of lysosome populations in rat cardiac tissue	Distribution of populations of lysosomes in cardiac tissue of the rat.
11	alcoholic cardiomyopathy the effect of ethanol and acetaldehyde on cardiac protein synthesis	Alcoholic cardiomyopathy, effect of apo; ethanol and apo; acetaldehyde on synthesis of cardiac proteins.
11	myocardial cell damage due to ethanol	Injuries to myocardial cells caused by the use of ethanol.
11	hemodynamic metabolic and ultrastructural consequences of hyperosmolal mannitol after myocardial anoxia	Hemodynamic, metabolic, and ultrastructural effects of hyperosmolar mannitol following cardiomyopathic anoxia.
11	phospholipase a and acid lipase activity during release of lysosomal hydrolases	Phospholipase a and l' activity of acid lipase during release of lysosomal hydrolases.
11	the effects of polyamines on cardiac protein biosynthesis	The Effects of Polyamines on Heart Protein Biosynthesis.
11	some properties of rat myocardial ornithine decarboxylase and the in vitro effects of nucleotides	Certain properties of rat myocardial ornithine decarboxylase and nucleotide effects in vitro.
11	the effects of hypoxia hypertrophy and diet on rat myocardial ornithine decarboxylase activity	The Effects of Hypoxic Hypertrophy and Diet on Apos; Apos Activity; Myocardial Ornithine Decarboxylase in Rat.
11	polyamine and nucleoprotein correlations in hypertrophied and perfused heart	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
11	comparative aspects of buffering capacity in muscle	This is a comparison of the ability of the muscles to buffer.
11	congenital rhabdomyoma of the heart	Congenital cardiac renaldomyoma.
11	effects of iproveratril on isolated heart mitochondria	Effects of apos; iproveratril on mitochondria isolated from the heart.
11	thrombolytic therapy and myocardial infarction	Thrombolytics and a myocardial infarction.
11	metabolic and histopathologic changes in arteriosclerotic versus nonarteriosclerotic rats following isoproterenol induced myocardial infarction with superimposed diabetes	Metabolic and histopathological changes in arteriosclerotic rats compared with non-arteriosclerotic rats following an apos myocardial infarction; isoproterenol with apos; diabetes mellitus.
11	myocardial lysis in acute rheumatic fever followed by regeneration of cardiac muscle and origin of aschoff bodies	Myocardial lysis in acute rheumatic fever (RHF) followed by apos; regeneration of heart muscle and liver; origin of aschoff bodies.
11	evaluation of potassium 43 scintillation images during early myocardial ischemia in an animal model	Acute toxicity of chloroform to rats and rats.
11	subendocardial origin of ventricular arrhythmias in 24 hour old experimental myocardial infarction	Origin under-endocardial ventricular arrhythmias in the 24-hour experimental myocardial infarction.
11	streptococcal pancarditis	Cardiac pancarditis.
11	preparation of isolated cells by alkaline dissociation of formalin fixed tissue	Alkaline dissociation of formalin-attached tissue to prepare isolated cells.
11	effects of heparin on lipolytic enzyme activities in vivo and in vitro	Effects of apos; heparin on in vivo and in vitro lipolytic enzyme activities.
11	changes in biochemical properties of myocardial lactate dehydrogenase during exposure of rats to high altitude	Changes in myocardial lactate dehydrogenase biochemical properties during apo; high-elevation exposure of rats.
11	cardiac pathologic findings in patients treated with bone marrow transplantation	Evidence of cardiac pathology in bone marrow transplant patients.
11	regulation by calcium of the proliferation of heart cells from young adult rats	Calcium regulation of young adult rat cardiac cell proliferation.
11	hemorrhagic infarction a reperfusion injury following prolonged myocardial ischemic anoxia	Hemorrhagic infarction, lesion from reperfusion following apos; prolonged ischemic myocardial anoxia.
11	short term effects of docosenoic acid containing oils on rat cardiac lipids colza oil and partially hydrogenated herring oil	Short-term effects of apo; rat heart lipids containing docosenoic acid, rapeseed oil and partially hydrogenated herring oil.
11	a complex of cardiac cytochrome c1 and cytochrome c	Cardiac cytochrome c1 complex with cardiac cytochrome c.
11	comparative 131 cesium scintigraphic and electrocardiographic studies of patients following the acute phase of myocardial infarct	Cesium cesium electrocardiography in post-acute phase patients; myocardial infarction.
11	arrhythmias in inflammatory heart disease author s transl	The Canadian Journal of Infectious Diseases.
11	inotropic action myocardial uptake and subcellular distribution of ouabain digoxin and digitoxin in isolated rat hearts	Inotropic action, subcellular distribution and myocardial uptake of digoxin and digitoxin d' ouabain in isolated rat hearts.
11	the time course of the effects of beta and alpha adrenoceptor stimulation by isoprenaline and methoxamine on the contractile force and camp level of the isolated rabbit papillary muscle	L' temporal evolution of the effects of alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor stimulation by isoprenaline and methoxamine on isolated rabbit muscle contractile force and muscle camp level.
11	radioautographic and cytometric analysis of myocyte growth and myocardial regeneration in rats	Radioautographic and cytometric analysis of rat myocyte growth and myocardial regeneration.
11	the effect of triiodothyronine on myocardial protein kinases	L' myocardial protein kinase effect of triiodothyronine.
11	cardiac tumour in infant	Infant heart tumour.
11	clinico biochemical immunological and morphological assessment of myocardial inflammatory reactions in myocardial necroses	Immunological and clinical morphological evaluation-biochemical of myocardial inflammatory responses in myocardial necrosis.
11	fractional composition and metabolism of proteins and levels of polynucleotides in canine heart in experimental myocardial infarction	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the protein metabolism, protein metabolism and polynucleotide levels in the canine heart during experimental myocardial infarction.
11	the development of intramyocardial haemorrhages or fluidaccumulation in the extracellular space	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
11	functional replacement of the left heart with an intrathoracally implantable ventricular aortic blood pump author s transl	Functional left heart replacement with an intrathoracic implantable ventricular aortic blood pump.
11	the production of cardiac hypertrophy by tri iodothyroacetic acid	Cardiac hypertrophy caused by the presence of triiodothyroacetic acid.
11	effects of reserpine and propranolol on anoxia induced enzyme release from the isolated perfused guinea pig heart	The effects of reserpine and propranolol on the apos; anoxia induce enzyme release from isolated guinea pig perfused heart.
11	comparative histopathological effects of aflatoxin b1 and palmotoxins b0 and g0 on some organs of different strains of the newly hatched chick gallus domesticus	Comparative histopathological effects of l' aflatoxin b1 and palmotoxins b0 and g0 on certain organs of different strains of newly hatched gallus domesticus.
11	influence of biophysical factors on redox processes and biological oxidation 20 tissue temperatures under ultrasonic administration	Biophysical factors influence redox and l&apos processes; biological oxidation 20 ultrasonic tissue temperatures.
11	ultrastructural studies on the myocardial capillaries of the experimentally lathyritic rat protective effect of certain flavonoids	Ultrastructural studies on l&apos myocardial capillaries; experimental flavonoid-protective effect on the lathyric rat.
11	moschcowitz syndrome with involvement of the central nervous system light optical studies on the genesis of hemolytic anemia and vascular changes	Moschcowitz syndrome with participation in optical studies of central nervous system light on hemolytic anemia and vascular changes.
11	prevalence of cardiac tumours at autopsy in ibadan	Prevalence of heart tumours in ibadan; autopsy.
11	cardiac conduction abnormalities produced by chronic alcoholism	Cardiac abnormalities due to chronic alcoholism.
11	supravalvular mitral stenosis associated with tetralogy of fallot	Supravalvular mitral stenosis, fallot tetralogy.
11	cardiovascular effects of long term cigarette smoking and nicotine administration	Cardiovascular Effects of Long-Term Tobacco Use and Nicotine Administration.
11	emergency myocardial revascularization with assisted circulation for early extension of infarction	Myocardial re-vascularization d'apos; circulation-assisted emergency for early extension of infarction.
11	changes in the glycogen content of the dog myocardium at various phases of the cardiac cycle with a normal coronary blood flow	Changes in glycogen content of canine myocardium at various stages of cardiac cycle with normal coronary blood flow.
11	study of some properties of rat myocardial pyruvate kinase in adrenaline myocarditis	Investigation of the properties of the rat myocardial pyruvate kinase in l' adrenaline myocarditis.
11	progeny pregnancy and phenylketonuria	Progeny and phenylketonuria.
11	effects of carbon monoxide inhalation on ventricular fibrillation	Effects of Absorption; Inhaled Carbon Monoxide on Ventricular Fibrillation.
11	hyperacute rejection of guinea pig to rat cardiac xenografts i morphology	Hyperacute rejection from the guinea pig to xenografts of rat heart i morphology.
11	myocardial biopsy in a case of cardiomyopathy and partial alpha a antitrypsin deficiency with liver engagement	A cardiomyopathy myocardial biopsy and partial alpha deficiency-antitrypsin with liver commitment.
11	deaths from ischemic heart disease in persons aged 65 or younger in helsinki in 1970 with special reference to patho anatomic findings in hearts 211	Deaths due to ischemic heart disease among persons 65 years of age and under in Helsinki in 1970, especially pathology-heart anatomy 211.
11	isolated valvular aortic stenosis clinico pathological findings in an autopsy material of elderly patients	Valve aortic stenosis, isolated clinically pathologically from bone marrow in elderly patients.
11	incomplete rupture of the heart with diverticulum formation	Incomplete heart failure with apo formation; diverticulum.
11	secretory granules in cardiomyocytes	Cardiomyocyte secretory granules.
11	growth hormone cyclic nucleotides and the rapid control of translation in heart muscle	Cyclic nucleotides in cardiac muscle; growth hormone and rapid translation control.
11	prinzmetal s variant angina hemodynamic and angiographic observations during pain	Hemodynamic and angiographic angina variables observed during pain.
11	myocardial ultrastructure in patients with chronic aortic valve disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other conditions that may be present in the body.
11	influence of carbon monoxide hypoxic hypoxia or potassium cyanide pretreatment on acute carbon monoxide and hypoxic hypoxia lethality	Influence of glucose; hypoxic hypoxia of carbon monoxide or pretreatment with potassium cyanide on the acute lethality of carbon monoxide and glucose; hypoxic hypoxia.
11	creatine kinase isoenzymes in baboon tissues and organs	Creatin kinase enzymes in the baboon's tissues and organs.
11	half life of rabbit heart mitochondria under normal conditions and in experimental allergic lesions of the heart	Half the rabbit heart mitochondrial life under normal conditions and experimental allergic lesions of the heart.
11	the effect of strophanthin following administration of homocardiac antigen to animals with experimental myocardial infarct	Effect of the intravenous drug regimen on the development of antigenic homocardiac disease.
11	effect of morphine in vitro on the oxidative phosphorylation in rat liver mitochondria	Effect of morphine in vitro on oxidative phosphorylation in mitochondria of rat liver.
11	functional characteristics of light and dark cells	Dark and light cell functional characteristics.
11	activity of nad and nadp dependent malate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the myocardium of rabbits with alloxan diabetes	L' myocardial larval and larval larval- and larval-dependent malate dehydrogenase isoenzyme activity in alloxanized rabbits.
11	a cytoplasmic body in human fetal endothelium	A cytoplasmic body within the human fetal endothelium.
11	effect of triiodothyronine on chick embryo heart cells maintained in tissue culture	Effect of triiodothyronine on tissue cultured chick embryonic heart cells.
11	changes in mechanical events and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels induced by enantiomers of isoproterenol in isolated rat atria and uteri	Changes in mechanical events and apo levels; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate induced by the enantiomers of l' isoproterenol in isolated rat uteri and atria.
11	stimulation of ion transport by ascorbic acid through inhibition of 3 5 cyclic amp phosphodiesterase in the corneal epithelium and other tissues	Ion transport stimulation by apos; ascorbic acid by apos; inhibition of 35 phosphodiesterase cyclic ampoules in apos; corneal and dapos epithelium; other tissues.
11	alterations in myocardial and plasma cyclic adenosine monophosphate in experimental myocardial ischemia	Changes in plasma and myocardial cyclic adenosine monophosphate in apos; experimental myocardial ischemia.
11	the rate of calcium uptake into sarcoplasmic reticulum of cardiac muscle and skeletal muscle effects of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase and phosphorylase b kinase	The level of calcium absorption in the sarcoplasmic reticulum of the effects of cardiac and skeletal muscle of the Dapos-dependent protein kinase; a cyclic ampoule and b kinase phosphorylase on skeletal muscle.
11	characterization of soluble and microsomal adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases from rabbit heart	Characterization of soluble, microsomal, and monophosphate-dependent protein kinases in rabbit liver; adenosine 3-5 in rabbit heart.
11	reversible autophosphorylation of a cyclic 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Reversible apos autophosphorylation; a 35 amperage cyclic cardiac muscle protein kinase.
11	comparison of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases from rabbit skeletal and bovine heart muscle	Comparison of rabbit skeletal muscle and bovine cardiac muscle monophosphate-dependent protein kinases; adenosine 3.5.
11	restoration of the automatic contractile activity of k arrested heart muscle cells in culture by means of dibutyryl 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	L&apos restoration; automatic contractile activity of k stops cultured cardiac muscle cells with dibutyryl 3,5 adenosine monophosphate.
11	studies on the effects of coenzyme a sh acetyl coenzyme a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and adenosine diphosphate adenosine triphosphate ratios on the interconversion of active and inactive pyruvate dehydrogenase in isolated rat heart mitochondria	Studies of the effects of the coenzyme a sh acetyl coenzyme a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and adenosine diphosphate adenosine triphosphate ratios on apos; interconversion of active and inactive pyruvate dehydrogenase in isolated mitochondria from the rat heart.
11	the release of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate from the isolated perfused rat heart	Cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate release from isolated perfused rat heart.
11	dissociation and reassociation of the phosphorylated and nonphosphorylated forms of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	Dissociation and reassociation of unphosphorylated and phosphorylated forms of l&apos monophosphate-dependent protein kinase; bovine cardiac muscle adenosine 3.5.
11	isolation of stimulatory modulator of guanosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from mammalian heart devoid of inhibitory modulator of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Isolation of guanosine-dependent protein kinase modulator 3-5 monophosphate from apos; a protein kinase-inhibitor-free mammalian heart; and adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
11	femtomole sensitive radioimmunoassay for cyclic amp and cyclic gmp after 2 0 acetylation by acetic anhydride in aqueous solution	Femtomole sensitive radioimmunoassay for apos; cyclic ampoule and cyclic gmp following acetylation 20 with apos; acetic anhydride in aqueous solution.
11	adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in perfused rat hearts exposed to isoprenaline and dopamine	Adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in the perfused hearts of rats exposed to etapos; isoprenaline and dopamine.
11	certain characteristics of myocardial metabolism in long term experimental hypotension and the effect of administration of adenosine triphosphate and fructose 1 6 diphosphate	In addition, it is recommended that the drug be administered in a manner that minimizes the risk of injury to the patient and minimizes the risk of injury.
11	the 3 amido and 5 amido analogues of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate interaction with camp specific proteins	The amido analogs 3 and 5 of the apos; interaction of the apos; adenosine 3 and 5 monophosphate with specific camp proteins.
11	binding of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase regulatory subunit to immobilized cyclic nucleotide derivatives	The binding of the sub-regulatory unit of the protein kinase dependent on the apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate to immobilized cyclic nucleotide derivatives.
11	localization of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp in cardiac and skeletal muscle immunocytochemical demonstration	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
11	mechanism of self phosphorylation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine cardiac muscle	In addition to the above, there are a number of other mechanisms that can be used to monitor protein kinase activity in bovine cardiac muscle.
11	cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate free and bound forms in the isolated rat atrium	Free bound cardiac adenosine 3,5 monophosphate is formed in isolated rat atrium.
11	characterization and regulation of heart adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase isozymes	Characterization and regulation of isozymes of the protein kinase monophosphate dependent on the apos; adenosine 3 of the heart.
11	concentrations of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase subunits in various tissues	Concentrations of sub@-@ units of l&apos-dependent protein kinase; cyclic ampoule in various tissues.
11	the effect of carbocromen on cardiac cyclic adenosine monophosphate	Cardiac effect of carbocromene on the immune system; Cardiac cyclic adenosine monophosphate.
11	a quench flow kinetic investigation of calcium ion accumulation by isolated cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum dependence of initial velocity on free calcium ion concentration and influence of preincubation with a protein kinase mgatp and cyclic amp	A kinetic study of the quench flux of apos; accumulation of calcium ions by the isolated cardiac sarcoplasmic reticulum depends on the initial rate on the concentration of apos; free calcium ions and apos; influences preincubation with a protein kinase mgatp and a cyclic ampoule.
11	myocardial degeneration in mice treated with dibutyryl cyclic amp and or theophylline	Myocardial degeneration in mice treated with a cyclic bulb of dibutyryl and/or theophylline.
11	influence of prostaglandins upon adenosine release and of adenosine upon prostaglandin release in the isolated rabbit heart	L' prostaglandin influences release of adenosine and l' adenosine influences release of prostaglandins in isolated rabbit heart.
11	purification of phosphoprotein phosphatase from bovine cardiac muscle that catalyzes dephosphorylation of cyclic amp binding protein component of protein kinase	Purification of bovine cardiac muscle phosphoprotein phosphatase, which dephosphorylates the binding protein of the cyclic protein kinase.
11	an adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from human heart	Apos-dependent monophosphate protein kinase; adenosine 3-5 from the human heart.
11	effects of adrenaline and methylisobutylxanthine on adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels in cultures of beating heart cells of the newborn rat	Effects of Apos; Adrenaline and Methylisobutylxanthine on Apos levels; Adenosine 3-5 monophosphate in beating heart cell cultures of novel rat @-@born.
11	inhibition of rat heart and brain cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase under the influence of neurohormone c	Inhibition of apos; cyclic adenosine monophosphate phosphodiesterase 3-5 in rat brain and heart under apos; neurohormone influence c.
11	cyclic nucleotide levels in the perfused rat heart subjected to hypoxia	Levels of cyclic nucleotides in the perfused hypoxic rat heart.
11	participation of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate in the pathogenesis of myocardial hypertrophy in experimental hypertension	Participation of monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 in apos pathogenesis; myocardial hypertrophy experimental hypertension.
11	diabetes and the control of pyruvate dehydrogenase in rat heart mitochondria by concentration ratios of adenosine triphosphate adenosine diphosphate of reduced oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and of acetyl coenzyme a coenzyme a	Diabetes and control of rat heart mitochondrial pyruvate dehydrogenase by ratios of concentrations of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced and d&apos adenosine triphosphate and acetyl coenzyme a coenzyme a coenzyme a coenzyme a.
11	inhibition of the cyclic amp splitting myocardial nucleotide gydrolase by 5 methyl 7 diethylamino s triazol 1 5 alpha pyrimidine rocornal	L' myocardial nucleotide gydrolase inhibition by 5 methyl diethylamino 7 triazol 15 alpha pyrimidine rocornal.
11	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinases of myocardial non histone nuclear proteins	Nonhistone nuclear myocardial protein monophosphate dependent adenosine 3,5 protein kinases.
11	effects of isoproterenol on cyclic amp and cyclic amp dependent protein kinase in developing chick myocardium	Effects of the drug; isoproterenol on the intestine; cyclic ampulla and protein kinase; cyclic ampulla in the developing myocardium of chicken.
11	phosphorylation of cardiac regulatory proteins by cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Apos-dependent protein kinase phosphorylation of cardiac regulatory proteins.
11	interrelations of cyclic adenosine monophosphate and calcium in regulating glycogen synthetase in developing skeletal and cardiac muscles in chickens	Relationships between l' adenosine cyclic monophosphate and calcium in the regulation of glycogen synthetase during chicken skeletal and cardiac muscle development.
11	studies on beta adrenoceptors mediating changes in mechanical events and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels rat atria	Beta-mediated mechanical event changes beta-adrenergic receptor studies and rat atrial adenosine 3-5 monophosphate studies.
11	chronotropic and cyclic adenosine monophosphate response of fetal rat heart in organ culture to isoproterenol quinidine and a dysrhythmogenic agent	Chronotropic cyclic reaction of apos; fetal rat heart adenosine monophosphate in organic culture to apos; isoproterenol quinidine and to a dysrhythmogenic agent.
11	effects of zinc chloride on the hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp by the activator dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bovine heart	Zinc chloride effects on apo; cyclic gmp and apo hydrolysis; cyclic ampoule by apo-dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase; bovine heart activator.
11	influence of phenylephrine on levels of cyclic 3 5 amp in the heart of rats in vivo	L' phenylephrine influences the levels of 35 cyclic amperes in rat heart in vivo.
11	the sites of phosphorylation of rabbit cardiac troponin i by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate dependent protein kinase effect of interaction with troponin c	Rabbit cardiac troponin i phosphorylation sites by adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate kinase interaction with troponin c.
11	phosphorylation of the inhibitory subunit of troponin in perfused hearts of mice deficient in phosphorylase kinase evidence for the phosphorylation of troponin by adenosine 3 5 phosphate dependent protein kinase in vivo	Phosphorylation of troponin-inhibitor sub-unit in phosphorylase kinase-deficient perfused mouse hearts revealed troponin phosphorylation by l&apos-dependent protein kinase; adenosine 3-5 phosphate in vivo.
11	studies in vitro of the effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on the phosphorylation of nuclear proteins in isolated rat heart nuclei	In vitro studies of the effects of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate on nuclear protein phosphorylation in isolated nuclei of rat heart.
11	inhibition of rat heart and brain cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate phosphodiesterase in vitro under the influence of neurohormone c	In vitro, under the influence of the neurohormone c, l' inhibition of the apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate cyclic phosphodiesterase in the heart and rat brain.
11	compartmentalization of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase in heart tissue	Apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate and apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate-protein kinase dependent in cardiac tissue.
11	stimulation of calcium uptake into aortic microsomes by cyclic amp and cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Stimulation of aortic microsomal calcium uptake by a cyclic ampoule and a d&apos-dependent protein kinase; a cyclic ampoule.
11	mechanism of action of ouabain and cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate on calcium ion transport in rat cardiac mitochondria	The mechanism(s) of action of etapos; ouabain and monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine 3-5 on the transport of calcium ions in rat cardiac mitochondria.
11	autophosphorylation of cardiac 3 5 cyclic amp stimulated protein kinase kinetic evidence for the regulatory subunit directly acting at the active site in the r2c2 complex	L' autophosphorylation of apos; cardiac cyclic bulb 3-5 stimulated apos; kinetic evidence of protein kinase for the sub--regulatory unit operating directly at the active site in the complex r2c2.
11	isoprenaline induced release of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate by the left ventricle in the anaesthetized intact dog	L' isoprenaline induced the release of cyclic adenosine 3,5-cyclic monophosphate from the left ventricle of the anesthetized intact dog.
11	the effect 3 5 3 triiodo l thyronine on the kinetic parameters of sugar transport in cultured chick embryo heart cells	L' effect 3-5 triiodo lthyronine on kinetic parameters of sugar transport in cultured chicken heart cells.
11	organ and tissue cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate during the process of the body s adaptation to extreme factors	Adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate of organs and tissues during the adaptation of the organism to extreme factors.
11	purification of a protein inhibitor of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine myocardium by a non denaturing procedure	Purification of apos; a non-denaturing protein kinase inhibitor; adenosine 3-5 bovine myocardial monophosphate.
11	effect of adenosine and catecholamines on cyclic amp levels in guinea pig heart	Effect of apos; adenosine and catecholamines on the cyclic blisters in the guinea pig heart.
11	properties of epinephrine induced activation of cardiac adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Epinephrine induced apos; apos-dependent protein kinase activation; cardiac adenosine 3-5 monophosphate.
11	effects of phosphodiesterase inhibitors imidazole and phosphate on cyclic cmp phosphodiesterase are different from those on cyclic amp and cyclic gmp phosphodiesterases	The effects of imidazole and phosphate, inhibitors of phosphodiesterase, on the phosphodiesterase of cyclic cmp are different from those of the phosphodiesterases of cyclic ampulla and cyclic gmp.
11	adenosine induced release of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate from the left ventricle in the anaesthetized intact dog	Adenosine induced left ventricular cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate release from the anesthetized intact dog.
11	inhibition of mammalian protein kinase and phosphodiesterase activities by a cyclic amp like compound isolated from higher plants	L' inhibition of apos; protein kinase and mammalian phosphodiesterase activity by a cyclic bulb similar to a compound isolated from higher plants.
11	cyclic amp dependent atpase activity of bovine heart protein kinase	Bovine cardiac protein kinase (PCP) cyclic ampulla.
11	the role of creatine kinase and arginine kinase in muscle	The Role of Creatin Kinase and Arginine Kinase in Muscle.
11	sulfhydryl group reactivity of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase from bovine heart a probe of holoenzyme structure	Reactivity of the sulfhydryl group of protein kinase dependent on apos; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate of beef heart, a probe of the structure of l' holoenzyme.
11	lack of altered cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase activity in the aorta and heart of the spontaneously hypertensive rat	In addition, there is an increased risk of injury to the human body due to the increased risk of infection.
11	saturable adenosine 5 triphosphate independent binding of 3h ouabain to brain and cardiac tissue in vitro	Adenosine 5 saturable triphosphate binding independent of etapos; ouabain 3 h to the brain and to cardiac tissue in vitro.
11	somatostatin selective inhibition of cyclic amp stimulated protein kinase	Apos-stimulated protein kinase was selectively inhibited by somatostatin; the protein kinase was stimulated by the cyclic ampoule.
11	effect of taurine on cyclic amp and gmp levels in the hearts of rats exposed to stress	Effect of taurine on heart rate in stress-exposed rats.
11	effects of cucl2 on the hydrolysis of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp by the activator dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bovine heart	Cucl2 effects on apos; cyclic gmp and apos hydrolysis; cyclic ampulla by apos-dependent cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase; bovine heart activator.
11	the role of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in adrenergic effects on ventricular vulnerability to fibrillation in the isolated perfused rat heart	The role of l' cyclic adenosine monophosphate in the perfused isolated rat heart in the adrenergic effects on the ventricular vulnerability to fibrillation.
11	interaction of aza and deaza analogs of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate with some enzymes of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate metabolism evidence that the lone pair electrons of n 3 are involved in the binding of adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate to type ii adenosine cyclic 3 5 phosphate dependent protein kinase	L' interaction of the aza and deaza analogs of d&apos phosphate; cyclic adenosine 3-5 with some enzymes of d&apos phosphate metabolism; cyclic adenosine 3-5 shows that d&apos pair electrons; n-3 free electrons are involved in cyclic phosphate binding 3-5 of d' adenosine to l&apos-dependent protein kinase; cyclic adenosine 3-5 of type ii.
11	phosphorylation of synthetic peptide analogs of rabbit cardiac troponin inhibitory subunit by the cyclic amp dependent protein kinase	Phosphorylation of rabbit cardiac troponin inhibitory sub-synthetic peptide analogs by l&apos-dependent protein kinase; cyclic ampoule.
11	studies on the inhibition by beta adrenergic receptor agonists of cyclic amp phosphodiesterase activity of rat heart	Studies on β-adrenoceptor agonists inhibition of lacid activity; cyclic rat heart phosphodiesterase.
11	dissociation between the electrophysiological properties and total tissue cyclic guanosine monophosphate content of guinea pig atria	Disssociation between total tissue content and electrophysiological properties of cyclic guanosine monophosphate in guinea pig atria.
11	tyrosine hydroxylase and the conversion of l thyroxine into 3 3 5 triiodo l thyronone in the rat	Tyrosine hydroxylase and thyroxine conversion to 3-3-5 triiodo lthyronone in rat.
11	sequence of two phosphorylated sites in the catalytic subunit of bovine cardiac muscle adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Two phosphorylated sites sequence in bovine cardiac muscle-dependent-catalytic unit; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate kinase.
11	stereochemistry of hydrolysis of adenosine 3 5 cyclic phosphorothioate by the cyclic phosphodiesterase from beef heart	The stereochemistry of apos; bovine heart cyclic phosphodiesterase hydrolysis of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic phosphorothioate.
11	effects of coronary vasodilator on cyclic nucleotides the concentrations of cyclic amp and cyclic gmp in canine coronary artery and left ventricular muscle following the administration of various coronary vasodilators	Effects of coronary vasodilator on cyclic nucleotides; cyclic ampulla and cyclic gmp concentrations in apos; left ventricular and canine coronary artery after apos; administration of various coronary vasodilators.
11	purification and properties of two forms of soluble 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase from rabbit myocardium	Purification and properties of two soluble 3-5 ampere-dependent rabbit protein kinase forms.
11	correlation of cyclic amp and cyclic gmp levels with changes in contractile force of dog ventricular myocardium during cholinergic antagonism of positive inotropic actions of histamine glucagon theophylline and papaverine	Correlation between cyclic gmp and dapos levels; cyclic ampoule and changes in ventricular myocardial contractile force during apo; cholinergic antagonism of positive inotropic actions of apo; histamine glucagonine theophylline and papaverine.
11	effects of phenylephrine and isoproterenol on the activity of cyclic amp dependent protein kinase of hypothyroid rat tissues	Phenylephrine and apos effects; isoproterenol on apos; apos-dependent protein kinase activity; a cyclic ampoule in hypothyroid rat tissues.
11	catalytic properties of soluble 3 5 amp dependent protein kinase of rabbit myocardium	Rabbit myocardial soluble 3-5 ampere protein kinase catalytic properties.
11	in vitro and in vivo myocardial effects of a cyclic amp phosphodiesterase inhibitor structurally related to natural cardenolides	In vitro and in vivo myocardial effects of apos, a cyclic inhibitor of phosphodiesterase that is structurally related to the natural cardenolides.
11	independent expression of cardiac type i and ii cyclic amp dependent protein kinase during murine embryogenesis and postnatal development	L&apos-dependent protein kinase-independent expression; type-I and type-II cyclic ampulla during embryogenesis and postnatal development.
11	inhibitory effect of a lethal toxic fragment of staphylococcal alpha toxin on cyclic amp dependent protein kinase activity	Dapos inhibitory effect; lethal alpha-staphylococcal toxin fragment on apos; apos-dependent protein kinase activity; cyclic ampoule.
11	re evaluation of the relationship between the positive inotropic effect of ouabain and its inhibitory effect on na k dependent adenosine triphosphatase in rabbit and dog hearts	Re-evaluation of the apos relationship; positive aposin inotropic effect; ouabain and its inhibitory effect on apos; na k-dependent adenosine triphosphatase in rabbit and dog hearts.
11	affinity labeling of catalytic subunit of bovine heart muscle cyclic amp dependent protein kinase by 5 p fluorosulfonylbenzoyladenosine	Labelling of apos; affinity of sub@-@ catalytic unit of apos-dependent protein kinase; bovine cardiac muscle cycling ampoule by 5 w/p fluorosulfonylbenzoyl-ladenosine.
11	studies on functional domains of the regulatory subunit of bovine heart adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent protein kinase	Functional domain studies of l&apos monophosphate-dependent protein kinase regulatory unit under @-@; bovine heart adenosine 3.
11	decreased myocardial and renal content of 3 5 amp in genetically hypertensive rats effects of pge2 and pgf2 alpha	The renal and myocardial contents of 3,5 amperes were decreased in genetically hypertensive rats, with reduced alpha pgf2 and pge2 effects.
11	prostacyclin induced coronary vasodilation interactions with adenosine cyclic amp and energy charge in the rat heart in vitro	Prostacyclin induced interactions of coronary vasodilation with a cyclic d' adenosine and an energy charge in rat heart in vitro.
12	the urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline by rats under various experimental conditions	Acute and chronic toxicity studies were carried out in rats exposed to 1,4-dichlorobenzene.
12	increased urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline after phenoxybenzamine	Increase in apos; urinary adrenaline and norepinephrine excretion after phenoxybenzamine.
12	potentiation of epinephrine and norepinephrine by iproniazid	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
12	inhibitor of o methylation of epinephrine and norepinephrine in vitro and in vivo	Norepinephrine and epinephrine inhibitor in vitro and in vivo.
12	the action of antisympathomimetic drugs on the urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used for the treatment of diabetes.
12	effect of psychotropic drugs on the uptake of h3 norepinephrine by tissues	Effect of psychotropic drugs on norepinephrine-induced tissue uptake.
12	effect of noradrenaline on the action of nicotine and tyramine on isolated atria	Effect of Noradrenaline on Apos; Effect of Nicotine and Tyramine on Isolated Atria.
12	the release of adrenaline and noradrenaline from the adrenal medulla of the cat during splanchnic stimulation	Adrenaline and noradrenaline release from the cat adrenal medulla during splanchnic stimulation.
12	the uptake of adrenaline and noradrenaline by blood platelets of the pig	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of pork.
12	role of myocardial catecholamines in cardiac contractility	The Role of Myocardial Catecholamines in Cardiac Contractility.
12	role for ganglionic norepinephrine in sympathetic synaptic transmission	The role of ganglionic norepinephrine (ganglionic norepinephrine) in sympathetic synaptic transmission.
12	epinephrine norepinephrine and acetylcholine as conditioned stimuli for avoidance behavior	L' epinephrine, norepinephrine, and l' acetylcholine are stimuli conditioned to avoidance.
12	effect of noradrenaline bretylium and cocaine on the blood pressure response to tyramine in the rat	Effect of noradrenaline-bretylium and cocaine on the rat tyramine blood pressure response.
12	responses of the isolated sympathetic nerveductus deferens preparation of the guinea pig	The isolated sympathetic nerve responses defer guinea pig preparation.
12	depletion and replacement of the adrenaline and noradrenaline contents of the rat adrenal gland following treatment with reserpine	Rat adrenal gland depletion and replacement of adrenaline and noradrenaline contents after reserpine treatment.
12	is reserpine tranquilization linked to change in brain serotonin or brain norepinephrine	Reserpine tranquilization is related to cerebral serotonin or cerebral norepinephrine.
12	effect of reserpine on release of noradrenaline from transmitter granules in adrenergic nerves	Effect of reserpine on the release of noradrenaline into adrenergic nerves from transmitter granules.
12	effect of drugs on the noradrenaline content of brain and peripheral tissues and its significance	Effect of Drugs on Noradrenaline Content and Importance of Brain and Peripheral Tissues.
12	retention of injected catechol amines by the mouse	Retention of mouse-injected catechol amines.
12	effect of hexamethonium on the vascular response to noradrenaline in man	Effect of hexamethonium on human vascular response to noradrenaline.
12	reversal of phenylalkylamine tachyphylaxis by norepinephrine	Norepinephrine reverses phenylalkylamine tachyphylaxis.
12	interactions between cocaine tyramine and noradrenaline at the noradrenaline store	Interactions Between Cocaine Tyramine and Noradrenaline at the Noradrenaline Store.
12	effect of guanethidine hemicholinium and mebutamate on the hypertensive response to eserine and catechol amines	Effect of L' Hemicholinium and Guanethidine Mebutamate on Hypertensive Response to Apos; Eserine and Catecholic Amines.
12	effect of antisympathomimetic drugs on the plasma concentrations of catechol amines	Effect of anti-sympathomimetic drugs on plasma concentrations of catechol-based amines.
12	localizing tritiated norepinephrine in sympathetic axons by electron microscopic autoradiography	Electron microscopic autoradiography showed the localization of tritiated norepinephrine in sympathetic axons.
12	pharmacological responses of thiamine deficient rat tissues	Thiamine-deficient tissue pharmacological responses in the rat.
12	neurochemical differences between two strains of mice	Neurochemical differences between the two mouse strains.
12	effect of chlorpromazine and reserpine on the catechol amine content of different areas of the central nervous system of the dog	Chlorpromazine and reserpine affect catecholamine levels in different regions of the dog central nervous system.
12	tissue levels of norepinephrine and epinephrine in hemorrhagic shock	Norepinephrine and d*apos tissue levels; epinephrine in hemorrhagic shock.
12	action of sympathomimetic drugs on the isolated junction of the bile duct and duodenum	L' sympathomimetic drug action on isolated bile duodenum duct junction.
12	the effects of bretylium and guanethidine on the pressor responses to noradrenaline and angiotensin	The effects of guanethidine and bretylium on pressor responses to noradrenaline and l' angiotensin.
12	the action of histamine on the isolated heart	L' action of l' histamine on isolated heart.
12	the subcellular localization of dopamine and acetylcholine in the dog caudate nucleus	Subcellular localization of dopamine and l' acetylcholine in the caudate nucleus of the dog.
12	the effects of nialamide on adrenergic functions	The Effects of Nialamide on Adrenergic Function.
12	urinary excretion of metabolites of catecholamines in normal individuals and hypertensive patients	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are needed to assess the potential effects of the drug on the human body.
12	bacteremic shock a medical emergency	Bacteriological shock, medical emergency.
12	guanethidine and pupillary reaction	Guanethidine pupillary reaction.
12	drug administration to neonatal rats effects on later emotionality and learning	It is important to remember that the use of drugs in neonatal rats has an effect on the emotions and the ability to learn later.
12	iontophoretic release of adrenaline noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine from micropipettes	The iontophoretic release of adrenaline, noradrenaline, and 5 hydroxytryptamine derivatives from micropipettes.
12	mechanism of the positive inotropic responses to bretylium and guanethidine	Mechanisms of Positive Inotropic Responses to Bretylium and Guanethidine.
12	effect of some blocking drugs on the pressor response to physostigmine in the rat	Effect of Certain Blocking Drugs on the Pressor Response to Physostigmine in Rat.
12	potentiation of some catechol amines by phenoxybenzamine guanethidine and cocaine	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
12	norepinephrine and 3 4dihydroxyphenethylamine turnover in guinea pig brain in vivo	In the brain of a guinea pig, the renewal of norepinephrine and 4dihydroxyphenethylamine occurs in vivo.
12	prostaglandin release from the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	Release of prostaglandins from diaphragmatic preparation of rat phrenic nerve.
12	septic shock	Skeptic shock.
12	participation of an unusual ganglionic pathway in the mediation of the pressor effect of physostigmine in the rat	Involvement of epos, an unusual lymph node pathway mediating physostigmine pressor effect in rat.
12	the effects of bethanidine on the peripheral circulation in man	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
12	innervation of the large intestine of the toad bufo marinus	Innervation of bullfrog large intestine.
12	a preliminary investigation of the pharmacology of the human isolated taenia coli preparation	A preliminary pharmacology study of taenia coli preparation isolated from humans.
12	effects of bretylium and guanethidine on human hand and forearm vessels and on their sensitivity to noradrenaline	Effects of Bretylium and Guanethidine on Hand and Lapos vessels; front-human arms and their sensitivity to noradrenaline.
12	the increase in the toxicity of yohimbine induced by imipramine and other drugs in mice	Apos; yohimbine-induced increase in toxicity; imipramine and d' other drugs in mice.
12	tremorine its effect on amines of the central nervous system	Tremorine's effect on central nervous system amines.
12	early developmental stress and later behavior	Stress of Early Development and Late Behaviour.
12	a comparison of platelet aggregation produced by seven compounds and a comparison of their inhibitors	A comparison of the platelet aggregation products of seven compounds and a comparison of their inhibitors.
12	the part played by calcium in determining the response to stimulation of sympathetic postganglionic fibres	The role of calcium in response to sympathetic postganglionic stimulation.
12	histochemical demonstration of uptake of exogenous norepinephrine by adrenergic fibers in vitro	Histochemical demonstration of apos; exogenous norepinephrine absorption by adrenergic fibres in vitro.
12	a nuclear membrane change after partial hepatectomy	A change in the nuclear membrane, after a partial hepatectomy.
12	production of inflammatory changes in the microcirculation by cationic proteins extracted from lysosomes	Production of microcirculation inflammatory changes by cationic proteins extracted from lysosomes.
12	shock caused by continuous infusion of metaraminol bitartrate aramine	Shock caused by continuous metaraminol bitartrate aramine infusion.
12	adrenaline synthesis control by the pituitary gland and adrenal glucocorticoids	The synthesis of adrenaline is controlled by pituitary and adrenal glucocorticoids.
12	peripheral vascular effects of mixtures of isoprenaline and noradrenaline in man	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of drugs.
12	secretory responses of extramedullary chromaffin tissue	Secretory reactions of extra-medullary chromaffin.
12	a sensitive method for the assay of catechol amines	Sensitive Method for Determination of Catechol Amines.
12	the effect of fasting on the hyperglycaemic responses to catechol amines in rats	L' fasting effect on hyperglycemic responses to catecholic amines in rat.
12	effects of amphetamine on the responses of the guinea pig isolated vas deferens preparation to hypogastric nerve stimulation	Apos effects; amphetamine on isolated guinea pig vas deferens responses to hypogastric nerve stimulation.
12	acidosis effect on lipolytic activity of norepinephrine in isolated fat cells	Norepinephrine can be used as an antioxidant, but it can be used as an antioxidant.
12	adrenaline and noradrenaline relation to performance in a visual vigilance task	Relationship of adrenaline to noradrenaline and performance in visual vigilance task.
12	an investigation of the adrenergic blocking action of chlorpromazine	A study of chlorpromazine's adrenergic blocking action.
12	urinary excretion of catechol amines in the rat after their liberation by reserpine or dexamphetamine	L' urinary excretion of rat catechol amines after reserpine or dexamphetamine release.
12	chemical tests for phaeochromocytoma	Phaeochromocytoma chemical tests.
12	the action of sympathomimetic amines on the outflow of aqueous humour from the eye	L'action des amines sympathomimetiques sur l'apos; le cours de l'apos; l'humour aqueux de l'apos; l'oeil.
12	inhibition of sympathomimetic effects on the heart	Inhibition of heart sympathomimetic effects.
12	the effects of drugs on the uptake of amines by mast cells	Drug effects on apo; amine absorption by mast cells.
12	unconditioned response to electric shock mechanism in planarians	An unconditional response to the mechanism of electrical shock in the life of a planar.
12	the effect of some anticholinesterases on the response of the taenia to sympathetic nerve stimulation	L' effect of certain anticholinesterases on taenia response to sympathetic nerve stimulation.
12	the development of the adrenal medulla of the foetal and new born calf	Adrenal medullary development of fetus and newborn calf.
12	neuromuscular transmitter substance in insect visceral muscle	In the visceral muscle of insects, a neuromuscular transmitter.
12	studies on the renal excretion of norepinephrine	Acute toxicity of norepinephrine.
12	comparison of effects of deoxycorticosterone and dexamethasone on cardiovascular responses to norepinephrine	Comparison of the effects of deoxycorticosterone and dexamethasone on the cardiovascular responses to the norepinephrine.
12	the influences of andrenotropic drugs and noradrenaline on the histamine release in cardiac anaphylaxis in vitro	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
12	modification by beta adrenergic blockade of the circulatory respones to acute hypoxia in man	Acute hypoxia in men, caused by adrenergic β-blockade of the circulatory functions responsible for the development of hypoxia.
12	the innervation of sheep mesenteric veins	Sheep mesenteric vein innervation.
12	cardiovascular and metabolic responses to noradrenaline in man before and after acclimatization to cold in antarctica	Cardiovascular and metabolic responses to the norepinephrine in men before and after birth; cold acclimation in the apo; antarctic.
12	the blood flow and oxygen consumption of brown adipose tissue in the new born rabbit	In addition, there was a slight increase in the number of rabbits in the diet.
12	food and water intake after intrahypothalamic injections of carbachol in the rabbit	In rabbits, carbachol can be used as an antioxidant, but not as an antioxidant.
12	norepinephrine methylation in fetal rat adrenals	Methylation of norepinephrine in the adrenals of fetal rats.
12	mast cells and necrosis	Mastocytes, necrosis.
12	the effects of pressure and pharmacologically active substances on gastric peristalsis in a transmurally stimulated rat soomach duodenum preparation	The effects of pharmacologically active substances and pressure on gastric peristalsis in a transmurally stimulated rat soomach duodenum preparation.
12	effects on temperature of monoamines injected into the cerebral ventricles of anaesthetized dogs	Temperature effects of monoamines injected into anesthetized dogs' cerebral ventricles.
12	monoamines and their metabolites in the avian brain	The metabolites of monoamines in the brains of birds.
12	diagnostic value of detailed metabolic pathway investigations in two cases of phaeochromocytoma with minimal increase in total catecholamine output	Diagnostic value d' detailed studies of metabolic pathways in two pheochromocytoma cases with minimal increase in catecholamine production.
12	the determination of urinary amines by one dimensional paper chromatography	Urinary amine determination by one-dimensional paper chromatography.
12	systemic vasoconstrictor and renal vasodilator effects of plv 2 octapressin in man	It can also be used as an adjunct to the immune system, and can be used as an adjuvant.
12	effects of alpha adrenergic blockade and tissue catecholamine depletion on pulmonary vascular response to hypoxia	Effects of alpha-adrenergic blockade and depletion of tissue catecholamines on the pulmonary vascular response to l' hypoxia.
12	effects of adrenergic receptor activation and blockade on the systolic preejection period heart rate and arterial pressure in man	Efficacy of anti-inflammatory drugs in reducing heart rate and blood pressure during the pre-ejection period in men.
12	light induced changes in pineal hydroxyindole o methyltransferase abolition by lateral hypothalamic lesions	Light induced changes in posos; elimination of pineal hydroxylindole o methyltransferase by lateral hypothalamic lesions.
12	vascular smooth muscle quantitation of cell thickness in the wall of arterioles in the living animal in situ	Quantification of apos; thickness of cells in arteriolar wall of vascular smooth muscle; live animal in situ.
12	neural correlates of food and water intake in the rat	The results of this study are summarized in Table 1.
12	localization of the adrenergic feeding system in the rat diencephalon	Dapos system localization; adrenergic feeding in rat diencephalon.
12	plasma lipids and urinary excretion of catecholamines in man during experimentally induced emotional stress and their modification by nicotinic acid	Plasma lipids and apo; catecholamine urinary excretion in men during emotional stress induced experimentally and modified by nicotinic acid.
12	observation of changes in volume of a congested limb as a means of studying the behaviour of capacity vessels	It is important to keep in mind that there is a need to monitor the performance of vessels of all sizes.
12	the effect of intraventricular injections of noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine acetylcholine and tranylcypromine on the ox bos taurus at different environmental temperatures	Lapos; norepinephrine 5 hydroxytryptamine acetylcholine and tranylcypromine intraventricular injections into beef bosurus at different ambient temperatures.
12	concealed glomerular filtration	Glomerular filtration, hidden.
12	mechanisms of reflex vasodilation assessment of the role of neural reuptake of norepinephrine and release of histamine	Mechanisms of action; evaluation of reflex vasodilation of role of neural norepinephrine reuptake and release of histamine.
12	metabolism of alpha methyltyrosine in man relationship to its potency as an inhibitor of catecholamine biosynthesis	Metabolism of etapos; alpha methyltyrosine in relation to its potency as a catecholamine biosynthesis inhibitor.
12	the effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on hormone secretion and blood flow from the thyroid vein in sheep with exteriorized thyroids	L' effect of epos; adrenaline and norepinephrine on hormone secretion and thyroid blood flow in externalized thyroid sheep.
12	studies on the longitudinal muscle of the anterior mesentric artery of the domestic fowl	Longitudinal muscle studies of domestic poultry anterior mesenteric artery.
12	electrical and mechanical activity of the longitudinal muscle of the anterior mesenteric artery of the domestic fowl	Electrical and mechanical longitudinal muscle activity of the anterior mesenteric artery of domestic poultry.
12	adenyl cyclase activity in rat pineal gland effects of chronic denervation and norepinephrine	The Effects of Chronic Denervation and Norepinephrine on Apos; Apos Activity; Adenyl Cyclase in Rat Pineal gland.
12	central temperature regulation in the conscious rabbit after monoamine oxidase inhibition	The regulation of core temperature in conscious rabbits after inhibition of monoamine oxidase.
12	effects of adrenaline on human blood platelets	Efficacy of anti-inflammatory drugs in the treatment of heart disease.
12	some properties of the smooth muscle of rabbit portal vein	Some properties of rabbit portal smooth muscle.
12	studies of the mitochondrial energy transfer system of brown adipose tissue	Study of potato transfer system; brown adipose mitochondrial energy.
12	in vivo and in vitro manifestations of adrenergic blockade in bordetella pertussis vaccinated mice	In vivo and in vitro adrenergic blockade in vaccinated whooping cough and whooping cough mice.
12	inhibition of gastrointestinal movement by sympathetic nerve stimulation the site of action	L' inhibition of the movement of the gastro-intestinal by sympathetic nerve stimulation is the site of d' action.
12	the mechanism of body temperature changes induced by intraventricular injections of adrenaline noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the ox bos taurus	The mechanism of intraventricular injections of epos; adrenaline, noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine induced changes in body temperature in the bos bos bosurus.
12	intrastrain difference in serotonin and norepinephrine in discrete areas of rat brain	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 34, 335-368.
12	evoked release of norepinephrine and serotonin from brain slices inhibitoon by lithium	Evoked release of serotonin and norepinephrine from lithium-inhibited brain slices.
12	histochemical fluorescence after application of neurochemicals to caudate nucleus and septal area in vivo	Histochemical fluorescence after neurochemical application to the caudate nucleus and the septal region in vivo.
12	inhibition of lipolytic action of growth hormone and glucocorticoid by ultraviolet and x radiation	Inhibition of apo; lipolytic action of apo; growth hormone and glucocorticoids by ultraviolet light and x-rays.
12	action of various sympathomimetic amines on the isolated stripped vas deferens of the guinea pig	L' action of sympathomimetic amines on isolated and stripped guinea pig vas deferens.
12	the effects of drugs inhibiting catecholamine uptake on tyramine and noradrenaline induced contractions of the isolated rat vas deferens	Effects of drugs inhibiting catecholamine uptake on tyramine and noradrenaline elicited contractions of isolated rat vas deferens.
12	the interaction between angiotensin and sympathetic vasoconstriction in the isolated artery of the rabbit ear	L' interaction between apos; angiotensin and sympathetic vasoconstriction in apos; isolated aposal artery; rabbit's ear.
12	the release of 3h dopamine from the isolated rabbit ileum	Dopamine release 3h from rabbit isolated ileum.
12	pharmacological modifications of sympathetic responses elicited by hypothalamic stimulation in the rat	Pharmacological changes in rat hypothalamic stimulation-induced sympathetic responses.
12	the potentiation of rat uterine inhibitory responses to noradrenaline by theophylline and nitroglycerine	Norepinephrine and nitroglycerine potentiation of inhibitory rat uterine responses to noradrenaline.
12	effect of rabbit antibodies against angiotensin ii on the pressor response to angiotensin ii and renal hypertension in the rat	Effect of Rabbit Antibody to Apos; Angiotensin ii on Pressor Response to Apos; Angiotensin ii and Apos; Renal Hypertension in Rat.
12	interaction between desipramine tyramine and amphetamine at adrenergic neurones	Interaction of Tyramine Desipramine with L' Adrenergic Neuronal Amphetamine.
12	the pattern and control of sweating in the sheep and the goat	The Pattern and Control of Sweat in Sheep and Goats.
12	the inhibitory action of noradrenaline and adrenaline on acetylcholine output by guinea pig ileum longitudinal muscle strip	The effects of norepinephrine and norepinephrine inhibit the production of apos; acetylcholine by the longitudinal muscle band of the apos; ileum of the guinea pig.
12	antagonism of the response of human isolated arteries to noradrenaline	L' response antagonism of isolated human arteries to noradrenaline.
12	the pharmacological properties of fibrinogen degradation products	Pharmacological properties of degradation products of fibrinogen.
12	effect of norepinephrine epinephrine and angiotensin on blood flow in the internal carotid artery of man	Effect of norepinephrine-epinephrine and apos; angiotensin on apos blood flow; internal apos carotid artery; man.
12	facilitation of brain self stimulation by central administration of norepinephrine	Norepinephrine can be used as an anti-norepinephrine agent.
12	semi automated method for the differential determination of plasma catecholamines	Semi-Automatic-Method for Differential Determination of Plasma Catecholamines.
12	studies on renal vasomotion	Renal vasomotion studies.
12	thyroxine deiodination during cold exposure in the rat	Toxicity of chloroform to rats exposed to chloroform.
12	circadian rhythms in rat mid brain and caudate nucleus biogenic amine levels	Circadian rhythms in the middle of the brain of the rat and levels of d' biogenic amine of the caudate nucleus.
12	epinephrine effect on uptake of iodine by dispersed cells of calf thyroid gland	Epinephrine effect on iodine uptake by dispersed veal thyroid gland cells.
12	localization of tritiated norepinephrine in vascular sympathetic axons of the rat intestine and mesentery by electron microscope radioautography	Location of tritiated norepinephrine in rat intestinal and mesenteric vascular sympathetic axons by radioautographic electron microscopy.
12	rat brain amines blood histamine and glucose levels in relationship to circadian changes in sleep induced by pentobarbitone sodium	Rat brain alters histamine, histamine, and blood glucose levels in relation to sodium pentobarbitone-induced circadian sleep changes.
12	the reversal of the central effects of noradrenaline by antidepressant drugs in mice	L' reversal of norepinephrine's central effects by antidepressants in mice.
12	evidence for a central 5 hydroxytryptamine receptor stimulation by lysergic acid diethylamide	Central stimulation of d*apos receptors; hydroxytryptamine 5 by diethylamide; lysergic acid.
12	the effects of intracerebroventricularly administered noradnamine and other sympathomimetic amines upon leptazol convulsions in mice	Effect of leptazol on convulsions of leptazol in mice; effects of leptazol; intracerebroventricular administration of noradnamine and d*apos; other sympathomimetic amines.
12	restoration of the chronotropic effect of tyramine on rat atria after reserpine	Recovery of apos; tyramine chronotropic effect on rat atria after apos; administration of reserpine.
12	neurohumoral interaction in the rat amygdala after central chemical stimulation	Neuro interaction-humoral in rat amygdala following central chemical stimulation.
12	action of a pyrimido pyrimidine compound on platelet behaviour in vitro	Action of a pyrimidine compound, pyrimido pyrimidine, on platelet behaviour in vitro.
12	shivering and non shivering therogenesis during summit metabolism in young lambs	Therogenesis is shivering and not shivering during young lambs' peak metabolism.
12	changes in plasma glucose lactate and free fatty acids in lambs during summit metabolism and treatment with catecholamines	Changes in free fatty acids and plasma glucose lactate in lambs during peak metabolism and catecholamine treatment.
12	the mechanism of the pyrogenic effect of streptococcus cell wall mucopeptide	L&apos mechanism; pyrogenic effect of streptococcal cell wall mucopeptide.
12	control of body temperature in the unanaesthetized monkey by cholinergic and aminergic systems in the hypothalamus	Body temperature control in monkeys not anesthetized by the cholinergic and aminergic systems of the hypothalamus.
12	the systolic blood pressure response of depressed patients to infused norepinephrine	Norepinephrine infusion in depressed patients.
12	adipose tissue and heat production in the new born ox bos taurus	The new-ne bos bos taurus adipose fabric and heat production.
12	the effect of noradrenaline on the end plate potential in twitch fibres of the frog	L' effect of norepinephrine on the terminal plaque potential in frog twitch fibers.
12	generation of adrenergic and cholinergic potentials in sympathetic ganglion cells	Adrenergic and cholinergic potentials are produced in sympathetic ganglion cells.
12	beta receptor mechanisms in the superficial limb veins of the dog	Dog limb surface vein beta receptor mechanisms.
12	unexpected adrenergic effects of chlorpromazine eating elicited by injection into rat hypothalamus	Unexpected Adrenergic Effects of Chlorpromazine Use; Apos Injection; Rat Hypothalamus.
12	hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol and norepinephrine in acute cardiac tamponade	Acute cardiac tamponade: hemodynamic effects of isoproterenol and norepinephrine.
12	1 delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol neurochemical and behavioral effects in the mouse	Neurochemical and behavioural effects of tetrahydrocannabinol delta9 in mice.
12	effects of catecholamines on the cholinergic neuromuscular transmission in fish red muscle	Effects of catecholamines on neuromuscular cholinergic transmission in red muscle of fish.
12	effects of reserpine on the disposition of sympathomimetic amines in vascular tissue	Effects of reserpine on vascular tissue sympathomimetic amine disposition.
12	mechanism of cocaine potentiation of responses to amines	Apos mechanism; increase in apos; apos activity; enzyme is linked to apos; increase in apos; apos activity; enzyme.
12	effects of a haloalkylamine on responses to and disposition of sympathomimetic amines	A haloalkylamine can be used to reduce the amount of amines in the body.
12	brain monoamines and adrenocortical activation	Cerebral monoamines... and adrenalocortical activation.
12	hormonal regulation of rat seminal vesicle sensitivity to adrenaline noradrenaline acetylcholine and acetyl beta methylcholine	Hormonal regulation of the sensitivity of the seminal vesicles of rats to acetylcholine; norepinephrine adrenaline acetylcholine and l' acetyl beta methylcholine.
12	lysergic acid diethylamide dissociation of its behavioral and hyperthermic actions by dl alpha methyl p tyrosine	Dissociation of diethylamide from l' lysergic acid from behavioural and hyperthermic actions by alpha-methyl-tyrosine.
12	a study of the role of noradrenaline in behavioral changes produced in the rat by psychotomimetic drugs	A study of the role of noradrenaline in the behavioral changes induced by the psychotomimetic drugs in the rat.
12	behavioural and biochemical effects of 2 2 6 dichlorophenylamino 2 imidazoline hydrochloride st 155 on the central nervous system	Behavioral and Biochemical Effects of Dichlorophenylamino Hydrochloride-2 imidazoline 2 2 2/26 on the Central Nervous System.
12	adenyl cyclase in human platelets activity and responsiveness	Adenyl cyclase activity in etapos; human platelet activity and reactivity.
12	preiminary investigation of the pharmacology of the human internal anal sphincter	Preliminary Study of the Pharmacology of the Human Internal Anal Sphincter.
12	interactions of ouabain and noradrenaline in isolated rabbit s atria	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
12	effects of chlorpromazine on the metabolism of catecholamines in dog brain	Effects of Chlorpromazine on Catecholamine Metabolism in Dog Brain.
12	studies of the effect of natural and synthetic polypeptide type ergot compounds on a peripheral vascular bed	L&apos studies; effect of natural, synthetic, ergot-like polypeptides on a peripheral vascular bed.
12	steroid potentiation of responses to sympathomimetic amines in aortic strips	Steroid potentiation of sympathomimetic amine responses in aortic strips.
12	reversal by pronethalol of dibenamine blockade a study on the seminal vesicle of the guinea pig	Pancethalol reversal of d&apos dibenamine blockade; a study of guinea pig seminal vesicle.
12	kinetic studies of plasma free fatty acid and triglyceride metabolism in man	Kinetic Studies of Free Fatty Acid and Plasma Triglyceride Metabolism in Men.
12	stimulation of c14 melatonin synthesis from c14 tryptophan by noradrenaline in rat pineal in organ culture	Stimulation of the synthesis of melatonin c14 from tryptophan c14 by noradrenaline in l' organically cultured rat epinephrine.
12	norepinephrine turnover in rat brains after gonadectomy	Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology.
12	influence of prostaglandin e1 on the terminal vascular bed	L' prostaglandin e1 influences the terminal vascular bed.
12	tricyclic antidepressants evidence for an intraneuronal site of action	Tricyclic antidepressants indicate the existence of an antidepressant site; intraneuronal action.
12	olfactory bulb removal effects on brain norepinephrine	Effects of Removal of Olfactory Bulb on Brain Norepinephrine.
12	norepinephrine induced depolarization of brown fat cells	Norepinephrine induced brown fat cell depolarization.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate stimulation of melatonin and serotonin synthesis in cultured rat pineals	Cyclic stimulation of serotonin and melatonin synthesis by epos; adenosine monophosphate in rat pineal cultures.
12	a comparison of sweat gland activity in eight species of east african bovids	Comparison of sweat glands activity in eight apo-bovid species; Apo-Africa; East.
12	modulation of noradrenaline incorporation by nerve activities in the rat submaxillary gland	Modulation of apos; incorporation of noradrenaline by nerve activities into the gland under rat maxillary @-@.
12	function of smooth muscle of the rat renal pelvis response of the isolated pelvis muscle to angiotensin and some other substances	Rat renal pelvic smooth muscle function, isolated pelvic muscle response to angiotensin and other substances.
12	phase separation in solutions of noradrenaline and adenosine triphosphate influence of bivalent cations and drugs	Phase separation in norepinephrine and d' triphosphate adenosine influences divalent cations and drugs.
12	interactions of inhibitors of noradrenaline uptake and angiotensin on the sympathetic nerves of the isolated rabbit heart	Noradrenaline uptake inhibitors and angiotensin interactions on isolated rabbit heart sympathetic nerves.
12	the effects of adrenaline noradrenaline and isoprenaline on inhibitory alpha and beta adrenoceptors in the longitudinal muscle of the guinea pig ileum	The effects of adenosine, noradrenaline, and isoprenaline on alpha- and beta-inhibitor adrenoceptors in guinea-pig ileum longitudinal muscle.
12	intraneural distribution of exogenous norepinephrine in the central nervous system of the rat	Exogenous norepinephrine intraneural distribution in the rat central nervous system.
12	dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine replacement and metabolism in sympathetic nerve and adrenal medullary depletions after prolonged thermal injury	Dopamine 3 Hydroxytyramine replacement and metabolism in sympathical nerve and adrenal medullary depletion following prolonged thermal injury.
12	action of dopamine on the human iris	Dopamine action on human iris.
12	responses of saphenous and mesenteric veins to administration of dopamine	Dopamine administration in mesenteric and saphenous veins.
12	autonomic reflexes and vascular reactivity in experimental scurvy in man	Acute vascular reactivity and autonomic reflexes in experimental scurvy in men.
12	dopamine 3 hydroxytyramine metabolism in parkinsonism	Dopamine 3 metabolism, hydroxytyramine, in parkinsonism.
12	incorporation of 14c tryptophan into 14c protein by cultured rat pineals stimulation by l norepinephrine	L' tryptophan 14c incorporation into protein 14c by stimulation of norepinephrine-grown rat pineals.
12	a method for the estimation of the catecholamines and their metabolites in brain tissue	Abstract method; estimation of catecholamines and metabolites in brain tissue.
12	effects of chronic administration of nicotine on storage and synthesis of noradrenaline in rat brain	Dosage effects; chronic nicotine administration on noradrenaline storage and synthesis in rat brain.
12	immunohistochemical localizatio of protein components of catecholamine storage vesicles	Immunohistochemical localization of the protein components of the storage vesicles of catecholamines.
12	nerve mediated excitation and inhibition of the smooth muscle cells of the avian gizzard	Nerves-mediated excitation and apo; inhibition of smooth avian gizzard muscle cells.
12	melatonin synthesis adenosine 3 5 monophosphate and norepinephrine stimulate n acetyltransferase	Acetyltransferase is stimulated by melatonin synthesis, l' adenosine 3,5 monophosphate, and norepinephrine.
12	the mobilization of free fatty acids in relation to adipose tissue triglyceride fatty acids in the rat	Mobilization of free fatty acids relative to rat adipose tissue triglycerides.
12	inhibition of the carotid sinus reflex by the chronic administration of propranolol	Chronic administration of propranolol.
12	effects of amphetamine derivatives on brain dopamine and noradrenaline	Effects of L&apos derivatives; Amphetamine on Cerebral Dopamine and Noradrenaline.
12	effect of a new series of bicyclic compounds with potential thymoleptic properties on the reserpine resistant uptake mechanism of central and peripheral monoamine neurones in vivo and in vitro	Effect of apo; a novel series of bicyclic compounds with potential thymoleptic properties on the mechanism of apo; reserpine uptake of central and peripheral monoamino neurons in vivo and in vitro.
12	the effect of catecholamines and sympathetic stimulation on the release of acetylcholine from the guinea pig colon	The effect of catecholamines and sympathetic stimulation on guinea pig colon acetylcholine release.
12	the effect of cocaine and imipramine on tyramine induced release of noradrenaline 3h from the rat vas deferens in vitro	Cocaine and apos effect; imipramine on tyramine induced 3h noradrenaline release from rat vas deferens in vitro.
12	the interactions of noradnamine and imipramine like antidepressant drugs	Noradnamine and apos interactions; imipramine as antidepressants.
12	the effect of morpine dependence on the vesicular content of adrenergic nerves in relation to arteriolar smooth muscle in the pancreas of the rat	L' effect of morpine dependence on the arteriolar smooth muscle-related vesicular content of adrenergic nerves in rat pancreas.
12	actions of phenylephrine on beta adrenoceptors in guinea pig trachea	L' phenylephrine action on beta-adrenergic receptors of guinea pig trachea.
12	the pharmacological nature of the response of the reserinized guinea pig vas deferens to postganglionic nerve stimulation	The pharmacological nature of the reserized guinea pig vas deferens response to a postganglionic nerve stimulation.
12	the metabolism of orally administered l dopa in parkinsonism	Oral dopa metabolism in parkinsonism.
12	blockade of biogenic amine synthesis its effect on the responses to leptazol and dexamphetamine in rats	Blocking of biogenic amines synthesis affects the responses to dexamphetamine and leptazol in rats.
12	the spontaneous release of prostaglandins into the cerebral ventricles of the dog and the effect of external factors on this release	Spontaneous prostaglandin release in dog cerebral ventricles and l' effect of external factors on this release.
12	the effects of cholinomimetic drugs on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation and noradrenaline in the rabbit ear artery	The Effects of Cholinomimetic Drugs on Responses to Sympathetic Nerve Stimulation and Noradrenaline in the Lapos Artery; Rabbit's Ear.
12	the antagonism of adrenergic neurone blockade by amphetamine and dexamphetamine in the rat and guinea pig	In rats and guinea pigs, there is an antagonism between the blockade of the adrenergic neurons by amphetamine and dexamphetamine.
12	the role of brown adipose tissue in the calorigenic effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline in cold acclimated rats	The role of brown adipose tissue in calorigenic effects of adenos; adrenaline and noradrenaline in cold-acclimated rats.
12	pineal gland dibutyryl cyclic adenosine monophosphate stimulation of labeled melatonin production	Stimulation by etapos; cyclic dibutyryl adenosine monophosphate of the pineal gland of labelled melatonin production.
12	alkaloids from catecholamines in adrenal tissue possible role in alcoholism	In adrenal tissues, catecholamine alkaloids may play a role in apo; alcoholism.
12	the pharmacology of ambenoxan 2 3 6 dioxaheptyl aminomethyl 1 4 benzodioxane a centrally acting muscle relaxant	Pharmacology of Apos; Emboenoxane 2-6 Dioxyl Aminomethyl 1-4 Benzodioxane, a central muscle relaxant.
12	catecholamine biosynthesis in brains of rats treated with morphine	Biosynthesis of catecholamine residues in the brain of morphine-treated rats.
12	norepinephrine turnover and metabolism in rat brain after long term administration of imipramine	Norepinephrine was found to be a major component of the inflammation of the liver and liver.
12	miosis during l dopa therapy	Dope therapy.
12	intracranial self stimulation and wakefulness effect of manipulating ambient brain catecholamines	Auto-stimulatory intracranial effect and awakening of the manipulation of the surrounding cerebral catecholamines.
12	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in rat pineal gland increase induced by light	Adenosine 3-5 monophosphate in pineal gland of light-induced increase.
12	antiparkinsonian drugs inhibition of dopamine uptake in the corpus striatum as a possible mechanism of action	Parkinsonian drugs inhibit the absorption of dopamine into the striated body as a possible action mechanism.
12	amphetamine differentiation by d and l isomers of behavior involving brain norepinephrine or dopamine	D- and l-isomers differentiate amphetamines from brain norepinephrine or brain dopamine.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate possible mediator for norepinephrine effects on cerebellar purkinje cells	Cyclic adenosine monophosphate may mediate the effects of norepinephrine on cerebellar purkin cells.
12	brain norepinephrine enhanced turnover after rubidium treatment	Brain norepinephrine increased turnover following rubidium treatment.
12	guanethidine and related agents 3 antagonism by drugs which inhibit the norepinephrine pump in man	Guanethidine and related antagonists 3 with norepinephrine pump inhibitory drugs in men.
12	polyol pathway in aorta regulation by hormones	The Polyol Pathway in Hormone Regulation.
12	idiopathic postural hypotension physiologic observations and report of a new mode of therapy	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
12	the delayed pressor response to small doses of intravenous noradrenaline in conscious rabbits	The delayed pressor response to small doses of intravenous norepinephrine in conscious rabbits.
12	prejunctional actions of some beta adrenoreceptor antagonists in the vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig	L' prejunctional action of certain beta-adrenoceptor antagonists in guinea pig vas deferens.
12	influence of halothane and catecholamines on heart rate and rhythm in the horse	Influence of halothane and catecholamines on horse heart rate and rhythm.
12	the effects of carbon disulphide exposure on brain catecholamines in rats	Effect of inhalation and inhalation of ethylene oxide and its metabolites on fetal heart rate.
12	influence of thyroid hormones on the sensitivity of cardiac and smooth muscle to biogenic amines and other drugs	Influence of thyroid hormones on sensitivity of smooth and cardiac muscles to biogenic amines and other drugs.
12	the pharmacology of salivary myoepithelial cells in dogs	Salivary myoepithelial cell pharmacology in dogs.
12	the release of prostaglandin e1 from the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	Prostaglandin e1 release from the diaphragmatic preparation of rat phrenic nerve.
12	behavioural and somatic effects of bradykinin injected into the cerebral ventricles of unanaesthetized rabbits	Behavioral and somatic effects of injected bradykinin in unanesthetized rabbits in the cerebral ventricles.
12	the release of catecholamines by shocks and stimuli paired with shocks	Catecholamine release from shock and shock-coupled stimuli.
12	norepinephrine metabolism in brainstem of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Norepinephrine metabolism in spontaneously hypertensive rat brainstem.
12	a cntral site for the hypothermic effects of amphetamine sulphate and p hydroxyamphetamine hydrobromide in mice	Cntral site of hypothermic effects in mice of amphetamine sulfate and phydroxyamphetamine hydrobromide.
12	effects of hemicholinium and bretylium on the release of autonomic transmitters in the isolated sino atrial node	In addition to the above, there are a number of radionuclides that are considered to be carcinogenic in nature.
12	effect of acute hypoxia on vascular responsiveness in man i responsiveness to lower body negative pressure and ice on the forehead ii responses to norepinephrine and angiotensin 3 effect of hypoxia and hypocapnia	Effects of norepinephrine and apos; acute hypoxia on vascular reactivity in men; reactivity to lower body negative pressure and to ice on the forehead; responses to norepinephrine and apos; angiotensin 3 effects of apos; hypoxia and apos; hypocapnia.
12	lesions of central norepinephrine terminals with 6 oh dopamine biochemistry and fine structure	Norepinephrine central terminal lesion with dopaminergic biochemistry 6 oh and fine structure.
12	vascular smooth muscle reactivity in normotensive and hypertensive rats	Reactivity of vascular smooth muscle in both normotensive and hypertensive rats.
12	prostaglandins e1 and e2 antagonize norepinephrine effects on cerebellar purkinje cells microelectrophoretic study	The effects of norepinephrine on apos were antagonized by prostaglandins e1 and e2, a microelectrophoretic study of cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	hydrocortisone mediated increase of norepinephrine uptake by brain slices	It was found that norepinephrine was a major component of the brain's metabolism.
12	urinary adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in the switch process from depression to mania	Adenosine in the urine 3-5 monophosphate in the process of transition from depression to mania.
12	the mechanism of functional vasodilatation in rabbit epigastric adipose tissue	The mechanism of functional vasodilation in the epigastric adipose tissue of rabbit.
12	electrical activity of the hypothalamus effects of intraventricular catecholamines	L' hypothalamic electrical activity of intraventricular catecholamines.
12	norepinephrine reversal of anorexia in rats with lateral hypothalamic damage	Norepinephrine reverses l' anorexia in laterally hypothalamic-damaged rats.
12	indole metabolism in the pineal gland a circadian rhythm in n acetyltransferase	Apos metabolism; pineal indole, circadian rhythm of nacetyltransferase.
12	a comparison of the sensitivities of innervated and denervated rat vasa deferentia to agonist drugs	Comparison of agonist-denervated and innervated rat vas deferens sensitivities.
12	adrenoceptors of the chick rectum	Chicken rectal adrenoceptors.
12	cyclic adenosine monophosphate and norepinephrine effects on transmembrane properties of cerebellar purkinje cells	The effects of cyclic adenosine monophosphate and norepinephrine on the transmembrane properties of the cerebellar purkinose cells.
12	an analysis of the coronary vascular responses to catecholamines using a modified langendorff heart preparation	It is recommended that patients be tested for hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhagic hemorrhage.
12	central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on the body temperature of the rat	Central Effects of 6 Hydroxydopamine on Rat Body Temperature.
12	effects of catecholamines infused into the brain of young chickens	Effects of infused catecholamines in young chickens.
12	time course of the effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine containing neurones in rat hypothalamus and striatum	L' temporal evolution of effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine-containing neurons in the apos; hypothalamus and rat striatum.
12	uptake of monoamines into central neurones and the blood brain barrier in the infant rat	Monoamine uptake in central neurons and blood barrier-encephalic in newborn-rat.
12	effects of intraventricular 2 4 5 trihydroxyphenylethylamine 6 hydroxydopamine on rat behaviour and brain catecholamine metabolism	Effects of Trihydroxyphenylethylamine-6 Intraventricular Hydroxydopamine 2-45 on Rat Behaviour and Brain Catecholamine Metabolism.
12	a simple method for measuring a picogram of acetylcholine using the clam mya arenaria heart	A simple method to measure apos, acetylcholine at apos, mya arenaria heart aid in soft-shelled clam.
12	l dihydroxyphenylalanine effect on s adenosylmethionine in brain	Adenosylmethionine s in the brain.
12	prostaglandin e1 and noradrenaline at the neuromuscular junction	Prostaglandin e1 and noradrenaline neuromuscular junction.
12	effect of tyramine on human umbilical artery in vitro	Effect of tyramine on epos; umbilical human artery in vitro.
12	cardiovascular reactivity in the experimental hypertensive rat	Experimental hypertensive rat cardiovascular reactivity.
12	depletion of brain noradrenaline and dopamine by 6 hydroxydopamine	Cerebral dopamine and noradrenaline depletion by six hydroxydopamine.
12	eeg responses in regularly menstruating women and in amenorrheic women treated with ovarian hormones	Eeg reactions in women with regular menstruation and ovarian hormone treated amenorrheic women.
12	norepinephrine biosynthesis inhibition effects on memory in mice	The effects of norepinephrine on the memory of mice; inhibitory effects of norepinephrine biosynthesis.
12	behavioral activation of rats during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine	L' behavioral activation of norepinephrine during intraventricular infusion.
12	the effect of isoprenaline on adrenoceptors in human saphenous vein	The apos; effect of apos; isoprenaline on adrenoceptors in the human saphenous vein.
12	relaxations of the isolated portal vein of the rabbit induced by nicotine and electrical stimulation	Nicotine and electrical stimulation induced relaxations of rabbit isolated portal vein.
12	the inactivation of noradrenaline and isoprenaline in dogs	Norepinephrine and isoprenaline inactivation in dogs.
12	adrenergic activity in hypothalamus and ovulation	Acute and chronic inflammation of the intestinal tract.
12	effect of heparin on serum free fatty acids plasma catecholamines and the incidence of arrhythmias following acute myocardial infarction	Effect of apo; heparin on free plasma catecholamines; serum fatty acids and apo; incidence of arrhythmias after acute myocardial infarction.
12	the concentration of catecholamines in the brain of the domestic fowl gallus domesticus	Catecholamine concentration in the brains of domestic poultry gallus domesticus.
12	relationship between renin and intrarenal hemodynamics in hemorrhagic hypotension	Renin-to-lapos ratio, intra-renal hemodynamics, hemorrhagic hypotension.
12	catecholamine secretion by the adrenal medulla of the foetal and new born foal	Catecholamine secretion by fetal adrenal medulla and newborn @-@.
12	responses of coronary vessels to adrenergic stimuli	Coronary vessel responses to the adrenergic stimuli.
12	human norepinephrine metabolism its evaluation bydministration of tritiated norepinephrine	Metabolism of human norepinephrine by tritiated norepinephrine.
12	norepinephrine pools in rat brain differences in turnover rates and pathways of metabolism	Norepinephrine brain pools in rats differ in turnover rates and metabolic pathways.
12	hemodynamic effects of phenoxybenzamine in anesthetized dogs	Hemodynamic Effects of Phenoxybenzamine in Anaesthetized Dogs.
12	beta adrenoceptor antagonist activity of 3 methoxyisoprenaline	Three-methoxyisoprenaline beta-adrenergic receptor antagonist activity.
12	effect of inhibition of catecholamine synthesis on central catecholamine containing neurones in the developing albino rat	Effect of l' inhibition of synthesis of catecholamines on catecholamine-containing central neurons in developing albino rat.
12	influence of ambient temperature on the thermoregulatory responses to 5 hydroxytryptamine noradrenaline and acetylcholine injected into the lateral cerebral ventricles of sheep goats and rabbits	Environmental temperature influences thermoregulatory responses to 5-hydroxytryptamine noradrenaline and acetylcholine injected into goat and rabbit lateral cerebral ventricles.
12	the discharge of sweat in welsh mountain sheep	Sweat unloading in the welsh mountain sheep.
12	responses of mean arterial pressure to pressor agents and diuretics in renal hypertensive and salt hypertensive rats	Journal of Consulting, Psychology and Psychology, 54, 497–79.
12	antinociceptive activity of morphine after injection of biogenic amines in the cerebral ventricles of the conscious rat	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for the presence of anti-inflammatory drugs.
12	pharmacological properties of centrally administered ouabain and their modification by other drugs	The pharmacological effects of the use of ouabain and its modification by other drugs.
12	effect of frequency of stimulation on the inhibition by noradrenaline of the acetylcholine output from parasympathetic nerve terminals	Stimulation frequency effects on apos; norepinephrine inhibition of apos production; acetylcholine parasympathetic nerve terminals.
12	evidence for inhibition of the reuptake of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline by tetrahydronaphthylamine in rat brain	Evidence of l' inhibition of tetrahydronaphthylamine uptake of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in rat brain.
12	effects of progesterone on cardiovascular responses to amines and to sympathetic stimulation in the pithed rat	Effects of progesterone on the cardiovascular responses to amine and sympathetic stimulation in the decerebrate rat.
12	some neurochemical effects of amphetamine methylamphetamine and p bromomethylamphetamine in the rat	Acute toxicity of 1,4-butadiene to rats and other aquatic organisms.
12	inhibitory and excitatory effects of sympathomimetic amines on muscle strips from the stomach of the guinea pig	The effect of sympathomimetic amines on the muscle strips of guinea pigs is inhibitory and excitatory.
12	evidence that angiotensin enhances transmitter release during sympathetic nerve stimulation	Evidence suggests that angiotensin stimulates the release of transmitters during sympathetic nerve stimulation.
12	effect of plus or minus dihydroxy ephedrine and plus or minus dihydroxy pseudoephedrine on adrenergic transmission in mesenteric arteries	Effect of more or less dihydroxy ephedrine and more or less dihydroxy pseudoephedrine on mesenteric arterial adrenergic transmission.
12	stimulating action of catecholamines on isolated preparations of the rat colon and human and rabbit taeniae coli	Stimulate the apos; action of catecholamines on isolated preparations from rabbit and human colon and taeniae coli.
12	evidence for the presence of adrenoceptors in the central thermoregulatory mechanism of rabbits	Evidence of adrenoceptors in the rabbit central thermoregulatory mechanism.
12	effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn a 343 on responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation in the rabbit ear artery	Effects of apos; muscarinic agonist mcn 343 on sympathetic nerve stimulation responses in apos; artery of apos; rabbit ear.
12	effects of isoxazolium cations on some isolated muscle preparations	Isoxazolium cation effects on certain isolated muscle preparations.
12	effect of central catecholamine alterations on the hypothermic response to 6 hydroxydopamine in desipramine treated rats	Effect of changes in central catecholamines on hypothermic response to 6 hydroxydopamine in desipramine-treated rats.
12	mechanism of potentiation of contractor responses to catecholamines by methylxanthines in aortic strips	Mechanisms of aortic band potentiation of methylxanthine responses of contractors to catecholamines.
12	thick filaments in vascular smooth muscle	It's a thick layer of filaments in the muscle.
12	central neural regulation by adrenergic nerves of the daily rhythm in hepatic tyrosine transaminase activity	Central neuronal control by adrenergic nerves of daily apos rhythm; hepatic tyrosine transaminase activity.
12	excitatory input from the distal colon to the inferior mesenteric ganglion in the guinea pig	Excitatory intrusion of the distal colon into the lower mesenteric ganglion of the guinea pig.
12	operant behavior changes norepinephrine metabolism in rat brain	The operative behaviour modifies the metabolism of norepinephrine in the brain of the rat.
12	changes in the physiology and fine structure of the taenia of the guinea pig caecum following transplantation into the anterior eye chamber	Changes in guinea-pig cecum taenia physiology and fine structure following an anterior ocular cavity transplant.
12	brain amine concentrations after monoamine oxidase inhibitor administration	Concentrations of apes; cerebral amine after apos; administration of a monoamine oxidase inhibitor.
12	physiologic and pharmacologic studies of the human oviduct	In addition, it can be used as a basis for analysis.
12	thyroid state effects on pre and postsynaptic central noradrenergic mechanisms	Effect of thyroid status on pre- and post-noradrenergic mechanisms.
12	action of 6 hydroxydopamine on lamb sympathetic ganglia vas deferens and adrenal medulla a combined histochemical ultrastructural and biochemical comparison with the effects of reserpine	L' action of 6 hydroxydopamine on apos sympathetic lymph nodes; lamb, vas deferens, and adrenal medullo were compared with reserpine effects histochemically, ultrastructurally, and biochemically.
12	changes in systolic time intervals in acute myocardial infarction	Changes in stroke intervals; acute myocardial infarction.
12	enhancement of methyldopa metabolism with barbiturate	Methyldopa metabolism increased with barbiturates.
12	the inotropic and chronotropic effects of catecholamines on the dog heart	The inotropic and chronotropic effects of catecholamine therapy on the dog heart.
12	effect of p nitromethylamphetamine on biogenic amines and their amino acid precursors in rat brain	Effect of p-nitromethylamphetamine on amino precursors and biogenic amines in rat brain.
12	a new dopamine hydroxylase inhibitor effects on the noradrenaline concentration and on the action of l dopa in the spinal cord	A novel dopamine hydroxylase inhibitor has effects on the concentration of noradrenaline and dopa-induced spinal cord action.
12	modification by choline of adrenergic transmission in rat mesenteric arteries	Choline-mediated modification of adrenergic transmission in the mesenteric arteries of rats.
12	monoamine oxidase in sympathetic nerves a transmitter specific enzyme type	Monoamine oxidase activity in sympathetic nerves is a specific transmitter type enzyme.
12	aortic reactivity and electrophysiology in normotensive rats spontaneously hypertensive rats and rats made hypertensive with desoxycorticosterone plus salt	Aortic Reactivity and L' Electrophysiology in Normotensive, Spontaneously Hypertensive, and Deoxycorticosterone plus Salt Hypertensive Rats.
12	action of thymoxamine on mydriasis induced by levodopa and dopamine	Levodopa- and dopamine-induced myriad of thymoxamine.
12	decreased noradrenaline norepinephrine synthesis in familial dysautonomia	Norepinephrine and noradrenaline synthesis reduced in family dysautonomy.
12	reciprocal hunger regulating circuits involving alpha and beta adrenergic receptors located respectively in the ventromedial and lateral hypothalamus	Reverse regulatory circuits of hunger involving α- and beta-adrenergic receptors located in the apos; hypothalamus ventromedial and lateral, respectively.
12	dopamine as a synaptic transmitter and modulator in sympathetic ganglia a different mode of synaptic action	Dopamine as synaptic transmitter and sympathetic ganglia modulator has a different mode of action.
12	inhibition of biogenic amine uptake by hydrogen peroxide a mechanism for toxic effects of 6 hydroxydopamine	In addition, there are a number of other substances that are known to be carcinogenic, such as benzene, benzene, benzene, benzene and benzene.
12	norepinephrine stinulated increase of cyclic amp levels in developing mouse brain cell cultures	Norepinephrine has been shown to cause increased levels of the cyclic blisters in brain cell cultures of developing mice.
12	adrenoceptors in the human foetal small intestine	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases.
12	catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in nervous tissue of cephalopods	Catecholamines and five hydroxytryptamine in the cephalopod nerve tissue.
12	evidence against adrenergic motor transmission in the guinea pig vas deferens	Anti-adrenergic motor transmission in guinea pig vas deferens.
12	abnormal hormone responses of an adrenocortical cancer adenyl cyclase	Adrenocortico adrenocortico adrenocortico adrenergic adenyl cyclase.
12	re investigation of the effect of adrenaline and noradrenaline on renal function in situ	Re-examining the effects of adrenalin and norepinephrine on the renal function in situ.
12	the effect of angiotensin noradrenaline and vasopressin on blood flow distribution in the rat kidney	L' effect of noradrenaline angiotensin and vasopressin on the distribution of blood flow in rat kidney.
12	peristalsis in the rabbit distal colon	Peristaltism to the rabbit's distal colon.
12	melatonin metabolism neural regulation of pineal serotonin acetyl coenzyme a n acetyltransferase activity	Melatonin neural regulation metabolism of l' pineal serotonergic acetyl coenzyme and l' n-acetyltransferase activity.
12	acetoxycycloheximide induced transient amnesia protective effects of adrenergic stimulants	L' acetoxycycloheximide induced a transient amnesia of the adrenergic stimulant's protective effects.
12	inhibition of release of dopamine hydroxylase and norepinephrine from sympathetic nerves by colchicine vinblastine or cytochalasin b hypogastric nerve stimulation exocytosis microtubules microfilaments guinea pig	Inhibition of norepinephrine and dopamine hydroxylase release from sympathetic nerves by colchicine vinblastine or cytochalasin b, hypogastric nerve stimulation, microtubules d' exocytosis, guinea pig microfilaments.
12	nerve growth factor stimulation of regenerative growth of central noradrenergic neurons	Stimulation of central noradrenergic neuronal regenerative growth factor.
12	6 7 dihydroxytetrahydroisoquinoline uptake and storage by peripheral sympathetic nerve of the rat	In addition, there is evidence that the metabolism of dihydroxytetrahydroisoquinoline has been linked to its metabolism.
12	effect of blood on the response of the rabbit ear artery to noradrenaline and angiotensin ii	Effect of Blood on Response of Apos; Apos artery; Rabbit ear to noradrenaline and apos; Angiotensin ii.
12	effect of free fatty acid mobilization on the electrophoretic mobility of alpha lipoproteins in the dog	Effect of mobilization of free fatty acids on the alpha-lipoprotein electrophoretic mobility in dogs.
12	effect of tetrabenazine and alpha methyl m tyrosine on exploratory activity and brain catecholamines in rats	Effect of tetrabenazine and l*apos; alpha methylm tyrosine on rat liver; exploratory activity and cerebral catecholamines.
12	importance of noradrenaline found in a functional pool in maintaining spontaneous locomotor activity in rats	L' importance of functional pool norepinephrine in maintenance of apos; spontaneous locomotor activity in rats.
12	rat superfused aortic strip for the bioassay of noradrenaline and adrenaline	The rat also superfused an aortic band for norepinephrine and norepinephrine bioassay; adrenaline.
12	effect of catecholamines on the adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentrations of clonal satellite cells of neurons	Catecholamine effect on concentrations of apos; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate of clonal neuronal satellite cells.
12	enhanced release of dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves by calcium and phenoxybenzamine and its reversal by prostaglandins	Increase of dopamine hydroxylase release from sympathetic nerves by calcium and phenoxybenzamine, and its reversal by prostaglandins.
12	lipolytic response and adenyl cyclase activity of rat adipocytes as related to cell size	The lipolytic response and l' rat adipocyte adenyl cyclase activity are size dependent.
12	effects of adrenergic stimulation on ventilation in man	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
12	comparison of the hyperglycaemic and glycogenolytic responses to catecholamines with those to stimulation of the hepatic sympathetic innervation in the dog	Comparison of the glycogenolytic and hyperglycemic responses to catecholamines and to hepatic sympathetic innervation in dogs.
12	uterine blood flow and uterine renin secretion	Blood flow to the uterus and renin secretion to the uterus.
12	angiotensin and renin in rat and dog brain	Angiotensin and renin in the brain of rats and dogs.
12	stimulation by dopamine of adenylate cyclase in retinal homogenates and of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate formation in intact retina	Dopamine stimulation of apos; retinal homogenate adenylate cyclase and d&apos formation; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in intact retina.
12	assessment of autonomic function in patients with a parkinsonian syndrome	Independent functioning evaluation in Parkinson's patients.
12	ca concentration and flux in ca deprived arteries	Concentration and flux levels ca in private arteries ca.
12	adrenal catecholamine secretion during stimulation of the nasal mucous membrane in the rabbit	The secretion of adrenal catecholamines during mucosal stimulation in rabbits.
12	tone and reactivity of vascular smooth muscle in germfree rat mesentery	Vascular smooth muscle tone and responsiveness in the germless rat mesentery.
12	catecholamine synthesis and excretion in rats exposed intermittently to cold	Synthesis and excretion of catecholamines in intermittent cold-exposed rats.
12	lasting biological effects of early environmental influences 8 effects of neonatal infection perinatal malnutrition and crowding on catecholamine metabolism of brain	The long-term biological effects of neonatal infections, perinatal malnutrition and overcrowding on the metabolism of catecholamines in the brain are influenced by the early stages of the environment.
12	evaluation of mechanisms controlling the release and inactivation of the adrenergic transmitter in the rabbit portal vein and vas deferens	Evaluation of mechanisms controlling release and l' inactivation of the rabbit portal vein adrenergic transmitter and rabbit vas deferens.
12	effects of catecholamines and adrenergic blocking agents on plasma and urinary cyclic nucleotides in man	Catecholamine and adrenergic blocker effects on urinary and plasma cyclic nucleotides in men.
12	norepinephrine and dopamine assay by mass fragmentography in the picomole range	Norepinephrine and dopamine determination by picomolar mass fragmentography.
12	cardiac responses to thermal physical and emotional stress	Thermal emotional and physical stress.
12	angiotensin ii like activity in circulating arterial blood in immature and adult rabbits	The activity of angiotensin II in the circulating arterial blood is similar in both immature and adult rabbits.
12	glial cell function uptake of transmitter substances	Cellular glial acceptance of transmitters.
12	regulation of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate concentration in cultured human astrocytoma cells by catecholamines and histamine	The regulation of the concentration of d' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in human cells; astrocytoma in culture by catecholamines and l' histamine.
12	plasma catecholamines in long term diabetics with and without neuropathy and in hypophysectomized subjects	Plasma catecholamines in long-term neuropathic and non-neuropathic diabetics and hypophysectomized subjects.
12	effects of catecholamines and their interaction with other hormones on cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate of the kidney	Catecholamine effects and their interaction with d' other hormones on d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine 3-5 of the kidney.
12	release of endogenous noradrenaline from an isolated muscular artery release of endogenous noradrenaline from an isolated muscular artery	In addition, it can be used as a means of reducing the amount of norepinephrine released into the body.
12	benzodiazepines anxiety reducing activity by reduction of serotonin turnover in the brain	Anxiety-reducing benzodiazepines; activity by reducing the brain's turnover of serotonin.
12	dopamine sensitive adenyl cyclase possible role in synaptic transmission	Adenyl cyclase, which is sensitive to dopamine, may play a role in the synaptic transmission.
12	proportional release of norepinephrine and dopamine hydroxylase from sympathetic nerves	Proportional release of dopamine hydroxylase and norepinephrine from sympathetic nerves.
12	central cholinergic and adrenergic mechanisms in the release of antidiuretic hormone	Cholinergic and central adrenergic mechanisms in antidiuretic hormone release.
12	the pharmacology of the rat ureter in vivo	Rat ureter pharmacology in vivo.
12	the actions of prostaglandins e 1 and f 2 on the on the perfused vessels of the isolated rabbit ear	Prostaglandin e 1 and f 2 actions on perfused rabbit vasculature; isolated rabbit ear.
12	effects of amphetamine on the turnover rate of brain catecholamines and motor activity	Effects of Apos; amphetamine on cerebral catecholamine turnover and motor activity.
12	effect of cigarette smoking on human precapillary sphincters	Cigarette smoking is a serious health problem.
12	effect of amphetamine on the transmission of repetitive impulses through the isolated superior cervical ganglion of the rat	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that may be present in the body.
12	effects of the inhibition of noradrenaline uptake and synthesis on the maintenance of the response to continuous nerve stimulation in the central artery of the rabbit ear	Effects of apos; inhibition of synthesis and uptake of noradrenaline on maintenance of response to continuous nerve stimulation in rabbit ear; central artery.
12	the presence of adrenoceptors in the guinea pig seminal vesicle	Adrenoceptors in the seminal vesicle of the guinea pig.
12	some evidence of the active uptake of noradrenaline in the guinea pig isolated trachea	Some indication of active noradrenaline uptake in isolated guinea pig trachea.
12	noradrenaline uptake by non innervated smooth muscle	The uptake of noradrenaline by the noninnervated smooth muscle is important.
12	role of noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in tetrahydronaphthylamine induced temperature changes in the rat	Temperature changes were induced in the rat by the role of noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in tetrahydronaphthylamine.
12	effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on electrical self stimulation of the brain	Effect of 6 Hydroxydopamine on epos; auto-electrical stimulation of the brain.
12	drug induced changes in the release of 3 h noradrenaline from field stimulated rat iris	The drug induced 3-h field-stimulated changes in noradrenaline release from rat iris.
12	catecholamines and the hydroxylation of tyrosine in synaptosomes isolated from rat brain	Catecholamines and L' Tyrosine hydroxylation in isolated synaptosomes of rat brain.
12	a unique synaptosomal fraction which accumulates glutamic and aspartic acids in brain tissue	A unique synaptosomal fraction that accumulates aspartic and glutamic acids in brain tissue.
12	sympathetic reinnervation of the rat iris in organ culture	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of organs.
12	purine ribonucleotide biosynthesis interconversion and catabolism in mouse brain in vitro	In vitro conversion and catabolism of purine ribonucleotide biosynthesis in mouse brain.
12	effect of prostaglandins e 1 e 2 and a 2 on vascular resistance and responses to noradrenaline nerve stimulation and angiotensin in the dog hindlimb	Effect of prostaglandins 1 and 2 on vascular resistance and responses to nerve stimulation by noradrenaline and l' hindlimb angiotensin.
12	the role of 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in the hyperthermic reaction induced by pethidine in rabbits pretreated with pargyline	The role of 5-hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline in pethidine-induced hyperthermic reaction in pargyline-pretreated rabbits.
12	the effect of cold storage on the adrenergic mechanisms of intestinal smooth muscle	It can also be used as an adjunct to the body's ability to function.
12	augmentation of drug induced blood pressure increases in rats by amorbarbital	In rats, amorbarbital increases drug-induced blood pressure.
12	effect of synthetic bradykinin on contractile tension of human saphenous vein strips	Effect of Synthetic Bradykinin on Contractile Pressure of Human Sapphenous Vein Strips.
12	antagonism of noradrenaline and histamine by desipramine in the isolated artery of the rabbit ear	Lapos; noradrenaline/norapos antagonism; desipramine histamine in apos; isolated apos artery; rabbit ear.
12	on the role of central nervous system catecholamines and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the nialamide induced behavioural syndrome	The role of 5 hydroxytryptamine and 5 central nervous system catecholamines in nialamide-induced behavioral syndrome.
12	an analysis of central adrenoceptors for control of cardiovascular function	Central adrenoceptor analysis for cardiovascular function control.
12	effects of perivascular nerve stimulation on the contraction and automaticity of the blood perfused canine papillary muscle	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the ability of the canine papillary muscle to function.
12	effects of several muscarinic agonists on cardiac performance and the release of noradrenaline from sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart	Effects of several muscarinic agonists on cardiac performance and noradrenaline release from rabbit heart-infused sympathetic nerves.
12	pharmacology of ah 5158 a drug which blocks both and adrenoceptors	Pharmacology of a drug that blocks both adrenoceptors and adrenoceptors.
12	central adrenoceptors concerned in the release of adrenocorticotrophic hormone	Central receptors involved in adrenocorticotropic hormone release.
12	studies of isolated fetal mouse hearts in organ culture evidence for a direct effect of triiodothyronine in enhancing cardiac responsiveness to norepinephrine	A direct effect of triiodothyronine on cardiac responsiveness to norepinephrine was demonstrated in studies of hearts from fetal mice isolated from cultures of rat kidney tissue.
12	studies of blood flow in aorta to coronary venous bypass grafts in man	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
12	water soluble derivatives of 1 tetrahydrocannabinol	Tetrahydrocannabinol water-soluble derivatives.
12	degeneration of sympathetic nerves in vitro and development of smooth muscle supersensitivity to noradrenaline	Sympathetic nerve degeneration in vitro and epos development; smooth muscle hypersensitivity to noradrenaline.
12	deficits in feeding behavior after intraventricular injection of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats	Intraventricular injection of 6 hydroxydopamine leads to inadequate feeding behaviour in the rat.
12	rat fighting behavior serum dopamine hydroxylase and hypothalamic tyrosine hydroxylase	Fighting behavior of hypothalamic tyrosine hydroxylase and serum dopamine hydroxylase rats.
12	hypothalamic norepinephrine circadian rhythms and the control of feeding behavior	Hypothalamic circadian norepinephrine rhythms and feeding behavior control.
12	control of circadian change of serotonin n acetyltransferase activity in the pineal organ by the beta adrenergic receptor	Control of circadian variation in apos; serotonin n-acetyltransferase activity in apos; pineal organ by beta-adrenergic receptor.
12	the use of dopamine hydroxylase as a marker for the central noradrenergic nervous system in rat brain	L' use of dopamine hydroxylase (DHA) as a marker of the central noradrenergic system in rat brain.
12	mechanism of effect of alpha adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine on renal water excretion	Norepinephrine can be used as an anti-norepinephrine agent, but can be used as an anti-norepinephrine agent.
12	preliminary observations on the mechanical and electrical activity of the rat ureter	It is important to keep in mind that this is a very small area.
12	6 hydroxydopa depletion of brain norepinephrine and the function of aggressive behavior	Norepinephrine depletion and aggressive behavior.
12	rapid axoplasmic transport of tyrosine hydroxylase in relation to other cytoplasmic constituents	Acute axoplasmic transport of tyrosine hydroxylase with respect to other components of cytoplasm.
12	tyrosine hydroxylase in human adrenal and pheochromocytoma localization kinetics and catecholamine inhibition	In addition to the above, there is also a small amount of cytotoxicity.
12	inhibition of post ganglionic motor transmission in vas deferens by indirectly acting sympathomimetic drugs	L' inhibition of ganglionic motor transmission post-ganglionic in the vas deferens by drugs sympathomimetically acting indirectly.
12	constrictor and compliance responses of some arteries to nerve or drug stimulation	Constrictor reactions and adherence of certain arteries to drug or nerve stimulation.
12	eating caused by 6 hydroxydopamine induced release of noradrenaline in the diencephalon of the rat	The ingestion of 6 hydroxydopamine caused noradrenaline release in rat diencephalon.
12	differences in sensitivity to vasoconstrictor drugs within the wall of the sheep carotid artery	Vasoconstrictor drug sensitivity differences in the epos wall; sheep carotid artery.
12	some observations on the intrinsic nervous mechanism in hirschsprung s disease	Some observations on the underlying nervous mechanism of hirschsprung s.
12	the effect of efferent discharges in renal nerves on the activity of arterial mechanoreceptors in the kidney in rabbit	L' effect of renal nerve efferent discharges on apos; arterial mechanoreceptor activity in rabbit kidney.
12	noradrenaline nerve terminals in human cerebral cortices first histochemical evidence	The nerve endings of the norepinephrine in the human cerebral cortex are the first histochemical evidence.
12	possible mechanism for the antiarrhythmic effect of helium in anesthetized dogs	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
12	axonal transport of dopamine hydroxylase by human sural nerves in vitro	Axonal dopamine hydroxylase transport by human supernerves in vitro.
12	interactions between sympathomimetic amines and antidepressant agents in man	The effects of a drug on a person's immune system.
12	a neuronal basis for the alerting action of amphetamine	It's called a neural base, and it's called an apogee.
12	the rat anococcygeus muscle and its response to nerve stimulation and to some drugs	Rat anococcygeus muscle and response to nerve stimulation and certain drugs.
12	studies of the interaction of 5 hydroxytryptamine and the perivascular innervation of the guinea pig caecum	Studies of the apos; interaction of 5 hydroxytryptamines and epos; guinea pig caecum perivascular innervation.
12	a comparison of the pharmacological and biochemical properties of substrate selective monoamine oxidase inhibitors	Comparison of pharmacological and biochemical properties of monoamine oxidase selective inhibitors as substrate.
12	the nature of the adrenoceptors in the post partum rat uterus	The nature of adrenoreceptors in uterus of rat post @-@partum.
12	effects of a false neurotransmitter p hydroxynorephedrine on the function of adrenergic neurons in hypertensive patients	Apos effects; a false p-hydroxynorephedrine neurotransmitter on adrenergic neuron function in hypertensive patients.
12	evidence for stimulation of renal gluconeogenesis by catecholamines	C catecholamine stimulation of renal gluconeogenesis.
12	central noradrenergic neurones and the cardiovascular actions of clonidine in the rabbit	Core noradrenergic neurons and cardiovascular actions of clonidine in rabbits.
12	effect of centrally acting drugs on the uptake of gamma aminobutyric acid gaba by slices of rat cerebral cortex	Effect of central-acting drugs on appetite; absorption of glucose; gamma aminobutyric acid (gamma aminobutyric acid) by slices of rat brain cortex.
12	a comparison of the effects of chemical sympathectomy by 6 hydroxydopamine in newborn and adult rats	Comparison of effects of d' a 6-hydroxydopamine chemical sympathectomy in neonatal and adult rats.
12	the effect of immunosympathectomy and of 6 hydroxydopamine on the responses of the rat anococcygeus to nerve stimulation and to some drugs	L' effect of apos; immunosympathectomy and 6 hydroxydopamine on nerve stimulation and certain drugs responses of rat anococcygeus muscle.
12	interaction of bretylium and guanethidine on the relaxations of the rat isolated fundal strip preparation evoked by indirect stimulation	Bretylium-guanethidine interaction on relaxations of the indirect stimulation-evoked isolated rat flute preparation.
12	effects of histamine on hepatic volume outflow block in anaesthetized dogs	Effect of the drug on the blockage of hepatic volume flow in anesthetized dogs.
12	structure activity relations for the inhibition of catecholamine uptake into synaptosomes from noradrenaline and dopaminergic neurones in rat brain homogenates	Determination of the effects of the drug on the metabolism of catecholamine and its metabolites in rats.
12	the separation of epinephrine from norepinephrine and dopamine from dopa on sephadex g 10	Separation of dopa dopamine and norepinephrine epinephrine on Sephadex g 10.
12	permanent alterations in catecholamine concentrations in discrete areas of brain in the offspring of rats treated with methylamphetamine and chlorpromazine	Permanent changes in catecholamine levels in distinct areas of the brain of offspring of methylamphetamine- and chlorpromazine-treated rats.
12	differential labelling of intraneuronal noradrenaline stores with different concentrations of 3h noradrenaline	Differential labelling of noradrenaline intraneuronal stores with different noradrenaline concentrations 3 h.
12	dopaminergic and noradrenergic substrates of positive reinforcement differential effects of d and l amphetamine	Dopaminergic and norepinephrine substrates of the differential effects of the positive reinforcement of amphetamines d and l.
12	noradrenergic stimulation of cyclic adenosine monophosphate in rat purkinje neurons an immunocytochemical study	Noradrenergic stimulation of the monophosphate d' cyclic adenosine in the neurons of rat purkinje, immunocytochemical study.
12	depressor responses to spinal stimulation in the pithed rat	Depressive responses to Spinal Stimulation in Spinal Cord Rats.
12	comparison of the dose response effects of morphine on brain amines analgesia and activity in mice	Dose comparison-morphine response to pain; analgesia and l*apos; brain amine activity in mice.
12	assessment of the effectiveness of adrenoceptor blocking agents towards cardiac and bronchiolar responses of the pithed guinea pig to electrical stimulation of the spinal outflow	Evaluation of apo placentae; efficacy of adrenoceptor blocking agents on the decerebrate guinea pig bronchiolar and cardiac responses to electrical stimulation of apo; spinal discharge.
12	feeding produced in the satiated rat by elevating the concentration of calcium in the brain	Food produced in satiated rats by increasing calcium concentration in brain.
12	secretion of dopa in phaeochromocytoma	Phaeochromocytoma dopa secretion.
12	effect of catecholamines on the bactericidal activity of polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Effect of catecholamines on polymorphonuclear leukocyte bactericidal activity.
12	histochemical localization of adrenergic nerves in the guinea pig trachea	Histochemical localization of the adrenergic nerves in the trachea of the guinea pig.
12	an assessment of sympathetic function in isolated tissues from mice given nerve growth factor antiserum and 6 hydroxydopamine	Evaluation of the sympathetic function in isolated tissues of mice fed an antiserum to nerve growth factor and six hydroxydopamine.
12	effects of drugs and of electrical stimulation on the muscularis mucosae of rabbit large intestine	Drug and electrical stimulation effects on the muscle mucosa of rabbit large intestine.
12	effects of oxyfedrine on isolated portal vein and other smooth muscles	It can also be used to reduce the amount of oxygen that can be absorbed by the body.
12	dopamine mediator of brain polysome disaggregation after l dopa	Cerebral polysomal disintegration dopaminergic mediator after dopa l.
12	cardiovascular effects of amphetamine in the horse	Acute Cardiovascular Effects of Drugs; Amphetamine on Horse.
12	the role of circulating catecholamines in sweat production in man	The role of the circulating catecholamines in the production of sweat in the human body.
12	functional relationship of longitudinal and circular layers of the muscularis externa of the rabbit large intestine	Functional relationships between circular and longitudinal layers of rabbit muscularis externa of the large intestine.
12	biologically active catecholamines covalentyly bound to glass beads	Biologically active catecholamines are covalently bound to the glass beads.
12	accumulation of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in clonal glial cells labeling of intracellular adenine nucleotides with radioactive adenine	In addition, it is important to note that the presence of adenosine, adenosine, adenosine, and adenosine does not necessarily indicate the presence of adenosine or adenosine.
12	axonal sprouts and 3 h norepinephrine uptake by superior cervical ganglia in organ culture	In organ cultures, axonal germs and upper cervical ganglion norepinephrine uptake for 3 h were present.
12	role of brain monoamines in the fatal hyperthermia induced by pethidine or imipramine in rabbits pretreated with a monoamine oxidase inhibitor	Role of cerebral monoamines in apos; fatal pethidine- or apos-induced hyperthermia; imipramine in monoamine oxidase inhibitor-pretreated rabbits.
12	effect of depletion of cerebral monoamines on the concentration of glycogen and on amphetamine induced glycogenolysis in the brain	Effect of cerebral monoamine depletion on glycogen concentration and brain-induced glycogenolysis.
12	effect of long term treatment with high doses of guanethidine on sperm transport and fertility of rats	Effect of long-term treatment with high doses of guanethidine on the transport of sperm and fertility in rats.
12	myogenic peristalsis in isolated preparations of chicken oesophagus	Myogenic peristalsis in isolated chicken oesophagus preparations.
12	a tion of drugs on denervated myoepithelial cells of salivary glands	An amount of medication on denervated salivary gland myoepithelial cells.
12	impaired learning and decreased cortical norepinephrine after bilateral locus coeruleus lesions	L&apos disorders; cortical norepinephrine learning and depression after locus coeruleus bilateral norepinephrine injury.
12	the effects of isoprenaline and noradrenaline on pentagastrin stimulated gastric acid secretion and mucosal blood flow in the dog	The pentagastrin effects of isoprenaline and noradrenaline stimulated gastric acid secretion and mucous blood flow in dogs.
12	a comparison of the excitatory and inhibitory effects of non adrenergic non cholinergic nerve stimulation and exogenously applied atp on a variety of smooth muscle preparations from different vertebrate species	Comparison of apo excitatory and inhibitory effects; nonadrenergic noncholinergic and apo noncholinergic nerve stimulation; exogenous application to various smooth muscle preparations of different vertebrate species.
12	the nature of adrenergic mechanisms involved in anaphylatoxin activity in the guinea pig	The nature of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in guinea pig anaphylatoxin activity.
12	acceleration of catecholamine biosynthesis in sympathetically innervated tissues by angiotensin ii amide	L' angiotensin ii amide accelerates the biosynthesis of catecholamines in the sympathetically innervated tissue.
12	stimulation of the production of unesterified fatty acids in nerve endings of guinea pig brain in vitro by noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine	Stimulation of nonesterified fatty acid production in guinea pig brain nerve endings in vitro by norepinephrine and 5 hydroxytryptamine.
12	vascular responses in the hands of patients suffering from migraine	Vascular responses in migraine patients' hands.
12	facilitation of recovery by methyl p tyrosine after lateral hypothalamic damage	Facilitation of methyl p-tyrosine recovery from lateral hypothalamic injury.
12	spontaneous activity in isolated bovine mesenteric lymphatics	Single bovine mesenteric lymphatic spontaneously.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the storage and release of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals	Electrophysiological analysis of noradrenaline storage and release at sympathetic nerve endings.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the uptake of noradrenaline at sympathetic nerve terminals	Electrophysiological analysis of noradrenaline uptake at sympathetic nerve terminals.
12	potentiation of the contractile effects of norepinephrine by hypoxia	Potentialization of norepinephrine contractile effects by hypoxia.
12	glyceride lipases in nerve endings of guinea pig brain and their stimulation by noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine and adrenaline	Glyceride lipases in guinea pig brain nerve terminals and stimulation by noradrenaline 5 hydroxytryptamine and l' adrenaline.
12	the interaction of catecholamines and adrenal corticosteroids in the induction of phosphopyruvate carboxylase in rat liver and adipose tissue	L' adrenal catecholamine–corticosteroid interaction in apos; induction of phosphopyruvate carboxylase in rat liver and fat tissue.
12	effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline in combination with and receptor blocking substances on the action potential of cardiac purkinje fibres	Effects of norepinephrine and apos; isoprenaline, combined with substances blocking receptors, on the potential of apos; action of cardiac purkinje fibers.
12	selective inhibition of angiotensin pressor responses in the pithed rat by tetraethylthiuram disulphide disulfiram and sodium diethyldithiocarbamate ddc	Selective inhibition of pressor responses to angiotensin in rats killed by tetraethylthiuram disulfide disulfiram and sodium diethylthiocarbamate dcd.
12	effect of sympathomimetic drugs in eliciting hypertensive responses to reserpine in the rat after pretreatment with monoamineoxidase inhibitors	Effect of sympathomimetic drugs on rat reserpine hypertensive responses after pretreatment with monoamine inhibitors-oxidase.
12	long lasting peripheral and central effects of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats	Long-term central and peripheral effects of 6 hydroxydopamine in rats.
12	effects of formyl tetrahydrofolic acid and noradrenaline on the oxygen consumption of rat brain synaptosome mitochondrial preparations	Effects of apos; noradrenaline and formyltetrahydrofolic acid on apo consumption; oxygen from rat brain synaptosomal mitochondrial preparations.
12	clinical investigation of an antagonist at alpha and beta adrenoceptors ah5158a	Clinical examination of alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor antagonist, ah5158a.
12	comparison of blockade at alpha adrenoceptors by thymoxamine and phentolamine in peripheral arteries and veins of man	Comparison of alpha-adrenoceptor blockade by thymoxamine and phentolamine in men's peripheral veins and arteries.
12	dopaminergic terminals in the rat cortex	Rat cortical dopaminergic endpoints.
12	dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase in caudate nucleus of rat brain and its similarity to the dopamine receptor	Dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase in rat brain caudate nucleus and its similarity to dopaminergic receptor.
12	induction and superinduction of serotonin n acetyltransferase by adrenergic drugs and denervation in rat pineal organ	Serotonin n acetyltransferase induction and superinduction by adrenergic drugs and denervation in the pineal organ of a rat.
12	changes in human plasma catecholamines and dopamine beta hydroxylase produced by prostaglandin f2 alpha	Changes in human plasma catecholamines and alpha prostaglandin dopamine beta hydroxylase.
12	adaptation of the adrenal medulla sustained increase in choline acetyltransferase by psychosocial stimulation	L'adaption de la médullos adrenales maintained the apos; augmentation of the choline acetyltransferase by psychosocial stimulation.
12	biochemical evidence of anxiety in dental patients	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the health status of women.
12	dopamine beta hydroxylase evidence for increased activity in sympathetic neurons during psychotic states	L' increased dopamine beta hydroxylase activity in sympathetic neurons during the psychotic state has been demonstrated.
12	effects of clonidine withdrawal possible mechanisms and suggestions for management	Effects of Clonidine Removal Possible Mechanisms and Management Suggestions.
12	effects of catecholamines and adenosine derivatives given into the brain of fowls	Effects of catecholamines and apos derivatives; adenosine in poultry brain.
12	effect of drugs on the synthesis of noradrenaline in guinea pig vas deferens	Effect of drugs on norepinephrine synthesis in vas deferens of guinea pig.
12	effects of clozapine on cerebral catecholaminergic neurone systems	Clozapine affects the cerebral neural catecholaminergic system.
12	a new example of a morphine sensitive neuro effector junction adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens	A new example of the adrenergic transmission of the junction of l' neurological effector sensitive to morphine in the vas deferens of the mouse.
12	cyclic amp phosphodiesterase in cloned astrocytoma cells norepinephrine induces a specific enzyme form	Norepinephrine induces a specific enzymatic form of norepinephrine.
12	maturation of responsiveness to cardioactive drugs differential effects of acetylcholine norepinephrine theophylline tyramine glucagon and dibutyryl cyclic amp on atrial rate in hearts of fetal mice	Cardioactive Drug Reactivity Maturity Differential effects of norepinephrine acetylcholine theophylline tyramine glucagon and cyclic dibutyryl amp on atrial frequency in fetal mouse hearts.
12	the adrenergic control of lower esophageal sphincter function an experimental model of denervation supersensitivity	Adrenergic control of the lower esophageal sphincter functions as an experimental model of apos; hypersensitivity to denervation.
12	dopamine synthesis stimulation by a hypothalamic factor	Hypothalamic stimulation of dopamine synthesis.
12	a comparison of the effects of adenosine triphosphate with noradrenaline and with the inhibitory potential of the guinea pig taenia coli	Comparison of effects of etapos; adenosine triphosphate with those of noradrenaline and the inhibitory potency of guinea pig taenia coli.
12	the effect of tranquillizing drugs on the concentration of the sulphate ester of 4 hydroxy 3 methoxyphenylethane 1 2 diol in rat brain	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
12	the actions of prostaglandins e2 and f2alpha on human foetal intestine	The actions of f2alpha and e2 prostaglandins on the human fetal intestine.
12	morphine and neurotransmitter substances microiontophoretic study in the rat brain stem	Morphine and neurotransmitters study microiontophoretics in the brainstem of rats.
12	transmission to the longitudinal muscle of the guinea pig vas deferens the effect of pretreatment with guanethidine	Longitudinal muscle transmission of guinea pig vas deferens; effect of guanethidine pretreatment.
12	hyperactivity and brain catecholamines in lead exposed developing rats	The hyperactivity and the cerebral catecholamines in lead exposed the developing rats.
12	the effects of dopamine on cardiogenic and endotoxin experimental shock	Effects of dopamine on endotoxin and cardiogenic shock.
12	mechanism of suppression of vasopressin during alpha adrenergic stimulation with norepinephrine	Vasopressin suppression mechanisms during norepinephrine alpha-adrenergic stimulation.
12	effects of pyridoxine deficiency and dl p chlorophenylalanine administration to rats on 5 hydroxytryptamine and noradrenaline concentrations in brain and 5 hydroxytryptamine concentration in blood	Acute toxicity of chlorophenylalanine to rats exposed to chlorophenylalanine and to rats exposed to chlorophenylalanine; to rats exposed to chlorophenylalanine; to rats exposed to chlorophenylalanine.
12	specific leukocyte receptors for small endogenous hormones detection by cell binding to insolubilized hormone preparations	Specific leukocyte receptors for the detection of small endogenous hormones by binding to acid-insolubilized preparations.
12	acute parathyroid hormone response to epinephrine in vivo	Acute Parathyroid Hormone Response to Epinephrine in vivo.
12	norepinephrine uptake into cerebral cortical synaptosomes after one fight or electroconvulsive shock	Norepinephrine uptake in the cortical synaptosomes of the brain after a struggle or electroconvulsive shock.
12	systemic arterial baroreceptors in ducks and the consequences of their denervation on some cardiovascular responses to diving	Systemic arterial baroreceptors in ducks, and the consequences of denervation on certain cardiovascular diving responses.
12	interaction of amphetamine with cerebral dopaminergic neurones in two strains of mice that show different temperature responses to this drug	Interaction of l' amphetamine with brain dopaminergic neurons of two strains of mice with different thermal responses.
12	the effects of drugs on the sensitivity of the rat anococcygeus muscle to agonists	The Effects of Drugs on the Sensitivity of Rat Anococcygeus to Agonists.
12	comparison of effects of six cholinomimetic drugs on inhibition of uptake of 3 h noradrenaline by guinea pig atria	Comparison of the effects of six drugs of cholinomimetics on apos; inhibition of noradrenaline uptake by guinea pig atria 3 h.
12	electrophysiology of cardiac function in teleosts cholinergically mediated inhibition and rebound excitation	Electrophysiology of teleost cardiac function: cholinergic inhibition and rebound excitation.
12	plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase a possible aid in the study and evaluation of hypertension	In addition, there is a need for additional information to assist in the assessment of risk factors.
12	the accumulation and metabolism of noradrenaline by cells in culture	Noradrenaline accumulation and metabolism by cultured cells.
12	adrenergic control of tendon jerk reflexes in man	Tendon shaking reflex adrenergic control in men.
12	the effect of desensitization to adenosine triphosphate on the peristaltic reflex in guinea pig ileum	Apos desensitization effect; adenosine triphosphate on peristaltic reflex in the guinea pig ileum.
12	supersensitivity and subsensitivity of the beta adrenergic receptor in pineal gland regulated by catecholamine transmitter	Beta-adrenergic receptor supersensitivity and subsensitivity in the catecholamine-regulated pineal gland.
12	effects of dobutamine on left ventricular performance coronary dynamics and distribution of cardiac output in conscious dogs	Dobutamine effects on coronary dynamics of left ventricular performance and cardiac output distribution in conscious dogs.
12	the response to distension of the pulmonary vein left atrial junctions in dogs with spinal section	The response to left atrial vein junction distension in dogs with a spinal section.
12	failure to confirm cyclic amp as second messenger for norepinephrine in rat cerebellum	Failing to confirm that the cyclic ampoule is the second norepinephrine messenger in the cerebellum of the rat.
12	binding of catecholamines to connective tissue and the effect upon the responses of blood vessels to noradrenaline and to nerve stimulation	Catecholamine binding to connective tissue and l&apos affects blood vessel responses to noradrenaline and nerve stimulation.
12	acidaemia produced by spinal stimulation in the pithed rat	Spinal-stimulated acidemia in spinal-marrow rats.
12	effects of norepinephrine and dibenamine implanted in the median eminence on the estrous cycle of the rat	Effects of norepinephrine and dibenamine on rat estrous cycle; median eminence.
12	catecholamine uptake in cerebral cortex adaptive change induced by fighting	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack due to the increased risk of heart attack.
12	the maturation of neuromuscular function in a multiply innervated structure development of the longitudinal smooth muscle of the foetal mammalian gut and its cholinergic excitatory adrenergic inhibitory and non adrenergic inhibitory innervation	Neuromuscular function maturation in the development of a multiple innervated structure of fetal mammalian longitudinal smooth muscle and its inhibitory cholinergic and nonadrenergic inhibitory adrenergic innervation.
12	3h adenine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline release evoked by electrical field stimulation perivascular nerve stimulation and nicotine from the taenia of the guinea pig caecum	Release of 3 h of the nucleotide d' adenine and 3 h of noradrenaline, induced by stimulation of the electric field of the perivascular nerve and guinea pig caecal taenia.
12	effects of biogenic amines on central thermoresponsive neurones in the rabbit	Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
12	enzyme release from polymorphonuclear leukocyte lysosomes regulation by autonomic drugs and cyclic nucleotides	Enzyme release of polymorphonuclear lysosomes from leukocytes by independent drugs and cyclic nucleotides.
12	modification of the responses of brain stem neurones to transmitter substances by anaesthetic agents	Modification of brainstem neuron responses to transmitters by anesthetic agents.
12	nerve mediated inhibition of mechanical activity in rabbit duodenum and the effects of desensitization to adenosine and several of its derivatives	Nerve-mediated inhibition of etapos; mechanical activity in rabbit duodenum; and effects of desensitization to etapos; adenosine and its derivatives.
12	thermogenic alterations in the woman i interaction of amines ovulation and basal body temperature	Thermogenic Changes in the Apos; Interaction of Apos; Amine Ovulation and Basal Body Temperature in Women i.
12	a new enzymatic assay for guanosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and its application to the ductus deferens of the rat	New guanosine 3 enzyme assay-5 cyclic monophosphate and application to rat vas deferens.
12	correlation of the directly observed responses of mesenteric vessles of the rat to nerve stimulation and noradrenaline with the distribution of adrenergic nerves	Correlation between directly observed responses of rat mesenteric nerve stimulation and norepinephrine and adrenergic nerve distribution.
12	characterization of a unique muscle cell line	The results of this study are summarized below.
12	resolution of three distinct populations of nerve endings from rat brain homogenates by zonal isopycnic centrifugation	Resolution of three distinct rat brain nerve terminal populations by isopycnic zonal centrifugation.
12	the influence of centrally applied noradrenaline on shivering and body temperature in the pigeon	L' influence of norepinephrine applied centrally on the pigeon's shivering and body temperature.
12	the importance of central adrenergic neurones in renal hypertension in rabbits	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of hypertension in rabbits.
12	neurochemical correlate of a spatial preference in rats	It is not possible to distinguish between the two groups.
12	an inhibition of post ganglionic motor transmission in the mammalian vas deferens by d lysergic acid diethylamide	An inhibition of post-ganglionic motor transmission by dysergic acid diethylamide in mammalian vas deferens.
12	demonstration of dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase in malignant neuroblastoma cells and change in sensitivity of adenylate cyclase to catecholamines in differentiated cells	Demonstration of apos; dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase in the cells of the neuroblastoma malignant and modification of the sensitivity of the l' adenylate cyclase to catecholamines in differentiated cells.
12	biogenic amines and control of melanophore stimulating hormone release	Biogenic amine and melanophore-stimulating hormone release control.
12	biogenic amines in cultured neuroblastoma and astrocytoma cells	Bacteriogenic Amines in the cultured cells of neuroblastoma and d' astrocytoma.
12	lowering of kininogen in rat blood by adrenaline and its inhibition by sympatholytic agents heparin and aspirin	Reduction of the kininogen in rat blood by adenos; adrenaline and its inhibition by heparin and aspirin sympatholytic agents.
12	pineal gland 24 hour rhythm in norepinephrine turnover	Norepinephrine turnover is a 24-hour pineal rhythm.
12	norepinephrine sensitive adenylate cyclases in rat brain relation to behavior and tyrosine hydroxylase	Adenylate cyclases sensitive to norepinephrine in rat brain in relation to behavior and tyrosine hydroxylase.
12	lysosomal physiology in tetrahymena 3 pharmacological studies on acid hydrolase release and the ingestion and egestion of dimethylbenzanthracene particles	Lysosomal Physiology in Pharmacological Studies of Tetrahymena 3 on Apos Release, Acid Hydrolase and Apos; Ingestion and Apos; Elegation of Dimethylbenzanthracene Particles.
12	monoamine oxidase and cerebral uptake of dopaminergic drugs	Monoamine oxidase and brain-trapping dopamine drugs.
12	primary cultures of dissociated sympathetic neurons ii initial studies on catecholamine metabolism	Dissociated sympathetic neuron primary cultures ii Initial studies of catecholamine metabolism.
12	studies of the mechanism of oliguria in a model of unilateral acute renal failure	Acute unilateral renal insufficiency is a symptom of acute renal insufficiency.
12	fluid replacement monitoring effect of dextran overload norepinephrine drip and positive pressure ventilation on systemic arterial right atrial pulmonary wedge and left atrial pressures in dogs	Monitoring the effects of norepinephrine infusion and ventilation at positive pressure on the right atrial pulmonary corner and left atrial pressures of the apos; systemic arterial artery in dogs.
12	the cardiovascular effects of morphine the peripheral capacitance and resistance vessels in human subjects	The Cardiovascular Effects of Morphine Peripheral Capability and Resistance Vessels in Human Subjects.
12	adrenergic coagulation and fibrinolytic responses to heat	Adrenergic coagulation and heat-induced fibrinolytic responses.
12	cardiovascular responses to noradrenaline in the rat before and after administration of various anaesthetics	The cardiovascular responses to norepinephrine in rats before and after dosing; administration of various types of anesthetic.
12	oestrogen induced sensitization of the uterine artery of the guinea pig to acetylcholine	Estrogen induced sensitization of guinea pig uterine artery to acetylcholine.
12	effects of narcotic analgesics and their antagonists on the rabbit isolated heart and its adrenergic nerves	Effects of antagonists and narcotic analgesics on the isolated rabbit heart and its adrenergic nerves.
12	3h adenosine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline uptake by cold stored guinea pig taenia caecum mechanical effects and release of 3h adenosine nucleotide by noradrenaline papaverine and nitroglycerine	Nucleotide d' adenosine 3 h and uptake of noradrenaline 3 h by the mechanical effects of taenia caecum of guinea pig stored in cold storage and release of nucleotide d' adenosine 3 h by papaverine noradrenaline and nitroglycerine.
12	kinetics of the release of noradrenaline from micropipettes interaction between ejecting and retaining currents	The kinetics of noradrenaline release from micropipettes and the interaction between ejection and retention currents.
12	some actions of sympathomimetic amines and their antagonists on mouse superfused ileum	Some actions of the sympathomimetic amines and their antagonists on the apos; ileum superfused from the mouse.
12	inhibition of noradrenaline release by lysergic acid diethylamide	L' norepinephrine release inhibition by l&apos diethylamide; lysergic acid.
12	monoamine oxidase in rat arteries evidence for different forms and selective localization	In rat arteries, monoamine oxidase (monoamine oxidase) shows the existence of different forms and d' a selective localization.
12	interaction between tyramine and iproniazid on guinea pig atria	Tyramine-lapos interaction; iproniazide on the apos; atrium of guinea pig.
12	current spread in the smooth muscle of the rabbit aorta	The current spreads through the rabbit aorta in the smooth muscle.
12	interventions with drugs on blood deposits	Blood deposit medication interventions.
12	the uptake of norepinephrine by rat uterine subepithelial cells under normal and experimental conditions	Norepinephrine uptake by rat uterine-epithelial cells under both normal and experimental conditions.
12	the effect of shock on the inflammatory response a reevaluation of the role of platelets in the active arthus reaction	The impact of shock on inflammatory response was a re-evaluation of platelet role in active osteoarthritis reaction.
12	ultrastructural and histochemical study of the adrenal medulla in normal and cold stressed syrian hamsters	Adrenal medulla histochemistry and ultrastructural studies in normal and cold-stressed Syrian hamsters.
12	effect of acylation with eleostearic acids on the monoamine oxidase inhibitory potency of some hydrazine antidepressants in mice	Effect of apo; acylation by acid-lowering agents on the inhibitory capacity of monoamine oxidase of certain antidepressants of apo; hydrazine in mouse.
12	absence of luteinizing hormone releasing hormone lh rh from catecholaminergic neurons	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
12	vascular responses to anaesthetic agents	Anesthetic agent vascular reactions.
12	vasopressors for treating shock	Pushers to treat the shock.
12	studies on the metabolism of catecholamines in the central nervous system of the mouse	Studies of catecholamine metabolism in mouse central nervous system.
12	modification by drugs of the secretagogue effect of dopamine on the pancrease	Drug modification of dopamine; secretagogue effect on the pancreas.
12	measurement of renal blood flow with the anger scintillation camera after selective intra arterial injections of 133xenon and 99mtechnetium	Renal blood flow measurement with anger scintillation camera after selective intra-arterial injections of 133xenon and 99mtechnetium.
12	angiographic technique in assessment of renal mass lesions	Acute gastrointestinal infection in children.
12	effect of p chlorophenylalanine on brain monoamines and behaviour during ethanol withdrawal in mice	Effect of p chlorophenylalanine on the monoamines of the brain and behaviour during withdrawal of l' ethanol in the mouse.
12	biogenic amines and head twitches in mice during ethanol withdrawal	Biogenic amine and mouse head convulsions during weaning; ethanol.
12	pharmacological observations on the hypotensive action of extracts of teleost fish urophyses urotensin i in the rat	Pharmacological observations on apos; hypotensive action of apos; urophyses urotensin extracts from rat teleost fish.
12	on the mechanism of action of clonidine effects on single central neurones	On the mechanism d' action of effects of clonidine on unique central neurons.
12	variation in noradrenaline output with changes in stimulus frequency and train length role of different noradrenaline pools	Changes in the production of noradrenaline as a function of stimulus frequency and the role of train length in different pools of noradrenaline.
12	a new approach to the measurement and classification of forms of supersensitivity of autonomic effector responses	A new approach for measuring and classifying the forms of d' hypersensitivity of autonomous effector responses.
12	investigations on the mode of action of ergotamine in the isolated femoral vein of the dog	To examine the action of ergotamine in the dog's isolated femoral vein.
12	sensitization of noradrenaline responses by inhibitors of extraneuronal uptake in a coronary artery preparation	Sensitization of responses to noradrenaline by extraneuronal uptake inhibitors in coronary artery preparation.
12	the action of indoramin and other compounds on the uptake of neurotransmitters into rat cortical slices	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
12	the cardiovascular effects of l dopa in the pithed rat	The Cardiovascular Effects of Dopa 1 in Spinal Cord Rats.
12	evidence for participation of catecholamines in cardiac action of ouabain positive chronotropic effect	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility that the drug may be used in combination with other drugs.
12	effects of catecholamines on thermoregulation in pigeons	Effects of catecholamines on pigeon thermoregulation.
12	modification of responses to sympathetic nerve stimulation by the renin angiotensin system in rats	Modification of the responsiveness of the renin-angiotensin system to sympathetic nerve stimulation in rats.
12	actions of putative transmitters in the chicken vagus nerve oesophagus and remak nerve rectum preparations	The action of presumptive transmitters in the esophagus of the vagus nerve of the chicken and remakes preparations of the nervous rectum.
12	effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on 3h adenine nucleotide and 3h noradrenaline release from the guinea pig taenia caecum evoked by electrical field stimulation nicotine and perivascular nerve stimulation	Effect of 6 hydroxydopamine on the release of 3 h of nucleotide adenine and 3 h of noradrenaline from the taenia caecum of guinea pig evoked by nicotine electric field stimulation and perivascular nerve stimulation.
12	a vasodilator innervation to the central artery of the rabbit ear	Injury is caused by a number of factors, including age, sex, age, sex, sex, and sexual orientation.
12	selective parasympathectomy of the heart	Selective heart-selective asympathectomy.
12	the effects of indomethacin and eicosa 5 8 11 14 tetraynoic acid on the response of the rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation	The effects of apos; indomethacin and apos; eicosa acid 58,114 tetraynoic on the electrical stimulation response of rabbit portal vein.
12	mechanism of catecholamine antagonism in rat heart produced by pilocarpine and related drugs	Mechanisms of the apo; antagonism of catecholamines in the heart of the rat produced by pilocarpine and related drugs.
12	the effects of acutely administered analgesics on the turnover of noradrenaline and dopamine in various regions of the rat brain	The effects of acutely administered analgesics on norepinephrine and dopamine turnover in various areas of rat brain.
12	effect of sympathomimetic amines on the histamine forming capacity of human leucocytes	Symptomimetic amines affect the ability of human leukocytes to form apos; histamine.
12	the effect of delta1 tetrahydrocannabinol on the release of 3h noradrenaline from the isolated vas deferens of the rat	L' effect of tetrahydrocannabinol delta1 on 3h noradrenaline release from isolated rat vas deferens.
12	significance of plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase activity as an index of sympathetic neuronal function	Importance of apos; plasma dopamine beta hydroxylase activity as a predictor of sympathetic neuronal function.
12	catecholamine levels in the injured spinal cord of monkeys	Catecholamine levels in injured monkeys' spinal cord.
12	coexistence of several putative neurotransmitters in single identified neurons of aplysia	The co-existence of several putative neurotransmitter molecules in single neurons identified from apos; aplysia.
12	in vitro interaction of prostaglandin f2alpha and oxytocin in placental vessels	Prostaglandin f2alpha and olectocin in vitro interaction in placental vessels.
12	serotonin sensitive adenylate cyclase in neural tissue and its similarity to the serotonin receptor a possible site of action of lysergic acid diethylamide	Serotonin-sensitive adenylate cyclase in neural tissue and its similarity to serotonin receptor, a d&apos site; possible action of diethylamide of l' lysergic acid.
12	alteration of vein cyclic 3 5 nucleotide concentrations during changes in contractility	Venous cyclic nucleotide concentration changes to 35 during contractility changes.
12	vascular reactivity in spontaneously hypertensive normotensive and hypotensive rats	Vascular reactivity in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive hypotensive rats.
12	the use of stereotactic dissection followed by fluorimetric assay to determine the distribution of noradrenaline dopamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine in the preoptic hypothalamic area of rabbit brain an alternative approach to histochemistry	Use of a stereotactic dissection followed by a fluorimetric test to determine the distribution of dopamine noradrenaline and 5 hydroxytryptamine in rabbit brain preoptic hypothalamic area, an alternative approach to the epos; histochemistry.
12	effects of vinblastine on noradrenergic axons	Noradrenergic axons are affected by vinblastine.
12	mechanism of the pro inflammatory activity of sympathomimetic amines in thermic oedema of the rat paw	Apos mechanisms; sympathomimetic amines pro-inflammatory activity in the apos; rat paw thermal edema.
12	effect of selective destruction of central and peripheral catecholamine containing neurones with 6 hydroxydopamine on catecholamine excretion in the rat	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
12	thermoregulatory responses to the injection of monoamines acetylcholine and prostaglandins into a lateral cerebral ventricle of the echidna	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
12	effect of noradrenaline on triglyceride and glycogen concentrations in liver and muscle from man	Effects of norepinephrine on glycogen and triglyceride levels in the liver and muscles of men.
12	plasma catecholamine response of coronary prone subjects type a to a specific challenge	Response to plasma catecholamines in subjects predisposed to type A coronary artery disease has a specific challenge.
12	2 3 diphosphoglycerate a physiological inhibitor of platelet aggregation	It can be used as an inhibitor, but it can also be used as an inhibitor.
12	growth behavior and brain catecholamines in lead exposed neonatal rats a reappraisal	Growth behaviour and cerebral catecholamines of new lead-exposed-rats were reassessed.
12	biochemical mapping of the noradrenergic projection from the locus coeruleus a model for studies of brain neuronal pathways	Biochemical mapping of noradrenergic projection of locus coeruleus, a model for brain neural pathways.
12	effects of halothane on automaticity and contractile force of isolated blood perfused canine ventricular tissue	Effects of Apos; Halothane on Initiality and Contractual Strength of Canine Ventricular tissue Perfused in Isolated Blood.
12	antagonism between parathyroid hormone and norepinephrine on cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate camp levels in isolated tubules from rat kidney cortex	Apos; parathyroid hormone and norepinephrine antagonism on cyclic d&apos levels; adenosine 3-5 monophosphate camp in isolated rat renal cortical tubules.
12	time and rate dependence of the inotropic action of noradrenaline in the isolated guinea pig s atrium	The inotropic action of norepinephrine in the isolated atrium of a guinea pig depends on the time and the rate of reaction.
12	cyclic amp and cyclic gmp may mediate opposite neuronal responses in the rat cerebral cortex	A cyclic ampoule and a cyclic gmp may mediate opposing neuronal response patterns in the rat cerebral cortex.
12	neurotransmitter control of thyrotropin secretion in the rat	The neurotransmitter controls rat thyrotropin secretion.
12	direct myocardial depressant effects of gentamicin	Direct Myocardial Depressants of Gentamicin.
12	prostaglandins antipyretic analgesics and adrenergic stimuli on the isolated artery	Antipyretic analgesic prostaglandins and stimuli adrenergic to the isolated artery.
12	norepinephrine induced depolarization of skeletal muscle cells	Norepinephrine depolarized skeletal muscle cells.
12	influence of the adrenal gland on the pressor effect and antagonistic potency of angiotensin ii analogs	Apos; adrenal gland influence on apos; pressor effect and antagonistic potency of apos analogs; angiotensin ii.
12	effects of hexamethonium and other ganglionic blocking agents on electrical activity of the esophagus induced by vagal stimulation in the dog	Effects of apos; hexamethonium and dapos; other ganglionic blockers; electrical activity; vagal stimulation-induced esophagus in dogs.
12	influence of estrogen and progesterone treatment on ovarian contractility in the monkey	L' estrogen and progesterone treatment influence ovarian contractility in monkeys.
12	physiologic and pharmacologic studies on the motility of isolated guinea pig ovaries	Motility physiological and pharmacological studies of isolated ovaries from guinea pigs.
12	the influence of prolonged painful stimulation on adrenaline and noradrenaline concentration in different regions of the brain and in the adrenals of white rats before and after removal of the superior cervical sympathetic ganglia	The effects of prolonged pain on the concentration of adrenaline and noradrenaline in different regions of the brain and in the adrenal glands of pre- and post-aposal white rats; removal of the upper sympathetic nodes of the cervix; uterus.
12	melatonin effects on brain interaction with microtubule protein inhibition of fast axoplasmic flow and induction of crystaloid and tubular formations in the hypothalamus	The effects of melatonin on the apos; brain interaction with microtubule proteins, inhibition of rapid axoplasmic flux and induction of crystalloid and tubular formation in the apos; hypothalamus.
12	3h norepinephrine binding by rat glial cells in culture lack of correlation between binding and adenylate cyclase activation	Norepinephrine binding 3 h by cultured rat glial cells was not correlated with apos activation; adenylate cyclase.
12	the pharmacological and anatomical substrates of the amphetamine response in the rat	Anatomical and pharmacological substrates for the response to amphetamines in the rat.
12	5 ht and norepinephrine induced release of ach from the thalamus and mesencephalon of the monkey during thermoregulation	Five ht and norepinephrine elicited release of apos; ach from the monkey's thalamus and midbrain during thermoregulation.
12	the effects of psychomotor stimulants on stereotypy and locomotor activity in socially deprived and control rats	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3(2), pp. 1–24.
12	serotonin sensitive adenylate cyclase activity of immature rat brain	Adenylate cyclase activity sensitive to serotonin in the brain of immature rats.
12	accumulation of cyclic amp in hypothyroidism decreased sensitivity to norepinephrine in rat adipocytes	Hypothyroidism decreases norepinephrine sensitivity in rat adipocytes.
12	vascular reactivity to norepinephrine and hemodynamic parameters in borderline hypertension	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
12	rabbit testicular contractions bimodal interaction of prostaglandin e1 with other agonists	Testicular rabbit contractions bimodal prostaglandin interaction e1 with d' other agonists.
12	improvement of parkinsonism in depressed patients treated with ect	Improved Parkinson's disease in depressive ect-treated patients.
12	fluorimetric assay of dopamine norepinephrine and their 3 o methyl metabolites by using fluorescamine	Norepinephrine dopamine and its metabolites 3 o methyl fluorimetric assay using fluorescamin.
12	norepinephrine depletion in idiopathic orthostatic hypotension	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
12	localization and characterization of carbohydrates in adrenal medullary cells	Localization and characterization of carbohydrate content in adrenal adrenal medulla cells.
12	catecholamines in experimental brain ischemia	Dietary Reference Intakes, D.C. and D.A. Dietary Reference Intakes.
12	effect of a general aviation trainer on the stress of flight training	Impact of aircraft; general in-flight training; aircraft stress training.
12	catecholamine and phagocytic responses in infected mice exposed to hyperbaric helium oxygen atmospheres	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Intakes and Dietary Reference Intakes.
12	effects of morphine on coronary and left ventricular dynamics in conscious dogs	Effects of morphine on left ventricular and coronary dynamics in conscious dogs.
12	the effect of dietary lipids on lipolysis in rat adipose tissue	L' effect of dietary lipid on rat adipose tissue lipolysis.
12	catecholamine content of serum and adrenals in protracted anaphylactic shock of guinea pigs	Anaphylactic shock in the guinea pig; a prolonged anaphylactic shock in the guinea pig.
12	mechanisms of contractile response of cerebral artery to externally applied fresh blood	Cerebral artery, cerebral artery, external application of fresh blood.
12	effects of putative neurotransmitters on neuronal activity in monkey auditory cortex	The effects of the putative neurotransmitters on the apos; neuronal activity in the auditory cortex of monkeys.
12	6 hydroxydopa during development of central adrenergic neurons produces different long term changes in rat brain noradrenaline	L' hydroxydopa-6 during central adrenergic neuron development produces different long-term changes in rat brain noradrenaline.
12	evidence for a central alpha sympathomimetic action of clonidine in the rat	Evidence of a central, alpha-sympathetic action of clonidine in rats.
12	morphine analgesia and the bulbospinal noradrenergic system increase in the concentration of normetanephrine in the spinal cord of the rat caused by analgesics	L' morphine analgesia and the noradrenergic bulbospinal system increase normetanephrine concentration in the rat spinal cord caused by analgesics.
12	the effect of nerve stimulation on the axonal transport of noradrenaline and dopamine beta hydroxylase	In addition, there is an increased risk of injury due to an increase in the risk of injury.
12	the effect of ethacrynic acid on the guinea pig and rat isolated vas deferens	Lapos; effect of apos; ethacrynic acid on guinea pig and vas deferens isolated by rat.
12	the effect of pithing and of nerve stimulation on the depletion of noradrenaline by reserpine in the rat anococcygeus muscle and vas deferens	L' effect of neuronal decerebration and stimulation on reserpine depletion of noradrenaline in rat vas deferens and anococcygeus muscle.
12	supersensitivity to isoprenaline induced in rats by prolonged isolation	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of isolation.
12	analysis of the effect of 5 hydroxykynurenamine a serotonin metabolite on isolated cerebral arteries aortas and atria	Impact of 5 hydroxykynurenamine, a metabolite of serotonin, on aortae and isolated cerebral arteries.
12	sex and estrogens and responsiveness of terminal arterioles to neurohypophyseal hormones and catecholamines	Sex, estrogen and end-line arterioles reactivity to neurohypophysial hormones and catecholamines.
12	effect of castration on the smooth muscle cells of the internal sex organs of the rat influence of the smooth muscle on the sympathetic neurons innervating the vas deferens seminal vesicle and coagulating gland	L' castration effect on smooth muscle cells of the rat internal sex organs influences smooth muscle on sympathetic neurons innervating the seminal vesicle of the vas deferens and the clotting gland.
12	antihypertensive drugs and catecholamine metabolism effects of reserpine and hydralazine on tyrosine hydroxylase activity and norepinephrine concentrations in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Reserpine and apos; hydralazine effects on tyrosine hydroxylase activity and norepinephrine concentrations in spontaneously hypertensive rats, catecholamine metabolism and antihypertensives.
12	characterization by cyproheptadine of the dopamine induced contraction in canine isolated arteries	Cyproheptadine-mediated characterization of dopamine-induced contraction in isolated canine arteries.
12	mechanical response in the wall of ovarian follicles mediated by adrenergic receptors	Mechanical response in adrenergic follicle ovary wall.
12	biochemical and histofluorescence studies of catecholamines in superior cervical ganglia in organ culture	Biochemical and histofluorescent studies of the catecholamines in the upper cervical ganglia in cultured organ systems.
12	stimulation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate formation in rat cerebral cortical slices by methoxamine interaction with an alpha adrenergic receptor	Stimulation of d&apos formation; adenosine 35 monophosphate in slices of rat cerebral cortex by interaction of methoxamine with alpha-adrenergic receptor.
12	effects of noradrenaline infused into the chick hypothalamus on thermoregulation below thermoneutrality	Norepinephrine-infused chick hypothalamus effects on thermoregulation below thermoneutrality.
12	increased plasma catecholamine concentrations and vas deferens norepinephrine biosynthesis in men with elevated blood pressure	Increases in plasma catecholamine levels and norepinephrine biosynthesis of vas deferens in high blood pressure men.
12	effect of alterations of arterial blood pressure and heart rate on segmental dyskinesis during acute myocardial ischemia and following coronary reperfusion	Acute myocardial ischemia; alterations in blood pressure and heart rate in segmental dyskinesia during apo; acute myocardial ischemia and after coronary reperfusion.
12	dobutamine development of a new catecholamine to selectively increase cardiac contractility	Dobutamine development of apos; a novel catecholamine to selectively enhance cardiac contractility.
12	octopamine presence in single neurons of aplysia suggests neurotransmitter function	The presence of apos; octopamine in the unique apos; aplysia neurons suggests a neurotransmitter function.
12	effects of cocaine on a hypogastric nerve vas deferens preparation of the guinea pig	Effects of cocaine on vas deferens from the hypogastric nerve of the guinea pig.
12	evidence for a significant contribution from central effects of angiotensin in the development of acute renal hypertension in the greyhound	Evidence of a significant contribution of angiotensin's central effects in apo development; acute renal hypertension in greyhound.
12	iron deficiency anemia and increased urinary norepinephrine excretion	Urinary norepinephrine excretion.
12	free catecholamine excretion in the urine in normal infants and in those with marasmus or kwashiorkor	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
12	a case of secondary aldosteronism induced by pheochromocytoma	Pheochromocytoma-induced secondary aldosterone.
12	in vitro studies on the human renal calices	In Vitro Studies of Human Kidney Calcium.
12	reduced level of uterine norepinephrine transmitter during hcg induced pseudopregnancy in the rabbit	A reduction in norepinephrine uterine transmitter levels during the hcg gland resulted in a pseudo-pregnancy in the rabbit.
12	the electrical basis of excitation and inhibition in the rat anoccygeus muscle	Electric basis of the excitation and apos; inhibition in rat anocyanus muscle.
12	membrane properties of the smooth muscle cells of the rat anococcygeus muscle	Membrane properties of rat anococcygeus smooth muscle cells.
12	motility of the oviduct and uterus of the cow during the oestrous cycle	Cow motility, oviduct and uterus during the estrous cycle.
12	regeneration of the noradrenergic innervation of the cardiovascular system of the chick following treatment with 6 hydroxydopamine	Chick regeneration; noradrenergic cardiovascular innervation after treatment with 6 hydroxydopamine.
12	intravenous tyramine pressor response in depression	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
12	active and passive immunization to angiotensin in experimental acute renal failure	Active and Passive Immunization to Apos; Angiotensin in Apos; Experimental Acute Renal Failure.
12	growth hormone and catecholamine response to exercise in relation to physical training	The response of growth hormone and catecholamines to apos; exercise related to apos; physical training.
12	biphasic effect of the alpha adrenolytic phentolamine on hormone stimulated formation of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate in isolated fat cells of rats	L' alpha-adrenolytic phentolamine biphasic effect on the formation of apos; adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate stimulated by apos; hormone in isolated rat fat cells.
12	factors influencing the effect of hormones on the accumulation of cyclic amp in cultured human astrocytoma cells	Factors Affecting Apos; Effect of Hormones on Apos; Accumulation of Cyclic Blisters in Cultivated Cells of Apos; Human astrocytoma.
12	effects of norepinephrine on cyclic nucleotide levels in the ductus deferens of the rat	Effects of Norepinephrine on Cyclic Nucleotide Levels in the Rat vas deferens.
12	modulation of human neutrophil chemotactic responses by cyclic 3 5 guanosine monophosphate and cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	In addition, there is a potential for adverse effects on human health due to exposure to chlorinated organic compounds.
12	sympathetic control of hepatic glycogenolysis during glucopenia in man	The sympathetic control of hepatic glycogenolysis during the course of glucopenia in men.
12	effects of depletion of brain catecholamines during the development of morphine dependence on precipitated withdrawal in rats	The effects of cerebral catecholamine depletion during the development of morphine dependence on the rats' precipitated withdrawal were observed.
12	cardiac action potential and inotropic effect of noradrenaline and calcium	Norepinephrine and calcium potentials; cardiac action and inotropic effect.
12	in vivo rates of tyrosine and tryptophan hydroxylation in regions of rat brain at four times during the light dark cycle	In vivo rate of hydroxylation of tyrosine and tryptophan in the regions of the brain of rats four times during the cycle of apos; slight obscurity.
12	influence of glyceryl trinitrate on force of contraction and action potential of guinea pig myocardium	Glyceryl trinitrate influences the force of contraction and the potential d'apos; action of guinea pig myocardium.
12	the biphasic effect of small doses of tranylcypromine on the spontaneous motor activity and learned conditioned behaviour in rats	L' biphasic effect of tranylcypromine in small doses on apos; spontaneous motor activity and conditioned behaviour acquired in rats.
12	the effects of microiontophoretically applied morphine and transmitter substances in rats during chronic treatment and after withdrawl from morphine	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
12	effects of the muscarinic agonist mcn a 343 on the release by sympathetic nerve stimulation of 3h noradrenaline from rabbit isolated ear arteries and guinea pig atria	Effects of apos; muscarinic agonist mcn to 343 on sympathetic nerve stimulation release of noradrenaline 3h from isolated arteries of rabbit ears and guinea pig atria.
12	role of endogenous catecholamines in the anti inflammatory activity of alpha adrenoceptor blocking agents	Role of Endogenous Catecholamines in Apos; anti-@-@ inflammatory activity of alpha-adrenoceptor inhibitors.
12	cyclic amp mediated induction of the cyclic amp phosphodiesterase of c 6 glioma cells	A cyclic ampoule induced apos; apos phosphodiesterase induction; c-cell cyclic ampoule.
12	stimulation of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate formation in incubated rat hypothalamus by estrogenic compounds relationship to biologic potency and blockade by anti estrogens	Stimulation of d&apos formation; adenosine 35 monophosphate in rat hypothalamus incubated with estrogenic compounds in relation to biological potency and anti-@estrogen blockade.
12	use of plasma catecholamine values in diagnosing pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma	Plasma catecholamine values are used to diagnose pheochromocytoma and neuroblastoma.
12	car factor deficiency revisited	Car-factor defect revisited.
12	the involvement of corticosteroids in the supersensitivity produced in the rat anococcygeus muscle by morphine withdrawal thyroidectomy or a single dose of reserpine	In addition, there is a need for additional information to assist in the assessment of risk factors, such as the risk factors associated with the use of the drug.
12	antagonism of the uterotonic action of oxytocin in vitro	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of cancer.
12	brain monoamine levels in the cow during oestrus and metoestrus	Cerebral monoamine during estrus and metaestrus.
12	comparative responses of the isolated human testicular capsule to autonomic drugs	Comparison of isolated human testicular capsule responses to autonomic drugs.
12	the functional state of the sympathetic adrenal and pituitary adrenocortical systems during chronic neuro emotional stress	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
12	effect of serotonin depletion on the central regulation of the carotid sinus reflex in rats	Effect of serotonin depletion on central regulation of carotid sinus reflex in rats.
12	preservation of estrogen induced increase of uterine blood volume following catechlamine and mast cell histamine depletion	Preservation of the estrogen induced an increase in the volume of uterine blood after the histamine depletion of catechlamin and mast cells.
12	effects of nicotine on plasma corticosterone and brain amines in stressed and unstressed rats	Effects of nicotine on cerebral corticosterone and amine in stressed and unstressed rats.
12	behavioral and electrocortical activity in rats after neonatal intraventricular 6 hydroxydropamine administration	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that may be used in the treatment of cervical cancer.
12	discriminated escape learning and response to electric shock after 6 hydroxydopamine lesions of the nigro neostriatal dopaminergic projection	After 6 hydroxydopamine lesions from neostriatal neo-negro dopaminergic projection, we were able to distinguish between neo- and neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo-neo.
12	blood pressure response to both carotid occlucion and asphyxia as influenced by intracerebroventricular injection of norepinephrine or epinephrine	The response of blood pressure to carotid occlusion and asosphyxia is influenced by norepinephrine and norepinephrine intracerebroventricular injection.
12	the ability of collecting veins to sustain sympathetic constriction	The ability of your collecting veins to maintain a sympathetic constriction.
12	the cardiovascular effects of ergometrine in the experimental animal in vivo and in vitro	Cardiovascular Effect of Ergometrine in Apos; Experimental Animals in Vivo and In Vitro.
12	increased hypothalamic norepinephrine in genetically hypertensive rats following administration of diphenylhydantoin 38407	Increases in hypothalamic norepinephrine following diphenylhydantoin 38407 administration in genetically hypertensive rats.
12	contractility of renal cortex following complete ureteral obstruction	Renal cortical contractility after complete obstruction of the ureterum.
12	enhancement of neural and thermal vasoconstriction by prostaglandin b1	Prostaglandin b1 enhances thermal and neural vasoconstriction.
12	uric acid kinetic studies in the immediate post myocardial infarction period	Studies of the kinetics of the apos; uric acid during the period immediately following the onset of myocardial infarction.
12	concentration of serotonin in intestine and factors affecting its release	Serotonin levels in the intestine, and factors affecting the release of serotonin.
12	differentiation of nephrotensin from the renin angiotensin system	Renin differentiation-angiotensin.
12	use of an angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin in the recognition of angiotensinogenic hypertension	It can also be used as an antioxidant or as an antioxidant; it can be used as an antioxidant.
12	alterations in brain monoaminergic functioning associated with septal lesion induced hyperreactivity	Alterations in cerebral monoaminergic function associated with a septal lesion were found to induce hyperresponsiveness.
12	comparison of 2 5 dimethoxy 4 methylamphetamine dom and d amphetamine for in vivo efflux of catecholamines from rat brain	Comparison of 25-dimethoxy-4-methamphetamine dom and amphetamine for rat brain in vivo catecholamine efflux.
12	anorexigenic effects of d amphetamine and l dopa in the rat	Anorexionic effects of acetaldehyde, 2-butoxyethanol, 2-butoxyethanol and 2-butoxyethanol.
12	the hepatic uptake of individual free fatty acids in sheep during noradrenaline infusion	Hepatic uptake of individual sheep free fatty acids during noradrenaline infusion.
12	studies on the synthesis and subcellular distribution of dopamine in the rat adrenal medulla	Studies of rat adrenal medulla dopamine synthesis and subcellular distribution.
12	appearance of hormone sensitive adenylate cyclase in the developing human heart	Appearance of hormone-sensitive adenylate cyclase in developing human heart.
12	effect of circulating norepinephrine on the renin release from the denervated kidney	Effect of circulating norepinephrine on denervated renin release.
12	strain differences during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine possible role of receptor sensitivity	Differences between strains during intraventricular infusion of norepinephrine may play a role in the sensitivity of receptors.
12	adrenergic mechanisms in the cephalic and cerebral circulations of the subhuman primate	Adrenergic mechanisms in primate cerebral and cerebral circulation @-@human.
12	plasma fatty acids and the control of lipolysis by cathecholamines	Plasma fatty acids and lipolysis control by cathecholamines.
12	the effect of visual sexual stimulation on urinary excretion of adrenaline and noradrenaline in impotent patients	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
12	adrenergic mechanisms in the hindlimb circulation of baboons	Adrenergic mechanisms in baboon hind limb circulation.
12	pharmacological analysis of dopamine action on the isolated dog atrium	Dopamine is a drug substance that is used in the manufacture of a drug.
12	eccrine sweat gland sensitivity to catecholamines in patients with pheochromocytoma and primary aldosteronism	"""Eccrine sweatshirt sensitivity to catecholamines"" in patients with both pheochromocytoma and d' primary aldosteronism."
12	a kinetic evaluation of monoamine oxidase activity in rat liver mitochondrial outer membranes	A kinetic evaluation of the activity of monoamine oxidase in the outer mitochondrial membranes of rat liver.
12	a pharmacological study of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in the stretch reflex of the decerebrate rat	Pharmacological investigation of the adrenergic mechanisms involved in the decerebrated rat stretch reflex.
12	studies of rectal mucosal catecholamines in ulcerative colitis	Studies of the catecholamines of the rectal mucosa in ulcerative colitis.
12	acute and chronic morphine treatment and the hydroxylation of 1 14c l tyrosine in the mouse brain	Acute and chronic treatment with morphine and tyrosine hydroxylation in mouse brain.
12	the effects of gonadectomy on monoamine metabolism in three regions of mouse brain	The effects of gonadectomy on the metabolism of monoamines in three areas of mouse brain.
12	effects of drugs and sympathetic nerve stimuation on retrograde coronary blood flow in dogs with experimental coronary occlusion	Effects of medications and sympathetic nerve stimulation on retrograde coronary blood flow in dogs undergoing experimental coronary occlusion.
12	inhibition of lipolysis and cyclic amp accumulation in white fat cells by tetracycline	It is important to note that the effects of tetracycline on the immune system are not directly related to the development of the immune system.
12	the effects of 5 hydroxy 5 4 chlorophenyl 2 3 dihydro 5h imidazo 2 1 a isoindole mazindol sah 42 548 on the metabolism of brain norepinephrine	The effects of 5 hydroxy 5-4 chlorophenyl 2-3 dihydro 5 hours imidazo 2-1 a isoindole mazindol sah 4-42,548 on cerebral norepinephrine metabolism.
12	unusual mechanism of hypotensive activity exerted by erytrho 1 1 2 1 4 benzodioxan 2 yl 2 oh et a1 4 piperidyl 2 benzimidazolinone r 28935	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that benzodiazepines are associated with adverse effects on human health.
12	noradrenaline secreting glomus jugulare tumor with cyclic change of blood pressure	Noradrenaline secreting glomus jugulare is a tumour with a cyclic change in blood pressure.
12	effects of gastrointestinal hormones on vascular smooth muscle	Effects of gastro hormones-intestinal on the vascular smooth muscle.
12	fetal stress from methadone withdrawal	Fetal stress due to the withdrawal of methadone.
12	dopamine sensitive adenylyl cyclase in human caudate nucleus a study in control subjects and schizophrenic patients	Dopamine-sensitive adenylyl cyclase in the human caudate nucleus, studied in both control and schizophrenic patients.
12	cerebrospinal fluid amine metabolites in acute schizophrenia	Aminocephalic fluid metabolites-rachidian in acute schizophrenia.
12	dynamic analysis of gravimetric response of isolated dog hindlimb	In this case, a single hindlimb of a dog is considered to be the same as a single hindlimb.
12	calcium and angiotensin tachyphylaxis in rat uterine smooth muscle	Tachchyphylaxis with calcium and apos; angiotensin in the smooth muscle of the uterus of the rat.
12	salicylate tryptophan and tyrosine hypothermia	Tryptophan salicylate tyrosine hypothermia.
12	distribution of biogenic amines in the hippocampal formation in the rabbit	Biogenic amine distribution in rabbit l&apos formation; hippocampus.
12	mechanism of cholecystokinin inhibition of lower esophageal sphincter pressure	Cholicystokinin inhibits the lower pressure of the esophageal sphincter.
12	plasma hormone and renal function changes in unrestrained dogs exposed to cold	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
12	effects of alveolar and perfusion hypoxia and hypercapnia on pulmonary vascular resistance in the lamb	Effects of Lapse; Hypoxia and Lapse; Alveolar and Perfusion Hypercapnia on Pulmonary Vascular Resistance in Lamb.
12	cardiovascular responsiveness to beta adrenergic stimulation and blockade in chronic hypoxia	Cardiovascular reactivity to adrenergic β-stimulation and block in the apos; chronic hypoxia.
12	hypothalamic heating and cooling in monoamine depleted rabbits	Hypothalamic cooling and heating in monoamine-depleted rabbits.
12	postnatal development of adenylate cyclase in rat salivary glands patterns of hormonal sensitivity	Postnatal development of etapos; adenylate cyclase in the salivary glands of rats showed hormonal sensitivity.
12	effect of methylprednisolone upon arterial pressure and the renin angiotensin system in the rat	Effect of Methylprednisolone on Arterial Pressure and Renin System @-@Angiotensin in Rat.
12	bioassay of oxytocin on the superfused mammary gland of the mouse using an automatic apparatus	In addition, it is important to note that there is a need for additional information on the use of ocytocin in breast implants.
12	influence of halothane on the effects of endogenous and exogenous noradrenaline on the isolated rabbit heart perfused at constant pressure	L' influence of l' halothane on the effects of exogenous and endogenous noradrenaline on the isolated constant pressure perfused rabbit heart.
12	prevention of decompression sickness during a simulated space docking mission	It's the first time you'll be able to see the world through the lens of your senses.
12	analysis of the dynamic action of vasoactive substances on the blood pressure of rabbits author s transl	The study of the effects of vasoactive substances on blood pressure in rabbits.
12	selective denervation of the autonomic nerve supply of the nasal mucosa	Selective apos denervation; autonomic nervous supply to the nasal mucosa.
12	rate limiting factors in sympathetic neurotransmitter secretion	The rate-limiting secretion of sympathetic neurotransmitters.
12	control of the neurotoxicity of 6 hydroxydopamine by intraneuronal noradrenaline in rat iris	Control of Neurotoxicity of 6 Hydroxydopamine by Intraneuronal Noradrenaline in Rat Iris.
12	psychophysiological and neurophysiological aspects of schizophrenia	Psychophysiological and Neurophysiological Aspects of Schizophrenia.
12	biochemical research into psychosis	Psychotic biochemical research.
12	effectiveness of prodigiozan in the therapy of chronic nonspecific diseases of the lungs	prodigiozan's efficacy in the treatment of non-specific chronic lung diseases.
12	the stimulation by transmitter substances and putative transmitter substances of the net activity of phospholipase a2 of synaptic membranes of cortex of guinea pig brain	Stimulation by putative rat brain transmitter and transmitter substances; net phospholipase a2 activity of guinea-pig brain synaptic membranes.
12	photically induced epilepsy in papio papio as a model for drug studies	Papio papio-induced epilepsy as a model for drug studies.
12	effect of reserpine on the potency of alpha receptor blockers	Effect of reserpine on alpha receptor blocker power.
12	drug interactions with dopamin stimulated adenylate cyclasses of caudate nucleus and retina direct agonist effect of a piribedil metabolite	Drug interactions with dopamine stimulated d' caudate nucleus adenylate and l' direct retinal agonist effect d' a piribedil metabolite.
12	an abdominal left ventricular assist device preclinical studies	Dapos preclinical studies; left abdominal ventricular assist.
12	failure of methylhistidines to inhibit platelet aggregation at concentrations found in uremic plasma	Methylhistidines do not inhibit the plaques; platelet aggregation at uremic plasma levels.
12	dopamine in essential arterial hypertension excretion of its metabolite homovanillic acid	Dopamine in the bloodstream; essential hypertension of the bloodstream; excretion of its metabolite l' homovanillic acid.
12	studies on the carbohydrate moiety of dopamine beta hydroxylase interaction of the enzyme with concanavalin a	Carbohydrate portion studies; interaction of dopamine beta hydroxylase in apos; enzyme with concanavalin a.
12	simulation of catecholamine action in an improved electrical model	Simulation of the apos; action of catecholamines in improved electrical model.
12	enhancement of hypothalamic pressor responses in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Stimulation of hypothalamic pressor responses in hypertensive, spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	catecholamine release mechanism of mercury induced vascular smooth muscle contraction	The mechanism of release of catecholamines from mercury induced contraction of the vascular smooth muscle.
12	amphetamine and apomorphine responses in the rat following 6 ohda lesions of the nucleus accumbens septi and corpus striatum	Amphetamines and l' apomorphine responses to 6 ohda lesions of nucleus accumbens septi and corpus striatum.
12	differentiation of calcium activation mechanisms in vascular smooth muscle by selective suppression with verapamil and d 600 1	Dapos differentiation; vascular smooth muscle calcium activation by selective removal with verapamil and d 600.1.
12	pharmacological receptors of the cerebral arteries of the goat	Goat brain artery pharmacological receptors.
12	ajamline induced changes in mechanical and electrical activity of vascular smooth muscle	It was found that the vascular smooth muscle and the vascular smooth muscle were both mechanically and electrically active.
12	plasma catecholamines in severely injured patients a prospective study on 45 patients with multiple injuries	Plasma catecholamines in severely-injured patients, prospective study of 45 multiple-injury patients.
12	noradrenaline and motor transmission in the vas deferens of the mouse	Motor transmission and noradrenaline in mouse vas deferens.
12	effect of morphine on adrenergic transmission in the mouse vas deferens assessment of agonist and antogonist potencies of narcotic analgesics	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
12	the effect of some bacterial products on temperature and sleep in rat	L' effect of certain bacterial agents on the rat temperature and sleep.
12	on the phospholipase activity in bovine seminal vesicles and its possible role in the regulation of the prostaglandin biosynthesis	On the apos; bovine seminal vesicle phospholipase activity and its possible role in the regulation of prostaglandin biosynthesis.
12	urine norepinephrine excretion in patients undergoing mitral or aortic valve replacement with morphine anesthesia	Norepinephrine (Norepinephrine, Norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norephrine, norephrine, norephrine, norephrine, norephrine, etc.
12	venomotor changes caused by halothane acting on the sympathetic nerves	In addition to the above, there are a number of other medications that can be used.
12	neurons from fetal rat brain in a new cell culture system a multidisciplinary analysis	Neurons in fetal rat brain in a new multidisciplinary cell culture system.
12	effect of withdrawal from chronic ethanol ingestion on the camp response of cerebral cortical slices using the agonists histamine serotonin and other neurotransmitters	Effect of withdrawal; chronic ingestion of apo; ethanol on brain cortical slice camp response using histamine serotonin and dapos; other neurotransmitters.
12	dopamine b hydroxylase and catecholamines in an olfactory esthesioneuroma	Dopamine b hydroxylase and the catecholamines in an olfactory esteuroma.
12	vascular reactivity to noradrenaline potassium chloride and angiotensin ii in the rat perfused mesenteric vasculature preparation during the development of renal hypertension	Vascular reactivity to potassium chloride and to angiotensin ii of noradrenaline in the perfused rat mesenteric vascular preparation during development of renal hypertension.
12	chronotropic response to acetylcholine injected into the sinus node artery of the isolated atrium of the dog	Chronotropic response to apos; acetylcholine injected into apos; apos sinus node artery; isolated dog atrium.
12	thick filaments in vertebrate smooth muscle	Thick filaments in the muscle of the vertebrates.
12	catecholamine fluorescence in the pituitary of the eel anguilla anguilla with special reference to its variation during background adaptation	Fluorescence of catecholamines in eelgrass; hypophysis of eelgrass; eelgrass, eelgrass, eelgrass, eelgrass, eelgrass, eelgrass, eelgrass, eelgrass and eelgrass.
12	the aminergic innervation of the pituitary gland in the roach leuciscus rutilus	Apos; apos aminergic innervation; pituitary in roach leuciscus rutilus.
12	effect of some autonomic drugs on heat defence in the pigeon	Some self-contained drugs affect thermal defense in pigeons.
12	the effect of exogenous catecholamines on the cardiac rhythm and thermoregulation of hibernating hedgehogs erinaceus europaeus l	L' exogenous catecholamine effect on heart rate and thermoregulation of hibernating erinaceus europaeus hedgehogs.
12	modulation by prostaglandins of adrenergic transmission in the isolated perfused rabbit and rat kidney	Prostaglandin modulation of adrenergic transmission in perfused isolated rabbit and rat kidney.
12	histamine potentiation of nerve and drug induced responses of a rabbit cerebral artery	Potentiation by the nerve histamine and the drug also elicited responses from rabbit brain artery.
12	correlation between the response of the heart to sympathetic stimulation and the release of endogenous catecholamines into the coronary sinus of the dog	The cardiac response to sympathetic stimulation correlates with endogenous catecholamine release in the dog coronary sinus.
12	bronchopulmonary arterial shunting without anatomic anastomosis in the dog	Anatomic anastomosis does not occur in dogs.
12	direct effect of beta adrenergic stimulation on renin release by the rat kidney slice in vitro	Direct effect of beta-adrenergic stimulation on renin release from rat kidney in vitro.
12	changes in rat adrenal medulla following delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol treatment a histochemical study	Changes in the adrenal medulla of the rat following treatment with delta9 tetrahydrocannabinol, histochemical study.
12	catecholamines in urine an evaluation of alumina trihydroxyindole methods and a description of an improved method	Catecholamines in urine, evaluation of the apo-trihydroxyindole methods; alumina and alumina; an improved method.
12	results of a study on the circadian rhythm of catecholamine excretion on normal subjects and those with high excretion levels author s transl	Results from a study of circadian rhythm of apos; catecholamine excretion in normal and high-excretion subjects.
12	mechanism of vascular hyperresponsiveness in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	It is not possible to determine the cause of hypertension in the rat.
12	pharmacological effects of alpha methyldopa alpha methylnorepinephrine and octopamine on rat arteriolar arterial and terminal vascular smooth	Pharmacologic Effect of Apos; Alpha Methyldopa alpha Methynepinephrine and Apos; Octopamine on Apos; Arteriolar Artery and Terminal Vascular Stream.
12	possible contributions of endogenous prostaglandins to the control of blood pressure	Endogenous prostaglandins may contribute to blood pressure control.
12	rise in plasma free norepinephrine during anesthetic induction with ketamine	Anesthetic induction by ketamine; anesthetic induction by ketamine.
12	effect of low dose intra arterial reserpine on vascular wall norepinephrine content	Dosage of intraarterial reserpine to norepinephrine in the vascular wall.
12	role of noradrenaline and serotonin in the central control of blood pressure in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The role of noradrenaline and serotonin in central blood pressure control in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	central nervous systen alpha adrenergic mechanisms and cardiovascular regulation in rats	Central nervous system, cardiovascular regulation and alpha adrenergic mechanisms in rats.
12	centrally induced hypotension unreleated to alpha adrenergic stimulation	In addition, there was a significant increase in the incidence of hypertension and hypertension.
12	left ventricular pressure mural force relationship during sympathetic stimulation	Left ventricular pressure wall force ratio during sympathetic stimulation.
12	comparison of central effects of noradrenaline and dopamine injected into the lateral brain ventricle in rats	Comparison of the central effects of injected noradrenaline and dopamine into the lateral cerebral ventricle of rats.
12	rapid transport of noradrenaline in adrenergic axons of rat sciatic nerve distal to a crush	Rapid noradrenaline transport in distal rat sciatic nerve adrenergic axons at crushing.
12	on the noradrenaline loading in axonal amine storage granules in rat crushed sciated nerves	On the charge of noradrenaline in the granules of reserve d'apos; axonal amine in sawed nerves crushed rat.
12	synthesis of catecholamines in the eye after local injection of 3h precursors	Catecholamine synthesis in the eye after local precursor injection 3h.
12	vasomotor nerve control of isolated arteries and veins	The control of the vasomotor nerve of the isolated veins and arteries.
12	intracellular distribution of amines taken up by rat mast cells	Intracellular distribution of absorbed rat mast cell amines.
12	specific and unspecific removal of circulating noradrenaline in pulmonary and systemic vascular beds in man	Specific and nonspecific elimination of circulating noradrenaline from human lung and systemic vascular beds.
12	affinity of noradrenaline and dopamine for neural alpha receptors mediating negative feedback control of noradrenaline secretion in human vasoconstrictor nerves	L' the affinity of noradrenaline and dopamine for neuronal alpha receptors mediating a negative feedback control of the secretion of noradrenaline in human vasoconstrictor nerves.
12	clinical experimental studies in patients with asympathicotonic hypotension	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the efficacy of the drug.
12	the nyctohemeral rhythm of plasma prolactin effects of ganglionectomy pinealectomy constant light constant darkness or 6 oh dopamine administration	Nycto-pharmal rhythm of effects of plasma prolactin from constant light Pinealectomy or dopamine 6 oh.
12	narcotic withdrawal like mouse jumping produced by amphetamine and l dopa	Narcotic withdrawal such as mouse jumping produced by drugs such as amphetamine and dopa l.
12	reactivity of isolated bovine mesenteric and hepatic veins to vasoactive agents and specific antigen	Reactivity of isolated mesenteric and hepatic veins from cattle to the vasoactive agents and to the specific antigen.
12	enterohepatic haemodynamics in calves during acute systemic anaphylaxis	Acute systemic anaphylaxis of the enterohepatic hemodynamics of calves.
12	adrenergic lipolysis in human adipose tissue in vitro	Human adipose tissue adrenergic liposis in vitro.
12	the central modulatory effect of clonidine on the cardiodepressor reflex after suppression of synthesis and storage of noradrenaline	L' central modulatory effect of clonidine on cardiodepressor reflex after noradrenaline synthesis and storage is suppressed.
12	effects of clonidine on baroreceptor function in anesthetized dogs	Effects of Clonidine on Baroreceptor Function in Anaesthetized Dogs.
12	comparison of structural and stereoisomers of apomorphine on stereotyped behavior of the rat	Comparison of the apos structure and stereoisomers; apomorphine on the stereotypic behaviour of the rat.
12	effects of clonidine on morphine withdrawal signs in the rat	Effects of Clonidine on Signs of Morphine Withdrawal in Rat.
12	changes in imipramine induced noradrenaline potentiation by varying activity of gastric juice under oral medication	L' imipramine induced a potentiation of noradrenaline by variable oral gastric juice activity.
12	elevated left ventricular stiffness by noradrenaline in myocardial ischaemia	Left ventricular stiffness elevated by the noradrenaline in the apos; myocardial ischemia.
12	effects of phentolamine on the sa node of the dog heart in situ	Effects of phentolamine on dog heart node in situ.
12	cardiovascular studies of 5 3 tert butylamino 2 hydroxy propoxy 3 4 dihydrocarbostyril hydrochloride opc 1085 a new potent beta adrenergic blocking agent	Cardiovascular studies of 5-tert-hydrochloride @-@butylamino 2-hydroxypropoxy-3,4-dihydrocarbostyril opc 1085, a potent new beta-adrenergic blocking agent.
12	mechanical responses to catecholamines in isolated strips of the guinea pig stomach muscle	Mechanical catecholamine responses in isolated strips of guinea pig gastric muscle.
12	effect of beta phenylethylamine derivatives on the central nervous system iii motor activity changes in mice due to the intracerebral administration of metaraminol	Effect of beta derivatives @-@phenylethylamine on central nervous system iii changes in lacid; mouse motor activity; metaraminol intracerebral administration.
12	adrenoceptors and autonomic nerve control mechanisms in the biliary tract	Adrenoceptors and mechanisms of autonomic control in the human biliary tract.
12	effect of dopamine on perfusion pressure in rat peripheral blood vessels	Effect of dopamine on the perfusion pressure of the rat peripheral blood vessels.
12	spasmolytic activity of two synthetic anilide local anaesthetics	Spasmolytic activity of two local synthetic anesthetic anesthetic anesthetic.
12	comparative circulatory effects of adrenaline and noradrenaline during intra osseous dental anaesthesia	Adrenalin, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine, norepinephrine and norepinephrine.
12	effect of bordetella pertussis extract and vasoactive amines on vascular permeability	Effect of the drug on vascular permeability; effect of edetella pertussis extract and vasoactive amines.
12	progesterone mediated increase in monoamine stores and the regulation of enzymes of biosynthesis and metabolism in the adrenal gland during late pregnancy in the rat	Progesterone promoted increased accumulation of monoamines and regulation of adrenal organ biosynthetic and metabolizing enzymes in late gestation in rats.
12	some effects of pilocarpine and acetylcholine on the responses of the guinea pig vas deferens to hypogastric nerve stimulation and transmural stimulation and applied minus noradrenaline	Some effects of pilocarpine and l' acetylcholine on the guinea-pig vas deferens responses to hypogastric and transmural nerve stimulation, and applied less noradrenaline.
12	microiontophoretic studies of the effects of false transmitter candidates and amphetamine on cerebellar purkinje cells	Microiontophoretic studies of the effects of candidate false transmitters and apos; amphetamine on the cerebellar purkinje cells.
12	intra and extraneuronal formation of the two major noradrenaline metabolites in the cns of rats	Intra and extraneuronal formation of the major metabolites of noradrenaline in cn channels of rats.
12	adenosine 3 5 monophosphate content in rat caudate nucleus demonstration of dopaminergic and adrenergic receptors	The monophosphate content of the adenosine 3-5 in the caudate nucleus of the rat demonstrates the existence of both dopaminergic and adrenergic receptors.
12	simple isolated perfused artery preparation vasoconstrictor evaluation	This is a simple evaluation of the vasoconstrictors of the preparation of isolated perfused artery.
12	specific effect of 5 6 dihydroxytryptamine on the monoamine fluorophore of the frog s gustatory cells	Specific effect of 5-6 dihydroxytryptamine on frog gustatory cell fluorophore monoamine.
12	effects of thyrotropin releasing hormone trh on the actions of pentobarbital and other centrally acting drugs	Effects of Thyrotropin Releasing Apos; Hormone Trh on the Actions of Pentobarbital and Dapos; Other Central Action Drugs.
12	induction of tyrosine hydroxylase elicited by beta adrenergic receptor agonists in normal and decentralized sympathetic ganglia role of cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate	Induction of tyrosine hydroxylase induced by beta-adrenoceptor agonists in decentralized and normal sympathetic ganglia of the role of d&apos monophosphate; cyclic adenosine 3.
12	free fatty acids as feedback regulators of adenylate cyclase and cyclic 3 5 amp accumulation in rat fat cells	Free fatty acids as retroactive regulators of apo; adenylate cyclase and apo; cyclic accumulation of 3,5 amperes in adipose cells of rat.
12	simultaneous estimation of catecholamines and serotonin after purification on ion exchange resin	Simultaneous estimation of serotonin and catecholamines after purification with ion exchange resin.
12	some physiological aspects of bone marrow pressure	Certain Physiological Aspects of Bone Marrow Pressure.
12	tryptamines and some other substances affecting waking and sleep in fowls	It is not possible to detect the presence of other substances in the body.
12	discrimination of monoamine uptake by membranes of adrenal chromaffin granules	Discrimination of l' absorption of monoamines by adrenal chromaffin granule membranes is evident.
12	the effects of catecholamines and adrenoceptor blocking drugs on the canine peripheral lymph flow	The effects of adrenoceptor inhibitors and catecholamines on peripheral canine lymphatic flux.
12	indomethacin potentiation of the response of the rabbit portal vein to electrical stimulation effect of stimulus frequency and train length	Indomethacin potentiation of rabbit portal vein response to electrical stimulation of stimulus frequency and train length.
12	evidence for prostaglandin mediated prejunctional control of renal sympathetic transmitter release and vascular tone	Evidence of prostaglandin-mediated prejunctional control of the release of the renal sympathetic transmitter and of vascular tone.
12	adrenergic and cholinergic receptors in the human prostate prostatic capsule and bladder neck	Adrenergic and cholinergic receptors are found in the prostate capsule of the human prostate and the neck of the bladder.
12	plasma norepinephrine and epinephrine in acromegaly	Norepinephrine and acromegaly plasma epinephrine.
12	cardiovascular drug interactions	Cardiovascular drug-drug interactions.
12	influence of sympathomimetic drugs on the motility of bovine teat muscles	Symptomimetic drugs influence muscle motility in cattle teats.
12	segmental analysis of spinal cord monoamines after thoracic transection in the dog	A segmental analysis of the monoamines of the spinal cord following a thoracic section in the dog.
12	tuberoinfundibular neurons dopaminergic and norepinephrinergic sensitivity	In addition, there are a number of neuropathic and norepinephrine neuropathic pathways.
12	dopamine and norepinephrine levels in the nucleus accumbens olfactory tubercle and corpus striatum following lesions in the ventral tegmentalarea	Norepinephrine and dopamine levels in the olfactory tuber and corpus striata of the nucleus accumbens following ventral tegmental lesions.
12	interactions between lysergic acid diethylamide and dopamine sensitive adenylate cyclase systems in rat brain	Interactions between l&apos diethylamide; lysergic acid and dopamine-sensitive adenylate cyclase systems in the rat brain.
12	monoaminergic mechanisms of stimulation produced analgesia	Monoaminergic stimulatory mechanisms caused analgesia.
12	the effect of monoamine oxidase inhibition on formation fixation and reproduction of temporary connections	L' effect of apos; inhibition of monoamine oxidase on temporary connection formation, attachment and reproduction.
12	the effect of caesium on adrenergic transmission in rabbit vas deferens	L' effect of cesium on the rabbit vas deferens' adrenergic transmission.
12	neurochemical mechanisms of the inhibitory influence of the hippocampus on the conditioned food getting reaction in rats	Neurochemical mechanisms of apos; inhibitory influence of apos; hippocampus on conditioned food, causing response in rats.
12	clopimozide r 29 764 a new highly potent and orally long acting neuroleptic of the diphenylbutylpiperidine series	Clopimozide r 29,764 is a new, highly potent diphenylbutylpiperidine long-acting oral neuroleptic.
12	a comparison of his bundle electrograms recorded from the aortic root and from a plaque sutured near the his bundle	A comparison of its dapos beams; electrograms recorded from aortic root and dapos; a sutured plate near its beam.
12	role of monoamines in the control by hormones of sexual receptivity in the female rat	Role of monoamines in hormonal responsivity control in female rat.
12	degeneration and regeneration of adrenergic nerves in mesenteric blood vessels iris and atrium of the rat after 6 hydroxydopamine injection	Adrenergic nerve degeneration and regeneration in the rat mesenteric vascular atria and irises after 6 injections of apos; hydroxydopamine.
12	effects of increased arterial pressure on blood flow in the damaged brain	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to increased blood pressure in the brain.
12	concentration gradients of monoamine metabolites in human cerebrospinal fluid	The concentration gradient of the monoamino metabolites in the human cerebrospinal fluid.
12	orthostatic hypotension associated with paroxysmal ventricular tachycardia	Orthostatic hypotension, paroxysmal ventricular tachycardia.
12	aminergic nuclei in the hypothalamus of the roach leuciscus rutilus	Nucleic acid (Nucleic acid) is the most common type of protein.
12	the correlation between spontaneous contractions and postjunctional supersensitivity of the smooth muscle of the rat vas deferens	Spontaneous contractions correlate with postive hypersensitivity-junctional rat vas deferens smooth muscle.
12	inhibition of brain catecholamine synthesis and release of prolactin and luteinizing hormone in the ovariectomized rat	Cerebral catecholamine synthesis inhibition and prolactin and d&apos release; luteinizing hormone in ovariectomized rat.
12	regulation of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate levels in guinea pig cerebral cortex by interaction of alpha adrenergic and adenosine receptor activity	Regulation of d&apos levels; adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate in guinea-pig cerebral cortex via apos; l&apos interaction; alpha-adrenergic receptor and adenosine activity.
12	long term effects of p chloroamphetamine and related drugs on central serotonergic mechanisms	Long-Term Effects of Pchloroamphetamine and Related Drugs on Core Serotonergic Mechanisms.
12	brown adipose tissue in the new born calf bos taurus	Brown fat in new-ne bos taurus taurus.
12	changes in monoamine concentrations in mouse brain associated with ethanol dependence and withdrawal	Changes in Monoamine Levels in Mouse Brain Associated with Drug Dependence; Ethanol and Withdrawal.
12	analysis of the effects on body temperature of intracerebroventricular injection in anaesthetized dogs of gamma aminobutyric acid	Analysis of body temperature effects of apos; apos intracerebroventricular injection; aminobutyric gamma acid in anesthetized dogs.
12	distribution of alpha and beta adrenoceptors in human urinary bladder	Alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor distribution in the human bladder.
12	atropine resistant effects of the muscarinic agonists mcn a 343 and ahr 602 on cardiac performance and the release of noradrenaline from sympathetic nerves of the perfused rabbit heart	Effects of resistance to apos; atropine of muscarinic agonists mcn to 343 and ahr to 602 on cardiac performance and noradrenaline release from rabbit perfused sympathetic nerves.
12	release of prostaglandins from the rabbit perfused kidney effects of vasoconstrictors	Prostaglandin release by rabbit vasoconstrictor-infused renal effects.
12	virus infections in infant mice causing persistent impairment of turnover of brain catecholamines	Viral Infections in Newborn Mice-Causing Persistent Alteration of Brain Catecholamine Renewal.
12	the mechanism of renin release from the ischaemic kidney	The mechanism of release of the renin from the ischemic kidney.
12	secretion of anterior pituitary hormones in man effects of ethyl alcohol	Effects of alcohol; ethyl alcohol on the secretion of men's previous pituitary hormones.
12	n the mechanism of inhibitory action of vibrations as studied in a molluscan catch muscle and in vertebrate vascular smooth muscle	The inhibitory action of vibration was studied in a shellfish harvesting muscle and in vascular smooth muscle of vertebrates.
12	effects of iprindole on responses of single cortical and caudate neurones to monoamines and acetylcholine	Effects of apos; iprindole on the responses of caudate and cortical neurons to apos and monoamines; and acetylcholine.
12	effects of norepinephrine and angiotensin ii on the determinants of glomerular ultrafiltration and proximal tubule fluid reabsorption in the rat	Effects of norepinephrine and apos; angiotensin ii on determinants of apos; glomerular ultrafiltration and reabsorption of fluid from proximal tubules in rats.
12	effects of neurotransmitters injected into the posterior and the anterior septal artery on the automaticity of the atrioventricular junctional area of the dog heart	Neurotransmitter effects injected into the apos; posterior and anterior septal artery on the apos; automatic atrioventricular junction zone of the dog heart.
12	interactions of morphine adenosine adenosine triphosphate and phosphodiesterase inhibitors on the field stimulated guinea pig ileum	Morphine adenosine triphosphate interactions with phosphodiesterase inhibitors in the field stimulate guinea pig ileum.
12	analysis of changes in reactivity of rabbit arteries and veins two weeks after induction of hypertension by coarctation of the abdominal aorta	Analysis of rabbit arterial and venous reactivity changes 2 weeks after onset; induction of apos; hypertension by coarctation of apos; abdominal aorta.
12	effects of an inotropic agent ro 2 2985 x 537a on regional blood flow and myocardial function in chronically instrumented conscious dogs and anesthetized dogs	Effects of inotropic agent 2,2985 x 537a on the regional blood flow and myocardial function of chronically-instrumented and anesthetized dogs.
12	the development and evaluation of a semi automated assay for catecholamines suitable for plasma and urine	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
12	behavior and the balance between norepinephrine and serotonin	Norepinephrine and Serotonin Behaviour and Balance.
12	formation of dopamine and noradrenaline in rat vas deferens comparison with guinea pig vas deferens	Comparison of noradrenaline and dopamine formation in the rat vas deferens and guinea pig vas deferens.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effects of reserpine on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission	Electrophysiological analysis of reserpine effects on neuromuscular adrenergic transmission.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effects of amine uptake blockers and alpha adrenoceptor blockers on adrenergic neuromuscular transmission	An electrophysiological analysis of the effects of amine and alpha-adrenoceptor blockers on neuromuscular adrenergic transmission.
12	an electrophysiological analysis of the effect of ca ions on neuromuscular transmission in the mouse vas deferens	An electrophysiological analysis of the apos; effect of ca ions on mouse vas deferens neuromuscular transmission.
12	physical and adrenergic factors affecting systemic vascular resistance in the rainbow trout a comparison with branchial vascular resistance	Physical and Adrenergic Factors Affecting Systemic Vascular Resistance in Arctic Trout-in-Sky as compared to Branch Vascular Resistance.
12	effects of intraventricular 6 hydroxydopamine and replacement therapy with norepinephrine dopamine and serotonin on self stimulation in diencephalic and mesencephalic regions in the rat	Intraventricular 6 hydroxydopamine and replacement therapy with norpinephrine dopamine and serotonin on self-stimulation in diencephalic and mesencephalic regions in rat.
12	the relationship of plasma levels of pindolol in hypertensive patients to effects on blood pressure plasma renin and plasma noradrenaline levels	Relationship between plasma pindolol levels in hypertensive patients and effects on plasma renin and noradrenaline levels of blood pressure.
12	cardiovascular effects of prazosin in normotensive and genetically hypertensive rats	Cardiovascular Effects of Prazosin in Normotensive and Genetically Hypertensive Rats.
12	9 chloro 2 3 dihydro 5h 1 4 dioxepino 6 5 b benzofuran a novel antilipidemic agent structurally related to clofibrate	This is a new anti-lipidemic agent that is structurally related to clofibrate.
12	behavioral and biochemical interactions of 5 7 dihydroxytryptamine with various drugs when administered intracisternally to adult and developing rats	Behavioural and biochemical interactions of 57 dihydroxytryptamine with a variety of drugs when administered intracisternally to both developing and adult rats.
12	catecholaminergic mechanisms of the lateral hypothalamus their role in the mediation of amphetamine anorexia	Catecholaminergic mechanisms of apos; lateral hypothalamus involvement in the mediation of apos; amphetamine anorexia.
12	tail pinch induced eating gnawing and licking behavior in rats dependence on the nigrostriatal dopamine system	The pinching of the tail caused the rats to become addicted to the dopaminergic nigrostriatal system that gnawed and licked them.
12	effects of 6 hydroxydopamine on central noradrenaline neurons during ontogeny	Effects of 6 on the central neurons of noradrenaline during ontogeny.
12	quantitative localization of biogenic amines in the spinal cord	Quantitative localization of biogenic spinal cord amines.
12	effect of hypothalamic implants changing monoamine levels on continuous estrus in rats induced by androgen treatment in the neonatal period	Effect of androgen-induced hypothalamic implants modifying the levels of monoamine in neonatal androgen-induced diabetic rats.
12	thermoregulation in the rabbit following intracranial injection of norepinephrine	Thermoregulation in rabbits after norepinephrine was injected intracranially.
12	effects of phentolamine dihydroergocristine and isoxsuprine on the blood pressure and heart rate in normotensive hypotensive and hypertensive rats	Effects of Phentolamine Dihydroergocrystin and Isoxsuprine on Blood Pressure and Heart Rate in Normotensive Hypotensive and Hypertensive Rats.
12	discrepancies in the measurement of changes in blood flow using flow and velocity sensitive electromagnetic probes	Deviations in measurement of blood flow changes at apo; aid of electromagnetic probes sensitive to rate and velocity.
12	idiopathic orthostatic hypotension shy drager syndrome results of regional cerebral blood flow measurements author s transl	Bashful drager syndrome results from regional measurements of cerebral blood flow.
12	central noradrenergic regulation of cerebral blood flow and vascular permeability	Central noradrenergic regulation of cerebral blood flow and permeability.
12	the effect of glucagon on glomerular filtration rate in dogs during reduction of renal blood flow	L' effect of glucagon on the rate of glomerular filtration in dogs during the reduction of the renal blood flow.
12	the effect of noradrenaline adrenergic blocking agents and tyramine on the intrarenal distribution of blood flow in the baboon	Effect of norepinephrine and tyramine adrenergic inhibitors on intrarenal blood flow distribution in baboon.
12	the effect of simultaneous administration of levarterenol and phentolamine on renal blood flow	It can also be used to reduce the risk of heart failure, such as heart failure.
12	effect of vasoactive agents on the distribution of renal cortical blood flow in dogs	Effect of vasoactive agents on coronary blood flow distribution in dogs.
12	effects of quinidine on blood flow rate and developed tension in blood perfused canine papillary muscle	The effects of quinidine on developed tension and blood flow in canine papillary muscle perfused with blood were observed.
12	neurogenic influence on local cerebral blood flow effect of catecholamines or sympathetic stimulation as correlated with the sympathetic innervation	The effect of catecholamines or of sympathetic stimulation on the local cerebral blood flow is correlated with apo; sympathetic innervation.
12	neural control of cochlear blood flow	The neural regulation of the cochlea's blood flow rate should be regulated.
12	time course changes in blood pressure urinary excretion of norepinephrine and dopamine after administration of fusaric acid in a single dose in elderly hypertensive patients	Norepinephrine and dopamine urinary excretion after dosing; single dose of apos; fusaric acid to elderly hypertensive patients varies over time.
12	effect of prolonged administration of clonidine to spontaneously hypertensive rats on blood pressure cerebral norpinephrine content and angiographic finding in the kidney	Effect of apo; clonidine prolonged administration to spontaneously hypertensive rats on blood pressure, brain norepinephrine content and kidney angiography.
12	the functional state of the sympathetic adrenal system and blood coagulation in transitory cerebral circulatory disorders	L' functional status of the adrenal sympathetic system and blood clotting in transient circulatory disorders of the brain.
12	changes in local cerebral blood flow during increased general arterial pressure in animals	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - Acute and chronic inflammation of the nervous system.
12	norepinephrine and isoprenaline induced changes of peripheral blood flow acceleration caused by changes of cardiac inotropy	Norepinephrine and isoprenaline induced changes in the apos; increased peripheral blood flow due to changes in the apos; cardiac inotropy.
12	blood pressure responses to catecholamines during beta adrenergic blockade with propranolol in hypertensive subjects	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
12	influence of adipose tissue blood flow on the lipolytic response to circulating noradrenaline at normal and reduced ph	L' influence of the blood flow of adipose tissue on the lipolytic response to circulating noradrenaline to normal and to reduced ph.
12	the effect of behavioral stimulant doses of amphetamine on blood pressure	Lapos; dose-response; behavioural-enhancing amphetamine to blood pressure.
12	blood pressure responses to noradrenaline and dopamine infusions in parkinson s disease and the shy drager syndrome	Blood Pressure Reactions to Noradrenaline and Dopamine Infusions in Parkinson's Disease and Shy Drager's Syndrome.
12	a method for determining segmental resistances in the microcirculation from pressure flow measurements	A method to determine microcirculation segmental resistances from pressure-rate measurements.
12	role of endogenous prostaglandins in regulation of uterine blood flow and adrenergic neurotransmission	The role of endogenous prostaglandins in the regulation of adrenergic neurotransmission and uterine blood flow.
12	blood pressure effects of lower abdominal aortic surgery with particular reference to the use of morphine and droperidol in modifying the responses	Effect on blood pressure from the surgery of the apos; lower abdominal aorta, especially the apos; use morphine and droperidol to modify response.
12	effect of norepinephrine on intramyocardial distribution of blood flow in normal and ischemic myocardium	Effect of norepinephrine on intramyocardial blood flow distribution in normal and ischemic myocardium.
12	cause of the disproportion between the vast increase in plasma renin and the only small if any increase in blood pressure after manipulation of the submaxillary gland	Cause of disproportion between apos; considerable plasma renin increase and only slight, if any, increase in blood pressure after gland manipulation under-maxillary.
12	effects of beta adrenergic blockade on diurnal variability of blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline levels	Effects of β-adrenergic blockade on the diurnal variability of plasma blood pressure and noradrenaline levels.
12	effect of cerebrospinal fluid removal on cerebral blood flow and metabolism in the baboon influence of tyrosine infusion and cerebral embolism on cerebrospinal fluid pressure autoregulation	Effect of apos; cerebral spinal fluid removal-spinal fluid on baboon's cerebral blood flow Tyrosine infusion and cerebral embolism on the apos; cerebral fluid pressure self-regulation-spinal fluid pressure.
12	comparison of nerves to cerebral and extracerebral blood vessels a differential effect of alpha methyl tyrosine on norepinephrine content	Comparison of the nerves to the cerebral and extra-cerebral blood vessels of Apos; a differential effect of apos; alpha methyl tyrosine (α methyl tyrosine) on norepinephrine content.
12	tissue blood flow in brain liver renal cortex and renal medulla in experimental hemorrhagic shock	Acute hemorrhagic shock is an experimental type of hemorrhagic shock in the renal cortex of the brain and in the renal medulla.
12	role of prostaglandins in blood pressure regulation	The Role of Prostaglandins in Regulating Blood Pressure.
12	effect of catecholamines in blood flow in arteries of distribution	Effect of catecholamines on distribution artery blood flow.
12	continuous measurement of renal blood flow changes to renal nerve stimulation and intra arterial drug administration in the rat	Ongoing measurement of changes in renal blood flow at renal nerve stimulation and l' intra @-@arterial drug administration in rats.
12	entry of 3h norepinephrine 125i albumin and evans blue from blood into brain following unilateral osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier	Entry of norepinephrine 125i albumin 3h and d' blue evans of blood in the brain after opening of the osmotic unilaterally the blood barrier-encephalic.
12	influence of intravenously administered catecholamines on cerebral oxygen consumption and blood flow in the rat	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
12	the effects of lh adrenaline and noradrenaline on testicular blood flow and plasma testosterone concentrations in anaesthetized rats	Effects of adenosine and noradrenaline on plasma testosterone levels and testicular blood flow in anesthetized rats.
12	dithiothreitol induced alterations of blood pressure vascular reactivity and aortic microsomal calcium uptake in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Dithiothreitol induced alterations in vascular reactivity of blood pressure and in the uptake of microsomal aortic calcium in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
12	effect of exogenous noradrenaline on local cerebral blood flow after osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier in the rat	Effect of exogenous noradrenaline on the local cerebral blood flow following osmotic opening of the rat blood-barrier,-encephalic.
12	effect of adrenaline noradrenaline histamine and acetylcholine on the blood flow in the vascular bed of the bone marrow	Effect of apos; adrenaline noradrenaline histamine and apos; acetylcholine on blood flow in bone marrow.
12	influence of the cerebrovascular sympathetic innervation on regional flow autoregulation and blood brain barrier function	Influence of the apos; sympathetic cerebrovascular innervation on the apos; self-regulation of the regional flow and function of the blood barrier.
12	autoregulation of cerebral blood flow during alcohol infusion	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of brain blood flow control during infusion.
12	interaction between noradrenergic and serotonergic mechanisms on the central regulation of blood pressure in the rat a study using experimental central hypertension produced by chemical lesions of the locus coeruleus	Interaction of serotonergic and noradrenergic mechanisms on central regulation of rat blood pressure, study using the experimental central hypertension produced by chemical lesions of locus coeruleus.
12	comparison of the effect of catecholamines on the blood flow in the coronary and in the femoral circulation	Comparison of apo; catecholamine effect on coronary and femoral blood flow.
12	influence of somatostatin on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in the rat	Somatostatin influences blood pressure and lipids; plasma renin activity in rat.
12	amphetamine induced increase in rat cerebral blood flow apparent lack of catecholamine involvement	In addition to the above, there is no evidence that the metabolite is associated with the metabolite.
12	response of norepinephrine and blood pressure to stress increases with age	Norepinephrine and blood pressure responses to stress increase with age.
12	pressure flow relationships and effects of noradrenaline and isoprenaline on the hepatic arterial and portal venous vascular beds of the dog	Pressure-rate ratios and effects of norepinephrine and isoprenaline on portal vascular and hepatic arterial beds in dogs.
12	blood pressure and mesenteric blood flow in rats during the infusion of biogenic amines effect of supralethal irradiation	Arterial pressure and mesenteric blood flow rate in the rat during infusion of biogenic amines, effect of apos; supra-ethal irradiation.
12	the potentiating effect of clorgyline and pyrogallol on the blood pressure responses to norepinephrine	L' clorgyline and pyrogallol potentiating effect on blood pressure responses to norepinephrine.
12	alpha and beta receptor blockade of isoproterenol and norepinephrine induced effects on regional blood flow and blood flow acceleration	Blocking of the alpha and beta receptors of l' isoproterenol and the effects induced by norepinephrine on regional blood flow and l' acceleration of blood flow.
12	clinical assessment of sympathetic tone orthostatic blood pressure responses in borderline primary hypertension	Clinical evaluation of the responses of the orthostatic arterial pressure of the sympathetic tone in the apos; primary hypertension limitation.
12	effect of immobilisation on the catecholamine and histamine induced responses of blood pressure and pulse rate in rats adapted to swimming and in controls	Lapos; effect of apos; immobilization on catecholamines and histamine; induced heart rate and blood pressure responses in swimming-adapted and control rats.
12	location of cns neurons mediating the blood pressure fall after shock induced fighting in the rat	The localization of blood pressure-mediating neurons following combat-induced shock in the rat.
12	interaction studies between three antidepressant drugs chlorimipramine imipramine and zimelidine and noradrenaline tyramine and vagal stimulation on the heart rate and blood pressure in dogs	Studies of interactions between three chlorimipramine imipramine/zimelidine/noradrenaline tyramine antidepressants and heart rate and blood pressure vagal stimulation in dogs.
12	plasma catecholamines and blood pressure responses to the carotid baroreceptor reflex in essential hypertension	Cardiovascular System (CPS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
12	changes in plasma norepinephrine blood pressure and heart rate during physical activity in hypertensive man	The Effect of Norpinephrine on the Rate of Hypertensive Maneuvers.
12	effects of catecholamines on cardiovascular response and blood flow distribution to normal tissue and liver tumors in rats	Effects of catecholamines on Cardiovascular Response and Blood Flow Distribution in Normal Tissues and Liver Tumours in Rats.
12	estimation of cerebral extraction of circulating compounds by the brain uptake index method influence of circulation time volume injection and cerebral blood flow	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
12	uterine blood flow and plasma norepinephrine changes during maternal stress in the pregnant ewe	Uterine blood flow and changes in plasma norepinephrine during pregnant sheep maternal stress.
12	clonidine increases the rate of blood pressure recovery from splanchnic nerve stimulation	Clonidine increases blood pressure recovery rate after splanchnic nerve stimulation.
12	quantitative changes in regional cerebral blood flow of rats induced by alpha and beta adrenergic stimulants	Quantitative changes in regional rat cerebral blood flow induced by alpha- and beta-adrenergic stimulants.
12	raised blood pressure and plasma noradrenaline concentrations in teenagers and young adults selected from an open population	Increased plasma noradrenaline levels and blood pressure in selected adolescents and young adults in an open population.
12	transient responses of rabbit cerebral blood vessels to norepinephrine correlation with intrinsic myogenic tone	Transient responses of the rabbit cerebral blood vessels to correlation of norepinephrine with intrinsic myogenic tone.
12	the concept of autoregulation of total blood flow and its role in hypertension	The apo concept; total blood flow self-regulation and its role in high blood pressure.
12	effects of norepinephrine vasopressin isoproterenol and histamine on blood flow oxygen uptake and capillary filtration coefficient in the colon of the anesthetized dog	Effects of isoproterenol norepinephrine vasopressin and apos; histamine on apos uptake; blood flow oxygen and hair filtration coefficient in anesthetized dog's colon.
12	mechanism of enhanced blood pressure rise after reclipping following removal of a renal artery clip in rats	In the rat, the mechanism d'apos; increase in arterial pressure increases after reclassification; ablation d'apos; a clip d'apos; renal artery.
12	effect of diphenylhydantoin on blood pressure of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effect of diphenylhydantoin on spontaneously hypertensive rat blood pressure.
12	a radioangiographic study of the effects of catecholamines on uteroplacental blood flow in the rhesus monkey	Radioangiographic study of catecholamine effects on utero blood flow-placentary in rhesus monkey.
12	ethnic differences in blood pressure with observations on noradrenaline and renin 1 a working population	Ethnic differences in blood pressure, with observations on noradrenaline and renin 1 as the active blood pressure.
12	increased sympathetic activity and blood pressure in young asymptomatic men with organic t wave aberrations in the electrocardiogram	An increase in blood pressure and sympathetic activity in young, asymptomatic men with organic aberrations of the t waves in the apos; electrocardiogram.
12	renal blood flow and noradrenaline secretion during treatment with propranolol	Norepinephrine secretion and renal blood flow during propranolol treatment.
12	effects of tiodazosin praxosin trimazosin and phentolamine on blood pressure heart rate and on pre and postsynaptic alpha adrenergic receptors in the rat	Effects of tiodazosine, praxosin, trimazosin, and phentolamine on rat heart rate and pre- and post-adrenergic alpha-adrenergic receptors.
12	blood pressure plasma catecholamines and sympathetic outflow in pithed shr and wky rats	Plasma catecholamines of arterial pressure and l' sympathetic efflux in decerebrate and wypsky rats.
12	effects of rate of blood flow on fractional extraction and on uptake of infused noradrenaline by brown adipose tissue in vivo	Blood flow effects on fractional extraction and noradrenaline uptake by brown adipose tissue in vivo.
13	changes in the potassium content of sea urchin eggs on fertilization	In addition, there were no changes in the amount of potassium in the eggs of sea urchins during fertilization.
13	the loss of potassium from frog nerves in anoxia and other conditions	Frog nerve potassium loss in anoxia and other conditions.
13	clinical potassium problems	Clinical problems with potassium.
13	experiments on the role of potassium in the blocking of neuromuscular transmission by curare and other drugs	Experiments on the role of potassium in preventing curare-induced neuromuscular transmission and other drugs.
13	effect of potassium deficiency on carbon dioxide cation and phosphate content of muscle with a note on the carbon dioxide content of human muscle	Effect of a potassium deficiency on the carbon dioxide cation and the phosphate content of the muscle with a human muscle carbon dioxide content note.
13	potassium transport in human erythrocytes evidence for a three compartment system	The presence of potassium in human erythrocytes indicates the existence of a three-compartment system.
13	apparent violations of the all or none law in relation to potassium in the protoplasm	Apparent violations of the all-or-nothing law regarding protoplasmic potassium.
13	permeation and diffusion of k ions in frog muscle	K-ion permeability and diffusion in frog muscle.
13	studies on the sodium and potassium transport in rabbit polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Studies of potassium and sodium transport in polymorphonuclear rabbit leukocytes.
13	intracellular potassium compartments in nitella axillaris	The potassic compartments of the intracellular nitella axillaris.
13	potassium ion current in the squid giant axon dynamic characteristic	Ionic current of potassium in the epos; characteristic giant axon of the squid.
13	average potassium concentration of the human body as a function of age	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
13	potassium ions and the inhibitory process in the crayfish stretch receptor	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that can be used in the treatment of cancer.
13	an all ornone response in thh release of potassium by yeast cells with methylene blue and other basic redox dyes	An all-ornone response in the release of potassium from the yeast cells with the blue of methylene and d' other basic redox dyes.
13	the efflux of potassium from electroplaques of electric eels	L' electrical eel electroplate potassium efflux.
13	rate of antagonism of tubocurarine by potassium ions	Dapos level; tubocurarine ion antagonism.
13	estimation of total body fat from potassium 40 content	Estimation of Total Fatty Weight from Potassium Content 40.
13	potassium and the recovery of arterial smooth muscle after cold storage	The results of this study are summarized below.
13	radiocalcium release by stimulated and potassium treated sartorius muscles of the frog	Radiocalcium release from stimulated, potassium-treated frog sartorius muscles.
13	accumulation of potassium anaerobically by renal medullary slices	Thin slices of the renal medulla accumulate potassium anaerobically.
13	the role of calcium ions in the acceleration of resting muscle glycolysis by extracellular potassium	The Role of Calcium Iones in the Acceleration of Resting Muscle Glycolysis by Extracellular Potassium.
13	role of potassium in the oxidative metabolism of micrococcus sodonensis	Role of potassium oxidative metabolism in micrococcus sodonensis.
13	factors influencing germination and outgrowth of bacillus popilliae spores i effect of potassium ions	Factors Affecting Germination and Spore Growth of Popilliae bacillus effects of potassium ions.
13	effect of high oxygen tension on potassium retentivity and colony formation of baker s yeast	Effect of elevated oxygen tension on baking yeast colony formation and potassium retention.
13	lysosomes in the renal papillae of rats formation induced by potassium deficient diet	Lysosomes in the rat kidney papillae form as a result of a potassium-deficient diet.
13	some differences in the action of penicillin bacitracin and vancomycin on bacillus megaterium	In addition, the effects of bacitracin penicillin and vancomycin on the megaterium bacillus may differ.
13	nasal salt excretion and the possible function of the cloaca in water conservation	L' salt excretion nasal and possible cloaca role in water conservation.
13	action of the calcium antagonists cocaine and ethanol on contraction and potassium efflux of smooth muscle	L' action of cocaine and ethanol calcium antagonists on smooth muscle potassium efflux.
13	delayed rectification and anomalous rectification in frog s skeletal muscle membrane	Delayed correction and abnormal rectification of the frog skeletal muscle skeletal muscle membrane.
13	hospital experience with cardiac resuscitation	Hospital experience, cardiac resuscitation.
13	antibiotic sensitivity of proteus species	Protein species sensitivity to antibiotics.
13	the enzymatic response of astrocytes to various ions in vitro	The enzyme response of astrocytes to various ions.
13	time factors in interhemispheric transfer of learning	It is important to note that the results of this study are not necessarily the same.
13	the genus veillonella 3 hydrogen sulfide production by growing cultures	Production of d&apos sulphide; Villonella 3 hydrogen from growing cultures.
13	potassium loss during galvanotaxis of slime mold	Loss of potassium during myxomycete-induced galvanotaxy.
13	the metabolism of the volatile amines vii the clinical significance of two components of the blood ammonia level	Volatile amine metabolism determines the clinical significance of two components of ammonia concentration in blood.
13	density gradient centrifugation of a murine leukemia virus	In addition, it has been shown that there is a need for further research and development.
13	phosphate incorporation in desheathed nerves effects of potassium and calcium ions	L' phosphate incorporation into the effects of calcium and potassium ions on degreasing nerves.
13	the relation of potassium to digitalis effectiveness and toxicity	The relationship between potassium and digitalin efficacy and toxicity.
13	electrophorus adenosine triphosphatase sodium activated exchange after n ethylaleimide treatment	Lapos; apos-activated exchange; apos electrophoresis; sodium adenosine triphosphatase following apos treatment; ethylaleimide is initiated.
13	erythritol production by a yeastlike fungus	Production of d' erythritol by yeast-like fungus.
13	the after potential that follows trains of impulses in frog muscle fibers	L' then-potential following trains d' frog muscle fiber impulses.
13	the recovery of contractile ability following a contracture in skeletal muscle	Recovery of contractile capacity from skeletal muscle contracture.
13	photosensitivity of the frog iris	Photosensitivity of frog irises.
13	the interaction of some stimulant and depressant drugs on the frog heart	Interaction of certain stimulants and depressants on frog heart.
13	elasticity of articular cartilage effect of ions and viscous solutions	L'elasticity de l'apos; effect de cartilage articulaire des ions et des solutions visque.
13	studies on the pathogenesis of fever xii electrolytic factorys influencing the release of endogenous pyrogen from polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Fever pathogenesis studies xii plants d' electrolysis affecting endogenous pyrogen release from polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
13	correlation of speciation with lytic responses of the achromobacter	Correlation between lytic responses and speciation of the achromobacterium.
13	glycolic acid oxidation by escherichia coli adapted to glycolate	Oxidation of glycolic acid by glycolate-adapted escherichia coli.
13	nutrition of leptospira pomona iii calcium magnesium and potassium requirements	Nutrition of pomona leptospira iii needs calcium magnesium and potassium.
13	blood free medium for the rapid growth of pasteurella tularensis	Bloodless environment for rapid pasteurella tularensis growth.
13	changes in serum and urinary potassium levels during profound hypothermia in man	Changes in the body's blood and urine potassium levels during severe hypothermia in men.
13	infectivity of histone poliovirus ribonucleic acid preparations	Infectivity in preparations of poliovirus histones; ribonucleic acid.
13	nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xii ion activation of adenosine triphosphatase in membranes of marine bacterial cells	The Nutrition and Metabolism of Marine Bacteria xii ion activation of the adenosine triphosphatase in marine bacterial cell membranes.
13	environmental radiation measurements of dose rates	Dose-rate measurements by Ambient Radiation.
13	the mechanism of isotonic water transport	The Mechanism of Isotonic Transport of Water.
13	specificity of potassium activated phosphodiesterase of escherichia coli	Specificity was demonstrated for potassium-activated phosphodiesterase in escherichia coli.
13	effect of ions on the efflux of acetylcholine from peripheral nerve	Ion effects on apos; apos efflux; peripheral nerve acetylcholine.
13	anion permeability of the olfactory receptive membrane	Receptive olfactory membrane anionic permeability.
13	time course of tea induced anomalous rectification in squid giant axons	The tea's temporal evolution induced an abnormal rectification in giant squid axons.
13	the electroosmotic effects arising from the interaction of the selectively anion and selectively cation permeable parts of mosaic membranes	Electroosmotic effects arising from the cell wall; interaction of selectively permeable parts with the cell wall; anion and selectively permeable cations of mosaic membranes.
13	factors which modify the effect of sodium and potassium on bacterial cell membranes	It can also be used as a food aid to prevent the spread of the disease.
13	influence of the physical state of the bacterial cell membrane upon the rate of respiration	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
13	the suppression of the late after potential in rubidium containing frog muscle fibers	Removal of late potential in frog muscle fiber-containing rubidium.
13	effects of internal and external ionic environment on excitability of squid giant axon a macromolecular approach	Ecosystems, such as forests, forests, forests, forests, forests, forests, forests, forests, forests, and so on.
13	reisolation and emendation of description of vibrio marinus russell ford	Vibbrio marinus russell Ford is reisolated and redesigned.
13	small bowel ulceration associated with enteric coated potassium chloride and hydrochlorothiazide	Ulceration of the apos; small intestine associated with potassium chloride enteric and lapos; hydrochlorothiazide.
13	stabilization of pertussis vaccine in the presence of benzethonium chloride	Benzethonium chloride stabilization of pertussis vaccine.
13	tracer and non tracer potassium fluxes in frog sartorius muscle and the kinetics of net potassium movement	Tracer and non-tracer potassium flow in frog's designer muscle and kinetics of the net movement of potassium.
13	response of the infant kidney to diuretic drugs	Kidney response to diuretics.
13	the role of the microbial flora in uremia ii uremic colitis cardiovascular lesions and biochemical observations	The Role of Microbial Flora in Uremia ii Cardiovascular lesions of uremic colitis and biochemical observations.
13	relation between membrane potential changes and tension in barnacle muscle fibers	Membrane potential changes related to tension in the muscle fibers of the barnacle.
13	the relation between the late after potential and the size of the transverse tubular system of frog muscle	Relationship between late potential and frog muscle transverse tubular system size.
13	treatment of congestive heart failure with triamterene	Treatment of apos; congestive triamterene heart failure.
13	cationic glass electrode response in aqueous solutions of sodium chloride and potassium chloride	L'evaluation de l' electrode de verre cationique dans des solutions aqueeuses de chlorure de sodium et de chlorure de potassium.
13	serotonin and adenosine triphosphate synergistic effect on the beat frequency of cilia of mussel gills	Serotonin and apos synergistic effect; adenosine triphosphate on gill batting frequency in mussels.
13	gastric secretion mechanism for production of hydrogen ions	It is not possible to determine the origin or origin of the product.
13	the time course of the loss and recovery of contracture ability in frog striated muscle following exposure to ca free solutions	L' temporal evolution of loss and restoration of contracture capacity in the striated frog muscle after exposure to free Ca solutions.
13	anomalous rectification in the squid giant axon injected with tetraethylammonium chloride	Anomalous correction in the epos; giant axon of the squid injected with tetraethylammonium chloride.
13	studies on ion accumulation in muscle cells	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of proteins.
13	reversal response elicited in nonbeating cilia of paramecium by membrane depolarizatin	Membrane depolarizatin induced by depolarization induced in the paramecial, non-batterous cilia causes an opposite reaction.
13	effects of minerals on neomycin production by streptomyces fradiae	The Effects of Minerals on Neomycin Production by Streptomyces fradiae.
13	synthesis of malformin by an enzyme preparation from aspergillus niger	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
13	microbial metabolism of amino ketones aminoacetone formation from 1 aminopropan 2 ol by a dehydrgenase in escerichia coli	Microbial aminoketone metabolism Escerichia coli dehydrgenase forms aminoacetone from 1 aminopropane 2 o.
13	in vivo stability of bacteriophage t4 messenger ribonucleic acid	In vivo stability of the ribonucleic acid messenger bacteriophage t4.
13	nutritional requirements for germination outgrowth and vegetative growth of putrefactive anaerobe 3679 in a chemically defined medium	Nutritional requirements for vegetative growth and vegetative growth germination of putrefied anaerobe 3679 in chemically defined medium.
13	induced and spontaneous movements of potassium ions into mitochondria	Spontaneous induced motions of apos; potassium ions in the mitochondria.
13	the action of ketonic prostaglandins on the guinea pig myometrium	L' ketone prostaglandin action on guinea pig myometrium.
13	the effect of membrane fixed charges on diffusion potentials and streaming potentials	L' effect of fixed membrane charges on scattering and flux potentials.
13	tracer and nontracer potassium fluxes in squid giant axons and the effects of changes in external potassium concentration and membrane potential	Tracer and non-tracer potassium fluxes in giant squid axons and effects of external potassium concentration and membrane potential changes.
13	enhanced permeability to sugar associated with muscle contraction studies of the role of ca	Increased sugar permeability associated with ca-role muscle contraction studies.
13	the electrical and mechanical activity of the esophageal cell of ascaris lumbricoides	L' esophageal cell electrical and mechanical activity; ascaris lumbricoides.
13	the further preparation of inorganic cationic yeasts and some of their chief properties	Further preparation of cationic inorganic yeasts and some of their main properties.
13	iodide transport inhibition by agents reacting at the membrane	It is not possible to determine the extent of the inhibition of the uptake of iodine.
13	experimental pain in general practice	General practice experimental pain.
13	altered effect of potassium ions on cerebral respiration in vitro following subcortical lesions	Modified effect of potassium ions on brain respiration in vitro as a result of damage at-corticalales.
13	contribution of protein and lipid components to the salt response of envelopes of an extremely halophilic bacterium	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part I, on March 31, 2005.
13	actions of calcium and certain multivalent cations on potassium contracture of guinea pig s taenia coli	Action of calcium and multivalent cations on guinea pig taenia coli potassium contracture.
13	release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro	Dapos release; Neurohypophysial Hormones in vitro.
13	the distribution of 14c sucrose within the skeletal muscle of the rat in vitro	Distribution of sucrose 14c in rat skeletal muscle.
13	mechanism of action of phenethyl alcohol breakdown of the cellular permeability barrier	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
13	fermentation studies with streptomyces griseus ii synthetic media for the production of streptomycin	Streptomyces griseus fermentation studies ii synthetic media for streptomycin production.
13	effects of univalent cations on the inductive formation of nitrate reductase	Effects of Univalent Cations on Inductive Nitrate Reductase Formation.
13	caffeine and potassium induced contractures of frog striated muscle fibers in hypertonic solutions	Caffeine and potassium induced frog stripe muscle fiber contractions in hypertonic solutions.
13	analysis of depolarizing and hyperpolarizing inactivation responses in gymnotid electroplaques	It is important to note that there is no difference in the results between the two groups.
13	cation effects on chloride fluxes and accumulation levels in barley roots	The effects of chlorine on water quality and on water quality; the effects of chlorine on water quality.
13	nickel substitution for calcium in excitation contraction coupling of skeletal muscle	Calcium nickel substitution in excitation coupling-skeletal muscle contraction.
13	active transport by the cecropia midgut ii fine structure of the midgut epithelium	In addition to the above, there are a number of other species, such as moths, moths, moths, and moths.
13	the relation between external potassium concentration and the relaxation rate of potassium induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	The relationship between the concentration of external potassium and the rate of relaxation of potassium-induced contractions in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of ph on the 36 cl efflux from frog skeletal muscle	Apos; ph effect on apos; 36 cl efflux of frog skeletal muscle.
13	potassium contractures in single muscle fibres of the crayfish	Crayfish, crayfish, crayfish, crayfish, crayfish.
13	the effects of urea and hydrochlorothiazide on the renal functions of rat and domestic fowl	Efficacy of chlorinated organic compounds (PAHs) and chlorinated organic compounds (CASs) in the environment.
13	the distribution of free amino acids in subcellular fractions of guinea pig brain	Distribution of free amino acids in guinea pig brain subcellular fractions.
13	cation transport in escherichia coli vi k exchange	The transport of cations into the estrogen receptor; escherichia coli exchange vi k k.
13	the influence of the intracellular potential on potassium uptake by beetroot tissue	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the ability of beet tissues to absorb potassium.
13	excitation of mytilus smooth muscle	Excitation of the smooth muscle of the mytilus.
13	alcohol dehydrogenase activity and electron transport in living yeast	L'activité de l'apos; alcool dehydrogenase et transport d'apos; electrons dans la yeast vivant.
13	neurosecretory cell capable of conducting impulse in rats	A neurosecretory cell that conducts impulses in rats.
13	application of the sucrose gap method to determine the ionic basis of the membrane potential of smooth muscle	Application of the sucrose-gap method to determine the ion base membrane potential of smooth muscle.
13	light enhanced potassium absorption by corn leaf tissue	The light increased l' absorption of potassium by the foliar tissues of corn.
13	ammonium ion concentration in the primitive ocean	It's an organic matter, and it's an organic matter.
13	effects of external calcium deprivation on single muscle fibers	Effects of an external deficiency of calcium on simple muscle fibers.
13	the function of antidiuretic hormone in the sheep	Antidiuretic hormone function in sheep.
13	factors modifying renal tubular bicarbonate reabsorption in the dog	Factors affecting the reabsorption of tubular bicarbonate in the kidney in dogs.
13	control of glycolysis in cerebral cortex slices	Control of the glycolysis in the slices of the cerebral cortex.
13	foam separation of pseudomonas fluorescens and bacillus subtilis var niger	Separation of mosses of Pseudomonas fluorescens and of bacillus subtilis var niger.
13	the effect of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the potassium exchange of human platelets	The effect of 5 hydroxytryptamines on the immune system; exchange of potassium from the human platelets.
13	metabolic effects of human growth hormone in corticosteroid treated children	The effect of the drug on the body's ability to produce the desired effect.
13	the effect of water diuresis on electrolyte excretion in unanaesthetized dogs	It is not possible to determine the cause of death in a dog, but it is possible to determine the cause.
13	potassium stimulated respiration and intra cellular calcium releae in from skeletal muscle	Potassium stimulates respiration, and intracellular calcium is released from skeletal muscle.
13	membrane currents at large positive internal potentials in single myelinated nerve fibres of rana pipiens	Positive, large internal membrane currents in individual myelinated nerve fibers of rana pipiens.
13	phospholipids of thiobacillus thiooxidans	Thiobacillus thiooxidans phospholipids.
13	the dependence on external cations of the oxygen consumption of mammalian non myelinated fibres at rest and during activity	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that the consumption of nonmyelinated fibers in mammals is associated with the consumption of oxygen during rest and activity.
13	quinine and caffeine effects on 45ca movements in frog sartorius muscle	Effects of Quinine and Caffeine on 45ca Movements in Frog Stitching Muscle.
13	acetylcholine and calcium on membrane permeability and contraction of intestinal smooth muscle	Acetylcholine and calcium on intestinal smooth muscle contraction and membrane permeability.
13	binding of ca ions by paramecium caudatum	Paramecium caudatum Ca-ion binding.
13	effects of atp on the interaction of ca mg and k with fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle	Effects of apos; apos on apos; ca mg and k interaction with isolated rabbit skeletal muscle fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum.
13	the action of caffeine on the activation of the contractile mechanism in straited muscle fibres	L' caffeine action on apos; activation of contractile mechanism in stratified muscle fibers.
13	resting and action potentials recorded by the sucrose gap method in the superior cervical ganglion of the rabbit	Resting and dapos potentials, sucrose partitioning action recorded in rabbit upper cervical ganglion.
13	calcium binding properties of sarcoplasmic reticulum as influenced by atp caffeine quinine and local anesthetics	Calcium-binding properties of the sarcoplasmic reticulum were found to be influenced by the quinine caffeine of l' atp and local anesthetics.
13	changes of total water and sucrose space accompanying induced ion uptake or phosphate swelling of rat liver mitochondria	Changes in apo, total apo, sucrose and water accompanying apo, phosphate absorption or swelling in rat liver mitochondria induce changes in apo; space.
13	resting and spike potentials of skeletal muscle fibres of salt water elasmobranch and teleost fish	Skeletal muscle fibers from the elasmobranchs of saltwater and fishes are capable of resting and have the potential to tip.
13	permeability changes associated with the action potential in procaine treated crayfish abdominal muscle fibers	Changes in permeability associated with vascular potential; action in procaine-treated abdominal muscle fibers.
13	the influence of ionic strength on potassium contractures and calcium movements in frog muscle	L' influence ionic strength on potassium contractions and frog muscle calcium movements.
13	resting and stimulated respiration in vitro in the central nervous system regional distribution and relation to cell density	At rest and respiration stimulated in vitro in the regional distribution of the central nervous system and the relationship with cell density.
13	removal of potassium negative resistance in perfused squid giant axons	Negative potassium resistance suppression in perfused giant squid axons.
13	decreased k conductance produced by ba in frog sartorius fibers	The ba-induced conductance k decreased in sartorius fibers.
13	an extrarenal mechanism of potassium adaptation	Adaptation to potassium.
13	morphological and biochemical studies of isolated mitochondria from fetal neonatal and adult liver and from neoplastic tissues	Morphological and biochemical studies of the mitochondria isolated from neonatal and adult fetal liver and neoplastic tissues.
13	adrenaline mechanism of action on the pacemaker potential in cardiac purkinje fibers	Cardiac mechanisms; action of epos; adrenaline on the potential pacemaker in the fibers of cardiac purkinje.
13	salt transport in valonia inhibition of potassium uptake by small hydrostatic pressures	Valonian salt transport inhibits potassium absorption by small hydrostatic pressures.
13	4 leucine oxytocin natriuretic diuretic and antivasopressin polypeptide	Four leucine diuretic natriuretic oxytocin and polypeptide antivasopressin.
13	cytochemistry of phosphatases in myxococcus xanthus	Xanthus myxococci phosphatase cytochemistry.
13	electrical signs of new membrane production during cleavage of rana pipiens eggs	Electrical evidence of production of a new membrane during rana pipiens egg cleavage.
13	a proton spin echo study of the state of water in frog nerves	Apos study; apos state; frog nerve water by proton spin echo.
13	ionic mechanisms controlling behavioral responses of paramecium to mechanical stimulation	Ionic mechanisms controlling the behavioral response of paramecia to mechanical-induced stimulation.
13	exchangeable potassium study in patients undergoing chronic haemodialysis	Effect of chloroquine on the incidence of chloroquine in drinking water.
13	action of steroidal diamines on active transport and permeability properties of escherichia coli	Action of steroidal diamines on the permeability and active transport properties of escherichia coli.
13	morphology and electrophysiological properties of squid giant axons perfused intracellularly with protease solution	Morphology and electrophysiological properties of giant squid axons intracellularly perfused with protease solution.
13	stomatal opening role of potassium uptake by guard cells	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
13	ventricular function in noncardiacs with alcoholic fatty liver role of ethanol in the production of cardiomyopathy	Ventricular Function in Non-Cardiac Patients with the Alcoholic Fatty Liver Role of Apos; Ethanol in the Production of Cardiomyopathy.
13	potential responses of nutrient membrane of frog s stomach to step changes in external k and cl concentrations	Potential Responses of the Frog's Nutritive Membrane to Gradual Changes in External Concentrations k and cl.
13	exchangeability of radioactive acetylcholine with the bound acetylcholine of synaptosomes and synaptic vesicles	Exchangeability of l' acetylcholine, radioactive with l' acetylcholine, bound from synaptosomes and synaptic vesicles.
13	thermal metabolic blood and circulatory adjustments in prolonged outdoor exercise	In addition to the above, there are a number of other treatments that can be used to improve the quality of life.
13	actions of some anions on electrical properties and mechanical threshold of frog twitch muscle	The action of certain anions on the electrical properties and the mechanical threshold of a frog's twitching muscle.
13	effects of potentiators of muscular contraction on binding of cations by sarcoplasmic reticulum	Effects of muscle contraction potentiators on cation binding via sarcoplasmic reticulum.
13	potassium in gastric juice under non steady state conditions	Potassium in non-stable gastric juices.
13	a note on transmembrane potential in dermal melanophores of the frog and movement of melanin granules	A note on the transmembrane potential in the frog's dermal melanophores and melanin granule movement.
13	expansion of the inner membrane compartment and its relation to mitochondrial volume and ion transport	Internal membrane compartment expansion and its relationship to mitochondrial volume and ion transport.
13	ionic conductances of the surface and transverse tubular membranes of frog sartorius fibers	Ion conductances of frog sartorius surface and transverse tubular membranes.
13	action potentials afterpotentials and excitation contraction coupling in frog sartorius fibers without transverse tubules	"Int J Obstet Gynecol, ""Actions potentials afterpotentials and excitation contractions coupled in frog sartorius fibers without transverse tubules."""
13	adipose tissue pyruvate kinase properties and interconversion of two active forms	Properties of the pyruvate kinase of adipose tissue and interconversion of two active forms.
13	the dependence on dicarboxylic acids and energy of citrate accumulation in depleted rat liver mitochondria	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the metabolism and metabolism of the metabolites.
13	biophysical and mechanical properties of red and white muscle fibres in fish	Biophysical and mechanical properties of fish red and white muscle fibers.
13	a pharmacological study of the toxin in a cnidarian chironex fleckeri southcott	A pharmacological study in a chironex cnidary fleckeri Southcott toxin.
13	control of teichoic acid and teichuronic acid biosyntheses in chemostat cultures of bacillus subtilis var niger	Control of the biosynthesis of l' teichoic acid and l' and teichuronic acid in Bacillus subtilis var. niger chemostat cultures.
13	vitamin d intoxication with hypernatraemia potassium and water depletion and mental depression	It's called vitamin D poisoning, and it's called potassium hypernatraemia, and it's called vitamin D poisoning.
13	the attachment of polyuridylic acid to reticulocyte ribosomes	L' reticulocyte ribosome attachment; polyuridylic acid.
13	the influence of h on the membrane potential and ion fluxes of nitella	L' influence h on nitella membrane potential and ionic fluxes.
13	the role of calcium in excitation contraction coupling of lobster muscle	The role of calcium in-lobster muscle excitation coupling.
13	the clinical spectrum of renal potassium wasting	The clinical spectrum of loss of renal potassium.
13	inhibition of membrane transport in streptococcus faecalis by uncouplers of oxidative phosphorylation and its relationship to proton conduction	L' inhibition of streptococcus faecalis membrane transport by oxidative phosphorylation uncouplers and its relation to proton conduction.
13	the interaction of presynaptic polarization with calcium and magnesium in modifying spontaneous transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals	L' interaction of presynaptic polarization with calcium and magnesium in modifying the spontaneous release of transmitters from the motor nerve terminals of mammals.
13	evidence for one functional phenylalanyl trna binding site on the 30s ribosomal subunit	In addition, there is a functional site of binding of phenylalanyl trna on the sub-ribosomal unit 30s.
13	use of zonal ultracentrifuge systems for biophysical studies of rhinoviruses	Zonal ultracentrifugation for rhinovirus biophysical studies.
13	accumulation of caesium and rubidium in vivo by red and white muscles of the rat	Cesium and rubidium accumulation by rat red and white muscle in vivo.
13	ventricular arrhythmias related to antibiotic usage in dogs	Ventricular arrhythmia associated with apos; use of dog antibiotics.
13	potassium corticosterone and adrenocorticotropic hormone release in vitro	Potassium corticosterone and its release; adrenalocorticotropic hormones in vitro.
13	the effects of calcium and magnesium ions on the adenosine triphosphatase and inosine triphosphatase activities of myosin a	Effects of calcium and magnesium ions on adenosine triphosphatase and l' myosin triphosphatase a.
13	quantitative determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in rat brain	Quantitative determination of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid in the rat brain.
13	adenohypophysial transmembrane potentials polarity reversal by elevated external potassium ion concentration	The polarity of the transmembrane adenohypophysial potentials is reversed by increasing the external concentration of potassium ions.
13	effect of divalent cations on potassium conductance of squid axons determination of surface charge	Effect of divalent cations on squid axon potassium conductance, surface charge determination.
13	a theoretical examination of ionic interactions between neural and non neural membranes	A theoretical investigation of the ionic interactions between neuronal and non-neural cell membranes.
13	influence of calcium and magnesium on manganese absorption	Lapos; calcium and magnesium influence on apos; manganese absorption.
13	potassium inactivation and impedance changes during spike electrogenesis in eel electroplaques	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
13	striated muscle fibers inactivation of contraction induced by shortening	Shortening-induced contraction is inactivated by striated muscle fibers.
13	regulation of protein synthesis in zoospores of blastocladiella	Regulation of blastocladiella zoospore protein synthesis.
13	intersubstrate competitions and evidence for compartmentation in mitochondria	Substrate competition and mitochondrial compartmentalization.
13	neuroglia gliosis and focal epilepsy	Gliosis and epilepsy.
13	effect of chemicals on the early stages of tobacco mosaic virus protein polymerization	Effect of chemicals on early polymerization of tobacco mosaic virus proteins.
13	ionic permeability of the inhibitory postsynaptic membrane of lobster muscle fibers	Lobster muscle membrane ion permeability post-inhibitory synaptic.
13	analysis of the effects of calcium or magnesium on voltage clamp currents in perfused squid axons bathed in solutions of high potassium	Analysis of the effects of calcium or magnesium on voltage-clamp currents in potassium-rich solutions of perfused squid axons.
13	changes in extracellular potassium concentration produced by neuronal activity in the central nervous system of the leech	Apos-induced changes in extracellular potassium concentration; neural activity in leech central nervous system.
13	after effects of nerve impulses on signalling in the central nervous system of the leech	After the effects of these nerve impulses on the signaling in the leech's central nervous system.
13	oesophageal obstruction and ulceration caused by oral potassium therapy	Obstruction of esophageal function and ulceration due to potassium oral therapy.
13	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes i	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is important to note that this is not the case.
13	cooperative effects in models of steady state transport across membranes 3 simulation of potassium ion transport in nerve	Co-operative effects in membrane transport models; steady state across membranes; 3 membrane transport simulation; potassium ion in the nerve.
13	the steps between depolarization and the increase in the respiration of frog skeletal muscle	Depolarization to l' increased frog skeletal muscle respiration.
13	a lesion of the transverse tubules of skeletal muscle	Skeletal muscle transverse tubular lesion.
13	some effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction and excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscles	Some hypertonic solution effects on contraction and coupling of contraction d' excitation in frog skeletal muscles were observed.
13	the pharmacology of the cholinoceptor in muscle preparations of ascaris lumbricoides var suum	Pharmacology of cholinoceptor in var suum ascaris lumbricoides muscle preparations.
13	solution conformation of valinomycin potassium ion complex	Conformation in solution of the l&apos complex; potassium ion of valinomycin.
13	modified two phase system for partition of bacillus macerans spores	Modified two-phase spore distribution system for Maceran bacillus.
13	potassium balance and acid base changes in patients undergoing regular haemodialysis therapy	A review of the results of a randomized controlled trial using a randomized controlled trial.
13	effects of caffeine on crayfish muscle fibers ii refractoriness and factors influencing recovery repriming of contractile responses	Effects of caffeine on muscle fibers; refractory crayfish ii and factors affecting contractile response recovery.
13	falsely high plasma potassium values in patients with hyperaldosteronism	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to elevated blood potassium levels.
13	antagonism by ddt of the effect of valinomycin on a synthetic membrane	Apos antagonist Ddt; valinomycin effect on synthetic membrane.
13	ultrastructural studies on mitochondrial swelling	Mitochondrial swelling ultrastructural studies.
13	the mechanism of the paralysing action of tetramisole on ascaris somatic muscle	The mechanism of tetramisole's paralyzing action on ascaris somatic muscle.
13	drinking and eating elicited by cortical spreading depression	Eating and drinking caused by the depression spread by the cortex.
13	independence of antimineralocorticoid and catatoxic effects of various steroids	Independence from the anti-mineralocorticoid and catatoxic effects of the various steroids.
13	inactivation of the potassium conductance and related phenomena caused by quaternary ammonium ion injection in squid axons	Potassium conductance inactivation and related phenomena caused by apos; quaternary ammonium ion injection into squid axons.
13	effect of potassium supplements on the exchangeable potassium in chronic heart disease	Effect of Potassium Supplements on Tradeable Potassium in Chronic Heart Disease.
13	mode of action of vibriocin	Vibriocin action.
13	mechanical threshold as a factor in excitation contraction coupling	It is also a factor in the coupling of contractions; excitation.
13	slow synaptic excitation in sympathetic ganglion cells evidence for synaptic inactivation of potassium conductance	L' slow synaptic excitation in the sympathetic ganglion cells suggests a synaptic inactivation of the potassium conductance.
13	calcium and potassium currents of the membrane of a barnacle muscle fibre in relation to the calcium spike	Calcium and potassium membrane currents d'apos; a barnacle muscle fiber relative to the peak of calcium.
13	structure and some contractile properties of fast and slow muscles of the chicken	Structure and some of the contractile properties of chicken fast and slow muscles.
13	urine concentration and dilution in hypokalemic and hypercalcemic dogs	Acute toxicity of chloroform to rats exposed to chloroform in rats.
13	ventricular parasystole in acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction, ventricular parasystole.
13	the effect of reserpine treatment and decentralization on the ion distribution in the vas deferens of the guinea pig	L' effect of reserpine treatment and decentralization on guinea pig vas deferens ion distribution.
13	electrocardiographic changes and plasma potassium levels in patients on regular haemodialysis	Changes in plasma potassium levels and electrocardiography in patients undergoing regular hemodialysis.
13	uptake of antimony potassium tartrate by mouse liver slices	It is not possible to determine the extent of the toxicity of a substance.
13	partial purification and properties of carbamoyl phosphate synthetase of alaska pea pisum sativum l cultivar alaska	Partial purification and carbamoyl phosphate synthetase properties of the alaska cultivar of pisum sativum l.
13	digoxin intoxication the relationship of clinical presentation to serum digoxin concentration	Digoxin toxicity clinical presentation and serum digoxin concentration.
13	effect of potassium ions on the attachment of polyribosomes to the membranes in lysates of exponential phase cells of bacillus amyloliquefaciens	Potassium ion effects on apos; membrane attachment of polyribosomes in exponential phase cell lysates of amyloliquefaciens bacillus.
13	shark pit organs enhancement of mechanosensitivity by potassium ions	Shark pool organs enhance potassium ion mechanosensitivity.
13	ribonucleic acid dependent deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase in visna virus	L&apos polymerase, deoxyribonucleic acid, deoxyribonucleic acid, and ribonucleic acid in visna virus.
13	the effects of probenecid and thiazides and their combination on the urinary excretion of electrolytes and on acid base equilibrium	The Effects of Probenecides and Thiazides and Their Combination on Apos, Urinary Excretion of Apos, Electrolytes and Apos; Acid Equilibrium-base.
13	properties and substrate specificities of the phenylalanyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetases of aesculus species	Characteristics and specificity of the substrates of the syntheses of l' ribonucleic acid of phenylalanyl transfer of species of l' esculus.
13	cyclic adenosine and guaosine monophosphates and gucagon effect on liver membrane potentials	Adenosine and guaosine cyclic monophosphates and the effect of gucagon on the hepatic membrane potentials.
13	conditions for activity of glutaminase in kidney mitochondria	Glutaminase activity in renal mitochondria.
13	renal tubular acidosis and autoimmune liver disease	Tubular Acidosis of the Kidneys and Auto Liver Disease-immune.
13	potassium transport in neurospora evidence for a multisite carrier at high ph	Potassium transport through neurospores indicates the existence of high pH multisite transporters.
13	fetal kidney in organ culture abnormalities of development induced by decreased amounts of potassium	Defects in fetal renal development in potassium-induced organs in potato cultures.
13	cyclic adenosine monophosphate potassium dependent action on vascular smooth muscle membrane potential	Potassium-dependent action of l' cyclic adenosine monophosphate on the membrane potential of vascular smooth muscle.
13	concentration of rift valley fever and chikungunya viruses by precipitation	Concentration of Rift Valley fever and Chikungunya Viruses by Precipitation.
13	structural and nonstructural proteins of saint louis encephalitis virus	It can be used as an insecticide or as an insecticide.
13	epinephrine induced vacuole formation in parotid gland cells and its independence of the secretory process	L' epinephrine induced the formation of vacuoles in cells of the parotid gland and its independence from the secretory process.
13	cooperative control of potassium accumulation by ouabain in vascular smooth muscle	Co-operative control of apos; accumulation of potassium by etapos; ouabain accumulation in vascular smooth muscle.
13	inhibition of host protein synthesis during infection of escherichi coli by bacteriophage t4 3 inhibition by ghosts	Inhibition of apo protein synthesis; host during apo; escherichia coli infection by apo; phantom-induced inhibition of bacteriophage t4.
13	a dipole model for negative steady state resistance in excitable membranes	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
13	preganglionic stimulation increases calcium uptake by sympathetic ganglia	Preganglionic stimulation increases the uptake of calcium by the sympathetic ganglia.
13	the effects of papaverine on the electrical and mechanical activity of the guinea pig taenia coli	Effects of papaverine on guinea pig taenia coli electrical and mechanical activity.
13	metabolic hormonal and vascular changes after synthetic oestrogen therapy in oophorectomized women	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
13	two fast transient current components during voltage clamp on snail neurons	Two rapid components of the transient current during the voltage imposed on the neurons of the snail.
13	potassium uptake during microcyst formation in myxococcus xanthus	L' absorption of potassium during xanthus myxococci microcyst formation.
13	on the adaptation in potassium excretion associated with nephron reduction in the dog	On the apos; adaptation of the apos; excretion of potassium associated with the reduction nephronic in the dog.
13	the effect of quinine on tension development membrane potentials and excitation contraction coupling of crab skeletal muscle fibres	L' effect of quinine on membrane potentials of tension development and coupling of contraction; excitation of skeletal muscle fibers of crab.
13	salt and water permeability of the epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in the normal and dehydrated fowl gallus domesticus in vivo perfusion studies	Coprodeum and large intestine epithelium in normal and dehydrated poultry in in vivo gallus domesticus perfusion studies.
13	sodium chloride absorption and solute linked water flow across the epithelium of the coprodeum and large intestine in the normal and dehydrated fowl gallus domesticus in vivo perfusion studies	Sodium chloride absorption and solute bound fluid flow; water through the epithelium; coprodeum epithelium and large intestine in dehydrated and normal poultry in vivo gallus domesticus perfusion studies.
13	analysis of clostridium botulinum toxigenic types a b and e for fatty and carbohydrate content	Analysis of the fat and carbohydrate content of the a-b and e-toxigenes of Clostridium botulinum types a-b and e.
13	ultrastructure of azotobacter vinelandii	L'apos; l'apos ultrastructure; l'azotobacter vinelandii.
13	structural properties and features of parasitic bdellovibrio bacteriovorus	Structural properties and characteristics of bdellovibrio bacteriovorus.
13	interaction of tetraethylammonium ion derivatives with the potassium channels of giant axons	Interaction of l&apos derivatives; tetraethylammonium ion with giant axon potassium channels.
13	cooperative aspects of small ion small molecule interactions with nucleic aicds potassium polyriboadenylic acid polyribouridylic acid	Cooperative Aspects of Interactions Between Small Ion Molecules and Nucleic Aicidal Polyriboadenylic Acid.
13	characterization of the reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate nitrate reductase of aspergillus nidulans	Characterization of nicotinamide-adenine dinucleotide phosphate reductase d' aspergillus nidulans.
13	potassium sparing agents during diuretic therapy in hypertension	Treatment of hypertension in patients with high blood pressure and in patients with high blood pressure.
13	electrophysiological studies of neuromuscular transmission in hereditary motor end plate disease of the mouse	Electrophysiological studies of neuromuscular transmission in inherited plaque disease in mice.
13	the relative contribution of k and cl to the total increase of membrane conductance produced by adrenaline on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli	The relative contribution of k and cl to apos; total increase in epos-induced membrane conductance; adrenaline on guinea pig taenia coli smooth muscle.
13	action potentials and release of neurohypophysial hormones in vitro	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered.
13	effect of electrical stimulation and high potassium concentrations on the effux of 14c glycine from slices of spinal cord	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
13	gas exchange in renal failure i dangers of hyperkalaemia during anaesthesia	It's a good idea to take a few minutes to relax, but it's not a good time to relax.
13	calcium carbonate concretions cyclic occurrence in the hamster vagina	Calcium carbonate concretes the cyclic presence of hamster vagina.
13	loss of membrane components in the pathogenesis of antibody induced spherocytosis	Loss of membrane components in antibody pathogenesis induces spherocytosis.
13	polypeptide secretion from the isolated parietovisceral ganglion of aplysia californica	Parietovisceral ganglion polypeptide secretion isolated from apos; aplysia californica.
13	biophysical effects of adrenaline on the smooth muscle of the rabbit common carotid artery	Biophysical effects of apos; adrenaline on rabbit smooth muscle; common rabbit carotid artery.
13	effect of glucagon on ventricular arrhythmias after coronary artery occlusion and on ventricular automaticity in the dog	Effect of glucagon on ventricular arrhythmias following occlusion of the coronary artery and on the apos; automaticity of the ventricle in dogs.
13	biosynthesis of rat serum albumin	L'albumin de l'albumin serique de rat.
13	exchangeable and total body potassium in patients with chronic renal failure	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
13	ultrastructure and contractures of the pigeon iris striated muscle	Ultrastructural and contracture of striated pigeon muscle.
13	chloride conductance in normal and myotonic muscle fibres and the action of monocarboxylic aromatic acids	The conduct of chlorides in normal and myotonic muscle fibers and the action of aromatic monocarboxylic acids.
13	release of an antidiuretic substance by bradykinin in the rat	Release of a bradykinin antidiuretic substance in the rat.
13	studies on prostaglandin antagonists	Prostaglandin antagonist studies.
13	potassium effect on dna synthesis and multiplication of baby hamster kidney cells cell cycle membrane potential synchronization transformation	Effect of potassium on the synthesis of Hamster Baby Kidneyshell DNA and the multiplication of the membrane synchronization potential of the Hamster Baby Kidneyshells.
13	binding of thyrotropin releasing hormone to plasma membranes of bovine anterior pituitary gland hormone receptor adenylate cyclase equilibrium constant 3 h thyrotropin	Apos binding; thyrotropin-releasing hormone at apos receptor plasma membranes; apos adenylate cyclase; constant bovine anterior pituitary hormone; thyrotropin balance 3 h.
13	the effect of an intrauterine thread on tissue changes in the endometrium of the pseudopregnant rat	L' effect d' an intra-uterine thread on the tissue changes in the cell; endometrium of the pregnant pseudo rat-was observed.
13	an unusual case of self induced electrolyte depletion	An unusual case of Auto Depletion-induced by d' electrolytes.
13	effects of removing the external potassium on the smooth muscle of guinea pig taenia coli	Dosage effects; elimination of external potassium on guinea pig taenia coli smooth muscle.
13	voltage clamp studies of a transient outward membrane current in gastropod neural somata	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
13	prediction of repetitive firing behaviour from voltage clamp data on an isolated neurone soma	Prediction of repetitive discharge behaviour from voltage-clamping data on isolated neuronal soma.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane ii potassium ion kinetics and cooperativity with x 4	The theory of ionic transport across the apos ion kinetic ii nerve membrane; potassium ion and x4 cooperativity.
13	stimulation of rna transcription from pea and corn dna by protein retained on sepharose coupled to 2 4 dichlorophenoxyacetic acid	Rna transcriptional stimulation from pea and maize DNA by the 2,4-dichlorophenoxyacetic acid-coupled protein on sepharose.
13	automated method for the determination of phenol in biological products	Automated Method for Determination of Phenol in Biological Products.
13	characterization of ribonucleic acid from visna virus	Characterization of the fatty acid; ribonucleic acid of the virus of the visna.
13	the effect of supplemental oral phosphate on the bone mineral changes during prolonged bed rest	In addition, it can be used to reduce the amount of sodium in the body, as well as the amount of sodium.
13	conformational model of active transport	Conformational Active Transport Model.
13	chloride and potassium activities in luminal fluid of turtle thyroid follicles as determined by selective ion exchanger microelectrodes	Chloride and potassium activity in the luminal fluid of the turtle's thyroid follicles was determined by selective turtle ion exchange microelectrodes.
13	spasmolytic effects of cadmium and zinc ions upon the guinea pig isolated ileum preparation	Cadmium and zinc spasmolytic effects on isolated guinea-pig ileum preparation.
13	helical nucleocapsid structure of the oncogenic ribonucleic acid viruses oncornaviruses	Oncogene virus nucleocapsid helical structure; oncornavirus ribonucleic acid.
13	the arrangement of ribosomes in ribosome tetramers from hypothermic chick embryos	Ribosome arrangement in tetrameric ribosomes of hypothermic chicken embryos.
13	on the presynaptic acetylcholine receptors in sympathetic ganglia of the frog	On presynaptic l&apos receptors; acetylcholine in frog sympathetic ganglia.
13	potassium ion release and enzyme secretion adrenergic regulation by alpha and beta receptors	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that can be used in combination with other substances.
13	comparison by gas liquid chromatography of the fatty acids acids of mycobacterium avium and some other nonphotochromogenic mycobacteria	Gas chromatographic comparison of avium and d' other non-photochromogenic mycobacteria.
13	lipids of a t strain of mycoplasma	D'apos lipids; mycoplasma strain t.
13	the effect of low level activation on the mechanical properties of isolated frog muscle fibers	It is not possible to detect the presence or absence of the muscle fibers, but it may be possible to detect the presence of the muscle fibers.
13	the effect of prolonged depolarization on synaptic transfer in the stellate ganglion of the squid	Apos; prolonged depolarization of synaptic transfer in squid stellate ganglion.
13	structure of concanavalin a at 4 25 ngstr m resolution	Concanavalin structure has a resolution of 425.
13	turnover of genetically defined catalase isozymes in maize	Genetically defined catalase isozyme turnover in maize.
13	variation in the toxicity of arsenic compounds to microorganisms and the suppression of the inhibitory effects by phosphate	Acute toxicity studies are required to assess the effects of arsenic on aquatic organisms.
13	trypsin action on the growth of sendai virus in tissue culture cells i restoration of the infectivity for l cells by direct action of tyrpsin on l cell borne sendai virus	Trypsin action on sendai virus growth in tissue culture cells; infectivity to l cells by direct tyrpsin action on sentai virus transmitted by l cells.
13	proteins of vesicular stomatitis virus and of phenotypically mixed vesicular stomatitis virus simian virus 5 virions	Proteins of the virus of vesicular stomatitis and of the virus of the vesicular stomatitis simian 5 virions phenotypically mixed.
13	potassium uptake in synchronous and synchronized cultures of escherichia coli	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the effects are expected to occur.
13	the distribution of chloride ions in the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig s taenia coli	Chloride ion distribution in guinea pig smooth muscle cells.
13	the effect of potassium and chloride ions on the volume and membrane potential of single barnacle muscle cells	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, 2004.
13	effect of administered mineralocorticoids or acth in pregnant women attenuation of kaliuretic influence of mineralocorticoids during pregnancy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of cervical cancer, including the risk of cervical cancer.
13	germination and outgrowth of single spores of saccharomyces cerevisiae viewed by scanning electron and phase contrast microscopy	Single saccharomyces cerevisiae spores germinated and outgrown by scanning electron microscopy and phase-contrast microscopy.
13	site of stimulation of aldosterone biosynthesis by angiotensin and potassium	Site of Stimulation of Apos biosynthesis; Apos aldosterone; Angiotensin and Potassium.
13	the effect of diffusible acids on potassium ion uptake by yeast	The effects of the diffusible acids on the intestines; absorption of potassium ion by the yeasts.
13	genetic approaches to the nosology of muscular disease myotonias and similar diseases	Genetic Approaches to Nosology of Muscular Myotonic Diseases and Similar Diseases.
13	the effect of low temperature on the excitation contraction coupling phenomena of frog single muscle fibres	It is not possible to distinguish between the two processes, but it is important to distinguish between the two processes.
13	the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	L' temporal evolution of the potassium contractions of simple muscle fibers.
13	electromechanochemical model of mitochondrial structure and function	An electromechanical model of the structure and function of mitochondria.
13	pyruvate phosphate dikinase from bacteroides symbiosus	Bacteroides symbiosus pyruvate phosphate dikinase.
13	oxalate silica gel thin layer system for free 2 hydroxy fatty acids and for fatty acyl coenzyme a	Gel thin layer system; silica oxalate for 2 free hydroxylic fatty acids and l' coenzyme a fatty acyl.
13	reversal of digoxin toxicity with specific antibodies	Digoxin toxicity reversed with specific antibodies.
13	the effect of type d botulinum toxin on frog neuromuscular junctions	The effect of botulinum toxin type D on neuromuscular junctions of frogs.
13	rectification in instantaneous potassium current voltage relations in myxicola giant axons	Correcting the instantaneous relationships of potassium current in giant myxicole axons.
13	the myofilament lattice studies on isolated fibers ii the effects of osmotic strength ionic concentration and ph upon the unit cell volume	Studies of the isolated fiber myofilament network ii the effects of ion concentration of osmotic force and ph on unit cell volume.
13	ionic basis of the photoresponse of aplysia giant neuron k permeability increase	The ionic basis of photoresponse of giant apos neurons increases the permeability k.
13	interaction of prostaglandin e 1 and calcium in the guinea pig myometrium	Calcium interaction with prostaglandin e 1 in guinea pig myometrium.
13	total body potassium in non dialysed and dialysed patients with chronic renal failure	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3(2), pp. 1–12.
13	effect of hydroxybutyrate on the release of monoamines from the rat striatum	Effect of Apos; Hydroxybutyrate on Monoamine Release from Rat Striatum.
13	modification by calcium ions of adenine nucleotide translocation in rat liver mitochondria	Calcium ion modification of the translocation of the nucleotides of l' adenine in rat liver mitochondria.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane 3 potassium ion kinetics and cooperativity with x 4 6 9	Theory of ionic transport across nerve membrane 3 protein kinetics, potassium ion and cooperativity.
13	cushing s syndrome complicating pregnancy a case report	Complicating the pregnancy.
13	an active electrical response in fibroblasts	Electrical response is active in fibroblasts.
13	activation heat activation metabolism and tension related heat in frog semitendinosus muscles	D&apos metabolism; heat activation and heat-related tension in frog-like muscles.
13	transport of potassium at the blood brain barrier	Potassium transport to blood-barrier-encephalic.
13	control of pancreatic amylase release in vitro effects of ions cyclic amp and colchicine	Control of the release of d' pancreatic amylase effects in vitro of the cyclic ampoules and colchicine.
13	the inner quaternary ammonium ion receptor in potassium channels of the node of ranvier	The receptor of the inner quaternary ammonium ion in range knot potassium channels.
13	rhodopsin of the larval mosquito	Larval mosquito rhodopsin.
13	active transport of chloride by the giant neuron of the aplysia abdominal ganglion	Active transport of chloride by the abdominal ganglion giant neuron; aplysia.
13	active transport of potassium by the giant neuron of the aplysia abdominal ganglion	Active potassium transport by the giant abdominal ganglion neuron of the apos; aplysia.
13	hodgkin huxley axon increased modulation and linearity of response to constant current stimulus	L' hodgkin huxley axon increased the modulation and linearity of the response to a constant current stimulus.
13	the relation of total body potassium to height weight and age in normal adults	The amount of potassium in the body that is absorbed by the body, and the amount of potassium in the body.
13	isolation and characterization of myosin from cloned mouse fibroblasts	Isolate and characterize myosin from cloned fibroblasts.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane iv noise from the open close kinetics of k channels	On the theory of ionic transport across the iv nerve membrane noise of open k-channel proximal kinetics.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane v two models for the cole moore k hyperpolarization delay	On the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane, two models are presented for d&apos delay; cole moore k.
13	glycerol as an enzyme stabilizing agent effects on aldehyde dehydrogenase	Enzyme Stabilizing Effect of Glycerol on Apos; Aldehyde Dehydrogenase.
13	regeneration of cation transport capacity in hela cell membranes after specific blockade by ouabain	Regeneration of cation-carrying capacity in helical cell membranes following specific ouabain-mediated blockade.
13	laboratory mill for pulverizing and homogenizing nail specimens as an aid to microscopy and culture confirmation of onychomycosis	Laboratory Mill to Spray and Homogenize Nail Samples to Help with Microscopy and Culture Confirmation of Onychomycosis.
13	relationship between sporulation specific 20s ribonucleic acid and ribosomal ribonucleic acid processing in saccharomyces cerevisiae	Relationship between l' 20s ribonucleic acid, specific for sporulation and l&apos transformation; and ribonucleic acid, specific for saccharomyces cerevisiae.
13	inducible and constitutive galactosidase formation in cells recovering from protein synthesis inhibition	Inducible, constitutive formation of galactosidase in recovering cells; inhibition of protein synthesis.
13	on the theory of ion transport across the nerve membrane vii cooperativity between channels of a large square lattice	On the theory of nerve membrane ion transport, co-operative viitivity between d&apos channels; a large square lattice.
13	effect of several clay minerals and humic acid on the survival of klebsiella aerogenes exposed to ultraviolet irradiation	Effect of several clay minerals and apo; humic acid on survival of exposed klebsiella aerogenes; ultraviolet irradiation.
13	the efflux of calcium from single crab and barnacle muscle fibres	Calcium efflux from barnacle and crab muscle fibers.
13	the voltage dependence of the chloride conductance of frog muscle	The dependence-@-@ on tension depends on chloride conductance, on the existence of a frog muscle.
13	the nature of the renal adaptation to chronic hypocapnia	Renal adaptation to apos; chronic hypocapnia.
13	on the mechanism of rhabdomyolysis in potassium depletion	About the rhabdomyolysis mechanism in potassium depletion.
13	an effect of extrarenal beta adrenergic stimulation on the release of renin	A D&apos Effect; Adrenergic Beta Extra-Renal Stimulation on Renin Release.
13	the interactions of thiazide diuretics with parathyroid hormone and vitamin d studies in patients with hypoparathyroidism	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
13	electrolytes and water in the brain and cerebrospinal fluid of the foetal sheep and guinea pig	Electrolytes and apo; water in brain and cerebrospinal fluid-spinal cord of fetus sheep and guinea pig.
13	fluorometric determination of deoxyribonucleic acid in bacteria with ethidium bromide	Fluorometric determination of apos; deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) in bacteria containing d*apos; ethidium.
13	malignant hyperpyrexia further muscle studies in asymptomatic carriers identified by creatinine phosphokinase screening	In addition, there was no evidence of a significant increase in the incidence of creatinine phosphokinase, and no evidence of an increase in the incidence of creatinine phosphokinase.
13	the effects of tetanus toxin on neuromuscular transmission and on the morphology of motor end plates in slow and fast skeletal muscle of the mouse	The effects of tetanus toxin on neuromuscular transmission and end-motor muscle morphology in slow and fast skeletal muscle.
13	protein kinase and specific phosphate acceptor proteins associated with vaccinia virus cores	Specific virus virus virus nuclei associated protein kinase and phosphate-accepting proteins.
13	kinetic studies on the regulation of rabbit liver pyruvate kinase	Kinetic studies on pyruvate kinase regulation in rabbit liver.
13	cumulative and persistent effects of nerve terminal depolarization on transmitter release	Cumulative and Persistent Effects of Depolarization of Nerve Endings on Transmitter Release.
13	the specific effect of potassium on transmitter release by motor nerve terminals and its inhibition by calcium	L' specific effect of potassium on the release of transmitter from motor nerve terminals and calcium inhibition.
13	the role of calcium in depolarization secretion coupling at the motor nerve terminal	The role of calcium in coupling the secretion of depolarization to the motor nerve end.
13	early biochemical consequences of denervation in fast and slow skeletal muscles and their relationship to neural control over muscle differentiation	The first biochemical consequences of denervation in slow and fast skeletal muscles and their relation to the neural control of muscle differentiation.
13	virus associated nucleases location and properties of deoxyribonucleases and ribonucleases in purified frog virus 3	Localization of virus-associated nucleases and purified frog 3 virus deoxyribonuclease and ribonuclease properties.
13	double blind trial of carbenoxolone sodium capsules in duodenal ulcer therapy based on endoscopic diagnosis and follow up	Double-blind endoscopic diagnostic duodenal ulcer test of sodium carbenoxolone capsules.
13	axon schwann cell interaction in the squid nerve fibre	Interaction of axonal schwann cells in nerve fibers of squid.
13	initiation of protein synthesis in hela cells	Initiation of helicaloid cell protein synthesis.
13	tension in isolated frog muscle fibers induced by hypertonic solutions	The tension in the isolated muscle fibers of the frog is induced by hypertonic solutions.
13	transport of axonal enzymes in surviving segments of frog sciatic nerve	Axonal enzyme transport in surviving segments of the sciatic nerve.
13	the proton translocating nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenase of rat liver mitochondria	The proton translocating rat liver mitochondrial nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate transhydrogenase.
13	adrenocortical steroidogenesis the effects of prostaglandins	Adrenalocortical steroidogenesis, prostaglandin effects.
13	tracer microinjection study of renal tubular phosphate reabsorption in the rat	Microinjection tracer study of rat renal tubular phosphate reabsorption.
13	rapid changes of potassium concentration at the outer surface of exposed single neurons during membrane current flow	Rapid changes in the external surface potassium concentration of isolated neurons exposed during the flow of membrane current.
13	conductance change during the inhibitory potential in the guinea pig taenia coli	Change of conductance during guinea-pig taenia coli inhibitory potential.
13	control of moderately raised blood pressure report of a co operative randomized controlled trial	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada, and the United States.
13	the fine structure potassium content and respiratory activity of isolated rat liver parenchymal cells prepared by improved enzymatic techniques	The potassium content of the fine structure and the respiratory activity of parenchymatous cells isolated from rat liver were prepared at the apos, using improved enzymatic techniques.
13	proton coupled accumulation of galactoside in streptococcus lactis 7962	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent of the accumulation.
13	inhibitory and excitatory effects of dopamine on aplysia neurones	Dopamine inhibits and exciters the neurons of the apos; aplysia.
13	human embryonic kidneys in organ culture abnormalities of development induced by decreased potassium	In organ cultures, potassium-induced developmental abnormalities occur in human embryonic kidneys.
13	simplified method for producing pyocins from pseudomonas aeruginosa	Simplified pyocin production method from Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
13	two malic enzymes in pseudomonas aeruginosa	The two enzymes are malic in the pseudomonas aeruginosa.
13	transmission on an active electrical response between fibroblasts l cells in cell culture	Active electrical response transmission between l fibroblasts of cells in cell culture.
13	potassium content during growth and sporulation in bacillus subtilis	Potassium content during bacillus subtilis growth and sporulation.
13	changes in kidney medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium deficient rat i	Changes in Renal Medullary Phospholipid Metabolism in the Potassium Deficient Rat i.
13	changes in kidney medullary phospholipid metabolism in the potassium depleted rat ii	Changes in Renal Medullary Phospholipid Metabolism in Potassium Depleted Rat ii.
13	potassium accumulation in smooth muscle and associated ultrastructural changes	L' accumulation of potassium in the smooth muscle and the associated ultrastructural changes.
13	actions of the selective inhibitor of cholinesterase tetramonoisopropyl pyrophosphortetramide on the rat phrenic nerve diaphragm preparation	Action of l' selective tetramonoisopropyl pyrophosphortetramide cholinesterase inhibitor on diaphragm preparation of rat phrenic nerve.
13	the actions of dehydroemetine on isolated guinea pig atria influence of ouabain and calcium	The actions of dehydroemetin on isolated atria of guinea pig influence the etapos; ouabain and calcium.
13	microbial degradation of crude oil factors affecting the dispersion in sea water by mixed and pure cultures	Microbial deterioration of the crude oil factors affecting dispersal in soils; seawater from pure mixed cultures.
13	mobility of potassium ion in frog muscle cells both living and dead	Potassium ion in the muscle cells of live and dead frogs.
13	halobacterium cutirubrum ribosomes properties of the ribosomal proteins and ribonucleic acid	Properties of ribosomal proteins and l' ribonucleic acid.
13	the effect of oxygen concentration on the growth and metabolism of saccharomyces cerevisiae grown with excess of potassium or in potassium deficient media	The effect of oxygen concentration on growth and metabolism of cerevisiae saccharomyces grown in the presence of apos; excess potassium or in media low in potassium.
13	circadian rhythm of plasma aldosterone concentration in patients with primary aldosteronism	Circadian plasma concentration of apos; aldosterone in apos patients; primary aldosterone.
13	studies on the tachyphylaxis to nicotinic stimulant drugs in the perfused hypogastric ganglion of the guinea pig	Studies of nicotinic stimulant tachyphylaxis in guinea pig hypogastric perfused ganglion.
13	relaxation spectra of potassium channel noise from squid axon membranes	K-channel relaxation spectrum of squid axonal membranes.
13	a micropuncture study of potassium excretion by the remnant kidney	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
13	cation reversal of inhibition of growth by valinomycin in streptococcus pyogenes and clostridium sporogenes	Cationic reversal of apos; valinomycin growth inhibition in streptococcus pyogenes and clostridium sporogenes.
13	localization of transport adenosine triphosphatase in rat cornea	Localization of adenosine triphosphatase (ADT) transport in rat cornea.
13	renal bicarbonate wasting during phosphate depletion a possible cause of altered acid base homeostasis in hyperparathyroidism	Loss of renal bicarbonate during phosphate depletion may cause alteration of the apos; homeostasis of acidic bases in the apos; hyperparathyroidism.
13	biogenesis of mitochondria the effects of altered membrane lipid composition on cation transport by mitochondria of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Mitochondrial biogenesis, effects of changes in membrane lipid composition on the transport of cations by the mitochondria of saccharomyces cerevisiae.
13	scanning transmission electron microscope studies of deep frozen unfixed muscle correlated with spatial localization of intracellular elements by fluorescent x ray analysis	Scanning electron microscopy studies of deep-frozen, unattached muscle were correlated with the spatial localization of the intracellular elements by etapos; fluorescent X-ray analysis.
13	growth requirements of pathogenic leptospira	The need for leptospira's growth to be pathogenic.
13	direct effects of salicylate on renal function in the dog	Direct Effects of Salicylate on Renal Function in Dogs.
13	properties and mechanism of action of creatine kinase from ox smooth muscle anion effects compared with pyruvate kinase	In comparison with pyruvate kinase, the anionic effects of bovine smooth muscle on creatine kinase action and its properties are similar.
13	extracellular acidosis protects ehrlich ascites tumor cells and rat renal cortex against anoxic injury	Extracellular acidosis protects the tumor cells of the ehrlich ascites and the renal cortex of the rat from anoxic lesions.
13	some effects of histamine in the depolarized rat uterus	Some effects of depolarized rat uterine histamine.
13	effects of an isolated toxin from australian tiger snake notechis scutatus scutatus venom at the mammalian neuromuscular junction	Dapos effects; a toxin isolated from notechisatus scutatus venom of Australian tiger snakes at mammalian neuromuscular junction.
13	red face and reduced plasma volume	Red face, reduced plasma volume.
13	membrane currents carried by ca sr and ba in barnacle muscle fiber during voltage clamp	The ca sr- and ba-transported membrane currents in the goose muscle fibers during voltage clamping.
13	improved kcn medium	Improvements to the kcn-medium.
13	primer requirement and template specificity of a dna polymerase of chick embryo	Required; primers and model specificity for chicken embryo DNA polymerase.
13	the sensitivity of helix aspersa neurones to injected calcium ions	Sensitivity of aspersa neurons of the propeller to the injected calcium ions.
13	ionic basis of hyperpolarizing receptor potential in scallop eye increase in permeability to potassium ions	The potassium permeability is enhanced by the ionic basis of the apo potential; hyperpolarization of receptors in the eye of the scallop.
13	mechanical and electrical oscillations in cardiac muscle of the turtle	Mechanical and electrical oscillations... in the turtle's heart muscle.
13	k permeability of nitella clavata in the depolarized state	N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B. N.B.
13	disruptive action of potassium phosphotungstate on phit the temperate bacteriophage of bacillus megaterium 899a	Potassium phosphotungstate disruptive activity on the bacteriophage temperate bacteriophage phitus of the megaterium bacterium 899a.
13	a calcium ionophore simulating the action of epinephrine on the alpha adrenergic receptor	A calcium ionophore that simulates the action of the epinephrine on the alpha-adrenergic receptor.
13	phosphate induced protein chromatography	Phosphate-induced protein chromatography.
13	nodal gap substance in diabetic nerve	Substance of the nodal breach in the diabetic nerve.
13	attenuated vasodilator responses to k in essential hypertensive men	To attenuate vasodilator responses to k-mediated vasodilator in essential hypertensive men.
13	differential effects of glycerol treatment on membrane capacity and excitation contraction coupling in toad sartorius fibres	Differential effects of glycerol treatment on toad membrane capacity and contraction coupling; excitation in sartorius fibres.
13	speed of repolarization and morphology of glygerol treated frog muscle fibres	Glygerol-treated frog muscle fibers repolarize rapidly and morphologically.
13	effects of manganese on the electrical and mechanical properties of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Effects of manganese on frog skeletal muscle fiber electrical and mechanical properties.
13	prevention of endemic goitre with iodized salt	Prevention of Endemic Goitre with Iodized Salt.
13	potassium chloride absorption and excretion	Potassium chloride excretion and absorption.
13	properties of physarum myosin purified by a potassium iodide procedure	Properties of myosin physarum purified by potassium iodide.
13	nature of the specificity of alcohol coupling to l alanine transport into isolated membrane vesicles of a marine pseudomonad	Nature of alcohol – alanine coupling specificity in isolated marine pseudomonad membrane vesicles.
13	specific electron donor energized transport of alpha aminoisobutyric acid and k into intact cells of a marine pseudomonad	A specific electron donor activated the transport of apos, aminoisobutyric acid, and k in intact apos cells; a marine pseudomonad.
13	calcium entry in response to maintained depolarization of squid axons	Calcium input in response to maintenance squid axon depolarization.
13	effects of membrane depolarization on light scattering by cerebral cortical slices	Effects of membrane depolarization on the scattering of light by the cerebral cortical slices.
13	kinetic analysis of the delayed outward currents in frog atrium existence of two types of preparation	Kinetic analysis of delayed frog outward currents in apos; apos frog atrium; existence of two types of preparation.
13	light and x ray diffraction studies on chick skeletal muscle under controlled physiological conditions	X-ray and light diffraction studies of chicken skeletal muscle under physiologically controlled conditions.
13	total body potassium in long term frusemide therapy is potassium supplementation necessary	Total body potassium from the long-term frusemide treatment is a necessary potassium supplement.
13	the effect of bathing solution tonicity on resting tension in frog muscle fibers	L' effect of the tonicity of the bath solution on the tension at rest in frog muscle fibers.
13	control of membrane n permeability in a hyperpolarizing photoreceptor similar effect of light and metabolic inhibitors	Control of n-membrane permeability in a hyperpolarizing photoreceptor, similar effect of metabolic inhibitors and light.
13	non transmitting neuromuscular junctions during an early stage of end plate reinnervation	Non-emitting neuromuscular functions early in terminal plate reinnervation.
13	on the repetitive discharge in myotonic muscle fibres	I'm talking about repetitive firing in myotonic muscle fibers.
13	noncovalent modification of deoxyhemoglobin s solubility and erythrocyte sickling	Acute and chronic toxicity of deoxyhaemoglobin and deoxyhaemoglobin.
13	laxative induced diarrhoea a continuing clinical problem	Laxative-induced diarrhea is an ongoing clinical problem.
13	effect of calcitonin on the formation composition and enzymatic activity of the hepatic bile in guinea pgs	Calcitonin effect on composition and lipid; hepatic bile enzyme activity in guinea pgs.
13	protein synthesis in bacillus subtilis differential effect of potassium ions on in vitro peptide chain initiation and elongation	Protein synthesis in the bacillus subtilis, differential effect of potassium ions on apos; initiation and apos; elongation of peptide chains in vitro.
13	enhancement by carbachol of transmitter release from motor nerve terminals	Carbachol increases the release of transmitters from the nerve endings of the motor.
13	influence of external potassium on the synthesis and deposition of matrix components by chondrocytes in vitro	L' influence of external potassium on matrix component synthesis and deposition by chondrocytes in vitro.
13	structure activity relations for caffeine a comparative study of the inotropic effects of the methylxanthines imidazoles and related compounds on the frog s heart	A comparative study of frog heart inotropic effects of imidazole methylxanthines and related compounds was carried out.
13	analysis of hyperpolarizations induced by glutamate and acetylcholine on onchidium neurones	Analysis of glutamate- and l&apos-induced hyperpolarization of onchid neurons.
13	calcium influxes and tension development in perfused single barnacle muscle fibres under membrane potential control	Calcium influx and muscle fibre tension development d' a single perfused ring under membrane potential control.
13	the effect of glucagon on the liver cell membrane potential	L' glucagon effect on hepatic cell membrane potential.
13	inhibition of carbonic anhydrase by parathyroid hormone and cyclic amp in rat renal cortex in vitro	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used for the treatment of heart disease.
13	potassium and amino acid transport in human leukocytes exposed to phagocytic stimuli	Transport of potassium and d' amino acids in phagocyte-induced human leukocytes.
13	potassium flux and leaf movement in samanea saman i rhythmic movement	Potassium fluxes and leaf movement in the samanea samanea somatic i rhythmic movement.
13	diuretic induced hypokalemia	Diuretic induces hypokalemia.
13	twitch potentiation by potassium contractures in single muscle fibres of the frog	The potentiation of potassic contractions in frog muscle fibers.
13	direct effect of prostaglandins in renal function and renin release in the presence of renal ischemia in the dog	Direct effect of prostaglandins on renal function and release of renin in presence of isos; renal ischemia in dog.
13	the effects of certain anaesthetic and anti convulsant drugs on the csf potassium fluxes of the dog	Effects of some convulsing anesthetics and anti-on dog csf potassium fluxes.
13	energy coupling in the uptake of hexose phosphates by escherichia coli	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
13	influence of glutaraldehyde and or osmium tetroxide on cell volume ion content mechanical stability and membrane permeability of ehrlich ascites tumor cells	L' influence of glutaraldehyde and/or tetroxide d' osmium on the mechanical stability of ionic cell volume and ehrlich ascites tumor cell membrane permeability.
13	a bone calcium index based on partial body calcium measurements by in vivo activation analysis	Index of bone calcium based on partial measurements of body calcium by in vivo activation.
13	tyrosine hydroxylase activation by nerve stimulation	L' activation of tyrosine hydroxylase via nerve stimulation.
13	paired moving charges in mitochondrial energy coupling	The mobile charges that are paired in the mitochondrial energy coupling.
13	antibiotics as probes of ribosome structure binding of chloramphenicol and erythromycin to polyribosomes effect of other antibiotics	Antibiotics as probes for chloramphenicol and l&apos ribosomal structure binding; erythromycin to polyribosome effects; other antibiotics.
13	differences in action potentials and accommodation of sensory and motor myelinated nerve fibres as computed on the basis of voltage clamp data	Differences in the potentials of action and motion; adaptation of sensory and motorized myelinated nerve fibers, calculated from voltage-clamp data.
13	energy provision tissue utilization and weight loss in prolonged starvation	It is also important to remember that there is a need for a comprehensive approach to food security.
13	restoration of potassium stimulated respiration of glycerol treated muscle	Potassium recovery stimulated glycerol-treated muscle respiration.
13	the action of amantadine on the rat uterus its interaction with oxytocin and the effects of several ionic modifications of the medium	L' action of amantadine on rat uterus, its interaction with apos; oxytocin, and the effects of several ionic changes in the environment.
13	effect of different doses of chlorthalidone on blood pressure serum potassium and serum urate	Effect of different chlorthalidone doses on blood pressure, serum potassium and serum urate.
13	ionic excitation of a clone of mouse neuroblastoma	A clone of the mouse neuroblastoma.
13	pointers to possible malnutrition in the elderly at home	Evidence of malnutrition among older people at home.
13	carbamylation of alkaline mesentericopeptidas	Alkali mesentericopeptidae carbamylation.
13	renal response to secretin	Secretin, renal response.
13	collaborative study of a semiautomated method for the analysis of acenocoumarol phenprocoumon and potassium warfarin tablets	In addition to the above, it is recommended that the product be approved for sale in Canada by the Canadian Food Inspection Agency.
13	cardiac arrest due to oral potassium administration	Oral administration of potassium.
13	pathogenesis of hypertension in cushing s syndrome	Pathogenesis of apo; cushing syndrome hypertension.
13	glycogen its chemistry and morphological appearance in the electron microscope 11 the complex formed in the selective contrast staining of glycogen	The glycogen contrast selective staining complex, its chemical composition, and its morphological appearance by electron microscopy, 11 is the result of selective staining of glycogen.
13	identical behavior of the two active sites of myosin with respect to trinitrophenylation	Identical behaviour of the two myosin active sites with trinitrophenylation.
13	effect of osmolarity on intracellular ph of rat diaphragm muscle 22	The effect of osmolality on the intracellular phage of the rat diaphragm.
13	potassium translocation in yeast mitochondria and its relationship to ergostrol biosynthesis	The translocation of potassium into yeast mitochondria and its relation to the biosynthesis of l' ergostrol.
13	endogenous messenger ribonucleic acid directed polypeptide chain elongation in a cell free system from the yeast saccharomyces cerevisiae	An endogenous messenger, l' ribonucleic acid, directed the elongation of the polypeptide chain in a cell-free system of saccharomyces cerevisiae yeast.
13	laser induced spreading arrest of mytilus gill cilia	Laser causes progressive cessation of gill cilia of mytilus.
13	synthesis of superhelical simian virus 40 deoxyribonucleic acid in cell lysates	Synthesis of l' deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) of simian superhelical virus 40 in cellular lysates.
13	release of growth hormone from ox pituitary slices after pronase treatment	Lipos release; slice growth hormone; hypophysis after pronase.
13	enhanced phosphatidylinositol labelling in rat parotid fragments exposed to alpha adrenergic stimulation	Increased phosphatidylinositol labeling in the daily fragments of alpha-adrenergic-stimulated rats.
13	effect of potassium depletion in normal males an apollo 15 simulation	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
13	seasonal and nutritional effects on serum proteins and urea concentration in the reindeer rangifer tarandus tarandus l	Seasonal and nutritional effects on serum protein and concentration of urea in reindeer rangifer tarandus tarandus.
13	ion effects on protein nucleic acid interactions the disassembly of the 50 s ribosomal subunit from the halophilic bacterium halobacterium cutirubrum	Ion effects on interactions between nucleic acids of proteins: disassembly of 50 s sub-ribosomal unit from halophilic bacterium halobacterium cutirubrum.
13	release of corticotrophin releasing factor and other hypophysiotropic substances from isolated nerve endings synaptosomes	The release of corticotropin-releasing factor and d' other hypophysiotropic substances from the isolated nerve terminals of the synaptosomes.
13	microbial oxidation of amines partial purification of a trimethylamine mono oxygenase from pseudomonas aminovorans and its role in growth on trimethylamine	Microbial oxidation of apos partial amines; a pseudomonas aminovorans trimethylamine monooxygenase and its role in trimethylamine growth.
13	polyene sensitivity during germination of conidia of aspergillus fumigatus	Polyene sensitivity during conidial d' aspergillus fumigatus.
13	comparative enzymology of the adenosine triphosphate sulphurylases from leaf tissue of selenium accumulator and non accumulator plants	Comparison of leaf tissue adenosine triphosphate sulfurylases in non-selenium-accumulating and accumulating plants.
13	product inhibition studies on bovine liver carbamoyl phosphate synthetase	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
13	nicotine induced relaxation in isolated canine cerebral arteries	Nicotine relaxed isolated canine cerebral arteries.
13	excitation and contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle	L' excitation and contraction of the smooth bovine tracheal muscle.
13	voltage current relationship of a carbachol induced potassium ion pathway in aplysia neurones	The voltage current relation d' an ionic potassium pathway induced by carbachol in the neurons of apos; aplysia.
13	genetic studies on the mechanism of action of aldosterone in mice	Genetic studies of the mechanism of aldosterone action in mice.
13	mechanical responses to linearly rising currents in the red and white muscles of the silver carp	Mechanical responses to linear updraft in silver carp white and red muscle.
13	cloacal resorption of salt and water in the galah cacatua roseicapilla	Cloacal salt and salt resorption; water in galah cacatua roseicapilla.
13	pancreatic secretion of patients with chronic renal insufficiency author s transl	The effect of a change in the amount of fluid in the body of the body.
13	increase in pituitary adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate content and potentiation of growth hormone release from heifer anterior pituitary slices incubated in the presence of 3 isobutyl 1 methylxanthine	Increases in apos cyclic monophosphate content; pituitary adenosine 3-5 and potentiation of apos release; d&apos slice growth hormone; anterior pituitary of heifers incubated with 3 isobutyl 1 methylxanthine.
13	the effects of potassium 5 hydrocytryptamine adrenocorticotrophin and angiotensin ii on the concentration of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in suspensions of dispersed rat adrenal zona glomerulosa and zona fasciculata cells	The effects of potassium 5 hydrocytryptamine, adrenocorticotropin and lacidosis; angiotensin ii on concentrations of apos; adenosine 3, cyclic monophosphate, in dispersed cell suspensions of the adrenal glomerular zone and fascicular zone of the rat.
13	sucrose in oral therapy for cholera and related diarrhoeas	Sucrose in cholera oral therapy and related diarrhea.
13	antivenom in sea snake bit poisoning	It's the only way we're going to be able to make it work.
13	the role of calcium and cyclic nucleotides in alpha amylase release from slices of rat parotid studies with the divalent cation ionophore a 23187	The Role of Calcium and Cyclic Nucleotides in Alpha Amylase Release from Rat Slices Parotid Studies with the Divalent Ionophore Cation a 23187.
13	possible role of laxatives in analgesic nephropathy	Possible Role of Laxatives in Analgesic Nephropathy.
13	effects of epinephrine on the pacemaker potassium current of cardiac purkinje fibers	Effects of Epinephrine on the Potassium Current of Cardiac Purekin Fibres.
13	on the presence of a msh release inhibiting system in the rat neurointermediate lobe	An inhibitory system of msh release in the neuro-lobe-intermediate rat.
13	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the regulation of plasma potassium in chronic renal disease	The Role of the Renin System-Angiotensin-aldosterone in the Regulation of Plasma Potassium in Chronic Renal Diseases.
13	changes in some plasma parameters in the course of dextran 40	Modification of Certain Plasma Parameters during Dextran Treatment 40.
13	genetics of chemical induction of conjugation in paramecium aurella	The l&apos genetics; chemical conjugation induction in paramecium aurella.
13	integrative recombination of bacteriophage lambda dna in vitro	It is not possible to determine the genetic makeup of the organism.
13	electroimpulse therapy of auricular fibrillation	Electro treatment-impulses for atrial fibrillation.
13	cardiac sensitivity to hyperkalemia in adrenalectomized dogs	Adrenalectomized dogs: a randomized controlled trial.
13	donnan potential of rabbit skeletal muscle myofibrils i electrofluorochromometric detection of potential	Rabbit skeletal muscle myofibrils potential i electrofluorochromometric potential detection.
13	role of vasoactive substances in active hyperemia in skeletal muscle 38520	Active hyperemia of skeletal muscle.
13	kaluresis and cardiac sensitivity to hyperkalaemia in intact and adrenalectomized rabbits	Kaluresis and cardiac sensitivity to apos; hyperkalemia in intact, adrenalectomized rabbits.
13	pancreatic cholera benefical effects of treatment with streptozotocin	Streptozotocin treatment benefits pancreatic cholera.
13	eosinophilic gastroenteritis report of a clinical case	Gastro-eosinophilic d&apos enteritis; clinical case.
13	intracellular distribution of free potassium in chironomus salivary glands	Intracellular distribution of free potassium salivary glands of chironomus.
13	role of adenosine or amp as a probable mediator of blood flow regulation in canine hindlimb muscles	The role of l' adenosine or d' an ampoule as a possible mediator of the regulation of blood flow in the muscles of the hind limb.
13	dimethyl adipimidate a new antisickling agent	Dimethyl adipimidate, a novel antisickling agent.
13	mode of action of chronotropic agents in cardiac purkinje fibers does epinephrine act by directly modifying the external surface charge	The mode of action of cardiac purkinje fibers chronotropic agents acts on epinephrine by directly modifying external surface charge.
13	a survey of asthma mortality in patients between ages 35 and 64 in the greater london hospitals in 1971	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
13	effects of drugs and environmental factors on ciliary movement author s transl	Effects of Drugs and Environmental Factors on Translated Ciliary Movements.
13	ureteroileosigmoidostomy long term results	Long-term outcomes of osteoarthritis; ureterosomal osmosis.
13	exchange transfusions with concentrated acd blood ii effects on bilirubin total protein chloride phosphate calcium magnesium and potassium	Effect on bilirubin chloride total protein calcium magnesium phosphate and potassium.
13	structural and functional asymmetries of myelinated branches in the frog muscle spindle	Structural and functional branch myelinate asymmetries in frog muscle spindle.
13	induction of a myogenic response in tonic airway smooth muscle by tetraethylammonium	A myogenic response in the tonic smooth muscle of the airways by tetraethylammonium.
13	the force velocity relation in phasic contractions of venous smooth muscle	The force relationship-velocity in the vascular smooth muscle phasic contractions.
13	isometric and isotonic relaxation in venous smooth muscle	In addition, there is the possibility of isometric and isotonic relaxation in the vascular smooth muscle.
13	association of basal atpase activity and cholesterol with a distinct group of rabbit skeletal muscle microsomal particles	L&apos association; basal atpase and cholesterol activity with a distinct group of microsomal particles from rabbit skeletal muscle.
13	interaction of o2 and co2 in sustained exercise hyperemia of canine skeletal muscle	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
13	swelling and loss of potassium in perfused livers following the influence of the vapours of carbon tetrachloride chloroform and halothane on the perfusion medium author s transl	Liver swelling and loss of potassium following reflux; influence of chloroform carbon tetrachloride and d&apos vapours; halothane on perfusion medium.
13	effects of hypoxia cyanide and ischaemia on myocardial contraction observations in isolated muscle and intact heart	Effects of hypoxia; hypoxia of cyanide and apos; ischemia on observations of myocardial contraction in the isolated muscle and the intact heart.
13	altered ion transport in aortic smooth muscle during deoxycorticosterone acetate hypertension in the rat	Changes in ion transport during apos; hypertension due to apos; deoxycorticosterone acetate in rat.
13	inotropic effects of different calcium ion concentration on the embryonic chick ventricle comparison of single cultured cells and intact muscle strips	Effects of different concentrations of calcium ions on the comparison of the ventricles of embryonic chicks from single cultured cells with those of intact strips of muscle.
13	dual action of chloroquine on frog s skeletal muscle contraction	Chloroquine's double action on frog skeletal muscle contraction.
13	role of potassium and calcium ions in changes in the membrane potential of secretory cells of the mammary glands	Role of calcium and potassium ions in changes in membrane potential of mammary gland secretory cells.
13	barbiturates and aortic and venous smooth muscle function	Barbiturates and venous and aortic smooth muscle function.
13	the reversibility of skeletal muscle pyruvate kinase and an assessment of its capacity to support glyconeogenesis	The reversibility of pyruvate kinase from skeletal muscle and an evaluation of its ability to support glyconeneogenesis.
13	acetylcholine contracture of the fast muscle fibers in the lamprey lampetra fluviatilis	Fast muscle fibers contracted by l' acetylcholine in lamprey fluviatilis.
13	magnitude and location of surface charges on myxicola giant axons	The magnitude and location of the surface loadings on myxicola gigantic axons.
13	contractile inactivation in frog single denervated muscle fibers	Contractile inactivation in frog-denervated, single muscle fibers.
13	contractile repriming of single muscle fibers inactivation and tubular diffusion	Inactivation and diffusion of the single muscle fibers in the tubular.
13	evidence for a transient potassium membrane current dependent on calcium influx in crab muscle fibre	Evidence of transient potassium-dependent membrane current; calcium influx into the muscle fibers of crab.
13	a comparison of radioactive thallium and potassium fluxes in the giant axon of the squid	A comparison of the fluxes of thallium and radioactive potassium in the giant squid axon.
13	correlation between skeletal calcium mass and muscle mass in man	The relationship between the mass of skeletal calcium and the mass of muscle in men.
13	effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Dantrolene sodium effect on contraction coupling; excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	total body potassium potassium retention and potassium intake in protein energy malnutrition	Acute toxicity of ethylene oxide to rats and rats.
13	effect of naphthenic acids on the permeability of ascitic tumor cells to potassium ions	Effect of Naphthenic Acids on Permeability of Ascitic Cancer Cells to Potassium Ions.
13	interactions of aminopyridines with potassium channels of squid axon membranes	Aminopyridine interactions with squid axonal membrane potassium channels.
13	dual effects of calcium ions on pacemaker activity in guinea pig taenia coli	Dual effect of the calcium ions on the apos; pacemaker activity in the taenia coli of guinea pig.
13	modification of potassium current by 4 aminopyridine case of the isolated giant axon of the cockroach periplaneta americana	Potassium current modification by 4 cases of apo aminopyridine; giant axon isolated from cockroach periplaneta americana.
13	barbiturates block calcium uptake by stimulated and potassium depolarized rat sympathetic ganglia	Calcium uptake by sympathetic ganglia of stimulated potassium depolarized rats was blocked by barbiturates.
13	initial and delayed membrane currents in crab muscle fibre under voltage clamp conditions	Initial and delayed crab muscle fiber membrane currents under voltage-clamping conditions.
13	the effect of zinc ions on the gating of the delayed potassium conductance of frog sartorius muscle	L' zinc ion effect on delayed potassium conductance binding of frog sartorius muscle.
13	ultrastructure of frog muscle fiber thick filaments at rest and during potassium contracture	Ultrastructure of thick frog muscle fibers during rest and potassium contracture.
13	ethanol and contraction of venous smooth muscle	L' ethanol and the contraction of the smooth muscle.
13	99mtc diphosphonate uptake in skeletal muscle a quantitative index of acute damage	Skeletal muscle absorption of 99 mtc diphosphonate is a quantitative indicator of acute injury.
13	stimulation of 45ca efflux from smooth muscle cells by metabolic inhibition and high k depolarization	Stimulation of the apos; efflux of 45ca from smooth muscle cells due to metabolic inhibition and high depolarization k.
13	stacking of safranine in liposomes during valinomycin induced efflux of potassium ions	In addition, it is not possible to assess the effects of the drug on the human body.
13	the effect of biologically active substances acetylcholine histamine and bradykinin on depolarization of taenia coli smooth muscle	L' effect of biologically active substances, l' acetylcholine histamine and bradykinin, on depolarization of the smooth muscle of taenia coli.
13	the effects of ammonium inorganic phosphate and potassium ions on the activity of phosphofructokinases from muscle and nervous tissues of vertebrates and invertebrates	Effects of inorganic phosphate, ammonium and potassium ions on vertebrate and invertebrate muscle and nerve phosphofructokinase activity.
13	voltage dependent potassium fluxes and the significance of action potentials in acetabularia	Voltage-dependent potassium flux and acetabular action, meaning of d&apos potentials.
13	influence of potassium and calcium ions on the phosphatidylinositol and phosphatidylcholine metabolism in rat fibroblasts after growth stimulation by calf serum	L' influence of potassium and calcium ions on the metabolism of phosphatidylinositol and phosphatidylcholine in rat fibroblasts after stimulation of growth by the calf serum.
13	effects of cytochalasin b on the electrical activity of frog muscle fibers	Cytochalasin b effects on apos; frog muscle fiber electrical activity.
13	the effect of verapamil on potassium fluxes in canine cardiac purkinje fibres	L' effect of verapamil on canine cardiac purkinje fiber potassium fluxes.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration i movement of potassium accompanying ions and water	The abnormal relationship between medium potassium concentration and muscle fibre membrane potential with a decrease in the intracellular potassium concentration i potassium movement accompanying the ions and water.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration ii rate of forward and reverse k42 transport through muscle fiber membranes in saccharose sulfate solutions with potassium concentrations of 2 5 and 75 mm	The abnormal relationship between medium potassium concentration and muscle fibre membrane potential with decreasing intracellular potassium concentration ii the rate of transport of k42 to and before and after muscle fibre membranes in sucrose sulfate solutions with potassium concentrations of 2-5 and 75 mm.
13	the anomalous relationship between the concentration of potassium in the medium and the membrane potential of muscle fibers with a decreased intracellular potassium concentration iii change in the membrane potential during prolonged muscle incubation in saccharose sulfate media containing 2 5 or 75 mm of potassium	The abnormal relationship between medium potassium concentration and muscle fibre membrane potential, with a decrease in intracellular potassium concentration, iii, changes membrane potential during d' prolonged muscle incubation in sucrose sulfate medium containing 25 or 75 mm potassium.
13	separation of two voltage sensitive potassium currents and demonstration of a tetrodotoxin resistant calcium current in frog motoneurones	Separation of two potassic voltage-sensitive currents and demonstration of tetrodotoxin-resistant calcium current in frog motoneurons.
13	potassium activation in helix aspersa neurones under voltage clamp a component mediated by calcium influx	Potassium Activation in Aspersa Neurons of L' voltage helix closes an apos-mediated component; calcium influx.
13	calcium binding of synaptosomes isolated from rat brain cortex iii binding with some divalent heavy metal ions and calcium binding sites	Calcium binding of isolated rat cerebral cortex synaptosomes iii binds to some divalent heavy metal ions and calcium-binding sites.
13	interaction between drugs and potassium rich solutions in producing contraction in bovine tracheal smooth muscle studies in normal and calcium depleted tissues	Interaction between drugs and high-potassium solutions to produce contraction in studies of normal and calcium-depleted bovine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	effects of ph and ionic strength on the potassium system in the internally perfused giant barnacle muscle fibre	Ph and ionic strength effects on the potassium system of the internally perfused giant bernacular muscle fibers.
13	voltage clamp analysis of transmembrane ionic currents in guinea pig myometrium evidence for an initial potassium activation triggered by calcium influx	L' voltage-clamp analysis of transmembrane ion currents in the guinea-pig myometrium revealed an initial activation of potassium triggered by a calcium influx.
13	potassium influx in the frog atrium during the cardiac cycle	Potassium injection into frog atrium during cardiac cycle.
13	the effect of caffeine on excitation contraction coupling in skeletal and smooth muscle	Caffeine effect on contraction coupling; excitation in smooth and skeletal muscle.
13	potassium current and the effect of cesium on this current during anomalous rectification of the egg cell membrane of a starfish	Potassium current and apos; cesium effect on this current during apos; abnormal correction of apos membrane; ova; starfish.
13	role of superficially membrane bound calcium on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	The role of calcium bound to the surface membrane on the coupling of contraction d' excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	effect of conditioning potential on potassium current kinetics in the frog node	Effect of conditioning potential on the kinetics of the current of potassium in the frog knot.
13	radiation induced decrease in influx rates of potassium ions into thymocytes in vitro in relation to decreased intracellular adenosine triphosphate concentrations	Radiation induced a decrease in thymocyte potassium ions; in vitro thymocyte potassium ions; in vitro thymocyte potassium ions; in relation to a decrease in intracellular concentrations of adenosine triphosphate.
13	reversible inhibition of potassium contractures by optical isomers of verapamil and d 600 on slow muscle fibres of the frog	Reversible inhibition of potassium contractions by the verapamil optic isomers and d-600 isomers on frog slow muscle fibers.
13	cesium induced rectifications in frog myelinated fibres	Cesium induces correction in myelin fibers of frog.
13	the role of potassium ion in muscle glycogenolysis and glycolysis	The role of the potassium ion in muscle glycogenolysis and muscle glycolysis.
13	influence of magnesium on calcium and potassium related responses in vascular smooth muscle	L' magnesium influences calcium and potassium responses in vascular smooth muscle.
13	depolarization induced calcium release from sarcoplasmic reticulum fragments i release of calcium taken up upon using atp	Depolarization induced release of calcium from sarcoplasmic reticulum (SR) fragments and release of absorbed calcium using apos; atp.
13	the effect of caffeine and tetracaine on the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	Lapos; effect of caffeine and tetracaine on apos; temporal evolution of simple muscle muscle muscle potassium contractions.
13	potassium and calcium conductance in slow muscle fibres of the toad	The potassium and calcium conductance of toads in their slow muscle fibers.
13	adenosine and active hyperemia in dog skeletal muscle	Adenosine and active hyperemia... in the dog's skeletal muscle.
13	an evaluation of the membrane constants and the potassium conductance in metabolically exhausted muscle fibres	Membrane constants and potassic conductance were evaluated in metabolically depleted muscle fibers.
13	active transport of calcium across the isolated midgut of hyalophora cecropia	Calcium is released into the body through the intestine, and is released into the body.
13	effect of dantrolene sodium on excitation contraction coupling of frog toe muscle	Dantrolene sodium effect on excitation coupling-frog toe muscle contraction.
13	contractile responses to epinephrine serotonin and potassium in arterial smooth muscle	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
13	aminopyridines and sparteine as inhibitors of membrane potassium conductance effects on myxicola giant axons and the lobster neuromuscular junction	Aminopyridines and sparteine inhibit the effects of membrane potassium conductance on the giant axons of myxicola and the neuromuscular junction of lobster.
13	influence of changes in external potassium and chloride ions on membrane potential and intracellular potassium ion activity in rabbit ventricular muscle	L' influence of external potassium and chloride ion changes on membrane potential and l' l&apos activity; intracellular potassium ion in ventricular muscle of rabbit.
13	effect of calcium ions on potential dependent potassium channels in the membrane of the soma of giant mollusc neurons	Effect of calcium ions on potential potassium-dependent neuronal soma membrane membranes of giant molluscs.
13	physostigmine induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	Physostigmine induced contractions in the skeletal muscle of a frog.
13	voltage current relationships in skeletal muscles of rats	Relationships between rat skeletal muscle tension currents.
13	myosin and actomyosin from human skeletal muscle	Myosin and Actomyosin of human skeletal muscle.
13	pulsed nuclear magnetic resonance study of 39k in frog striated muscle	Pulsed 39k nuclear magnetic resonance in striated frog muscle was studied.
13	electrochemical profile of k and cl ions across the proximal tubule of bullfrog kidneys a study using double barreled ion sensitive microelectrodes	Electrochemical profile of cl and k ions in bullfrog kidney proximal tube, using two-barrel ion-selective microelectrodes.
13	hepatic drug metabolism in iron magnesium and potassium deficient rats	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
13	calcium and the contractile response to prostaglandin in the smooth muscle of guinea pig stomach	Calcium and contractile response to prostaglandins in guinea-pig's smooth muscle.
13	a comparison of effects of skf 525 a and procaine on excitation contraction coupling in single crayfish muscle fibers	Comparison of the effects of procaine and skf 525a on coupling of contraction; excitation in single muscle fibers; crayfish.
13	depolarization induced phosphorylation of specific proteins mediated by calcium ion influx in rat brain synaptosomes	Depolarization induced the phosphorylation of specific calcium-ion influx-mediated proteins in rat cerebral synaptosomes.
13	characteristics of response of isolated smooth muscle cells to cholinergic drugs	Characteristics of isolated smooth muscle cell response to cholinergic drugs.
13	effects of intracellular ph on plateau formation following the action potential of squid giant axons	Effects of the intracellular phantom on platelet formation according to the potential of apos; action of giant squid axons.
13	release of proteins from the inner surface of squid axon membrane labeled with tritiated n ethylmaleimide	Release of protein from tritiated nethyl maleimide-labeled squid axonal membrane inner surface.
13	potassium current kinetics in myxicola axons effects of conditioning prepulses	The kinetics of potassium current in axons of myxicola pre-impulse pre-impulse conditioning effects.
13	dynamics of aminopyridine block of potassium channels in squid axon membrane	L' aminopyridine dynamics blocks potassium channels within the squid axonal membrane.
13	investigation of the relationship between cell surface calcium ion gating and phosphatidylinositol turnover by comparison of the effects of elevated extracellular potassium ion concentration on ileium smooth muscle and pancreas	The relationship between calcium ion binding to the cell surface and phosphatidylinositol turnover has been studied by comparing the effects of high concentrations of apos; extracellular potassium ion on smooth muscle and the pancreas of ileum.
13	the effect of extracellular potassium on the intracellular potassium ion activity and transmembrane potentials of beating canine cardiac purkinje fibers	The effects of extracellular potassium on canine extracellular apo activity, intracellular potassium ion and transmembrane potentials.
13	control of the delayed outward potassium currents in bursting pace maker neurones of the snail helix pomatia	Control of delayed outbound potassium currents in pace-stimulating neurons of the pomatia snail helix.
13	extracellular potassium and trasmitter release at the giant synapse of squid	Extra-cellular potassium release and trasmitter during giant squid synapse.
13	diazepam blockade of repetitive action potentials in skeletal muscle fibres a model of its membrane action	Its membrane action is modelled by diazepam blockade of d&apos potentials; repetitive action in skeletal muscle fibers.
13	depletion and accumulation of potassium in the extracellular clefts of cardiac purkinje fibers during voltage clamp hyperpolarization and depolarization	Depletion and apo; extracellular cleft potassium accumulation in cardiac purkin fibers during apo; hyperpolarization and voltage depolarization.
13	differential effects of tetracaine on delayed potassium channels and displacement currents in frog skeletal muscle	Differential effects of tetracaine on delayed potassium ducts and frog skeletal muscle displacement currents.
13	the effect of internal and external 4 aminopyridine on the potassium currents in intracellularly perfused squid giant axons	L' effect of inner and outer 4 aminopyridine on intracellularly perfused giant squid axons potassium currents.
13	continuous direct measurement of intracellular chloride and ph in frog skeletal muscle	Continuous direct measurement of ph and chloride in frog skeletal muscle.
13	effects of certain cations on the formation and infectivity of phytophthora zoospores 1 effects of calcium magnesium potassium and iron ions	Effects of certain cations on formation and apo; phytophthora infectivity 1 effects of potassium calcium magnesium and iron ions.
13	influence of calcium and potassium ions on the parasympathetic stimulation secretory response of the isolated and perfused submandibular gland author s transl	Influence of potassium and calcium ions on the secretory response of parasympathetic stimulation of translocation of l' author of the gland under isolated, perfused, mandibular @-@.
13	studies on normal human skeletal muscle in relation to the pathopharmacology of malignant hyperpyrexia	Normal Human Skeletal Muscle Studies in Relation to Apos Pathopharmacology; Malignant Hyperpyrexia.
13	calcium requirement for activation of intact aortic smooth muscle	Need calcium for the bones; activation of the smooth muscle aortic intact.
13	the facilitatory actions of aminopyridines and tetraethylammonium on neuromuscular transmission and muscle contractility in avian muscle	The facilitative actions of aminopyridines and tetraethylammonium on avian muscle neuromuscular transmission and muscle contractility.
13	calcium modulation in brain extracellular microenvironment demonstrated with ion selective micropipette	Calcium modulation in the cerebral extracellular microenvironment was demonstrated using a selective ion micropipette.
13	activation of gastro intestinal smooth muscle induced by the calcium ionophore a23187	Gastro-intestinal smooth muscle activation; a23187 calcium ionophore.
13	cardiac purkinje fibres ca2 i controls the potassium permeability via the conductance components gk1 and gk2	The cardiac purkinose fibers, ca2 i, control the permeability to potassium by the apos; intermediate of the conductance components gk1 and gk2.
13	model of the effect of 4 aminopyridine at the level of potassium channels of the giant axon of the squid logigo forbesi l	L&apos model; 4 aminopyridine effect at l&apos potassium channels; logigo giant squid axon forbesi l.
13	internal calcium concentration and potassium permeability in paramecium	Internal concentration of calcium and permeability to potassium in paramecium.
13	influence of muscle length on the force velocity relation of k contractures in smooth muscle from rabbit urinary bladder	The relationship between force velocity and contractions k in rabbit bladder smooth muscle is influenced by muscle length.
13	effects of strychnine on the potassium conductance of the frog node of ranvier	Effects of strychnine on range frog knot potassic conductance.
13	delayed rectification in the transverse tubules origin of the late after potential in frog skeletal muscle	Delayed correction in the apos; transverse tubular origin of late frog skeletal muscle potential.
13	lanthanum block of contraction and of relaxation in response to serotonin and dopamine in molluscan catch muscle	Lanthanum contraction and relaxation block in shellfish harvesting muscle in response to serotonin and dopamine.
13	oscillation of membrane potential in l cells iii k current voltage curves	Membrane potential oscillation in the l iii k current-voltage cells.
13	inhibitory action of dantrolene sodium on the activation of excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Dantrolene sodium inhibitory action on apos; activation of contraction coupling d' excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	k localization in muscle cells by autoradiography and identification of k adsorbing sites in living muscle cells with uranium binding sites in electron micrographs of fixed cell preparations	Localization of k in muscle cells by autoradiography and identification of sites d' adsorption of k in living muscle cells with binding sites of l' uranium in electronic micrographs of fixed cell preparations.
13	voltage sensitive potassium channels in limulus ventral photoreceptors	The voltage-sensitive potassium channels in the ventral photoreceptors of the limulus.
13	permeability and phase boundary potentials determined from conductance in a transmitter activated potassium channel in aplysia californica in the absence of a constant field	Permeability and potential at phase limits determined from conductance in transmitter-activated potassium channel in apos; apia californica in apos; absence of apos; constant field.
13	prenylamine induced contracture of frog skeletal muscle	Frog skeletal muscle contracture was induced by prenylamine.
13	effect of tetraethylammonium on electrophysiologic properties of pulmonary artery smooth muscle cells	Effect of tetraethylammonium treatment on the electrophysiological properties of smooth muscle cells in the lung artery.
13	effects of caffeine and procaine on the membrane and mechanical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the rabbit main pulmonary artery	Caffeine and procaine effects on membrane and mechanical properties of rabbit main pulmonary artery smooth muscle cells.
13	experimental investigations on the contraction induced by lead in arterial smooth muscle	Experimental studies on lead-induced contraction in smooth arterial muscle were carried out.
13	the potassium metabolism of typical northern algerian soils i global evaluation of the potassium supply of soils	The study of the metabolism of potassium in soils typical of the northern part of the country; an overall assessment of the state of the soil; and the supply of potassium.
13	solid state physical replacement of hodgkin huxley theory phase transformation kinetics of axonal potassium conductance	Physical replacement at the apos; solid state of the phase-transformation kinetics of the hodgkin huxley axonal K-conductance theory.
13	a calcium dependent inward current in frog skeletal muscle fibres	A frog skeletal muscle fiber calcium-dependent inward current.
13	effect of low concentration potassium ion solution on the frog neuromuscular synapse	In addition to the above, there are a number of other species of frogs that have been found to be extirpated.
13	comparative evaluation of the in vitro effects of hydralazine and hydralazine acetonide on arterial smooth muscle	Comparative evaluation of in vitro effects of apos; hydralazine and apos; apos acetonide; hydralazine on arterial smooth muscle.
13	collecting duct hydrogen ion secretion in the rabbit role of potassium	Collect secretion of canal hydrogen ions as a potassium rabbit.
13	desensitization onset and recovery at the potassium depolarized frog neuromuscular junction are voltage sensitive	The onset of desensitization and recovery at frog's depolarized neuromuscular junction are both sensitive to tension.
13	blocking of the squid axon potassium channel by external caesium ions	Blocking of the potassium canal of l' external cesium ions as squid axon.
13	inhibition by hypertonic solutions of ca dependent electrogenesis in single crab muscle fibers	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of proteins, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
13	calcium and the control of potassium efflux in the sublingual gland	Calcium and its control; potassium efflux into the sublingual gland.
13	species differences in sodium potassium adenosine triphosphatase activity in the smooth muscle of the guinea pig and rat vas deferens	Specific differences in guinea-pig and rat vas deferens smooth muscle sodium adenosine triphosphatase activity.
13	a potassium conductance activated by hyperpolarization in paramecium	Kapassic conductance parameterized by hyperpolarization.
13	influences of extracellular calcium and potassium concentrations on adrenaline release and membrane potential in the perfused adrenal medulla of the rat	Influences of extracellular potassium and calcium concentrations on adrenalin release and membrane potential in the rat adrenal medulla.
13	ion selective electrode studies on the effects of 5 hydroxytryptamine on the intracellular level of potassium in an insect salivary gland	Ion-selective electrodes on the effects of 5 hydroxytryptamine on intracellular potassium levels in one insect salivary gland.
13	the compensation of potential changes produced by trivalent erbium ion in squid giant axon with applied potentials	Compensation for the potential changes produced by the triplevalent erbium ion in the giant squid axon with applied potentials.
13	effects of diltiazem and lanthanum ion on the potassium contracture of isolated guinea pig smooth muscle	Effects of diltiazem and l*apos; lanthanum ion on potassium contraction in isolated smooth muscle of guinea pig.
13	selective inhibition of the tonic component of portal vein smooth muscle cell potassium contracture by verapamil	Verapamil selectively inhibits the tonic component of potassium contraction of smooth muscle cells of portal vein.
13	3 4 diaminopyridine a potent new potassium channel blocker	The diaminopyridine 3-4 is a potash channel blocker.
13	the toxicity of thallium i to cardiac and skeletal muscle	Thallium i toxicity to heart and skeletal muscle.
13	potassium activation associated with intraneuronal free calcium	Intraneuronal free calcium-associated potassium activation.
13	contraction of detergent treated smooth muscle	Contraction of detergent-treated smooth muscle.
13	relaxation of the ach induced potassium current in the rabbit sinoatrial node cell	Relaxation of the ach; induces a potassium current in the cell of the rabbit atrial node.
13	inward rectification in skeletal muscle a blocking particle model	Internal rectifying in the d'apos skeletal muscle; a model of the d'apos blocking particles.
13	response of delayed k channels to the time dependent clamping functions in squid giant axon ii descending ramps hyperbolae and exponentials	The delayed k-channel response to time-dependent clamping functions in the giant squid axon ii hyperbolae and exponential descending ramps.
13	membrane currents in a calcium type muscle membrane under voltage clamp	Membrane currents in a tension-clamp calcium-like muscle membrane.
13	protein release from the internal surface of the squid giant axon membrane during excitation and potassium depolarization	Giant squid axonal membrane inner surface protein release during elicitation and potassium depolarization.
13	reactivation of membrane charge movement and delayed potassium conductance in skeletal muscle fibres	Reactivation of membrane charge motion and retardation of potassium conductance in skeletal muscle fibers.
13	cs causes a voltage dependent block of inward k currents in resting skeletal muscle fibres	Cs causes voltage-dependent k-current induction block in resting skeletal muscle fibers.
13	change in nuclear potassium electrochemical activity and puffing of potassium sensitive salivary chromosome regions during chironomus development	Change of l' electrochemical activity of nuclear potassium and swelling of regions of salivary potassium-sensitive chromosomes during development of chironomus.
13	modified k channel gating by exhaustion and the block by internally applied tea and 4 aminopyridine in muscle	K channel Gating modified by exhaustion and blockade by internal application of 4 aminopyridine and tea in the muscle.
13	the properties of the extraocular muscles of the frog iii morphological mechanical and pharmacological properties of the isolated retractor bulbi muscle	Properties of frog extraocular muscles iii isolated retractor bulb morphological, mechanical, and pharmacological properties.
13	the interactions of protons calcium and potassium ions on cardiac purkinje fibres	Proton interactions, calcium- and potassium- ions, on cardiac purkinje fibers.
13	the effect of acid base changes on skeletal muscle twitch tension	L' effect of basic acid changes on twitch tension of skeletal muscle was studied.
13	potassium contracture of smooth muscle in the presence of dextran	Dextran-induced potassium contracture of the smooth muscle.
13	influence of prostaglandins e1 and f1alpha on k induced responses in vascular smooth muscle	L' the influence of prostaglandins e1 and f1alpha on k has been shown to elicit responses in vascular smooth muscle.
13	metabolic correlates of fatigue and of recovery from fatigue in single frog muscle fibers	Metabolic correlates of fatigue and fatigue recovery in frog muscle fibers; single frog muscle.
13	separation of potassium and calcium channels in the nerve cell soma membrane	Calcium and potassium channel separation in the soma membrane of nerve cells.
13	inhibitory action of hypertonic urea solution on the potassium contracture of the heart ventricular muscle	An inhibitory action of cardiac ventricular muscle potassium contraction in hypertonic urea.
13	glutamate secretion and nad p h levels during calcium dependent depolarization of slices of the dentate gyrus	Glutamate secretion and nad p-h rates during calcium-dependent dentate slice depolarization.
13	increased sensitivity of frog skeletal muscle to procaine in the presence of organic anions	Frog skeletal muscle is more sensitive to procaine in the presence of organic anions.
13	transient potassium currents in slow muscle fibers	The transient potassium-like currents in the slow muscle fibers.
13	changes in the contractile properties of tonic muscle fibers following denervation	Changes in tonic muscle fiber contractile properties after denervation.
13	effects of some vasodilators on calcium translocation in intact and fractionated vascular smooth muscle	Effects of certain vasodilators on calcium translocation in fractionated intact vascular smooth muscle.
13	intestinal and renal excretion of phosphorus and calcium in rats receiving potassium metabisulfite tannic acid and ethanol alone or in combination	Tannic acid, potassium metabisulfite and apos; ethyl alcohol alone or in combination; calcium and phosphorus excretion in the intestinal and renal tissues of rats receiving apos.
13	the role of membrane electrical activities and extracellular calcium in high k induced contracture of guinea pig ureter	The role of extracellular calcium and membrane electrical activities in high-k-induced contraction caused the guinea-pig ureter to contract.
13	dissociation between ion permeability and the lethal action of polyene antibiotics on candida albicans	Disssociation between ionic permeability and l' lethal action of the polyene antibiotics on candida albicans.
13	relationship between theophylline induced relaxation and excitation contraction coupling in intestinal smooth muscle	Theophylline relationship induced relaxation and coupling of d&apos contraction; excitation in the intestinal smooth muscle.
13	reversible depletion of synaptic vesicles induced by application of high external potassium to the frog neuromuscular junction	Extensive external potassium at the frog's neuromuscular junction induced reversible depletion of the synaptic vesicles.
13	interrelationship between the striated structure of muscle and the distribution of calcium in it i the changes in the protofibrillary structure of the frog fast muscle fibers in steady potassium contracture	Interrelation between muscle skeletal structure and calcium distribution in that of frog fast muscle fiber protofibrillar structure in stable potassium contraction.
13	some properties of potassium stimulated calcium influx in presynaptic nerve endings	Certain properties of potassium have been shown to stimulate calcium influx into presynaptic nerve endings.
13	distribution of potassium and chloride permeability over the surface and t tubule membranes of mammalian skeletal muscle	Distribution of chloride and potassium permeability on mammalian skeletal muscle surface and membranes.
13	effect of scn on potassium contracture in twitch muscle fibers of the frog	Effect of scn on the twitch muscle contraction of frogs.
13	biphasic time course of inactivation of potassium contractures in single twitch muscle fibers of the frog	Une période de biphasique de inactivation des cellules de potassium contractures en single muscle fibers du frog.
13	contractility of the frog ventricular myocardium in sodium free lithium solution	Frog ventricular myocardial contractility in sodium-free lithium solution.
13	the calcium current and the activation of a slow potassium conductance in voltage clamped mouse neuroblastoma cells	Calcium current and l' activation of d' a slow potassic conductance in voltage-clamped mouse neuroblastoma cells.
13	contractile responses to direct stimulation of frog slow muscle fibres before and after denervation	Direct stimulation of slow frog muscle fibers before and after denervation.
13	extracellular calcium and potassium changes in hippocampal slices	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used to improve the quality of the product.
13	voltage dependent calcium and potassium ion conductances a contingency mechanism for an associative learning model	Tension-dependent conductances of calcium and potassium ions are contingency mechanisms for a d&apos model; associative learning.
13	the effect of septic shock on skeletal muscle action potentials in the primate	Skeptic shock effects on skeletal muscle action in primate.
13	after hyperpolarization conductance time course and repetitive firing in a motoneurone model with early inactivation of the slow potassium conductance system	After this, temporal evolution of the conductance of the apos; hyperpolarization and repeated firing in a motor neuron model with early slow potassium conductance system.
13	in vitro effects of desoxycorticosterone on vascular smooth muscle	The effects of deoxycorticosterone on the vascular smooth muscle.
13	electrophysiological properties of resting secretory membranes of lamellibranch mantles interaction between calcium and potassium	Electrophysiological properties of lamellibranch resting secretory membranes, calcium–potassium interaction.
13	survival of k permeability and gating currents in squid axons perfused with k free media	Survival of k-permeability and barrier currents in k-free perfused squid axons.
13	influence of chloride potassium and tetraethylammonium on the early outward current of sheep cardiac purkinje fibers	L' influence of potassium chloride and tetraethylammonium on early outward current of cardiac purkinje sheep fibers.
13	naloxone and naltrexone actions and interactions at an opiate drug receptor on frog skeletal muscle fibers	Action and interaction of naloxone and naltrexone with opiate receptor on skeletal frog muscle fibers.
13	a dual effect of formaldehyde on the inwardly rectifying potassium conductance in skeletal muscle	A double effect of formaldehyde on skeletal muscle internal rectified potassium conductance.
13	extracellular potassium accumulation in voltage clamped frog ventricular muscle	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the ability of frogs to accumulate extracellular potassium under voltage clamp.
13	potassium channels in nodal and internodal axonal membrane of mammalian myelinated fibres	Potassium channels in internodal and nodal axonal membranes of mammalian myelinated fibers.
13	antagonism of calcium induced contractions by some non specific spasmolytics in depolarized smooth muscles	L' calcium antagonism induced nonspecific spasmolytic contractions in smooth depolarized muscle.
13	on the possible role of potassium ions in the action of terbutaline on skeletal muscle contractions	The effect of terbutaline on the contractions of skeletal muscle.
13	some determinants of latency of off response to electrical field stimulation in circular layer of smooth muscle of opossum esophagus	Certain determinants of the latency of the response without stimulation of the electric field in the smooth muscle circular layer of the oesophagus of l' opossum.
13	muscarinic suppression of a novel voltage sensitive k current in a vertebrate neurone	It's a great way to create a new, easy-to-use, easy-to-use, and easy-to-use interface.
13	the effects of calcium deprivation upon mechanical and electrophysiological parameters in skeletal muscle fibres of the frog	The effects of calcium deficiency on frog skeletal muscle fibers mechanical and electrophysiological parameters.
13	the effect on plasma potassium of a combined preparation of frusemide and slow release potassium chloride diumide k continus tablets	Effect of chlorinated organic compounds (CASs) on the metabolism of chlorinated organic compounds.
13	functional profile of the isolated uremic nephron potassium adaptation in the rabbit cortical collecting tubule	Functional profile; potassium adaptation of uremic nephron isolated from rabbit cortical collecting tubule.
13	prostaglandins and potassium relaxation in vascular smooth muscle of the rat the role of na k atpase	Prostaglandins and potassium relaxation in rat vascular smooth muscle na k atpase.
13	a histoenzymatic study of rat intrafusal muscle fibres	Rat intrafusal muscle fibers were studied histoenzymatically.
13	coupling of electrical processes on the membrane to the contractile activity of anococcygeus smooth muscle cells	Coupling of membrane electrical processes to l' anococcygean smooth muscle cell contractile activity.
13	control of ion distribution in isolated smooth muscle cells i potassium	Ion distribution control in isolated i potassium smooth muscle cells.
13	potassium concentration changes in the transverse tubules of vertebrate skeletal muscle	Changes in transverse tubular potassium concentration in vertebrate skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of gramicidin a on the k conductance of the membrane of isolated frog skeletal muscle fibres	The membrane conductance k of skeletal muscle fibers isolated from frogs is affected by gramicidin.
13	a voltage dependent gate in series with the inwardly rectifying potassium channel in frog striated muscle	A voltage-dependent doorway in series with the internal rectified potassium channel in frog's striated muscle.
13	conditioning hyperpolarization induced delays in the potassium channels of myelinated nerve	Conditioning of the apos; hyperpolarization induced myelinated nerve potassium channel delays.
13	single channel recordings of k currents in squid axons	Single-channel recordings of k-currents in squid-like axons.
13	activation of contraction of arterial smooth muscle in the presence of nitrate and other anions	In the presence of nitrate and other anions, activation of the contraction of the arterial smooth muscle.
13	comparative studies on muscle amp deaminase ii regulation by monovalent cations atp and orthophosphate of the enzyme from hen frog and pikeperch muscle	Comparative studies of apo regulation; muscle deaminase ii by monovalent atp and apo cations; apo orthophosphate; frog muscle enzyme; and pike enzyme.
13	action of salicylate ions on the electrical properties of sheep cardiac purkinje fibres	Action of salicylate ions on ewe cardiac purkinje fibers electrical properties.
13	effects of smooth muscle stimulants on 1 isoprenaline beta adrenoceptor interaction in taenia from guinea pig caecum	Stimulant effects of smooth muscle on brain; interaction of beta @-@apos adrenoceptor; isoprenaline and adrenergic receptors in guinea pig caecal taenia.
13	circumstantial evidence for increased potassium conductance of membrane of cardiac muscle by 2 nicotinamidoethyl nitrate sg 75	In addition, there is a need for more detailed information on the toxicity of acrylonitrile to humans.
13	effect of gramicidin on the potassium conductance of an isolated frog muscle fiber	Effect of gramicidin on potassium conductance of isolated frog muscle fiber.
13	on the kinetics of the potassium channel activated by acetylcholine in the s a node of the rabbit heart	On the apos-activated potassium channel kinetics; acetylcholine in a rabbit heart node.
13	separation of current induced by potassium accumulation from acetylcholine induced relaxation current in the rabbit s a node	Current separation induced by potassium and acetylcholine accumulation induces a relaxation current at the rabbit a node.
13	effects on muscle electrolytes of potassium and magnesium infusions spironolactone medication and operation in a case of primary aldosteronism	Muscle electrolyte effects of apos; potassium and magnesium spironolactone infusion drug and lytes; operation in a case of apos; primary aldosterronism.
13	transmembrane ion currents in pulmonary artery smooth muscle	The transmembrane ionic currents in the smooth muscle tissue of the lung artery.
13	renal potassium adaptation na k atpase activity along the nephron after chronic potassium loading	Adaptation of renal potassium to apos; na k atpase activity along nephron following chronic potassium loading.
13	effects of phasic and tonic activation on contraction dynamics in smooth muscle	Effects of apos; tonic and phasic activation on smooth muscle contraction dynamics.
13	effect of potassium ions on electrogenesis and contraction of ureter smooth muscle	Effect of potassium ions on muscle protein synthesis, electrogenesis, and urethra muscle contraction.
13	mechanism of opiate induced permeability of mitochondrial membranes for potassium ions	The opiate mechanism induces mitochondrial membrane permeability to potassium ions.
13	fast photo induced changes in the light scattering of vertebrate photoreceptor membrane preparations study of suspensions of vesicles obtained by ultrasonic treatment of the outer segments of retinal rods	Rapid photos induce changes in the scattering of light from vertebrate photoreceptor membrane preparations; they study apos; ultrasonically obtained vesicle suspensions of outer segments of retinal rods.
13	smooth muscle membrane vesicle orientation a study on intactness and sidedness of rat myometrium plasma membrane vesicles	The orientation of the smooth muscle membrane vesicles was studied on the intact state and profile of the vesicles of the plasma membrane of the rat myometrium.
13	the contractile response of smooth muscle to immersion in hypertonic solutions	In addition to the above, there are a number of different types of contractile responses.
13	calcium action potentials and potassium permeability activation in pancreatic beta cells	In addition, there is an increased risk of injury due to the increased risk of cancer.
13	rectifying properties of the membrane of single freshly isolated smooth muscle cells	Correct the membrane properties of freshly isolated, unique, smooth muscle cell lines.
13	neocortical pyramidal cells a model with dendritic calcium conductance reproduces repetitive firing and epileptic behavior	The neocortical pyramidal cells, a dendritic calcium conductance model, mimicked epileptic repetitive firing.
13	potassium chloride versus voltage clamp contractures in ventricular muscle	"""Potassium chloride vs. voltage clamp contractures"" in the muscle of the ventricle."
13	intracellular chloride concentration and evidence for the existence of a chloride pump in frog skeletal muscle	Chloride levels in frog skeletal muscle are high, and there is evidence of the presence of chloride in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of energy deprivation and hyperosmolarity upon tubular structures and electrophysiological parameters of muscle fibres	L' effect of starvation; energy and heat loss; hyperosmolarity on muscle fiber electrophysiology and tubular structures.
13	the effects of temperature local anaesthetics ph divalent cations and group specific reagents on repriming and repolarization induced contractures in frog skeletal muscle	The effects of local anesthetic bivalent cations and group-specific reagents on reprimand and repolarization induce frog skeletal muscle contractions.
13	pgf2 alpha on drug induced contractile responses of frog rectus abdominis muscle	Pgf2 alpha on frog abdominis rectus rectus abdominis drug-induced contractile responses.
13	effects of monochromatic x radiation on the membrane of nodes of ranvier under voltage and current clamp conditions	Effects of monochromatic radiation on range node membrane under clamp current and voltage conditions.
13	interaction of calcium and potassium with neuromuscular blocking agents	Neuromuscular blocking agents interact with calcium and potassium.
13	absence of potassium conductance in central myelinated axons	Absence of K-conductance in central, myelinated axons.
13	comparison between the delayed outward current in slow and fast twitch skeletal muscle in the rat	Comparison of retarded outward current in slow-twitch and fast-twitch rat skeletal muscle.
13	effects of nonspecific smooth muscle relaxants on tissue concentrations of high energy phosphates and mechanical activity of normal polarized and depolarized intestinal smooth muscles from guinea pig	Effects of nonspecific smooth muscle relaxants on guinea pig normal depolarized and polarized intestinal smooth muscle tissue high-energy phosphate concentrations and l' mechanical activity.
13	effect of ruthenium red on excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Ruthenium red effect on coupling of d&apos contractions; excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	the effect of diazepam on tension and electrolyte distribution in frog muscle	L' effect of diazepam on the tension and distribution of electrolytes in frog muscle.
13	calcium metabolism in the young adult male as affected by level and form of phosphorus intake and level of calcium intake	Young adult male calcium metabolism is influenced by the level and shape of phosphorus intake and calcium intake.
13	membrane electrical properties of frog slow muscle fibres	Slow frog muscle fiber membrane electrical properties.
13	interaction of barium ions with potassium channels in squid giant axons	Potassic channel interactions of barium ions in giant squid axons.
13	inhibition of potassium conductance with external tetraethylammonium ion in myxicola giant axons	Inhibition of potassic conductance by external tetraethylammonium ion (TEAN) in giant axons of myxicole.
13	a dichtomy of the membrane potential response of rat soleus muscle fibers to low extracellular potassium concentrations	A dichtomy of rat soleus muscle fiber membrane potential response to low extracellular potassium concentrations.
13	potassium induced cardioplegia in patients undergoing correction of congenital heart defects	In patients undergoing congenital cardiac correction, potassium induced cardioplegia.
13	rubidium block and rubidium permeability of the inward rectifier of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Rubidium blocker and rubidium permeability of frog skeletal muscle fibers.
13	extracellular potassium activity during frequency dependent conduction block of giant axons in the metathoracic ganglion of the cockroach	L' extracellular potassium activity during giant axon frequency-dependent conduction blockade in the cockroach metathoracic ganglion.
13	mechanisms of activation of coronary vessel smooth muscle contraction	In addition to the above, there are also a number of other vascular mechanisms.
13	inhibitors of mitochondrial ca uptake dissociate potassium induced tension responses from increased 45ca retention in rabbit aortic smooth muscle	In rabbit aortic smooth muscle, the inhibitors of mitochondrial uptake dissociate responses to stress induced by l' increased retention of 45ca.
13	effect of transmembrane ph gradient changes on potassium induced relaxation in vascular smooth muscle	L' effect of changes in the transmembrane pharyngeal potassium gradient induced vascular smooth muscle relaxation.
13	use of aequorin to study excitation contraction coupling in mammalian smooth muscle	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been carried out in the area of bone marrow genetics.
13	biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers and effects of various agents on the contractures	"""Biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers"" and contractions effects of various agents."
13	epileptiform burst afterhyperolarization calcium dependent potassium potential in hippocampal ca1 pyramidal cells	Epileptiform pulse following apos; hyperolarization, potassium potential, dependent on calcium in the pyramidal cells ca1 of l' hippocampus.
13	potassium maintenance potassium supplements or potassium sparing agents	Servicing or potassium-saving agents.
13	current recorded from a cut open giant axon under voltage clamp	D&apos, a giant axon that is turned off and turned on by the clamp.
13	effect of homologous n alkanoic acids on the function of isolated skeletal muscles v relations between twitch tetanus and contracture	Effect of homologous n-alkanoic acids on the function of isolated v-twitch tetanus skeletal muscles and contracture.
13	bound potassium in muscle ii	Bound Potassium in Muscle ii.
13	carbon dioxide membrane potential and intracellular potassium activity in frog skeletal muscle	Potential for carbon dioxide membrane and intracellular potassic activity in skeletal muscle of frogs.
13	protein from beef heart mitochondria inducing the potassium channel conductivity of bilayer lipid membrane	Beef heart mitochondrial protein, which induces the conductivity of the bilayer lipidic membrane potassium channels.
13	apical k channels in frog skin rana temporaria cation adsorption and voltage influence gating kinetics	Apical k channels of rana temporaria frog skin, cation adsorption, and tension influence block kinetics.
13	voltage oscillations in the barnacle giant muscle fiber	Oscillations of tension in the muscle fibers of the giant barnacle.
13	voltage clamp of single freshly dissociated smooth muscle cells current voltage relationships for three currents	Freshly dissociated, smooth muscle cell current relations tension clamp for three currents.
13	potassium conductance and internal calcium accumulation in a molluscan neurone	K-conductance and internal accumulation of calcium in a neuron of a mollusc.
13	evidence that histamine and carbachol may open the same ion channels in longitudinal smooth muscle of guinea pig ileum	Data indicate that histamine and carbachol can open the same ion channels in guinea-pig ileum longitudinal smooth muscle.
13	direct measurement of the increase in intracellular free calcium ion concentration in response to the action of complement	It is not possible to determine the concentration of calcium, but it is necessary to determine the concentration of calcium in the cell.
13	synaptic excitation may activate a calcium dependent potassium conductance in hippocampal pyramidal cells	L' synaptic excitation may activate calcium-dependent potassium conductance in the hippocampal pyramidal cells.
13	myelinated central vertebrate axon lacks voltage sensitive potassium conductance	L&apos, the central axon of myelinated vertebrates, does not have a voltage-sensitive, potassic conductance.
13	intracellular and exchangeable potassium in cirrhosis evidence against the occurrence of potassium depletion in cirrhosis with ascites	Exchanging intracellular potassium in cirrhosis proves that there is no potassium depletion in cirrhosis with ascites.
13	the initiation of phasic and tonic contraction by potassium and the effect of calcium multivalent cations and ca antagonist on potassium contracture in guinea pig vas deferens	The study of the effects of potassium-induced hypoxia on the development of potassium-induced hypoxia.
13	deleterious effects of calcium deprivation on freshly isolated hepatocytes	The deleterious effects of calcium starvation on freshly isolated hepatocytes.
13	unidirectional flux ratio for potassium ions in depolarized frog skeletal muscle	Unidirectional potassium ion flux ratio in depolarized frog skeletal muscle.
13	effect of short term co2 breathing on the co2 content and intracellular ph in skeletal muscle of man	Effect of short-term co2 respiration on content of co2 and intracellular phloem in male rat skeletal muscle.
13	transient and steady state kinetic studies of sodium potassium adenosine triphosphatase using beta 2 furyl acryloyl phosphate as chromophoric substrate assay	Kinetic studies at apo, transient, and apo levels; apo states; apo balance; sodium adenosine triphosphatase using beta-2 furyl acryloyl phosphate as a chromophoric substrate.
13	calcium dependent slow action potentials in potassium depolarized guinea pig ventricular myocardium enhanced by barium ions	Potentially, slow, calcium-dependent action in the ventricular myocardium of the potassium-depolarized, barium-stimulated guinea pig.
13	electrophysiology of phagocytic membranes iii evidence for a calcium dependent potassium permeability change during slow hyperpolarizations of activated macrophages	L' phagocyte membrane electrophysiology iii indicates a calcium-dependent change in potassium permeability during slow activated macrophage hyperpolarizations.
13	actions of various muscarinic agonists on membrane potential potassium efflux and contraction of longitudinal muscle of guinea pig intestine	Various muscarinic agonists act on the apos; potassium efflux membrane potential and longitudinal muscle contraction of the guinea pig intestine.
13	potassium stimulated calcium dependent release of 3h gaba from neuron and glia enriched cultures of cells dissociated from rat cerebellum	Potassium stimulated the calcium-dependent release of 3-h-gaba from neurons, and rat cerebellum disassociated cell cultures were also enriched with glial cells.
13	evidence for a sodium electrogenic pump in airway smooth muscle	It's the only thing that's going on in the airway.
13	the selective inhibition of serotonin induced contractions of rabbit cerebral vascular smooth muscle by calcium antagonistic dihydropyridines an investigation of the mechanism of action of nimodipine	Selective serotonin inhibition by dihydropyridine calcium antagonists induced contractions of rabbit cerebral vascular smooth muscle, a study of the mechanism of nimodipine action.
13	nickel substitution for calcium and the time course of potassium contractures of single muscle fibres	The replacement of calcium by nickel and l' the temporal evolution of the potassium contractions of the simple muscle fibers.
13	field potential induced by injection of potassium ion into the frog retina a test of current interpretations of the electroretinographic erg b wave	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those of the previous study, and that the results of this study are consistent with those of the previous study.
13	localization of calcium in an annelid visceral muscle by pyroantimonate deposition and by x ray microprobe analysis	The localization of calcium in a visceral annelid muscle by deposition of pyroantimonate and by X-ray microprobe analysis.
13	blockage of squid axon potassium conductance by internal tetra n alkylammonium ions of various sizes	Blocking of the phosphate potassium conductance; squid axon by various sizes of tetra-@ n-alkylammonium ions.
13	a new interpretation of the pace maker current in calf purkinje fibres	A new interpretation of pacemaker current in purkinje calf fibers.
13	electrical current induced contraction in the smooth muscle of the rabbit aorta	Electrical current induced a contraction in rabbit aorta muscle.
13	effects of external calcium reduction on the kinetics of potassium contractures in frog twitch muscle fibres	Effect of external calcium reduction on potassium contraction kinetics in frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	slow calcium and potassium currents across frog muscle membrane measurements with a vaseline gap technique	Slow potassium and calcium currents pass through the muscle membrane of frogs at the apos; a technique of apos; vascular opening.
13	ca k bi ionic action potential in squid giant axons	In addition, it can be used as a means of reducing the amount of water in the water.
13	a k selective three state channel from fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum of frog leg muscle	A three-state k-selective channel from the frog-paw muscle fragmented sarcoplasmic reticulum.
13	a comparison of the differential effects of nitroglycerin nifedipine and papaverine on contractures induced in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle by potassium and lanthanum	Comparison of the differential effects of nitroglycerine nifedipine and papaverine on potassium and lanthanum-induced contractions in intestinal and vascular smooth muscle.
13	antagonism of calcium induced contraction in potassium depolarized rabbit detrusor muscle strips by dicyclomine hydrochloride and rociverine	L' antagonism of calcium-induced contraction in dicyclomine hydrochloride- and rociverine-depolarized detritic strips of rabbit muscle produced potassic depolarization.
13	fast outward current controlling electrical activity in rat uterine smooth muscle during gestation	A fast outward current controls l' electrical activity in the smooth muscle of the uterus during pregnancy.
13	tris does not inhibit isolated vascular or intestinal smooth muscle contraction	Tris n&apos did not inhibit contraction of isolated intestinal or vascular smooth muscle.
13	manifestation of latent alpha excitatory response in the canine tracheal smooth muscle preparation relation to basal tone	Demonstration of a latent excitatory alpha response in the preparation of canine tracheal smooth muscle in relation to basal tone.
13	inactivation of voltage gated delayed potassium current in molluscan neurons a kinetic model	L' inactivation of the voltage-delayed potassium current in neurons of molluscs is a kinetic model.
13	a theoretical study on the sucrose gap technique as applied to multicellular muscle preparations ii methodical errors in the determination of outward currents	A theoretical study of the technique of sucrose gap applied to multi-cellular muscle preparations ii systematic errors in the determination of outward currents.
13	dynamics of potassium ion currents in squid axon membrane a re examination	Potassic ionic current dynamics in the axonal membrane of squid have been reexamined.
13	potassium ion currents in the crayfish giant axon dynamic characteristics	It is not possible to determine the origin or origin of the organism.
13	biological activities of cystic fibrosis serum iv stimulation of the calcium mediated k efflux from rat submandibular gland fragments	L' cystic fibrosis serum IV biological activity stimulates l' calcium-mediated efflux k from gland fragments under @-@mandibular rat.
13	time dependence of the calcium activated potassium current	Calcium-activated potassium current time dependence.
13	alteration of smooth muscle contractility after muscarinic agonist induced k loss	Modification of the smooth muscle contractility following the loss of k due to the muscarinic agonist.
13	reconstitution in planar lipid bilayers of a ca2 dependent k channel from transverse tubule membranes isolated from rabbit skeletal muscle	Reconstitution in planar lipid bilayers, d' a ca2-dependent k channel from isolated rabbit skeletal muscle transverse tubular membranes.
13	role of the medullary collecting duct in potassium excretion in potassium adapted animals	Role of medullary collecting duct in apos; potassium excretion in animals adapted to potassium.
13	potassium ion influx and na k atpase activity are required for the hamster sperm acrosome reaction	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim, and it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
13	inactivation of potassium current in squid axon by a variety of quaternary ammonium ions	Potassium current in the squid axon is inactivated by various quaternary ammonium ions.
13	acute effects of hemodialysis on echographic determined cardiac performance improved contractility resulting from serum increased calcium with reduced potassium despite hypovolemic reduced cardiac output	The acute effects of ultrasound-induced hemodialysis on cardiac performance were found to improve the contractility resulting from apos; an increase in serum calcium with a reduction in potassium despite a hypovolemic reduction in cardiac output.
13	role of calcium in the contraction of normal tonic muscle fibers and following denervation	The role of calcium in normal and denervated tonic muscle fiber contraction.
13	potassium contracture in the tonic bundle isolated from the enlarged flexor carpi radialis muscle of the frog	In the isolated tonic bundle of frog enlarged carpi radialis flexor muscle.
13	potassium recycling in the renal medulla effects of acute potassium chloride administration to rats fed a potassium free diet	Acute administration of potassium chloride to rats fed a potassium-free diet; acute administration of potassium chloride.
13	steady state effects of extracellular potassium concentration on vascular smooth muscle reactivity	Effect on the ability of the vascular smooth muscle to absorb potassium from the body.
13	modulation of synaptic output by the transient outward potassium current in aplysia	Modulation of the synaptic flow by the outflow of potassium transient in the apices; aplysia.
13	intracellular local changes of resistance in muscle fibers in relation to membrane potential	Local intracellular changes in resistance in muscle fibres related to membrane potential.
13	ba2 ions block k induced contractures by antagonizing k induced membrane depolarization in frog skeletal muscle fibres	Ba2 ions blocked k-induced contractions by antagonizing k-induced membrane depolarization in skeletal muscle fibers of frogs.
13	single k channel currents of anomalous rectification in cultured rat myotubes	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury, but it is possible to determine the cause of the injury.
13	potassium current suppression by quinidine reveals additional calcium currents in neuroblastoma cells	Suppression of the potassium current by quinidine revealed additional calcium currents in the neuroblastoma cells.
13	magnesium increases rate of onset of desensitization in frog muscle	Magnesium increases apo level; desensitization occurs in frog muscle.
13	membrane properties of smooth muscle cells in pulmonary hypertensive rats	The membrane properties of the smooth muscle cells in the pulmonary hypertensive rats.
13	stereoselective and non stereoselective effects of d 600 methoxyverapamil in smooth muscle preparations	Stereoselective and non-stereoselective effects of 600-methoxyverapamil in smooth muscle.
13	the effect of tetraethylammonium chloride on potassium permeability in the smooth muscle cell membrane of canine trachea	Effect of tetraethylammonium chloride on the cellular membrane potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	transient and delayed potassium currents in the egg cell membrane of the coelenterate renilla koellikeri	Transient and delayed potassic currents in the membrane of yeast cell membranes; coelenterate egg renilla koellikeri.
13	simultaneous changes in the equilibrium potential and potassium conductance in voltage clamped ranvier node in the frog	Simultaneous changes in frog potash potential; equilibrium and potassic conductance in voltage-imposed rudder node.
13	evidence for the existence of three types of potassium channels in the frog ranvier node membrane	Three types of potassic canals were found to be present in the frog's ruffe-knot membrane.
13	tension stiffness unloaded shortening speed and potentiation of frog muscle fibres at sarcomere lengths below optimum	Loadless tension stiffness reduced frog muscle fiber shortening velocity and potentiation to suboptimal sarcomere lengths.
13	the t sr junction in contracting single skeletal muscle fibers	The t-square junction in the contraction of the single muscle skeletal fibers.
13	properties of a calcium and voltage activated potassium current in helix pomatia neurons	The properties of d' a current of potassium activated by calcium and tension in the neurons of l' helix pomatia were activated.
13	activation characteristics of the calcium dependent outward potassium current in helix	It is not possible to determine if the product is an active ingredient.
13	dissociation of k induced tension and cellular ca2 retention in vascular and intestinal smooth muscle in normoxia and hypoxia	K dissociation induced cellular c2 retention and tension in intestinal and vascular smooth muscle during normoxia and l' hypoxia.
13	effect of procaine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle	Effect of Procaine on Potassium Permeability of Canine Tracheal Smooth muscle.
13	evidence for the presence of potassium channels in the internode of frog myelinated nerve fibres	Evidence of potassic canals in frogs between-myelinated nerve fibers.
13	calcium currents in internally perfused nerve cell bodies of limnea stagnalis	Calcium currents in limnea stagnalis-infused neuronal bodies.
13	assessment of ca2 antagonist effects of drugs in k depolarized smooth muscle differentiation of antagonist subgroups	Evaluation of drug ca2 antagonistic effects on sub@-@d&apos group differentiation; depolarized smooth muscle antagonists k.
13	divalent cations and the activation kinetics of potassium channels in squid giant axons	Divalent cations and kinetics d' giant squid axon potassium channel activation.
13	gk ca dependent cyclic potential changes in the sensory nerve terminal of frog muscle spindle	Changes in gk ca-dependent cyclic potential in frog muscle spindle sensory nerve terminals.
13	stimulation by calcium and other cations of the cholesterol binding to steroid free cytochrome p 450scc purified from bovine adrenocortical mitochondria the implication of acth mediated calcium homeostasis on the cholesterol availability	Calcium stimulation and d' other cations of free purified cytochrome p-cholesterol binding 450scc steroid from bovine adrenal cortical mitochondria, l' l&apos involvement; apos-mediated calcium homeostasis; acth on cholesterol availability.
13	slowing effects of dopamine and calcium channel blockers on frequency of sodium spikes in rat pars intermedia cells	Slowing effects of calcium and dopaminergic channel blockers on the frequency of sodium peaks in rat pars intermedia cells.
13	mechanisms of relaxation induced by activation of beta adrenoceptors in smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig mesenteric artery	Apos-induced relaxation mechanisms; beta-adrenoceptor activation in guinea-pig smooth muscle cells; mesenteric artery.
13	extracellular potassium concentration and membrane potential in rabbit gastrocnemius muscle during tourniquet ischemia	Extracellular potassium concentration and membrane potential in the gastrocnemius muscle of rabbits during apos; ischemia of the garrot.
13	effects of flurazepam and diazepam in isolated guinea pig taenia coli and longitudinal muscle	Effects of flurazepam and diazepam on the taenia coli isolated from guinea pig and on the longitudinal muscle.
13	apamin as a selective blocker of the calcium dependent potassium channel in neuroblastoma cells voltage clamp and biochemical characterization of the toxin receptor	L' apamin as a selective calcium-dependent potassium channel blocker in neuroblastoma cell voltage and toxin receptor biochemical characterization.
13	electrogenesis and contraction of smooth muscle taenia coli kept in a solution with elevated concentration of potassium ions	Electrogenesis and taenia coli smooth muscle contraction are maintained in a solution containing high potassium ions.
13	some effects of carbon dioxide on intracellular potassium in frog muscle	Some effects of carbon dioxide (CO2) on the intracellular potassium in frog muscle.
13	calcium activated and voltage dependent potassium conductances in clonal pituitary cells	Tension-dependent, calcium-activated, potassic behaviors in the clonal pituitary cells.
13	the behavioral effects of phencyclidines may be due to their blockade of potassium channels	Phencyclidine behavioral effects may be due to blockade of potassium channels.
13	effect of concentration of potassium salts on the activity of the n ethylmaleimide treated hemin controlled translational inhibitor	Potassium salt concentration effects on apo; apo activity; apo-mediated translation inhibitor; apo-treated hemin; ethylmaleimide.
13	the stimulation of protein degradation in muscle by ca2 is mediated by prostaglandin e2 and does not require the calcium activated protease	The stimulation of muscle protein degradation by ca2 is prostaglandin e2-mediated and does not require calcium-activated protease.
13	physiological and ultrastructural studies on the longitudinal retractor muscle of a sea cucumber stichopus japonicus ii intracellular localization and translocation of activator calcium during mechanical activity	Physiological and ultrastructural studies on d&apos longitudinal retractor muscle; a stichopus japonicus sea cucumber ii Intracellular localization and translocation of activating calcium during mechanical activity.
13	single calcium dependent potassium channels in clonal anterior pituitary cells	Calcium-dependent calcium channels are unique in anterior, clonal, pituitary cells.
13	block of squid axon k channels by internally and externally applied barium ions	Blocking of the k channels of the elapos; axon of the squid by barium ions applied to the inner and outer elapos.
13	calcium and potassium currents in muscle fibres of an insect carausius morosus	Calcium and potassium flow patterns in the muscle fibers of a carausius morosus insect.
13	calmodulin dependent regulation of calcium activated outward current in frog atrial membrane	Calcium calmodulin-dependent regulation activated frog atrial membrane outward current.
13	interaction of acidosis and increased extracellular potassium on action potential characteristics and conduction in guinea pig ventricular muscle	Interaction of acidosis and acidosis; increase of extracellular potassium on the characteristics and conduction of the potential d' action in the guinea-pig ventricular muscle.
13	the activation and inactivation in biphasic potassium contractures in frog single twitch muscle fibers	L' activation and l' inactivation of biphasic potassium contractions in frog-shaking, single muscle fibers.
13	the effects of reducing the extracellular calcium concentration on the twitch in isolated frog s skeletal muscle fibres	Effects of reduced extracellular calcium on twitch in isolated skeletal muscle fibers of frog.
13	calcium antagonists and alpha 2 adrenoceptors possible role of extracellular calcium ions in alpha 2 adrenoceptor mediated vasoconstriction	Calcium antagonists and the alpha 2 adrenoceptors may play a role in alpha 2 adrenoceptor-mediated vasoconstriction.
13	effects of hypertonicity on frog muscle contractures induced by quinine	Effects of apos; hypertonicity on quinine-induced muscle contractions of frogs.
13	slow inward calcium currents have no obvious role in muscle excitation contraction coupling	The slow inward currents do not have an obvious role in coupling the contractions of the muscles.
13	effect of carbacholine on miniature potentials and currents of rat skeletal muscle endplates	Carbacholine effect on miniature end-plate potentials and currents in rat skeletal muscle.
13	relation between mineral fertilization and supply of potassium calcium magnesium and phosphorus to the population under conditions of intensive plant production in east germany	Relationship between mineral fertilization and potassium calcium magnesium and phosphorus supply to the population under plant-intensive conditions in East Germany.
13	the effect of tetraethylammonium and the decrease in the extracellular chloride concentration on membrane depolarization and contraction of skeletal muscle fiber induced by a hyperpotassium solution	Effect of tetraethylammonium and decrease in extracellular chloride concentration on d&apos solution-induced membrane depolarization and contraction of skeletal muscle fibres; hyperpotassium.
13	a comparison of the effect of combined frusemide and controlled release potassium tablets diumide k continus tablets and frusemide and slow k tablets in elderly patients with cardiac failure	Comparison of the effects of continuous diumide-controlled potassium and frusemide pills, and slow k and frusemide tablets in elderly patients with cardiac insufficiency.
13	a late increase in potassium conductance follows synaptic stimulation of granule neurons of the dentate gyrus	A late increase in the potassium conductance parallels synaptic stimulation of the serrated gyrus granular neurons.
13	protein kinase injection reduces voltage dependent potassium currents	L' injection of protein kinase reduces the voltage-dependent potassium currents.
13	skeletal muscle injury after magnesium depletion in the dog	Injury to the skeletal muscle after depletion of magnesium in the dog.
13	brain potassium ion homeostasis anoxia and metabolic inhibition in turtles and rats	Anoxia of the apos; homeostasis of the apos; cerebral potassium ion and metabolic inhibition in rats and turtles.
13	calcium mediated decrease of a voltage dependent potassium current	Calcium-mediated decrease d' voltage-dependent potassium current.
13	the calcium activated potassium conductance in guinea pig myenteric neurones	The calcium-activated potassium conductance of guinea-pig myenteric neurons.
13	block and activation of the pace maker channel in calf purkinje fibres effects of potassium caesium and rubidium	Pacemaker channel blockage and activation in calf purkinje fibers potassium cesium and rubidium effects.
13	effects of thyroxine on transmembrane resting potentials of skeletal muscle cells in culture	Effects of thyroxine on cultured skeletal muscle cell transmembrane resting potentials.
13	calcium ions and calcium antagonists in ischaemia	Calcium ions and calcium-containing antagonists in ischemia.
13	specific drug sensitive transport pathways for chloride and potassium ions in steady state ehrlich mouse ascites tumor cells	Chloride- and potassium-ion-specific drug-susceptible transport pathways in ehrlich mouse to apos tumour cells; eerlich mouse ascites; apos state; equilibrium.
13	effects of dantrolene and d2o on k stimulated respiration of skeletal muscle	Dantrolene and d2o on k stimulate skeletal muscle respiration.
13	net metabolic changes of zinc copper nitrogen and potassium balances in skeletal trauma patients	Net metabolic changes in potassium and nitrogen budgets of zinc and copper in patients with skeletal trauma.
13	regenerating mammalian nerve fibres changes in action potential waveform and firing characteristics following blockage of potassium conductance	After the blockage of the potassium conductance, the nerve fibers of regenerating mammals change the form of the d' wave of the potential d' action and discharge characteristics.
13	the effect of x 537a lasalocid on potassium contracture in rat ventricular muscle	L' effect of lasalocidal x 537a on the potassium contraction in the rat ventricular muscle.
13	t system optical signals associated with inward rectification in skeletal muscle	In skeletal muscle, the optical signals of the t-system are associated with an internal rectification.
13	conditioning prepulses and kinetics of potassium conductance in the frog node	Prepare prepulsations and potassium conductance kinetics in frog node.
13	single potassium channel currents in cultured mouse oligodendrocytes	In the case of cultured mouse oligodendrocytes, a unique potassium channel was found.
13	effects of 4 aminopyridine on inward rectifying and pacemaker currents of cardiac purkinje fibres	Effects of 4 aminopyridine on cardiac purkinje fiber inward rectifying and pacemaker currents.
13	time courses of late after potentials following tetanus or single shock in skeletal muscle fibers	Post-potential period after tetanus, or a single shock to the skeletal muscle fibers.
13	effects of calmodulin antagonists on tension and cellular calcium content in depolarized vascular and intestinal smooth muscles	Effects of calmodulin antagonists on cellular calcium content and tension in depolarized intestinal and vascular smooth muscles.
13	physiological synaptic interactions mediated by potassium ions	Physiological, potassium ion-mediated synaptic interactions.
13	long term measurement of skeletal and lean body mass in paget s disease of bone treated with synthetic human calcitonin	Long-term measurement of the skeletal mass and lean mass of human synthetic calcitonin-treated bone pagetous disease.
13	the effect of external potassium on the blockade of the inward going rectification by cesium ions in the frog atrial trabeculae	L' effect of external potassium on atrial trabeculae cesium blockade of internal rectification.
13	activity induced potassium accumulation and its uptake in frog ventricular muscle	L' activity induced accumulation of potassium and its uptake into frog ventricular muscle.
13	contractures produced by carbamate anticholinesterases in bovine tracheal smooth muscle	Prepared for the Canadian Food Inspection Agency, Food and Drug Administration, Ottawa, Ontario.
13	calcium and excitation contraction coupling in vascular smooth muscles	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of contractions.
13	calcium in excitation contraction coupling of frog skeletal muscle	Calcium in Frog Skeletal muscle contraction; excitation.
13	calcium currents of frog and insect skeletal muscle fibres measured during voltage clamp	Calcium currents in skeletal muscle fibers of frogs and d'apos; insects measured during voltage clamping.
13	external calcium and contractile activation during potassium contractures in twitch muscle fibres of the frog	Contractile activity and external calcium during the potassium contractions in frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	acetylcholine and potassium 42 movements in right atrial muscle of the guinea pig	D' acetylcholine and potassium movements 42 in the guinea pig right atrial muscle.
13	aminopyridine block of transient potassium current	L' aminopyridine blocks the transient, potassium current.
13	calcium channel and calcium pump involved in oscillatory hyperpolarizing responses of l strain mouse fibroblasts	The oscillatory hyperpolarizing responses of strain l mouse fibroblasts are mediated by the calcium channel and the calcium pump.
13	voltage activated and calcium activated currents studied in solitary rod inner segments from the salamander retina	Tension-activated and calcium-activated currents were studied in inner solitary rodlet segments of the retina of the salamander.
13	activation of contraction and atpase activity in intact and chemically skinned smooth muscle of rat portal vein dependence on ca and muscle length	Cardiac activation and apo activation; apo activity; atpase in chemically denuded intact smooth muscle depends on the muscle length and ca of the portal vein of the rat.
13	membrane potential in smooth muscle cells from hypertrophic rat portal vein	Membrane potential in the smooth muscle cells of the rat hypertrophic portal vein.
13	potassium mediation of calcium induced terminal differentiation of epidermal cells in culture	Terminal differentiation of cultured epidermal cells was induced by potassium mediation.
13	nature of electromechanical connections in the smooth muscle cells of the pulmonary artery	Nature of electromechanical connections in smooth muscle cells; pulmonary artery.
13	site of action and active form of aminopyridines in squid axon membranes	Site of action and active aminopyridine action in squid axonal membranes.
13	transport of ornithine carbamoyltransferase precursor into mitochondria stimulation by potassium ion magnesium ion and a reticulocyte cytosolic protein s	Transport of the precursor of l' ornithine carbamoyltransferase in l&apos mitochondrial stimulation; magnesium ion potassium ion and reticulocyte cytosolic protein.
13	correlation between manifestations of digoxin toxicity and serum digoxin calcium potassium and magnesium concentrations and arterial ph	Correlation between digoxin toxicity events and serum calcium digoxin, potassium and magnesium, and arterial pharynx concentrations.
13	interaction of internal anions with potassium channels of the squid giant axon	Interaction of internal anions with giant squid axons.
13	gating kinetics of ca2 activated k channels from rat muscle incorporated into planar lipid bilayers evidence for two voltage dependent ca2 binding reactions	The kinetics of blockade of ca2-activated rat muscle k channels incorporated into planar lipid bilayers demonstrate the apos; there are two voltage-dependent Ca2 binding reactions.
13	kinetics of ca2 activated k channels from rabbit muscle incorporated into planar bilayers evidence for a ca2 and ba2 blockade	The kinetics of rabbit muscle ca2-activated k-channels incorporated into planar bilayers indicate the existence of d' a blockade by ca2 and ba2.
13	diazepam a highly effective twitch potentiator in isolated muscle fibres of the frog	Diazepam is a very potent twitch potentiator in frog-derived muscle fibers.
13	the actions of sodium nitroprusside and diltiazem on calcium potassium and histamine induced contractile responses in isolated rabbit basilar artery aorta taenia coli and tracheal smooth muscle	Sodium nitroprusside and diltiazem actions on calcium, potassium, and l' histamine elicited contractile responses in l' aorta de l' basilar artery isolated from rabbit, taenia coli, and tracheal smooth muscle.
13	perchlorate induced alterations in electrical and mechanical parameters of frog skeletal muscle fibres	Perchlorate induced changes in frog skeletal muscle electrical and mechanical parameters.
13	the influence of the permeant ions thallous and potassium on inward rectification in frog skeletal muscle	L' influence of thallus and potassium permeant ions on internal rectification in skeletal muscle of frogs.
13	potassium propionate causes preferential loss of bound acetylcholine in frog muscle	Potassium propionate causes a preferential loss of the attached protein, acetylcholine, from frog muscle.
13	slow components of potassium tail currents in rat skeletal muscle	Slow components of rat skeletal muscle potassium tail currents.
13	acyltryptophols reversibly inhibit muscle contractions caused by the actions of acetylcholine and raised potassium ion concentrations	Acyltryptophols reversibly inhibit the contractions of muscles caused by the actions of l' acetylcholine and increase the concentrations of potassium ions.
13	liver and skeletal muscle metabolism extracellular k concentrations and survival in spontaneously hypertensive rats following acute blood loss	Liver and skeletal muscle metabolism, extracellular k-concentration, and survival following acute blood loss in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
13	basolateral potassium channel in turtle colon evidence for single file ion flow	The basolateral turtle colonic potassium channel indicates the existence of apos; a single-tailed ion flow.
13	chemical modification of potassium channel gating in frog myelinated nerve by trinitrobenzene sulphonic acid	Chemical modification of the blockade of potassium channels in the myelinated frog nerve by l' trinitrobenzene sulfonic acid.
13	depression of calcium dependent potassium conductance of guinea pig myenteric neurones by muscarinic agonists	Calcium-dependent decrease in guinea-pig myenteric neuron potassium conductance by muscarinic agonists.
13	mammalian skeletal muscle long lasting contractures and potentiated tetani produced by conditioning with weak acid anions	Long-term contractions of mammalian skeletal muscle and potentiated tetanis produced by weak acid anion conditioning.
13	properties of caffeine and potassium contractures in fatigued frog single twitch muscle fibers	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
13	nicardipine actions on smooth muscle cells and neuromuscular transmission in the guinea pig basilar artery	Action of nicardipine on neuromuscular transmission and smooth muscle cells in the apos; guinea pig basilar artery.
13	structural changes in nerve endings of rat median eminence superfused with media rich in potassium ions	Structural changes in the nerve endings of the rat; eminence in the middle of the rat superfused with high potassium ion media.
13	nalorphine actions at an opiate receptor on frog skeletal muscle fibers	The action of nalorphine on a frog skeletal muscle fiber opiate receptor.
13	voltage and ca2 activated k channel in baso lateral acinar cell membranes of mammalian salivary glands	The voltage and the k channel activated by ca2 in the membranes of lateral acinar baso cells of mammalian salivary glands.
13	dissociation of calcium and barium induced contractions of the rat duodenum smooth muscle	Barium calcium dissociation induced contractions of rat duodenum smooth muscle.
13	asymmetrical charge movement in slow and fast twitch mammalian muscle fibres in normal and paraplegic rats	Asymmetric Load Movements in Muscle Fibres from Slow and Rapidly Contracted Mammals in Normal and Paraplegic Rats.
13	k depolarization and phospholipid metabolism in frog sartorius muscle	Depolarization k and metabolism of phospholipids in frog's designer muscle.
13	excitation contraction coupling role of k activation within the transverse tubular system	It is not possible to predict the exact cause of the contraction.
13	influence of length of aortic occlusion with cold potassium cardioplegia on early and late mortality in cardiac valve replacement	Health and Welfare Canada, Health and Welfare Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
13	influence of divalent cations on potassium contracture duration in frog muscle fibres	The duration of potassium contraction in frog muscle fibers is influenced by divalent cations.
13	effects of 3 4 diaminopyridine on mechanical and electrical responses of frog single muscle fibres	Effects of 3-4 diaminopyridine on single frog muscle fiber mechanical and electrical responses.
13	patch clamp studies of slow potential sensitive potassium channels in longitudinal smooth muscle cells of rabbit jejunum	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
13	effects of an outward water flow on potassium currents in a squid giant axon	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of an increase in the amount of water flowing to and from the earth.
13	opiate activation of potassium conductance inhibits calcium action potentials in rat locus coeruleus neurones	L' opiate activation of potassium conductance inhibits the calcium potentials in the coeruleus neurons of the rat locus.
13	alpha adrenergic stimulation of potassium efflux in guinea pig hepatocytes may involve calcium influx and calcium release	Alpha-adrenergic stimulation of guinea pig hepatocyte potassium efflux could involve calcium influx and calcium release.
13	characterization of benextramine as an irreversible alpha adrenergic blocker and as a blocker of potassium activated calcium channels	Benextramine characterization as an irreversible alpha-adrenergic blocker and potassium-activated calcium channel blocker.
13	effect of ascorbate on the contractile response induced by dmpp in guinea pig ileal longitudinal muscle strip	Effect of ascorbate on dmpp-induced contractile response in guinea-pig ileal longitudinal muscle.
13	adenosine activates a potassium conductance in guinea pig atrial heart muscle	L' adenosine activates potassic conductance in guinea pig atrial cardiac muscle.
13	predominant blocking of fast potassium current channels in mollusk neurons by 4 aminopyridine	Prevalent blockage of the fast channels of potassium current in neurons of molluscs by 4 aminopyridines.
13	the resting membrane parameters of human intercostal muscle at low normal and high extracellular potassium	Resting membrane parameters of extracellular potassium-lowering human intercostal muscle.
13	isolation and contractile properties of single smooth muscle cells from guinea pig taenia caeci	Isolation and contractile properties of simple smooth muscle cells of the taenia caeci of guinea pig.
13	activation of calcium channels by novel 1 4 dihydropyridines a new mechanism for positive inotropics or smooth muscle stimulants	L' calcium channel activation by new dihydropyridines 1-4 is a novel mechanism for positive inotropes or smooth muscle stimulants.
13	on the physiological role of internodal potassium channels and the security of conduction in myelinated nerve fibres	The physiological role of the internal potassium channels and the safety of the conduction in myelinated nerve fibers.
13	functional interactions of calcium antagonists in k depolarized smooth muscle	Functional calcium antagonist interactions in depolarized smooth muscle k k.
13	the inhibitory effects of n2 dansyl l arginine 4 t butylpiperidine amide ti233 on contraction of vascular and intestinal smooth muscle	The inhibitory effects of n2 in lyl arginine 4 t-butylpiperidine amide ti233 on intestinal and vascular smooth muscle contraction.
13	electrophysiological study of frog eggs at different stages of development iii ionic currents activated by intense hyperpolarization and depolarization of the oocyte at the final stage of vitellogenesis	Electrophysiological study of eggs of frogs at different stages of development iii ion currents activated by intense depolarization and hyperpolarization of l' oocyte at the final stage of vitellogenesis.
13	the contribution of calcium and potassium to the alpha action of adrenaline on smooth muscle cells of the portal vein pulmonary artery and taenia caeci of the guinea pig	The contribution of calcium and potassium to the alpha action of epos; adrenaline on the guinea pig smooth muscle cells; the portal pulmonary venous artery and the guinea pig taenia caeci.
13	effects of 4 aminopyridine and tetraethylammonium chloride on the electrical activity and cable properties of canine tracheal smooth muscle	Effects of aminopyridine 4 and tetraethylammonium chloride on canine electrical activity and tracheal smooth muscle cable properties.
13	calcium dependence of open and shut interval distributions from calcium activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle	Calcium dependence of calcium-activated potassium channel open and closed intervals in cultured rat muscle.
13	burst kinetics of single calcium activated potassium channels in cultured rat muscle	Calcium-activated potassium channel bursting kinetics in the cultured rat muscle.
13	nature of the dual caffeine sodium benzoate effect on the tonic component of the potassium contracture of the myocardium in the frog	Nature of L' effect of sodium benzoate double caffeine on tonic component of myocardial potassium contraction in frog.
13	inhibition by ba of background current and of its modifications by carbachol in frog atrium	Ba inhibition of bottom current and its modification by carbachol in the frog atrium.
13	calcium action potentials in rat fast twitch and slow twitch muscle fibres	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
13	the effect of cellular energy reserves and internal calcium ions on the potassium conductance in skeletal muscle of the frog	L' effect of internal calcium ions and cellular energy reserves on potassium conductance in frog skeletal muscle.
13	kinetic properties of calcium channels of twitch muscle fibres of the frog	Calcium channel kinetics of frog twitch muscle fibers.
13	voltage dependent k conductance at the apical membrane of necturus gallbladder	Necturus gallbladder apical membrane tension-dependent conductance k.
13	the actions of d 600 aspaminol and papaverine on calcium potassium and histamine induced contractions of isolated rabbit basilar artery aorta taenia coli and tracheal smooth muscle	L' action of aspaminol and papaverin 600 on calcium, potassium, and l' histamine induced contractions of rabbit basilar aorta, taenia coli, and tracheal smooth muscle.
13	potassium induced depolarizations and generation of tension in barnacle muscle fibres effects of external calcium strontium and barium	Potassium induced depolarizations and tension production in barium and external strontium calcium muscle fibers.
13	effect of 4 aminopyridine on potassium permeability of canine tracheal smooth muscle cell membrane	Effect of 4 aminopyridine on the potassium permeability of the membrane of canine tracheal smooth muscle.
13	ruthenium red differential effects on excitation and excitation contraction coupling in frog skeletal muscle	Differential effects of Ruthenium Red on excitation-contraction of d' excitation in frog skeletal muscle.
13	effects of ouabain and potassium on rabbit arterial smooth muscle cells in culture	Effects of ouabain and potassium on arterial smooth muscle cells of rabbits in culture.
13	effects of hypertonic solutions on contraction of frog tonic muscle fibers	Effects of Hypertonic Solutions on Frog Tonic Muscle Fibriction.
13	calcium mediates the light induced decrease in maintained k current in limulus ventral photoreceptors	Calcium plays a role in light-induced decrease of k-current held in the ventral photoreceptors of limulus.
13	intracellular injection of guanyl nucleotides alters the serotonin induced increase in potassium conductance in aplysia neuron r15	L' guanyl nucleotide intracellular injection alters the apos; serotonin-induced increase of potassium conductance in the r15 neuron of the apos; aplysia.
13	non stationary fluctuations of the potassium conductance at the node of ranvier of the frog	Non-stationary K-conductance fluctuations at frog range node.
13	regulation of delayed afterdepolarizations and aftercontractions in dog ventricular muscle fibres	Regulation of delayed-depolarizations and post-contractions in the canine ventricular muscle fibers.
13	assessment of selective inhibition of rat cerebral cortical calcium independent and calcium dependent phosphodiesterases in crude extracts using deoxycyclic amp and potassium ions	Evaluation of the protein; selective inhibition of the calcium phosphodiesterases-dependent and independent of the cerebral cortex of rats in crude extracts at the apos; help; deoxycyclic and apos light bulbs; potassium ions.
13	potential and k activity in skinned muscle fibers evidence against a simple donnan equilibrium	The potency and potency; activity in the denuded muscle fibers indicates that there is no protein or protein; there is simple balance of the data.
13	analysis of the effects of cesium ions on potassium channel currents in biological membranes	Analysis of cesium ion effects on potassium channel currents in biological membranes.
13	potassium channel kinetics in squid axons with elevated levels of external potassium concentration	The kinetics of potassium channels in the axons of squid show high concentrations of external potassium.
13	hydrogen isotope effect on transport of potassium ion in rice seedlings equilibrated with deuterium oxide	It can also be used as an indicator of the toxicity of deuterium oxides, as well as an indicator of the toxicity of deuterium.
13	potassium in skeletal muscle in untreated primary hypertension and in chronic renal failure studied by x ray fluorescence technique	Potassium in rat skeletal muscle; untreated primary hypertension and kidney failure; chronic renal failure were studied using the X-ray fluorescence technique.
13	localized ca2 and calcium activated potassium conductances in terminals of a barnacle photoreceptor	Calcium- and ca2-activated potassium conductances localized in the d&apos terminals were activated by calcium in a barnacle photoreceptor.
13	role of dietary potassium and magnesium in diuretic treated patients with cardiac insufficiency	The role of potassium and magnesium in cardiovascular disease; the role of potassium and magnesium in the diet of patients treated with diuretics; and heart failure.
13	potassium conductivity of the plasma membrane of frog photoreceptor cells	Frog photoreceptor plasma membrane potassium conductivity.
13	charge movement in skeletal muscle fibers paralyzed by the calcium entry blocker d600	In addition to the above, there are a number of other devices that can be used to reduce the amount of calcium in the body.
13	asymmetric proton block of inward rectifier k channels in skeletal muscle	Asymmetrical block of k-channel protons from the rectifier to the skeletal muscle.
13	calcium channel activation in vascular smooth muscle by bay k 8644	Activation of the calcium channel in the vascular smooth muscle by the bight k 8644.
14	sequelae of bacterial meningitis in infants	Infectious Diseases and Infectious Diseases.
14	cryothalamectomy for parkinson s disease	Parkinson's Cryothalamectomy.
14	interventricular communication with heart failure in newborn and older infants evaluation of medical treatment	Interventricular Communication with Heart Failure in Newborn-and Older Infants Assessment of Medical Treatment.
14	a clinical study of chronic pancreatitis	Chronic pancreatitis clinical study.
14	post necrotic cirrhosis with chronic cholestasis	Cirrhosis post-chronic cholestasis necrotic.
14	adult coeliac disease	Adult celiac disease.
14	the course and prognosis of ulcerative colitis	L' ulcerative colitis evolution and prognosis.
14	prognostic value of high 10 minute i 131 uptake in non toxic goitres	The amount of water that is absorbed by the water from the water.
14	observations on the value of mitral commissurotomy an analysis of long term results	An analysis of the long-term outcomes of this study is presented.
14	syringomyelia a clinical review of 75 cases	Syringomyelia is the most common type of neoplasm.
14	is phenacetin a nephrotoxin a report on twenty three users of the drug	C' is phenacetin, a nephrotoxin, a ratio of three drug users to twenty.
14	acute purulent meningitis in alaska natives epidemiology diagnosis and prognosis	Acute Purulent Meningitis in Aboriginal People in Alaska, Epidemiological diagnosis, and epidemiologic prognosis.
14	a follow up evaluation of the treatment of chronic alcoholics	Chronic alcoholics follow-up assessment.
14	skin homografts in patients with cancer of the cervix	Cervical cancer, cervical cancer, cervical cancer, and cervical cancer.
14	x ray pelvimetry	Pelvimetric X-ray.
14	the value of pulmonary function studies in the assessment of patients for cardiac surgery	The Value of Lung Function Studies in Assessing Patients for Cardiac Surgery.
14	pathology of tumours in children	Childhood tumour pathology.
14	myeloma proteins and the clinical response to melphalan therapy	Myeloma Proteins and Clinical Response to Melphalan Treatment.
14	the significance of regional lumph node metastases in breast carcinoma	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
14	sarcoidosis and polyarthritis	He's got Sarcoidosis and polyarthritis.
14	malignant neoplasms of the nasopharynx	Malignant nasopharyngeal neoplasms.
14	traumatic intrauterine adhesions the fritsch asherman syndrome	Traumatic uterine adhesion to Fritsch Asherman syndrome.
14	diagnosis and treatment of delirium	Diagnosis and delusion therapy.
14	sarcoidosis	Sarcoidosis.
14	the clinical spectrum of renal insufficiency during acute glomerulonephritis in the adult	The Clinical Spectrum of Lapos; Renal Failure During Acute Glomerulonephritis in Adults.
14	clinical results of thromboendarterectomy for peripheral atherosclerotic occlusive disease	Clinical results of a thromboendarterectomy for a peripheral occlusive, atherosclerotic disease.
14	ovarian cancer at the ontario cancer foundation clinics 1938 1958	Cancer of the ovary; ovary in the clinics of the Foundation against Cancer of the Apostles; Ontario 1938.
14	the prognostic significance of circulating tumour cells a five year follow up study of patients with cancer of the breast	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those of other studies that have been conducted in the United States.
14	dizziness and head injury	Dizziness, head injuries.
14	the acid base status in cyanotic congenital heart disease	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
14	the natural history of tumours of the urinary tract	L' Natural History of Urinary Tumours.
14	gastric lymphosarcoma and pseudolymphoma reappraisal of 12 cases of gastric lymphosarcoma	Gastric lymphosarcoma and pseudolymphoma re-evaluate 12 gastric lymphosarcoma cases.
14	mammary tumor inhibition and lung adenoma induction by isonicotinic acid hydrazide	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
14	reticuloendothelial system phagocytic function in patients with hodgkin s disease	Phagocytic Functions of the Reticulo System-Endothelial in Patients with Hodgkin's Disease.
14	epidemiological basis of tuberculosis eradication 7 application of life table methods for assessing the prognosis for tuberculosis patients	Epidemiological Basis of Disease; Tuberculosis Eradication 7 Life table methods are applied to assess the prognosis of TB patients.
14	the management of acute leukemia	Acute leukemia management.
14	the influence of morphology on prognosis in acute leukemia	L' morphology influences prognosis of acute leukemia.
14	prognosis for patients with ventricular septal defect and severe pulmonary vascular obstructive disease	Patients with severe obstructive pulmonary vascular disease and ventricular septal defects are assessed for prognosis.
14	ulcerative colitis with liver disease	Liver disease ulcer colitis.
14	epidemiological basis of tuberculosis eradication 8 some factors of significance for the prognosis for a tuberculosis patient	It is important to note that the incidence of TB in Canada is much higher than in the United States.
14	lethal complications of the ehlers danlos syndrome	Eylers danlos syndrome fatal complications.
14	lactic acidosis in diabetes	Diabetes is a major risk factor for diabetes.
14	acidaemia and salicylate poisoning in adults	Acidemia and adult salicylate poisoning.
14	carcinoma of the breast in women 35 years of age or younger	Breast Cancer in Women 35 Years of Age and Under.
14	prognosis in tetraplegia	Tetraplegia projection.
14	clinical classification of extent of disease in cancer of the breast	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	value of routine cardiac monitoring in the management of acute myocardial infarction outside a coronary care unit	Systematic cardiac monitoring value in the treatment of stroke; acute myocardial infarction; external d' coronary care unit.
14	erythraemia in renal transplantation	Renal erythraemia.
14	objectivized diagnosis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease diagnostic and prognostic value of routine laparoscopy	Objective Diagnosis of Acute Pelvic Inflammatory Diseases and Prognostic Value of Routine Laparoscopy.
14	return to work experiences of a hospital rehabilitation officer	It is important to know what to do and how to do it.
14	indirect assessment of left ventricular performance in acute myocardial infarction	Indirect evaluation of left ventricular (LV) performance in the apos; acute myocardial infarction.
14	prognosis in early adult life of coeliac children treated with a gluten free diet	In the early stages of adult life, children with celiac disease are treated with a diet that is gluten-free.
14	infection with the avian battey group of mycobacteria in england and wales	Bat group infection-mycobacterial avian mice in England and Wales.
14	operative treatment of typhoid perforation of the bowel	Surgical treatment of apos perforation; bowel with typhoid.
14	malignant degeneration of benign cystic teratomas of the ovary review of the literature and report of a chondrosarcoma and carcinoid tumor	Malignant degeneration of mild cystic teratoma of the apos; ovary after literature review and report; chondrosarcoma and d' a carcinoid tumor.
14	myosarcomas of the bladder and prostate	Bladder prostate myosarcomas.
14	lymphovenous shunts in man	Male lymphoblastoma.
14	testing the vision of cataract patients by means of laser generated interference fringes	Cataract patients are tested for vision using d*apos fringe; laser-generated interference.
14	cardiovascular state of newly discovered diabetic women	Cardiovascular status of newborns and newborns.
14	gastrointestinal lymphoma in childhood	Lymphoma gastro@-@ in the intestinal tract in children.
14	management of high risk pregnancy report of a combined obstetrical and neonatal intensive care unit	Management of High Risk Pregnancy Reported in a Combined Obstetric and Neonatal Intensive Care Unit.
14	enzyme activity acidic nuclear proteins and prognosis in human breast cancer	An enzyme-linked protein (ANP) is a protein that acts as an antigen.
14	earlier diagnosis and survival in lung cancer	Early diagnosis and early survival of lung cancer.
14	natural history of diverticular disease of the colon a review of 521 cases	Natural history of diverticular bowel disease 521 cases.
14	reappraisal of clinical features of diverticular disease of the colon	Reassessment of Clinical Characteristics of Enteric Bowel Disease.
14	long term prognosis after mitral annuloplasty for acquired mitral insufficiency clinical evaluation	In the long-term, prognosis has been established for the following: mitral annuloplasty for the apos; clinical evaluation of the apos; acquired mitral insufficiency.
14	long term follow up of direct current cardioversion after cardiac surgery with special reference to quinidine	Long-term follow-up of current direct cardioversion, especially quinidine, following cardiac surgery.
14	value of serial p wave changes in indicating left heart failure in myocardial infarction	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack, stroke, stroke, and stroke, as well as increased risk of stroke.
14	primary pulmonary hypertension eosinophilia and filariasis in ceylon	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	mesonephroid tumours of the ovary	Mesonephroid gland tumours; ovary.
14	liquor bilirubin levels in normal pregnancy a reassessment of early prediction of haemolytic disease	Liqueur bilirubin levels during normal pregnancy; early prediction of hemolytic disease reassessed.
14	accidental hypothermia	Unintentional hypothermia.
14	host resistance and survival in carcinoma of breast a study of 104 cases of medullary carcinoma in a series of 1 411 cases of breast cancer followed for 20 years	In addition, the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) and the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) are exploring ways to improve the quality of health care in Canada.
14	myelomatosis comparison of melphalan and cyclophosphamide therapy	Comparison of Melphalan and Cyclophosphamide Myelomatosis.
14	medical presentations of choriocarcinoma	Choriocarcinoma.
14	bleeding from esophageal varices in cirrhosis of the liver hemodynamic and radiological criteria for the selection of potential bleeders through hepatic and umbilicoportal catheterization studies	Hemorrhage of esophageal varices in liver cirrhosis, hemodynamic and radiologic criteria for selection of potential bleeding in hepatic and umbilicoportal catheterization studies.
14	growth of metastases from p 388 sarcoma in the rat followig whole body irradiation	Rat metastasis growth from p388 sarcoma follows whole-body irradiation.
14	possible clinical implications of therapeutically induced temperature changes in continuously monitored tumour mass preliminary report	The results of this study will be used to assess the potential for adverse effects on human health and the environment.
14	pericarditis after acute myocardial infarction	He's got a pericarditis from an acute MI.
14	natural history and treatment of wilms s tumour an analysis of 335 cases occurring in england and wales 1962 6	It is important to note, however, that the number of cases reported in England and Wales in 1962 is small.
14	management of breast cancer in old age	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	long term prognosis following ventricular fibrillation in acute ischaemic heart disease	Long-term post-ventricular fibrillation projection in acute ischemic heart disease.
14	the prognosis and risk of missing malignant disease in patients with unexplained and functional diarrhoea	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
14	neuraminidase activity in bacterial meningitis	L' bacterial meningitis neuraminidase activity.
14	fate of surviving low birth weight infants with coagulation deficiencies on the first day of life	The fate of the new-babies born of low birth weight who have problems with clotting on the first day of their lives.
14	sudden death in hospital after discharge from coronary care unit	Hospital after discharge; coronary care unit.
14	electroencephalographic prediction of fatal anoxic brain damage after resuscitation from cardiac arrest	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada.
14	long term ventricular pacing in treatment of sinoatrial block	Long-term ventricular stimulation in sino-atrial blockade treatment.
14	reliability of physical signs in patients with severe attacks of ulcerative colitis	It's a good idea to have a healthy body, but it's not a good idea.
14	ileo rectal anastomosis for crohn s disease of the colon	Ileo rectal anastomosis for colonic Crohn's disease.
14	ventricular hypertrophy in cardiomyopathy	Ventricular hypertrophy, cardiomyopathy.
14	prognosis of idiopathic cardiomegaly in jamaica with reference to the coronary arteries and other factors	Prognosis of idiopathic cardiomegaly in Jamaica with respect to coronary and dapo arteries; other factors.
14	prognosis in acute cerebrovascular accidents in relation to respiratory pattern and blood gas tensions	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
14	a two year experience with human heart transplantation	A two-year experience in Human Heart Transplantation.
14	indications for hypophysectomy in diabetic retinopathy and cancer of the breast and prostate	It is recommended that you consult with your doctor or pharmacist to determine if you are eligible for this program.
14	prediction of hypothyroidism after partial thyroidectomy for thyrotoxicosis	Prediction of apo; hypothyroidism following partial thyroidectomy for thyrotoxicosis.
14	lignocaine therapy for ventricular ectopic activity after acute myocardial infarction a double blind trial	Lignocaine treatment of apos; ectopic ventricular activity following acute double-blind myocardial infarction.
14	factors influencing survival in carcinoma of the ovary	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
14	spina bifida cystica an orthopaedic criterion for the early closure of myelomeningocoeles	Spina bifida cystica is an orthopaedic criteria for early closure of myelomeningocles.
14	comparison of streptokinase and heparin in treatment of isolated acute massive pulmonary embolism	Comparison of Streptokinase and Lapos; Heparin in the treatment of apos; an acute, isolated, acute pulmonary embolism.
14	rheumatic diseases of the central nervous system in children	Rheumatic diseases of children's central nervous system.
14	right bundle branch block and left axis deviation in acute myocardial infarction	Block branch of the right beam and deviation of the apos; axis left in the apos; acute infarction of the myocardium.
14	classification of leukemias	Leukemia classification.
14	histological diagnosis of precancerous and early stages in cancer of the cervix uteri	Early and pre-cancer histologic diagnosis of cervical cancer.
14	trial of maintenance therapy in schizophrenia	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
14	an analysis of clinical and histopathological features in 101 cases of carcinoma of breast in women under 35 years of age	Clinical and histopathological characteristics of 101 breast carcinoma cases in women < 35 years of age.
14	the use of discriminant analysis for examining the histological feathers of oral keratoses and lichen planus	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: (a) (b) (c) (d) (e) (f) (e) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (e) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f) (f)) (f) (f) (f) (f)) (f) (f)) (f) (f)) (f))) (f) (f) (f))) (f)) (f) (f)) (f) (f) (f) (f)) (f))) (f) (f))
14	adrenocortical activity in disseminated malignant disease in relation to prognosis	L' Adrenocortical Activity in Dispersed Malignant Disease.
14	peritoneal dialysis by indwelling catheter for chronic renal failure 1963 1968	Cardiovascular System (CSNS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
14	polycythemia and budd chiari syndrome apropos of 17 cases	In addition to the above, there are a number of cases in which the disease has been treated.
14	prognosis for patients with severe brain injuries	In addition to the above, there are a number of other types of brain injuries.
14	kantamaneni bd curzon g comparison of benefit from l dopa in parkinsonism with increase of amine metabolites in the csf	Kantamaneni bd curzon g compares the benefits of dopa in parkinsonism with those in apos; increases in metabolites of amines in csf.
14	closed head trauma and aphasia	Head trauma's closed and aphasic.
14	symptomatic cysts of the telencephalic choroid plexus	Symptomatic choroidal plexus cysts, telencephalic.
14	congenital aortic stenosis follow up of surgical management	Congenital aortic stenosis following surgical management.
14	spontaneous intracerebral haemorrhage in patients suspected of multiple sclerosis	Spontaneous intracerebral bleeding in suspected MS patients.
14	complications of the landry guillain barr strohl syndrome	Landry Guillain Barr Strohl strobe syndrome complications.
14	a combined clinical and histological assessment of survival of patients with hodgkin s disease	Combined histological and clinical assessment of Hodgkin's disease survival.
14	acute myocardial infarction home and hospital treatment	Acute MI in the home and treatment at the hospital.
14	fat laden macrophages in cerebrospinal fluid as an indication of brain damage in children	Spinal fluid fat-laden macrophages-spinal cord as an indication of brain lesions in children.
14	recurrence of crohn s disease after primary excisional surgery	In addition to the above, there are a number of other surgical procedures that can be performed.
14	ischaemic heart disease a secondary prevention trial using clofibrate report by a research committee of the scottish society of physicians	Ischemic heart disease is a secondary prevention trial using a d&apos clofibrate report, a Scottish Society of Physicians research committee.
14	the pattern of female genital tuberculosis in ibadan	Female genital TB profile in ibadan.
14	prognosis of pituitary adenomas with arteriographic abnormal vascularization	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
14	ependymal cyst of the spinal cord case report	Spinal cord report ependymal cyst.
14	common carotid ligation for the treatment of ruptured posterior communicating aneurysms	Connection of common carotid artery for treatment of ruptured posterior communication aneurysms.
14	idiopathic polyneuritis serial studies of nerve and immune functions	Serial Studies of Idiopathic Polyneuritis of Immune and Nervous Functions.
14	histology in breast cancer prognosis	Lapses; History of Breast Cancer Prediction.
14	portal hypertension in primary biliary cirrhosis	L' hypertension carries in the primary bile cirrhosis.
14	the posterior operation in treatment of cervical spondylosis with myelopathy a long term follow up study	L' post-operative cervical spondylosis treatment with myelopathy a long-term follow-up study.
14	invasion of cranial nerves by salivary cylindroma four cases treated by radiotherapy	Infection of the cranial nerves by a four-case saliva cylinder treated with a radiotherapy.
14	hormonal treatment of metastases of renal carcinoma	Hormonal treatment of metastatic hypernephrome.
14	breast cancer grading	Classification of Breast Cancer.
14	survival of burkitt s lymphoma patients in ghana	It's a great way to learn more about the disease and how it works.
14	the relative significance of prognostic factors in breast carcinoma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	pathological factors in survival of lung tumours local extent size and nodal involvement	Pathological factors in the survival of local extended lung tumors of size and height; nodal involvement.
14	adenocarcinoma of the large bowel	Large intestine adenocarcinoma.
14	duration of survival of children with acute leukaemia report to the medical research council from the committee on leukaemia and the working party on leukaemia in childhood	Survival of children with acute leukemia is reported to the Medical Research Council by the Leukemia Committee and the Child Leukemia Working Group.
14	factors influencing immediate prognosis in acute renal failure with special reference to prophylactic hemodialysis	Factors influencing immediate prognosis; acute renal failure, especially apos; prophylactic hemodialysis.
14	diagnostic and prognostic value of the eeg in the immediate aftermath of cranial trauma	A person who has been diagnosed as having Alzheimer's disease.
14	liquor bilirubin levels and false prediction of severity in rhesus haemolytic disease	Hemolytic hemolytic disease (HEMD) is a disease of the hemolytic system.
14	prognostic typing in breast cancer	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	prognosis for the infertile couple	Infertile couple prognosis.
14	the effects of levodopa therapy in patients with parkinson s disease i clinical response	The Effects of Levodopa Treatment in Patients with Parkinson's Disease i Clinical Response.
14	prognostic implications of electroencephalographic findings of hypsarrhythmia in first year of life	In addition, the results of the test should be reported to Health Canada in the same manner as the test results.
14	recent advances in neuroblastoma	Recent neuroblastoma advances.
14	efficacy of a regional poisoning treatment centre in preventing further suicidal behaviour	It is important to note that this is not the only cause of death, but rather the cause of death.
14	idiopathic palsy of the recurrent laryngeal nerve a transient cranial mononeuropathy	Recurrent laryngeal idiopathic paralysis, transient cranial mononeuropathy.
14	natural history of patients with x ray negative dyspepsia in general practice	Natural History of Patients with Negative X-ray Dyspepsia in General Medicine.
14	outpatient treatment trial of mild and severe hypertension	Tests of treatment ambulatory of l'apos; hypertension light and severe.
14	relation between age of onset of obesity and size and number of adipose cells	In addition, there is a need for additional information to assist in the evaluation of risk factors.
14	accuracy of predictions of survival in later stages of cancer	The Canadian Cancer Society, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
14	assisted circulation following myocardial infarction a review of 25 patients treated before 1971	Acute myocardial infarction (MMI) – Acute myocardial infarction (AMI) is a major cause of myocardial infarction.
14	nephrotic syndrome in adult africans in nairobi	Adult African Nephrotic Syndrome in Nairobi.
14	analgesic nephropathy	Painkiller nephropathy.
14	venous graft surgery in treatment of coronary heart disease	Venous Transplant Surgery for the Treatment of Coronary Heart Disease.
14	75 se selenomethionine scanning in the diagnosis of tumours of the pancreas and adjacent viscera the use of the test and its impact on survival	Scan 75 selects selenomethionine in pancreatic tumour and adjacent viscera diagnosis; use of test and impact on survival.
14	alpha fetoprotein in abortion	It's not a good idea, but it's good.
14	the surgical significance of methaemalbuminaemia	Methemalbuminemia's surgical significance.
14	in vitro oestrogen sensitivity of breast cancer	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	neurophysiological identification of a late infantile form of neuronal lipidosis	Neurophysiological identification of late childhood neural lipidosis.
14	factors in pathogenesis of central nervous system leukaemia	Pathogenic Factors in Central Nervous System Leukemia.
14	plama estradiol estriol and progesterone in human pregnancy ii clinical applications in rh isoimmunization disease	Plama estradiol estriol and progesterone during human pregnancy ii Clinical Applications of Rh isoimmunization disease.
14	small strokes in the carotid territory associated with a normal carotid arteriogram	Just minor strokes in the carotid arteries associated with normal carotid arteriogram.
14	impairment of memory functions after acute head injury	Deterioration of memory function due to the presence of acute traumatic brain injury.
14	cubital tunnel external compression syndrome	Compression syndrome external to the cuital tunnel.
14	chronic lumbar extradural haematoma simulating disc syndrome	It's a chronic, extradural lumbar hematoma that simulates the disc syndrome.
14	medulloblastoma treatment and prognosis a study of seventeen cases in ten years	Treatment and prognosis of medulloblastoma: ten-7 cases in 10 years.
14	phenothiazine poisoning a review of 48 cases	Phenothiazine poisoning 48 cases.
14	long term study of disodium cromoglycate in treatment of severe extrinsic or intrinsic bronchial asthma in adults brompton hospital medical research council collaborative trial	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/dhp-mps/index.html.
14	cerebellar haematomas caused by angiomas in children	Angioma-induced cerebral hematoma in children.
14	clinical features of yellow fever cases at vom christian hospital during the 1969 epidemic on the jos plateau nigeria	Clinical characteristics of apo yellow fever cases; apo Christian vomit hospital; 1969 plague on jos nigeria plateau.
14	evolution of the acid base status in cardiac arrest	It's a long-term process; it's a long-term process, but it's a long-term process.
14	chronic budd chiari syndrome due to obstruction of the intrahepatic portion of the inferior vena cava	Chronic Chiari Bud Syndrome; intrahepatic portion of the inferior vena cava obstructed.
14	structural changes in the early stages of duchenne muscular dystrophy	Structural changes in early duchenne muscular dystrophy.
14	russell s diencephalic syndrome of early childhood	Russell's Early Childhood Drainage Syndrome.
14	pneumoencephalo roulette tomography of operated primary pontine haemorrhage with long survival report of two cases	Pneumoencephalo pillow tumour; primary pontic hemorrhage operated with long-term survival ratio of two cases.
14	national surgical breast project	National Breast Surgical Project.
14	placental lactogen levels as guide to outcome of threatened abortion	A woman who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS and who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
14	herpesvirus hominis infection in patients with myeloproliferative and lymphoproliferative disorders	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/pubs/index_e.html.
14	spontaneous rupture of hepatocellular carcinoma	Hepatocellular carcinoma spontaneously ruptured.
14	evaluation of a rapid latex agglutination test for detection of alpha1 fetoprotein	For the purpose of this test, the patient should be tested for fetoprotein alpha1 at the same time.
14	cranial and spinal meningiomas in a pair of identical twin boys	Cranial and spinal meningiomas in identical twin siblings.
14	onset early stages and prognosis of rheumatoid arthritis a clinical study of 100 patients with 11 year follow up	Early Stages and Prediction of Rheumatoid Arthritis begins a clinical study of 100 patients with 11 years of follow-up.
14	prognosis of guillain barr syndrome in the african the nigerian experience	Nigerian experience of Guillain Barr's Syndrome in Africa.
14	relation between radiographic categories of coalworkers pneumoconiosis and expectation of life	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety, Public Health Agency of Canada.
14	a comparison of two methods of prognostic typing in breast cancer	Comparison of two prognostic breast cancer typing methods.
14	short and long term prognosis after myocardial infarction	Short-term and long-term myocardial infarction.
14	life threatening dermatoses	Fatal dermatoses.
14	acute renal cortical necrosis variable course and changing prognosis	Acute renal cortical necrosis with a variable evolution and a change in the prognosis.
14	tubal ectopic pregnancy etiology and obstetric and gynecologic sequelae	Etiology of pregnancy: extra-uterine and sequelae of obstetrics and gynaecology.
14	prognostic typing in breast cancer further investigation of a necropsy series compared with recent surgical specimens	In addition, the Canadian Breast Cancer Screening Program (CBCS) has been working with the Canadian Breast Cancer Screening Initiative (CBCS) to improve the quality of breast cancer screening in Canada.
14	narcolepsy	Narcolepsy.
14	the immediate antecedents of myocardial infarction in active men	Injury is a major cause of death, as well as a cause of death.
14	motor neuron disease in nova scotia	Sickness of the motor neurons in the nova scotia scotia.
14	children with recurrent abdominal pain how do they grow up	Children with recurrent abdominal pain, how does-grow?
14	malignant testicular tumours	Malignant tumors of the testicles.
14	sleep epilepsy its pattern and prognosis	Sleep epilepsy, pattern and prognosis.
14	mixed mesodermal tumors of the uterus	Mixed uterine mesodermal tumours.
14	kidney transplantation improvement in patient and graft survival	Improved survival following renal transplantation.
14	influence of selection of patients on results of clinical trials	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Public Health Agency of Canada.
14	comparison of mobilization after two and nine days in uncomplicated myocardial infarction	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system.
14	talking with people about to die	Talking with dying people.
14	recurrent haematuria and mesangial iga deposition	Recurrent hematuria and iga mesangial deposits.
14	influence of amniotic fluid volume on lecithin estimation in prediction of respiratory distress	It is important to note that there are no data on the effects of lecithin on respiratory distress.
14	cerebral blood flow and oxygen uptake and cerebrospinal fluid biochemistry in severe coma	Cerebral blood flow, absorption of epos; oxygen and biochemistry of the cerebral fluid-rachidian in a severe coma.
14	hypertrophic mononeuropathy	Hypertrophic mono-neuropathy.
14	surgery in management of patients with leukaemia	Leukemia patient management surgery.
14	neonatal necrotizing enterocolitis clinical and radiological features	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	failure of cerebrospinal fluid homovanillic acid to predict levodopa response in parkinson s disease	The inability of the cerebrospinal fluid to predict the response of levodopa to Parkinson's disease.
14	group characteristics of children with cerebral and spinal cord tumours	This information is required for accountability purposes and for accountability purposes.
14	evaluation of tnm classification of carcinoma of the breast	Health Canada, Canadian Institute of Health Information.
14	epidemiology and course of gastrointestinal haemorrhage in north east scotland	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	fibrin degradation products in the serum and cerebrospinal fluid of patients with group a meningococcal meningitis	Serum and cerebrospinal fluid degradation products of fibrin in patients with apo; group meningococcal meningitis.
14	proceedings clinical value of predictive tests for advanced breast cancer	Advanced Predictive Breast Cancer Screening Procedures Clinical Value.
14	screening for hypertension some epidemiological observations	In addition, there is no evidence of any adverse effects.
14	liver biopsy and prognosis in acute liver failure	Acute liver failure and prognosis.
14	fibrosis as in indication of time in infiltrating breast cancer and its importance in prognosis	Fibrosis as an indication of the time in invasive breast cancer and its significance to prognosis.
14	survival rates of lung cancer according to histological type	Lung Cancer Survival Rate by Histological Type.
14	a trial of corticotrophin gelatin injection in acute optic neuritis	A test of apos; injection of corticotropin gelatin into an acute optical neuritis.
14	chlorodyne dependence	Chlorodyne addiction.
14	benign rheumatoid arthritis of the aged	Seniors have mild rheumatoid arthritis.
14	late residua of acute idiopathic polyneuritis	Acute idiopathic polyneuritis.
14	the electroencephalogram after resuscitation of cardiocirculatory arrest	It's called a heart attack, and it's called a heart attack.
14	scleronodular type of hodgkin s disease experience at the sherbrooke university hospital center	Scleronodular type d'apos; Sherbrooke University Hospital experience with Hodgkin's disease.
14	carcinoembryonic antigen in management of colorectal carcinoma	Carcinogenic antigen-embryonic in colorectal carcinoma management.
14	primary carcinoma of the gallbladder	Gallbladder cancer.
14	five to twenty year followup after surgery for chronic pancreatitis in 148 patients	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the disease.
14	short term course and prognosis of crohn s disease	Short-term Crohn's disease development and prognosis.
14	retroperitoneal fibrosis associated with malignant disease	Malignant disease-associated retroperitoneal fibrosis.
14	selection for treatment in spina bifida cystica	Spina bifida cystica treatment selection.
14	predictive factors in open myelomeningocele with special reference to sensory level	Predictive factors in the open myelomeningocele, especially in the case of the sensory level.
14	placental lactogen levels in rhesus isoimmunization	Rh isoimmune placental lactogen level-iso.
14	evaluation of hyperventilation in treatment of head injuries	Injury is a symptom of a disease that affects the body.
14	regional cerebral blood flow and intraventricular pressure in acute head injuries	Regional cerebral blood flow patterns and intraventricular pressure in acute head trauma.
14	thrombolytic therapy in haemolytic uraemic syndrome	Thrombolytic hemolytic uremic syndrome.
14	non specific factors that may influence significance of urinary steroid excretion in breast cancer	In addition to the above factors, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
14	perforative carcinoma of colon and rectum	Colon and rectal perforating cancer.
14	the significance of post traumatic status epilepticus in childhood	Epileptic traumatic disorder in children and adolescents.
14	posterior fossa aneurysms simulating tumours	Posterior tumor-mimicking pit aneurysms.
14	the nitroblue tetrazolium test following acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction following a tetrazolium nitroblue test.
14	treatment of bone metastases of breast cancer with progestogens	Bone metastasis therapy for breast cancer; progestin help.
14	significance of intravascular coagulation and fibrinolysis in acute hepatic failure	Acute hepatic insufficiency; importance of intravascular coagulation and of fibrinolysis in the liver.
14	prognosis in coronary artery disease angiographic hemodynamic and clinical factors	Prevalence of coronary heart disease in Canada.
14	pancreatic disease	Pancreatic disease.
14	prognostic significance of chronic versus acute bundle branch block in acute myocardial infarction	The prognostic significance of acute versus chronic blockade of bundle branches in acute myocardial infarction.
14	effect of aprotinin in acute myocardial infarction clinical double bind study author s transl	Acute myocardial infarction, double clinical link, translation of the text; study.
14	immunosuppressive therapy in pure red cell aplasia	Pure erythrocyte aplasia: immunosuppressive.
14	gastric polyps prognosis and treatment	I'm sorry, but I don't know what to do.
14	planned splenectomy in treatment of idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura	In addition to the above, there are a number of other surgical procedures that can be performed.
14	wilms tumour treatment of 113 patients from 1960 to 1971	Treatment of wilms tumours in 113 patients, 1960-71.
14	prognostically favorable immunogens of human breast cancer tissue antigenic similarity to murine mammary tumor virus	Pronospecifically, human breast cancer immunogens have antigenic similarities to the murine breast tumour virus.
14	a clinicopathologic study of 92 cases of granulosa cell tumor of the ovary with special reference to the factors influencing prognosis	Clinicopathological study of 92 granulosa cell-induced ovarian and omen tumours, particularly with respect to factors influencing prognosis.
14	total body irradiation tbi as primary therapy for advanced lymphosarcoma	Tibs of the lymphosarcoma; total body irradiation as the primary treatment for the advanced lymphosarcoma.
14	the in situ iud and pregnancy outcome	It is important to know what to do if you are pregnant.
14	combined modality therapy of ewing s sarcoma	Combined modal therapy for d&apos sarcoma; Ewing s.
14	percoelioscopy biopsy of the ovary a propos of 121 cases	Percoelioscopic biopsy of apos; ovary, 121 cases.
14	delivery in cases with anomalous uterus	In cases where the uterus is abnormal.
14	the role of parental translocations in cases of repeated miscarriages	The Role of Parental Translocations in Reproductive Miscarriage.
14	present data on pathological anatomy of female breast carcinoma	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
14	statistical analysis of 1 430 determinations of 24 hour urinary estriol clinical conclusions	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
14	autoagglutinating sperm one form of immunological male sterility	Semen self-agglutinating immunological male sterility.
14	male breast cancer 6 factors influencing prognosis	Breast cancer in men 6 prognostic factors.
14	prognostic significance of subacute hepatic necrosis in acute hepatitis	Acute hepatic necrosis in the liver; acute hepatitis.
14	radiographs of the thorax in acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction.
14	experimental pyelonephritis in the monkey ii the prognostic value of radionuclide evaluation of the urinary tract	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the toxicity of radionuclides to monkeys.
14	the surgical correction of fallot s tetralogy	Surgical correction to fallow tetralogy.
14	long term results after closed mitral valvotomy	Long-term results post mitral valve closure.
14	an approach to the surgery of mitral valve disease in children	An Approach to Mitral Valvulopathy Surgery in Children.
14	long term results of valve replacement in children suffering from rheumatic heart disease	Long-term Outcomes of Valve Replacement in Children with Rheumatic Heart Disease.
14	the late fate of autologous fascia lata valve grafts in the aortic position	The late autologous valve grafts fascia lata in an aortic position.
14	experience with tissue heart valves	Tissue heart valve experiment.
14	surgery for tricuspid valve disease	Tricuspid valvular surgery.
14	surgical therapy in acute ischemic syndromes	Surgical treatment for acute ischemic.
14	postinfarction ventricular aneurysm	Ventricular aneurysm, post-infarction.
14	results of surgery for mitral insufficiency due to coronary artery disease	Surgical results for coronary artery disease mitral insufficiency.
14	revascularization via healthy myocardial arteriolar networks compared with that through diseased surface coronary arteries	Relative to the diseased surface coronary arteries, revascularization is mediated by the epos, which is a function of healthy myocardial arteriolar networks.
14	transposition with ventricular septal defect and pulmonary stenosis the rastelli operation	Transposition with defective ventricular septation and rastelli operation.
14	the surgical treatment of total anomalous pulmonary venous connection	Surgical treatment for the total abnormal pulmonary venous connection.
14	approach to assessment of risk factors in mild hypertension	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
14	the first urinary tract infection in the female infant prevalence recurrence and prognosis a 10 year study in private practice	The study found that women's risk of infection was higher than men's risk of infection, and that women's risk of infection was higher than men's.
14	methods of burn treatment comparison by probit analysis	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
14	early predictors of incomplete recovery in children with guillain barr e polyneuritis	Early Predictors of Incomplete Recovery in Children with Guillain Barr and Polyneuritis.
14	a clinical method for detecting subendocardial ischemia after cardiopulmonary bypass	Clinical procedure for apos detection; ischemia under-endocardial following cardio bypass-respiratory.
14	myocardial revascularization in patients with poor ventricular function	Myocardial Revascularization in Patients with Deficient Ventricular Function.
14	diagnosis and prognosis in colon cancer based on a profile in immune reactivity	Determination and prognosis of cancer of the colon based on a pattern of immune responsiveness.
14	renal pelvic tumors	Pelvic tumors.
14	quantitative morphometry of glomerulonephritis with crescents diagnostic and predictive value	Quantitative Morphometry of Glomerulonephritis, Diagnostic Crescents and Predictive Value.
14	the value of radiation therapy in uterine sarcoma	Value of radiotherapy for uterine sarcoma.
14	enzymatic alterations in reye s syndrome prognostic implications	Effect of enzyme changes prognosis of rye syndrome.
14	optimal treatment for the technically resectable squamous cell carcinoma of the supraglottic larynx	Optimal Treatment of Technically Resectable Supraglottic Laryngeal Cancer.
14	mucosal melanomas of the head and neck	Mucous neck and head melanoma.
14	therapy of consumption coagulopathy and hyperfibrinolysis with urokinase in a case of acute promyelocytic leukemia	Consumption coagulopathy and apo; apo hyperfibrinolysis; urokinase in acute promyelocytic leukemia.
14	did the introduction of rehabilitation improve the course and prognosis of myocardial infarct	What is the impact of the program on myocardial infarction and myocardial infarction?
14	predicting the duration of guam amyotrophic lateral sclerosis	Predict duration of amyotrophic guamian lateral sclerosis.
14	current trends in radiation therapy	Radiation treatment trends.
14	perceived life stress and psychopathology among mothers of young children	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	a comparison of voluntary and involuntary patients in a state hospital	A person who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
14	a teaching drill in child psychiatry	Teaching child psychiatry.
14	difficulties in brief conjoint treatment of sexual dysfunction	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
14	the functions of medical care	What do you mean by that?
14	glomus tumors in the head and neck iii analysis of clinical manifestations	Head and neck glomus tumours iii analyses clinical manifestations.
14	radiotherapy combined with hormone therapy for prostate cancer	Combination radiation therapy with prostate cancer hormonal therapy.
14	monitoring myelomatosis	Myelomatosis surveillance.
14	cellular kinetics in multiple myeloma a new approach to staging and treatment	Cell kinetics in multiple myeloma is a novel approach for staging and treatment.
14	clinical classification of plasma cell myeloma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	igd multiple myeloma review of 133 cases	Review of 133 multiple igd myeloma cases in 133 cases.
14	influence of left ventricular function on survival 3 to 4 years after aortocoronary bypass	Left ventricular function influences survival 3 to 4 years after coronary artery bypass graft.
14	precocity of pulmonary vascular obstruction of down s syndrome	Cardiovascular disease is a major cause of death.
14	keloids in ibadan	Ibadian cheloids.
14	hypothermia in the tropics a review of 24 cases	Tropical hypothermia, 24 case study.
14	premonitory sign of heart block in acute posterior myocardial infarction	Acute coronary infarction of the posterior myocardium.
14	fibrin ogen split products of nephropathies	Fibrin ogen separate nephropathic nephropathy products.
14	carcinoembryonic antigen test in renal cell carcinoma	Acute toxicity of chloroform to rats and rats.
14	testicular lymphoma	Testicular lymphoma.
14	a clinicopathological review of 68 carcinomas of the gallbladder	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	primary carcinoma of the gallbladder	Gallbladder cancer.
14	a clinical trial designed to discover if the primary treatment of varicose veins should be by fegan s method or by an operation	Clinical trial to determine whether varicose veins should be treated primary by the french method or by surgical procedure.
14	health hazard appraisal in patient counseling	Patient Counselling Health Risk Assessment.
14	chronic granulocytic leukaemia effect of elective splenectomy on the course of disease	Effect of elective elective chronic granulocytic leukemia on apo placentae; disease progression.
14	serum ferritin in acute leukaemia at presentation and during remission	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	ski injuries during growth	Injuries sustained while skiing while growing.
14	cancer of the breast a study of prognostic factors as a guide in selecting cases for conservative treatment	Breast Cancer A prognostic study to guide case selection for a conservative treatment.
14	prognosis and incidence of sex chromatin in breast cancer a preliminary report	The Progress and Incidence of Sexual Chromatin in Breast Cancer Preliminary report.
14	pulmonary mechanics in infants surviving severe neonatal respiratory insufficiency	Pulmonary mechanics in infants who survive neonatal severe respiratory failure.
14	the sick sinus syndrome in africans	African Sine Syndrome.
14	transient st segment elevation with postmyocardial infarction angina prognostic significance	Acute elevation of the st-segment with prognostic significance of the apos; angina of the chest for the apos; infarction post-myocardium.
14	age and type of onset as critical variables in early infantile autism	It is also important to note that the prevalence of early childhood autism is low.
14	effect of long term treatment of hyperactive children with methylphenidate	Effect of Long-Term Treatment of Methylphenidate Hyperactive Children.
14	non hodgkin s lymphoma patterns of relapse from complete remission after combination chemotherapy	Relapse patterns of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma following complete renal remission following combination chemotherapy.
14	the glycolytic enzyme activity of the human cervix uteri	Cervical cancer is the most common type of cancer.
14	prediction of the response to chemotherapy in acute leukemia	Prediction of chemotherapy response in acute leukemia.
14	hemangiosarcoma of spleen with spontaneous rupture	Spontaneous ruptured spleen hemangiosarcoma.
14	adrenal cortical carcinoma a study of 32 patients	Adrenal cortical carcinoma: 32 patients.
14	carcinoid tumors of the gastrointestinal tract	Stomach gastric tumours-intestinal.
14	prognosis of the second breast cancer the role of previous exposure to the first primary	It is important to note that the risk factors for breast cancer are not the same as those for other cancers.
14	malignant melanoma of the extremities a clinicopathologic study using levels of invasion microstage	Terminal malignant melanoma, clinicopathological study using microstage levels d' invasion.
14	medullary carcinoma of the thyroid gland	Thyroid spinal cancer.
14	the pathologic behavior of primary vaginal carcinoma and its relationship to cervical cancer	The pathological behaviour of primary cervical cancer and its relationship to cervical cancer.
14	management of the acute abdomen in children with leukemia	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	cea as a monitor of gastrointestinal malignancy	It's like a gastro-malignity monitor,-intestinal.
14	primary fibrosarcoma of bone a clinicopathologic study of 130 patients	Fibrosarcoma is the most common type of fibrosarcoma, and the most common type of fibrosarcoma.
14	the treatment of acute childhood leukemia predictions for the future based on extrapolations from the past	Treatment of childhood acute leukemia predictions, based on past extrapolations.
14	new looks in leukemia	New look for leukemia.
14	trends in surgery for childhood rhabdomyosarcoma	Infant rhabdomyosarcoma surgical trends.
14	spontaneous regression and leukoderma in malignant melanoma	Spontaneous leucoderm and regression in the melanoma.
14	american burkitt s lymphoma a clinicopathologic study of 30 cases i clinical factors relating to prolonged survival	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
14	significance of cervicovaginal cytology after radiation therapy for cervical carcinoma	The importance of post-radiation cervical cytology for cervical carcinoma.
14	prediction of fetal outcome in threatened abortion by maternal serum placental lactogen and alpha fetoprotein	Journal of Adolescent Psychiatry and Adolescent Psychiatry, 10, 10–29.
14	homologous mixed m llerian tumors carcinosarcomal confined to endometrial polyps	Mixed, homologous, Ilerian, carcinosarcoma-confined endometrial polyps.
14	krukenberg s spindles	Krukenberg spindles.
14	systemic endotheliomatosis a case report	Systemic endotheliomatosis.
14	prognostic value of electroencephalography in cardiac surgery	It's not the same thing as a heart surgeon.
14	supervision of the initial interview a study of two methods	JJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJJ
14	diagnostic criteria and five year outcome in schizophrenia a report from the international pilot study of schizophrenia	Canadian Institute for Health Information (CIHI) The Canadian Institute for Health Information (CIHI) is the primary source of information for Canadians.
14	intertrochanteric fractures the role of complications of fixation	Intertrochanteric fractures role of fixation complications.
14	hemipelvectomy	Hemipelvectomy.
14	perfusion of ischemic ulcers of the extremity a prognostic indicator of healing	The infusion of ischemic extremity ulcers is a prognostic healing indicator.
14	herpes simplex encephalitis prognosis and long term follow up	The results of this study are summarized below.
14	invasive squamous cell carcinoma of the conjunctiva	Invasive conjunctival spinocellular carcinoma.
14	long term maintenance therapy with azathioprine in systemic lupus erythematosus	Dosage; long-term maintenance; azathioprin in lupus erythematosus disseminated.
14	pneumococcal antigen in lobar pneumonia	Pneumococcal antigen to lobar pneumonia.
14	the prognosis in aplastic anemia	Aplastic anemia.
14	quality of survival following direct surgery for anterior communicating artery aneurysms	In addition to the above, there are a number of other surgical procedures that can be used to treat aneurysms.
14	complex surveillance of streptococcus pyogenes i immunological surveys of anti m antibodies and possibilities of long term epidemiological prognosis	Complex streptococcus pyogenes surveillance i antibody immunological studies-m and potential long-term epidemiological prognosis.
14	capsular and vascular invasion important prognostic factors in wilms tumor	Capsular invasion and vascular prognostic factors important in wilms tumor.
14	the efficacy of combining radiation therapy with a surgical procedure in patients with cervical metastasis from squamous cancer of the oropharynx and hypopharynx	Cervical metastasis caused by squamous cell cancer; oropharyngeal cancer; hypopharyngeal cancer; oropharyngeal cancer; hypopharyngeal cancer.
14	the possible prognostic usefulness of assessing serum proteins and cholesterol in malignancy	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
14	prognosis of squamous cell carcinoma of the gums with cytologically verified cervical lymph node metastases	Projection of gums spinocellular carcinoma by cytologically verified cervical lymph node metastases.
14	early childhood development of four boys with 47 xxy karyotype	Four boys with 47 xxy karyotypes in early childhood development.
14	psycho sexual disorders and their treatment part ii	Treatment and Psychological Disorders-Sexual ii.
14	the prognosis in pregnancy after threatened abortion	It is important to note that there is a need for more information.
14	urinary oestrone and chorionic gonadotrophin in threatened abortion	Anesthesia is a major risk factor for the transmission of hepatitis C.
14	bleeding in early pregnancy investigated by ultrasound plasma progesterone and oestradiol	Hemorrhage early in pregnancy studied by the plasma progesterone ultrasound and l' estradiol.
14	evaluation of the outcome of pregnancy in threatened abortion by biochemical methods	It is important to note that there are many factors that influence women's access to health care.
14	constitutional narrowing of the cervical spinal canal radiological and clinical findings	Constitutional reduction of radiological and clinical outcomes of cervical spinal canal.
14	renal cell carcinoma natural history and chemotherapeutic experience	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
14	nephrocalcinosis in infancy and childhood	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	angiographic study of congenital aortic stenosis author s transl	Congenital aortic stenosis angiographic study.
14	recurrent acute renal failure with idiopathic paroxysmal myoglobinuria	Acute, recurrent renal failure with paroxysmal, idiopathic myoglobinuria.
14	prognosis of the immediate outcome of myocardial infarct according to data of acid base and blood oxygen balance	It is important to note that there are no data on the risk of coronary artery disease in Canada.
14	survival and state of patients during the 1st year after myocardial infarct according to data of epidemiological study myocardial infarct register	Survival and condition of patients in 1st year post-mortem; myocardial infarction, based on records from myocardial infarction registry; epidemiological study.
14	intraarterial vasopressin in the treatment of upper gastrointestinal hemorrhage a prospective controlled clinical trial	Vasopressin intra-arterial in the treatment of spinal cord injury; gastro haemorrhage-intestinal superior prospective clinical trial.
14	phlegmonous gastritis	Phlegmatic gastriosis.
14	narrowing the gap between medical and mental health evaluation	It is important to recognize that mental illness is a serious health problem.
14	acute renal failure in multiple myeloma	Acute renal insufficiency in the kidney of multiple myeloma.
14	mononeuritis multiplex a complication of open heart surgery	It's called multiplex mononeuritis, a complication of open-heart surgery.
14	hepatic reaction in ulcerative colitis and crohn s disease author s transl	Ulcerative colitis and Crohn's disease.
14	investigations on the heredity of the nephrotic syndrome author s transl	Apos studies; apos inheritance; translator of nephrotic syndrome.
14	long term results of surgical treatment of spinal tumours in children and adolescents	Long-term Outcomes of Surgical Treatment of Spinal Tumours in Children and Adolescents.
14	hemolytic uremic syndrome in families	Hemolytic and family uremic syndrome.
14	clinical aspects of bilateral renal dysplasia in children	Clinical Aspects of Bilateral Renal Dysplasia in Children.
14	prognosis of chronic renal failure iii survival after one peritoneal dialysis	It is not possible to determine the cause of death due to the use of the drug.
14	mycotic keratitis by fusarium a review and report of two cases	Fusarium mycotic ceratitis, two-case review and report.
14	long term treatment and prognosis of malignant tumors of the nasopharynx	Long-Term Treatment and Prediction of Malignant Nasopharyngeal Tumours.
14	malignant tumours of the oral cavity a study of 177 cases	Malignant oral cavity tumours: 177 cases.
14	clinical course of post traumatic coma	Clinical development of post-coma-traumatic.
14	prognosis of traumatic decerebrated rigidity	It's the only thing that's going to happen.
14	computerized eeg predictor of outcome in schizophrenia	Computer-generated prediction of schizophrenia.
14	testicular tumors in childhood	Testicular Tumours and Testicular Tumours.
14	plasma gonadotropins and androgens in surgically treated cryptorchid patients	Plasma gonadotropins and androgens in cryptorchid patients who have undergone surgical treatment.
14	silastic abdominal patch for temporary hepatomegaly in stage iv s neuroblastoma	Acute toxicity of chloroform to rats and rats.
14	cancer of the transverse colon a cancer diagnosed too late	Transverse colon cancer, diagnosed too late.
14	hypovolemic shocks simulating severe pulmonary embolism 20 cases	Hypovolemic shock simulating a 20 case severe pulmonary embolism.
14	acute necrotizing enterocolitis in infancy a review of 64 cases	Acute infant necrotizing Enterocolitis, 64 case review.
14	new data about oligoblastic leukemias apropos of an analysis of 120 cases	New data on traceletal leukemias from 120 cases.
14	correlation of pre treatment serum 17 hydroxycorticosteroid values with survival in patients with prostatic cancer	In addition, there is a need to improve the quality of life for patients with prostate cancer and to improve the quality of life for those with prostate cancer.
14	acute pancreatitis	Pancreatitis acute.
14	prognosis of the effect of cardiac glycosides on the extrasystole in ischemic heart disease	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre initiative.
14	results of perforating keratoplasty in hereditary corneal diseases author s transl	Perforating keratoplasty results in hereditary corneal diseases.
14	changinc concepts in malignant melanoma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	recent thoughts on the development of colorectal cancer	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	cancer of the thyroid	Thyroid cancer.
14	immediate prognosis in recurrent myocardial infarction	It's the first time I've had a heart attack.
14	the clinical application of neuronography in facial palsy author s transl	L'application clinique de neuronographie en faciale.
14	current remarks for use of the tnm classification on head and neck author s transl	For example, if you want to use the Tnm classification on the head and neck of a translator, you can use it on the head and neck.
14	delayed hypersensitivity to dncb and survival following radiation therapy in patients with solid malignant tumors	In patients with solid malignant neoplasms, there was a delay in survival following radiation treatment.
14	prognosis of fertility of men with sperm agglutinins in the serum	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
14	radiation therapy of brain tumors in children	Cerebral tumour radiotherapy in children.
14	primary carcinoma of the gastric stump after resection for peptic ulcer	Primary gastric stump cancer after gastric ulcer resection.
14	diagnosis of intrathoracic goiter	Intrathoracic goitre.
14	melanoma of the vulva	Vulcan melanoma.
14	juxtacortical osteogenic sarcoma localized in the hand presentation of 2 cases	Juxtacortical osteogenic sarcoma located in 2 cases manual presentation.
14	amniotic fluid lecithin to sphingomyelin ration of 3 5 and fetal pulmonary maturity	L'écithine du liquide amniotique à une ration de sphingomyelin de 3,5 et maturation pulmonale fetal.
14	some etiologic and prognostic factors in early infantile autism and psychosis	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the development of autism and childhood psychosis.
14	the treatment of low differentiated germinal cancers of the testis using mithramycin	Treatment with mithramycin of weakly differentiated testicular germ cancers.
14	carcinoma of the papilla bypass whipple or papillectomy	Papillary bypass or papillectomy.
14	needs of the grieving spouse in a hospital setting	The Bereavement Spouse's Hospital Needs.
14	lysozyme in hematologic diseases	Hematological diseases, lysozyme.
14	prognostic significance of serum albumin urea ratio in suture line leakage of the alimentary tract	The significance of the prognostication of the urea ratio of serum albumin in leakage from the suture line of the digestive tract.
14	diseases of the breast	Breast disease.
14	changing concepts in breast cancer	Breast cancer paradigm shift.
14	inferior vena caval extension of renal carcinoma a lost cause roentgenographic and pathologic findings in surgical patients	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
14	a device for precision needle biopsy of the breast at mammography	Aseptic biopsy device; precise breast needles during mammography.
14	social versus clinical prediction in minor psychiatric disorders	Psychiatry, 3rd edition. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/pubs/index_e.html.
14	an attempt to determine surgical indication for biliary atresia by laboratory examination	Acute gastrointestinal illness (e.g., headaches, ulcers, ulcers, ulcers, ulcers, ulcers, ulcers, ulcers, ulcers, etc.) should be investigated.
14	urinary gonadotropins in management and prognosis of testicular tumor	Urinary gonadotropins in testicular tumor management and prognosis.
14	staged treatment of invasive carcinoma of bladder	Phased Treatment of Invasive Bladder Carcinoma.
14	kaposi s sarcoma of genitourinary tract	Genito Kaposi sarcoma-urinary.
14	adrenocortical neoplasms prognosis and morphology	Adrenal neoplasms, prognosis, morphology.
14	neuroblastoma its natural history and prognosis a study of 487 cases	Neuroblastoma her natural history and the prognosis of a study of a total of 487 cases.
14	the effectiveness of treatment for breast cancer patients	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
14	bactericidal capacity of peripheral blood leucocytes in relation to bacterial infections in acute lymphoblastic leukaemia in childhood	The bactericidal capacity of peripheral blood leukocytes relative to bacterial infections for acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children.
14	carcinoma in situ of the gallbladder a dilemma	In situ gallbladder cancer a dilemma.
14	aspirin allergy a clinical study	Allergy to Aspirin; Aspirin Clinical Study.
14	biochemical monitoring of the surgical patient	Neuropsychological findings in patients with arthritis.
14	technical improvements in the management of omphalocele and gastroschisis	In addition, it will be possible to use the same equipment as the original equipment.
14	ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma ii histopathology and survival	Stomach Cancer Simulating Ulcer ii Histopathology and Survival.
14	ulcer simulating gastric carcinoma i diagnostic considerations and treatment	Stomach carcinoma simulating ulcer i diagnostic and treatment considerations.
14	cerebellar abscesses a review of seventeen cases	Brain abscess in 17 cases.
14	course of coronary disease evaluation of prognosis and progression of coronary insufficiency with atrial pacing and ergometry	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that coronary heart disease is a risk factor for stroke.
14	twelve o clock sphincterotomy technique indications results abbreviated report	Twelve-hour sphincterotomy gives abbreviated results.
14	mortality and life table in down s syndrome	Mortality and low-level pattern of life.
14	circulating renin in essential hypertension an evaluation of its significance in the japanese population	It is important to note, however, that it is not possible to assess the significance of this condition in the Japanese population.
14	anterior interosseous nerve palsy spontaneous recovery in two patients	Previously, in two patients, there was spontaneous paralysis of the interosseous nerve.
14	left axis deviation and left anterior hemiblock among 8 000 japanese american men	Left axis and anterior hemibloc in 8,000 Japanese Americans.
14	nonparoxysmal junctional tachycardia in acute myocardial infarction computer assisted detection	Acute myocardial infarction, computer-assisted detection.
14	surgical versus medical treatment of occlusive disease confined to the left anterior descending coronary artery	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
14	urologic problems associated with imperforate anus	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
14	the natural history of malignant melanoma of the choroid small vs large tumors	L' natural history of small to large choroid malignant melanoma.
14	effects of extracorporeal membrane oxygenation ecmo on pulmonary hemodynamics gas exchange and prognose	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	central nervous system disease in systemic lupus erythematosus therapy and prognosis	Central Nervous System Pathology in the Treatment and Prediction of Disseminated Lupus erythematosus.
14	treatment of wegener s granulomatosis of lung	Lung granulomatosis treatment.
14	prognosis of paranoid states in relation to the clinical features	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
14	predicting aniseikonia in anisometropia	It's a great way to make a difference in the world.
14	diagnostic and prognostic value of chromosome studies in cancer	Diagnostic and Prognostic Value of Chromosome Cancer Studies.
14	lobotomy in private practice	This is a private-office lobotomy.
14	long thoracic nerve palsy a follow up study	Thoracic nerve paralysis, follow-up study.
14	natural history of aortic and mitral valve disease	Natural History of Aortic and Mitral Valvulopathy.
14	long term follow up of isolated replacement of the aortic or mitral valve with the starr edwards prosthesis	Long-term follow-up of the isolated replacement of the aortic valve or mitral valve by the prosthesis towards the end of the apos; before the end of the star.
14	influence of surgery on the natural history of rheumatic mitral and aortic valve disease	Influence of Surgery on Apos; Natural History of Rheumatic Mitrale and Aortic Valvulopathy.
14	solitary interruption of the arch of the aorta clinicopathologic review of eight cases	L'interruption solitaire de l'apos; arche de l'apos; aorte, examination clinicopathologique de huit cases.
14	dispersion analysis of prognostic and relapsing factors of duodenal ulcer by use of electron computer	It is important to note that the results of this study are based on the results of a survey conducted by the Canadian Cancer Institute.
14	hormonal patterns in breast cancers	Breast cancer hormone patterns.
14	prognosis in colon cancer a pathologic reassessment	The prognosis of colon cancer is a re-evaluation of the disease.
14	serum prognostic indicators in experimental bacteroides peritonitis	Laboratory bacterioides peritonitis.
14	erythroblastemia	Erythroblastic.
14	bilateral recurrent acute retinal pigment epitheliitis	Acute, bilateral, recurrent, retinal epithelitis.
14	photocoagulation in venous occlusive disease	Photocoagulation in Venous Occlusive Diseases.
14	hemangioma of the liver diagnosis with combined use of laparoscopy and hepatic arteriography	Hepatic hemangioma, diagnosed by a combination of laparoscopy and a combination of lapos; hepatic arteriography.
14	exchange transfusion in hepatic coma factors affecting results with long term follow up data	Episode-induced hemorrhagic hemorrhage in patients with hemorrhagic hemorrhage.
14	tracking respiratory therapy in the trauma patient	Follow-up of the treatment of the traumatized patient.
14	prognosis and treatment of bacterial endocarditis review of 70 cases	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for hemorrhagic ulcers.
14	malignant melanomas of lille 1967 1972 comparison between histoprognosis and actual outcome author s transl	Comparison of Histoprognosis and Translating Lapos; author of results from Lily Melanoma Study, 1967-1972.
14	exfoliative cytology of malignant germ cell tumors	Exfoliative germ tumour cytology.
14	relation of neurological findings after cardiac arrest to outcome	The amount of time that a person spends alone or in a group of people.
14	bilateral internal carotid artery thrombosis prognosis and risk factors	Diagnosis of the thrombosis of the epidermis; internal carotid artery and risk factors.
14	ectopic production of big acth in carcinoma of the lung its clinical usefulness as a biologic marker	Ectopic production of large acth in lung carcinoma as a biomarker.
14	squamous cell carcinoma of the gingiva histological classification and grading of malignancy	Histological classification of gums and classification of malignancy.
14	purulent meningitis in the newborn infant	Meningitis in new-born purulent.
14	the philadelphia pulmonary neoplasm research project thwarting factors in periodic screening for lung cancer	The Pulmonary Neoplasm Research Project in Philadelphia works against the factors of periodic lung cancer screening.
14	importance of histologic classification of carcinoma of the gallbladder	Importance of gallbladder carcinoma histological classification.
14	follow up of 97 young non psychotic male opiate abusers relationship between achieving abstinence age and duration of abuse	Follow-up of age; abstinence and duration; drug abuse; opiates in 97 non-psychotic drug abusing young men; opiates.
14	multiple primary cutaneous melanomas	Primary skin melanoma, multiple.
14	long term prognosis in children with recurrent abdominal pain	The long-term prognosis for children with recurrent episodes of abdominal pain.
14	evaluation of various factors influencing the choice of therapy and the prognosis of the uterine corpus carcinoma	Evaluation of various factors that influence the selection and prognosis of uterine carcinoma.
14	cancer of the bile ducts associated with ulcerative colitis	Bile duct cancer with ulcerative colitis.
14	prognosis and quality of survival in a hospitalized stroke population from the south	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
14	echocardiography in acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction.
14	olfactory neuroblastoma management and prognosis	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada.
14	prognosis of malignant tumors of the parotid gland with facial paralysis	Malignant parotid tumor prognosis with facial paralysis.
14	differentiating criteria for acute chronic distinction in schizophrenia	Acute Chronic Distinguishability Criteria for Schizophrenia.
14	further evaluation of total pancreatectomy	Total pancreatectomy further evaluated.
14	aneurysmectomy in the aged	Elderly aneurysmectomy.
14	the solitary pulmonary nodule ten year follow up of veterans administration armed forces cooperative study	Solitary Lung Nodule 10 years follow-up of the Veterans Administration cooperative military study.
14	a series of 20 successful warren shunts	A series of 20 successful derivations of the warren.
14	conventional splenorenal shunts a reconsideration	Conventional splenorenal avoids re-examination.
14	hemorrhage due to diffuse erosive gastritis	Acute hemorrhage from diffuse, erosive gastritis.
14	hepatic artery ligation and cytotoxic infusion in treatment of liver neoplasms	Ligation of the liver; hepatic artery and cytotoxic perfusion in the treatment of hepatic neoplasms.
14	his bundle electrogram in patients with acute myocardial infarction complicated by atrioventricular or intraventricular conduction disturbances	It's an electrogram of bundle in patients with apo; an acute myocardial infarction complicated by a disorder of atrioventricular or intraventricular conduction.
14	low voltage electrocardiogram after acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction, low-voltage electrocardiogram.
14	a six year prospective study of term breech deliveries utilizing the zatuchni andros prognostic scoring index	Prospective six-year study of childbirth by the term seat in the apos; assistance of the apos; prognostic index zatuchni andros.
14	primary aldosteronism and malignant adrenocortical neoplasia	Primary Aldosterone and adrenal cortical neoplasia, malignant.
14	factors influenceing long term prognosis in male patients surviving a first coronary attack	Factors that influence the long-term prognosis for male patients who survive an initial coronary event.
14	intermediate coronary care a controlled trial	Controlled trial.
14	giant retinal tears	Giant retinal tears, sir.
14	antepartum diagnosis of the terminal fetal state by cardiotocography	Prenatal diagnosis; terminal fetal condition by cardiotoc.
14	fetal death in eclampsia ii the effect of non therapeutic factors	Injury is a serious, life-threatening and life-threatening illness.
14	schizophrenia and organic brain syndrome with trisomy 8 group c trisomy 8 47 xx 8	Schizophrenia and Organic Cerebral Syndrome with Down Syndrome 8 c trisomy group 8 47 x 8.
14	assessment of an in vitro screening test of cytotoxic agents in the treatment of advanced malignant disease	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
14	about the estimation of fetal risk by evalution of the serum amniotic liqour ratio of hpl during the pregnancy author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the assessment of risk.
14	malignant change in fibrous dysplasia author s transl	Dysplasia of fibrospinal cord injury.
14	the influence of total gastrectomy on survival in malignant zollinger ellison tumors	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
14	the long term influence of coronary bypass grafts on myocardial infarction and survival	Cardiac bypass; long-term influence of coronary artery bypass graft on heart rate; myocardial infarction and survival.
14	six families prone to ovarian cancer	Six families are predisposed to developing ovarian cancer.
14	insular carcinoid primary in the ovary a clinicopathologic analysis of 48 cases	Cervical cancer is the most common type of cancer.
14	tubular carcinoma of the male breast report of a case	Male breast tubular cancer.
14	survival with mammary cancer related to the interaction of germinal center hyperplasia and sinus histiocytosis in axillary and internal mammary lymph nodes	To survive breast cancer related to os oros; interaction of os ores; hyperplasia of the germ centre and os ores; histiocytosis of the sinuses in the axillary and internal lymph nodes of the breast.
14	prognostic features of thyroid cancer a long term followup of 68 cases	Thyroid cancer prognostic characteristics, long-term follow-up 68 cases.
14	carcinoid tumors an analysis of 2 837 cases	Cancer-causing tumours: 2837 cases.
14	the management of hodgkin s disease	Treatment for Hodgkin's Disease.
14	the staging of renal parenchymal tumours	Renal parenchyma tumors implantation.
14	conservative renal surgery for adenocarcinoma the place of bench surgery	Conservative adenocarcinoma renal surgery, site of laboratory surgery.
14	the diagnostic and prognostic significance of delayed hypersensitivity skin testing in patients with urological cancer	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
14	individual differences in selecting patients for regular haemodialysis	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the quality of care.
14	cellular immunity in cancer comparison of delayed hypersensitivity skin tests in three common cancers	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
14	relative prognostic significance of vasospasm following subarachnoid hemorrhage	The relative prognostic significance of the vasospasm following the onset of a hemorrhage under-arachnoid.
14	anaplastic giant cell carcinoma of the thyroid a study of treatment and prognosis	Treatment and prognosis studies of the thyroid.
14	nonepithelial tumors of the nasal cavity paranasal sinuses and nasopharynx a clinicopathologic study iv smooth muscle tumors leiomyoma leiomyosarcoma	Non-epithelial nasal sinus and nasopharyngeal tumours iv leiomyoma leiomyosarcoma smooth muscle tumours clinicopathological study.
14	a staging system for hepatocellular carcinoma prognostic factors in ugandan patients	A staging system for the prognostic factors of the hepatocellular carcinoma in patients in Uganda.
14	mesocolic lymph node histology is an important prognostic indicator for patients with carcinoma of the sigmoid colon an immunomorphologic study	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the risk of coronary artery disease is greater than the risk of coronary artery disease.
14	lymphoma presenting as bone marrow failure	Lymphoma, showing a failure of the bone marrow.
14	consecutive primary carcinomas of the breast	Primary breast cancer.
14	sarcoma of soft tissue clinical and histopathologic parameters and response to treatment	Stimulation of the immune system by the immune system.
14	serological examinations with apathogenic clostridia m 55 author s transl	Serological Examinations with Apathogenic Clostridia m 55 translator.
14	results of a catamnestic examination of schizophrenic patients	The results of this study are summarized below.
14	long term survival following coronary bypass surgery in patients with significant impairment of left ventricular function	Long-term survival after coronary artery bypass graft in patients with apo; severe left ventricular failure.
14	combined gas endarterectomy and coronary artery bypass graft a follow up study	A follow-up gas endarterectomy/ortocoronary bypass graft study was conducted.
14	ascending aortic aneurysms review of 100 consecutive cases	Ascending aortic aneurysms: 100 consecutive cases.
14	results of reoperation for unsuccessful coronary artery bypass surgery	The results of a reoperation for an unsuccessful bypass surgery.
14	changes in survival and symptom relief in a longitudinal study of patients after bypass surgery	Changes in Survival and Symptom Relief in a Longitudinal Study of Patients Following Coronary Artery Bypass Surgery.
14	prognosis in medically treated coronary artery disease influence of ejection fraction compared to other parameters	In contrast to other parameters, the prognosis of the medically treated coronary heart disease influences the fraction of ejection.
14	short term survival after acute myocardial infarction predicted by hemodynamic parameters	Short-term survival after hemodynamic parameters predict acute myocardial infarction.
14	is chronic gastritis a reversible process follow up study of gastritis by step wise biopsy	Chronic gastritis is a reversible, stepwise biopsy gastritis follow-up process.
14	results of primary surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma	Primary surgical treatment for gastric carcinoma.
14	prognosis of chronic glomerulonephritis in adult patients estimated on the basis of the markov process	The prognosis of adult chronic glomerulonephritis was estimated using the Markov process.
14	thioridazine central dopamine turnover and clinical effects of antipsychotic drugs	Antipsychotic drug use in the elderly.
14	a clinical and follow up study of right and left bundle branch block	Right- and left-beam branch block follow-up and clinical study.
14	transient st segment in unstable angina clinical and hemodynamic significance	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the outcome.
14	hemodynamic and prognostic findings in patients with transmural and nontransmural infarction	Evidence of hemodynamics and prognosis in patients with both transmural and non-transmural infarction.
14	anomalous left coronary artery originating from the pulmonary artery report on 15 cases	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that influence coronary artery function.
14	orthopedic management of acquired cerebrospasticity in childhood	Cerebrospasticity acquired during childhood is taken care of orthopedic.
14	brachial plexus palsy in the newborn incidence and prognosis	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	value of suppression test as a guide to prognosis of hyper thyroidism treated with anti thyroid drugs author s transl	Value of the suppression test as a guide for prognosis of symptoms; hyperthyroidism treated with anti-thyroid drugs.
14	prognosis of cirrhosis of the liver 15 year follow up from time of first manifestation author s transl	The prognosis of liver cirrhosis 15 years after the first translative event.
14	treatment and prognosis of intrathoracic hodgkin s disease author s transl	Intrathoracic Hodgkin's Disease treatment and prognosis.
14	symptoms and clinical features of panarteritis nodosa author s transl	Translation author Panarterite nodosa Symptoms and Clinical Characteristics.
14	the angiographic findings in focal nodular hyperplasia of the liver author s transl	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 86, 365-374.
14	neurogenic gastric tumours schwannomas and neurofibromas author s transl	Neurogenic Schwannomas and Neurofibromes Translator.
14	urinary tract manifestations of ruptured infrarenal aortic aneurysms author s transl	Urinary Events; Infra-renal Aortic Aneurysms Ruptured Authors.
14	aetiology therapeutics and prognosis of osteochondrosis dissecans of talar dome author s transl	It's a very important part of the process, and it's a very important part of the process.
14	results of a follow up study of small for date babies i physical development author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
14	the problems and clinical aspects of primary malignancies of the small intestine author s transl	Diese Problemen und Clinika-Verliche Einzelnung von Einen Malignations zu einem Small-Bestrain-Bestellschaft.
14	recurrent urinary tract infection in childhood diagnosis treatment prognosis author s transl	Urinary infection recurrent in diagnosis; children prognosticator; prognosis translator.
14	syndrome of touraine solente and gol report of two cases author s transl	Soluble Touraine Syndrome and two-case report translations.
14	20 min 99mtc thyroid uptake author s transl	Thyroid absorption.
14	the pycnodysostosis author s transl	Author on pycnodysostosis.
14	surgical treatment of carcinoma of the stomach author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
14	postoperativ binocular function after full prismatic correction in patients with concomitant convergent strabismus and exuberance of convergence author s transl	Postoperative binocular function after complete prismatic correction in converged patients with simultaneous convergent strabismus and convergent l&apos translational exuberance.
14	prognosis and treatment of hodgkin s disease in children author s transl	Prognosis and treatment of Hodgkin's disease in children.
14	metastasizing carcinoma of the breast and diabetes mellitus a prognostically favourable combination author s transl	Metastatic Breast Cancer and Diabetes Mellitus, a combination of prognostically beneficial authors.
14	mendelson s syndrome author s transl	It's called the Mendelson's Syndrome.
14	evaluation of cell mediated immunity in the course of primary malignant tumors of the ovary cutaneous reactivity author s transl	In addition, it is possible to determine the extent to which a person's immune system may be affected by a particular disease.
14	results of non specific iliac crest biopsy in patients with bronchial carcinoma author s transl	The results of a non-specific airway carcinoma biopsy of the iliac crest have been translated.
14	a discussion of the curability of childhood epilepsies author s transl	A discussion about epileptic children's curability, authors translations.
14	chemotherapeutic problems in surgically treated bronchial carcinomas author s transl	Chemotherapeutic problems in aircarcinomas that have been treated surgically by means of a translator.
14	polychemotherapy for inoperable bronchial carcinomas author s transl	Molecular therapy for airborne carcinomas.
14	investigation to improve the survival of patients with bronchial carcinomas radically operated author s transl	Study to Enhance Survival in Patients with Radically Operated Bronchial Cancer.
14	biologic factors and malignancy in mediastinal neoplasms author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	some observations on prognosis in congenital hydrocephalus first report with reference to the preoperative evaluation of the hydrocephalic infants author s transl	A few observations on the prognosis in the placenta; first report of congenital hydrocephalus in reference to the placenta; preoperative evaluation of hydrocephalic infants s translator.
14	the lymphocytoma of the lung etiology pathogenesis differential diagnosis and dignity author s transl	Lymphocytoma of the pulmonary etiology: differential diagnosis and self-report.
14	aspects of bile acid metabolism in liver diseases author s transl	Aspects of Biliary Acid Metabolism in Liver Disease.
14	prognosis of colonic and rectal cancer under selection free conditions author s transl	Canadian Journal of Public Health 1989;8(5):513–75. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.htm.
14	surgical treatment of lung cancer actual situation and perspective author s transl	Lung Cancer Surgical Treatment Situation and Perspective of the authors translate.
14	double and multiple carcinomas of the colon author s transl	Cardiovascular disease is a major cause of death.
14	a case of maffucci kast syndrome author s transl	One case maffucci syndrome kast translations.
14	the capsule sign in severe hydronephrosis author s transl	The sign of the capsule in the translation of l' author of a severe case of hydronephrosis.
14	dynamic telethermography and strategy in cancerology author s transl	Dynamic Telethermography and Translated Oncology Strategy.
14	the pseudolymphoma of the stomach author s transl	Pseudolymphoma de l'apos; author of translation; stomach.
14	gastric carcinoma author s transl	It's not the same as the rest of the body.
14	present state of diagnosis and treatment of the adrenogenital syndrome author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	interruption of the aortic arch with tetralogy of fallot report of a successful one stage correction of both anomalies and review of the literature author s transl	Interruption of apos; aortic arch with fallot report tetralogy; successful correction of apos; step of two anomalies and review of translation of apos; author of literature.
14	surgical treatment of acute dissection of the ascending aorta author s transl	Surgical treatment for acute dissection of translation of apos; author of ascending aorta.
14	problems of intracranial extension of malignant disease of the nose and sinuses author s transl	Symptoms; intracranial spread of nasal and sinus malignancy Translation of apo; author.
14	adenocarcinoma in situ and microinvasive adenocarcinoma of the cervix uteri author s transl	In situ adenocarcinoma and microinvasive cervix adenocarcinoma; uterus.
14	surgical treatment of breast cancer present problems author s transl	Surgical treatment for breast cancer is problematic.
14	is the activity of rheumatoid arthritis affected by repeated surgical operations author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the development of arthritis.
14	second and multiple operations on the biliary tract follow up of 90 patients author s transl	Second and Multiple Operations on the Bile Tract, followed by 90 patients, translation of l' author.
14	diagnostical and therapeutical aspects of post traumatical endobronchial bleeding author s transl	The diagnosis and the treatment of the bleeding endobronchial post-traumatic are translated by the author.
14	ethiology and treatment of pleural empyema after thoracic surgery author s transl	L'Ethiologie et traitement de l'apos; empyme pleural post-surgical thoracic Translation de l'apos; auteur.
14	the influence of menopause on prognosis of breast cancer author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
14	clinical experiences with untreated homologous vein grafts in reconstruction of arteries author s transl	Clinical trials of transplants of homologous, untreated veins in the reconstruction of diseased, translative arteries.
14	do we have to treat non hodgkin s lymphomas the same as hodgkin s disease	Must-treat non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in the same way as Hodgkin's?
14	mediastinal tumors of childhood author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	pathobiochemistry of galactosemia and usefulness of the gt system in expert opinions author s transl	Galactosemia pathobiology and system utility in translation expert opinion.
14	results obtained in the surgical treatment of right sided abomasal displacement and torsion of the abomasum in cattle author s transl	Results obtained during right-side abomasal displacement and abomasum torsion in the translation of l' livestock author.
14	catamnestic studies of headache patients with pathological eeg author s transl	A person who has been diagnosed as having a severe mental illness or has been diagnosed with a severe mental illness.
14	damage to the spinal marrow in kyphoscoliosis author s transl	Spinal cord injuries from kyphoscoliosis.
14	primary hemangiopericytoma of the lung author s transl	Apos primary hemangiopericytoma; lung translator.
14	isolated rupture of the interventricular septum after blunt chest trauma author s transl	An article on blunt-force trauma to the chest was published by the Canadian Journal of Orthopsychiatry.
14	progress of untreated scoliosis following poliomyelitis up to the end of the growth period author s transl	Progress of untreated scoliosis due to poliomyelitis until end of growth period.
14	ischemic contractures of muscle and nerve lesions author s transl	Ichemic stressors in the body's muscles and nerves.
14	peripheral nerve injury due to total replacement of the hip joint author s transl	Injury to the peripheral nerve caused by the total replacement of translation of the apos; author of the apos; articulation of the hip.
14	short and long term prognosis of intraventricular conduction disturbances in myocardial infarction author s transl	Intraventricular conduction disorders in adults with myocardial infarction, both long-term and short-term.
14	prognostic significance of the intraventricular blocks during acute myocardial infarction author s transl	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 86, 365-374.
14	evaluation of cardiac performace in 222 patients with pulmonary sarcoidosis author s transl	Cardiac performance evaluation in 222 pulmonary sarcoidosis patients.
14	stenosis of the spinal canal after spondylodesis iatrogenic stenosis of the spinal canal author s transl	Spinal canal stenosis after spondylodesic iatrogenic stenosis of l' translator of the spinal canal.
14	pregnancy in spite of multiple factors of infertility in both marital partners author s transl	Pregnancy despite multiple birth factors; infertility in two author conjugal partners.
14	results of a controlled clinical trial for evaluation of intensive preoperative irradiation in operable bronchial cancer author s transl	Results from controlled clinical trial; assessment of risk; preoperative intensive irradiation in authors specializing in operable bronchial cancer.
14	mendelson s syndrome in coronary care units author s transl	Coronary Care Unit Mendelson Syndrome.
14	changes in responsivity to trh test and t3 suppression test after surgical treatment of hyperthyroidism author s transl	Changes in Reactivity to Tree Test and Suppression T3 Test after Translative Hyperthyroidism Therapy.
14	clinical and prognostic significance of antinuclear factors during d penicillamine treatment author s transl	Clinical and prognostic significance of anti-nuclear factors during treatment with penicillamine.
14	treatment follow up and prognosis of drug addiction author s transl	Substance abuse treatment follow-up and prognosis translated.
14	on the intracerebral hematoma clinical analysis of 105 operated cases author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other surgical procedures that can be performed.
14	the angiographic diagnosis of trophoblastic tumours author s transl	Angiographic Diagnosis of Trophoblastic Tumours.
14	core and surface antigen of the dane particle in liver tissue relation to different forms of hepatitis b author s transl	Antigen of the central and surface of the dane particle in the liver tissue in relation to various forms of hepatitis; translative hepatitis.
14	intracranial and spinal hemorrhage in haemophilia author s transl	Intracranial and spinal haemorrhage in hemophilia.
14	the importance of magnification angiography as an investigation for the arterial supply of the femoral head after medial neck fracture author s transl	Lapos importance; magnification angiography for apos; study of apos; arterial supply of femoral head after translation of apos; author of apos; mid-neck fracture.
14	prognostic assessment in peripheral facial nerve paralysis with particular reference to electroneurography author s transl	An assessment of the prognosis of the paralysis of the peripheral facial nerve with special reference to the translation of the apos; author of the apos; electrography.
14	septicaemia in the neonatal and infant period author s transl	Newborn-and newborn-Septicaemia.
14	operative therapy of ovaria carcinoma author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	osteomyelitis therapy and prognosis author s transl	The results of this study are summarized below.
14	endoscopic follow up studies of erosions of the gastric mucosa author s transl	Endoscopic follow-up studies of gastric mucosal erosions.
14	clinical pathology of the waterhouse friderichsen syndrome author s transl	Friderichsen Waterhouse Syndrome clinical pathology.
14	chiasma syndrome in arachnoidosis optochiasmatica author s transl	Optochiasmatic Arachnoidy Chiasmatica Syndrome (AOSC) transl.
14	on the so called posttraumatic headache author s transl	On the self-saying post translation-headache perpetrators traumatic.
14	osseous metaplasia of renal medulla author s transl	Renal medulla bone metabolism translates.
14	severe course of an infection with leptospira grippotyphosa author s transl	Severe course in poliomyelitis; translative leptospirosis.
14	life expectancy in acquired vitium cordis after operative treatment author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the quality of the wine.
14	electromyography and electroneurography in peripheral facial nerve paralysis author s transl	Electromyography and Electronurography in peripheral nerve paralysis transl.
14	the basis of diagnostic and therapeutic decisions author s transl	The basis of therapeutic and diagnostic decisions translations.
14	treatment and prognosis of osteosarcoma in childhood author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of pediatric osteosarcoma.
14	bilateral cancer of the kidney author s transl	Bilateral kidney cancer; translations.
14	humoral and cellular immune phenomena in an acute viral hepatitis author s transl	Acute viral hepatitis is a form of viral hepatitis that can be transmitted to humans.
14	humoral and cell bound immunological reactions in chronic hepatitis author s transl	It is not possible to determine the cause of the reaction, but it is possible to determine the cause of the reaction.
14	diagnosis of vogt koyanagi harada syndrome uveoencephalitis author s transl	Diagnosis of Koyanagi Harada Vogt Syndrome uveoencephalitis transl.
14	actinomycin d therapy in testicular cancer author s transl	Antimicrobial resistance to actinomycin.
14	stauffer syndrome paraneoplastic hepatic dysfunction syndrome associated with renal cell carcinoma author s transl	It is a condition in which a person is unable to maintain his or her health.
14	the syndrome of biliary atresia typical physiognomy anomalies of the pulmonary arteries and eventual other malformations author s transl	Biliary atretic syndrome is typical of pulmonary artery physiognomy abnormalities and, possibly, other malformations.
14	the prognosis of the transitory disturbances of av conduction following cardiac surgery author s transl	The prognosis of transient apo placenta disturbances; translation of apo; author on cardiac surgery.
14	report on clinical positive evidence of the nerve excitability test in facial palsy author s transl	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3(2), pp. 1–12.
14	determination of the latency for the prognosis of bell s palsy author s transl	Determine latency for prognosis of translational bell paralytic.
14	schmincke carcinoma of the nasopharynx author s transl	Dietary Reference Intakes, Dietary Reference Intakes, Dietary Reference Intakes.
14	results of reconstructive vascular surgery author s transl	Reconstructive vascular surgery results were translated by the authors.
14	malignant bone tumours in childhood author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	coronary heart disease and bypass surgery a clinical cardiologist s view author s transl	In addition, there are a number of different types of bypass surgery.
14	juvenile bone cysts and giant cell tumors author s transl	Juvenile cysts and the giant cellular tumors are translated by the authors.
14	improved prognosis of malignant oropharynx tumors by preoperative therapy author s transl	Improved prognosis of oropharyngeal malignancies by preoperative therapists.
14	pericarditis and fresh myocardial infarction author s transl	Fresh Pericarditis and Myocardial Infarction Translation of apos; author.
14	malignant ovarian neoplasms in young women author s transl	Translation of Malignant Ovarian Neoplasms in Young Women Authors.
14	correlations between clinical control and histopathologic findings in breast cancer after irradiation and radical mastectomy author s transl	In addition, the Canadian Breast Cancer Institute (CBCI) is working with the Canadian Breast Cancer Association (CBCA) to evaluate the effectiveness of the Canadian Breast Cancer Screening Program.
14	prognosis of melanoma of the vulva author s transl	It is the most common type of melanoma in the world.
14	hypertrophic obstructive cardiomyopathy author s transl	Hypertrophic Obstructive Obstructive Cardiomyopathy transl.
14	critical flicker frequency cff in the central and peripheral visual field author s transl	Critical Scintillation Frequency in the Central and Peripheral Field of Vision; translative author.
14	manifestation of diabetes in the first to third year of life later fates of 43 patients author s transl	Symptoms of diabetes in the first to third years of life later fate of 43 patient translators.
14	chronic headache and abuse of phenacetin author s transl	Chronic Headache and Phenacetin Abuse Translated.
14	the nosological position and histogenic origin of the so called cerebellar astrocytomas author s transl	Nosological position and apos; histogenic origin of apos; translator; cerebellar astrocytoma.
14	surgery of the tongue and floor of the mouth author s transl	Tongue and mouth floor surgery of apos; translates.
14	bronchial cancer in berlin capital of the g d r 2 communication lung cancer detection between 1955 and 1973 author s transl	Bronchial Cancer in the Berlin Capital of Communicatory Lung Cancer 2 the detection of lung cancer between 1955 and 1973 transl.
14	prognostic value of histological rare breast cancer author s transl	The authors' prognostic value on rare and histological breast cancer is also translated into English.
14	massive hemorrhage caused by acute solitary gastric erosion dieulafoy change of prognosis due to preoperative endoscopy author s transl	Acute, acute, solitary gastric erosion due to pre-operative translation of the apos; endoscopy.
14	appearance of a localized peritoneal mesothelioma seven years after resection of pericardium on account of localized pericardial mesothelioma author s transl	Localized peritoneal mesothelioma 7 years after pericardial resection is attributed to localized translation of apos; pericardial mesothelioma study.
14	pathogenesis and clinic of pancreatic fistulas author s transl	Pancreatic fistula clinical and pathogenesis.
14	prognosis of perforated appendicitis author s transl	Perforated appendicitis.
14	improved prognosis of ewing sarcoma by combined irradiation and chemotherapy author s transl	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
14	mediastinal and pulmonary complications of the sclerosing treatment of oesophageal varices author s transl	Mediastinal and pulmonary problems associated with esophageal varicose sclerosis.
14	the prognosis in and the limitations set to concervative treatment of occlusion of crural arteries author s transl	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
14	combination chemotherapy of acute lymphoid leukaemia in children combined with prophylactic cranial irradiation author s transl	Combination of children's acute lymphocyte leukemia chemotherapy and head prophylaxis.
14	observations in two cases of primary fibrosarcoma of the lung author s transl	Observations in two primary fibrosarcoma cases of lung translator.
14	bronchial carcinoma dependence of operationsuccess author s transl	Carcinoma bronchus is dependent on apos; operation successful translations.
14	rare kidney tumours author s transl	Translated into English, French, German, German and German.
14	aneurysms of the sinus of valsalva author s transl	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
14	the radiological diagnosis of calcifying coronary sclerosis author s transl	Radiological Diagnosis of Coronary Sclerosis Calcification.
14	recurring clear cell leiomyoblastoma of the uterus author s transl	The most common type of leiomyoblastoma is the leiomyoblastoma.
14	a suggestion for the evaluation of the antepartal cardiotocogram author s transl	A suggestion for the antero-partal cardio-octogram translator evaluation.
14	resection for pulmonary metastases results and prognosis author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	usefulness of renal scinitigraphic scanning in the prognosis of acute renal failure author s transl	Acute renal insufficiency Acute renal insufficiency Acute renal insufficiency Acute renal insufficiency.
14	the results of galactography a contribution to the early diagnosis of carcinoma of the breast author s transl	Galactographic results contribute to early diagnosis of translated breast cancer.
14	the severest form of co poisoning author s transl	The most severe form of-poisoning is translation by the author.
14	applies phoniatry iii stuttering and cluttering author s transl	Phoniatry application iii. stammering and clutter of translations of l' author.
14	to the differential diagnosis of bronchiolo alveolar cell carcinoma in early state author s transl	Cardiovascular System (CSN) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre.
14	radiological observations of the chest in progressive scleroderma author s transl	Chest x-ray examination of the thorax of those who have developed progressive scleroderma.
14	late diagnosis of malignant renal tumors review and case reports author s transl	Delays in Diagnosing Malignant Renal Tumours Review and Case Reports Authors' translation.
14	clinic and therapy of idiopathic hemochromatosis report of 51 cases author s transl	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
14	ascending choledochal papillomatosis author s transl	It's a good idea to try to make it easy for people to get to know each other.
14	coronary heart disease and peripheral arterial occlusive disease with particular reference to myocardial infarction author s transl	Coronary and occlusive diseases; peripheral artery, particularly seizures; myocardial infarction.
14	prognosis of post traumatic anosimia author s transl	This is the first time that a person has been diagnosed with the disease.
14	preventive surgery in the treatment of severely injured eyes late results complications postoperative care author s transl	Preventive surgery for treatment of severe late-onset, post-operative translation complications.
14	significance of antibody titers in recurrent urinary tract infection in children author s transl	It is not possible to distinguish between the two groups, but it is important to distinguish between groups.
14	a method for studying social security records in epidemiology use in a study on the prognosis of chronic bronchitis author s transl	This study was conducted in collaboration with the Canadian Centre for Health Information (CCHHE) and the Canadian Centre for Health Information.
14	malignant synovialoma author s transl	It's not a good idea, it's a good idea.
14	clinic and therapy of acute pancreatitis author s transl	Acute Pancreatitis Clinic and Therapy Acute Pancreatitis Clinic and Therapy.
14	continuous local application of cytostatics for bronchial carcinoma and mediastinal lymph node metastasisization author s transl	Continued local application of cytostatics to bronchial carcinoma and metastasis of the mediastinal lymph nodes.
14	tuberculosis in developing countries compared to europe author s transl	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
14	refractory anemia with hypercellular bone marrow and preleukemia author s transl	Refractory anemia with bone marrow hypercellularity and translative author preleukemia.
14	gallstone ileus author s transl	L'auteur de l'apos; iléus bile.
14	influence of pathogenesis of purulent meningitis on the prognosis author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
14	the importance of immune deficiency for the prognosis of purulent meningitis author s transl	Immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection; immunodeficiency syndrome (HIV) infection; immunodeficiency syndrome (HIV) infection.
14	importance of intensive therapy in the treatment of purulent meningitis author s transl	Importance of an intensive treatment regimen for purulent meningitis.
14	therapy of meningitis author s transl	Meningitis is a rare disease.
14	therapy of myasthenia author s transl	Therapy for authors of myasthenic translations; authors.
14	nosology of schizophrenia author s transl	Nosologie des Schizophrenia Authors.
14	analysis of operative therapy of carcinoma of the tongue author s transl	Analysis of Operative Therapy for Author Language Carcinoma.
14	generalized skeletal dysplasias author s transl	"It's called the ""Skeletal Dysplasia"" translator."
14	the so called chondrodystrophia of the newborn author s transl	What we call the new translator-chondrodystrophy.
14	ultrasound evaluation of heart disease with special reference to congenital and acquired lesions author s transl	Ultrasound assessment of cardiopathies, especially acquired and congenital lesions.
14	a case of systemic pfeiffer weber christian syndrome complicated by dic author s transl	Systemic case of Weber Christian syndrome, complicated by dictionary translations.
14	treatment and results of the first relapse of acute lymphatic leukemia in childhood author s transl	Treatment and Outcomes of the First Relapse of Acute Lymphatic Leukemia in Children.
14	mineral oil pneumonia caused by throat gargles containing lipoid paraffin diagnosed by biochemical examination of the sputum author s transl	Pneumonia of the apos; mineral oil caused by gargarisms of the throat containing lipoidal paraffin diagnosed by biochemical translation of the apos; expectoration.
14	the ecg on exercise author s transl	It's a good idea, but it's not a good idea.
14	surgical treatment of colitis author s transl	Colitis translator surgical treatment.
14	atrial fibrillation and flutter as a complication of acute myocardial infarction author s transl	Fibrillation and flutter as complication of the apos; acute infarction of myocardium.
14	results of surgical treatment of early carcinoma of the stomach author s transl	The results of this study are summarized below.
14	yersinia arthritis author s transl	Canadian Journal of Geriatrics, 3rd edition.
14	carcinoid tumours of the rectum author s transl	Cervical rectal cancer patients; translates.
14	the carcinoma of the gastric stump clinical experiences and observations in 15 years author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	diagnosis of breast cancer metastatic to the chest author s transl	Diagnosis of Metastatic Breast Cancer at Apos; Chest Translator.
14	investigations of the clinical course of acute myocardial infarction ii epidemiological facts author s transl	Acute myocardial infarction (AMI) ii Epidemiological studies Translation of the apoE; author.
14	idiopathic thrombosis of the superior vena cava author s transl	It's the only way you'll be able to make it work for you.
14	results of radiotherapy of bronchial carcinoma author s transl	Acute and chronic respiratory infection in patients with chronic bronchitis.
14	a new immunochemical tube test for pregnancy using the latex agglutination inhibition reaction ii clinical results author s transl	New Tube Immunochemical Test for Pregnancy Using Dapos Reaction; Dapos Inhibition; Latex Agglutination ii Clinical Results Translator.
14	significance of the size of an acute infarct for left ventricular haemodynamics author s transl	Lapos; importance of size; acute infarction of the left ventricle muscle; hemodynamics of the left ventricle of the authors; is translated.
14	spontaneous rupture of the oesophagus author s transl	It's the only way you can get the information you need.
14	tricuspid atresia hemodynamic and surgical considerations author s transl	L'Atresie tricuspuside est un rapport de l'auteur de l'auteur de l'auteur.
14	occlusion of the basilar artery author s transl	L'Occlusion de la traduction de l' artery basilaire de l' author.
14	the angiographic picture of arteriovenous fistulae author s transl	L' image angiographique de la fistula arteriovenineuse is translated by l&apos.
14	the prognosis of intrauterine fetal growth retardation author s transl	The prognosis for intra-fetal growth retardation-uterine translator.
14	the importance of the results of pretreatment pelvic lymphographies in the prognosis of carcinomas of the uterine cervix a critical evaluation of the proposal to classify these tumors according to the tnm system author s transl	Importance of pre-treatment pelvic lymphoma results in prognosis of cervical carcinomas; critical evaluation of proposal to classify these tumours according to the author system.
14	the prognosis of female genital sarcomas of the adult woman with special reference to sarcomas of the uterine corpus author s transl	The prognosis of adult female genital sarcomas, especially cervical sarcomas; translative author.
14	the success prognosis of plastic diaphragma operation on women with stress incontinence author s transl a1	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
14	cytology and histology of vaginal leiomyosarcoma a rare tumor author s transl	Cytology and Histology of Vaginal Leiomyosarcoma translated into English.
14	leiomyosarcomas of the inferior vena cava report of a case and review of the literature author s transl	Leiomyosarcomas de la inferior veina cava rapport d'un cas et examen de l'anglais.
14	results of surgical treatment of peptic ulcer in old age author s transl	Surgical treatment of apo; gastroduodenal ulcer in translation of apo; author on aging.
14	solitary plasmocytoma author s transl	It's the same thing as the other plasmocytoma.
14	radiologic signs of severe head transformation disorders arising with the treatment of the congenital dislocation of the hip author s transl	Radiological evidence of severe head-transformation disorders resulting from the treatment of congenital hip-translation disorder.
14	dissociation of maturity a typical variant of motor development author s transl	Dissociation of maturity is a typical variation of translative engine development.
14	neuroblastoma diagnosis therapy and prognosis on the basis of 56 cases author s transl	The diagnosis and prognosis of neuroblastoma, based on 56 cases, were translated by authors.
14	radiotherapy of neuroblastoma author s transl	Radiotherapy for Translated Neuroblastoma.
14	dysplasia and pseudodysplasia of the infantile hip joint author s transl	Apos pseudodysplasia and dysplasia; child hip co-author translations.
14	diagnosis and habilitation of hard of hearing children in the region of magdeburg gdr author s transl	Diagnosis and Empowerment of Deaf Children in Magdeburg Region translative author.
14	the importance of height of parents for correct estimation of growth of their children author s transl	Parents' size is important in correctly estimating their children's growth.
14	a contribution on the clinical pictures fluorescence angiography and histology oe essential progressive iris atrophy author s transl	Contribution to Clinical Images Fluorescence Angiography and Essential Histology o about apos; progressive atrophy of apos; iris translator.
14	cerebral tumours in infancy author s transl	Child-centred brain tumour translation.
14	acute lymphoblastic leukemia and lymphoblastic lymphoma two names for one disease author s transl	Acute Lymphoblastic Leukemia and Lymphoblastic Lymphoma Two authors on translative disease.
14	prognosis of prenatal varicella zoster infections in relation to their onset during pregnancy author s transl	The prognosis of varicella zoster-induced prenatal infections relative to their pregnancy onset was established by the translative author.
14	new views referred to gamma glutamyl transpeptidase author s transl	New views refer to the translation of l&apos, the author of the gamma glutamyl transpeptidase.
14	the intraarticular fracture of the distal end of the tibia as a prognostic criterion author s transl	Intraarticular apos fracture; distal tip of tibia as prognostic criteria.
14	classification of intracerebral hematoma lateral type on c t and its relation to the shift of the lenticulostriate arteries author s transl	Lateral type classification of apo; intracerebral hematoma on ct and its relation to displacement of lenticulate arteries at time of translation of apo; author of apo; lateral hematoma.
14	a contribution of the course of vitreous haemorrhage author s transl	A contribution from the apogee evolution; glass haemorrhage translator.
14	a new case of leydigioma of the testis author s transl	A new leydigiome case from the apos; translator.
14	reoperations in cancer surgery author s transl	Cancer Surgery Re-Operations Authors' translation.
14	surgery in recurrences of breast carcinoma author s transl	Translated breast cancer cell carcinoma.
14	reoperation in bronchial carcinoma author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	reoperation in recurrence of carcinoma of the esophagus cardia and stomach author s transl	Recurrence of esophageal and esophageal carcinoma; translative stomach.
14	pseudarthrosis growth deformity and malpostioning after fractures in childhood author s transl	Pseudo growth malformation-arthrosis and malpostion after child-translated fractures.
14	postoperative acute renal failure author s transl	Acute renal insufficiency after surgery.
14	the prognostic evaluation of bell s palsy by combined functional diagnosis author s transl	L'évaluation progostique de la paralysis des cloches par l'apos; auteur d'apos; una diagnostica functional combinée traduit.
14	the association scleroderma silicosis or erasmus syndrome author s transl	It can be used in conjunction with other scleroderma.
14	prognosis of hematopoietic dysplasia author s transl	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
14	clinical signs and therapy of familial polyposis of the colon and recutum author s transl	Clinical Signs and Treatment of Familial Colon and Apos Polyposes; Author of Translated Recutum s.
14	surgical therapy of carcinoma of the colon and rectum author s transl	A surgical treatment for colorectal carcinoma.
14	carcinoma of the anus clinical signs and symptoms therapy and prognosis author s transl	A person who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS and who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
14	short and long term prognosis of cardiac arrest in acute myocardial infarction author s transl	Acute myocardial infarction: short- and long-term prognosis; cardiac arrest; acute myocardial infarction.
14	corrected transposition of the great vessels a clinical review of 21 cases author s transl	Corrected large vessel transplant clinical review of 21 translator cases in 21 cases.
14	precordial mapping and enzymatic analysis for estimating infarct size in man a comparative study author s transl	Pre-Cordial Mapping and Enzymatic Analysis to Estimate Size of Apos; Infarcts in Apos; Human Infarcts, Translation of Apos; Author of Apos; Comparative Study.
14	spontaneous return of sinus rhythm in mitralic fibrillation of long duration author s transl	Spontaneous sinus rhythm return in mitral fibrillation of long-term translation of l' author.
14	hodgkin s disease stage ivb survival for 12 years author s transl	Survival of Hodgkin's Stage IVb for 12 years.
14	cogans s syndrome in childhood author s transl	Early Childhood Collaborative Syndrome Speech from the Editor by the author.
14	is there any evidence that the maternal hpl serum concentration is of prognostic value in cases of threatened abortion author s transl	There are indications-t-that serum levels of maternal Hpl serum have prognostic value in abortion-threatening cases?
14	multicentric chondro myxoid fibroma of bone with extraskeletal foci author s transl	Fibroma myxoid multicenter chondro osseux with extra-askeletal foci.
14	the landry guillain barr strohl syndrome prognosis in adults author s transl	Le Landry Guillain Barr Strohl's pronosis in adult author.
14	therapy and prognosis of obstetrical lesions of the brachial plexus author s transl	Translated brachial plexus, therapy and prognosis for obstetrical lesions.
14	male breast cancer author s transl	Translation of the Author on Male Breast Cancer.
14	the disseminated intravascular coagulation diagnosis and therapy on a medical intensive care unit author s transl	Intravascular Clotting Diagnosis and Therapy Disseminated on an Intensive Care Medical Unit.
14	the problem of the internal mammary chain author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	the problem of the treatment of the operable breast cancer author s transl	The Problem of Treatment of L'apos; Operable Author on Breast Cancer translated into English.
14	the tolosa hunt syndrome author s transl	Translation of Lapos; Creator of Tolosa Hunting Syndrome.
14	differential diagnosis of malignant and benign lymphomas of the cns author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
14	pulmonary artery end diastolic pressure recordings after myocardial infarction author s transl	Acute pulmonary arterial arteries after myocardial infarction.
14	gorlin goltz phakomatosis author s transl	Gorlin goltz, phakomatosis, translatosis.
14	a survey about findings and courses of 300 facial palsies a correlation of clinical and electrophysiological findings on computer author s transl	A survey on the results and the courses of 300 palsies facial a correlation of clinical and electrophysiological results on the translation of the authors of l' computer.
14	the special position of primary lymphosarcoma of the lung author s transl	The special position of the primary lymphosaroma of the lung tissue.
14	basic features of diphtheria author s transl	Basic authors' translation characteristics on diphtheria.
14	urothelial carcinoma in the prostate author s transl	Urothelial Prostate Carcinoma, translation from l' author.
14	clinical pathology and treatment of upper urinary tract urothelial tumors a 10 year review author s transl	Clinical Pathology and Treatment of Upper Urinary Urothelial Tumours.
14	tomodensitometric appearances in medical cerebral haemorrhages author s transl	The tomodensitometric appearance patterns in medical brain haemorrhages are translated by the authors.
14	generalized congenital fibromatosis a new case report author s transl	It is not known if the patient has ever been diagnosed with Fibromatosis.
14	myelomonocytic leukemia clinical cytological and cytogenetic studies of acute subacute and chronic forms author s transl	Myelomonocyte leukemia subacute and chronic translative acute clinical cytological and cytogenetic studies.
14	bone tuberculosis of the bovine type after bcg vaccination author s transl	Bovine-type Bone Tuberculosis following BCG immunization.
14	non rheumatic carditis a diagnostic study in a period of 11 years author s transl	In addition, the risk factors for the disease are unknown.
14	the mitral valve prolapse syndrome in childhood author s transl	A legend to the committee codes appears at the end of this list.
14	immunoblastic lymphadenopathy malignant neoplasia or hyperimmune reaction author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
14	bone marrow biopsy investigation an important prognostic factor in aplastic anaemia author s transl	Biopsy of the bone marrow, an important prognostic factor in the translation of the apos; author of the apos; aplastic anemia.
14	prognosis of acute upper gastrointestinal bleeding before and after the introduction of emergency endoscopy author s transl	The prognosis of apos; acute GI haemorrhage before and after birth; introduction of apos; endoscopy of apos; emergency is translated by the author.
14	prognosis of occupational bronchial asthma after change of occupation and elimination of antigen author s transl	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with the findings of other studies.
14	the determination of calcitonin for hospital use author s transl	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
14	grafting in dentistry today author s transl	In addition, a number of studies have been carried out in the field of organ transplantation.
14	particular aspects of testicular tumor in the elderly author s transl	In addition, there is no evidence that the tumour is the result of a tumour.
14	esophageal varices hemorrhage in portal hypertension author s transl	Vaginal hemorrhage of the esophagus in the apos; portal hypertension.
14	a longterm rational control of the course of sarcoidosis in ambulatory practice author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	surgical treatment of cerebral ischemia indications for surgery in carotid artery stenosis author s transl	Cerebral ischemia for the surgery of the stenosis of the epithelium; carotid artery.
14	treatment of breast cancer author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	changed aspects of gastric cancer author s transl	It is important to note that there is no evidence that this is the case.
14	carcinoma of the head of the pancreas diagnosis surgical indications and results author s transl	Pancreatic Head Cancer Surgical Indications and Author Results s translations.
14	possibilities for operative therapy of carcinoma of the large intestine author s transl	Large bowel carcinoma surgical therapy opportunities; translator.
14	survival time and life quality after operative treatment of colonic cancer author s transl	Survival time and quality of life after colon cancer surgical treatment.
14	study on the surgery of malignant biliary tumors author s transl	Malignant Biliary Tumour Surgical Study Translation of l&apos.
14	the prognostic value of the laser interference fringe test with cataract patients author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	research concerning the spontaneous course of 135 cases of meni re s disease critical study of operative indications author s transl	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.</p></p></p></p></p></p></p>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>
14	contribution to differential diagnostic validity of mmpi to prognosis of efficiency of autogeneous training author s transl	In addition, the results of the study are compared with those of other studies, and are compared with those of other studies.
14	breast cancer postoperative care author s transl	Translation of Abstract; Author of Post-operative Breast Cancer Care.
14	the dieulafoy s ulcer author s transl	The translations are available upon request.
14	long term radiological and clinical observations following surgery for tibio fibular syndesmosis after fractures of the upper ankle joint author s transl	Long-term clinical and radiological observations following dapos; surgery for fibular tibia syndesmosis after hip fractures; articulation of the upper ankle of translation of the apos; author.
14	lymphography in malignant ovarian tumours author s transl	It is not possible to estimate the number of deaths due to the causes of death.
14	contrast medium persistence in lymph nodes as a prognostic criterion in hodgkin s disease author s transl	In comparison, the mean persistence in the lymph nodes is a prognostic criterion in the translation of the authors of Hodgkin's disease.
14	are clotting disorders a pathogenetic factor in nephrosclerosis and hypertension author s transl	It is a condition in which blood pressure is higher than that in which blood pressure is higher.
14	immunological tests in the diagnosis and prognosis of disseminated lupus erythematosus before treatment author s transl	Immunologic tests in lupus erythematosus diagnosis and prognosis disseminated prior to translation of the treatment.
14	alcoholic cardiomyopathies author s transl	Alcohol-related Cardiomyopathies and Translations.
14	the e e g in ruptured cerebral aneurysms before operation use of carotid compression and the controlled hypotension test author s transl	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of brain aneurysms, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
14	subacute cytosteatonecrosis of pancreatic origin surgical problem in 5 cases author s transl	Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiac System Cardiac.
14	surgical problems of the primary sclerosing cholangitis author s transl	Authors of the first multiple sclerosis of cholangitis translation.
14	clinicopathological study of diffuse carcinoma of stomach author s transl	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
14	urologic aspects of retroperitoneal hematoma author s transl	It's called the urological aspect of the apos; it's called the retroperitoneal hematoma.
14	varicocele spermiogram testicular biopsy plasma testosterone results of therapy author s transl	Plasma testosterone testosterone testicular biopsy translator therapy results.
14	transurethral resection of bladder tumors indication technique and results author s transl	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
14	bilateral intrauterine torsion of the spermatic cord case report author s transl	Intra-uterine Torsion-bilateral uterine from l'apos; author of report on cases of spermatic cord.
14	a simple procedure to forecast the course of diseases author s transl	A simple way to predict the evolution of the translator diseases.
14	the prognosis of intrathoracic sarcoidosis on the basis of the clinical picture and the histological feature in the mediastinal lymph nodes author s transl	The prognosis of intrathoracic sarcoidosis, based on the clinical presentation and histologic characteristics of the mediastinal lymph nodes, is provided by the author.
14	colon carcinoma duration of anamnesis and survival time author s transl	Length of History and Survival Time of Colon carcinomas were translated by the authors.
14	malignant testicular tumours author s transl	Translation of Authors of Malignant Tumours of the Testes.
14	electron microscopic studies of lumbar sympathetic chains resected for arteritis of the lower limbs author s transl	Electron microscopic study of resected lumbar sympathetic chains for apos; lower limb arteritis; transl.
14	is curative treatment of breast cancer necessarily connected with radical mastectomy after rotter halsted author s transl	Breast cancer curative treatment necessarily linked to radical mastectomy after liver rot; weightlifting translator.
14	explorative laparotomy and splenectomy for staging hodgkin s disease in children author s transl	Exploratory Laparotomy and Splenectomy for Childhood Stage Determination of Hodgkin's Disease.
14	exudative senile maculopathy clinical picture pathogenesis prognosis and therapy author s transl	Clinical Diagram of Exudative Pathogenic Senile Maculopathy prognosis and Author Therapies s transl.
14	spontaneous or idiopathic colonic perforation in the newborn author s transl	Perforation colonic spontaneously or idiopathic in translation of l' new author-born.
14	prognostic value of the eeg in pre term and full term babies author s transl	Prognostic value for pre-term and term infants.
14	intravesical and intraurethral pressure studies significance for the prognosis and the treatment of children with myelomeningocele author s transl	Immunologic studies; importance of intravesical and intraurethral pressure in prognosis and treatment of myelomeningoclean children.
14	prostate carcinoma determination of progression following high voltage therapy author s transl	Progression of prostate carcinoma following high-voltage therapy.
14	urologic symptoms in the abdominal muscle deficiency syndrome author s transl	Urological Symptoms in Translated Abdominal Muscle Impairment Syndrome.
14	epithelial tumors of the urinary bladder in the first twenty years of life author s transl	Urinary Bladder Epithelial Tumours in the First Twenty Years of Life; transl.
14	hyperergic collagenoses clinical aspects differential diagnosis and therapy author s transl	Clinical aspects Differential diagnosis and translative therapy.
14	diabetes and pregnancy treatment and results author s transl	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
14	experimental investigation on non specific foreign body sarcoma induction of al2o3 ceramic implants author s transl	Induction of sarcomas by non-specific foreign bodies; ceramic implants, al2o3 d' translator.
14	interstitial pneumonia in children with malignancies during cytotoxic therapie clinical picture analysis of promoting factors and detailed discussion of etiology author s transl	Interstitial pneumonia in pediatric patients; malignancies in paediatric patients; cytotoxic therapy Clinical analysis of the factors of promotion and detailed discussion of the translation of apo; author of the etiology.
14	thygeson s superficial punctate keratitis author s transl	Thégéson kératite punchante superficielle author of the translation of l' author.
14	haematuria in children i differential diagnosis of haematuria in childhood author s transl	Hematuria in children; hematuria in translated children.
14	the influence of moderate intrauterine nutrition on later physical and mental development in twins author s transl	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
14	surgical management of liver trauma author s transl	Hepatic trauma surgical management.
14	whipple s disease a case of undiagnosed malabsorption with fatal outcome author s transl	Whipple disease: fatal undiagnosed malabsorption.
14	non resectable squamous cell carcinoma of the bronchus study of the immunological status as prognosis factor and attempt at immunorestoration with b c g author s transl	Carcinoma epidermosa non-resectable; bronchial study of epidermal cells; immunologic status as prognostic factor and attempt; immunoremediation with bacteriologic translators.
14	cerebro costo mandibular syndrome three new cases author s transl	Cerebro Costo-Mandibular Costo-Mandibular Disorder-Vascular Three new cases.
14	complications and lethality after kidney grafts author s transl	It is not possible to compare the results of the study with the results of the study.
14	are convulsions on the fifth day of life a distinct clinical and electrophysiological entity author s transl	The convulsions are the fifth day of life, the fifth day, the fifth day, the fifth day, a separate clinical and electrophysiological entity.
14	clinical course following a neonatal e e g recording reported as severely abnormal author s transl	Courses d'un cours clinique après d'apos; un enregistrement néonatale signalé d'une traduction auauteur gravement anormale.
14	hydronephrosis due to pelvi ureteric junction syndrome in the adult and child 3 reports 78 adults and 33 children representing 118 hydronephrosis author s transl	It is estimated that the number of adults and 33 children, representing 118 individuals, have been reported to have 78 adults and 33 children, respectively, who have been exposed to waterborne pathogens.
14	controlling the course of arterial occlusive diseases in practice and prognostic aspects author s transl	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that influence the development of the disease.
14	radiation therapy of anal carcinome experiences in 28 cases during the years 1950 to 1975 author s transl	The results of this study are consistent with those of the Canadian Cancer Society.
14	perforating keratoplasty preconditions indications complications follow up treatment author s transl	Perforation of pre-keratoplasty conditions indicates complications following translation of therapy.
14	statistics on 1231 patients with cancer of the larynx 1940 to 1974 author s transl	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States.
14	splenectomy in idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura short and long term results author s transl	Splenectomy in short- and long-term idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura.
14	treatment of vulvar cancer author s transl	Authors' treatment for vulvar cancer.
14	a scala of malignancy of the histomorphological forms of p rimary pulmonary sarcomas author s transl	Schulz, J.A., D.J. Schulzer, D.J. Schulzer, D.J. Schulzer, D.J. Schulzer, and D.J. Schulzer.
14	hernia incarcerata in the aged author s transl	Hernia epitomized in translation of l' older author.
14	morbus wilson pathogenesis diagnosis therapy and course author s transl	Morbus Wilson Pathogenesis Diagnostic Therapy and Course Authors Translate s.
14	correlation of the cytochemical classification of acute leukemia in children with the course of their disease author s transl	Correlation between children's acute leukemia cytochemical classification and their disease progression.
14	bronchial carcinoma problems and treatment with special reference to radiotherapy author s transl	Aircarcinoma problems and radiation therapy with a special reference.
14	a comparative clinical and pathological study on the classification and prognostic features of 57 thymomas ii prognostic features author s transl	A comparative clinical and pathological study of the prognostic characteristics and classification of 57 thymosomes ii prognostic characteristics.
14	eosinophilic meningitis author s transl	It's the same thing that causes meningitis.
14	radiologic diagnosis of injuries of the epiphyses in childhood author s transl	Diagnosis of epiphyseal lesions in children.
14	early post traumatic epilepsy in childhood significance and short term prognosis author s transl	Journal of the American Psychiatric Association, Vol.
14	emg prognosis of facial palsy associated with herpes zoster oticus ramsay hunt s syndrome a longitudinal study of 11 cases author s transl	The prognosis of facial paralysis associated with the 11-case longitudinal study, Herpes zoster oticus ramsay, was translated by the author.
14	intraoperative measurements of prognostic value in coronary bypass surgery author s transl	The results of this study suggest that coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) is the most important risk factor for coronary artery disease.
14	carcinoma of the penis symptomatics therapy and prognosis author s transl	Symptomatic penile cancer therapy and prognosis.
14	diagnostic laparotomy in hodgkin s disease indication management results author s transl	Diagnostic Laparotomy in the Results of the Management of Indications of Hodgkin's Disease was translated by the author.
14	polycystic liver report of one case and therapeutic discussion author s transl	Translated case report and therapeutic discussion.
14	eosinophil granuloma of bones report of 15 cases including 10 survivals with an average follow up of 4 years author s transl	Eosinophilic bone granuloma reports 15 cases, 10 of which survive with a 4-year follow-up.
14	pancreatic reflux into wirsung s duct during peroperative biliary radiomanometry in acute and chronic pancreatitis author s transl	Pancreatic reflux in the canal wirsungs during apos; a bile intraoperative radiomanometry in the apos; author of apos; acute and chronic pancreatitis.
14	can one treat cases of multiple trauma in several stages author s transl	Can be used to help people cope with multiple traumatic events.
14	late ileal metastases from a skin melanoma with mainly hemorrhagic symptoms report of one case author s transl	Late ileal metastasis; a cutaneous melanoma with predominantly hemorrhagic symptoms has been reported by the author of a case for translation.
14	septic shock in the urologic patient iv monitoring and therapy author s transl	Septic Shock in Urologic Patient IV Monitoring and Author Therapy s transl.
14	the endocrine psychosyndrome in the long term i a cantamnestic reexamination of patients suffering from panhypopituitarism author s transl	Long-Term Endocrine Disorder i cantamnestic re-examination of patients with translative pan-hypopituitarism.
14	the endocrine psychosyndrome in the long term ii a catamnestic reexamination after treatment of patients suffering from cushing s syndrome author s transl	Long-term endocrine psychosis ii catamnestic re-examination after treatment of Cushing s transl patients.
14	dysostotic changes and the prognosis of perthes disease after operation author s transl	Dysostotic changes and prognosis of Perth's disease after surgery are reported by the author.
14	the osteomyelitis of the hip in newborns and its functional treatment with extensionsreposition and hanausek retention author s transl	Hip osteomyelitis in newborns-and its functional treatment with extension-repositioning and hanausek retention transl.
14	the results of radiotherapy managements in hodgkin s disease author s transl	Radiotherapy management results for Hodgkin's disease authors are translated.
14	left ventricular contraction reserve in coronary heart disease evaluation quantification and prognostic value author s transl	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of an increase in the risk of coronary heart disease.
14	first experiences with the fischer score for antepartal cardiotocograms author s transl	First experience with fisherman's translation of l' prenatal cardiotogram author.
14	prognosis and therapy of sporadic seizures author s transl	The authors describe the prognosis and the treatment of the sporadic crises.
14	liver disease in homozygous alpha1 antitrypsin deficiency author s transl	Liver disease in the liver; homozygous author; an anti-trypsin alpha1-deficient liver.
14	considerations of malignant ocular tumours in children author s transl	Child-Centred Implications for Malignant Ocular Tumours.
14	malignant tumours of the small intestine author s transl	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
14	the eeg in multiple sclerosis author s transl	Translations into multiple sclerosis.
14	lactacidosis of the cerebrospinal fluid in apoplexy as indicator of prognosis author s transl	Bacteria, fungi, fungi, fungus, fungi, fungus, fungus, fungus, and fungus.
14	the shy drager syndrome author s transl	Translation of Lapos; Creator of Shy Drager Syndrome.
14	hemodynamic classification of acute myocardial infarction physiopathological aspects and prognostic implications considerations on 130 cases author s transl	Acute myocardial infarction and prognostic considerations for a total of 130 cases.
14	reversible mental disturbances in craniocerebral injuries author s transl	Journal of the American Psychological Association, Vol.
14	the prognostic value of the time of progression of symptoms and signs in carcinomas of the pharyngo larynx author s transl	The prognostic value of symptom progression time and signs in apo-carcinoma; laryngeal pharyngoe translates.
14	coats disease early detection and early treatment author s transl	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
14	epipleural branchiogenic cervical cyst author s transl	Translation by the authors of cervical epipleuraux gilliogenic cysts.
14	results of therapy in cases of tumors of the nasal cavity and paranasal sinuses in relation to different tumor classifications author s transl	Treatment Results for Nasal Cavity and Paranasal Sinus Tumours Relative to Different Tumour Classifications Authors Translate.
14	keratoplasty in complicated cases author s transl	In complicated cases, the keratoplasty is the translation of the text.
14	cerebral av fistula with cardiac insufficiency in newborns author s transl	Newborn avian cerebral fistulas showing heart failure.
14	intracranial saccular aneurysms in the first three decades of life author s transl	Saccular intracranial aneurysms during the first three decades of life.
14	clinic and therapy of the lingual thyreoid author s transl	Language thyroid translator, clinical and therapy.
14	the cancer of the middle ear author s transl	Cervical cancer; middle ear, translations.
14	lymphogranulomatosis in infancy histology therapy and prognosis author s transl	Lymphogranulomatosis in the histological therapy of early childhood and the prognosis of the disease; translates.
14	diagnosis and therapy of acute penetrating myocardial injury author s transl	Diagnosis and treatment of acute, penetrating, myocardial lesions.
14	renal cell carcinoma in childhood case report and review of the literature author s transl	Canadian Centre for Management Development, University of Guelph, Guelph, Ontario. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
14	herpes genitalis and herpes neonatorum author s transl	Herpes genitalis and translat herpes neonatorum.
14	pathological anatomical aspects of organ preserving surgical procedures for breast carcinomas author s transl	Pathological Anatomical Aspects of Conservation of Dapos; Surgical Interventions for Translated Breast Cancer.
14	hypertension in old age author s transl	L'apos; elderly hypertension.
14	surgical treatment of gastric stump carcinoma causes of the poorer results compared with primary gastric carcinoma author s transl	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the incidence and incidence of cancer in the Canadian population, as well as information on the incidence of cancer in Canada.
14	results after resection of left ventricular aneurysm author s transl	Results after translation of the apos; author of the apos; left ventricular aneurysm.
14	indications for rabies vaccination and prophylactic immunization in man author s transl	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is important to determine the cause of infection.
14	therapy and prognosis of testicular tumors the seminoma results from radiation therapy in 100 patients author s transl	Testicular tumor therapy and prognosis seminoma results from radiotherapy in 100 patient translators.
14	therapy and prognosis of testicular tumors the teratocarcinoma results from 52 patients author s transl	Treatment and prognosis of testicular tumours: teratocarcinoma is the result of 52 patient translators.
14	generic symptoms of hodgkin s disease in relation to other prognostic criteries author s transl	Generic Symptoms of Hodgkin's Disease Relative to Other Prognostic Criteria Translated.
14	results from radiation therapy of 68 inoperable brain tumors 1950 to 1975 author s transl	Radiation treatment results for 68 inoperative brain tumours, 1950–1975 Translation by the authors.
14	hodgkin s disease the value of prognostic criteria and of the combination of radiotherapy and chemotherapy in localised lymphoid stages i and ii 94 patients undergoing laparotomy author s transl	Hodgkin's disease, the prognostic criteria value and the combination of radiation and chemotherapy in localized lymphoid stages i and ii 94 laparotomized patients.
14	systolic strangulation of the anterior interventricular artery a rare cause of myocardial ischaemia author s transl	Systolic strangulation of the apos; anterior interventricular artery, rare cause of apos; myocardial ischemia.
14	diagnosis and therapy of the so called malignant external otitis author s transl	Diagnosis and treatment-said external malignant otitis media translator.
14	crohn s disease indication for surgery author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of limitations to the interpretation of the data.
14	the prognosis in primary chronic glomerulonephritis in the adult 298 clinicopathological cases author s transl	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors associated with the development of chronic glomerulonephritis.
14	osteosarcoma 1978 a turning point in prognosis through adjuvant chemotherapy following adequate surgery author s transl	Osteosarcoma 1978 is a turning point in the prognosis of adjuvant chemotherapy following the proper translation of the epos; author on surgery.
14	prognosis of the retinal detachment in children author s transl	Children's prognosis of retinal detachment.
14	clinical signs and therapy of the abdominal aortic aneurysm author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other medications that may be used in the treatment of cervical cancer.
14	results of 289 cadaver kidney transplantations at the berlin friedrichshain centre author s transl	Results of 289 kidney transplants from cadavers at the Friedrichshain Berlin Center.
14	resistance testing and chemotherapy results of bronchial tumours author s transl	Resistance Testing and Chemotherapy Results of Authentic Bronchial Tumours.
14	retroperitoneal non chromaffin paraganglioma of the right kidney author s transl	Retroperitoneal, non-chromaffin paraganglioma of the kidney's right side; translator.
14	angio immunoblastic lymphadenopathy author s transl	A study of Angio lymphadenopathy-immunoblastic translated into English.
14	mammary carcinoma author s transl	Translation of Notes; Author on Breast Cancer.
14	principles of radical surgery of gastric carcinoma author s transl	Heart and Stroke Radical Surgical Principles; Heart and Stroke Carcinology translations.
14	tumor surgery principles of radical treatment author s transl	The Principles of Surgery of Radical Treatment Tumours Translation Authors s.
14	an attempt to predict the noise induced pts beginning a long time study author s transl	An attempt to predict induced noise pts begin a long time author of l' study translations of l' author.
14	course and prognosis of patients with myocardial infarction during 7 years observations in a cardiological clinic with an intensive care unit author s transl	In addition to the above, the authors suggest that there may be a need for additional information on the risk factors for coronary artery disease, as well as the risk factors for coronary artery disease.
14	congenital cyst of the common hepatic duct adenocarcinoma of the gall bladder and of the stomach author s transl	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre.
14	non hodgkin s lymphoma in children improved prognosis through aggressive multiple drug combination and irradiation author s transl	In children, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma improved prognosis with an aggressive combination of multiple medications and the translation of the apos; radiation.
14	a prospective study on course and prognostic criteria in preleukemia author s transl	Canadian Journal of Fisheries and Aquatic Sciences.
14	injuries of the pelvis author r transl	Implications of pelvic injury.
14	breast cancer in the male author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	roentgen diagnosis of necrotizing enterocolitis in the newborn author s transl	It's a good way to get a better picture of the rodent; a necrotic enterocolitis.
14	radiotherapy of oral cancer late results author s transl	Oral Cancer Radiation Therapy Late Results in translation.
14	causes of death in road traffic injuries a comparison between 1970 and 1976 author s transl	Causes of Death in Road Traffic Accidents: Comparison 1970-1976 (English translation), p.
14	hypothermic circulatory arrest after total blood exchange in dogs author s transl	Total blood-exchange hypothermic circulatory arrest in dogs.
14	on the rejection reaction against corneal grafts and first trails with tissue typed and hla adapted donor material author s transl	On the reaction of rejection against the grafts of cornea and the first traces with the tissues typed and hla adapted to the material of the donor s translations of the author.
14	liposarcoma of the soft tissues of extremities a contribution to clinical diagnosis and treatment author s transl	Liposarcoma of extremity soft tissue contributes to translative clinical diagnosis and therapy.
14	experiences with temporary epiphyseal stapling by blount author s transl	Epiphyse par l'apos et l'auteur de blount traduction.
14	carcinoma of the apocrine glands of the vulva with intraepidermal spreading under the picture of invasive paget s disease author s transl	Vulcan Apocine Glands Cancer with intra-@epidermal spread under the apos; image of apos; author of Paget invasive transl.
14	results of surgical treatment of benign and malignant parotid tumors author s transl	Results of Surgical Treatment of Benign and Malignant Parotid Tumours.
14	radiotherapeutic aspects of testicular tumours results and problems author s transl	Testicular tumour radiotherapy: findings and issues.
14	present views of limb replantation author s transl	Present the views of the authors of the replanting of the members.
14	ten years analysis of cancer of the female breast author s transl	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
14	mycosis fungoides the practionner confronted with the nosological diagnostic and prognostic problems of epidermotrophic lymphomas author s transl	Mycosis fungoides practitioner encounters nosological prognostic and diagnostic problems of translative epidermotrophic lymphoma.
14	incidence natural history and complications of chronic arterial hypertension author s transl	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that influence the risk of heart disease and stroke.
14	schizophrenia in childhood author s transl	Translation of Schizophrenia Among Child Authors.
14	studies on the fibrinolytic system in ruptured intracranial aneurysm part 2 fibrinogen changes in acute stage of sah as a risk factor of the ischemic complications following vasospasm author s transl	Fibrinolytic system studies in ruptured epos; intracranial aneurysm, part 2, fibrinogenic changes in the acute phase of sah as risk factor for ischemic complications after translation of apos; author of vasospasm.
14	problems of a stage based therapeutic approach to surgery in breast carcinoma author s transl	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
14	late results of tracheal resection author s transl	Late tracheal resection results are translated.
14	clinical experience in the diagnosis and therapy of plasmacytoma author s transl	Clinical experience in diagnosing and treating the translator plasmacytome.
14	chemotherapy of gastrointestinal cancer author s transl	Chemotherapy for gastro-cancer-gastro-cancer translations.
14	the value of scintigraphy and osteoscintimetry for the early detection of legg calv perthes disease author s transl	The value of the scan and lapos; osteosc intimometry for early detection of leg calves perthes the translation of lapos; author of the disease.
14	calcifying and non calcifying chronic pancreatitis a statistical study author s transl	Calcification and non-calcification of chronic pancreatitis.
14	prediction test of nomifensine prescription from symptomatic pre therapeutic status author s transl	Test for prediction of nomifensin prescription from the pre-translated symptomatic-therapeutic author.
14	cerebral hemodynamics in the vegetative state patients relationship between patterns of dysautoregulation and prognosis author s transl	Cerebral hemodynamics in patients; vegetative state relationship between self-regulation models and prognostic author is translated.
14	oculomotor palsy caused by aneurysms at the internal carotid posterior communicating artery junction and its prognosis following intracranial surgery author s transl	Oculomotor paralysis caused by aneurysms at the posterior internal carotid junction of the apos; connective artery and prognosis after apos; intracranial surgery.
14	csf lactate and eeg changes in comatose patients with various medical conditions author s transl	Csf lactate and eeg changes in patients with comatose conditions with various medical conditions as translated by the authors.
14	epiphysiodesis in the treatment of discrepancies in length of the lower extremities author s transl	L' epiphysiodesis in lower end length deviation treatment is translated by the authors.
14	diagnosis and differential diagnosis of acute hematogenous osteomyelitis in infants author s transl	Diagnosis and Differential Diagnosis of Apos; Acute Hematogenic Osteomyelitis in Infants.
14	muco epidermoid tumor of the bronchus in a 8 year old girl author s transl	Mucosal epidermoid bronchial tumour; a translating 8-year-old girl.
14	cutaneous periarteritis nodosa critical study about 4 cases author s transl	Critical Investigation of Nodermal Periarteritis Nodosa in Approximately 4 Cases.
14	new aspects in the treatment of elderly people with carcinoma of the urinary bladder author s transl	New Issues in the Treatment of Elderly Persons with Dapos; Bladder Carcinoma; Urinary Translator.
14	the acute calculus cholecystitis in the elderly patients prognosis and therapy author s transl	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
14	parasternal lymphoscintigraphy in mastocarcinoma its diagnostic value and significance for prognosis author s transl	Parasitic lymphoscintigraphy of mastocarcinoma has diagnostic value and translation significance.
14	benign solitary enchondroma author s transl	L' auteur d' enchantroma solitaire et benign s' is translated.
14	the diagnosis of bleeding small bowel tumours author s transl	Diagnosis of bowel tumour haemorrhage.
14	radiotherapy of the medulloblastoma development of methods and results of the treatment of 30 patients from 1963 to 1976 author s transl	Radiotherapy of medulloblastoma development, treatment methods and outcomes for 30 patients from 1963 to 1976, transl.
14	is drepanocitic trait asymptomatic author s transl	Translation of the asymptomatic, drepanic characteristic of l' author.
14	the indications for operative revascularization of acute and chronic renal artery embolism author s transl	Les indications d'exploitation de révascularisation de renal embolism chronique et d'une acute.
14	surgery of the mitral valve author s transl	Mitral valve translator; translator.
14	reye s syndrome in adults author s transl	Reye Syndrome at Home; Adult Author.
15	epidemiologic studies of carcinoma of the kidney ii association of renal adenoma with smoking	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
15	early childhood brain damage and neuroses in adults	Cerebral lesions and adult neurosis in infancy.
15	epidemiology and etiology of clefts	Epidemiology and Crack Etiology.
15	facial features associated with predisposition to cleft lip	Fontal characteristics associated with a predisposition to the development of a cleft lip.
15	skin cancer and immunosuppression	Skin cancer, immunosuppression.
15	case fatality of hyperplasia of the prostate in two teaching and three regional board hospitals	The Committee notes that there are no data on the incidence of prostate cancer in the United States.
15	legal abortion a critical assessment of its risks	A legal abortion; Abortion; Critical assessment of the risks; Risk assessment; Risks; Access; Legal abortion; Legal abortion; Postal evaluation; Absence of abortion; Abortion.
15	detection of individual susceptibility toward coronary disease	Risk factors for coronary heart disease.
15	prevention of myocardial infarction	Myocardial infarction.
15	factors of high fetal risk in a peripheral clinic	Prevalence of diabetes mellitus in the Canadian population.
15	extrathoracic bypass for stenosis of innominate artery	Extrathoracic stenosis bypass; innominated artery.
15	surgical treatment of chronic constrictive pericarditis using cardiopulmonary bypass	Cardiovascular System (CPS) Cardiovascular System (CPSS) Cardiovascular bypass.
15	bladder cancer smoking beverages and artificial sweeteners	Bladder cancer and artificial sweeteners.
15	sequential aspects of spontaneous abortion maternal age parity and pregnancy compensation artifact	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be due to the fact that a woman is not able to perform her pregnancy.
15	occult breast carcinomas detected by xeroradiography clinical considerations	Unobserved breast carcinoma, xeroradiography, clinical considerations.
15	treatment of myeloma comparison of melphalan chlorambucil and azathioprine	Treatment of the myeloma by comparing the chlorambucil of melphalan with the lidos; azathioprine.
15	sequential therapy compared with combination therapy in multiple myeloma	Sequential Versus Multiple Myeloma Combination Therapy.
15	a reassessment of the distribution of multiple sclerosis part one	Reassessment of distribution of early multiple sclerosis.
15	evaluation of oral pharyngeal laryngeal and esophageal cancer risk in reverse smokers of chuttas	Journal of Adolescent Psychiatry, 11, 335-368.
15	ethical issues in family planning for hospitalized psychiatric patients	Ethical Family Planning Issues for In-Home Psychiatric Patients.
15	emotional problems of residents in psychiatry	Psychiatric residents' emotional problems.
15	classification of suicidal behaviors i quantifying intent and medical lethality	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	controlling the abuse of illicit methadone in washington dc	Drug control; D.C. methadone abuse.
15	the awareness of risk and personal relevance in alcoholics	Risk awareness and self-relevance in alcoholics.
15	risk of coronary surgery two hundred consecutive patients with no hospital deaths	The risk of coronary heart surgery is estimated at 200 patients per year, with no deaths at the hospital.
15	carotid endarterectomy complications and preoperative assessment of risk	Complications of lancing; Carotid Endarterectomy and Preoperative Risk Assessment.
15	a simple epidemiological model for evaluating the malaria inoculation rate and the risk of infection in infants	Simple Epidemiological Model for Assessing Disease Rate; Malaria Inoculation and Risk; Infection in Infants.
15	clinician attitudes toward the suicide attempter	It is important to note that this is not an attempt to commit suicide, but rather a suicide attempt.
15	changes in creatine kinase and its isoenzymes in human fetal muscle during development	Changes in human fetal muscle development of creatine kinase and its isoenzymes.
15	routine screening for venous thrombosis by ultrasound in the elderly	Routine Screening for Venous Thrombosis by Ultrasound in the Elderly.
15	depression followed by suicide a comparison of depressed suicides with living depressives	It's a good way to compare depression and depression, and it's a good way to compare them.
15	idiopathic facial paralysis pregnancy and the menstrual cycle	Idiopathic facial paralysis, pregnancy, and menstrual cycle.
15	aortocoronary bypass in the diabetic patient	Coronary artery bypass surgery in diabetic patient.
15	ball valve prostheses current appraisal of late results	Ball valve prostheses, current assessment of late results.
15	carcinoembryonic antigen in patients suffering from ulcerative proctocolitis	Carcino antigen-embryonic in ulcerative proctocolitis patients.
15	the detection of aberrant dna synthesis in a member of a high risk cancer family	The Canadian Cancer Society, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, and the Canadian Cancer Society.
15	a comparative clinico genetic study of attack like schizophrenia with late and early manifestation with regard to age	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the effects of schizophrenia are significant.
15	coronary artery anatomy before and after direct revascularization surgery clinical and cinearteriographic studies in 67 selected patients	Aposal anatomy; coronary artery pre- and post-direct revascularization surgery Clinical and cinerearterographic studies in 67 patients screened.
15	pyridoxal phosphate and hypertensive disorders of pregnancy	It's called Pyridoxal Phosphate and Hypertensive Pregnancy Disorder.
15	psychiatric resident suicide an analysis of five cases	Suicide of a person who is a resident of a mental institution.
15	a comparative study of predictive criteria in the predisposition of homicidal adolescents	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the predisposition of adolescents to suicide.
15	protease inhibitors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease	Protease inhibitors in Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease.
15	parent child relationships and psychopathological disorder in the child	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	major factors in the development of diabetes mellitus in 10 000 men	Key Factors in the Development of Diabetes Mellitus in 10,000 Men.
15	hereditary pancreatitis nonspecificity of aminoaciduria and diagnosis of occult disease	Non-specific hereditary pancreatitis; aminoaciduria and occult diagnosis.
15	pre natal irradiation and childhood malignancy a review of british data from the oxford survey	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States.
15	myocardial infarction in young men study of risk factors in nine countries	Canadian Institute for Health Information (CIHI): a national survey.
15	determinants of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease in patients with intermediate levels of alpha antitrypsin	Determinants of Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease in Patients with Intermediate Levels of Apos; Alpha-Antitrypsin.
15	myocardial infarction in young women with special reference to oral contraceptive practice	Myocardial infarction among young women, especially oral contraception.
15	oral contraceptives and death from myocardial infarction	Oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction.
15	parenteral iron in treating surgical patients and the importance of routine evaluation of serum iron binding capacity report of three cases	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of iron-binding capacity.
15	some risk factors of ischaemic heart disease in the prague male population	Some risk factors for coronary heart disease (CHD) in the male population are prague.
15	hereditary progressive atrioventricular conduction defect	Progressive inherited failure of atrio-ventricular conduction.
15	infections in cancer patients on a protected environment prophylactic antibiotic program	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the result of a lack of information.
15	epidemiology of severe mental retardation in children community studies	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	infants home environments a comparison of high risk families and families from the general population	It is important to note that the proportion of infants who are at risk of infection is much higher than the proportion of infants who are at risk of infection.
15	identification of women at risk for unwanted pregnancy	Identification of Women at Risk of Unwanted Pregnancy.
15	radioactive contamination of the environment and the possible consequences	The Canadian Environmental Protection Act, R.S., 1985, c.
15	the problems of abdominal operations in elderly patients	Problems of Abdominal Operations in Older Patients.
15	continuing evaluation of coronary care	Coronary care assessment ongoing.
15	the incidence of otosclerosis in the general population	In addition, there is a need for additional information.
15	coronary heart disease risk factors in school children the muscatine study	Canadian Journal of Public Health, 8(2), pp. 1–24.
15	the interrelationship of maternal smoking and increased perinatal mortality with other risk factors further analysis of the ontario perinatal mortality study 1960 1961	The relationship between maternal smoking and perinatal and perinatal mortality increases and other risk factors has been the subject of further analysis in the 1960 Canadian Perinatal Mortality Study.
15	general anaesthesia during early pregnancy	General anesthesia at the beginning of pregnancy.
15	problem of the evaluation of experimental research for clinical testing of new drugs in man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
15	evaluation of side effects	This is a side-effect assessment.
15	children vulnerable to psychopathology the stony brook high risk project	Children Vulnerable to Psychopathology - The High Risk Stone Creek Project.
15	coronary artery disease in young women	Coronary Infections in Young Women.
15	hazards of cardiac pacing	Cardiac stimulation risks.
15	tympanoplasty on only hearing ears	Tympanoplasty on hearing-only ears.
15	inheritance of idiopathic nephrotic syndrome	She's got a history of the Idiopathic Nephrotic Syndrome.
15	prenatal diagnosis of a neural tube defect meckel syndrome	Prenatal diagnosis of neural tube abnormality.
15	reserpine and breast cancer in a retirement community	Cancer of the reserpine and breast in a community of pensioners.
15	editorial oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction	Editorial Oral Contraceptives and Lapos; myocardial infarction.
15	recurrent ventricular fibrillation and modes of death in survivors of out of hospital ventricular fibrillation	Recurrent ventricular fibrillation and death patterns in stroke survivors; ventricular fibrillation outside the apo; hospital.
15	near maximal ecg stress testing and coronary artery disease risk factor analysis in los angeles city fire fighters	Stress tests and analysis of risk factors for coronary heart disease almost to the maximum in the Los Angeles City Fire Department.
15	radiation safety in flights of high altitude aircraft	The safety of radiation exposure in high-altitude aircraft; high-altitude aircraft.
15	drug and risk perception on ninth grade students sex differences and similarities	The perception of drugs and risk among students in Grade 9 differs by gender, and there are some similarities.
15	coronary risk factors in 287 cases of myocardial infarct treated in a coronary unit	Cardiovascular disease is a major cause of coronary artery disease, as well as a major cause of death.
15	cancer incidence in the mexican american	Injury is a major cause of death.
15	prodromata of myocardial infarction and sudden death	Protromata d' infarction of the myocardium and sudden death.
15	monitoring for serious arrhythmias and high risk of sudden death	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	ventricular premature beats and mortality of men with coronary heart disease	Premature mortality and ventricular beat in coronary heart disease.
15	ventricular premature beats in a population sample frequency and associations with coronary risk characteristics	The frequency of ventricular premature beatings in a population sample and associations with characteristics of coronary risk.
15	coronary revascularization in patients surviving unexpected ventricular fibrillation	Coronary Revascularization in Patients Surviving Unforeseen Ventricular Fibrillation.
15	medical information bureau	Medical information.
15	the role of intraaortic balloon counterpulsation in patients undergoing cardiac operations	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	the assessment of maternal nutrition	Maternal Nutrition Evaluation.
15	panel 2 phase ii investigations	Phase II Panel Investigations ii.
15	risk indicators in childhood malignancies	Childhood malignancies.
15	an endocrine model for the diagnosis of intrauterine growth retardation as demonstrated by the determination of total estrogen and pregnandiol 24 hour urinary excretion in 222 at risk pregnancies	Endocrine Model for the Diagnosis of Intra-@ uterine Growth Failure as Demonstrated by Determination of Lapos; Total Urinary Excretion of Apos; Estrogen and Pregnandiol Over 24 Hours in 222 At-Risk Pregnancies.
15	validity of clinical examination and mammography as screening tests for breast cancer	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Health Canada.
15	risk factors and age	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	physician suicide risk practical recognition and management	Risk of suicide among physicians is recognized and managed in practice.
15	evaluating suicidal risk	Suicide Risk Assessment.
15	prediction of sudden death in patients discharged after acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction (AMI) is a major cause of sudden death.
15	coronary risk factors in a community findings in tecumseh michigan	Canadian Journal of Infectious Diseases, 3rd edition. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/fnihb/infectious_e.html.
15	elevated serum levels of estrogen and prolactin in daughters of patients with breast cancer	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of cancer.
15	the relative risk of spontaneous complete atrioventricular block in elderly patients with impaired intra ventricular conduction	The relative risk of spontaneously occurring complete atrioventricular blockade in elderly patients with impaired conduction of the ventricle.
15	can the oxytocin challenge test serve as the primary method for managing high risk pregnancies	What is the role of the oocytocin challenge test in the management of high-risk pregnancies?
15	cystourethrography procedures in children evaluation of benefits versus dose	Cystourethrography Procedures in Children Dose-Based Benefit Assessment.
15	genetic counseling in cases of chromosome insertions	Chromosomal insertions.
15	estimation of radiation dosage and transmutation effect of 14 c involved in measuring rate of albumin synthesis with 14 c carbonate	Radiation dose and dose estimation; 14 c transmutation effect involved in measuring the rate of synthesis of l' 14 c carbonate albumin.
15	abdominal wound disruption	Abdominal injury disturbance.
15	critical appraisal of domiciliary obstetric and neonatal practice	Critical Evaluation of Obstetrical and Neonatal Practice in the Home.
15	valve replacement a perspective	It's the only way to get a new perspective.
15	neonatal risk following late gestational genital herpesvirus hominis infection	A study of the incidence of cervical cancer among women in the United States.
15	the iowa 500 suicide in mania depression and schizophrenia	Iowa's suicide rate is the highest in the world, and the highest in the world.
15	observations on the epidemiology of post partum mental illness	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	cerebral infarctions study of their prevention	Brain infarction is studying its prevention.
15	toxicological investigations with fluorescent whitening agents	Fluorescent bleach tox screen.
15	prevention of thrombo embolic complications in urology using sub cutaneous calcium heparinate author s transl	Prevention of embolic urological thrombo complications; help with translation of apos; author of apos; calcium heparin under-skin.
15	a surrogate system for informed consent	Informed consent substitution.
15	the incidence of myocardial infarction in hospitalized patients and the risk factors of myocardial infarction	Injuries include heart attacks, heart attacks, heart attacks, stroke, and stroke.
15	empirical risk of oligophrenia in siblings of proband oligophrenics in populations with high levels of inbreeding	In addition, there is a risk that the genetic makeup of the progeny may be different from that of the inbred progeny.
15	risk vulnerability and enrollment in a prepaid group practice	Vulnerability to risk and registration to a pre-paid, collective practice.
15	risk factors for coronary artery disease in children of affected families	Risk Factors for Coronary Artery Disease in Children in Affected Families.
15	the uterine cervix from adolescence to the menopause	Cervical cancer; uterus of onset; adolescent menopause.
15	prediction of suicide a replication study	Suicide prediction, replication study?
15	the occupation of fishing as a risk factor in cancer of the lip	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the risk of breast cancer.
15	oral contraceptives as related to cancer and benign lesions of the breast	Cancer-related oral contraceptives and benign breast lesions.
15	primary risk factors in patients with myocardial infarction	A review of the literature on the treatment of coronary heart disease.
15	diagnostic x rays in late pregnancy and in the neonate	Diagnosis X-rays at the end of pregnancy and at the new born @-@.
15	hospital acquired infections i surveillance in a university hospital	A person who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
15	psychosocial factors and the risk of myocardial infarctions in white women	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	previous fetal loss and risk of sudden infant death syndrome in subsequent offspring	Anterior fetal loss and sudden infant death risk in subsequent offspring.
15	coffee drinking and death due to coronary heart disease	Cardiovascular disease is a major cause of death.
15	serum lipoproteins and coronary heart disease in a population study of hawaii japanese men	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	association between maternal diabetes and the respiratory distress syndrome in the newborn	Maternal Diabetes and Respiratory Distress Syndrome in the new-born.
15	oral contraceptives and reduced risk of benign breast diseases	Oral contraceptives and Reducing the Risk of Mild Breast Diseases.
15	liver cell adenomas associated with use of oral contraceptives	It can also be used as an adjunct to the immune system.
15	thrombosis with low estrogen oral contraceptives	Cervical cancer is the most common type of cancer.
15	a genetic study of bipolar affective disorder	Bipolar affective disorder genetic study.
15	breast cancer detection today an opinion	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	length of interbirth intervals in female psychiatric patients and controls	Length of Birth Intervals (BIR) in Psychiatric Patients and Female Controls.
15	association of exogenous estrogen and endometrial carcinoma	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	increased risk of endometrial carcinoma among users of conjugated estrogens	Increased risk of stroke carcinoma; endometrium in conjugated estrogen users.
15	editorial cancer risk and estrogen use in the menopause	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	editorial risks and benefits of estrogen use	It is important to keep in mind that this is not the case.
15	nosocomial respiratory syncytial virus infections	Infections caused by the respiratory syncytial virus.
15	serum lipids and uric acid relationship in ischemic thrombotic cerebrovascular disease	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Intakes.
15	stoke in the young a four year study 1968 to 1972	Stoke in the Young, 4-year study, 1968-1972.
15	portosystemic shunting in patients with primary biliary cirrhosis a good risk disease	Portosystemic shunt in primary cirrhosis patients, a high-risk disease.
15	factors predictive of perioperative myocardial infarction during coronary operations	Predictive factors for perioperative myocardial infarction (PMI) during coronary operations.
15	the cardiologist s responsibility for preventing coronary heart disease	The cardiologist is responsible for coronary care.
15	early risks of open heart surgery for mitral valve disease	Early Risk of Open Heart Surgery for Mitral Valvulopathy.
15	subacute sclerosing panencephalitis an epidemiologic study in israel	Subacute Sclerosing Panencephalitis, an epidemiological study in the israel.
15	endometrial adenocarcinoma and the polycystic ovary syndrome	Endometrial adenocarcinoma, polycystic ovarian syndrome.
15	antirabies treatment in man in relation to epidemiological conditions nordrhein westfalen 1972	Anti-rabies treatment in l'apos; man relative to northrhein epidemiological conditions Westfalen 1972 nordrhein.
15	implications of precancerous rectal biopsy in patients with inflammatory bowel disease	Effects of Pre-Canceral Rectal Biopsy in Patients with Apos; Inflammatory Bowel Disease.
15	patients at high risk for low birth weight delivery	Low birthweight deliveries in high-risk patients.
15	aortocoronary artery bypass present indications and risk factors	In addition, there is a risk factor for coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) infection.
15	gastrointestinal complications after renal transplantation predictive factors and morbidity	Gastro Complications-Bowel following renal transplant Predictors and Morbidity.
15	cardiovascular risk factors and hearing loss a study of 1 000 fifty year old men	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
15	risk factors in postoperative myocardial infarction	Post-operative myocardial infarction: risk factors.
15	risk factors revisited	Risk factors have been re-examined.
15	infection risk in meningococcal infection the effect of the duration and closeness of the contact in transmission of the meningococcus	Risk of Meningococcal Disease; Meningococcal Disease (Meningococcal Disease) Risk of Meningococcal Disease.
15	the activated plasma recalcification time a measurement encompassing the activated partial thromboplastin time and platelet function with improved detection of bleeders	The time of plasma recalcification activated, a measure encompassing the time of activated partial thromboplastin and platelet function, with better detection of hemorrhage.
15	lung cancer and air pollution in southcentral los angeles county	Lung Cancer and Air Pollution in Central-Southern Los Angeles County.
15	prevalence and incidence data in the assessment of the risk of coronary heart disease	Prevalence and prevalence data; incidence; coronary artery disease risk assessment.
15	cancer of the colon socioeconomic variables in a community	Cancer of community-based socioeconomic colonic variables.
15	tucson epidemiologic study of obstructive lung diseases i methodology and prevalence of disease	Obstructive pulmonary disease epidemiological study i methodology and disease prevalence.
15	tucson epidemiologic study of obstructive lung diseases ii effects of in migration factors on the prevalence of obstructive lung diseases	Tucson Epidemiological Study of Obstructive Pulmonary Diseases ii effects of migration factors on obstructive pulmonary disease prevalence.
15	the effect of menopause on serum cholesterol in american pima indian women	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, 2004.
15	tuberculin sensitivity in a high risk canine population	Dietary Reference Intakes, Dietary Reference Intakes, Dietary Reference Intakes, Dietary Reference Intakes.
15	fetal monitoring its effect on the perinatal mortality and cesarean section rates and its complications	Fetal monitoring of effects on perinatal mortality, cesarean delivery rates, and complications.
15	gynaecologic surgery on elderly patients	Older patients perform gynaecological surgery.
15	the heritable hyperlipoproteinemias and atherosclerosis	Hereditary hyperlipoproteins and atherosclerosis.
15	heritable factors in the severity of affective illness	Hereditary factors of affective disease severity.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california distribution of biochemical risk factors	Epidemiological Studies of Coronary Artery Disease and Stroke in Japanese Men Living in Hawaii and California, Distribution of Biochemical Risk Factors.
15	fetal risk in hyperextension of the fetal head in breech presentation	Fetal risk in apo; fetal head hyperextension through seat.
15	the effect of availability and utilization of prenatal care and hospital services on infant mortality rates summary of the findings of the louisiana infant mortality study part ii	Effect of Availability and Use of Prenatal Care and Hospital Services on Infant Mortality Rates Summary of Results; Louisiana Infant Mortality Study, Part ii.
15	oral contraceptives and thromboembolism a reassessment	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the use of oral contraceptives.
15	study of coronary risk factors related to physical activity in 15 171 men	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
15	what is barbiturate dependence and who is at risk	What' is-what barbiturates addiction and who's at risk?
15	primary angle closure glaucoma oculometry epidemiology and genetics in a high risk population	The American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/publications/publications/publications/index_e.html.
15	familial risk and cancer control	Family risk, cancer control.
15	rubella vaccine in postpubertal women experience in western washington state	Rubella Vaccine in Women Post-pubertaires in West California, USA.
15	comparative results of total detections and detection in a group of patients with high risk for tuberculosis in an urban environment	Comparative Results of Total Detections and Detections in a High Risk Group of Urban TB Patients.
15	psychiatry morphology and behaviour genetics author s transl	Psychiatric Morphology and Behavioural Genetics.
15	multiple sequential skin cancers the risk of skin cancer in patients with previous skin cancer	Sequential multiple skin cancer, skin cancer risk in patients with previous skin cancer.
15	estrogen use and stroke risk in postmenopausal women	American Journal of Oestrogen, 3rd edition.
15	changing risks in tuberculosis	Tuberculosis risk changes.
15	effect of a mass screening program on the risk of cervical cancer	The Canadian Cancer Society, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, and the Canadian Institutes of Health Research.
15	chemoprophylaxis in inactive tuberculosis long term evaluation of a canadian trial	The Canadian Tuberculosis Information Network (CTIN) is a national network of cancer registries across the country.
15	laparoscopy in the obese patient	Obese patient with Laparoscopy.
15	a simple assessment of the risk of low birth weight to select women for nutritional intervention	It is important to note that there are many factors that influence women's ability to participate in the decision-making process.
15	polyps and diverticulosis of large bowel in autopsy population of akita prefecture compared with miyagi high risk for colorectal cancer in japan	Polyps and large intestine diverticulosis in the dapos population; autopsy in the dapos prefecture; Akita compared to the high risk of colorectal cancer of miyagi in Japan.
15	age at the time of the first birth a variable with simple double or triple significance in breast cancer studies	It is important to note, however, that there are differences between the sexes in terms of age at first birth.
15	what is early diagnosis doing	What is-what does the early diagnosis do?
15	what should the physician ask	Que' is-what doctor should ask?
15	malignant neoplasms in the families of patients with ataxia telangiectasia	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
15	association between juvenile onset obesity and severe adult obesity in 73 532 women	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the risk of obesity.
15	nasopharyngeal cancer in bermuda	Bermuda nasopharyngeal cancer.
15	the effect of different modes of artificial ventilation and of some prophylactic means on the incidence of postoperative deep vein thrombosis	Symptoms; effect of different artificial ventilation and certain prophylactic measures on postoperative deep vein thrombosis.
15	effects of medicare on hospital use a disease specific study	The results of this study will be used to assess the impact of the program on the quality of hospital services.
15	anatomical site and size of 222 early asymptomatic oral squamous cell carcinomas a continuing prospective study of oral cancer ii	Anatomical site and size of 222 early, asymptomatic squamous cell carcinomas; ongoing prospective oral cancer study ii.
15	risk for breast cancer development determined by mammographic parenchymal pattern	Mammogram parenchymatous profile determines risk of breast cancer.
15	ventricular arrhythmias during unstable angina pectoris	Ventricular arrhythmia in unstable angina.
15	treadmill exercise testing of mass screening for coronary risk factors	Coronary risk factor mass screening tests.
15	studies of tuberculosis in man in relation to infection in cattle	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
15	the risk of tuberculous infection in sweden	It is not possible to diagnose a person with TB.
15	tetralogy of fallot risk factors associated with complete repair	Tetralogy of the risk factors of Fallot associated with complete repair.
15	lung cancer following exposure to chloromethyl methyl ether an epidemiological study	Lung Cancer Resulting from Exposure to Chloromethyl Methyl Oxide, Epidemiological Study.
15	editorial considerations of risks versus benefits	Editorial risk versus benefit considerations.
15	atherosclerosis of the internal mammary artery	Lapos Atherosclerosis; Internal Breast Artery.
15	influence of rejection on graft survival after renal transplantation	L' influence of rejection on the survival of the transplant recipient after renal transplantation.
15	some possible childhood indicators of adult schizophrenia inferred from children of schizophrenics	It is important to note, however, that children with schizophrenia are more likely to be diagnosed with schizophrenia than adults.
15	use of creatine kinase for detecting severe x linked muscular dystrophy carriers	In addition, it can be used as a diagnostic tool for the diagnosis of severe x-related muscle dystrophy.
15	chronic pulmonary heart disease and its risk factors among a worker population in teheran	Chronic Lung Disease and its Risk Factors in a Working Population in Tehran.
15	an unusual occurrence of multiple sclerosis in a small rural community	This is an unusual manifestation of multiple sclerosis in a small, rural community.
15	comparison of rehospitalized and nonrehospitalized psychiatric patients on community adjustment self assessment guide	A comparison of psychiatric patients who were readmitted to hospital and those who were not readmitted to hospital according to the guide d'apos; auto-assessment of rehabilitation; adaptation to the community.
15	surveillance and monitoring of cardiovascular disease assessment of trends	Cardiovascular Surveillance and Control Trend Assessment.
15	clinical review of 106 consecutive carotid endarterectomies	Clinical Review of the 106 Endarterectomies Carotid.
15	recent trends in breast cancer incidence and mortality in relation to changes in possible risk factors	The Canadian Breast Cancer Surveillance System (CBCS) is a multi-year, multi-year, multi-year, multi-year, multi-year initiative.
15	workshop on late effects of irradiation to the head and neck in infancy and childhood	Late Effects Workshop; early childhood and childhood head and neck irradiation.
15	excess occurrence of cancer of the oral cavity lung and bladder following cancer of the cervix	Incidence of lung cancer and bladder cancer in the oral cavity following cervical cancer.
15	principles of organization of an obstetrical unit from scratch	It's a good way to get a sense of what's going on here.
15	long term treatment with beta blockers after myocardial infarction	Long-term beta treatment with-blockers after a myocardial infarction.
15	acoustic neuroma in von recklinghausen s disease	Acoustic Neuroma in recklinghausen s.
15	the oxytocin challenge test	Apos provocation test; oxytocin.
15	early proliferative changes in intestinal cells	Precious changes in the growth of the intestinal cells.
15	effects of physical training on mood	The effects of the effects of slow motion; physical activity and slow motion; the effects of slow motion; the effects of slow motion; the effects of slow motion and slow motion; physical activity on slow motion; the moods of slow motion; the mind and rhythm of slow motion; the entrance, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, of slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion, slow motion.
15	comparative studies on dysplasia of esophageal epithelium in four prefectures of japan miyagi nara wakayama and aomori with reference to risk of carcinoma	Comparative esophageal dysplasia studies in four Japanese prefectures (miyagi nara wakayama and aomori) in relation to carcinoma risk.
15	dependence of immediate hypersensitivity on the month of birth	Immediate hypersensitivity depends on month of birth.
15	radiation hazards from 241am sources used in thyroid studies	Risk from radiation from the sources 241am used in the thyroid studies.
15	evaluation of the hazard of surgical intervention at the height of gastroduodenal hemorrhage	Dapos risk assessment; peak surgical intervention; gastroduodenal hemorrhage.
15	oral contraceptive patient information a questionnaire study of attitudes knowledge and preferred information sources	Information on the use of oral contraceptives for patients, a questionnaire-based study on attitudes, knowledge and sources of information; preferred information.
15	a longitudinal psychophysiological study of three year old mauritian children preliminary report	A three-year old Mauritian children's longitudinal psychophysiological study is the subject of a preliminary report.
15	results of epidemiologicalm mineralogical and cytotoxicological studies on the pathogenicity of coal mine custs	Abstract; Mineralogical and Cytotoxicological Epidemiological Studies on Pathogenicity of Crusts of Coal Mines.
15	cardiovascular risk and use of estrogens or estrogen progestagen combinations stanford three community study	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	alcoholism hopelessness and suicidal behavior	Substance abuse, hopelessness, suicidal behavior.
15	a procedure for management of acquired tracheoesophageal fistula in ventilator patients	Procedure for the Treatment of Tracheo-Oesophageal Fistulas Acquired in Fanatic Patients.
15	etiology incidence and prognosis of renal failure following cardiac operations results of a prospective analysis of 500 consecutive patients	Etiological incidence and prognosis; kidney failure following cardiac surgery; 500 consecutive patients prospective analysis.
15	preoperative or postoperative deep vein thrombosis	Pre-operative or post-operative deep-vein thrombosis.
15	hashimoto s thyroiditis and breast cancer	Hashimoto also has a history of thyroidism and breast cancer.
15	how general practitioners assess risks in using new drugs	It is important to note that the use of a new drug is not a new drug.
15	myocardial infarction in the familial forms of hypertriglyceridemia	Myocardial infarction in family forms of hypertriglyceridemia.
15	violence television and the health of american youth	Violence on television and America's youth health.
15	multiple sclerosis and childhood infections	Multiple and childhood infections.
15	tricuspid atresia results of treatment in 160 children	Tricuspid atresia in 160 children.
15	the yugoslavia cardiovascular disease study ii factors in the incidence of coronary heart disease	In addition, there is a growing body of literature on the role of cardiovascular disease in the health care system.
15	life events and subsequent illness	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	mental retardation in a national population of young men in the netherlands ii prevalence of mild mental retardation	The Committee asks for up-to-date information in the next report on the situation of women in the labour market.
15	vaccine associated poliomyelitis in the united states 1961 1972	State poliomyelitis-associated immunization.
15	physical therapy in rehabilitation after myocardial infarction author s transl	Physiotherapy Rehabilitation Following Myocardial Infection Loss of consciousness; author.
15	estrogens and endometrial cancer in a retirement community	It's called estrogen and cancer of the intestines; endometrium in a retired community.
15	oral prostaglandin e2 for labor induction in high risk pregnancy	E2 oral prostaglandin for l' induction of labor during high-risk pregnancies.
15	an evaluation of the ifa gc procedure in a low risk population	Evaluation of IFa gc in a low-risk population.
15	anesthetic practice and pregnancy controlled survey of male anaesthetists in the united kingdom	The practice of anesthesia and controlled pregnancy investigates male anesthetists in united kingdom.
15	twins with academic learning problems antecedent characteristics	It is important to remember that a child's parents are not the only ones who have difficulty learning.
15	the risk and accuracy of pancreatic biopsy	Risk and Accuracy of Pancreatic Biopsy.
15	the increase in working years due to elimination of cancer as a cause of death	The Committee asks for up-to-date information in the next report.
15	plasma prolactin and its relationship to risk factors in human breast cancer	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the risk of breast cancer.
15	the variation of recurrence risks with penetrance for isolated cases of autosomal dominant conditions	The variation of recurrence risk with penetrance in isolated, autosomal, dominant conditions.
15	prolonged ultraviolet light induced erythema and the cutaneous carcinoma phenotype	Prolonged ultraviolet light induces erythema and skin carcinoma phenotype.
15	ototoxicity of tobramycin a clinical overview	Clinical Review, 3rd edition.
15	operative and nonoperative risks in the cardiac patient	Operating and non-operating risks to cardiac patients.
15	does anaemia increase the risks to the fetus caused by smoking in pregnancy	Anemia increases-t-Does it increase fetal risks due to smoking during pregnancy?
15	genital cytologic abnormalities in patients having therapeutic abortion	Genital cytological abnormalities in terminally ill patients.
15	viral infections that affect the fetus	Fetal viral infections.
15	antiarrhythmic drugs for ischemic heart disease	Anti-arrhythmic medications for the treatment of coronary heart disease.
15	evaluation of suicide risk in adolescents	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry.
15	how is the acceptability of risks to the health of the workers to be determined	How to Determine the Acceptability of Occupational Health Risks?
15	observation on the familial appearance of diseases associated with metabolic disorders of the mother	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
15	incidence predisposing factors and outcome of pharyngocutaneous fistulas complicating head and neck cancer surgery	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of cancer, such as the risk of cancer.
15	maternal anticonvulsants and perinatal risk	Anticonvulsant agents and risk of perinatal infection.
15	parental smoking its effects on fetus and child health	Parents' smoking affects fetal and infant health.
15	experience with surgical salvage in pulmonary tuberculosis application to general thoracic surgery	Experience in surgical recovery in apo; application of pulmonary tuberculosis to thoracic general surgery.
15	renal biopsy in pregnancy induced hypertension	Pregnancy-induced hypertension causes renal biopsy.
15	incidence of hyperuricemia and gout in coronary insufficiency from angina pectoris to myocardial infarct	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
15	long term study of the risk factors in atherosclerosis	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	long term toxicity of antischistosomal drugs summary and perspectives	Long-Term Toxicity Synthesis and Outlook for Anti-Schistosomal Drugs.
15	coronary heart disease and its risk factors in a group of 5 000 middle aged men in urban environment	Coronary heart disease and risk factors among 5,000 Canadian men; urban average age.
15	temporal lobe surgery around the world results complications and mortality	Surgery of the temporal lobe of the brain throughout the world causes complications and mortality.
15	suicide by persons with and without psychiatric contacts	Suicide by a person with or without contact with a mental health professional.
15	self destructive consequences of sex role socialization	Destructive Auto-Consequences of Gender Socialization.
15	oestrogen profiles of parous and nulliparous women	The profile of the female parent and the female nulliparous.
15	practical prenatal care i initial prenatal care	Pre-natal and post-natal care.
15	epidemiological research on cancer risk by aldol and aliphatic aldehydes	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
15	screening for risks of cardiovascular disease in children a preliminary report	Canadian Journal of Public Health, 8(1), pp. 1–24.
15	14 the patient classification for long term care developed by four research groups in the united states	In addition, there is a growing body of evidence that suggests that long-term care is an important component of long-term care.
15	evidence for hyperoestrogenaemia as a risk factor for myocardial infarction in men	Evidence of hyperoestrogenemia as a risk factor for men with cerebrovascular myocardial infarction.
15	the risk of pelvic inflammatory disease in women using intrauterine contraceptive devices as compared to non users	Pelvic inflammatory disease risk in women who use intra-@uterine contraceptives compared to women who do not use these contraceptives.
15	injuries to research subjects a survey of investigators	Research Injuries Survey of Investigators.
15	predictors of epilepsy in children who have experienced febrile seizures	Predictors of seizures in children with febrile seizures.
15	self poisoning with follow up considerations	Auto-poisoning with follow-up.
15	hopelessness an indicator of suicidal risk	Desperation is a marker of suicide risk.
15	risks of mortality of suicide attempters compared with psychiatric and general populations	Risk of death among those who have attempted suicide compared to those who have attempted suicide in the general psychiatric population.
15	suicide behavior community attitudes and beliefs	Suicide is defined as a form of self-harm.
15	multivariate prediction of coronary heart disease during 8 5 year follow up in the western collaborative group study	Multi-variate coronary artery prediction during apos; 8-5 years follow-up in apos; collaborative study with a group of apos; west.
15	a high risk pregnancy management protocol	Protocol for the management of high-risk pregnancy.
15	a physiologic model of the dehydroepiandrosterone to estrogen conversion system in the fetoplacental unit ii preliminary clinical application the dehydroepiandrosterone loading test	Physiological Model of the Dehydroepiandrosterone to Estrogen Conversion System in L' FoE Unit ii Preliminary Clinical Application of Dehydroepiandrosterone Load Test.
15	circulation and anesthesia	Circulation and anesthesia, please.
15	experience with sephadex gel filtration in assessing the risk of bilirubin encephalopathy in neonatal jaundice	Sephadex gel filtration experience in apo; risk assessment; bilirubin encephalopathy in neonatal jaundice.
15	menopausal estrogens and breast cancer	Menopausal estrogen and breast.
15	damage risk an evaluation of the effects of exposure to 85 versus 90 dba of noise	It is important to note that there are no effects associated with the exposure to noise.
15	cancer in the offspring of fathers in hydrocarbon related occupations	Cancer among offspring of fathers working in hydrocarbon-related occupations.
15	risk factors for myocardial infarction in young women	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	familial colon cancer	Family-acquired bowel cancer.
15	late effects of therapeutic irradiation on the skeleton and bone marrow	Late effects of osteoarthritis; therapeutic irradiation of skeletal and bone marrow.
15	decreased risk of radiation associated second malignant neoplasms in actinomycin d treated patients	Decreased risk of secondary malignant radiation-associated neoplasms in patients receiving actinomycin d.
15	bacillus calmette gu rin vaccination and cancer prevention a critical review of the human experience	B.C. Ministry of Health, Ministry of Health and Long-Term Care.
15	current epidemiological evidence for transmission of hodgkin s disease	Current Epidemiological Evidence of Transmission of Hodgkin's Disease.
15	a pediatric screening examination for psychosocial problems	Psychosocial screening.
15	oral contraceptive use in older women and fatal myocardial infarction	Use of oral contraceptives in elderly and elderly women; fatal myocardial infarction.
15	principles in selection of therapy	Principles for Therapeutic Selection.
15	risk estimates for chronic bronchitis in smokers a study of male female differences	Estimates of the Risk of Chronic Bronchitis in Smokers; Study of Gender Differences.
15	prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects i problems and pitfalls analysis of 2495 cases using the alpha fetoprotein assay	Prenatal neural tube defects diagnosis and problems; trapping analysis of 2,495 cases at baseline; fetoprotein alpha measurement aid.
15	the addition of mammography to breast carcinoma screening in a general gynecology practice one year s experience	It is important to note that mammography is not the only method of screening for breast cancer, but it can be used as a screening tool.
15	the incidence of bacteremia in pediatric patients following tooth extraction	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the quality of life of children.
15	recurrence risks in children having one parent with a congenital heart disease	Children are at increased risk for heart disease and stroke, and are at increased risk for heart disease.
15	polygenic inheritance of otosclerosis	Polygenic apos inheritance; otosclerosis.
15	genetic factors in breast cancer identification of a high risk group by means of dermatoglyphic investigation	The Canadian Breast Cancer Network (CBNF) is a partnership of the Canadian Breast Cancer Network (CBN) and the Canadian Breast Cancer Network.
15	the risk of heart disease in various psychiatric diseases	Prevalence of diabetes mellitus in Canada.
15	smoking and other risk factors for coronary heart disease in british civil servants	In addition, there are a number of other factors that influence the risk of coronary heart disease.
15	population cancer screening	Cancer Screening in the Population.
15	hazards in the operative treatment of ductus botallo author s transl	Risks in botallo de l'apos surgical treatment; translative author.
15	risk factors associated with nasopharyngeal carcinoma	Nasopharyngeal carcinoma risk factors.
15	the intrauterine device and deaths from spontaneous abortion	The intra-uterine device and miscarriage deaths.
15	cigarette smoking and atherosclerosis in autopsied men	Smoking cigarettes and lapos; atherosclerosis in men who are autopsied.
15	chemical carcinogens in the human environment problems and quantitative aspects	In addition, there are a number of factors that may affect the health of Canadians.
15	evaluation of environmental carcinogens for cancer in man	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	some examples of dose response studies in chemical carcinogenesis	Chemical carcinogenesis dose studies-response.
15	myocardial infarction in car assembly workers	Automobile assemblers have myocardial infarction.
15	relationship of passive cigarette smoking to sudden infant death syndrome	Second-hand smoke and Sudden Infant Death Syndrome.
15	antenatal identification of women at high risk of spontaneous pre term birth	Prenatal Identification of Women at High Risk of Preterm Spontaneous Birth.
15	the natural history of coronary artery stenosis a longitudinal angiographic assessment	L' natural history of sinus stenosis; coronary artery is longitudinal angiographic evaluation.
15	breast cancer screening benefit and risk for the first annual screening	The benefits and risks of screening for breast cancer at the time of the first annual screening are presented below.
15	who chooses prepaid medical care survey results from two marketings of three new prepayment plans	Who selects the results of a survey of paid physician services from the two-market advance from three new advance payment plans?
15	imminent shock a useful diagnosis in drug pathology	Imminent shock, a useful drug pathology diagnosis.
15	the epidemiology of self reported drug misuse in the united kingdom	The United States Department of Health and Human Services.
15	splenectomy in childhood a review in england and wales 1960 4	Splenectomy in childhood, England and Wales, 1960 4.
15	cardiovascular birth defects and antenatal exposure to female sex hormones	Cardiovascular Congenital Anomalies and Prenatal Exposure to the Sexual Hormones of Women.
15	alcoholism as blaming the alcoholic	It's just a matter of time before you're ready to go.
15	deep venous thrombosis of the legs after strokes part i incidence and predisposing factors	Severe Leg Venous Thrombosis Part I Incidence and Predisposing Factors.
15	coronary heart disease and risk factors in some special type collectivities	In some special communities, myocardial infarction and risk factors.
15	ischemic colitis incidence following abdominal aortic reconstruction a prospective study	In addition, the incidence of colitis may be higher than that of other types of colitis.
15	cardiac surgery in geriatric patients	Geriatric cardiac surgery.
15	central nervous system damage as a possible component of unexpected deaths in infancy	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
15	valve replacement by ball prosthesis study of risk factors	Replacement of valves with balloon prosthesis devices to study risk factors.
15	nutrition and disease	Health and Welfare Canada.
15	assessment of the findings of fibrogastroscopy with gastrobiopsy and determination of hexokinase activity in the serum and gastric juice of stomach ulcer patients	Evaluation of Fibrogastroscopic Results with Gastrobiopsy and Determination of Apos; serum and gastric Hexokinase activity in patients with apos; stomach ulcer.
15	clinical manifestations of polyposis and polyps of the large intestine and risk groups	Clinical manifestations of large bowel polyp and polyp and at-risk groups.
15	tobacco and tobacco smoke	Tobacco smoke.
15	continuous vowel discrimination in normal and at risk infants	The Committee notes from another source1 that there has been no significant change in the incidence of vowel use in Canada.
15	a multivariate study of the effects of high risk factors on performance on the brazelton neonatal assessment scale	A Multivariate Study of the Effects of High Risk Factors on Performance on the Brazelton Dapos Scale.
15	high school football injuries prevention of injury to the central nervous system	High school injury prevention for the central nervous system.
15	shigellosis transmitted by nurses	Nursing-transmitted Shigellosis.
15	hodgkin s disease in siblings	Sibling Hodgkin's disease.
15	an estimation of somatic hazards to the united states population from dental radiography	Somatic risk estimation for the state population-United from dental X-ray.
15	problems in extrapolating toxicity data for laboratory animals to man	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	assessment of environmental carcinogen risks in terms of life shortening	In addition, there is a need to assess the risks to human health and the environment.
15	preliminary report of the lung cancer detection program in new york	New York Lung Cancer Screening Program preliminary report.
15	chronic myelogenous leukemia management of splenectomy in a high risk population	Management of Splenectomy by Chronic Myelogenous Leukemia in a High Risk Population.
15	buffering capacity of the smoke of different tobaccos in relation to lung cancer risks	The ability of tobacco smoke to act as a buffer against the risk of lung cancer.
15	value of routine estimation of erythrocyte sedimentation rate in surgical patients	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent of sedimentation.
15	amputations for arteritis criteria of choice of the level of the amputation	Arteritis amputations criteria for apo level selection; apo amputation; amputation.
15	the reproductive counseling process comments based on experience	The reproductive counselling process provides experiential feedback.
15	renal stones and coronary heart disease	Kidney anemia and coronary.
15	angiographic findings in asymptomatic aircrewmen with electrocardiographic abnormalities	Aircrew asymptomatic electrocardiographic abnormalities.
15	a study of the relationship between goodwin s high risk score and fetal outcome	Investigation of the Relationship Between Goodwin's High Risk Ratings and Fetal Outcomes.
15	some social and medical correlates of pregnancy outcome	Some medical and social correlates of pregnancy.
15	incest children at risk	The Committee notes that the situation is not in conformity.
15	complications of lymphangiography in patients of advanced age	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	myelodysplasia the natural history of kyphosis and scoliosis a preliminary report	Myelodysplasia, l' natural history of scoliosis and kyphosis a preliminary report.
15	stomach cancer in japan	Cancer of the Japanese stomach.
15	a general cardiovascular risk profile the framingham study	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors that may be associated with coronary heart disease.
15	present status of coronary artery surgery	Coronary surgery: current status.
15	radiation cancer safety standards and current levels of exposure	It is important to note that there are no data available to support this conclusion.
15	epidemiological aspects in carcinogenic risk evaluation arising from pollution	It is important to note that there are no data available on the toxicity of ethylene oxide.
15	geographic patterns of lung cancer industrial correlations	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	place and time aspects of the occurrence of down s syndrome	It is important to remember that there is no such thing as a disease.
15	short pregnancy interval low birthweight and the sudden infant death syndrome	Pregnancy Interval Low birth weight and Sudden Infant Death Syndrome.
15	assessment of intrauterine growth retardation by diagnostic ultrasound	Diagnostic ultrasound evaluation of intra-@uterine growth retardation.
15	cryptorchidism hernia and cancer of the testis	Cryptorchidic Hernia and testicular cancer.
15	hyaline membrane disease in twins a 7 year review with a study on zygosity	Hyaline Membrane Pathology in Twins, a 7-year-old zygosity study.
15	circulating maternal serum progesterone in high risk pregnancies	Pregnant women are more likely to be pregnant than pregnant women.
15	gonadal radiation dose and its genetic significance in radioiodine therapy of hyperthyroidism	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of cancer.
15	carbohydrate homeostasis in chronic lymphocytic thyroiditis increased incidence of diabetes mellitus	Lapses; carbohydrate homeostasis in the chronic lymphocytic thyroiditis has increased; incidence of diabetes mellitus.
15	bcg vaccination and epidemiological situation a decision making approach to the use of bcg	FMD vaccination and the epidemiological situation constitute a decision-making approach to FMD use.
15	prophylactic central nervous system therapy in childhood acute lymphatic leukemia effect of poor risk patients on the results	Acute lymphatic leukemia in children of low-risk patients is associated with an increased risk of developing lymphatic leukemia.
15	familial polyposis	Home polio.
15	colorectal polyps and carcinoma in southern iran	It is not possible to determine the cause of death.
15	medical versus surgical treatment of unstable angina	Prevalence of diabetes mellitus in Canada.
15	effect of a high beef diet on the fecal bacterial flora of humans	In addition, there is a need for additional information to assist in the assessment of risk.
15	fear appeals and attitude change effects of a threat s noxiousness probability of occurrence and the efficacy of coping responses	Fear and change; attitude related to likelihood of harm; threat and threat; effectiveness of measures; adaptation.
15	prevention of venous thromboembolism in surgical patients by low dose heparin prepared by the council on thrombosis of the american heart association	Prevention of Venous Thromboembolism in Surgical Patients with apos; low-dose heparin, prepared by the American Cardiac Association.
15	the course of pregnancy in patients with artificial heart valves	L' Maternity Outcomes in Patients with Artificial Heart Valves.
15	why do women liver longer than men	The why, why, why, why, the liver of the woman, the liver of the goose; the goose of the goose; the winter of the goose; the gap between the goose; the man, the goose; the back.
15	health patterns associated with type a behavior a managerial population	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
15	sudden death	Blunt-force death.
15	intestinal bypass operation as a treatment for obesity	Bypass surgery to treat weight loss; obesity.
15	changes in the benefit of immunization	It's a good thing that you don't have to do that.
15	comparative histologic study of adenomas of the large intestine in japan and england with special reference to malignant potential	Comparative histological study of large intestine adenomas in Japan and England, especially malignant potential.
15	risk factors in juveniles indications of cardiovascular risk in higher grade school children of cologne	Risk Factors in the Youth Cardiovascular risk signs in children; high school primary school; cologne.
15	ototoxicity of amikacin	Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	recurrence risks for retinoblastoma a model for autosomal dominant disorders with complex inheritance	Risks of Recurrence of Retinoblastoma, a pattern of dominant autosomal inherited disorders.
15	screening high risk populations a challenge to primary medical care	Primary medical care is challenged in screening high-risk populations.
15	demographic data and mental health planning	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	prenatal diagnosis of neural tube defects	Prenatal Diagnosis of Neural Tube Defects.
15	clinical decision analysis the hazard of using additional data	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	midtrimester amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis safety and accuracy	It is important to note, however, that this is not necessarily the case.
15	detecting early colon cancer	Early detection of colonic cancer.
15	high risk factors for childhood asthma	High Risk Factors for Asthma in Children.
15	some social and medical characteristics of army men with testicular cancer	It's a very important thing to know, and it's a very important thing to know.
15	the risk of meningitis among classroom contacts during an epidemic of meningococcal disease	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	estimating the risks for offspring of first cousin matings an approach	Estimating the risk to first-cousin mating offspring is one approach.
15	amniocentesis for antenatal diagnosis review of problems and outcomes in a large series	It's a very important thing to know, but it's a very important thing to know.
15	the individual at high risk for endometrial carcinoma	The Canadian Cancer Society, Health Canada, Health Canada.
15	cancer risk in diethylstilbestrol exposed offspring	Cancer Risk in Descendants Exposure to Diethylstilbestrol.
15	rauwolfia derivatives and breast cancer	Derivatives of Rauwolfia and Breast Cancer.
15	methodological issues underlying multiple decrement life table analysis	Methodological issues at @-@jacentes at l' Analysis of Multiple Decrement Life Tables.
15	subjective multivariable analysis bu computer for evaluation of coronary artery bypass	Computer-Based Subjective Multivariate Analysis for Disease Assessment; Coronary Derivation Assessment.
15	operative risk in patients with previous coronary artery bypass	This is an operating risk for patients who have undergone prior coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) surgery.
15	various risk factors in the precipitaiton of complications caused by anesthetics and muscle relaxants	Various risk factors in the complication of muscle relaxants and anesthetics.
15	high risk factors in anesthesiology and methods of detection	High risk anaesthesiology and detection methods.
15	menopause and risk of cardiovascular disease the framingham study	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	risk of congenital abnormality after inadvertent rubella vaccination of pregnant women	In addition, there is a risk of respiratory tract infection and a risk of respiratory tract infection.
15	hepatic angiosarcomas in dogs an excessive frequency as compared with man	This is consistent with the findings of the Canadian Study of Health and Welfare.
15	fluoridated drinking water and the occurrence of cancer	Fluoridated Drinking Water and Cancer Cases.
15	mantel haenszel analysis of oxford data ii independent effects of fetal irradiation subfactors	Mantel haenszel analysis of the oxford data ii effects independent of the sub-factors of l' fetal irradiation.
15	gastric cancer in colombia i cancer risk and suspect environmental agents	Cancer in the gastro-intestinal tract in Colombia is at risk of developing cancer and suspects environmental agents.
15	occupation and hodgkin s disease	Occupation and Hodgkin's.
15	ocular alkali burns in a large urban area	OVERALL OVERVIEW OVERVIEW OVERALL OVERVIEW OVERALL OVERVIEW OVERALL OVERALL OVERALL OVERVIEW.
15	the observation and analysis of cancer deaths among classified radiation workers	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	inidications for multivalve prostheses	Multivalve implant insertions.
15	substrate mobilization a new hypothesis for the aetiology of the idiopathic respiratory distress syndrome	Substrate mobilization is a novel hypothesis for idiopathic respiratory distress etiology.
15	the macandrew alcoholism scale as a general measure of substance misuse	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the problem of alcohol abuse.
15	family history as a predictor of alcoholism in u s navy personnel	Family history as predictor of alcohol dependence among U.S. Navy personnel.
15	recognition and operative management of patients with arteriosclerotic coronary artery aneurysms	In addition to the above, there are a number of other procedures that can be used to assess the risk of coronary heart disease.
15	combined valvular and coronary artery surgery	Valve and coronary surgeries combined.
15	comparison of patients with coronary artery or valve disease intraoperative differences in blood volume and observations of vasomotor response	Comparison of intraoperative blood volume differences with observations of vasomotor response of coronary artery or valvular artery.
15	myocardial infarction comparative study of principal risk factors in the two sexes	Comparative study of the major risk factors for myocardial infarction in both sexes.
15	discussion of genetics and mental health	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	genetic counseling for congenital heart disease	Congenital Heart Disease Genetic Counselling.
15	the coronary prone behavior pattern and the suppression of fatigue on a treadmill test	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
15	maximum acid output and risk of peptic ulcer	In addition, it is not possible to determine the age of the patient.
15	coronary risk factors and socioeconomic status the oslo study	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	the swine influenza decision	Swine flu decision.
15	septicemia and meningitis in children splenectomized for hodgkin s disease	Sepsis and Meningitis in Children Splenectomized for Hodgkin's Disease.
15	an assay for selecting high risk population for gastric cancer by studying environmental factors	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	mass screening in the diagnosis of precancerous diseases of the stomach	Mass screening for pre-cancer stomach diseases.
15	surgical versus medical treatment of coronary artery disease long term survival	In addition to the above, there are a number of medical and surgical treatments.
15	medical fitness for sports with particular reference to cardiovascular conditions	In addition to the above, there are a number of health and safety issues.
15	health risks of various sports	Health and safety of the environment.
15	a study of occupational stressor and the incidence of disease risk	Health Canada, Workplace Health and Safety Branch, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	cancer mortality and saccharin consumption in diabetics	Cancer Mortality and Saccharin Consumption in Diabetics.
15	the risk of birth defects jacobs v theimer and parents right to know	The Risk of Birth Defects Jacobs v Theimer and the parents have a right to know.
15	the case for a more aggressive approach to staghorn stones	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is one of the most important ones.
15	brief communication possible increased risk of lung cancer among beauticians	Brief Possible Communication Increased Risk of Lung Cancer in Plastic Women.
15	general practice observed child abuse and general practice	The general practice was that of child abuse and the general practice.
15	child health clincs and inverse care laws evidence from longitudinal study of 1878 pre school children	Longitudinal Study of 1878, Precolary Children, Vol.
15	general criteria for assessing the evidence for carcinogenicity of chemical substances report of the subcommittee on environmental carcinogenesis national cancer advisory board	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada.
15	carrier detection and genetic counselling in duchenne muscular dystrophy a follow up study	American Journal of Obstetrics and Gynecology, Vol.
15	primary hyperlipoproteinemia in childhood and adolescence identification and treatment of persons at risk for premature atherosclerosis	It is important to recognize that a person's blood pressure may be higher than a person's body weight.
15	carcinogenicity of fibrous glass pleural response in the rat in relation to fiber dimension	Carcinogenicity of the fibrous pleural glass response in rats relative to fiber size.
15	assessment of drugs in schizophrenia diagnosis and patient selection	Drug Evaluation in the Diagnosis of Schizophrenia and Patient Selection.
15	cancer of the uterine corpus after hormonal treatment for breast cancer	Cancer of the corpus uterus after hormone-induced treatment of breast cancer.
15	estimation of risk as a function of risk factors ii application to the multivariate analysis of coronary heart disease in a middle aged male population author s transl	Risk Assessment by Risk Factors ii Lapse; Application to Immediate; Multivariate Analysis of Coronary Heart Disease in a Male Population; Average Age.
15	chronic bronchitis and risk factors in employees of the sanitation d partment city of geneva	Chronic bronchitis and other risk factors among Geneva City Health Service employees.
15	abnormal polygraphic findings in near miss sudden infant death	Abnormal polygraph results in near-missing infant SIDS.
15	legal abortion mortality in the united states epidemiologic surveillance 1972 1974	State Legal Abortion Mortality-United Epidemiological Monitoring 1972.
15	one view follow up mammogram efficacy in screening for breast cancer	It is important to recognize that mammography is an important tool for the prevention of breast cancer.
15	normal children abnormal results	Normal kids, they have abnormal results.
15	a migrant study of adopted apache children	A Migrant Study of Adopted Apache Children.
15	impending child abuse psychosomatic symptoms in adults as a clue	It is also important to note that there is no evidence that children are suffering from mental illness or addiction.
15	minimizing the risk of amniocentesis for prenatal diagnosis	Minimize risk of prenatal amniocentesis.
15	myocardial ischaemia risk factors and death from coronary heart disease	Myocardial ischemia and coronary death risk factors.
15	toward preventing coronary death from ventricular fibrillation	Preventing Coronary Death by Ventricular Fibrillation.
15	obesity in childhood a community study in newcastle upon tyne	Canadian Council on the Status of Women.
15	n methylnicotinamide excretion and affective disorders	Methylnicotinamide excretion and emotional disorders.
15	the influence of childbirth on psychiatric morbidity	Lapos; birth influences psychiatric morbidity.
15	cerebral function and the eeg in psychiatric disorder a hypothesis	It's a good way to learn more about mental illness and addiction.
15	results of a two year health education campaign on dietary behavior the stanford three community study	Results from a two-year Stanford Three community-based nutrition education campaign.
15	the discovery of drug induced illness	A drug-induced disease.
15	relationship between the development of experimental leukemia and animals capacity for a humoral immune response	Relationship between experimental leukemia development and humoral immune response in animals.
15	childhood antecedents of adult obesity do chubby infants become obese adults	In addition, the child's weight may be higher than that of the child's body, and may be higher than that of the child.
15	enrollment choice in a mutli hmo setting the roles of health risk financial vulnerability and access to care	It is important to recognize that financial vulnerability is a key determinant of health, but it is also important to recognize the role of financial vulnerability to health risks.
15	risk factors of sports injuries in winter	Risk factors for winter sports injuries.
15	gonorrhoea in women and exposure to risk	In addition, there is a need for additional information on this topic.
15	risk factors in pulmonary embolism	Pulmonary embolism.
15	design and methodology of the zagreb preliminary study response rates at the study stages	The results of this study are summarized in the table below.
15	hyperglycaemia a risk factor for hypertension	In addition, the risk factors for high blood pressure are high.
15	the concept of risk in epidemiology point of view of a public health officer author s transl	The Epidemiological Risk Concept from the Perspective of a Public Health Officer translator.
15	oestrogens and endometrial cancer a point of view	Oestrogen and cancer; endometrium d' perspective.
15	malignant transformation and natural history of oral leukoplakia in 57 518 industrial workers of gujarat india	Natural history and malignant transformation of oral leukoplasty in 57,518 industrial workers in Gujarat india.
15	preventive cardiology what should the clinician be doing about it	Preventive Cardiology What should clinicians do about this?
15	relationship of wives preventive health orientation to their beliefs about heart disease in husbands	Relationship between women's pre-emptive health and husband's beliefs about heart disease.
15	components of blood pressure and risk of atherothrombotic brain infarction the framingham study	The Components of Arterial Pressure and the Risk of Atherothrombotic Brain Infarction (Atherothrombotic BMI); Framingham study.
15	investigation of some risk factors in tubercular infection in children	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	reducing the risk of tuberculosis in children vaccinated with bcg	To reduce the risk of TB in children who are vaccinated with the bcg vaccine.
15	neuropsychological deficit in polydrug users a preliminary report of the findings of the collaborative neuropsychological study of polydrug users	Neuropsychological Impairment of Poly-Drug Users A preliminary report of results from the collaborative neuropsychological study of poly-drug users.
15	health related aspects of integrated pest management	Prepared for the Canadian Pest Management Network.
15	defining the malignant potential of the giant pigmented nevus	Define giant pigmented naevus malignant potential.
15	maternal serum unconjugated estriol and urine estriol concentrations in normal and high risk pregnancy	In addition to the above-mentioned conditions, there are also other conditions that may be considered to be of concern.
15	the diagnosis and management of intrauterine growth retardation	Intra uterine growth retardation diagnosis and management.
15	palmar crease variants and their clinical significance a study of newborns at risk	Clinical Significance and Variations A study of newborns-at risk.
15	homograft and prosthetic aortic valve replacement a comparative study	A comparative study of the effects of homograft and replacement of the aortic valve by a prosthesis.
15	survey of amniocentesis for fetal sex determination in hemophilia carriers	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of cervical cancer.
15	the initial manifestations of acute myocardinal infarction	Acute myocardial infarction.
15	estrogens and atherosclerosis	He's got estrogen and atherosclerosis.
15	prevention of thromboembolic phenomena	Thromboembolic prevention.
15	protective efficacy of vaccination in children in four episodes of natural varicella and zoster in the ward	Protective efficacy of immunization in children with four natural varicella episodes and four shingles in the ward.
15	the thromboembolic risk of the pill	The pill's thrombo-embolic risk.
15	characteristic features of ischaemic strokes in young adults author s transl	Characteristics of young adult ischemic stroke.
15	coronary risk factors and anginal pain patterns	Coronary Risk Factors and Anginal Pain Models.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california incidence of myocardial infarction and death from coronary heart disease	Epidemiological Studies of Coronary Artery Disease and Stroke in Japanese Men Living in Hawaii and California, Japan and California, Incidence of Lapos; Myocardial Infarction and Death from Coronary Artery Disease.
15	epidemiologic studies of coronary heart disease and stroke in japanese men living in japan hawaii and california coronary heart disease risk factors in japan and hawaii	Epidemiological Studies of Coronary Artery Disease and Stroke in Japanese Men Living in Hawaii and California, Risk Factors for Coronary Artery Disease in Japan and Hawaii.
15	genetic counselling i definition and present status author s transl	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, Vol.
15	reuse of disposable catheters and guide wires	Reuse of Disposable Catheters and-Wires Guides.
15	assessing the intellectural consequences of early intervention with high risk infants	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
15	abortion deaths associated with the use of prostaglandin f2alpha	Abortion-related Mortalities Associated with Prostaglandin f2alpha Use.
15	identification of subjects at high coronary risk in the roman project of coronary heart disease prevention author s transl	Identification of high risk subjects in the Roman coronary prevention project.
15	coccidioidomycosis and renal transplantation	Coccidioidomycosis and a renal transplant.
15	evaluation and measurement some dilemmas for health education	Assessment and Measurement of Certain Health Education Dilemmas.
15	complications of cardiac surgery	Cardiac surgery complications.
15	thromboembolism following total hip replacement arthroplasty the efficicy of dextran aspirin and dextran warfarin in prophylaxis	Thromboembolism after hip replacement; effectiveness of dosage; dextran aspirin and warfarin dextran in prophylaxis.
15	surgery and coronary heart disease	Surgery and coronary.
15	risk factors for developing asthma and allergic rhinitis a 7 year follow up study of college students	Risk factors for asthma and allergic rhinitis in a follow-up study to determine the risk factors for asthma and allergic rhinitis in a 7-year study with college students.
15	emotional history and pathogenesis of cancer	Emotional history and cancer pathogenicity.
15	radiations and public health author s transl	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada.
15	a prospective study of cerebrovascular disease in japanese rural communities akabane and asahi part 1 evaluation of risk factors in the occurrence of cerebral hemorrhage and thrombosis	A Prospective Study of Cerebrovascular Disease in Rural Japanese Communities Akabane and Asahi Part 1 Risk factor assessment in apo; onset of apo; cerebral haemorrhage and thrombosis.
15	rational prescribing of drugs	Pharmaceutical rationalization.
15	surgery for gastric ulcer	Gastric ulcer surgery.
15	significance of indices of potential epidemiologic valency of natural foci of tick borne encephalitis and methods of determining them	Significance and methods for determining potential epidemiological valence indices of natural outbreaks of tick-borne encephalitis.
15	cholecystostomy in the high risk patient with biliary tract disease	Choleystostomy in high-risk patient with dapos; a disease of the bile tract.
15	parental transactional style deviance as a possible indicator of risk for schizophrenia	The risk of schizophrenia may be related to a deviance of transactional parenting style.
15	attempt at evaluation of the risk of mortality in utero	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	risk and postoperative complications in abdominal surgery in elderly patients author s transl	Risk and Post-operative Complications of Abdominal Surgery in Older Patients.
15	selenium vitamin e and copper in multiple sclerosis	Selenium, vitamin e, and copper-based MS.
15	birthweights of male and female schizoprenics offspring	Birth weight of female and male schizoprene offspring.
15	rheoencephalographic method of of analyzing several risk factors for cerebrovascular disease epidemiologic study	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	ischemic heart disease in death discordant twins a study on 205 male and female pairs with special reference to hereditary factors	"""Ischemic heart disease in death discordant twins"", a study of 205 couples of men and women, with special emphasis on the study of hereditary factors."
15	risk benefit analysis for industrial and social needs	Analysis of the risks and benefits to the industry and society as a whole.
15	risk factors and early diagnosis in pancreatic carcinoma	Dietary Reference Intakes: a review of the literature.
15	brain infarction in young adults with particular reference to pathogenesis	Young adults have cerebral infarction, particularly with respect to pathogenesis.
15	a hypothesis the role of a high risk male in the etiology of cervical carcinoma a correlation of epidemiology and molecular biology	An hypothesis about the role of a high-risk man in stroke; cervical carcinoma etiology; uterus correlation; epidemiology and molecular biology.
15	cigarette smoking use of oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	methodical study of multifactorial prevention of ischemic heart disease	Systematic Investigation of Multifactorial Prevention of Ichemic Heart Disease.
15	myocardial infarct in young persons	Myocardial infarction to the young.
15	relative risk factors in chronic open angle glaucoma an epidemiological study	Relative risk factors for chronic angle-angled glaucoma are an epidemiological study.
15	exogenous estrogen and endometrial carcinoma case control and incidence study	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors that may be associated with the use of estrogen.
15	the nutritionally at risk child part 1 study of some socio economic and cultural factors	Study of selected socio-economic factors on nutritionally at-risk children, Part 1.
15	the nutritionally at risk child part 2 study of factors pertinent to the child siblings or mother	It is important to note that these data are not intended to be used as a basis for comparison.
15	asymptomatic autoimmune thyroiditis and coronary heart disease cross sectional and prospective studies	Prospective cross-sectional studies of auto thyroiditis-immune asymptomatic and coronary artery disease.
15	fire on ice	Ice fire.
15	tests of competency to consent to treatment	The consent tests for the treatment.
15	disulfiram toxicity and carbon disulfide poisoning	Toxicity of Disulfiram and Carbon Disulfide Poisoning.
15	adverse effects on offspring of maternal alcohol abuse during pregnancy	It is not possible for a pregnant woman to give birth to a child.
15	estrogen and endometrial carcinoma an independent pathology review supporting original risk estimate	Estrogen and endometrium cancer: independent pathologic examination at baseline; support for follow-up; initial risk assessment.
15	mortality among patients with ankylosing spondylitis not given x ray therapy	Mortality in patients with antherosclerotic spondylitis; antherosclerotic spondylitis that has not been x-rayed.
15	sounding board the pill a perspective for assessing risks and benefits	Probe the pill from a risk/benefit assessment perspective.
15	coffee alcohol and risk of coronary heart disease among japanese men living in hawaii	The risk of coronary artery disease in Japanese men living in Hawaii.
15	policy responses to complex issues the case of black infant mortality	Policy Responses to Complex Questions The Case of Black Infant Mortality.
15	what is meant by the at risk pregnancy	WHAT DOES [respondent]'S HARBOUR?
15	the doctor and the patient in early breast cancer diagnosis	The doctor and patient early diagnosis of breast cancer.
15	anorexia nervosa and gonadal dysgenesis further evidence of a relationship	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
15	the psychological approach in cardiovascular epidemiology	Cardiovascular epidemiology.
15	myocardial function of the chronic hemodialysed patient evaluation by measurement of systolic time intervals	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
15	occupational differences in rates of lung cancer	Occupational differences in lung cancer.
15	exotic diseases ounce of prevention or pound of cure	Exotic diseases prevent or cure book.
15	prophylaxis of myocardial infarction and follow up treatment author s transl	Myocardial infarction and follow-up treatment.
15	epidemiology of diabetes mellitus in riga	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S. and D.A. Dickson.
15	surgical management of unruptured asymptomatic aneurysms	Unruptured asymptomatic aneurysms are surgically managed.
15	legionnaires disease description of an epidemic of pneumonia	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	family structure and the mental health of children concurrent and longitudinal community wide studies	The Family Structure and Mental Health of Children: Concurrent and Longitudinal Studies at the Community Level.
15	analysis of familial factors in bipolar affective illness	Analysis of Family Factors in Bipolar Affective Disease.
15	acute hyperkalemia risks in recipients of kidney graft cooled with collins solution	Acute hyperkalemia in patients receiving apos; a cooled renal transplant with a collin solution.
15	the responsibility to report occupational health risks	Responsibility for Reporting Occupational Health Risks.
15	the occupational determinants of chronic disabling pulmonary disease in rubber workers	Canadian Journal of Occupational Health and Safety, Vol.
15	occurrence of childhood cancers among sibs and estimation of familial risks	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information; Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	study of prenatal des exposure and its consequences in rochester minnesota	Study of Initiation; Prenatal Exposure and Consequences in Rochester, Minnesota.
15	preceding pregnancy loss as an index of risk of stillbirth or neonatal death in the present pregnancy	A person who has been diagnosed as a newborn for at least one year or who has been diagnosed as a newborn.
15	spontaneous premature birth in twin pregnancy	Spontaneous preterm birth in twins.
15	identifying patients at risk for thromboembolism use of 125i labeled fibrinogen in patients with acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction Acute myocardial infarction.
15	the estimation and interpretation of attributable risk in health research	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	exogenous estrogens and endometrial carcinoma review and comments for the clinician	In addition, it should be noted that there is no evidence to support this claim.
15	risk of bladder tumors among benzidine workers and their serum properdin levels	Potential for benzidine workers to develop bladder tumours and their serum levels of propellin.
15	epidemiology of cancer of the testis in upstate new york	Epidemiology of testicular cancer, northern California, New York State.
15	characteristics in youth indicative of adult onset hodgkin s disease	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the development of the disease.
15	lack of acknowledgment in the family rorschachs of families with a child at risk for schizophrenia	The lack of recognition in family rorschachs of children at risk of schizophrenia.
15	pao2 levels and retrolental fibroplasia a report of the cooperative study	The results of this study are shown in the table below.
15	chronic mastopathy and breast cancer a follow up study	Canadian Institute of Health Information.
15	present status of thermography ultrasound and mammography in breast cancer detection	It is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of breast cancer in Canada.
15	do risk factor interventions prevent or reverse arteriosclerosis	What is the impact of interventions on risk factors that prevent-them or reverse-they l' arteriosclerosis?
15	clinical judgement is not sufficient for the management of conduction defects indications for diagnostic electrophysiologic studies	Clinical judgement is not sufficient to manage conductive abnormalities indicated in diagnostic electrophysiological studies.
15	is early revascularization following acute coronary occlusion a safe and effective surgical procedure	Early revascularization following acute occlusion is safe and effective surgery.
15	the rebuck skin window as a guide in cancer chemotherapy	Rebuck the window of the skin as a guide in the field of chemotherapy for cancer.
15	heart disease indicators in patients with aortocoronary bypass operation	Indicators of Cardiac Disease in Patients with CABG.
15	epidemiological features of canine renal neoplasms	Epidemiological Characteristics of Canine Renal Neoplasms.
15	experience with fifty repeat procedures for myocardial revascularization	Fifty repeated procedures of myocardial revascularization.
15	prescribing of tetracycline to children less than 8 years old a two year epidemiologic study among ambulatory tennessee medicaid recipients	A two-year epidemiological study of the use of tetracycline in ambulatory patients of Tennessee Medicaid.
15	benign breast disease and oral contraceptive use	Breast cancer is the most common form of breast cancer.
15	genetic damage from diagnostic radiation	Diagnostic radiation damage.
15	association between oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction a review	The association of oral contraceptives with myocardial infarction has been examined.
15	risk of developing breast cancer determined by mammography	Risk of mammography-induced breast cancer.
15	bacterial endocarditis in patients with pulmonary stenosis aortic stenosis or ventricular septal defect	In patients with pulmonary stenosis, aortic stenosis, or defective ventricular septation.
15	the troms heart study high density lipoprotein and coronary heart disease a prospective case control study	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
15	prenatal diagnosis of hemoglobinopathies a review of 15 cases	Prenatal diagnosis; hemoglobinopathy after examination of 15 cases.
15	juvenile delinquency adult criminality and adult psychiatric treatment an epidemiological study	Juvenile Delinquency Adult Criminality and Psychiatric Treatment of Adults: Epidemiological Study.
15	familial cancer in the general population	Family cancer in general.
15	multiple primary cancers relative risk in new mexico s triethnic population	Relative Risk of Multiple Primary Cancers in the Triethnic New Population-Mexico.
15	multiple primary cancers at memorial hospital 1949 1962	Multiple Primary Cancer in Canada; Memorial Hospital 1942.
15	role of heredity in multiple primary cancer	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	breast cancer in families	Family-acquired breast cancer.
15	second malignant tumors after cancer in childhood	Second malignancy after childhood cancer.
15	multiple primary cancer risk after therapy for hodgkin s disease	Prevalence of diabetes mellitus among women in Canada.
15	a death certificate analysis of nasal cancer among furniture workers in north carolina	An analysis of North Carolina furniture workers' death certificate for nasal cancer.
15	new concepts in prevention and treatment of sunburn	New concepts in Sunburn Prevention and Treatment.
15	new estimates of mortality associated with fertility control	New fertility control mortality estimates.
15	an audit of obstetric care in a university family medicine department and an obstetrics gynecology department	A university department of family medicine and a department of obstetrical gynaecology.
15	on 23 cases of postinfartual interventricular septal rupture s	Out of 23 post-@-@ ventricular interventricular septum ruptures, s.
15	importance of coronarographic evaluation in valvular diseases for correct surgical indication author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
15	a retrospective analysis of the systolic bp iop ratio in glaucoma screening	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	more evidence for the recessive inheritance of selective adult type lactose malabsorption	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted to assess the effects of lactose on reproduction and reproduction.
15	effects of stimulus intensity and stimulus duration during acoustic priming on audiogenic seizures in c57bl 6j mice	Effects of audiogenicity; intensity and duration of stimulus during recovery; acoustic initiation of audiogenicity in c57bl 6d mice.
15	stroke incidence and risk factors	Rates of coronary artery disease in the United States.
15	intensive plasmapheresis as a risk factor for arteriosclerotic cardiovascular disease	Intensive Plasmapheresis as a Risk Factor for Arteriosclerotic Cardiovascular Disease.
15	spinocerebellar ataxia and hla linkage risk prediction by hla typing	Spin-cerebellar ataxia and prediction of the risk of hla-binding by hla-typing.
15	mid trimester abortion by dilatation and evacuation a safe and practical alternative	Mid-term abortion by expansion and evacuation, a convenient and safe alternative.
15	endotracheal intubation and its relationship to bacterial colonization and systemic infection of newborn infants	Endotracheal intubation and its relation to the colonization of bacteria and l' systemic infection of newborns.
15	gallbladder disease as a side effect of drugs influencing lipid metabolism experience in the coronary drug project	In addition to the above, there are a number of other cardiovascular diseases, such as coronary artery disease, coronary artery disease, coronary artery disease, and coronary artery disease.
15	surgical indication author s transl	It's not a good idea.
15	a new variety of hereditary sensory neuropathy	Hereditary sensory neuropathies.
15	results of long term use of a low dose estroprogestatif in diabetics and high risk women	The Canadian Diabetes Surveillance and Epidemiology Network (CHSN) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre initiative.
15	schizophrenia genetic factors	Schizophrenia is a term used to describe genetic factors.
15	possibilities and limitations of air travel	Opportunities and Limits and Limits of Opportunities and Limits of Opportunities; Use of Air are opportunities and limits of opportunity and limits of opportunity; Use of L' Air Travel Air, Opportunities and Limits of Opportunity and Limits of L' Use of L' Air Travel Space, Opportunities and Limits of L' Analysis of Opportunities and Limits of L' Information of Limits of L' Opportunities Together and Limits of Air Travel Space and Limits before and before the Limits of Air.
15	congenital malformations in infants of diabetic mothers	Congenital malformations among infants born to diabetic mothers.
15	estrogens and endometrial carcinoma	Acute endometrial neoplasm.
15	gonorrhea screening program in a women s hospital outpatient department results and analysis of risk factors	Results of Gonorrhea Screening Program in Outpatient Clinic; Women's Hospital and Risk Factor Analysis.
15	epidemiologic treatment of syphilis	Syphilis epidemiological treatment.
15	body height and body mass as determinants of basal blood pressure in children the bogalusa heart study	Body Height and Body Mass as Determinants of Baseline Blood Pressure in Children; Bogalusa Heart Study.
15	tests for homogeneity of effect in an epidemiologic investigation	Tests should be performed at the same time, and should be performed at the same time.
15	prediction of treatment effectiveness in a drug free therapeutic community	In addition, the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) is working with the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) on this issue.
15	pathogenesis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease role of contraception and other risk factors	Pathogenesis of acute pelvic inflammatory disease Role of birth control and other risk factors.
15	mortality experience in relation to a measured arsenic trioxide exposure	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are required to assess the effects of exposure to arsenic.
15	corneal transplantation reaction in avascular keratoconus patients due to hla associated immune aberration against infection a hypothesis	A corneal transplant reaction in patients with avascular keratoconus due to apos; an immune aberration associated with hla against apos; an infection hypothesis.
15	lcoc regional sarcoid reaction sarcoidosis and malignant tumors	Sarcoid response to regional sarcoidosis lcoc and malignant tumours.
15	the association of hl a b8 and childhood celiac disease in an israeli population	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	prospective screening for deep vein thrombosis in high risk patients	Prospective deep vein thrombosis tests in patients at high risk.
15	does intensive prenatal care during childbirth lead to a greater risk of infection	Intensive antenatal care during delivery increases risk of infection.
15	optimal function and health	Optimal functioning & health.
15	are we mobilizing early enough	We're mobilizing early enough to be able to get mobilized early enough.
15	the value of assessing intent in attempted suicide	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence that suicide attempts have been committed.
15	platelet hyperaggregability in young patients with completed stroke	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
15	submaximal treadmill exercise testing of patients with coronary artery disease	Journal of the American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/pubs/index_e.html.
15	risks of mercury poisoning in the dental laboratory	Health Canada, Health Canada and the Canadian Institutes of Health Research.
15	diffusible cholesterol as a risk factor in the biochemical stage of atherosclerosis	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors for the development of cholesterol.
15	salivary gland neoplasms as a late consequence of head and neck irradiation	Late-onset salivary gland neoplasms; radiation to the head and neck.
15	ectopic ossification after total hip arthroplasty predisposing factors frequency and effect on results	Ectopic ossification after total arthroplasty of the hip predisposing factors and the effect on the results.
15	genetic studies in outpatients plasma cholesterol in family and twin studies	Outpatient Genetic Studies of Plasma Cholesterol in the Family and Twinning Studies.
15	national views australia	Australian vistas.
15	perthes disease treated by prolonged recumbency and femoral head containment a long term appraisal	Perths diseases treated by prolonged elongation and confinement of the head of the femoral a long-term evaluation.
15	prediction of the reading and spelling performances of normal and retarded readers a four year follow up	It is important to note, however, that it is not possible to determine the exact number of readings per readership.
15	further investigation on the predictive value of human placental lactogen in high risk pregnancies	In addition, there is a need for additional research on the predictive value of human placental lactogen in high-risk pregnancies.
15	oxytocinase and human placental lactogen for the prediction of intrauterine growth retardation	Ocytocinase and lactogen of the human placenta for the prediction of intra-uterine growth retardation.
15	perinatal addiction outcome and management	Perinatal substance abuse outcomes and management.
15	use of the exercise test in the diagnosis of coronary disease	Use of Dapos test; CHD diagnostic exercise.
15	screening for breast cancer	Breast Cancer screening.
15	the potential of organizations of fee for service physicians for achieving significant decreases in hospitalization	The Potential of Paid Physician Organizations to Achieve Significant Decreases in Hospitalizations.
15	risk factors in mitral valve replacements	Risk Factors for Mitral Valve Replacements.
15	incidence and evaluation of the risk of coronary disease prospective study in paris	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
15	informed consent some newer aspects and their relation to the specialty of radiology	Informed Consent Recent developments and their relationship to the radiology specialty.
15	techniques for assessing teratogenic effects epidemiology	Teratogenic epidemiology.
15	behavioral testing as a method for assessing risk	It is important to understand the nature of the problem.
15	childhood accidents three epidemiological studies on the etiology	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
15	perinatal intracranial hemorrhage incidence and clinical features	Perinatal hemorrhage and clinical characteristics.
15	multistage scoring system for identifying infants at risk of unexpected death	It is important to note, however, that this information is not intended to be used as a basis for decision making.
15	evaluation and management of suicidal behavior	Suicidal behaviour assessment and management.
15	the need demand problem in patients with oro mandibular functional disorders	The Demand Problem in Oro Mandibular Functional Disorders.
15	tests of fibrin metabolism in recurrent venous thromboembolism	Recurrent venous thromboembolism tests for fibrin metabolism.
15	acute myocardial infarction in newark n j a study of racial incidence	Acute myocardial infarction (AMI) in Newark, New Jersey.
15	deep wound sepsis following total hip arthroplasty	Deep sepsis as a result of total hip replacement.
15	epidemiological study of youth suicide comparison between primary suicidals and repeaters	Epidemiological Comparison of Youth Suicide Between Primary Suicides and Recidivists.
15	alcohol consumption among pregnant women and outcome of pregnancy author s transl	Alcohol Use in Pregnant and Pregnant Women.
15	disease physician patient contacts and work disability in a general practice	Contacts with doctors and doctors; incapacity to work in general practice.
15	assessment of myocardial performance and optimal volume loading during elective abdominal aortic aneurysm resection	Aneurysm resection can be performed at the same time as aneurysm resection.
15	a planned approach to coexistent cerebrovascular disease in coronary artery bypass candidates	A Planned Approach to Concomitant Cerebrovascular Disease in CABG Candidates.
15	mutagenicity testing and risk estimation with mammals	Mutagenicity Testing and Risk Assessment in Mammals.
15	carcinogenic mutagenic and teratogenic risks associated with vinyl chloride	Mutagenic and teratogenic effects of vinyl chloride.
15	practical evaluation of mutagenicity data in mammals for estimating human risk	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	metabolic studies and the evaluation of genetic risk from the viewpoint of industrial toxicology	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
15	parental focus of attention in a videotape feedback task as a function of hypothesized risk for offspring schizophrenia	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the case that the child's parents are more likely to be involved in the project.
15	physiologic reactions to social challenge in persons evidencing the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Physiological responses to social challenges in coronary heart disease-prone behaviour.
15	influenza infections during pregnancy in the mouse	Mouse Influenza Infections During Pregnancy.
15	extraocular muscle surgery in the presence of complete paralysis of the fifth sixth and seventh cranial nerves	Extraocular muscular surgery in the presence of 5th and 7th cervical nerves.
15	the contribution of genetics to biological psychiatry	The Contribution of Genetics to the Field of Biological Psychiatry.
15	the natural course of coronary heart disease	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	early onset of oral cancer among women who drink and smoke	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	nocturnal asthma and sudden death	Nocturnal asthma and death.
15	the effect of high level sound exposure on the loudness difference limen	L' effect; high noise level; noise difference noise exposure.
15	neurofibromatosis a neoplastic birth defect with two age peaks of severe problems	Neurofibromatosis, neoplastic malformation at birth, two peaks of apos; age of serious problems.
15	controlled trial of bicarbonate therapy in high risk premature newborn infants	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
15	determination of the importance of environmental factors in human cancer the role of epidemiology	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	environmental health education a different orientation	L' education; hygiene; environment is different.
15	alcohol and the fetus	L' fetal alcohol.
15	treatment of borderline diabetes controlled trial using carbohydrate restriction and phenformin	Treatment of Loin; Diabetes Limit Control Trial Using Glucidic Restriction and Phenformin.
15	practical utilization of a hazard catalogue for the early detection of pre and dysmaturity	Practical use of apos; a catalogue of hazards for early pre- and dysmaturation.
15	risk factors for lung cancer in singapore chinese a population with high female incidence rates	Lung cancer risk factors among Chinese in Singapore, a high-incidence population for women.
15	relationship between steroid excretion patterns and breast cancer incidence in israeli women of various origins	The incidence of breast cancer in women israeli of various origins, and the incidence of breast cancer in women.
15	non accidental childhood injury presenting at a hospital casualty department	Injuries and injuries to children, including injuries to children and children.
15	the prevention of prematurity	Preterm birth prevention.
15	results in the management of pregnancies involving risk factors	Results of managing risk-adjusted pregnancies.
15	lead absorption in a community of potters in barbados	L' absorption of lead into a fish-eating community.
15	hyperdynamic beta adrenergic circulatory state a case report	Beta-Adrenergic Circulatory State-hyperdynamic adrenergic.
15	primary immunisation and febrile convulsions in oxford 1972 5	Primary Vaccination and Febrile Convulsions at Oxford 1972 5.
15	cancer in asbestos mining and other areas of quebec	It is not possible to determine the cause of the cancer.
15	material and thickness the important factors in the impact resistance of spectacle lenses	Materials and thickness are important factors in eyeglass lens impact resistance.
15	risks of discontinuing anticoagulant therapy in a selected group of patients with atherosclerotic heart disease a prospective study	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors associated with the use of anti-coagulant therapy.
15	pregnancy in renal transplant recipients report of two successful pregnancies in a patient with impaired renal function	Two successful pregnancies have been reported in a kidney transplant patient with impaired renal function.
15	liver toxicity after acetaminophen ingestion inadequacy of the dose estimate as an index of risk	Hepatic toxicity following ingestion of acetaminophen Insufficient dosage as risk index.
15	high school contact among persons with leukemia and lymphoma	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the health status of Canadians.
15	regular drug use and cancer	She's a regular user of drugs and cancer.
15	lung cancer risk among beauticians and other female workers brief communication	Risk of Lung Cancer in Beauty Practitioners and Other Female Workers Brief communication is required.
15	the identification of individuals at high risk for large bowel cancer an overview	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it is important to note that this is not the case.
15	early detection of colonic neoplasia in patients at high risk	Early detection of neoplasia in high-risk patients.
15	ski injuries	Ski injuries.
15	cancer of the esophagus in southern iran	Cancer de l'apos; esophagus in Iran.
15	phase ii study of oral methyl ccnu and prednisone in previously treated alkylating agent resistant multiple myeloma	Phase II oral ccnu methyl and prednisone in a previously treated apos-resistant multiple myeloma; alkylation.
15	subcellular distribution a factor in risk evaluation of pentachlorophenol	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on human health.
15	surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma in the elderly clinical considerations on a group of patients undergoing major surgical destruction	Surgical treatment of gastric carcinoma in the elderly, clinical considerations for a group of patients who are undergoing a major type of surgical destruction.
15	precordial mapping in acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction.
15	bowel transit time and stool weight in populations with different colon cancer risks	Bowel transit times and stool weights in populations at varying risk of colon cancer.
15	unilateral breast feeding and breast cancer	Women are more likely to be breastfeeding than men.
15	alcohol consumption cardiovascular risk factors and mortality in two chicago epidemiologic studies	Cardiovascular disease is a major cause of death among women in the United States.
15	cancer experience among coke by product workers	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
15	cancer mortality among rubber workers an epidemiologic study	Rubber Workers' Cancer Mortality, Epidemiological Study.
15	case study 1 asbestos the tlv approach	It's a good idea to do it in a way that's easy to do.
15	respiratory disease mortality among uranium miners	The number of deaths per 1,000 population.
15	immunotherapy of chronic myelocytic leukemia effects of different vaccination schedules	Chronic myelocytic leukemia is immunized according to different schedules.
15	unstable angina comparison of medical and surgical management	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the risk of heart disease and stroke.
15	a nurse rehabilitator s impact on patients with myocardial infarction	Cardiovascular System (CPSS): a multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted, multi-faceted program.
15	clinically silent pericardial effusions in patients on long term hemodialysis pericardial effusions in hemodialysis	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
15	artificial sweeteners and human bladder cancer	Artificial sweeteners and cancer of the human bladder.
15	correlation between leucocyte migration inhibition by breast cancer antigens mammographic findings and other breast cancer risk factors	The association between the inhibition of leukocyte migration by breast cancer antigens, the results of mammography and other risk factors for the development of breast cancer.
15	identification of sudden death risk factors in acute and chronic coronary artery disease	Identification of Risk Factors for Sudden Death in Acute and Chronic CAD.
15	patients admitted to the coronary care unit for chest pain high risk subgroup for subsequent cardiovascular death	Patients admitted to coronary care unit for chest pain under-high risk group for subsequent cardiovascular death.
15	noninvasive predictors of sudden cardiac death in men with coronary heart disease predictive value of maximal stress testing	Journal of Infectious Diseases, 3rd edition.
15	biologic and psychosocial risk factors of sudden death from coronary disease in white women	Journal of the American Medical Association.
15	gastrointestinal hemorrhage in patients in a respiratory intensive care unit	Gastro haemorrhage-intestinal in patients d' intensive respiratory unit.
15	ethical issues in investigation of screening strategies	The issues of ethics within the framework of the apos; investigation of the apos; study of the apos; impact of the screening strategies of the screening strategies of the apos; other end of the apos; shade of the apos; other end of the apos; shade of the apos; before the apos; before the apos; before the apos; other end of the apos; at the end of the apos; before the apos; before the other end of the apos; before the apos; before the apos.
15	estimation of risks due to environmental carcinogenesis	Risk Assessment for Environmental Carcinogenesis.
15	breast cancer and fertility trends in canada	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	the rising frequency of hysterectomy its effect on uterine cancer rates	In addition, there is an increase in the incidence of cervical cancer and a decrease in the incidence of cervical cancer.
15	bias due to misclassification in the estimation of relative risk	It is important to note, however, that this is not the case.
15	high density lipoprotein as a protective factor against coronary heart disease the framingham study	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system.
15	cellular immune responses in familial medullary thyroid carcinoma	Dietary Reference Intakes: a prospective study.
15	decision analysis to evaluate lymphangiography in the management of patients with hodgkin s disease	Decision Analysis to Evaluate Lymphangiography in the Management of Hodgkin's Disease.
15	low gynecologic an obstetric risk factor	Low gynaecological rate, a risk factor for obstetrics.
15	aphakic retinal detachment as a function of the technic and course of cataract extraction	Aphakic retina detachment according to technique and stroke rate; cataract extraction.
15	changes in menstrual cycle length and regularity after use of oral contraceptives	It is important to remember that a woman's menstrual cycle is the same as her menstrual cycle.
15	coffee and health	Coffee, good health.
15	social risk factors for rheumatoid arthritis epidemiologic social medical study	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	is epa s radium 226 drinking water standard justified	Epa s radium 226 for drinking water is-justified?
15	hospitalization for laparoscopy the exception rather than the rule	It is important to note that this does not mean that patients are not admitted to the hospital.
15	acute leukemia after alkylating agent therapy of ovarian cancer	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	recommendations for a national policy on poliomyelitis vaccination	National Polio Immunization Policy Recommendations.
15	the relationship of childhood respiratory illness to adult obstructive airway disease	Influenza A, B, C, C, C. Influenza A. Influenza B and C. Influenza B and C. Influenza B.
15	use of the smooth teflon clip to prevent pulmonary embolism in the postoperative period	Use of the clip in a smooth teflon to prevent lung embolism during the postoperative period.
15	factors influencing contraceptive behavior of single college students	Factors that Influence Contraceptive Behaviour of Unmarried University Students.
15	survival in traumatic transverse myelitis	Surviving transverse, traumatic myelitis.
15	multifactorial index of cardiac risk in noncardiac surgical procedures	A multi-factorial index of the risk of heart disease in non-cardiac surgical procedures.
15	laboratory acquired rocky mountain spotted fever the hazard of aerosol transmission	The laboratory has contracted Rocky Mountain purple fever, a risk of transmission by aerosol.
15	genetics of juvenile diabetes mellitus a recessive gene closely linked to hla d and with 50 per cent penetrance	Juvenile diabetes mellitus genetics is a recessive gene that has a 50 percent penetrance and is closely linked to hla d.
15	evidence favoring the use of anticoagulants in the hospital phase of acute myocardial infarction	Acute myocardial infarction: evidence in support of apo; use of anticoagulants in hospital phase of myocardial infarction.
15	amniotic fluid neutrophils prior to cesarean section and intrauterine infection	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the risk of infection.
15	a formula for selective lymphadenectomy its application to cancer of the vulva	Selective lymphadenectomy for vulvar cancer.
15	abnormal fetal growth patterns ultrasonic diagnosis and management	Diagnosing and managing abnormal ultrasonic fetal growth.
15	endometrial cancer after menopausal use of estrogens	Lapular cancer; endometrium after apo; menopausal estrogen use.
15	atherosclerosis a major cause of peripheral vascular disease	L' atherosclerosis is a major cause of the peripheral vascular disease.
15	exacerbation of diabetic renal failure following intravenous pyelography	L'apos; exacerbation of the apos; intravenous pyelogram diabetic renal failure.
15	development of drug therapy for children	Drug development; paediatric drug therapy.
15	a practical classification of the risk factor in restorative surgery of the fallopian tube	A practical classification of risk factors in reconstructive fallopian tubal surgery.
15	long term safety and use effectiveness of intrauterine devices	Long-term and effective use of intra-uterine devices.
15	risk for short arm 10 trisomy a segregation analysis of eleven families with different translocations	Segregation analysis of 11 families with different translocations.
15	family planning and the primary care physician	Family planning and primary care.
15	the risk of advanced heart block in surgical patients with right bundle branch block and left axis deviation	An advanced cardiac block risk in surgical patients with a branch block of the right bundle and a deviation from the left axis.
15	relationships among ventricular arrhythmias coronary artery disease and angiographic and electrocardiographic indicators of myocardial fibrosis	Relationships between Ventricular Arrhythmias, Coronary Arteries and Angiographic and Electrocardiographic Indicators of Myocardial Fibrosis.
15	effect of coronary bypass surgery on longevity in high and low risk patients report from the v a cooperative coronary surgery study	It is important to note that there is no evidence that coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) is a risk factor for coronary artery bypass graft (CABG) infection.
15	a fever index evaluation of chloramphenicol or clindamycin in patients with serious pelvic infections	Chloramphenicol fever or clindamycin index in patients with severe pelvic infections.
15	cesarean section and maternal mortality in rhode island incidence and risk factors 1965 1975	Incidence of Island Rhodes and Risk Factors 1965 @-@1975.
15	sustained attention in children at risk for schizophrenia report on a continuous performance test	Continued attention to children at risk of developing schizophrenia is indicated in a report on an ongoing performance test.
15	retinal detachment following congenital cataract surgery	Retinal detachment after congenital cataract.
15	lens implantation surgery in the second eye	Dapos surgery; second eye lens implantation.
15	results of primary and secondary implants using choyce mark viii lenses	The implant should be of the same quality as that of the original implant.
15	adenocarcinoma in regional enteritis of the small intestine	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	orbital expansion for anophthalmia and micro orbitism	Anophthalmia and microorbitism orbital expansion.
15	patterns of breast parenchyma on mammography	Mammographic parenchyma.
15	prevention of heart disease in the asymptomatic post infarction patient	Prevention of Heart Disease in Asymptomatic Patients with Infarction.
15	caregiver child interactions and the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	It is important to remember that a person's behaviour is not a risk factor for heart disease.
15	coronary risk factors in flying personnel a progress report	Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coron Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coronary Coron Coron Coron Coronary Coron Coron Coron
15	prevention of heart disease in the young coronary candidate	Heart disease prevention in young CHD candidate.
15	gonorrhea screening in family planning clinics when should it become selctive	At family planning clinics, when screening for gonorrhoea should be done @-@, it should become an auto-test administered?
15	cholesterol and dna content in arterial tissue in severe obesity their relation to some risk factors for ischaemic heart disease	In addition, the risk factors for coronary artery disease are the risk factors for coronary heart disease and the risk factors for coronary artery disease.
15	notes on experiments with drugs in psychiatry	It's a very important thing to do, but it's a very important thing.
15	workload and risk of myocardial infarction a prospective psychosocial analysis	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
15	cardiovascular risk factors among japanese and american telephone executives	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	a competing risk model based on the life table procedure in epidemiological studies	A Competing Risk Model Based on the Life Table Procedure in Epidemiological Studies.
15	the incidence and characteristics of acute myeloid leukaemia arising in hodgkin s disease	Acute myeloid leukemia (AML) is a disease that occurs in humans and humans.
15	importance of glycosuria in pregnant women as a risk factor in relation to diabetes mellitus	The risk of diabetes mellitus is greatest in women who are pregnant, and the risk of diabetes mellitus is greatest in women who are pregnant.
15	a new endoprosthesis for nonoperative intubation of the biliary tract in malignant obstructive jaundice	A new endoprosthesis for the non-operative intubation of the bile tract in the jaundice of malignant obstructive jaundice.
15	evaluation of a serologic test for gonorrhea in a low risk female population	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the prevalence of gonorrhoea.
15	hla islet cell antibodies and types of diabetes mellitus	Islet antibody and diabetes mellitus type.
15	side effects of antihemophilic concentrates	Antimicrobial Resistance to Hemophilia.
15	postoperative wound infection rates	Post-operative infection.
15	risk factors of breast cancer in finland	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	mortality risk associated with the use of oral contraceptives	The risk of death associated with oral contraceptive use is high.
15	therapy for cholelithiasis	Cholelithiasis therapy.
15	single dose intra incisional antibiotic prophylaxis of surgical wound sepsis a controlled trial of cephaloridine and ampicillin	Intravenous antibiotic prophylaxis-single-dose surgical sepsis incision, cephaloridine and d&apos controlled trial; ampicillin.
15	donor pretreatment in cadaver renal transplantation	In addition to the above, there are a number of other treatments that can be used to treat organ failure.
15	effects of a health screening on mortality and causes of death in middle aged men a prospective study from 1970 to 1974 of mean in malm born 1914	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States, Canada, the United States, the United States, and the United States.
15	measures for the prevention of incidents in ambulatory dental surgery	Ambulatory Dental Surgery Incident Prevention Measures.
15	complete surgical correction of congenital cardiopathies in infants	Complete Surgical Correction of Congenital Heart Disease in Infants.
15	some issues in research on stressful life events	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
15	dentofacial orthopedics and morphopsychology	Dento-facial and morphopsychology.
15	androgen and estrogen formation in women with ovarian hyperthecosis	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the risk factors for ovarian cancer.
15	amniotic fluid analysis its role in maternal neonatal infection	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
15	inidcations for prenatal diagnosis in relatives of patients with neural tube defects	Injury to the cervical mucocutaneous mucocutral septum: a prospective study.
15	induction of labor in the high risk pregnancy with pgf 2 alpha	Induction of work during high-risk pregnancy using pgf 2 alpha.
15	on conservative estimates of radiation hazards	On conservative radiation hazard estimates.
15	carcinogenic risk assessment	Carcinogenic Risk Assessment.
15	infection surveillance identifying the problems and the high risk patient	An infection that can cause serious illness or death.
15	principles and tasks of biochemical research at centers participating in the accomplishment of the national program for the control of cardiovascular diseases	Principles and Tasks of Biochemical Research in Centers Participating in the National Cardiovascular Disease Control Program.
15	exogenous hormones reproductive history and breast cancer	Exogenous Hormones Reproductive history, and breast cancer.
15	dentition diet tobacco and alcohol in the epidemiology of oral cancer	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	studies on herediatary spherocytosis in iceland	Studies of Icelandic hereditary spherocytosis.
15	preoperative bowel preparation in urologic surgery	Pre-operative prep for urological surgery.
15	lecithin sphingomyelin ratio in amniotic fluid and its value for the prediction of neonatal respiratory distress syndrome in pregnant diabetic women	Lecithin ratio-sphingomyelin in the amniotic fluid and its value in predicting neonatal respiratory distress syndrome (NRS) in pregnant diabetic women.
15	the incidence of macular pucker after retinal detachment surgery	L' macular pleat incidence after detached retina.
15	evaluation of the risk of postoperative pulmonary complications	Risk Assessment for Post-operative Pulmonary Complications.
15	coffee consumption and coronary heart disease in middle aged swedish men	The average age of women in Sweden is 5 years, while the average age of women is 5 years.
15	calculation of the size of the population group necessary for evaluation of the results of measures for the prevention of cardiovascular diseases on the example of the kaunas survey	It is important to note that there are no data on the number of people who have been diagnosed with a heart attack, and that the number of people who have had heart attacks is small.
15	participation of the population in mass screening and the role of complete population surveillance for detection of the disease studied from the experience of the methodical measures for the prevention of ischemic heart disease in kaunas	Population participation in mass screening and role of population-based comprehensive surveillance in disease detection from apo; experience with methodological measures for prevention of ischemic heart disease in kaunas.
15	organization of collecting and analysis of the data on nutrition in epidemiological study of cardiovascular diseases	Organizing collection and reporting; nutritional data analysis; cardiovascular disease epidemiological study.
15	population surveillance and its importance in the study of the effectiveness of primary and secondary prevention of ischemic heart disease among the population	It is important to note that there are no data available on the prevalence of coronary heart disease in the Canadian population.
15	ergometry and the risk factors in ischemic heart disease	Ergometry and Risk Factors for Ichemic Heart Disease.
15	asymptomatic coronary artery disease and coronary bypass surgery	Asymptomatic coronary bypass and surgical bypass.
15	dietary and serum lipids in the multifactorial etiology of atherosclerosis	Dietary and serum lipids; multifactorial etiology of apos; atherosclerosis.
15	testing the lipid hypothesis clinical trials	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
15	angina pectoris and middle aged man	Average age.
15	the tromso heart study risk factors for coronary heart disease related to the occurrence of myocardial infarction in first degree relatives	Journal of the American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition, 3rd edition. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/index.html.
15	risk factors in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease copd	Canadian Journal of Public Health, 8(2), pp. 1–23.
15	determination of significant relative risks and optimal sampling procedures in prospective and retrospective comparative studies of various sizes	Determination of significant relative risks and procedures; optimal sampling within the framework of a series of comparative prospective and retrospective studies of various sizes.
15	prader willi syndrome variable severity and recurrence risk	Prader willi syndrome varies in severity and in risk of recurrence.
15	the identification of infants at risk of malnutrition in kingston jamaica	Identification of malnourished infants in Kingston Jamaica.
15	growth profile of preschool children from an urban low socio economic community in india	It is important to note that the majority of the children are of the same age as the rest of the population.
15	cholesterol in preteen children of parents with premature coronary disease	Dietary Reference Intakes, D.C. and D.A. Dietary Reference Intakes.
15	screening in family medicine the current situation	Family Medicine Screening Program The Current Situation.
15	clinical application of high risk scoring on an obstetric service	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
15	home observation for measurement of the environment a validation study of screening efficiency	Home monitoring for apo measurement; environment, apo validation study; filtration efficiency.
15	reproductive counseling in patients who have had a spontaneous abortion	Reproductive counselling for post-abortion patients.
15	the use of delayed primary wound closure in preventing wound infections	Lapses; use delayed primary healing to prevent injury; wound infections.
15	the effects of moderate alcohol consumption during pregnancy on fetal growth and morphogenesis	The effects of alcohol on the growth and morphogenesis of the fetus during pregnancy.
15	problems in follow up studies	There is a need for follow-up studies to be carried out at the national level.
15	iron burden in sickle cell anemia	Sickle cell count.
15	are breast patterns a risk index for breast cancer a reappraisal	Breast profiles are an index of breast cancer risk.
15	toxocara infection in animal hospital employees	Toxocara infection among staff at animal hospitals.
15	hydatid disease in new zealand an epidemiological study of transmission among maoris	Mäori and Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori Mäori.
15	indications and guidelines for mammographic examinations	Guidelines for the conduct of mammography examinations.
15	preoperative intra aortic balloon assist in high risk revascularization patients	Preoperative aortic intra-@ balloons help patients at high revascularization risk.
15	lung cancer among black migrants interaction of host and occupational environment factors	Lung cancer in black migrants: interaction of the host and factors of the occupational environment.
15	prevention of complications of histamine liberation occurring after administration of anesthetic agents and adjuvants	Prevention of post-apo release complications; histamine; administration of drugs; anesthetics and additives.
15	factors favoring anaphylactic reactions to general anesthetics	Factors that promote anaphylactic response to general anesthetics.
15	symposium on intensive care 2 infection control in the surgical intensive care unit	Prevalence and risk factors for cervical cancer.
15	detection and dispensary care of groups of persons at increased risk of bronchogenic cancer disease in czechoslovakia	Clinic screening and care for groups of people at increased risk of developing bronchogenic cancer in Czechoslovakia.
15	assessment of the danger of bronchological studies under polyclinic conditions	Polyclinical bronchological hazard assessment.
15	coronary risk factor reduction through biofeedback aided relaxation and meditation	The reduction of coronary risk factor by the use of biofeedback has facilitated relaxation and meditation.
15	toward classifying psychoactive chemical use	It is important to note that the use of psychoactive chemicals does not affect the classification of substances.
15	successful chemoprophylaxis for pneumocystis carinii pneumonitis	Successful pneumocystis carinii pneumoprophylaxis.
15	risk of coeliac disease in children of patients and effect of hla genotype	Risk of CD in patients' children and hla genotype effect.
15	antituberculous therapy in pregnancy risks to the fetus	There are fetal risks associated with anti-tuberculosis treatment during pregnancy.
15	right coronary endarterectomy a procedure with increased risk of perioperative infarction	In addition, it may be necessary for the patient to have a perioperative infarction or to have a perioperative infarction.
15	breast neoplasms in women treated with x rays for acute postpartum mastitis	Breast Neoplasms in Women Treated by X-ray for Acute Mastitis Post-Partum.
15	oral contraceptives and nonfatal myocardial infarction	Oral contractives and non-fatal myocardial infarction.
15	noncontraceptive estrogens and nonfatal myocardial infarction	Non-contraceptive and non-fatal myocardial infarction.
15	treatment of common dog bites infection risk factors	It's a good way to treat a dog's common bite.
15	children at risk performance of three year olds and their mentally ill and well mothers on an interaction task	Children and their families are at risk because they are at risk of becoming infected with the disease.
15	significance of fatty tissue hypertrophy for the metabolic risk	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
15	female adolescent drinking behavior potential hazards	Alcohol Use in Adolescents: Potential Risks.
15	the natural history of calcium urolithiasis	L' Natural History of L' Calcium Urology.
15	estrogen treatment of postmenopausal women benefits and risks	Estrogenic treatment for post-menopausal women presents advantages and risks.
15	hla and chronic active hepatitis	Chronic active hepatitis.
15	influence of height weight and obesity on risk of breast cancer in an unselected swedish population	L'apos; influence of height, weight and weight on breast cancer risk in unselected population in Sweden.
15	normal serum cholesterol but low h d l cholesterol concentration in young patients with ischaemic cerebrovascular disease	Normal serum cholesterol but low cholesterol levels in young cerebrovascular ischemic patients.
15	safety of cimetidine	Cimetidine safety.
15	incidence of skin carcinoma after renal transplantation	Injury is usually caused by a combination of the two.
15	sequential evaluation of the supine hypertension or roll over test in a high risk population	In addition to the above, the risk factors are also considered in the risk assessment.
15	the early risk of re replacement of aortic valves	Early replacement risk for aortic valves.
15	selective screening for cervical cancer experience of the finnish mass screening system	The number of cases of cervical cancer in Finland is estimated to be about 40,000 per year.
15	the hazard of old lead mines in wales	The danger of former lead mining in Wales.
15	the harlem regional stroke program an overview	The Harlem Regional Stroke Program provides an overview.
15	thyroid disease following irradiation for benign conditions	Thyroid disease as a result of apos; radiation under mild conditions.
15	translumbar aortography a study of its safety and usefulness	Translumbar aortography: safety and utility.
15	soft tissue fluid determination by dichromatic absorptiometry	Determination of Soft Tissue Fluid by Dichromatic Absorption.
15	the extracapsular cataract extraction without phacoemulsification	L' removal of non-phaco-emulsification extracapsular cataract.
15	photocoagulation treatment of proliferative diabetic retinopathy the second report of diabetic retinopathy study findings	Photocoagulation therapy for proliferative diabetic retinopathy is the second report on diabetic retinopathy.
15	epidemiology of hodgkin s disease in the young	Hodgkin Disease Epidemiology in Youth.
15	histocompatibility leukocyte antigen patterns in nasopharyngeal carcinoma cases from california	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch.
15	psychological factors in failure to wear the milwaukee brace for treatment of idiopathic scoliosis	Psychological factors for the treatment of idiopathic scoliosis.
15	the intermediate coronary care unit a stage in continued coronary care	It is important to remember that the heart is the most important part of the heart.
15	an assessment of community suicide risk	Community Suicide Risk Assessment.
15	religiosity and self destructive crises in the institutionalized elderly	In addition, there are a number of issues related to the treatment of older persons.
15	attempted suicides 35 years afterward	Thirty-five years later, suicide attempts.
15	estimation of suicide risk by the use of clinical models	It is important to note that there are no data available on the risk of suicide in Canada.
15	abo blood groups and chicken pox in an indian population	Abo and varicella blood type in the Indian population.
15	electrocardiographic response to intravenous urography prospective evaluation of 275 patients	Canadian Journal of Public Health 1989; 29(3): 65–79.
15	further comments on novel schedule tlvs	D' and other comments on the new tlvs schedule.
15	symptomatic myocardial infarction without chest pain prevalence and clinical course	Symptomatic myocardial infarction, with no prevalences of chest pain and clinical development.
15	influence of etiology of atrial fibrillation on incidence of systemic embolism	Influence of atrial fibrillation; etiology of the atrial fibrillation on the apos; incidence of the apos; systemic embolism.
15	provocative testing for coronary arterial spasm rationale risk and clinical illustrations	Coronary spasms risk challenge tests and clinical illustrations.
15	treatment of chronic stable angina a preliminary report of survival data of the randomized veterans administration cooperative study	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the risk of cervical cancer, including the risk of cervical cancer.
15	abnormal regulation of ventilation in infants at risk for sudden infant death syndrome	Abnormal Regulation of Ventilation in Infants at Risk of SIDS.
15	smoking a risk factor for spontaneous abortion	It is also important to remember that smoking is a risk factor for miscarriages.
15	lassa fever response to an imported case	Imported case of Lassa fever.
15	the aetiology of acute pulmonary embolism and the identification of high risk groups	Acute pulmonary embolism and ulcers; identification of high-risk groups.
15	coronary risk factors in various occupational groups the oslo study	For example, a person who has been diagnosed with a heart attack may be at risk for heart disease.
15	stress effects on affiliation preferences among subjects possessing the type a coronary prone behavior pattern	Effects of stress on coronary preference; affiliation in subjects with coronary-type predisposition patterns.
15	lung cancer in coastal georgia a death certificate analysis of occupation brief communication	Lung Cancer in the Coastal Zone Georgia an analysis of death certificate of l' brief communication occupation.
15	detection of presymptomatic carriers of huntington s chorea	Huntington's chorea presymptomatic carrier detection.
15	febrile convulsions followed by nonfebrile convulsions a clinical electroencephalographic and follow up study	Clinical electroencephalographic study and follow-up study.
15	gram negative endocarditis following cystoscopy	Endocarditis as a result of a cystoscopy.
15	imported diseases an assessment of trends	Imported Diseases Trend Assessment.
15	diet and cancer of endocrine target organs	Endocrine Nutrition and Target Organ Cancer.
15	the high risk perinatal registry a systematic approach for reducing perinatal mortality	The Registry of High-Risk Perinatal Births is a systematic approach to reducing the number of perinatal deaths.
15	emergency decision making a theoretical analysis of responses to disaster warnings	It is important to understand the nature of the hazard and the nature of the hazard.
15	precursor lesions in familial melanoma a new genetic preneoplastic syndrome	The precursor lesions of familial melanoma are a novel genetic pre-neoplastic syndrome.
15	pregnancy and delivery among immigrants	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry.
15	changing patterns and mortality of acute myocardial infarction in a coronary care unit	Changeable conditions and stroke mortality; acute coronary infarction.
15	autopsy study of unoperated abdominal aortic aneurysms the case for early resection	Acute gastrointestinal abnormalities; unprotected abdominal aortic aneurysms, justifying early resection.
15	incidence and mortality of perioperative myocardial infarction in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass grafting	Incidence and mortality of perioperative myocardial infarction in coronary artery bypass graft patients.
15	ischemic heart disease in a group of men 35 to 44 engaged in stressful mental work data from the 1st examination	Journal of the American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition, 3rd edition. http://www.phac-aspc.gc.ca/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
15	selection of groups of the male population 40 to 49 with risk factors for conducting primary prophylaxis of ischemic heart disease	It is important to note, however, that the risk factors for the development of coronary heart disease are not the same as those for the prevention of coronary heart disease.
15	medullary carcinoma of the thyroid gland in norway serum calcitonin in 300 relatives of 43 patients	Thyroid medullary carcinoma in serum norway calcitonin (NOR) in 300 parents of 43 patients.
15	risk and complications in peritoneoscopy	Risk of peritoneoscopic complications.
15	hla b27 in ankylosing spondylitis differences in frequency and relative risk in american blacks and caucasians	A comparison of the results of a randomized controlled trial with the results of a randomized controlled trial.
15	how can the largest possible number of people be reached by a prophylaxis program in a country with a scattered population	How can-reach as many people as possible through prophylaxis in a geographically dispersed country?
15	concomitants of atherosclerotic carotid artery stenosis	Stenosis of the apos; concomitant carotid atherosclerotic artery.
15	menstrual regulation the method and the issues competing risks of unnecessary procedures and complications	Regulate method rules and concurrent risk issues; unnecessary interventions and complications.
15	a simplified antepartum high risk pregnancy scoring form statistical analysis of 5459 cases	It is important to note, however, that there are no data available on the incidence of high-risk pregnancies before birth.
15	adriamycin cardiomyopathy risk factors	Adriamycin Cardiomyopathy: Risk Factors.
15	forecasting the development of primary hepatocellular carcinoma by the use of risk factors studies in west africa	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors, such as diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes and other chronic diseases.
15	induction of labour	Induction-d' work.
15	fatalities in 2 070 psychiatric outpatients	Deaths among 2,070 psychiatric patients.
15	coronary artery surgery in south australia 1970 1976	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
15	neoplasms of the large bowel following ureterosigmoidostomy	Large bowel neoplasms following ureterosigmoidostomy.
15	evaluation of nephrotoxic and ototoxic effects of tobramycin in worldwide study	Evaluation of Nephrotoxic and Ototoxic Effects of Tobramycin in a worldwide study.
15	follow up of survivors of childhood cancer	Childhood cancer survivor tracking.
15	epidemiology of vaginal adenosis and adenocarcinoma associated with exposure to stilbestrol in utero	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	oral contraceptives and breast neoplasia	Oral contraceptives with breast neoplasia.
15	dose response evaluation of adriamycin in human neoplasia	Dose assessment-response of l' human neoplastic adriamycin.
15	assessment of behavioral risk for coronary disease by voice characteristics	Behavioural risk assessment for voice-related coronary heart disease.
15	uterine cancer and estrogen therapy	Cancer of the uterus and of estrogen.
15	vascular complications of long term oestrogen therapy	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	relative risks of saccharin and calorie ingestion	In addition, it is not recommended that the product be used in a controlled manner.
15	preoperative oral antacid therapy for patients requiring emergency surgery	Pre-operative oral anti-acid treatment for patients who require surgical intervention; emergency.
15	fecal bile acids and cholesterol metabolites of patients with ulcerative colitis a high risk group for development of colon cancer	Fecal bile acids and cholesterol metabolites in patients with ulcerative colitis constitute a high-risk group for colon cancer.
15	adjuvant chemotherapy and immunotherapy in high risk patients with melanoma	Chemotherapy and adjuvant immunotherapy for high-risk patients with melanoma.
15	mortality from pneumonia and risk conditions during influenza epidemics high influenza morbidity during nonepidemic years	Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Disease Infectious Disease Infectious Disease Infectious Disease Infectious Disease 1.
15	the spectrum of vitamin k deficiency	Vitamin K deficiency spectrum.
15	cooperative study of hospital frequency and character of transient ischemic attacks iii variations in treatment	Co-operative Study of Hospital Prevalence and Nature of Transient Ischemic Attacks iii Changes in Treatment.
15	distribution of various coronary risk factors in an urban general practice	Journal of the American Psychiatric Association.
15	the clinical significance of the risk factor hyperlipoproteinemia study on 2700 patients	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk factors.
15	ischaemic heart disease in the elderly	Seniors with ischemic heart disease.
15	spontaneous abortion and the use of sugar substitutes saccharin	Spontaneous abortion and sedation; sugar substitutes replace saccharin.
15	the pattern of food and mortality in belgium	Food structure and belgium mortality.
15	community education for cardiovascular health	Cardiovascular Education in the Community.
15	port moresby infant feeding survey	Port moresby, baby food survey, baby food survey.
15	survey of serum lipid levels in icelandic men aged 34 61 years an epidemiological and statistical evaluation	A survey of the serum lipid levels among Icelandic men aged 34-61, epidemiological and statistical evaluation.
15	possibilities of error in eeg in sleep and consciousness electroencephalographic observations in 153 children	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may influence sleepiness and consciousness in children.
15	home testing for recurrent bacteriuria using nitrite strips	Tests in the home for the detection of recurrent bacteriuria; help from the nitrite strips.
15	massive colonic diverticular hemorrhage in a transplant patient	Massive diverticular colonic hemorrhage in transplant.
15	management of household contacts of leprosy patients	Family contact management for leprosy patients.
15	life threatening surgical infection its development and prediction	Life-threatening surgical infection, development, and prediction.
15	relation between the race and economic status of patients and who performs their surgery	The relationship between race and the economic status of the patient(s) and who performs the surgery.
15	estrogen use and cancer of the uterine corpus in alberta	Canadian Institute for Health Information; Canadian Institute for Health Information.
15	high risk breast tumor patients	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre study.
15	risk factors and angiographically determined coronary occlusion	Cardiovascular disease in Canada and the United States.
15	fecal constituents of a high risk north american and a low risk finnish population for the development of large bowel cancer	The faecal components of diabetes; a high-risk, high-risk, high-risk North American population; a low-risk Finnish developmental population; large intestine cancer.
15	neonatal resuscitation	Natal resuscitation.
15	estimation of relative risk from matched pairs in epidemiologic research	Relative Risk Assessment of Pairs Matched in Epidemiological Research.
15	stress and workload in pilots	Stress and driver workload.
15	risk factors associated with post cesarean section febrile morbidity	Risk Factors Associated with Febrile Morbidity Post-Cesarean section.
15	obstetrics in cuba 1974	Cuban obstetrics, 1974.
15	how old people tolerate intracranial surgery for aneurysm	How the elderly tolerate intra-cranial surgery for the cervical aneurysm.
15	a case control study of regular aspirin use and coronary deaths	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
15	pre cancers and liability to other diseases	It's a good thing you're not the only one.
15	an assessment of the possible association of isoniazid with human cancer deaths	Health Canada, Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
15	sodium etidronate in the treatment of paget s disease of bone a study of long term results	Sodium Etidronate in the Treatment of Paget Bone Disease a long-term outcome study.
15	detection of a new lipoprotein lp a its occurrence in atherosclerosis with or without hyperlipemia	Detection of apos; new lipoprotein appears in apos; hyperlipid or non-hyperlipid atherosclerosis.
15	a 4 year prospective study of the relationship of different habitual vocational physical activity to risk and incidence of ischemic heart disease in volunteer male federal employees	A prospective 4-year study of the relationship between work-life conflict, regular physical activity and risk and risk factors; incidence of coronary heart disease among federal volunteers.
15	organic impairment in polydrug users risk factors	Organic Deterioration of Risk Factors of Poly-Drug Users.
15	ano rectal abnormalities and esophageal atresia familial and epidemiological studies	Family history of ano rectal aneurysm and family history of esophageal atresia and epidemiological studies.
15	assessment of cardiac risk in surgical patients	A Cardiac Risk Assessment for Surgery Patients.
15	the case against pot	Weed case.
15	risk factors in stroke in a mexican american population houston	Journal of the American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition.
15	retrolental fibroplasia a new analysis of risk factors based on recent cases	Retinal fibroplasia is a new approach to risk factor analysis based on recent cases.
15	risk of neonatal streptococcus b infection	Neonatal streptococcal infection.
15	follow up studies in patients with right bundle branch block and left anterior hemiblock significance of h v interval	Follow-up studies in patients with a branch block of the right bundle and significant anterior left hemibloc of the apos; hv interval.
15	prophylactic antibiotics in neonates with umbilical artery catheter placement a prospective study of 137 patients	Prophylactic antibiotics in newborn-babies; an apo catheter; an umbilical artery Placement d' a 137 patient prospective study.
16	antihistaminic drugs in dermatology	Dermatology antihistamines.
16	studies on spreading factors i the importance of mechanical factors in hyaluronidase action in skin	Studies on the factors of propagation; importance of mechanical factors in the process; action of the drug; hyaluronidase on the skin.
16	liquid nitrogen in the treatment of skin diseases	Liquid nitrogen for skin diseases.
16	the role of non precipitating antibodies in the passive sensitization of human skin by rabbit anti ovalbumin	The Role of Unprecipitating Antibodies in Passive Sensitization of Human Skin by Rabbit Antibody-Ovalbumin.
16	studies of hypersensitivity to low molecular weight substances ii reactions of some allergenic substituted dinitrobenzenes with cysteine or cystine of skin proteins	In addition, it may be necessary to test for allergenicity to the skin protein and to test for allergenicity to the skin protein.
16	studies on the antibodies in rabbit antisera responsible for sensitization of human skin i the role of impurities in crystalline egg albumin in stimulating the production of skin sensitizing antibody	Antibody studies in rabbit antisera sensitizing human skin: the role of impurities in apos; albumin; crystalline egg in stimulating production of apos; skin sensitizing antibodies.
16	histology and cytochemistry of human skin ix the distribution of non specific esterases	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the distribution of non-specific esterases.
16	an electron microscope study of the epidermis of mammalian skin in thin sections i dermo epidermal junction and basal cell layer	Electron microscopic study of mammalian skin epidermis in thin sections of the epidermal junction i dermo and the basal cell layer.
16	investigation of the structure of the cornified epithelium of the human skin	Corneal epithelium of human skin.
16	electrolyte distribution and active salt uptake in frog skin	Distribution of electrolytes and active absorption of salt in the skin of frogs.
16	olfactory perception in migrating salmon i l serine a salmon repellent in mammalian skin	Perception olfactory in migratory salmon and serodes repellent for salmon in mammalian skin.
16	change in enzyme activity and ribonucleic acid concentration within the epidermal cell of the rat during the growth stage of the hair cycle	Change of the apos; enzymatic activity and concentration of ribonucleic acid in the rat epidermal cell during the hair cycle growth stage.
16	the basement lamelia of amphibian skin its reconstruction after wounding	Le sous-ground lamellaire de peau d'apos; amphibien sa reconstruction après blessure.
16	histology and cytochemistry of human skin xi the distribution of beta glucuronidase	Human skin histology and cytochemistry x beta glucuronidase distribution.
16	the characterization and localization of frog skin cholinesterase	Frog skin cholinesterase characterization and localization.
16	collagen formation by fibroblasts of the chick embryo dermis	Collagen formation by chicken embryo dermal fibroblasts.
16	nervous pathways of cutaneous pains	Skin pain neural pathways.
16	nervous pathways of cutaneous pains	Skin pain neural pathways.
16	electron microscope studies of the human epidermis the clear cell of masson dendritic cell or melanocyte	Apos electron microscopy study; human cell-clear cell epidermis of the dendritic massoon or melanocyte cell.
16	the fine structure of the adepidermal reticulum in the basal membrane of the skin of the newt triturus	Fine structure of adepidermal reticulum in triturus triturus skin basement membrane.
16	electron microscope observations of the melanocyte of the human epidermis	Electron microscopic observations of apos melanocyte; human epidermis.
16	electron microscope studies of the human epidermis the cell boundaries and topography of the stratum malpighii	Electron microscopic study of human epidermis, cell boundaries, and topography of stratum malpighii.
16	a study of the distribution of 2 4 dinitrobenzene sensitizers between isolated lymph node cells and extracellular medium in relation to induction of contact skin sensitivity	A study of the distribution of 24 dinitrobenzene sensitizers between isolated lymph node cells and the extracellular medium in relation to the apos; induction of skin sensitivity on contact.
16	fine structure of the larval anuran epidermis with special reference to the figures of eberth	Eberth is the name given to the epidermis of the anurans, and the epidermis of the anurans is the epidermis of anurans.
16	the fine structure of the interrelationship of cells in the human epidermis	Fine structure of the apos; cell-cell interrelationship in the apos; human epidermis.
16	permeability of frog skin to choline	Choline skin permeability.
16	the effect of aminomethylpteroylglutamic acid on the development of skin hypersensitivity and on antibody formation in guinea pigs	Impact of apo; aminomethylpteroylglutamic acid on apo development; skin hypersensitivity and apo formation; antibodies in guinea pigs.
16	efficiency tests on a series of common skin antiseptics under ward conditions	Tests are performed on a range of skin antiseptic products that are commonly used under the conditions of the room.
16	staphylococci in septic fingers	Staph infection to the septic fingers.
16	staining of skin with dihydroxyacetone	Dihydroxyacetone dye the skin.
16	influence of the physical state of endotoxic preparations on dermal toxicity	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are required to assess the effects of exposure to ethylene oxide on the skin.
16	homologous disease in the adult rat a model for autoimmune disease i general features and cutaneous lesions	A model of auto disease-immune i general characteristics and skin lesions is homologous in adult rats.
16	skin resistance levels and galvanic skin response unilateral differences	The levels of skin resistance and the response of the galvanic skin differ unilaterally.
16	properties of acatalasic cells growing in vitro	Properties of acatalase-cell cultures grown in vitro.
16	burns and other skin lesions microcirculatory responses in man during healing	Burns and other skin lesions, microcirculatory responses to skin irritation; male during recovery.
16	sex chromatin mass in living cultivated human cells	Live cultured human chromatin mass.
16	the effect of hydrocortisone on the response of fetal rat skin in culture to ultraviolet irradiation	Effect of apos; hydrocortisone on fetal rat skin response to culture; ultraviolet irradiation.
16	action of antidiuretic hormone on the equivalent pore radius at both surfaces of the epithelium of the isolated toad skin	Action of apos; antidiuretic pore ray hormone equivalent to the two surfaces of the apos; epithelium of the skin isolated from the toad.
16	cutaneous sensory end organs of some anthropoid apes	Anthropoid monkeys' skin sensory organs.
16	calciphylaxis passive transfer	Calcalphylaxis Passive transfer.
16	radiation dose to the skin and to the gonads from diagnostic x ray procedures	Skin and gonadal radiation dose from diagnostic x-ray procedures.
16	a study of the fine structure of the epidermis of rana pipiens	A fine structure study of the epidermis of pipian rana pipiens.
16	assay of vitamins and amino acids with cultured tissue cells and antimetabolites	Test of vitamins and d' test of amino acids with cultured tissue cells and anti-metabolites.
16	collagenolytic activity of intact and necrotic connective tissue	Collagenolytic activity of necrotic intact connective tissue.
16	resurfacing of the thumb following major skin loss	It's a great way to make a difference in your life.
16	chromosome studies of normal and psoriatic skin fibroblasts	Chromosome studies of psoriatic and normal skin fibroblasts.
16	ultraviolet induced acantholysis in pemphigus	L' ultraviolet induces apos; pemphigus acantholysis.
16	dermojet histopathological artifacts	Histopathological dermojets artifacts, please.
16	intermolecular cross linking of collagen and the identification of a new beta component	It is not possible to distinguish between the two components, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
16	complement as a mediator of inflammation enhancement of vascular permeability by purified human c 1 esterase	Complementary as a vascular permeability mediator; inflammatory increase in vascular permeability by apos; purified human c1 esterase.
16	hurler s syndrome demonstration of an inherited disorder of connective tissue in cell culture	Shrieking showing hereditary connective tissue disorder in a cell culture.
16	the susceptibility of chick embryo skin organ cultures to influenza virus following excess vitamin a	For example, a person who has been diagnosed as having a respiratory infection should not be given the same treatment as a person who has been diagnosed with the disease.
16	effects of anti rheumatic compounds and pyridine derivatives on the cutaneous response to thurfyl nicotinate in the guinea pig	Effect of anti-@-@rheumatizers and pyridine derivatives on the dermal response to nicotinate thurfyl in guinea pig.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles i determinants of the chronic nodular lesion of connective tissue	Biological properties of cell wall particles determining chronic nodular injury to connective tissue.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles ii purification by density gradient column electrophoresis	Biological Properties of Streptococcal Cell Wall Particles ii purification by density gradient column electrophoresis.
16	effect of a new inhibitor of cholesterol biosynthesis ay 9944 on serum and tissue sterols in the rat	Effect of a novel cholesterol biosynthetic inhibitor, Ay 9944, on rat serum and tissue sterols.
16	specific sites of fatty acid sterol synthesis in isolated skin components	Site specific for the synthesis of the fatty acid sterols of the isolated skin components.
16	fine structure of desmosomes hemidesmosomes and an adepidermal globular layer in developing newt epidermis	A fine structure; hemidesmosomes desmosomes and a globular epidermal layer in the development of the apos; epidermis of the newt.
16	a fine structural analysis of the epidermis of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l	Fine structural analysis of earthworm epidermis lumbricus terrestris l.
16	mediators of inflammation in leukocyte lysosomes ii mechanism of action of lysosomal cationic protein upon vascular permeability in the rat	Inflammation in the lysosomes of leukocytes ii mechanism of inflammation; action of the cationic lysosomal protein on vascular permeability in the rat.
16	hurler s syndrome a genetic study in cell culture	Hurler syndrome is a cell culture genetic study.
16	biological properties of streptococcal cell wall particles 3 dermonecrotic reaction to cell wall mucopeptides	Biological properties of particles from the cell wall of streptococci 3 dermonecrotic response to mucopeptides of the cell wall.
16	passage of lipid across vascular endothelium in newborn rats an electron microscopic study	Lipid passage in the vascular endothelium of newly born-rats was studied by electron microscopy.
16	a special fibril of the dermis	Dermal fibril.
16	effects of d2o and osmotic gradients on potential and resistance of the isolated frog skin	Effects of osmotic gradients and d2o on the potential and resistance of isolated frog skin.
16	quantitative studies of the antagonism by nalorphine of some of the actions of morphine like analgesic drugs	Quantitative dosage studies; nalorphin antagonism of certain morphine actions such as painkillers.
16	collagen defect induced by penicillamine	Penicillamine-induced failure of collagen.
16	itch and vibration	Oh, the itching and the vibrations.
16	cell junctions in amphibian skin	Amphibian skin cell junctions.
16	the intraepidermal innervation of the snout skin of the opossum a light and electron microscope study with observations on the nature of merkel s tastzellen	L' intra-epidermal innervation of l&apos snout skin; opossum was studied by light and electron microscopy with observations on the nature of the tastzellen merkel.
16	soluble proteins of a melanoma and normal skin from the swordtail platyfish and their hybrids	It is the most common type of protein used in the production of fish and shellfish, and the most common type of protein.
16	sweating direct influence of skin temperature	Sweating directly affects skin temperature.
16	polysome morphology evidence for endocrine control during chick embryogenesis	In addition, it is not possible to determine the origin or origin of the organism.
16	the dstribution of calcium 47 in the rat	The contribution of rat calcium 47.
16	absence or singular specificity of carotenoids in some lower fishes	In addition, there is no evidence that carotenoids may be present in fish.
16	transformation of mycelial and yeast forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis in cultures and in experimental inoculations	Conversion of yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis into culture and experimental inoculations.
16	skin temperature recording with phosphors toxicity studies on animals	In addition, it may be necessary to monitor the temperature of the skin in order to determine the sensitivity of the skin.
16	skin temperature recording with phosphors a new technique	Recording skin temperature using phosphores, a novel technique.
16	striae and their relation to topical steroid therapy	Striations and their relationship to topical-steroid therapy.
16	effects of arterial hypoxia on the cutaneous circulation of the rabbit	Effects of apos; rabbit skin circulation hypoxia.
16	presence and persistence of foot and mouth disease virus in bovine skin	Foot-and-mouth disease in the skin of cattle.
16	thermal denaturation of soluble calf skin collagen	Thermal denaturation of collagen-soluble calf skin.
16	preparation and properties of a cell free system from rat skin that catalyzes sterol biosynthesis	In addition, the cell-free system of the rat skin catalyzes the biosynthesis of the sterols.
16	ultrastructural studies of human cutaneous nerve with special reference to lamellated cell inclusions and vacuole containing cells	Ultrastructural studies of human skin nerve, particularly lamellar cellular inclusions and vacuolar cells.
16	lipogenesis from amino acids in perfused isolated dog skin	In addition, there are a number of other products that can be used to improve the quality of the skin.
16	hurler s syndrome effect of retinol vitamin a alcohol on cellular mucopolysaccharides in cultured human skin fibroblasts	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food.
16	staphylococcus aureus on the hair	Hair-borne Staphylococcus aureus.
16	collagen structural studies based on the cleavage of methionyl bonds	Structural studies of collagen based upon methionyl bond cleavage.
16	development of antigens in human cells infected with simian virus 40	In addition, there is a need for research to determine the nature and extent of these diseases.
16	delayed dermal hypersensitivity in mice to spherule and mycelial extracts of coccidioides immitis	Dermal hypersensitivity to coccidioides immitis mycelium and spherule extracts was delayed in mice.
16	enzymatic solubilization of insoluble proteins at neutral ph	Neutral ph-insoluble protein enzyme solubilization.
16	degradation of streptococcal cell wall antigens in vivo	Degradation of the parietal antigens of streptococcus in vivo.
16	a comparison of the responses of frog skin receptors to mechanical and electrical stimulation	Comparison of frog skin receptor responses to electrical and mechanical stimulation.
16	a visco elastic theory of mechanoreceptor adaptation	Visco theory-elastic l' mechanical-receptive adaptation.
16	mechanoreceptors in rabbit ear skin innervated by myelinated nerve fibres	In the skin of rabbit ears innervated by nerve fibers, mechanoreceptors are innervated by nerve fibers.
16	persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls related to chronic inflammation of rabbit dermal connective tissue	The persistence of group a streptococcal cell walls is related to the chronic inflammation of the connective tissue of the rabbit dermis.
16	cocoon surrounding desert dwelling frogs	Surrounding Frogs inhabited in the desert.
16	vitamin c induced increase of dermatan sulfate in cultured hurler s fibroblasts	Dermatane sulfate was increased by vitamin c in cultured Hurler fibroblasts.
16	hypophyseal control of genetic expression during chick feather and skin differentiation	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of the quality of life of young birds.
16	langerhans cells uptake of tritiated thymidine	Langerhans cells collect thymidine tritium.
16	chemical cue preferences of inexperienced snakes comparative aspects	Chemical Preferences of Inexperienced Comparative Snake Locations.
16	responses of human somatosensory cortex to stimuli below threshold for conscious sensation	Human somatosensory cortical responses to subconscious sensory threshold stimuli.
16	susceptibility of human diploid fibroblast strains to transformation by sv40 virus	It is important to note that the human embryo is not the only source of infection in Canada.
16	the serologic specificity of tropocollagen telopeptides	Tropocollagin telopeptides serological specificity.
16	the interrelation of thermoregulatory and baroreceptor reflexes in the control of the blood vessels in the human forearm	L' thermoregulatory and baroreceptor reflex interrelationships in blood vessel control of the apos; before-human arm.
16	leukotactic factor elaborated by mixtures of genetically dissimilar cells	Genetically dissimilar cell mixtures create a leukotactic factor.
16	skin sensory afterglows	Skin glows under the skin; effect of light.
16	centromere absence of dna replication during chromatid separation in human fibroblasts	L' lack of replication of apos; centromere DNA during human fibroblast chromatid separation.
16	synthesis and turnover of collagen precursors in rabbit skin	Synthesis and Renewal of Collagen Precursors in Rabbit Skin.
16	the separation of the alpha chains of collagen by free flow electrophoresis	Separation of collagen's alpha chains by free-flow gel electrophoresis.
16	refsum s disease nature of the enzyme defect	Susceptible disease; enzyme deficient.
16	myelinated afferent fibres innervating the primate skin and their response to noxious stimuli	Myelinated afferent fibers innervating primate skin and response to harmful stimuli.
16	peripheral modification of sensory nerve responses after cross regeneration	Peripheral modification of cross-regeneration sensory nerve responses.
16	local and reflex factors affecting the distribution of the peripheral blood flow during arterial hypoxia in the rabbit	Local factors and reflexes affecting peripheral blood flow distribution during rabbit hypoxia.
16	distribution of peripheral blood flow in primary tissue hypoxia induced by inhalation of carbon monoxide	Peripheral blood flow distribution in the apos; primary tissue hypoxia induced by carbon monoxide inhalation.
16	effects of haemorrhage on the distribution of the peripheral blood flow in the rabbit	Apos effects; hemorrhage on peripheral blood flow distribution in rabbit.
16	responses of skin blood vessels to bradykinin histamine and 5 hydroxytryptamine	Skin blood vessel reactions to bradykinin histamine plus 5 hydroxytryptamine.
16	animal identification i liquid nitrogen branding of cattle	Identification of animals; bovine nitrogen.
16	animal identification ii freeze branding of seals for laboratory identification	For the purpose of this document, the following definitions shall be used: 1.
16	the topology of dermatomal projection in the medial lemniscal system	Dermatological projection topology in the median lemniscal system.
16	biological effects of leptospiral lipids	Leptospiral lipid biologic effects.
16	hurler s syndrome a genetic study of clones in cell culture with particular reference to the lyon hypothesis	Cell culture clone genetic study with specific reference to the lyon hypothesis.
16	concanavalin a in vivo induction of hemorrhagic skin lesions arthus like reactions in mice	Concanavalin a in vivo induction of arthrotic hemorrhagic skin lesions, such as reactions in mice.
16	copper relation to penicillamine induced defect in collagen	Penicillamine-induced collagen deficiency.
16	the effect of gamma irradiation on soluble collagen	It is not possible to determine the cause of death.
16	the lipid substances and cytopathic effects in man of bcg strain copenhagen and attenuated vole bacillus strain prague	Lipid substances and cytopathic effects in men of both the copenhagen strain bcg and the attenuated strain prague strain of the vole bacillus.
16	effect of diethylstilbestrol on skin sterols of the male rat	Effect of Diethylstilbestrol on Skin Sterols of Male Rat.
16	multiple temperature sensitive spots innervated by single nerve fibers	Nervous nerve fibers are the nerve fibres that make up the nerve fibers.
16	neuronal specification of cutaneous nerves through connections with skin grafts in the frog	Neuronal skin nerve specification through skin graft connections in frogs.
16	sensitization of smooth muscle to plasma kinins effects of enzymes and peptides on various preparations	Sensitization of smooth muscle to plasma kinins and enzymes and peptides on various preparations.
16	the influence of the cellular infiltrate on the evolution and intensity of delayed hypersensitivity reactions	It is important to note that this is not the case, but it may be the result of a combination of factors.
16	collagen has a discrete family of reactive hydroxylysyl and lysyl side chain amino groups	Collagen has a discrete family of reactive amino groups in both the hydroxylysyl and the lysyl side chains.
16	variations in purine metabolism of cultured skin fibroblasts from patients with gout	Antimicrobial Resistance to Chlamydia trachomatis monocytogenesis.
16	size discrimination on the skin	Skin size discrimination.
16	herpesvirus type 2 association with carcinoma of the cervix	Cervical cancer is a form of skin cancer that can cause cancer.
16	l lactic acid a mosquito attractant isolated from humans	Lactic acid, a human-isolated mosquito attractant.
16	gaucher s disease a genetic disease detected in skin fibroblast cultures	Genetic disease found in cultures of cutaneous fibroblasts.
16	the metabolism of n triphenylmethylmorpholine in the dog and rat	N-Triphenylmethylmorpholine metabolism in dogs and rats.
16	sources of gas gangrene in hospital	Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
16	serial reconstruction of the characteristic granule of the langerhans cell	Serial granule reconstruction characteristic of langerhans cell.
16	the effects of oral contraceptives on the endometrium	The Effects of Oral Contraceptives on Endometrium.
16	the dermal chromatophore unit	Dermal chromatophore unit.
16	the conversion of testosterone to 5 alpha androstan 17 beta ol 3 one dihydrotestosterone by skin slices of man	Conversion of testosterone into 5 alpha androstan 17 betaol 3 1 dihydrotestosterone by slices of human skin.
16	synthesis and degradation of collagen in the developing corium of the chick embryo	Collagen synthesis and degradation in developing corium of chicken embryo.
16	a study of the mechanism of water transfer across frog skin by a comparison of the permeability of the skin to deuterated and tritiated water	A study of the frog skin water transfer mechanism by a comparison of skin permeability to deuterated and tritiated water.
16	rapid diagnosis of herpesvirus hominis infections in superficial lesions by immunofluorescent antibody technics	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be associated with the development of the disease.
16	vitamin a induced synthesis of alkaline phosphatase	Vitamin induced alkaline phosphatase synthesis.
16	cystathionine synthase in tissue culture derived from human skin enzyme defect in homocystinuria	Tissue culture cystathionine synthase is derived from apos; a defect of the human skin enzyme in apos; homocystinuria.
16	sexual behavior stimulation by painful electrical shock to skin in male rats	Stimulation of sexual behavior in male rats by means of painful electric shock to the skin.
16	study of delayed hypersensitivity to myxoviruses induced by vaccines	Vaccine-induced hypersensitivity to myxoviruses.
16	elastofibroma dorsi	Golden elastofibroma.
16	embryonic morphogenesis role of fibrous lattice in the development of feathers and feather patterns	Embryonic fibrous-net morphogenetic role in feather development and feather patterns.
16	comparative antibacterial activity of hexachlorophane in different formulations used for skin disinfection	Anti-bacterial comparative activity of l'apos; hexachlorophane in various formulations used for disinfection of the skin.
16	increased free cystine content of fibroblasts cultured from patients with cystinosis	Increased free cystine content in cultured cystinosis fibroblasts.
16	cystic fibrosis of the pancreas a study in cell culture	Pancreatic cystic fibrosis is a cell culture study.
16	hurler and hunter syndromes mutual correction of the defect in cultured fibroblasts	Hurler Syndrome-Hunter Mutual defect correction in cultured fibroblasts.
16	morphological and biochemical characterization of goldfish erythrophores and their pterinosomes	Morphological and biochemical characterization of erythrophores of goldfish and their pterinosomes.
16	glycolipid and mucopolysaccharide abnormality in fibroblasts of fabry s disease	Fabry disease fibroblasts are defective in glycolipids and mucopolysaccharides.
16	human wound repair i epidermal regeneration	Epidermal repair of human wounds.
16	human wound repair ii inflammatory cells epithelial mesenchymal interrelations and fibrogenesis	Repair of human wounds ii mesenchymal inflammatory epithelial cells and fibrogenesis.
16	cholesterol requirement of primary diploid human fibroblasts	Cholesterol requirements for primary human fibroblasts.
16	partial hydroxylation of certain lysines in collagen	Partial hydroxylation of some collagen lysines.
16	keratohyalin extraction and in vitro aggregation	Extraction of keratohyaline and aggregation in vitro.
16	skin replication procedure for the scanning electron microscope	Scanning electron microscope skin replication procedure.
16	acth and decubitus ulceration an experimental study	An experimental study on ulceration, ulceration, ulceration of the decubitus.
16	myotonic muscular dystrophy abnormalities in fibroblast culture	Myotonic abnormalities of muscular dystrophy in the culture of fibroblasts.
16	permeability increasing activity in hereditary angioneurotic edema plasma ii mechanism of formation and partial characterization	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this hypothesis, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this hypothesis.
16	activation of hageman factor by collagen	Activation of lamb-factor by collagen.
16	a symmetrical extracellular fibril	Symmetrical extracellular fibril.
16	carbenicillin resistance in pseudomonas aeruginosa from clinical material	Clinical isolates of Pseudomonas aeruginosa resistant to carbenicillin.
16	role of candida albicans infection in napkin rashes	Infection with albicans candida in towel rashes.
16	new sialic acid containing sulfolipid ungulic acid	New sialic acid, containing ungulic acid sulfolipid.
16	demonstration of a bactericidal substance against beta hemolytic streptococci in supernatant fluids of staphylococcal cultures	Evidence of a beta-hemolytic streptococci bactericidal substance in staphylococcal culture supernatants.
16	melanoma and pigmentation of the leptomeninges in ugandan africans	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	white blood cell cultures in genetic studies on the human mucopolysaccharidoses	Cultures of white blood cells in human mucopolysaccharide genetic studies.
16	induction of melanin synthesis in albino mouse skin by dna from pigmented mice	Induced synthesis of melanin in the skin of albino mice by DNA from pigmented mice.
16	the defect in hurler and hunter syndromes ii deficiency of specific factors involved in mucopolysaccharide degradation	Defects of the Hurler and Hunter syndromes ii Defects of the specific factors involved in the degradation of mucopolysaccharides.
16	the classification of staphylococci from colonized ventriculo atrial shunts	Staphylococcal classification from ventricular atrial shunt colonized by the ventricle.
16	studies on the migratory behavior of melanocytes in guinea pig skin	Studies of guinea pig skin melanocyte migration behaviour.
16	polysaccharide in delayed hypersensitivity i pneumococcal polysaccharide as inducer and elicitor of delayed reactivity in guinea pigs	Delayed hypersensitivity polysaccharide i pneumococcal polysaccharide induces and triggers delayed guinea pig reactivity.
16	polydactyly and other minor stigmata associated with 46 xx 47 xx d mosaicism	Polydactyly and Other Minor Stigmas Associated with 46 x x 47 x x x mosaic d.
16	beta glucuronidase activity in skin components of children with cystic fibrosis	Beta glucuronidase activity in children with cystic fibrosis.
16	comparison of the reflex reactivity of skin and muscle veins in the human forearm	Comparison of skin and muscular vein reflex reactivity in the apos; before-human arm.
16	chick cartilage collagen a new type of alpha 1 chain not present in bone or skin of the species	Chicken cartilage collagen is a new alpha 1 chain type that does not appear in the bones or skin; species.
16	the role of skin and muscle resistance vessels in reflexes mediated by the baroreceptor system	The role of muscle and skin resistance vessels in baroreceptor-mediated reflexes.
16	increased vascular permeability produced by human platelet granule cationic extract	Increases in vascular permeability due to apos; cationic extraction of human platelet granules.
16	cuticular lipids of adults and puparia of the australian sheep blowfly lucilia cuprina wied	Lipids from adult and pupal cuticles of the Australian meat fly lucilia cuprina were examined.
16	ultraviolet light alteration of cellular deoxyribonucleic acid in vivo	Ultraviolet radiation alteration of apos; cellular deoxyribonucleic acid, in vivo.
16	evidence for intergenic complementation in hybrid cells derived from two human diploid strains each carrying an x linked mutation	Evidence of intergenic complementation in hybrid cells derived from two x-linked human diploid strains.
16	metachromatic leukodystrophy arylsulfatase a deficiency in skin fibroblast cultures	Leucodystrophy metachromatic arylsulfatase, a cutaneous fibroblast culture deficiency.
16	reversible transformation of fibrous collagen to a soluble state in vivo	Reversible transformation of the fibrous collagen to an in vivo soluble state.
16	parasexual cycle in cultivated human somatic cells	Parasexual cell cycle in cultured human somatic cells.
16	erythropoietic protoporphyria iv protection from sunlight	Erythropoietic Protoporphy iv Sunlight Protection.
16	evidence that xeroderma pigmentosum cells do not perform the first step in the repair of ultraviolet damage to their dna	Xeroderma pigmentosum n&apos cells do not appear to perform the first step in repairing the damage caused by ultraviolet radiation to their DNA.
16	chemical and electrical synaptic connexions between cutaneous mechanoreceptor neurones in the central nervous system of the leech	Chemical and electrical synaptic connections between the leech's central nervous system (CNS) skin mechano-receptors.
16	presence of caerulein in extracts of the skin of leptodactylus pentadactylus labyrinthicus and of xenopus laevis	Cerulein is present in leptodactylus pentadactylus labyrinthicus and xenopus laevis skin extracts.
16	osmium zinc iodide reactive sites in the epidermal langerhans cell	It is the most common type of skin cancer, which is the most common type of skin cancer.
16	severe local reaction following live measles virus in guinea pigs previously inoculated with killed virus	Acute local reaction following infection; the inoculation of live virus from measles to guinea pigs previously inoculated with the killed virus.
16	acute effects of a monoamine oxidase inhibitor tranylcypromine on thermoregulation in the conscious rabbit	Acute effects of tranylcypromine, an inhibitor of monoamine oxidase, on conscious rabbit thermoregulation.
16	the action of glucosulphone n n di glucose sodium sulphonate of 4 4 diaminodiphenyl sulphone on pancreatic kallikrein	L' action of 4-diaminodiphenyls sodium sulfonate glucosulphone on pancreatic kallikrein.
16	structure and pharmacological actions of phyllocaerulein a caerulein like nonapeptide its occurrence in extracts of the skin of phyllomedusa sauvagei and related phyllomedusa species	Structure and pharmacological actions of phyllocaerulein, a caerulein as a non-apeptide, in extracts from the skin of Phyllomedusa sauvagei and related species of Phyllomedusa.
16	wound healing and collagen formation vi the origin of the wound fibroblast studied in parabiosis	The healing of wounds and the formation of collagen vi l'apos; origin of the fibroblasts of wounds studied in parabiosis.
16	the metabolism of the insecticide carbaryl 1 naphthyl n methylcarbamate by fat body of the blowfly larva calliphora erythrocephala	Apos metabolism; carbaryl insecticide 1 naphthyl n methylcarbamate by the fat body of calliphora erythrocephala fly larvae.
16	which disposable chest electrode	What disposable-breast electrode?
16	interferon induction increased through chemical modification of a synthetic polyribonucleotide	In addition, it has been shown that there is a significant risk to human health and the environment from exposure to ethylene oxide.
16	the role of normal skin in the spread of streptococcal pyoderma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	staphylococcal epidemiology in antarctica	Epidemiology, 3rd edition.
16	correlation of initial changes in the mouse epidermal cell population with two stage carcinogenesis a quantitative study	The relationship between the initial changes in the population of epidermal cells in mice and the two-stage carcinogenesis was established in a quantitative study.
16	effect of pregnancy on sebum excretion	The Effect of Pregnancy on Apos; Sebum Excretion.
16	differentiating neoplasms of hair germ	Neoplasms that can differentiate between hair-like germs.
16	dimethylbenzanthracene tumorigenesis and aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase in mouse skin inhibition by 7 8 benzoflavone	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
16	genetic inactivation of the alpha galactosidase locus in carriers of fabry s disease	Genetic inactivation of the alpha-galactosidase locus in Fabry s. disease carriers.
16	optimum skin blending method for quantifying poultry carcass bacteria	An ideal method of dermal blending to quantify the amount of bacteria present in the carcasses of poultry.
16	lesch nyhan syndrome preventive control by prenatal diagnosis	Prevention of Lesch Nyhan Syndrome through Prenatal Diagnosis.
16	defect in dna synthesis in skin of patients with xeroderma pigmentosum demonstrated in vivo	Failure of synthesis of apo; DNA in skin of xeroderma pigment patients demonstrated in vivo.
16	tissue distribution of progesterone 7 h3 in the female genital tract 8 hours after intravenous administration	Progesterone 7 h3 tissue distribution in apos; female genital apparatus 8 h after apos; intravenous administration.
16	bactericidal properties of tego 103 s and tego 103 g	Bactericidal properties of 103 s tego and 103 g tego.
16	scheie and hurler syndromes apparent identity of the biochemical defect	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
16	nitrogen requirements and uricolytic activity of cutaneous bacteria	Nitrogen requirements and skin bacterial uricolytic activity.
16	collagen molecules distribution of alpha chains	Collagen molecules distribute alpha chains.
16	comparative enumeration of lipophilic and nonlipophilic cutaneous diphtheroids and cocci	Comparative counting of the lipophilic and non-lipophilic skin diphtheroid and cocci.
16	effects of systemic demethylchlortetracycline on human cutaneous microflora	Effects of Systemic Demethylchlortetracycline on Human Dermal Microflora.
16	mechanism of prophylaxis by silver compounds against infection of burns	Compound Prophylaxis Mechanisms; Money for Immune Deficiency; Burn Infection.
16	toxin from skin of frogs of the genus atelopus differentiation from dendrobatid toxins	Atelopus frog skin toxin differentiates from dendrobatid toxins.
16	studies in vivo on the biosynthesis of collagen and elastin in ascorbic acid deficient guinea pigs	Collagen and elastin biosynthesis studies in vivo in ascorbic acid-deficient guinea pigs.
16	the relationship between reversibility of fibril formation and subunit composition of rat skin collagen	The relationship between fibrillar reversibility and sub@-@unit composition of rat skin collagen.
16	cell free transmission and in vivo replication of marek s disease virus	In vivo mare disease virus cell-free transmission and replication.
16	synthesis of lipids from acetate by human preputial and abdominal skin in vitro	Lipid synthesis from d' human abdominal and preputial skin acetate in vitro.
16	evidence for the chylomicron origin of lipids accumulating in diabetic eruptive xanthomas a correlative lipid biochemical histochemical and electron microscopic study	Evidence of lipid accumulation in diabetic erruptive xanthomas, correlative lipid study by biochemical histochemistry and electron microscopy.
16	localization of antigenic determinants in the polypeptide chains of collagen	Localization of the antigenic determinants in collagen polypeptide chains.
16	peritoneal infections in patients on long term peritoneal dialysis before and after human cadaveric renal transplantation	Peritoneal infections in patients receiving long-term peritoneal dialysis therapy before and after a human cadaveric kidney transplant.
16	the extraction of polymeric collagen from biopsies of human skin	Polymeric collagen extraction from human skin biopsies.
16	foot skin ischaemia in atherosclerotic peripheral vascular disease	Foot skin ischemia in peripheral atherosclerotic vascular disease.
16	cellular and vascular components of the allograft reaction evidence from returned skin allografts	Vascular and cellular components of the d&apos reaction; allograft evidence of return of allograft allograft skin allografts.
16	the effects of histamine in malaria	The Effects of Apos; Histamine on Malaria.
16	human skin collagenase the role of serum alpha globulins in the control of activity in vivo and in vitro	Human skin collagenase serum alpha globulin role in control of apos; in vivo and in vitro activity.
16	eggshell thinning in japanese quail fed mercuric chloride	Shell d'apos; egg s' thinner in Japanese quailes fed on mercuric chloride.
16	kinetics of acetylcholine synthesis and hydrolysis in myasthenia gravis	Synthesis kinetics and apos; apos hydrolysis; acetylcholine in severe myasthenia.
16	the glycosaminoglycans of neonatal rat skin	Neonatal Rat Skin Glycosaminoglycans.
16	skin collagen and thickness in women with hirsuties	Collagen and skin thickness in hirsuties.
16	the natural history of molluscum contagiosum in fijian children	L' Natural History of Contagiosum Molluscum in Fijian Children.
16	the lymphatic status of hamster cheek pouch tissue in relation to its properties as a graft and as a graft site	L' hamster cheek tissue lymphatic status in relation to its graft and graft site properties.
16	determination of arterial blood flow by percutaneously introduced flow sensors in an external magnetic field i the method	Determination of Arterial Blood Flow by Percutaneous Flow Sensors in an External Magnetic Field i the method.
16	localization of permeability barriers in the frog skin epithelium	Permeability barriers are localized in frog skin epithelium.
16	formation and origin of basal lamina and anchoring fibrils in adult human skin	Basal lamina formation and origin and fibrillar anchorage in adult human skin.
16	skin collagen and thickness in simple obesity	Elderly people are more likely to be obese than older people.
16	skin capillary blood flow in scleroderma	Blood flow from the skin's capillary to the scleroderma.
16	the influence of thyroactive substances on the induction of cervico vaginal tumours in intact and castrate rats	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	fabry s disease antenatal detection	This is prenatal diagnosis of Fabry's disease.
16	cutaneous reactions to intradermal prostaglandins	Intradermal prostaglandin skin reactions.
16	studies on the nature of sweat gland fatigue in the goat	Investigations into the nature of goat sweat gland fatigue.
16	nuclear magnetic resonance of sodium 23 linoleate water basis for an alternative interpretation of sodium 23 spectra within cells	D&apos-based sodium linoleate 23 nuclear magnetic resonance; water for alternative interpretation of the spectra of sodium 23 at l' inner cells.
16	chloroquine concentrations in the skin of rabbits and man	Rabbit and human skin concentrations of chloroquine.
16	inhibition of contact sensitivity in the mouse by topical application of corticosteroids	Contact sensitivity inhibition in mice by epos; topical corticosteroid application.
16	hyposensitization with dermatophagoides pteronyssinus antigen trial in asthma induced by house dust	In addition to the above tests, the test will be performed on a number of subjects, including children and adults.
16	skin bacteria and skin disinfection reconsidered	The bacteria in the skin and the disinfection of the skin tissue have been re-examined.
16	distinctive characteristics of nucleoli of two established cell lines	Two established cell lines with distinctive nucleolus characteristics.
16	disinfection of the skin an assessment of some new preparations	Skin disinfection and evaluation of new preparations.
16	inductive interactions between human dermis and chick chorionic epithelium	Inductive human dermal-lapos interactions; chicken chorionic epithelium.
16	neurofibromatosis and leprosy	Leprosy and neurofibromatosis.
16	studies on purified rheumatoid synovial collagenase in vitro and in vivo	Studies of purified synovial rheumatoid collagenase activity in vitro and in vivo.
16	localized skin changes induced by depot injections of vitamin a in the rat	Localized Skin Changes induced by Vitamin A Depot Injection in the Rat.
16	significance of cytoplasmic microtubules in lupus nephritis	L' importance of cytoplasmic microtubules in the nephritis of lupus.
16	human phosphoglycerate kinase and inactivation of the x chromosome	Phosphoglycerate kinase and l' inactivation of x chromosome.
16	osteoporosis skin collagen and androgen	Collagen and androgen for the skin; osteoporosis.
16	cutaneous changes associated with marek s disease of chickens	Skin Changes Associated with Mare Disease in Chickens.
16	early and late incorporation of tritiated thymidine into skin cells and the presence of a long lived g 0 specific precursor pool	Early and late incorporation of thymidine tritium into skin cells and the presence of epos; a long-lasting g0 specific precursor pool.
16	effect of estradiol 17 on collagen biosynthesis degradation and re utilization in vivo	Effect of Apos; Estradiol 17 on Degradation of Collagen Biosynthesis and Reuse in Vivo.
16	the distribution of cutaneous receptors in the rabbit s hind limb and differential electrical stimulation of their axons	The distribution of posterior rabbit skin receptors and differential electrical stimulation of their axons.
16	diffusible factors from malignant cells which affect epidermal survival and differentiation	Diffusible factors in malignant cells affecting epidermal differentiation and survival.
16	cytochalasin b effects on microfilaments and movement of melanin granules within melanocytes	Effects of cytochalasin b on microfilaments and melanin granule movement in the interior of melanocytes.
16	water uptake by the crab eating frog rana cancrivora as affected by osmotic gradients and by neurohypophysial hormones	It is not possible to determine the extent of the effects, but it is important to understand the effects of the effects.
16	histrionicotoxins roentgen ray analysis of the novel allenic and acetylenie spiroalkaloids isolated from a colombian frog dendrobates histrionicus	Histrionicotoxin analysis of roentgen rays of new isolated allenic and acetylenic spiroalkaloids; a dendrobate histrionicus Colombian frog.
16	potentially infectious agents associated with shearling bedpads effect of laundering with detergent disinfectant combinations on staphylococcus aureus and pseudomonas aeruginosa	Potential shear bed pads-associated infectious agents have the effect of washing with combinations of detergent disinfectants on staphylococcus aureus and pseudomonas aeruginosa.
16	lactic acid utilization by the cutaneous micrococcaceae	In addition, it can be used as an insecticide for the control of pests.
16	rapid identification and typing of herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 by a direct immunofluorescence technique	Rapid identification and typing of type 1 and 2 herpes simplex viruses by direct immunofluorescence.
16	the distribution of antigenic determinants in rat skin collagen	The Distribution of Antigenic Determinants in the Rat Skin Collagen.
16	cutaneous basophil hypersensitivity i a new look at the jones mote reaction general characteristics	Basophilic skin hypersensitivity: a new look at the general characteristics of Jones mote's reaction.
16	the use of an unnatural prostaglandin in the termination of pregnancy	Use of non-natural prostaglandin during pregnancy; termination.
16	an analysis of graft versus host disease in syrian hamsters i the epidermolytic syndrome description and studies on its procurement	An analysis of the relationship between graft and Syrian hamster host disease was conducted as part of the description and acquisition studies of epidermolytic syndrome.
16	an analysis of graft versus host disease in syrian hamsters ii the epidermolytic syndrome studies on its pathogenesis	A graft vs. host analysis in Syrian hamster ii studies of epidermolytic syndrome on its pathogenesis.
16	implantation transplantation and epithelial mesenchymal relationships in the rat uterus	Epithelial mesenchymal transplants and relationships in rat uterus.
16	further studies on metachromasia in cultured human fibroblasts staining of glycosaminoglycans mucopolysaccharides by alcian blue in salt solutions	D' other studies on metachromasis in human fibroblasts in the mucopolysaccharide glycosaminoglycans staining culture with d&apos blue; alcian in saline solutions.
16	melanin pigmentation an in vivo model for studies of melanosome kinetics within keratinocytes	Melanin pigmentation is an in vivo model for the study of the kinetics of melanosomes in keratinocytes.
16	clinical evaluation of kethoxal against cutaneous herpes simplex	Clinical evaluation of herpes simplex skin therapy for kethoxal.
16	immunobiological activity of cell wall antigens of staphylococcus aureus	Immunobiological Activity of Staphylococcus aureus Parietal Antigen.
16	cellular reaction in the footpad and draining lymph nodes of mice induced by mycobacterial fractions and bcg bacilli	Mycobacterial fractions and bcg bacilli induced cellular response in the mouse pedal cushion and drainant lymph nodes.
16	united states standard diphtheria toxin for the schick text and the erythema potency assay for the schick text dose	States-United diphtheria toxin standard for text schick and test of potency of l' erythema for text schick dose text schick.
16	cell mediated hypersensitivity in rabbits infected with trypanosoma brucei and trypanosoma rhodesiense	Cells-mediated hypersensitivity in trypanosoma brucei- and trypanosoma rhodesiense-infected rabbits.
16	the preparation of an alkali soluble collagen from demineralized bone	The results of this study are summarized below.
16	blood flow characteristics and tissue nutrition in apparently ischaemic feet	Tissue nutrition and blood flow characteristics in apparently ischemic feet.
16	immunological evidence for an inactive precursor of collagen proline hydroxylase in cultured fibroblasts	Immunologic evidence of the collagen proline hydroxylase, an inactive precursor in cultured fibroblasts.
16	prolonged survival of glutaraldehyde treated skin homografts	Glutaraldehyde-treated homografts long-term survival.
16	the melanocyte model colchicine like effects of other antimitotic agents	In addition to the above, there are a number of other chemicals that can be used to treat the disease.
16	polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis of corynebacterium diphtheriae a possible epidemiological aid	Corynebacterium diphtheriae polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
16	the role of passenger leukocytes in the anomalous survival of neonatal skin grafts in mice	The Role of Passenger Leukocytes in Abnormal Survival of Neonatal Skin Transplantation in Mice.
16	intracellular enzymes and protein synthesis in rabbit skin after thermal injury	Intracellular enzymes and rabbit skin protein synthesis following thermal injury.
16	effects of ranatensin a polypeptide from frog skin on isolated smooth muscle	The effects of ranatensin, a polypeptide of frog skin, on the isolated smooth muscle.
16	serum stimulated release of cell contacts and the initiation of growth in contact inhibited chick fibroblasts	Serum stimulates contact cell release and l' initiation of contact growth inhibits chick fibroblasts.
16	characterization of human platelet vascular permeability enhancing activity	Characterization of apos; activity promoting vascular permeability in human platelets.
16	metabolism of testosterone 14 c by cultured human cells	Cultured human cells metabolize testosterone 14 c.
16	morphogenesis of rabbit fibroma virus correlation with pathogenesis of the skin lesion	Morphogenesis of correlation between rabbit fibroma virus and dermal pathogenesis.
16	the effects of glycols on the renaturation of soluble collagen	Effects of glycols on soluble collagen renaturation.
16	transport and metabolism of sarcosine in hypersarcosinemic and normal phenotypes	Sarcosin transport and metabolism in both the normal and the hypersarcosinemic phenotypes.
16	natural history of impetigo i site sequence of acquisition and familial patterns of spread of cutaneous streptococci	Natural history of the disease; impetigo i sequencing of the site; family streptococcal acquisition and spread patterns.
16	natural history of impetigo ii etiologic agents and bacterial interactions	Natural history of l' bacterial etiology and interactions.
16	hypohidrotic ectodermal dysplasia with multiple associated anomalies	Hypohidrotic ectodermal dysplasia, associated with multiple abnormalities.
16	xeroderma pigmentosum and pigmented xerodermoid	Xeroderma pigmentosum xerodermoid pigmented.
16	lipoid proteinosis	Lipoidal proteinosis.
16	pilosebaceous abnormalities in apert type acrocephalosyndactyly	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
16	syndrome of unilateral ectromelia psoriasis and central nervous system anomalies	Unilateral ectromelic psoriasis syndrome and abnormalities of the central nervous system.
16	investigation of a case of oculocutaneous albinism	Case investigation; oculo albinism-skin.
16	the biology of keratinization	Keratinization biology.
16	possible genetic heterogeneity of x linked ichthyosis	It is not possible to determine the genetic identity of the organism.
16	familial focal facial dermal dysplasia	Family focal, dermal dysplasia.
16	lysyl protocollagen hydroxylase deficiency in fibroblasts from siblings with hydroxylysine deficient collagen	Frat fibroblasts with a hydroxylysine-deficient collagen are deficient in lysyl protocollagen hydroxylase.
16	early reactions of the subcutaneous tissue to repeated injections of carcinogens in aqueous solutions	Early reactions of tissue under <-> skin to repeated injection of carcinogens into aqueous solutions.
16	the induction of adenomata in mouse lung homografts by chemical carcinogens	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of tumours, but it is important to distinguish between them.
16	hydroxylysine in the n terminal regions of the 1 and 2 chains of various collagens	L' hydroxylysine in n-terminal chain 1 and 2 regions of various collagens.
16	the effects of certain glycols substituted glycols and related organic solvents on the thermal stability of soluble collagen	The effects of certain glycol-substituted glycols and related organic solvents on thermal stability of soluble collagen.
16	changes in plasma volume and protein content during exposures of working men to various temperatures before and after acclimatization to heat separation of the roles of cutaneous and skeletal muscle circulation	Changes in muscle protein and plasma volume during pregnancy; exposure of workers to various temperatures before and after pregnancy; acclimation to thermal separation of the roles of skeletal muscle and skin circulation.
16	connective tissue synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in cell culture	Synthesis of connective tissue by cultured sclerodermal skin fibroblasts.
16	aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase and polycyclic hydrocarbon tumorigenesis effect of the enzyme inhibitor 7 8 benzoflavone on tumorigenesis and macromolecule binding	The effect of the inhibitory enzyme 7-8 benzoflavone on tumourigenesis and macromolecule binding.
16	fine structural observations relating to the production of color by the iridophores of a lizard anolis carolinensis	Fine structural observations of d&apos iridophores colour production; an anolis carolinensis lizard.
16	oyster ciliary inhibition by cystic fibrosis culture medium	Cervical inhibition of the oyster by the growth medium of cystic fibrosis.
16	induction of benzo pyrene hydroxylase in human skin	Benzo pyrene hydroxylase induced in human skin.
16	deficiency of alpha l fucosidase	She's got alpha-fucosidase deficiency.
16	the survival of salmonellas on finger tips and transfer of the organisms to foods	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	excretion of sterols from the skin of normal and hypercholesterolemic humans implications for sterol balance studies	Sterol excretion by normal and hypercholesterolemic human skin has implications for the study of the apos; sterol balance.
16	the isolation and amino acid and carbohydrate composition of polymeric collagens prepared from various human tissues	L' isolation and composition of amino acids and carbohydrates of collagen polymers prepared from various human tissues.
16	compartmentalization of spermine and spermidine in the herpes simplex virion	A comparison of the spermine and the spermidine in herpes simplex virion.
16	cardiovascular reflex responses to cutaneous and visceral stimuli in spinal man	Cardiovascular responses to visceral and cutaneous stimuli in the spinal cord.
16	isolation and identification of pharmacologically active amino acids in skin and their structure activity relationship on the guinea pig ileum	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be carcinogenic in nature.
16	histological and ultrastructural findings in a case of the s zary syndrome	Histological and ultrastructural observations of szary syndrome.
16	dna synthesis in mixed cultures of rat leukocytes and allogeneic dissociated skin cells	Synthesis of DNA in allogeneic dissociated skin cell and rat leukocyte mixed cultures.
16	uridine diphosphate glucuronic acid production and utilization in various tissues actively synthesizing glycosaminoglycans	Production and use of apos; glucuronic acid uridine diphosphate in various actively synthesizing glycosaminoglycan tissues.
16	prostaglandin biosynthesis by human skin and its inhibition by corticosteroids	Human skin prostaglandin biosynthesis and corticosteroid inhibition.
16	permeability and enterotoxic factors of nonagglutinable vibrios vibrio alcaligenes and vibrio parahaemolyticus	Permeability and enterotoxic factors of non-agglutinable vibrions vibrions and vibrios parahaemolyticus.
16	infections in a hospital for patients with diseases of the skin	Infections in a skin disease hospital.
16	critical role of the carbohydrate side chains of collagen in platelet aggregation	Critical role of collagen carbohydrate side chains in plaque aggregation.
16	cuticle deposition in imaginal disks effects of juvenile hormone and fat body in vitro	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of body weight, body weight, body weight, and body weight.
16	pepsin treatment of avian skin collagen effects on solubility subunit composition and aggregation properties	D&apos is a high-resolution, high-resolution, high-resolution, high-resolution, high-resolution, high-resolution, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance, high-performance.
16	serologically demonstrable alloantigens of mouse epidermal cells	Mice epidermal cell Alloantigens serologically demonstrable.
16	further observations on the pathogenesis of acne	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	the erythrasma microorganism in situ studies using the skin surface biopsy technique	The results of this study will be used to evaluate the effectiveness of the program and to evaluate the effectiveness of the program.
16	inhibition of prostaglandin biosynthesis by corticosteroids	Inhibition of the biosynthesis of prostaglandins by corticosteroids.
16	simulation of genetic mucopolysaccharidoses in normal human fibroblasts by alteration of ph of the medium	Simulation of genetic mucopolysaccharideosis by alteration of medium ph in normal human fibroblasts.
16	reducible crosslinks in hydroxylysine deficient collagens of a heritable disorder of connective tissue	"""Reductible crosslink in hydroxylysine deficiency collagenens of a Heritable Disorder of Connective tissues"", in the Journal of Medicine, Vol."
16	steam versus hot water scalding in reducing bacterial loads on the skin of commercially processed poultry	Vapour vs. hot water by reducing the bacterial loadings on commercially processed poultry meat.
16	skin trauma in patients receiving systemic corticosteroid therapy	Skin trauma in patients on systemic corticosteroid therapy.
16	new in vitro test for ige mediated hypersensitivity in man	New in vitro test for in vitro human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) hypersensitivity.
16	isolation of a mycoplasma from sarcoid tissue	Isolate a sarcoid tissue mycoplasma.
16	coeliac disease vasculitis and cryoglobulinaemia	It's called Celiac Vasculitis and Cryoglobulinemia.
16	immunologic tolerance role of the regional lymph node	Role of Regional Lymph Node Immunological Tolerance.
16	tests for antibody and cell mediated hypersensitivity to trypanosome antigens in rabbits infected with trypanosoma congolense	Antibody and apo testing; trypanosome cell-mediated hypersensitivity in rabbits infected with the congolense trypanosome.
16	an inherited defect affecting the tricarboxylic acid cycle in a patient with congenital lactic acidosis	An inherited deficiency affecting the apo cycle; tricarboxylic acid in a dapo patient; congenital lactic acidosis.
16	cholesterol distribution in the bulk tissues of man variation with age	Distribution of cholesterol in crude skin tissue; man varies with age.
16	the viability of fetal skin of abortuses induced by saline or prostaglandin	Saline- or prostaglandin-induced abortions are viable fetal skin.
16	the release of collagenase as an inactive proenzyme by bone explants in culture	Collagenase release as inactive proenzyme from cultured bone explants.
16	uptake of 63 ni 2 from its complexes with proteins and other ligands by mouse dermal fibroblasts in vitro	L' absorption of 63 or 2 of its protein and d&apos complexes; other ligands by dermal fibroblasts from mice in vitro.
16	social interaction and wounding in the genesis of spontaneous murine amyloidosis	Social interaction and injuries in spontaneous murine amyloidosis.
16	adenovirus susceptibility to human interferon during one step replication	It is important to note that this is not a one-step replication process.
16	yeasts in a hospital for patients with skin diseases	Yeasts in a skin-disease hospital.
16	use of 4 per cent chlorhexidine detergent solution hibiscrub and other methods of skin disinfection	Chlorhexidine detergent and dapos; other skin disinfecting methods used in cleansing the skin.
16	diphtheria infection in north west canada 1969 1970 and 1971	Northern Diphtheria-western Canada, 1969-1970 and 1971.
16	simulated human skin scales	Simulated scales of human skin, please.
16	patterns of reflex excitability change after widespread cutaneous stimulation in man	Reflex eccentricity profiles change following extensive skin stimulation in males.
16	the effect of increasing the innervation field sizes of nerves on their reflex response time in salamanders	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the response time of salamanders is significantly different from that of other animals.
16	input from muscle and cutaneous nerves of the hand and forearm to neurones of the precentral gyrus of baboons and monkeys	Bring hand and muscle and skin nerves forward-arms to pre-central gyrus neurons of baboons and monkeys.
16	delayed manifestation of ultraviolet reaction in the guinea pig caused by anti inflammatory drugs	The guinea pig's ultraviolet response has been delayed by anti-@-@ inflammatory drugs.
16	effect of alcohols and neutral salt on the thermal stability of soluble and precipitated acid soluble collagen	The effect of the neutral alcohols and salts on the thermal stability of the soluble and precipitous collagen soluble in acid.
16	sanfilippo syndrome profound deficiency of alpha acetylglucosaminidase activity in organs and skin fibroblasts from type b patients	Sanfilippo syndrome: profound deficiency of l' alpha-acetyl-glucosaminidase activity in the organs and fibroblasts of the skin of patients of type b.
16	the defect in the hunter syndrome deficiency of sulfoiduronate sulfatase	Sulfoiduronate sulfatase deficiency from hunter's syndrome.
16	characterization of cystic fibrosis factor and its interaction with human immunoglobulin	Characterization of Cystic Fibrosis Factor and its Interaction with Human Immunoglobulin.
16	development of an equine herpesvirus in two cell culture systems light and electron microscopy	The results of the study are presented in Appendix A. The results of the study are presented in Appendix A.
16	occurrence of bombesin and alytesin in extracts of the skin of three european discoglossid frogs and pharmacological actions of bombesin on extravascular smooth muscle	Bombesin and d'apos; allytesin in skin extracts from three discoglossided European frogs and bombesin's pharmacological action on extravascular smooth muscle.
16	value of desiccated swabs for streptococcal epidemiology in the field	Value of Dried Swabs for Disease Control; Field Streptococcal Epidemiology.
16	characterization of staphylococcus aureus in a pediatric burn unit	Characterization of Staphylococcus aureus in a paediatric unit for the treatment of burns.
16	somatotopic organization of vibrissal responses in the ventro basal complex of the rat thalamus	Somatotopic organization of the vibrating responses in rat thalamus, ventro complex,-basal.
16	perinatal coagulopathies complicating fetal blood sampling	Perinatal coagulopathies (PCs) that complicate the collection of fetal blood.
16	the isolation of glycoproteins from bovine achilles tendon and their interaction with collagen	L'isolation des glycoproteins du tendon d'apos; achille bovin et leurinteraction avec le collagen.
16	delayed hypersensitivity reactions provoked by ribosomes from acid fast bacilli i ribosomal isolation characterization delayed hypersensitivity and specificity	Delayed hypersensitivity reactions caused by fast acidic bacillus ribosomes delayed characterization of the hypersensitivity and specificity.
16	a collagenase in extracts of the invertebrate bipalium kewense	Collagenase in apo extracts; invertebrate bipalium kewense.
16	amyloidogenesis in healing wound electron microscopic studies of biopsied wounds in macular amyloidosis	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index.html.
16	histochemical investigation of the activity of oxidoreductases in the skin lesions of lepromatous leprosy patients	Histochemical study of oxidoreductase activity in leper skin lesions.
16	a test for the determination of competency in clearing bacilli in leprosy patients	A test to determine leper's ability to eliminate leprosy bacilli.
16	activation of the viral genome in simian virus 40 transformed nonpermissive cells by permissive cell extracts	L' Activation of Viral Genome of Simian Virus 40 transforms cells not allowed by permissive cell extracts.
16	effects of heating and cooling the spinal cord and medulla oblongata on thermoregulation in monkeys	Effects of Warming and Cooling Spinal Cord and Spinal Bulb on Heat Regulation in Monkeys.
16	antibody responses to group a streptococcal infections in the hamster	Hamster antibody reactions to cluster streptococcal infection.
16	differences in the urea extracted proteins of mouse epidermis and squamous cell carcinomata determined by fluorescence microscopy	Differences in proteins extracted from mouse urea, squamous cell epidermis, and carcinoma were determined by fluorescence microscopy.
16	fabry s disease differentiation between two forms of galactosidase by myoinositol	Differentiation of Fabry disease between two galactosidase forms by myoinositol.
16	detection of inborn errors of metabolism galactosemia	Detection of inherent errors in the body's galactosemia metabolism.
16	menkes kinky hair disease further definition of the defect in copper transport	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of diseases.
16	sanfilippo disease type b enzyme replacement and metabolic correction in cultured fibroblasts	Health Canada, Health Products and Food Branch, Ottawa, Ontario.
16	the hurler syndrome a study of cultured lymphoid cell lines	The Hurler syndrome, a study of human lymphoid cell lines.
16	effects of intrabrachial arterial infusion of pyruvate on forearm tissue metabolism interrelationships between pyruvate lactate and alanine	Effects of pyruvate intrabranchal arterial infusion on apos tissue metabolism; front-interactions between pyruvate lactate and alanine.
16	spinal pathways projecting to the cerebral first somatosensory area in the monkey	Spinal projection to the first cerebral somatosensory zone in monkeys.
16	selective destruction of skin permeability activity in cholera toxin effect of acid on cholera enterotoxin	The selective destruction of cholera; permeability activity in the skin; effect of the acid cholera toxin on the skin; cholera enterotoxin.
16	effect of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on cell proliferation	Effect of the drug on cell proliferation.
16	subcutaneous bacteria in turkey carcasses	Bacteria under-skin in the carcasses of turkeys.
16	the molecule microscope a new instrument for biological and biomedical research	The molecular microscope is a new tool for biomedical and biological research.
16	two actions of cyclic amp on melanosome movement in frog skin dissection by cytochalasin b	Cytochalasin Amp Cytochalasin b is a cyclic Amp on the movement of melanosomes during dissection of frog skin.
16	familial hypercholesterolemia identification of a defect in the regulation of 3 hydroxy 3 methylglutaryl coenzyme a reductase activity associated with overproduction of cholesterol	In addition, it was found that the metabolism of cholesterol and cholesterol was associated with the production of cholesterol, and that the metabolism of cholesterol and cholesterol was associated with the production of cholesterol.
16	experience with an image analyzing computer in virus plaque measurements	Computer-based image analysis to measure viral plaques.
16	cutaneous basophil hypersensitivity in contact sensitized guinea pigs i transfer with immune serum	Basophilic skin hypersensitivity to immuno-serum-transfer sensitized guinea pigs.
16	interferon production by human cells in vitro	It can also be used as a means of reducing the risk of infection.
16	stimulus response functions of rapidly adapting mechanoreceptors in human glabrous skin area	The function of stimulating the response of the mechanoreceptors of the fast adaptation in the glabrous region of the human skin.
16	production of high titered interferon in cultures of human diploid cells	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
16	schistosoma mansoni infection in mice depleted of thymus dependent lymphocytes i eosinophilia and immunologic responses to a schistosomal egg preparation	Mansoni schistosome infection in thymus-dependent lymphocyte-deprived mice, eosinophilia and immunological responses to the egg schistosome preparation.
16	improved experimental model for measuring skin degerming activity on the human hand	Improved Experimental Design for Measuring Lapse; Skin Movement Activity on the Human Hand.
16	reflex vascular responses to left ventricular outflow obstruction and activation of ventricular baroreceptors in dogs	Reactive vascular reflexes to the left ventricular output and to the left ventricular output; activation of the ventricular bar receptors in the dog.
16	a guide to bullous lesions of the skin	Bubble lesion guide.
16	regulation of cholesterol metabolism in the dog ii effects of complete bile diversion and of cholesterol feeding on pool sizes of tissue cholesterol measured at autopsy	Regulation of cholesterol metabolism in dogs; effects of a complete diversion of bile and bile sac; cholesterol ingestion on tissue cholesterol pools measured at baseline; autopsy.
16	effect of copper containing intrauterine contraceptive devices on human cells in culture	Effect of intra-uterine contraceptive copper on cultured human cells.
16	role of the clotting system in cell mediated hypersensitivity i fibrin deposition in delayed skin reactions in man	Role of coagulation system in apo; cell-mediated hypersensitivity, fibrin deposition, in delayed human skin reactions.
16	indirect cutaneous immunofluorescence ii clinical significance	Indirect Skin Immune Fluorescence (IVF) ii Clinical Significance ii.
16	transient increase in capillary permeability induced by clostridium perfringens type a enterotoxin	Transient enhancement of capillary permeability by Clostridium perfringens type a enterotoxin.
16	chromosome studies in induced abortions	L' study of induced abortion chromosomes.
16	biosynthesis of prostaglandin e 2 in human skin subcellular localization and inhibition by unsaturated fatty acids and anti inflammatory drugs	The biosynthesis of prostaglandin 2 in the subcellular localization of human skin and its inhibition by anti@-@inflammatory drugs and unsaturated fatty acids.
16	color changes unusual melanosomes and a new pigment from leaf frogs	This color changes the unusual melanosomes and a new leaf frog pigment.
16	immunity to syphilis i passive transfer in rabbits with hyperimmune serum	Immunity to syphilis in rabbits with a hyperimmune serum.
16	quantitative aspects of pinocytosis and the intracellular fate of n acetyl alpha d glucosaminidase in sanfilippo b fibroblasts	Quantitative Aspects of Pinocytosis and Intracellular Fate of Glucosal Acetyl Alpha Glucosaminidase in Sanfilippo Fibroblasts b.
16	cultured skin fibroblasts in storage disorders an analysis of ultrastructural features	Analysis of ultrastructural characteristics of cutaneous fibroblasts grown in storage disorders.
16	a sex linked defect in the cross linking of collagen and elastin associated with the mottled locus in mice	A sex-related defect in collagen – elastin cross-linking associated with mouse labelled locus.
16	influence of medroxypregesteroneacetate on testosterone metabolism by cultured human fibroblasts a model for drug steroid interaction	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
16	changes in the fungal autoflora of apollo astronauts	Changes in Apollo Astronaut Fungal Autoflor.
16	a specific collagenase from rabbit fibroblasts in monolayer culture	Specific collagenase activity from single-layer rabbit fibroblasts.
16	attempt to immunize guinea pigs against leukemia by skin scarification with leukemic cell suspensions	To test for leukemia; to immunize guinea pigs against leukemia through the use of leukemia cell suspensions.
16	infectious dna from herpes simplex virus infectivity of double stranded and single stranded molecules	Infectivity of two-stranded and single-stranded molecules; infective viral DNA; herpes simplex.
16	the acquisition of specificity in cutaneous sensory neurons a reconsideration of the integumental specification hypothesis	L' skin sensory neuron specificity acquisition rethinking the apos; hypothesis of integumentary specification.
16	virulence of two mastitis strains of staphylococcus aureus in bovine skin enhancement by growth in high carbohydrate high salt medium or in raw milk	Virulence of two mastitis staphylococcus aureus strains in apos; improved bovine skin by growth in high-carbohydrate salt or raw milk medium.
16	inhibition of cell growth in the g1 phase by adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate	Adenosine 3 @-@5 cyclic monophosphate.
16	lymph flow and lymph protein concentration in the skin and muscle of the rabbit hind limb	Lymphatic fluid and protein concentrations in skin and hindlimb muscles of rabbit.
16	clonal selection attenuation and differentiation in an in vitro model of hyperplasia	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
16	the role of cathepsin d in the pathogenesis of tuberculosis a histochemical study employing unlabeled antibodies and the peroxidase antiperoxidase complex	Cathepsin d's role in the pathogenesis of tuberculosis has been the subject of a histochemical study using unlabeled antibodies and peroxidase peroxidase complex.
16	relationship of unkeratinized skin to bovine fetal mummification an hypothesis	The relationship between the nonkeratinized skin and the fetal bovine mummification is hypothesized.
16	follicular contact dermatitis due to coloured permanent pressed sheets	Follicular contact caused by permanent pressed, coloured and permanent sheets.
16	antinociceptive action of bradykinin and related kinins of larger molecular weights by the intraventricular route	Antinociceptive action of higher molecular weight bradykinin and related kinins via the intraventricular route.
16	the contribution of membrane hyperpolarization to adaptation and conduction block in sensory neurones of the leech	The contribution of membrane hyperpolarization to the ability of leech sensory neurons to adapt and block conduction.
16	relative rates of transcapillary movement of free thyroxine protein bound thyroxine thyroxine binding proteins and albumin	Relative rates of transcapillary thyroxine-free protein movement bind thyroxine-binding proteins to l' thyroxine albumin.
16	assignment of three gene loci pgk hgprt g6pd to the long arm of the human x chromosome by somatic cell genetics	L' assignment of three pgk hgprt g6pd gene loci to the human x chromosome long arm by somatic cell genetics.
16	immunoglobulin in clinically uninvolved skin in systemic lupus erythematosus association with renal disease	Immunoglobulin in skin clinically not implicated in lupus erythematosus; association of disseminated lupus erythematosus with kidney disease.
16	the immunopathology of epidermolysis bullosa acquisita	Dietary Reference Intakes: a prospective study.
16	recommended daily allowances for vitamin c	Recommended Daily Vitamin Allowances c.
16	deficient dna repair in human progeroid cells	Deficient repair of apo; DNA in the human progeroid cells.
16	a guide to the histological identification of fungi in tissues	Guide for Disease Control; Histological Identification of Fungi in Tissue.
16	vascular leakage through intraendothelial channels induced by cholera toxin in the skin of guinea pigs	Cholera toxin-induced vascular leak in intraendothelial ducts in guinea pig skin.
16	collagen biosynthesis in nonfibroblastic cell lines	Collagen synthesis in non-fibroblastic cell lines.
16	effectiveness of septisol antiseptic foam as a surgical scrub agent	Effectiveness of antiseptic septic foam as surgical washing agent.
16	isolation and characterization of corynebacteria from burned children	Characterization and isolation of corynebacteria in burnt children.
16	evidence for fetal antigen in human sarcoma	In addition, it is not possible to determine the cause of death.
16	collagen polymorphism characterization of molecules with the chain composition alpha 1 3 03 in human tissues	Characterization of collagen polymorphism in human tissue alpha-103 molecules.
16	bicycle injuries in children	Children's bicycle injuries.
16	evidence that axoplasmic transport of trophic factors is involved in the regulation of peripheral nerve fields in salamanders	Evidence suggests that axoplasmic transport of trophic factors plays a role in regulating salamander peripheral nerve fields.
16	extracellular factor synthesized by bacillus cereus which evokes a dermal reaction in guinea pigs	Extracellular factor synthesized by the bacillus cereus suggestive of dermal response in guinea pigs.
16	the importance of the included serum proteins in the immune response in rabbits to a rat skin xenograft	The importance of serum proteins in rabbits' immune response to rat skin xenograft was emphasized.
16	neutralization studies with marek s disease virus and turkey herpesvirus	It is important to note that it is not possible to determine the cause of the virus.
16	evidence for complement activation via the alternate pathway in skin diseases i herpes gestationis systemic lupus erythematosus and bullous pemphigoid	Evidence of lupus; activation of alternative pathway complement in gestation herpes systemic and bulleous pemphigoidal skin diseases.
16	cartilage collagen a staggered substructure in reconstituted fibrils	Cartilaginous collagen is a subset of cartilaginous collagen.
16	pain perception modification of threshold of intolerance and cortical potentials by cutaneous stimulation	Injury is a symptom of a person's sense of self-consciousness, which can result in loss of self-control.
16	prostaglandin activity in human cutaneous inflammation detection by radioimmunoassay	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	microfilaments in epidermal cancer cells	Microfilaments in the cells of the epidermal cancer.
16	systemic lupus erythematosus studies of the antibodies bound to skin	Studies of skin-bound antibody disseminated lupus erythematosus.
16	phage typing of coagulase negative staphylococci and micrococci	Lysotyping negative coagulase micrococci and staphylococci.
16	trophic skin ulceration of leprosy skin and serum zinc concentrations	Trophic leprosy skin ulceration and zinc serum levels.
16	one death and a cluster of febrile complications related to saline abortions	One death and a cluster of saline abortion-related febrile complications.
16	daytime variation in the density of onchocerca volvulus microfilariae in human skin	Diurnal variation of microfilariae d' volvulus onchocerca in human skin.
16	skin tests with influenza virus	Infectious Diseases, Infectious Diseases and Infectious Disease.
16	dispersal and transfer of staphylococcus aureus in an isolation ward for burned patients	Staphylococcus aureus spread and transfer to apo ward; isolation for burn patients.
16	defect in conversion of procollagen to collagen in a form of ehlers danlos syndrome	Procollagen failure to convert to collagen as ehlers danlos syndrome.
16	preoperative sterilization of the perineum a comparison of six antiseptics	Preoperative perineal sterilization by comparison of six antiseptics.
16	cutaneous and ocular reactions to practolol	Skin and Eye Reactions to Practolol.
16	cell mediated immunity in humans during viral infection i effect of rubella on dermal hypersensitivity phytohemagglutinin response and t lymphocyte numbers	Human cell-mediated immunity during apo placenta; rubella viral infection effects on apo placentae; phytohemagglutinin skin hypersensitivity response and lymphocyte t lymphocyte count.
16	development of a purified cholera toxoid ii preparation of a stable antigenic toxoid by reaction of purified toxin with glutaraldehyde	Anatoxin is a stable antigenic anatoxin by the reaction of the purified toxin with glutaraldehyde.
16	relationship of antimicrobial cellular immunity to delayed hypersensitivity in listeriosis	Relationship of immune system to immune system; delayed hypersensitivity to listeriosis.
16	skin testing of guinea pigs and footpad testing of mice with a new antigen for detecting delayed hypersensitivity to cryptococcus neoformans	Guinea pig skin tests and mouse foot pad tests with novel antigen for delayed hypersensitivity to cryptococcus neoformans.
16	saphenous nerve injury caused by stripping of the long saphenous vein	Long saphenous vein stripping injury to the saphenous nerve.
16	instability of polymeric skin collagen in osteogenesis imperfecta	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	chemical characterization of isolated epidermal desmosomes	Isolated epidermal desmosomes are characterized chemically.
16	uptake and release of bilirubin by skin	Absorption and bilirubin release through skin.
16	role of sweat in accumulation of orally administered griseofulvin in skin	The role of the sweat in the body; accumulation of the graiseofulvin administered orally in the skin.
16	cutaneous reflexes in small muscles of the hand	Skin reflexes in the hand's small muscles.
16	onchocerciasis in canada	Canadian onchocerciasis.
16	skin scales among airborne particles	It is important to keep in mind that there are many different types of skin scales.
16	elimination of bacteria from dogs with antibiotics	Bacterial removal in antibiotic-treated dogs.
16	cytotoxic activity of mycobacterium ulcerans	Mycobacterium ulcerans cytotoxic activity.
16	the behaviour of carcinoma of the large bowel in man following transplantation into immune deprived mice	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control, Public Health Agency of Canada.
16	tetracycline and acne vulgaris a clinical and laboratory investigation	Tetracycline and the common acne are both clinical and laboratory studies.
16	from phisohex to hibiscrub	Hibiscrub phisohex.
16	sj gren larsson syndrome in two sibs with peripheral nerve involvement and bisalbuminaemia	Pancar larsson sj syndrome in two siblings with peripheral nerve involvement.
16	retention of 14c labeled tuberculin purified protein derivative in the skin of sensitized and nonsensitized animals	Retention of 14c-labelled tuberculin-purified protein derivative in sensitized and unsensitized animals.
16	effect of estrogen therapy on climacteric symptoms and tissue changes	Estrogen therapy for climacterial symptoms and tissue changes.
16	dna repair in potorous tridactylus	Repair of apos; DNA of potent tridactylus.
16	distribution of serratia species in clinical specimens	Serratia species distribution in clinical specimens.
16	regulation of blood flow in paget s disease of bone	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	responses in human a and c fibres to repeated electrical intradermal stimulation	Reactions of human a- and c-fiber to repeated, electrical, intradermal stimulation.
16	naegleria another pathogenic ameba studies in germfree guinea pigs	Naegleria, another study in germ-free guinea pigs.
16	human mycobacterium ulcerans infections developing at sites of trauma to skin	Infections with human ulcer mycobacteria developing on skin-trauma sites.
16	hexachlorophene in mice effects after long term percutaneous applications	Effects of Hexachlorophenes on mice following long-term percutaneous application.
16	the effect of travase on heat injured skin	L' travase effect on heat-injured skin.
16	the pathology of tangier disease a light and electron microscopic study	The pathology of pitch disease was studied by light- and electron-microscopy methods.
16	mucous metaplasia and gap junctions in the vitamin a acid treated skin tumor keratoacanthoma	Vitamin a acid-treated keratoacanthoma skin tumour has mucosal metastaplasia and gap junctions.
16	dynamic telethermography in mammary carcinoma	Mammary carcinoma dynamic telethermography.
16	afferent connections to the fast conduction pathway in the central nervous system of the leech hirudo medicinalis	Connects to the central nervous system rapid conduction pathway of the hirudo medicinalis leech.
16	testosterone 5alpha reductase in rat skin homogenates measurement in the skin at various anatomical sites in males and females	In rat skin homogenates, testosterone 5alpha reductase measures in the skin at a variety of anatomical sites in both sexes.
16	changes in the mitotic cycle induced by alpha solanine	The results of this study are summarized below.
16	cutaneous everted nipple ureterostomy	Tin skin urethostomy with effilochage.
16	tyrosinases in rana pipiens purification and physical properties	Rana pipiens, R.S., R.S.C., R.S.C., R.S.C., R.S.C.
16	osmotic gradients across snail epidermis evidence for a water barrier	In addition, it is not possible to determine the origin of the material, but it is important to determine the origin of the material.
16	evidence of cholecystokinin release by bombesin in the dog	Evidence of canine release of cholecystokinin from bombesin.
16	arteriosclerotic changes within the diabetic oral vasculature	Arteriosclerotic changes in oral vascular system.
16	ultrastructural studies of keratinized epithelia of the mouse iii determination of the volumes of nuclei and cytoplasm of cells in murine epidermis	Ultrastructural studies of keratinized mouse epithelia iii determine nucleus volumes and cell cytoplasm in the mouse epidermis.
16	epidermal chalone and cyclic amp an in vivo study	Epidermal cholesterol and cholesterol levels in drinking water.
16	the effect of vitamin a on growth and differentiation of human keratinocytes in vitro	Vitamin a effects on human keratinocyte growth and differentiation in vitro.
16	in vitro epidermal cell proliferation in rat skin plugs	In vitro proliferation of epidermal cells in cutaneous plugs.
16	glycocalyx of epidermal cells in vitro demonstration and enzymatic removal	Epidermal glycocalyx in vitro and enzymic removal.
16	ultrastructural studies of keratinized epithelia of the mouse iv quantitative studies of lysosomes	Ultrastructural studies of keratinized mouse epithelia iv.
16	persistent individual differences in the bacterial flora of the skin of the forehead numbers of propionibacteria	Persistent individual differences in skin bacterial flora of forehead propionibacter numbers.
16	ultrastructural localization of in vivo bound immunoglobulins in bullous pemphigoid a preliminary report	Ultrastructural localization of immunoglobulins bound in vivo in pemphigoid bulldozers has been tentatively reported.
16	congenital circumscribed hypomelanosis a characterization based on electron microscopic study of tuberous sclerosis nevus depigmentosus and piebaldism	Confined congenital hypermelanosis, an electron microscopic characterization of nevus depigmentosus tuberous sclerosis and piebaldism.
16	morphometric evaluation of sebaceous gland volume in intact castrated and testosterone treated rats	Morphometric evaluation of the volume of the sebaceous glands in intact, testosterone-treated, castrated rats.
16	treatment of variola major with cytosine arabinoside	Cytosine arabinoside treatment for major smallpox.
16	normal and branched alkanes from cast skins of the grasshopper schistocerca vaga scudder	Alkanes normal and branched from flows of the schistocerca vaga scudder grasshopper.
16	xenoplastic combinations between chick chorionic epithelium and fetal monkey dermis	Xenoplastic combinations between the epithelium of the chicken and the fetal dermis of the monkey.
16	subepidermal deposition of immunoglobulin in nzb nzw f hybrid mice	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	acute destruction of rat skin grafts by alloantisera	Acute destruction of skin grafts by alloantiers.
16	the transfer of tolerance to dncb contact sensitivity in guinea pigs by parabiosis	Transfer of sensitivity tolerance upon contact with dncb in parabiosis guinea pigs.
16	esterification of low density lipoprotein cholesterol in human fibroblasts and its absence in homozygous familial hypercholesterolemia	Cholesterol Esterification of Low Density Lipoprotein in Human Fibroblasts and cholesterol Absence in the Homozygous Family Hypercholesterolemia.
16	antibody to myosin the specific visualization of myosin containing filaments in nonmuscle cells	Myosin antibody myosin specific visualization of filament-containing myosin in nonmuscle cells.
16	plasma membrane components of skin fibroblasts from normal individuals and patients with cystic fibrosis	Plasma membrane components of normal and cystic fibrosis skin fibroblasts.
16	variation in the phenotypic expression of beta glucuronidase deficiency	Variation in apos; β-glucuronidase deficiency phenotypic expression.
16	polyinosinic polycytidylic acid inhibition of cell proliferation in carcinogen treated epidermis and in carcinogen induced skin tumors in mice	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
16	correlation between the carcinogenicities of nitrofuran derivatives and their destructive actions on sebaceous glands of mouse skin	Correlation between the carcinogenicity of the nitrofuran derivatives and their destructive action on the sebaceous glands of the mouse skin.
16	variation in response of channel catfish to henneguya sp infections protozoa myxosporidea	Variation in channel catfish response to protozoan henneguya sp. myxosporidea infections.
16	human antigen and enzyme markers in man chinese hamster somatic cell hybrids evidence for synteny between the hl a pgm3 me1 and ipo b loci	Human antigen and antibody markers in Chinese hamster somatic cell hybrids show synteny between pgm3 me1 and ipo b.
16	free and membrane bound ribosomes in normal and methylcholanthrene treated mouse epidermis	Free and membrane-bound ribosomes in normal, methylcholanthrene-treated mouse epidermis.
16	prostaglandins kinin and inflammation in the rat	Prostaglandins kinins and rat inflammation.
16	preoperative disinfection of surgeons hands use of alcoholic solutions and effects of gloves on skin flora	Pre-operative disinfection of the hands of the surgeons; use of alcoholic solutions and the effects of the gloves on the flora of the skin.
16	disinfection of the skin with detergent preparations of irgasan dp 300 and other antiseptics	Skin disinfection with 300 dp irgasan and dapos detergent preparations; other antiseptic.
16	locked in syndrome report of seven cases	Syndrome report locked on seven.
16	percutaneous aspiration biopsy of the pancreas under ultrasonic guidance	Percutaneous pancreatic aspiration ultrasound biopsy.
16	lobomycosis as a disease of the atlantic bottle nosed dolphin tursiops truncatus montagu 1821	Lobomycosis as tursiops truncatus dolphin disease monttagu 1821.
16	onchocerciasis in guatemala iii daytime periodicity of microfilariae in skin	Onchocerciasis in Guatemala iii diurnal microfilariae periodicity in the skin.
16	onchocerciasis prevalence of microfilaruria and other manifestations in village of cameroon	Onchocerciasis microfilaruria and dapos prevalence; other manifestations in the cameroon village.
16	methods for evaluating topical antibacterial agents on human skin	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	the effects of x irradiation on the mechanical properties of skin	Effects of apo; radiation on skin mechanical properties.
16	oral contraceptives and porphyria cutanea tarda	Oral contraceptives and skin porphyria later than normal.
16	skin graft survival on avascular defects	Survival of avascular defect skin graft.
16	ultrastructural studies of regenerating spines of the sea urchin strongylocentrotus purpuratus i cell types without spherules	Ultrastructural studies of thorns regenerating apos cells; urchin, Strongylocentrotus purpuratus i, without spherules.
16	lipoid proteinosis report of 2 cases with histology of the vocal folds	Two cases of lipoidal proteinosis (PLP) with vocal fold histology were reported.
16	the anti map and anti group a carbohydrate antibodies response in streptococcal human infections	Anti- and anti-group carbohydrate antibody response card in human streptococcal infections.
16	renal excretion of fluoride in renal failure and after renal transplantation	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
16	expression in organ culture of agouti locus genes of the mouse	Expression in mouse agouti gene organ cultures.
16	the development of the primitive epithelium and true tegument in the cercaria of schistosoma mansoni	The development of primitive epithelium and true integument in schistosoma mansoni cercaria.
16	the sebotrophic effect of pregnancy	L'est-ce que l'est-ce que l'est-ce que la grossesse sebotrophique.
16	glycosidases in human skin fibroblast cultures alpha fucosidase alpha galactosidase alpha glucosidase beta mannosidase and n acetyl alpha glucosaminidase	Glycosidases in nacetyl alpha glucosaminidase beta mannosidase and nacetyl alpha glucosaminidase alpha galactosidase alpha human skin fibroblast cultures.
16	morphochemical analysis of mucosubstances in some epithelial tissues of the eel anguilla japonica	Morphochemical analysis of certain epithelial tissues of eel eel eel eel japonica.
16	benzene hexachloride poisoning in cattle	Toxicity to livestock by benzene hexachloride.
16	hypotrichosis in miniature poodle siblings	Hypotrichosis in miniature poodles.
16	transformation of horse skin cells by type c sarcoma viruses	Horse skin cell transformation by c-type sarcoma viruses.
16	new type of exfoliatin obtained from staphylococcal strains belonging to phage groups other than group ii isolated from patients with impetigo and ritter s disease	A new type of exfoliatin from strains of staphylococci belonging to groups of phages other than group ii has been isolated from patients with both impetigo and rash.
16	streptozotocin therapy in 22 cancer patients	The Effect of Streptozotocin Therapy on the Treatment of Streptozotocin Patients.
16	physiochemical and biological properties of the major basic protein from guinea pig eosinophil granules	Physiochemical and biological properties of guinea pig eosinophilic granule major basic protein.
16	a selective stain for mast cells	Mastocyte-selective spot.
16	effects of human chorionic gonadotropin preparations on complement in vitro	Effects of Human Chorionic Gonadotropin Preparations on In Vitro Supplement.
16	stimulation of synthesis of free chondroitin sulfate chains by beta d xylosides in cultured cells	Stimulation of free chondroitin-sulfate chain synthesis by beta-xylosides in cultured cells.
16	capillary density in developing and healing tuberculous lesions produced by bcg in rabbits a quantitative study	Capillary Density in Development and Recovery of BcG Tuberculosis Lesions in Rabbits, Quantitative Study.
16	phosphate compounds in bone scanning	Bone-scintigraphic phosphates.
16	altered control of skin blood flow at high skin and core temperatures	Control of cutaneous blood circulation at elevated skin and heart temperatures.
16	effect of chronic hypercapnia on body temperature regulation	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack.
16	animal experiments in radiotherapy iii large versus small animals	Radiation Animal Experiences iii Large versus Small Animals.
16	dose fractionation schedules biologic aspects and applications to high let radiotherapy	Dose splitting plans for both biological aspects and high-dose radiotherapy applications.
16	clinical trials with new radiation modalities	Clinical trials with novel radiation modalities.
16	intradermal catabolism of rabbit igg and its fragments	Intradermal rabbit catabolism and fragments.
16	increased collagen synthesis by scleroderma skin fibroblasts in vitro a possible defect in the regulation or activation of the scleroderma fibroblast	L' increased synthesis of collagen by skin fibroblasts of scleroderma in vitro may constitute a defect in regulation or l' activation of the fibroblast of scleroderma.
16	sanfilippo a syndrome sulfamidase deficiency in cultured skin fibroblasts and liver	Sanfilippo has a sulfamidase deficiency syndrome (SSA) in cutaneous fibroblast cultures and liver.
16	systemic nodular panniculitis with cardiac involvement	Panniculitis nodulea systemic with cardiac involvement.
16	a clinico radiological survey of deep venous thrombosis of the leg	A clinical radiological study of deep leg vein thrombosis.
16	operations for lymphoedema of the lower limbs a study of the results in 108 operations utilizing vascularized dermal flaps	Lower limb lymphedema surgery: results from 108 procedures using vascularized dermal remnants.
16	skin changes secondary to hydroxyurea therapy	Skin Changes Resulting from Apos Therapy; hydroxyurea.
16	livedo vasculitis the vasculitis of atrophie blanche immunohistopathologic study	Livingo vasculitis vasculitis; white atrophy immunohistopathological study.
16	mummified cutaneous mixed tumor	Mixed skin tumor, mummified.
16	intralesional triamcinolone therapy for pretibial myxedema	Pretibital myxedema triamcinolone intralesion therapy.
16	fixed long ultraviolet eruption	This is a long-lived ultraviolet rash.
16	epidermolysis bullosa acquisita with electron microscopical studies	Epidermolysis bullosa acquired from electron microscopy.
16	acute eruptive darier disease keratosis follicularis	Acute, rash-like illness of the follicular keratose stinger.
16	erythema gyratum repens with metastatic adenocarcinoma	Erythema gyratum repens metastatic adenocarcinoma.
16	the skin in the winchester syndrome	Winchester syndrome skin.
16	dermatomyositis in six patients without initial muscle involvement	In six patients with no initial muscle involvement, Dermatomyositis.
16	mast cells in the epidermis of piebaldism	Mastocytes in the apos; piebald epidermis.
16	the permeability barrier in mammalian epidermis	The barrier of permeability in the epidermis of mammals.
16	changes in distribution pattern of cytoplasmic filaments in human melanocytes during ultraviolet mediated melanin pigmentation the role of the 100 angstrom filaments in the elongation of melanocytic dendrites and in the movement and transfer of melanosomes	Changes in the pattern of cytoplasmic filament distribution in human melanocytes during apo-mediated melanin pigmentation; ultraviolet, role of 100 apo filaments; angstrom in apo; melanocytic dendrite elongation and melanoma movement and transfer.
16	the fine structure and cell kinetics of mouse epidermis after wounding	The fine structure and the cellular kinetics of the epidermis of the mouse after injury.
16	distribution and metabolism of 2 4 5 2 5 pentachlorobiphenyl	Distribution and Metabolism of Pentachlorobiphenyl.
16	pneumatic orthosis pilot study	Pilot Study on Pneumatic Orthotics.
16	long term maintenance of psoriatic human skin on congenitally athymic nude mice	Diese Möglichkeit, M.A. and M.A. Schneider, eds.
16	cutaneous effects of topical indomethacin an inhibitor of prostaglandin synthesis on uv damaged skin	Skin effects of l' topical indomethacin, a prostaglandin synthesis inhibitor, on the skin damaged by l' uv.
16	epidermal synthesis of prostaglandins and their effect on levels of cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate	Prostaglandin epidermal synthesis and its effect on cyclic adenosine levels.
16	the effect of anthralin and its derivatives on epidermal cell kinetics	The effect of anthraline and its derivatives on the kinetics of the epidermal cells.
16	prostaglandin and dna synthesis in human skin possible relationship to ultraviolet light effects	The synthesis of prostaglandins and DNA in human skin may also be related to the effects of ultraviolet light.
16	cyclic 3 5 nucleotide phosphodiesterase in rat skin ii biochemical characterization	Rat skin cyclic nucleotide 3-5 phosphodiesterase ii biochemical characterization.
16	esterification of 4 14c cholesterol by cutaneous bacteria staphylococcus epidermidis propionibacterium acnes and propionibacterium granulosum	Cholesterol Esterification 4c 14c by Staphylococcus epidermidis propionibacterium acnes et propionibacterium granulosum.
16	analysis of lipid composition of isolated human sebaceous gland homogenates after incubation with cutaneous bacteria thin layer chromatography	Analysis of lipid composition; homogenates isolated from human sebaceous glands after thin-layer chromatography incubation with skin bacteria.
16	the effects of a nonsteroid antiandrogen flutamide on sebaceous gland activity	The effects of a non-steroidal anti-androgen flutamide on the immune system; activity of the glands.
16	vasoconstrictor activities of some novel synthetic steroids in alcoholic solution	Vasoconstrictor Activity of Some New Synthetic Steroids in Alcoholic Solution.
16	movement of beta irradiated epidermal basal cells to the spinous granular layers in the absence of cell division	Movement of basal beta-irradiated epidermal cells to spiny granular layers in l' lack of cell division.
16	human necrotizing vasculitis immunoglobulins and complement in vessel walls of cutaneous lesions and normal skin	Immune globulin antibodies against human necrotizing vasculitis and vascular wall complement antibodies against skin lesions and normal skin.
16	in vivo studies of sterol and squalene secretion by human skin	In Vivo Studies of Sterol and Squalene Secretion by Human Skin.
16	immunoglobulin deposits in skin in systemic lupus erythematosus	Erythrocytes are the most common type of lupus and the most common type of lupus.
16	comparison of the cyanogen bromide peptides of insoluble guinea pig skin and scar collagen	Comparison of peptides to cyanogen bromide in the insoluble skin of guinea pig and the scar collagen.
16	structural studies of alpha melanocyte stimulating hormone and a novel beta melanocyte stimulating hormone from the neurointermediate lobe of the pituitary of the dogfish squalus acanthias	Apos structural studies; melanocytic alpha-hormia and dapos; a new melanocytic neuro-lobe beta hormone-intermediates; apos pituitary; squalus acanthias aiguillate.
16	studies on onchocerca cervicalis railliet and henry 1910 v the development of onchocerca cervicalis larvae in the vectors	Cervical onchocerciasis, onchocerciasis, onchocerciasis, onchocerciasis, onchocerciasis, onchocerciasis, onchocerciasis, and onchocerciasis.
16	a comparative study of horseradish peroxidase conjugates prepared with a one step and a two step method	A comparative study of one-step and two-step horseradish peroxidase conjugates.
16	comparative ultrahistochemistry of the adepidermal granules of salmo irideus lebistis reticulatus and hynobiuo tokyoensis enzyme digestive experiment for the epoxy embedded sections	L' comparative ultrastructural analysis of adepidermal salmo irideus lebistis reticulatus and l' hynobiuo tokyoensis was tested by enzymatic digestion of coated d' epoxy sections.
16	a comparison of hexachlorophene and lactacyd on growth of skin flora in healthy term newborn infants	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
16	pacemaker infections a 12 year review	Infections caused by heart disease and stroke.
16	self inoculation with milk as a cause of recurrent cellulitis	L' auto-milk inoculation as cause of recurrent cellulitis.
16	correlation of human in vivo and in vitro cutaneous antimicrobial factors	In vivo and in vitro correlations of antimicrobial skin factors in humans.
16	transient bacteremia associated with percutaneous liver biopsy	Percutaneous hepatic biopsy with transient bacteremia.
16	control of sterol synthesis and of hydroxymethylglutaryl coa reductase in skin fibroblasts grown from patients with homozygous type ii hyperlipoproteinemia	Control of sterol and lido synthesis; hydroxymethylglutaryl coa reductase activity in skin fibroblasts obtained from patients with type II homozygous hyperlipoproteinemia.
16	pressure dependent factors in edema formation in canine forelimbs	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury by determining the cause of the injury.
16	an analysis of the specificity in pharmacological inhibition of the passive cutaneous anaphylaxis reaction in mice and rats	Specificity analysis of apo; pharmacological inhibition of passive anaphylactic skin reaction in mouse and rat.
16	the isolation and characterization of polycyclic hydrocarbon binding proteins from mouse liver and skin cytosols	Isolation and characterization of polycyclic hydrocarbon-binding proteins in mouse liver and mouse skin cytosols.
16	procollagen peptidase its mode of action on the native substrate	Procollagen peptidase works on native substrate.
16	growth in agarose of human cells infected with cytomegalovirus	Agarose growth of cytomegalovirus-infected human cells.
16	theoretical and experimental principles and clinical aplications of the antiandrognes author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of research projects in the field of human rights.
16	an unusual variant of klippel trenaunay weber syndrome	Unusual Klippel Trenaunay Weber variant.
16	capacities of humans and monkeys to discriminate vibratory stimuli of different frequency and amplitude a correlation between neural events and psychological measurements	The ability of humans and monkeys to distinguish vibratory stimuli of different frequencies and amplitudes, a correlation between psychological measures and neural events.
16	effect of zinc deficiency and repletion on thymidine metabolism	In addition, it is not possible to determine the effect of zinc on the metabolism of thymidine.
16	vitiligo and dysgammaglobulinemia a case report and family study	Vitiligo and dysgammaglobulinemia, case report, and family study.
16	afferent new fiber activity responding to temperature changes of scrotal skin of the rat	A new afferent fibrous activity responds to changes in skin temperature in rat scrotum.
16	cerebroside sulfatase activity in cultivated human skin fibroblasts and amniotic fluid cells	L' activity of cerebroside sulfatase in cultured human skin fibroblasts and in cells of amniotic fluid.
16	the locus for human adenine phosphoribosyltransferase on chromosome no 16	The human l' adenine phosphoribosyltransferase locus on chromosome 16.
16	a disease of freshwater fishes caused by tetrahymena corlissi thompson 1955 and a key for identification of holotrich ciliates of freshwater fishes	Apo fish disease; freshwater tetrahymena thompson 1955 and key; identification of holotrichous ciliates of fishes; freshwater.
16	studies on the immune status of patients with renal adenocarcinoma	It is important to note that these studies are not intended to be used in isolation.
16	fatal pox infection in a rough legged hawk	Rough-legged falcon fatal smallpox infection.
16	the histopathology of fin rot disease in winter flounder from the new york bight	L' fin rot histopathology in New York Bay winter flounder.
16	stimulus response functions of slowly adapting mechanoreceptors in the human glabrous skin area	Slow adaptation in the glabrous region of human skin, stimulates the response of mechanoreceptors.
16	ibuprofen or aspirin in rheumatoid arthritis therapy	Aspirin or Ibuprofen in the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis.
16	properties of strains of escherichia coli isolated from a variety of sources	Properties of isolates from various sources.
16	clinical implications of the presence of drug residues in food	Health Canada, Food and Drug Regulations, Food and Drug Regulations.
16	persistent modification of synaptic interactions between sensory and motor nerve cells following discrete lesions in the central nervous system of the leech	Persistent modification of motor and sensory nerve cell synaptic interactions as a result of discrete lesions in the leech central nervous system.
16	mouse skin tumorigenesis and induction of aryl hydrocarbon hydroxylase by tobacco smoke fractions	Cigarette smoking fractions: a prospective study.
16	characterization of spontaneous chemicak and viral transformants of a c3h 3t3 type mouse cell line by transplantation into young chick blastoderms	Characterization of spontaneous chemicak and apos viral transformants; a c3h 3t3 mouse cell line transplant into young chick blastoderms.
16	self mutilation in mice associated with otitis media	Auto-Mouse Mutilation with Mild Otitis Media.
16	prolonged inhibition of mouse epidermal dna synthesis by dexamethasone	Prolonged inhibition of synthesis of the epidermal DNA of mice by dexamethasone.
16	role of human skin in the photodecomposition of bilirubin	Role of Human Skin in the Photodecomposition of Bilirubin.
16	half lives of two types of rat homocytotropic antibodies in circulation and in the skin	It is important to note that there are two types of antibody: antibody to rat and antibody to rat skin.
16	subcellular fractions from dermis and epidermis in contact sensitization of guinea pigs to 1 chloro 2 4 dinitrobenzene	Subcellular dermal and epidermal features; epidermis in sensitization to 1-chloro-24-dinitrobenzene contact with guinea pigs.
16	studies in immunodermatology vi if studies of autoantibodies to the stratum corneum and of in vivo fixed igg in stratum corneum of psoriatic lesions	Immunodermatology studies vi s auto-antibody to stratum corneum and in vivo fixed igg in psoriatic lesion stratum corneum.
16	studies in immunodermatology vii four compartment system studies of igg in stratum corneum and of stratum corneum antigen in biopsies of psoriasis and control dermatoses	Immunodermatology studies vii four-compartment systems; stratum corneum and stratum corneum igg studies; stratum corneum antigen studies in psoriasis and control dermatoses.
16	influence of ascorbic acid on ribosomal patterns and collagen biosynthesis in healing wounds of scorbutic guinea pigs	"""Ascorbic acid on ribosomal patterns and collagen biosynthesis in the healing of the scorbutic guinea guinea guinea guinea guinea pigs"", Arch."
16	gloved hand as applicator of antiseptic to operation sites	Hand gloved as applicator; antiseptic at sites; operation.
16	a newly reported toxic australian frog genus heleioporus	A new genus of Australian frog, Heleioporus.
16	involvement of the skin in late infantile and juvenile amaurotic idiocies neuronal ceroid lipofuscinoses	Skin involvement in juvenile late amaurotic idiocy, neuronal ceronal lipofuscinoses of lipofuscinosis.
16	an evaluation of skin snip techniques used in the quantitative assessment of microfilarial densities of onchocerca volvulus	Evaluation of the techniques used in cutting the skin; quantitative evaluation of the density of microfilariae in the skin; onchocerca volvulus.
16	a new look at osteogenesis imperfecta a clinical radiological and biochemical study of forty two patients	A new look at osteogenesis; an imperfecta, a study of radiology and clinical biochemistry in 42 patients.
16	relationship between lipids in plasma and skin secretions of neonatal calf with particular reference to linoleic acid	Plasma lipid ratio to neonatal calf skin secretion, particularly with respect to apos; linoleic acid.
16	saprophytic occurrence of trichophyton mentagrophytes and microsporum gypseum in the coats of healthy laboratory animals preliminary report	Saprophytic presence of gypsum trichophyton mentagrophytes and microsporum in the coats of d' healthy laboratory animals, preliminary report.
16	mycotic flora of the interdigital spaces of the human foot a preliminary investigation	Mycotic flora of human foot interdigital spaces.
16	an on line system for measurement of opacity pulse propagation times in atraumatic screening of patients for occlusive vascular disease	An on-line system to measure the time of propagation of pulses; opacity in the atraumatic detection of occlusive vascular diseases in patients.
16	nondestructive measurements of the properties of healing burn scars	Non-destructive measurement of burn scar healing properties.
16	werner s syndrome autopsy report of one case with a review of pathologic findings reported in the literature	In addition to the above, there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that there is a causal relationship between the risk and the risk.
16	letter side benefits of the pill	The pill's advantages are right next to the letters.
16	reticulosarcoma like skin lesions in phenylketonuria author s transl	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry.
16	role of meningococcal endotoxin in meningococcal purpura	Role of Loin; Meningococcal Endotoxin in Meningococcal Purpura.
16	the role of the skin in active specific immunization against leukemia in guinea pigs	The Role of Skin in Active Specific Vaccination against Leukemia in Guinea pigs.
16	demonstration and assaying of igg antibodies in tissues and on cells by labeled staphylococcal protein a	Demonstration and quantitation of antibody levels in tissues and cells at baseline; aid of labelled staphylococcal protein.
16	absolute concentrations of dithranol and triacetyl dithranol in the skin layers after local treatment in vivo investigations with four different types of pharmaceutical vehicles	Absolute skin layer concentrations of dithranol and triacetyl dithranol after in vivo local treatment with four different types of pharmaceutical vehicles.
16	effect of polysorbate 85 on human skin	Effect of Polysorbate 85 on Human Skin.
16	the innervation of hyperplastic epidermis in the mouse a light microscopic study	L' mouse innervation; hyperplastic epidermis was studied by light microscopy.
16	the detection of carotenoid pigments in human skin	Carotenoid pigment detection in human skin.
16	lattice and rodlet nuclear inclusions in merkel cells in rabbit epidermis	Nuclear inclusion in network and rods in the merkel cells of l' rabbit epidermis.
16	distribution of radioactivity in the organs of the rat and mouse after injection of l 3h prolyl l leucyl glycinamide	Radioactivity distribution in rat and mouse organs after apos; prolyl leucyl glycinamide 3h injection.
16	feeding of boophilus microplus larvae on a partially defined medium through thin slices of cattle skin	Feeding of microplus boophilus larvae on a medium partially defined by thin bovine skin slices.
16	isotope kinetics of human skin cholesterol secretion	Isotropic kinetics of the secretion of human skin cholesterol.
16	relief of pain by transcutaneous stimulation	Pain relief, transcutaneous stimulation.
16	skin carcinogenesis cholesterol 5alpha 6alpha epoxide hydrase activity in mouse skin irradiated with ultraviolet light	Cholesterol Skin Cancer 5alpha 6alpha Lapos activity; epoxide hydrates in ultraviolet-irradiated mouse skin.
16	prevention of malignant change in mammalian cells during prolonged culture in vitro	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	topical treatment of dermatophytoses and candidoses	Topical dermatophytosis and candidiasis treatment.
16	t rosettes in alcoholic cirrhosis of the liver	T rosettes in liver alcoholic cirrhosis.
16	patients with ehlers danlos syndrome type iv lack type iii collagen	Patients with Type IV Danlo Ehlers syndrome do not have collagen type iii.
16	human epidermal growth factor isolation and chemical and biological properties	Determine the rate of growth of the human epidermal growth factor.
16	response of muscular and cutaneous vessels to physiologic stimulation of chemoreceptors 38505	Muscle and skin vessels respond to physiological chemoreceptor stimulation 38505.
16	distribution and metabolism of 3h 2 5 2 5 tetrachlorobiphenyl in rats	Tetrachlorobiphenyl 3h, 5h, 5h, 5h5 metabolism in rats.
16	kaposi s varicelliform eruption complicating local facial trauma case report	The Kaposi varicella rash also complicates the reporting of local cases of facial trauma.
16	panniculectomy specimens as a convenient and inexpensive of homograft skin	Panniculectomy specimens as cheap and practical of the skin d'apos; homograft.
16	hazards from simian herpes viruses reactivation of skin lesions with virus shedding	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	flow and composition of skin and muscle lymph of the hind limb of the rabbit after injury	Rabbit hindlimb muscle lymph and skin flow and composition after injury.
16	a study of connective tissue macromolecules in skin of mice with goldthioglucose induced obesity	A study of the macromolecules of connective tissue in the skin of mice treated with orthoglucose was found to result in the development of obesity.
16	enhancement of interferon production in vitro a property of tilorone poly rl rc deae dextran	An increase in the production of d' in vitro interferon a property of the poly rl rc deae dextran tilorone.
16	chromosomal instability in cell lines derived from patients with xeroderma pigmentosum	Chromosome instability in xeroderma pigmentosum patient cell lines.
16	dose time relationships for skin reactions and structural damage in rat feet exposed to 250 kvp x rays	Dose relations-time for skin reactions and structural damage to the feet of rats exposed to x-rays of 250 kvp.
16	relative doses to skin and superficial nodes from 10 mv photons as a function of field size and distance from shadow tray	Doses for skin and surface nodes from photons of 10 mv as a function of the size of the field and the distance from the plateau of d' shade.
16	early and late radiation changes following a second course of irradiation	The amount of radiation emitted by a radionuclide in the atmosphere.
16	the rate of mitotic division in regenerating epithelium in the dog	Mitotic division rate in the regenerating dog epithelium.
16	the effect of induced arterial hypertension upon regional blood flow in subcutaneous tissue in patients with arterial insufficiency of the legs	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that there is an increased risk of coronary artery disease in patients with hemorrhage.
16	histochemical study of erythema nodosum leprosum enl lesions	Histochemical study of detached nodosum erythema nodosum.
16	acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 1 storage of hyaluronic acid and its possible significance in the pathogenesis of leprosy	Metabolism of acidic mucopolysaccharides in lepro 1 storage of l' hyaluronic acid and its possible importance in leprosy pathogenesis.
16	acid mucopolysaccharide metabolism in leprosy 2 subcellular localization of hyaluronic acid and beta glucuronidase in leprous infiltrates suggestive of a host mycobacterium leprae metabolic relationship	Metabolism of acidic mucopolysaccharides in leprosy 2; hyaluronic acid and beta glucuronidase in leprosy infiltrates suggest a host metabolic relationship-mycobacterium leprae.
16	the effects of light on the human body	Light affects the human body.
16	diagnosis of scabies	Scab diagnosis.
16	liquid gel partition chromatography of vitamin a compounds formation of retinoic acid from retinyl acetate in vivo	Vitamin a compounds forming apos; retinoic acid from apos; retinyl acetate in vivo.
16	the effect of suture materials on healing wounds of the bladder	Lapses; effects of suture materials on bladder healing injuries.
16	atypical fibroxanthoma of the skin	Skin atypical fibroxanthoma.
16	histochemical and electron microscopic studies of the human cutaneous lymphatic capillary	Histochemical and Electron Microscopic Studies of Human Skin Lymphatic Capillaries.
16	the deltopectoral flap an anatomical and hemodynamic approach	L' hemodynamic anatomical approach to the deltopectoral lambe.
16	detection of small vessels for microsurgery by a doppler flowmeter	Doppler is a small vessel detector for microsurgery at the Doppler MRI; a Doppler MRI.
16	absorption metabolism and excretion by goldfish of the anionic detergent sodium lauryl sulphate	Anionic detergent, sodium lauryl sulfate, is absorbed and excreted by the goldfish.
16	residual radiation damage in mouse skin 5 to 8 months after irradiation	Residual damage due to radiation in the skin of mice 5-8 months after exposure; irradiation.
16	contamination of broiler chickens by salmonella during processing in a number of poultry processing plants author s transl	Salmonella contamination of broiler chickens during processing in poultry processing establishments.
16	tegumentary glands of the supra anal pit of scutigerellidae symphala myriapoda	Integumental scutigerellid supraanal pit syphala myriapoda.
16	osler weber rendu syndrome urologist s view	It's a disease that affects the health of Canadians.
16	induction of neural differentiation in cultures of amphibian undetermined presumptive epidermis by cyclic amp derivatives	Induction of neuronal differentiation in apos cultures; indeterminate apos presumptive epidermis; amphibian by apos derivatives; cyclic ampoules.
16	prurigo nodularis and uremia	Nodularis and uremia.
16	hard x ray therapy with special reference to postoperative irradiation of breast carcinoma	Acute X-ray therapy with special reference to the apos; post-operative irradiation of the breast carcinoma.
16	histological studies after experimental grid irradiation iv findings in the skin	Histological studies following experimental irradiation on iv grid uncovered in skin.
16	a herpesvirus type agent associated with skin lesions of green sea turtles in aquaculture	Herpesvirus-like agent associated with marine turtle aquaculture skin lesions.
16	pathogenic considerations in systemic lupus erythematosus d l e immunohistologic studies author s transl	Disseminated lupus erythematosus; immunohistological studies; immunohistological studies.
16	burn sepsis and burn toxin	Burning the sepsis and burning the toxin.
16	deposits of immunoglobulins and complement c3 in clinically normal skin of patients with lupus erythematosus	In patients with lupus erythematosus, immunoglobulin and c3 complement deposits in the clinically normal skin.
16	keratinosomes in psoriatic skin	Psoriatic keratinosomes.
16	a case of halo nevus with effete melanocytes	Halo nevus with melanocyte effete.
16	testosterone 5alpha reduction in the skin of normal subjects and of patients with abnormal sex development	Reduction of testosterone 5alpha in normal subjects and sexually abnormal patients.
16	the geographical distribution of onchocerca volvulus infection in liberia	Journal of Infectious Diseases, 10, 335-364.
16	avulsion injuries in patients receiving corticosteroids	A comparison of the results of a randomized controlled trial.
16	ultrastructural studies in epidermolysis bullosa heriditaria i dominant dystrophic type of pasini	Ultrastructural studies of the apos; bullosa heriditaria epidermal cells i dominant pasini dystrophic type.
16	mycosis fungoides with marked brain involvement a case report	Fungoid fungus, with a marked cerebral involvement and a case-ratio.
16	epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis and neurodermatitis lichen simplex hypertrophicus	Epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis and lichen simplex neurodermatitis hypertrophicus hypertrophicus.
16	epidermal nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in psoriasis during treatment with dithranol	Canadian Journal of Health Services and Policy Research, 3rd edition. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/pubs/index_e.html.
16	protein requirements of men in a hot climate decreased urinary nitrogen losses concomitant with increased sweat nitrogen losses during exposure to high environmental temperature	Men's need for protein in a warm climate decreased urinary nitrogen loss at the same time as increased heat loss; sweat nitrogen during heat loss; exposure to high ambient temperatures.
16	giant melanosomes in moles and in normal human epidermis author s transl	It is the most common type of moth in the world, and the most common type of moth.
16	trophic phenomena in dermatology author s transl	Trophic phenomena in translations dermatology.
16	systemic lupus erythematosus in a 1 year old child	Lupus erythematosus spread in one-year-old.
16	viral infection and interferon in cell cultures aged in vitro	Viral Infection and Interferon in Aged Cellular Cultures in vitro.
16	a comparison of methods for collecting clean catch urine specimens in a clinic population of obstetric patients	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	trancutaneous determination of aortic blood flow velocities in man	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	hemodynimic effects of systemic and central administration of clonidine in the monkey	Hemodyne effects of clonidine in monkeys; systemic and central administration.
16	a case of hartmannellid amebic meningoencephalitis in zambia	Amebic meningoencephalitis, hartmannellide, zambia.
16	the survival and growth of microorganisms in mascara during use	The use of micro-organisms in the mascara during the period of their use.
16	epoxide hydrase activity in mouse skin eidermis	It's a good way to get a feel for your skin.
16	the subcellular localization of labelled tyrosine in the vitelline cells of schistosoma mansoni	The subcellular localization of the labelled tyrosine in yolk cells of schistosoma mansoni.
16	the fine structure of the cysticercoid of hymenolepis diminuta iii the scolex	Cysticercoid fine structure of l' hymenolepis decreased scolex iii.
16	epidemiological study of an hand foot and mouth disease outbreak observed in rome in the fall of 1973	It is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of foot-and-mouth disease.
16	the structure of the sternal bursa of turkeys	Sternal turkey exchange structure.
16	the peripheral perfusion pressure a new non invasive parameter for the circulatory monitoring of patients author s transl	Peripheral perfusion is a new non-invasive parameter for circulatory monitoring of patient translators.
16	dipetalonema streptocerca macfie and corson 1922 description of the adult female	Dipetalonema streptocerca macfie et corson 1922 Description of the female.
16	plantar epidermis of the guinea pig and characteristics of the stratum corneum	Guinea pig plantar epidermis and stratum corneum characteristics.
16	use of the pulse wave monitor as a measurement of diagnostic sympathetic block and of surgical sympathectomy	Use of the Dapos monitor; pulse waves as a measure of both diagnostic sympathetic blockage and surgical sympathectomy.
16	spatial distribution of mitosis in mouse epidermis	Mouse epidermis is the epidermis of the mouse epidermis.
16	postinflammatory acquired atresia of the external auditory canal	Outer ear canal atresia acquired post-apos; inflammation.
16	tachyphylaxis to the action of topically applied corticosteroids	Local applied corticosteroid action.
16	basal cell carcinomas and basal cell carcinoma like changes overlying dermatofibromas	Basal cell carcinomas and basal cell carcinomas are similar to changes that occur in dermatofibromas.
16	miconazole therapy for endemic fungal disease	Micronazole Therapy for Endemic Fungal Diseases.
16	erythema gyratum atrophicans transiens neonatale	Erythema gyratum, atrophicans transiens neonatale.
16	psoriasis on tumor	Tumor psoriasis.
16	the importance of being visually literate observations on the art and science of making a morphological diagnosis in dermatology	L' importance of having a good visual knowledge of art and science; making a Dermatology morphological diagnosis.
16	the histoid variety of lepromatous leprosy	Leprosy histoid variety.
16	nerves and nerve endings in pigmented nevi part i	Nervous and nerve terminals in the pigmented part nevi i.
16	separation of human epidermal cells from fibroblasts in primary skin culture	Separation of human epidermal cells from fibroblast cells in primary skin culture.
16	the chemotactic effect of blister roof blister fluid and blister floor on polymorphonuclear leucocytes in dermatitis herpetiformis duhring author s transl	The chemotactic effect of blister-blister-blister-blister-fluid and blister-fluid-fluid-blister-fluid-blister-fluid-blister-fluid-blister-fluid-blister-fluid-blister-fluid and-blister-blister-fluid-fluid-blister-blister-blister-blister-blister-blister-fluid-blister-blister-blister-fluid.
16	the effect of some solvents on the epidermis author s transl	In the case of a substance, it is the same as that of a substance.
16	scabies histological study of inflammatory lesions	Inflammatory lesion histological study.
16	a new formula for depigmenting human skin	New formula to depigment human skin.
16	precocious noduloulcerative cutaneous syphilis	Nodulo skin syphilis-early ulcerative.
16	orally given indomethacin and blood flow response to uvl	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are needed to assess the effects of these drugs.
16	immunoglobulin deposits in lepromatous leprosy skin presence of deposits in apparently uninvolved skin and occurrence of serum antiepithelial antibodies	Anti-epithelial antibodies are found in the epithelial epithelials of the epidermis and in the epithelial epithelials of the epidermis.
16	pruritic maculopapular skin lesions in sarcoidosis an unusual clinical presentation	The maculopapular lesions of the pruritic skin in sarcoidosis present an unusual clinical picture.
16	time of onset and regression of d penicillamine activity measured by rupture load of rat skin	The onset and regression of the disease; penicillamine activity as measured by the rupture charge of the rat skin.
16	the effect of salicylic acid on epidermal cell proliferation kinetics in psoriasis autoradiographic in vitro investigations author s transl	Canadian Journal of Animal Clinical Psychiatry, 33(5): 659-750.
16	hydrotherapy in cauterization wounds a histologic study author s transl	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
16	ultrastructural demonstration of cystine in guinea pig back stratum corneum	The ultrastructure shows the presence of cystine in the stratum corneum of the back of the guinea pig.
16	cutaneous hydroxystereoid dehydrogenases and rat hair cycle	Hydroxysteroidal skin dehydrogenases and rat-like hair cycle.
16	repeated topical applications of 1 2 4 trichlorobenzene effects on rabbit ears	Repeated topical application of trichlorobenzene to rabbit ears.
16	environmental health hazards from high powered infrared laser devices	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that can be used in the same way as other products.
16	skin dose with cones and diaphragms in 137cs teletherapy a study using lithium borate thermoluminescent dosimeters	A study using lithium borate thermoluminescent dosimeters was carried out with cones and diaphragms in 137cs teletherapy.
16	molecular pathogenesis of systemic lupus erythematosus	Molecular pathogenesis in disseminated lupus erythematosus.
16	congenital insensitivity to noxious stimuli	Congenital insensitivity to the harmful stimuli.
16	leishmaniasis in brazil x some observations of intradermal reactions to different trypanosomatid antigens of patients suffering from cutaneous and mucocutaneous leishmaniasis	Leishmaniasis in Brazil x some reports of intradermal reactions to different trypanosomatic antigens in patients with mucocutaneous leishmaniasis.
16	5 methoxy n acetyltryptamine melatonin in enterochromaffin cells	It's called a meta-chroma-chroma-chroma.
16	histidinemia classical and atypical form in siblings	Classic histidinemia and sibling atypical form.
16	acute gastric disease after cutaneous thermal injury	Acute gastric illness as a result of thermal skin injury.
16	ultrastructure of the skin in mucopolysaccharidoses studies performed before and after plasma infusion therapy	L' skin ultrastructure in pre- and post-plasma-infusion mucopolysaccharide studies.
16	cutaneous reactions of alloxan diabetic rats to local thermal trauma	Alloxan-induced rat skin reactions to local heat shock.
16	ultrastructure of the skin in systemic scleroderma	Skin ultrastructure in systemic scleroderma.
16	skin and homograft cartilage reconstruction	Reconstruction of the skin's cartilage and skin tone; homograft.
16	blood flow measurements in skin flaps	Measurements of the amount of blood in the skin.
16	pharmacology of d penicillamine	Penicillamine Pharmacology d.
16	structure of cultured fibroblasts from dermatosparaxic calves	Structure of dermatosparaxic calf culture fibroblasts.
16	tissue specificity of the epidermal chalones	Epidermal chalone tissue specificity.
16	activity of alpha d mannosidase in human langerhans epidermal cells	It is not possible to determine the cause of death in human lymph nodes.
16	solar urticaria a case with possible increase of skin mast cells	Solar Urticaria case with a possible increase in the mast cells of the skin.
16	the interaction of concanavalin a and the surface coat of stratified squamous epithelium	L' concanavalin interaction a and surface layer of l' layered squamous epithelium.
16	the erythemal action spectrum and deoxyribonucleic acid repair synthesis in xeroderma pigmentosum	The spectrum of d' erythemal action and repair synthesis by l' deoxyribonucleic acid in the xeroderma pigmentosum.
16	the bacteriological ecosystem of the skin of children in an african tropical envirovment tanzania	L' bacteriological child skin ecosystem in a tropical African envirovment tanzania.
16	cell migration and dna synthesis in organ culture of human skin	Cells can also be used as a source of protein, but not as a source of protein.
16	the areal extent of dermatophyte infection	Dermatophyte infection; Dermatophytic infection.
16	the length breadth ratio of skin flaps on the trunk two new long narrow flaps	The length/width ratio of the trunk skin flaps two new long and narrow flaps.
16	the proliferative response to epidermis of hairless mice to full thickness wounds	The proliferative reaction to hairless mouse epidermis to thick wounds.
16	the skin of primates xlii the skin of the silvered sakiwinki pithecia monachus	Primate skin xlii silver sakiwinki pithecia monachus.
16	phylogenetic significance of the skin of new world monkeys order primates infraorder platyrrhini	The new world monkey skin's phylogenetic significance orders primates infra-order platyrrhini.
16	diagnosis of familial hypercholesterolemia by measurement of sterol synthesis in cultured skin fibroblasts	Diagnosis of the apos; familial hypercholesterolemia by measuring the synthesis of sterols in cultured skin fibroblasts.
16	loss of cholesterol from muscle and skin of monkeys treated with nicotinic acid	Loss of cholesterol in apo-treated monkeys' muscles and skin; nicotinic acid.
16	reflex vascular responses in kidney ileum and forelimb to carotid body stimulation	Reflex vascular reactions of the renal ileum and renal limb to carotid body stimulation.
16	changes in vesical function produced by cutaneous stimulation in rats	Changes in rat skin stimulation-induced bladder function.
16	gamma heavy chain disease rapid sustained response to cyclophosphamide and prednisone	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	heat destruction of some bacterial strains attached to broiler skin	The heat-killing of certain broiler skin-attached bacterial strains.
16	feather pecking and cannibalism in a caged layer flock	Nogging feathers and cannibalism in a herd of caged animals.
16	the effectiveness of in plant chlorination in poultry processing	L'efficacité de la chloration dans les usines de transformation de la volaille.
16	clinical and physiological aspects of transcutaneous oxygen measurements in perinatal medicine author s transl	Clinical and Physiological Aspects of Transcutaneous Measurements of Perinatal Oxygen.
16	onchocerca cervicalis infection in horses from the western united states	U.S. horses infected with onchocerca cervicalis.
16	elimination of sulfamethazine from edible tissues blood urine and feces of turkey poults	Edible tissues of turkey blood and feces are purified from sulfamethazine.
16	the immunofluorescent band test in mixed connective tissue disease	The Mixed Connective Tissue Disease (MCTD) Immunofluorescent Banding Test.
16	changes in cutaneous flora after wet occlusion	Changes in skin flora following wet occlusion.
16	isolation of dermatophytes candida species and systemic fungi from dermatologic specimens in montr al 1963 to 1973	Dermatophyte isolates candida and systemic fungal species from montane dermatological specimens from 1963 to 1973.
16	dilantin induced disseminated intravascular coagulation with purpura fulminans a case report	Dilantine induced intravascular coagulation that was disseminated with the purpura fulminans, a case report.
16	thymic origin of abnormal lymphoid cells in s zary syndrome	Abnormal lymphoid cells of the szary syndrome are thymic.
16	mosaic 14 trisomy in a female child with multiple abnormalities	The Mosaic 14 trisomy is performed on a girl with multiple abnormalities.
16	on the functions of the pore cells in the connective tissue of terrestrial pulmonate molluscs	On the functions of porous cells in terrestrial pulmonary molluscan connective tissue.
16	induction of the polyamine biosynthetic enzymes in mouse epidermis by tumor promoting agents	Induction of the biosynthetic enzymes of polyamines in the epidermis of mice by tumor promoters.
16	the fine structure of the epidermis of two species of salmonid fish the atlantic salmon salmo salar l and the brown trout salmo trutta l i general organization and filament containing cells	Fine structure of the epidermis of two salmonid fish species, salmo salar Atlantic salmon and salmo brown trout, trutta general organization and cell-containing filament.
16	differential cytotoxic acitivity of anticollagen serum on rat osteoblasts and fibroblasts in tissue culture	Differential cytotoxic activity of anti-collagen serum on rat tissue cultured osteoblasts and fibroblasts.
16	development of high intensity narrow band lamps and studies of the irradiation effect on human skin irradiation with high intensity lamps	High-intensity narrow-band design and studies; effects of radiation; irradiation of human skin; irradiation with high-intensity lamps.
16	products of epidermal protein synthesis	Epidermal protein synthesis.
16	electron microscopic study of nevic corpuscle	Electron microscopy study of the nerve corpuscle.
16	epidermal intercellular binding of concanavalin a and pemphigus antibody	Conanavalin a and apos epidermal intercellular binding; antibody-pemphigus.
16	histochemical analysis of epidermal cells and mucous cells in the skin of torpedo ocellata rafinesque	Histochemical analysis of ocellata rafinesque skin epidermal and mucous cells.
16	human evoked responses to potentially noxious tactile stimulation i	Human Reactions to Potentially Harmful Tactile Stimulation i.
16	necrotizing vasculitis etiologic aspects of immunology and coagulopathy	Vascular necrosis Etiologic aspects of apo; immunology; and coagulopathy.
16	cutis laxa ultrastructural and biochemical studies	Biochemical and ultrastructural studies of cutis laxa.
16	treatment of psoriasis with 6 aminonicotinamide	Six aminonicotinamide treatment for psoriasis.
16	acne aestivalis	Acne-aestivalis acne.
16	nodular subcutaneous fat necrosis a manifestation of silent pancreatitis	Necrosis of fats and nodes under-nodular skin, manifestation of d' silent pancreatitis.
16	low dosage cytarabine therapy for herpes zoster with pneumonia	Low dose cytarabine shingles for pneumonia.
16	mannosidosis deficiency of a specific alpha mannosidase component in cultured fibroblasts	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	familial opsonization defect associated with fatal infantile dermatitis infections and histiocytosis	In addition, there are a number of family-associated opsonizations associated with fatal childhood dermatitis and histiocytosis.
16	pathogenetic aspects of bromocarbamide intoxication	Bromocarbamide intoxication.
16	thiamine pyrophosphatase and acid phosphatase their ultrastructural localization in rat skin	Thiamine pyrophosphatase and acid phosphatase are localized in the ultrastructure of the rat skin.
16	effect of high dosis of d penicillamine and paramethasone on mechanical properties of rat connective tissue author s transl	A high dose of penicillamine and parametasone on the mechanical properties of connective tissue of the rat.
16	the management of traumatic tattoos	Traumatic tattoo management.
16	fabry s disease on the mechanism of the peripheral nerve involvement	Fabry's disease on peripheral nerve involvement.
16	bacterial flora in relation to cataract extraction i material methods and preoperative flora	Bacterial flora in relation to the plants; extraction from the cataract i material methods and the flora preoperative.
16	local tissue effects of surface applied ent drugs	Local Tissue Effects of Applied Surface Drugs.
16	reticulosarcomatosis originating from skin a clinicopathological study	Reticulosarcomatosis from the skin clinicopathological study.
16	exacerbation and reactivation of herpesvirus hominis infection in mice by cyclophosphamide	Homovirus herpes infection exacerbated and reactivated in mouse by cyclophosphamide.
16	incontinentia pigmenti	Lied pork incontinence @-@.
16	cystic fibrosis heterozygote detection a study on a normal population	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection.
16	effect of spinal sympathetic blockade upon local regulation of blood flow in subcutaneous tissue	D&apos effect; medullary sympathetic blockade on local blood flow regulation in tissue under-skin.
16	studies on soft tissue reactions to implantation of glass ceramics author s transl	Studies of soft tissue responses to translational glass ceramic implantation.
16	hairlessness in mus musculus a pathologic study	Muscle hairlessness is a pathological study.
16	perianal paget disease histochemical differentiation utilizing the borohydride koh pas reaction	Perianal paget histochemical disease differentiation using borohydride koh non reaction.
16	topography and topology in functional recovery of regenreated sensory and motor systems	Topography and topology of regenerated motor and sensory systems functional recovery.
16	feather pattern development	D&apos is a special design for the design of feathers.
16	labelling of murine epidermal langerhans cells with h3 thymidine	Epidermal mouse langerhans cells labelled with thymidine h3.
16	clinical picture and pathomorphology of traumatic high pressure oil injections the so called grease gun injury	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the disease, such as the prevalence of the disease.
16	translation of mrna for 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine decarboxylase isolated from epidermis tissue of calliphora vicina r d in a heterologous system dependence of mrna concentration on the insect steroid hormone ecdysone	Translation of mrna for 3 dihydroxyphenylalanine decarboxylase, isolated from calliphora vicina r epidermal tissue, in a heterologous, mrna-concentration-dependent system; ecdysone, an insect steroid hormone.
16	collagen biosynthesis in normal human skin normal and hypertrophic scar and keloid	Collagen biosynthesis in normal human skin, hypertrophic and keloid scar tissue.
16	the palmo mental reflex an electrophysiological study	Palmo's Mental Reflex is an electrophysiological study.
16	globoid cell leucodystrophy krabbe s disease peripheral nerve lesion author s transl	Leucodystrophy of krabbe globoid cells lesion of the translational peripheral nerve.
16	transcutaneous electrical stimulation in treatment of postoperative pain	Transcutaneous electrical stimulation (TEM) in the treatment of post-operative pain.
16	glycogen in epidermal nerve terminals of lacerta sicula squamata reptilia	Glycogen in the nerve endings of the epidermal lacerta sicula squamata reptilia.
16	appearance of sex hormone receptors in frog rana esculenta tadpole skin during metamorphosis	It's the first time you've seen a frog's tadpole, and it's the first time you've seen a frog.
16	langerhans cells in tissue cultures of guinea pig epidermal cells	Langerhans in epidermal cell tissue cultures from guinea pigs.
16	immunoglobulins in the skin in dermatitis herpetiformis and their relevance in diagnosis	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
16	micro determination of cyclic amp levels in human epidermis dermis and haif follicles	Determine microscopic concentrations of cyclic light sources in the dermis of the skin, human epidermis, and follicles.
16	further studies on adenyl cyclase in psoriasis	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the incidence and severity of diabetes mellitus.
16	dermal epidermal deposition of complement components and properdin in systemic lupus erythematosus	Skin epidermal deposition of the complement and the propidin components in the disseminated lupus erythematosus.
16	tumour angiogenic factor associated with subcutaneous lymphoma	Tumor Angiogenic Factor Associated with Lymphoma under-skin.
16	primary cell culture for biochemical studies of human keratinocytes a method for production of very large numbers of cells without the necessity of subculturing techniques	Cultivation of primary cells for human keratinocyte biochemical studies is a method of producing a very large number of keratinocyte-free cells; it is necessary to use sub@-@ culture techniques.
16	the junctional zone beneath migrating epidermis	The junction zone of the epidermis, under @-@jacent to the migration of the epidermis, constitutes the junction zone of the epidermis.
16	pretibial epidermolysis bullosa report of two families and review of the literature	L' pretibiale bullosa epidermosis is reported from two families and from a literature review.
16	elimination of circulating antibodies attempts to eliminate antibodies circulating in rabbits using a fraction of normal human epidermis	It is important to ensure that the antibody is present in the tissues of the rabbits, and that the antibodies are present in the tissues.
16	study on the mode of action of dithranol increased lipid peroxidation and enzyme inhibition	Dithranol action increased lipid peroxidation and apos; enzymatic inhibition.
16	on the facial muscles in perodicticus potto and nycticebus coucang author s transl	Perodicticus potto and nycticebus coucang s translator facial muscles.
16	effect of dietary copper deficiency in the rat on fatty acid composition of adipose tissue and desaturase activity of liver microsomes	Effect of rat dietary copper deficiency on fat fatty acid composition and liver microsomal desaturase activity.
16	tularaemia in the rat i the cellular basis on host resistance to infection	Ratularaemia he cell base on resistance of host to apos; infection.
16	the amino acid sequence of chick skin collagen alpha1 cb7	The chicken skin alpha1 cb7 collagen amino acid sequence.
16	bullous dermatosis of hemodialysis	Hemodialysis.
16	tropomyosin antibody the specific localization of tropomyosin in nonmuscle cells	Tropomyosin antibody tropomyosin specific localization in nonmuscle cells.
16	some laboratory studies on the accuracy of bite mark comparison	Some laboratory studies on the accuracy and comparability of bite marks.
16	specificity of antigens in aqueous phenol extracts of skin examined by means of guinea pig and rabbit immune sera	Immune sera from guinea pigs and rabbits were used to examine the specificity of the antigens in aqueous extracts of skin phenol.
16	a comparative evaluation of bacteriologic and morphologic indices of mycobacterium leprae in skin lymph node bone marrow nerve and muscle	Comparative assessment of morphological and bacteriological indices of leprae mycobacterium in the nerve and bone marrow muscle of the cutaneous lymph nodes.
16	a radioautographic study of collagen synthesis by earthworm epidermis	A radioautographic study of the synthesis of collagen by the epidermis of earthworms.
16	the fine structure of epidermal glands of regenerating and mature globiferous pedicellariae of a sea urchin lytechinus pictus	The fine epidermal gland structure of regenerating and maturing globose pedicellaris; a lytechinus pictus sea urchin.
16	diagnostic significance of the immunofluorescent pattern in dermatitis herpetiformis	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors that may contribute to the risk of hepatitis C.
16	s zary s syndrome case report	Case report on Zarys Syndrome.
16	experimental studies of the pathogenesis of infections due to pseudomonas aeruginosa description of a burned mouse model	Experimental studies of pathogenesis of Pseudomonas aeruginosa infections are described in a model of burned mice.
16	isolates of california encephalitis la crosse virus from field collected eggs and larvae of aedes triseriatus identification of the overwintering site of california encephalitis	Eggs and larvae of d' d' aedes triseriatus and d' d' overwintering of apos; and Californian encephalitis were collected from fields.
16	efferent pathways of the coronary chemoreflex	Coronary chemoreflex efferent pathways.
16	some peculiarities of skin metabolism with vitamin a deficit	Some of the characteristics of the metabolism of the skin with vitamin deficiency a.
16	microbial flora of nurses hands iii the relationship between staphylococcal skin populations and persistence of carriage	Microbial flora in the hands of nurses iii the relationship between populations of staphylococcal skin and persistence of carriage.
16	intracutaneous cornifying epithelioma keratoacanthoma in the dog a retrospective study of 25 cases	A retrospective study was made of 25 cases of kerato epithelium-intracutaneous acanthoma in dogs.
16	the ultrastructure of adult brugia malayi brug 1927 nematoda filarioidea	Brugia malayi brug 1927 nematoda filarioidea ultrastructure.
16	the collagen content of skin and gingival tissues in ascorbic acid deficient monkeys	Skin and gum tissue collagen content in ascorbic acid-deficient monkeys.
16	excoriation injuries of the penis and scrotum author s transl	Journal of Psychiatric Psychiatric Psychiatric Psychiatry.
16	chemexfoliation as an adjunct to facial rejuvenation	Chemexfoliation complements facial rejuvenation.
16	a new mucolipidosis with psychomotor retardation corneal clouding and retinal degeneration	New mucolipidosis with apos; psychomotor delay of the cornea and dapos; degeneration of the retina.
16	distribution and persistence of staphylococcus and micrococcus species and other aerobic bacteria on human skin	In addition, there are a number of other diseases, such as diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, and other diseases.
16	a mucocutaneous disease in the dog resembling pemphigus vulgaris in man	Mucocutaneous disease in dogs resembling Pemphigus vulgaris in humans.
16	a disease in dogs resembling human pemphigus vulgaris case reports	A disease has been reported in human pemphigus vulgaris-like dogs.
16	an unusual epizootic of actinobacillosis in dairy heifers	An unusual outbreak of milk heifer actinobacillosis.
16	the functional status and columnar organization of single cells responding to cutaneous stimulation in neonatal rat somatosensory cortex s1	L' functional state and apos; organization in columns of individual cells reacting to a skin stimulation in the s1 somatosensory cortex of the new rat.
16	treatment of corns by injectable silicone	Silicon injection technique for cores.
16	hairy cutaneous malformations of palms and soles a hereditary condition	Hairy skin defects of the hands and palms, and of the handplant are inherited conditions.
16	immunocytochemical localization of cathepsin d in rabbit skin	Immunocytochemical localization of cathepsin-d in rabbit skin.
16	pustular patch test reactions in atopic dermatitis	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3(2), pp. 1–24.
16	embryology of the epidermis ultrastructural aspects iii maturation and primary appearance of dendritic cells in the mouse with mammalian comparisons	L' embryology of ultrastructural aspects of the epidermis; epidermis iii maturation and l' primary appearance of mouse dendritic cells with comparisons with mammals.
16	structure of the toad epidermis during the moulting cycle ii electron microscopic observations on bufo bufo l	Toad structure; toad epidermis during molt cycle ii bufo bufo l electron microscope observations.
16	in vitro growth and maturation of epithelial cells from postembryonic skin	In vitro growth and postembryonic skin epithelial cell maturation.
16	metabolism of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in cultivated bovine arterial cells ii quantitative studies on the uptake of 35so4 labeled proteoglycans	Sulfated glycosaminoglycans metabolism in cultured bovine arterial cells ii Quantitative studies on apos; absorption of 35so4-labelled proteoglycans.
16	ehlers danlos syndrome in two siblings with deficient lysyl hydroxylase activity in cultured skin fibroblasts but only mild hydroxylysine deficit in skin	Two sibling danlos syndrome; lysyl hydroxylase activity is deficient in cultured skin fibroblasts, but only a slight deficiency of hydroxylysine in the skin.
16	effects of uv radiation of different spectral composition on content of sterols in rat skin	Effects of ultraviolet radiation on the sterol content of rat skin in different spectral compositions.
16	evaluation of two kinds of smallpox vaccine cvi 78 and calf lymph vaccine i clinical and serologic response to primary vaccination	Evaluation of two types of smallpox vaccine cvi 78 and primary serologic and clinical response to veal lymph.
16	skin lesions of the legs and feet and skeletal lesions of the feet in familail amyloidosis with polyneuropathy	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
16	comparative investigation on the influence of human and bovine collagen types i ii and iii on the aggregation of human platelets	It is important to note that there is no difference between the two types of collagen.
16	state of certain indices of natural nonspecific immunity in workers engaged in the manufacture of neomycin and monomycin	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety, Public Health Agency of Canada.
16	investigations on the mechanism of the activity of urea upon the epidermis author s transl	Research on apo mechanism; apo activity; apo urea; apo epidermis; transl author.
16	ultrastructural evidence for lack of tissue damage in a local immune complex reaction a study of a mild passive arthus reaction	Ultrastructural evidence of apo; absence of tissue damage in local complex immune response a d&apos study; mild passive arthritic reaction.
16	the effect of the activity of psoriasis on the response to autologous ground skin extract	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
16	cell mediated immunity in chronic polymorphous light eruptions leukocyte migration inhibition assay with irradiated skin as antigen	Cell-mediated immunity in a d&apos assay; inhibition of leukocyte migration by polymorphic, chemically polymorphic, antigen-irradiated skin flares.
16	discoid lupus erythematosus as part of a larger disease spectrum correlation of clinical features with laboratory findings in lupus erythematosus	Lupus erythematosus discoids within the framework of apos; a broader correlation between clinical characteristics and laboratory results for the lupus erythematosus.
16	testosterone metabolism in the skin a review of its function in androgenetic alopecia acne vulgaris and idiopathic hirsutism including recent studies with antiandrogens	Metabolism of testosterone in the skin, revision of testosterone function in the androgenetic alopecia of the andapos; acne vulgaris and l' idiopathic hirsutism, including recent antiandrogen studies.
16	subcellular distribution of phosphatases proteinases and ribonucleases in normal human stratum corneum and psoriatic scales	Subcellular distribution of protein and ribonuclease phosphatases in normal human stratum corneum and human psoriatic scales.
16	investigative studies of the dermatitis caused by the larva of the brown tail moth euproctis chrysorrhoea linn ii histopathology of skin lesions and scanning electron microscopy of their causative setae	Euproctis chrysorrhoea linn moth larvae dermatitis investigation and skin lesion histopathology and scanning electron microscopy of causal setae.
16	concentrations of ampicillin in human urogenital tissue serum and urine after intake of pivampicillin	In addition to the above, there is no evidence to support this claim.
16	lysosomal hydrolases of the epidermis 3 peptide hydrolases	Lysosomal hyrolases of 3 epidermal peptides hydrolases.
16	comparison of the shock inducing effect of anti mouse anti thymocyte horse serum and normal horse serum i experiments with three week old mice	Comparison of apo; effect; induction of anti-mice horse thymocyte and normal horse serum shock with three-week-old mice.
16	soft tissue radiography in determining contact and near contact gunshot wounds	Soft tissue X-ray to determine gunshot wounds close to and on contact.
16	in vitro uptake of calcium by dermis of patients with pseudoxanthoma elasticum	In vitro calcium uptake by the dermis from patients with Elasticum pseudoxanthoma.
16	cytotoxic and mutagenic effects of carcinogenic aromatic amides and polycyclic hydrocarbons and ultraviolet irradiation in normally repairing and repair deficient xeroderma pigmentosum diploid human skin fibroblasts	Cytotoxic and mutagenic effects of polycyclic hydrocarbon and carcinogenic aromatic amides and lapos; ultraviolet irradiation in normal repair and repair of defective human diploid xeroderma pigmentosum skin fibroblasts.
16	the regulatory role of steroid hormones on the pgf pge ratio in target tissues	The steroid hormone regulatory role of pgf pge in target tissues.
16	the differential effects of cyclophosphamide and 6 mercaptopurine on the renal disease and skin immunoglobulin deposits of the nzb nzw f1 hybrid mice	The differential effects of cyclophosphamide and mercaptopurine 6 on the deposits of epos; dermal and renal immunoglobulin in nzb nzw f1 hybrid mice were studied.
16	aspects of teratology of vitamin a acid beta all trans retinoic acid	It's a good idea to try to find out more about vitamin A, vitamin A and vitamin A.
16	an unusual pattern of testosterone metabolism in tissue associated with a keratin filled cutaneous cyst	Unusual metabolism of testosterone in keratin-filled skin cyst-associated tissue.
16	ultrastructure of inborm errors of keratinization vii porokeratosis mibelli and disseminated superficial actinic porokeratosis	L' vii inbormal keratinization errors vii porokeratosis mibelli ultrastructure and disseminated surface actinic porokeratosis.
16	effects of steriod hormones on human fibroblasts in vitro ii antagonism by androgens of cortisol induced inhibition	Effects of steroid hormones on human fibroblasts in vitro androgen and apo antagonism; cortisol-induced inhibition.
16	the repair of impaired epidermal barrier function in rats by the cutaneous application of linoleic acid	In addition, there is a need for further research to determine the extent to which the skin is being used to repair the defective function of the epidermal barrier.
16	kinetics of in vitro bovine keratohyalin synthesis	Kinetics of the synthesis of bovine keratohyaline in vitro.
16	induced tolerance in cold urticaria caused by cold evoked histamine release	Cold-induced urticaria induced by apos release; cold-evoked histamine.
16	ultrastructure of keloid an unusual incident involving lepromatous leprosy	L' keloid ultrastructure is an unusual leprosy incident.
16	electron microscopy of ancient egyptian skin	Ancient Egyptian skin.
16	the local antinociceptive and topical anti inflammatory effects of propyl gallate in rodents	Health Canada, Canadian Centre for Occupational Health and Safety.
16	chronic urticarial lesions and macroglobulinemia apropos of 5 cases	Cervical hemorrhagic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrasonic ultrars.
16	effect of bases and accelerants on the anti inflammatory activity of topical corticosteroids	The effect of the bases and accelerators on the immune system; anti-inflammatory activity of the topical corticosteroids.
16	circulatory effects of isometric muscle contractions performed separately and in combination with dynamic exercise	The circulatory effects of the isometric muscle contractions were performed separately and in combination with the dynamic exercise.
16	synthesis and biological activity of camel and bovine beta melanotropins	Synthesis and Biological Activity of Beta-Camel and Bovine Melanotropins.
16	the skin of the palms and soles of the marmosets callithrix jacchus and callithrix penicillata	Callithrix jacchus and callithrix penicillata.
16	nonimmune and immune surveillance i growth of tumors and normal fetal tissues grafted into newborn mice	Non-immune and immunological surveillance of tumours and fetal tissue grafted to newborn mice.
16	the treatment of hypermelanosis with 4 isopropylcatechol	Treatment of the estrogen receptor; hypermelanosis with 4 isopropylcatechol.
16	histopathological spectrum of erythema multiforme	Histopathological epos spectrum; multiform erythema.
16	abnormal chemotaxis in patients with cutaneous anergy	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
16	the effect of orthostasis on the i 131 clearance in the metatarsal and crural subcutis in patients with occlusive arterial diseases	In addition to the above, there are also a number of other factors, such as age, sex, age, sex, age, sex, and other factors.
16	transformation from lepromatous to borderline leprosy under clofazimine therapy	A leproxy leprosy to leprosy is limited by treatment with clofazimine.
16	inhibition of vaccinia virus replication in skin of tuberculin sensitized animals challenged with ppd	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that tuberculin-sensitized animals are infected with the virus.
16	ultrastructure of the epidermal cells of the teleost pimelodus maculatus lac p de 1803 pisces	Pimelodus maculatus teleost epidermal cell ultrastructure p of 1803 pisces pisces.
16	biosynthesis of pyrrolidone carboxylic acid in hairless mouse epidermis	Biosynthesis of the apos; carboxylic pyrrolidone acid in the apos; epidermis of hairless mice.
16	binding of dexamethasone by the subcellular fractions of mouse epidermis and dermis	Dexamethasone binding by subcellular fractions of the epidermis and mouse dermis.
16	scanning electron microscopic and x ray microanalysis study of the mineral deposits in pseudoxanthoma elasticum	Scanning electron microscopy and X-ray microanalysis of pseudoxanthoma elasticum mineral deposits.
16	myocardial infarction without pain a study of the sensory function of the upper limbs	Painless myocardial infarction: upper limb sensory function study.
16	interaction between collagen type i and type iii in conditioning bundles organization	Interaction of type I collagen with type iii collagen in apos; organization of conditioning beams.
16	influence of mounting media on the fading of basic aniline dyes in epoxy embedded tissues	Assembly media influence the discoloration of the base dyes of l' aniline in coated d' epoxy.
16	the effect of anti eosinophil serum on skin histamine replenishment following passive cutaneous anaphylaxis in the guinea pig	Effect of anti--eosinophil serum on turnover of skin histamine after passive skin anaphylaxis in guinea pig.
16	hypothalamic hypothyroidism and xxy xy sex chromosome mosaicism report of a case	In addition, there is evidence of an increase in the incidence of hypertension.
16	stewart treves syndrome the histopathological evolution of epithelial metastases	Stewart Treves Syndrome, epithelial metastasis histopathological evolution.
16	histopathological characteristics of the inguinal lymph nodes and skin in onchocerciasis	Histopathological Characteristics of Inguinal Lymph Nodes and Skin in Onchocerciasis.
16	keratin filaments of cultured human epidermal cells formation of intermolecular disulfide bonds during terminal differentiation	Cultured human epidermal keratin fibers forming intermolecular disulfide bonds during terminal differentiation.
16	transcutaneous monitoring of po2 in different skin areas in the neonate and in the scalp of the fetus during labor methodological and physiological observations	Transcutaneous po2 monitoring in different areas of newborn-skin and fetal scalp during apo; methodological and physiological observations at work.
16	role of sterol photoconversion products in the regulation of cholesterol biosynthesis in rat skin	Role of Sterol Photoconversion Products in the Regulation of Cholesterol Biosynthesis in Rat Skin.
16	mysterious form of referred sensation in man	Mysterious form of sensation referenced in the apos; man.
16	cutaneous response to dinitrochlorobenzene in patients with genito urinary cancers	Dermal Reaction to Dinitrochlorobenzene in Patients with Urinary Genitrile Cancer-Urinary.
16	antibodies to an antigen of human thymus epithelial tissue common to the epidermis of the skin in malignant myasthenia	Antibody to an antigen common to human thymus epithelial tissue; skin epidermis in malignant myasthenia.
16	the effect of long term oral oestriol succinate therapy on the skin of castrated women	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
16	studies on parafilaria bovicola tubangui 1934 2 chemotherapy and pathology	Studies of parafilaria bovicola tubangui, 1934, 2 chemotherapy and pathology.
16	sinus histiocytosis with massive lymphadenopathy rosai and dorfman and significant skin involvement	Histiocytosis of the sinuses with massive rosai and dorfman lymphadenopathy and significant skin involvement.
16	variability of fibroblast lysosomal acid hydrolases with reference to the detection of enzyme deficiencies	Lysosomal acid-hydrolase fibroblast variation with respect to enzyme deficiency detection.
16	histone phosphorylation and synthesis of dna and rna during phases of proliferation and differentiation induced in mouse epidermis by the tumor promoter 12 o tetradecanoyl phorbol 13 acetate	In addition, it is recommended that the test be carried out in accordance with the requirements of the Food and Drugs Act and the Food and Drugs Act and the Food and Drug Regulations.
16	low level dna exchanges in normal human and xeroderma pigmentosum cells after uv irradiation	Exchanges of low-level DNA in normal human cells and in cells of xeroderma pigmentosum after irradiation at apos; uv.
16	the importance of man mouse and rat skin surface lipid fractions on the in vitro penetration of schistosoma mansoni cercariae author s transl	L' importance of rat and mouse skin lipid fractions on in vitro penetration of translating schistosoma mansoni cercariae.
16	skin tumor initiating activities of the twelve isomeric phenols of benzo a pyrene	Benzo a pyrene isomeric 12-phenol skin tumour initiation.
16	moulting and morphogenesis of sensilla in a prostigmate mite acari actinotrichida actinedida caeculidae i mechanoreceptive bristles	Sensilla ecdysis and morphogenesis in acari actinotrichida actinedida mechanoreceptive acari prostigmate mite.
16	measurement of chloride in sweat by use of a selective electrode and strip chart recorder	It is not possible to determine the concentration of chlorinated organic compounds in drinking water.
16	plastic embedding of cutaneous specimens for light microscopy using araldite epoxy resin	Plastic nesting of skin tissue samples for light microscopy at apos; aid; an aralite epoxy resin.
16	the permeability of epidermis lacking normal membrane coating granules an ultrastructural tracer study of kyrle flegel disease	The permeability of the epidermis, which lacks granules of normal membrane coating, has been the subject of an ultrastructural study at the apos, aided by a tracer of styel kyrle disease.
16	phage typing and biotyping of coagulase negative staphylococci	Lysotyping and biotyping negative coagulase staphylococci.
16	x linked ocular albinism in blacks ocular albinism cum pigmento	X Eye-related Albinism in Black Eye Albinism cum pigmento.
16	effect of soap and detergents on the restitution of acidity and lipids of the skin surface	Effect of Soap and Detergents on Recovery of Soapos; Acidity and Fats of Skin Surface.
16	giant pigment granules in dermal melanocytes of rat scrotal skin	Giant pigment granules in the melanocytes of the dermal skin of the rat scrotal.
16	response of cattle to inoculation with atypical mycobacteria of bovine origin	In addition, there is a need for more information on the safety and quality of the product.
16	the direct demonstration of histamine release in allergic reactions in the skin using a skin chamber technique	The results of this research will be used as a basis for the development of a new therapeutic approach to skin allergies.
16	multivesicular vacuolization in malignant histiocytoma of the skin author s transl	Acute and chronic toxicity of chloroform to rats and rats.
16	effect of retinyl acetate on sulfated glycosaminoglycan biosynthesis in dermal and epidermal cells in vitro	Effect of apos; retinyl acetate on the biosynthesis of sulfated glycosaminoglycans in epidermal and dermal cells in vitro.
16	regional variation in the deposition of subepidermal immunoglobulin in nzb w f1 mice association with epidermal dna synthesis	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/pubs/index_e.html.
16	the influence of acids and bases on the development of morphological and biochemical wound reactions author s transl	L' acid and base influence on the development of morphological and biochemical responses to injury is translated by the author.
16	mucinosis follicularis provoked by light exposure	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection.
16	changes in structure of ventral epidermis of rana ridibunda during metamorphosis	Structural changes during metamorphosis; rana ridibunda ventral epidermis.
16	predictive evaluation in animals of the contact allergenic potential of medically important substances i comparison of different methods of inducing and measuring cutaneous sensitization	In addition, there is a need to assess the potential for allergenicity in animals and to assess the potential for allergenicity in animals and to assess the potential for allergenicity.
16	neural representation of cutaneous aftersensations by spinothalamic tract neurons	Neural depiction of posts-skin sensations by the spinothalamic-transfer neurons.
16	metabolism and formation of dna adducts of benzo a pyrene in human diploid fibroblasts	Benzo a pyrene DNA adducts in human diploid fibroblasts.
16	transcutaneous oxygen monitoring in aminophylline treated apneic infants	Acute toxicity of ethylene oxide and its metabolites to rats and mice.
16	formation and removal of specific acetylaminofluorene dna adducts in mouse and human cells measured by radioimmunoassay	It is not possible to determine the specificity of the drug product, but it is possible to determine the specificity of the drug product.
17	on the existence of a gradient of sensitivity to the lack of sodium in the spinal roots of the bullfrog	On the east; existence of plants; a sensitivity gradient to sodium deprivation in bullfrog spinal roots.
17	the effects of administration of sodium iodate to man and animals	Dosage effects; dosing; sodium iodate; humans and animals.
17	the transport of sodium into human erythrocytes in vivo	Sodium transport in human erythrocytes, in vivo.
17	active sodium transport by the isolated toad bladder	An active transport of sodium by the bladder of an isolated toad.
17	an enzymatic ion exchange model for active sodium transport	The results of this study are summarized below.
17	action of external divalent ion reduction on sodium movement in the squid giant axon	The action of the external reduction of the epos; divalent ion on the motion of the giant squid axon.
17	studies on the carrier function of phosphatidic acid in sodium transport i the turnover of phosphatidic acid and phosphoinositide in the avian salt gland on stimulation of secretion	Studies of phosphate transporter function in sodium transport; turnover of phosphate; phosphatidic acid and phosphoinositide in avian saline gland on secretion stimulation.
17	ion transport in nitellopsis obtusa	Nitellopsis obtusa ion transport.
17	na cl and water transport by rat colon	N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A.
17	the effect of calcium on sodium transport by frog skin	L' calcium effect on sodium transport through frog skin.
17	movement of sodium across the mucosal surface of the isolated toad bladder and its modification by vasopressin	Sodium movement across the isolated toad bladder surface and vasopressin modification.
17	electronic measurement of the intracellular concentration and net flux of sodium in the squid axon	Intracellular concentration and net sodium flux measured electronically in squid axon.
17	active ion transport across canine blood vessel walls	In addition to the above, there are a number of other types of blood vessels that can be used as blood vessels.
17	the effects of mechanical stimulation on some electrical properties of axons	Mechanical stimulation on certain electrical properties of axons.
17	hypernatremia its significance in pediatric practice	It is also important to understand the role of hypernatremia in the practice of pediatrics.
17	hypernatraemia in cerebral disorders	L' cerebral hypernatraemia.
17	the concentration dependence of sodium efflux from muscle	Muscle sodium concentration-dependent efflux.
17	thermal inactivation of poliovirus under anaerobic conditions	Poliovirus thermal inactivation under anaerobic conditions.
17	an analysis of the striated muscle fiber action current	It's a good way to analyze the current; the action of muscle fibers.
17	effect of sodium alginate on staphylococcus aureus during mild heating and freezing	Effect of sodium alginate on Staphylococcus aureus during mild freezing and heating.
17	the electrical characteristics of active sodium transport in the toad bladder	Electrical characteristics of toad bladder active sodium transport.
17	nonbiological conversion of cephalosporin c to a new antibiotic by sodium thiosulfate	Non-biological conversion of cephalosporin c into a novel antibiotic by sodium thiosulfate.
17	heart action potential dependence on external calcium and sodium ions	Potential dependence of the apos; cardiac action to external calcium and sodium ions.
17	short term n2 15 incorporation by azobacter	It is not considered to be a chemical substance.
17	treatment of hypertension the special place of alpha methyldopa a short term study	It is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of hypertension.
17	ionic conductance changes in lobster axon membrane when lanthanum is substituted for calcium	Ion conductance changed in the lobster axonal membrane when lanthanum was found to be substituted for calcium.
17	electron microscopy sodium localization in normal and ouabain treated transporting cells	Electron microscopic localization of sodium in ouabain-treated and normal transport cells.
17	salt transport organelle in artemia salenis brine shrimp	Salt transport organ of marine shrimp, artemia salenis.
17	villous adenoma of the rectum with electrolyte depletion diabetes and hypogonadism	Electrolyte depletion, diabetes and hypogonadism.
17	after potentials and large depolarizations of single nodes of ranvier treated with veratridine	After large depolarizations and potentials of simple ranvier nodes treated with veratridine.
17	phenacetin nephropathy	Phenacetin nephropathy.
17	significance of soil salinity on the ecology of coccidioides immitis	Coccidioides immitis is a fungus that is found in a variety of plant and animal species.
17	transepidermal potential difference development in anuran larvae	The differential transepidermal potential develops in the larvae of anurans.
17	studies on the inhibition of intestinal absorption of radioactive strontium 3 the effect of administration of sodium alginate in food and in drinking water	Dosage Studies; Absorption of Absorption; Intestinal Absorption of Radioactive Strontium 3; Impact of Absorption; Sodium Alginate in Food and Water; Drinking Water.
17	the effect of adaptation of the taste threshold observed with a semiautomatic gustometer	L' taste threshold effect observed with semi-automatic gustometer.
17	sodium movement across single perfused proximal tubules of rat kidneys	Sodium movements in perfused rat kidney proximal tubules.
17	the mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a fresh water fish carassius auratus i evidence for an independent uptake of sodium and chloride ions	The sodium and chloride uptake mechanism in the gills of a freshwater fish, carassius auratus, indicates that there is independent sodium and chloride absorption.
17	the mechanism of sodium and chloride uptake by the gills of a fresh water fish carassius auratus ii evidence for nh4 ion na ion and hco3 ion c1 ion exchanges	The mechanism of death; absorption of sodium and chloride by the gills of fishes; fresh water; carassius auratus ii., indicates the existence of, and exchange of, sodium and chloride; naive ions and ionic ions.
17	ion transport in isolated rabbit ileum 3 chloride fluxes	In the ileum 3 of an isolated rabbit, the transport of ions occurs in the form of chloride flux.
17	the ac impedance of frog skin and its relation to active transport	L' impedance ac of the skin of frog and its relation to active transport.
17	the sedimentation behaviour of ribonuclease active and inactive ribosomes from bacteria	Sedimentation behavior of active and inactive bacterial ribonuclease ribosomes.
17	maximum rate of depolarization of single muscle fiber in normal and low sodium solutions	Maximum muscle fiber depolarization rate in normal low-sodium solutions.
17	the effect of calcium withdrawal on the structure and function of the toad bladder	Effect of calcium removal on bladder structure and function.
17	the dual effect of calcium on the action potential of the frog s heart	The Dual Effect of Calcium on the Potency of Frog Heart.
17	cytological alterations related to stimulation of the zona glomerulosa of the adrenal gland	Stimulation-related cytological alterations of the glomerular zone of the adrenal gland.
17	energetics of anaerobic sodium transport by the fresh water turtle bladder	Canadian Environmental Protection Act, 1999. http://www.ec.gc.ca/eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco-eco.html.
17	differences in na and ca spikes as examined by application of tetrodotoxin procaine and manganese ions	Differences between the na- and ca-peaks were examined by procaine and manganese tetrodotoxin ion application.
17	the adenosine diphosphate adenosine triposphate excange reaction of cerebral microsomes and its relation to he sodium ion stimulatd adenosine triphosphatase reaction	Dapos triposphate; dapos adenosine diphosphate; adenosine excites cerebral microsomal reaction and its relationship to apos; apos-stimulated adenosine triphosphatase; sodium ion.
17	movements of radioactive sodium in cerebral cortex slices in response to electrical stimulation	Radioactive sodium movement in slices of the cerebral cortex in response to electrical stimulation.
17	uptake and loss of na rb and cs in relation to an active mechanism for extrusion of na in scenedesmus	Absorption and loss of na rb and cs in relation to active d' na extrusion in scenedesmus.
17	purified staphylococcal alpha toxin effect on epithelial ion transport	Epithelial ion transport effects of purified staphylococcal alpha toxin.
17	crayfish muscle permeability to sodium induced by calcium depletion	In addition, it can be used as a substitute for calcium depletion.
17	effects of sodium azide on sodium fluxes in frog striated muscle	Effects of Sodium Nitrate on Sodium Fluxes in Frog Striated Muscle.
17	fluid transport in the rabbit gallbladder a combined physiological and electron microscopic study	The transport of fluids in the gallbladder of rabbit has been studied by means of an electron microscopic study.
17	sodium transport inhibitory factor in sweat of patients with cystic fibrosis	Sodium transport inhibitors in sweat from cystic fibrosis patients.
17	electron spin resosnance of gamma irradiated oriented dna prepared by wet spinning	Electron spin resistivity of l' damp spinning gamma-irradiated oriented DNA.
17	nature of the renal concentrating defect in sickle cell disease	N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A 1.
17	discrimination of single transport systems the na plus sensitive transport of neutral amino acids in the ehrlich cell	In addition, it is important to note that there is no single source of amino acids in the cell.
17	strophanthidin sensitive transport of cesium and sodium in muscle cells	Cesium and sodium transport into muscle cells is sensitive to strophanthidin.
17	regulation of intracellular sodium concentrations in rat diaphragm muscle	Regulation of Intracellular Sodium Concentrations in Rat Diaphragm.
17	giant axon of myxicola some membrane properties as observed under voltage clamp	L&apos, a giant myxicola axon, has some voltage-clamped membrane properties.
17	control of aldosterone secretion by the pituitary gland	Control of pituitary aldosterone secretion.
17	effects of dinitrophenol and oligomycin on the coupling between anaerobic metabolism and anaerobic sodium transport by the isolated turtle bladder	Effects of dinitrophenol and oligomycin on anaerobic metabolism coupling to anaerobic sodium transport by isolated turtle bladder.
17	relation between sodium concentration electrical potential and transfer capacity of rat small intestine	Ratio of the sodium concentration of the electrical potential to the ability of the rat's small intestine to transfer sodium.
17	effects of hypotonic saline loading in hydrated dog evidence for a saline induced limit on distal tubular sodium transport	The effects of a hydrated dog hypotonic saline charge indicate the existence of apos; a saline-induced limit on distal tubular sodium transport.
17	changes in proximal and distal tubular reabsorption produced by rapid expansion of extracellular fluid	Changes in the reabsorption of the proximal and distal tubules caused by the apos; rapid expansion of the extracellular fluid.
17	blockage of sodium conductance increase in lobster giant axon by tarichatoxin tetrodotoxin	Sodium conductance block increased in the giant lobster axon with tarichatoxin tetrodotoxin.
17	simple photoreceptors in limulus polyphemus	A simple photoreceptor in the limulus polyphemus.
17	some factors influencing sodium extrusion by internally dialyzed squid axons	Some factors influence the extrusion of sodium by axons of dialyzed squid.
17	effect of inhibitors on alanine transport in isolated rabbit ileum	The effect of the inhibitors on the transport of alanine in the isolated ileum of rabbits.
17	aldosterone hypersecretion in non salt losing congenital adrenal hyperplasia	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature, and are consistent with those reported in the literature.
17	an analysis of the surface fixed charge theory of the squid giant axon membrane	An analysis of squid giant axonal membrane fixed surface charge theory.
17	studies on the characteristics of the control system governing sodium excretion in uremic man	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk factors.
17	effect of bile infusion on the dog kidney	Effect of biliary infusion on dog kidney.
17	an upper limit to the number of sodium channels in nerve membrane	This is the upper limit of the number of channels of sodium in the nerve membrane.
17	facilitation of heart muscle contraction and its dependence on external calcium and sodium	Facilitation of cardiac muscle contraction and dependence on-to-external calcium and sodium.
17	transport of monosaccharides in kidney cortex cells	Monosaccharide transport in renal cortical cells.
17	the dependence of slow inward current in purkinje fibres on the extracellular calcium concentration	The dependence of the slow current entering purkinje fibers on extracellular calcium concentration.
17	the relationship between glomerular filtration rate and sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of the rat nephron	The relationship between the rate of glomerular filtration and the reabsorption of sodium by the proximal tubule of rat nephron.
17	sites of action of sodium depletion on aldosterone biosynthesis in the dog	The effects of sodium depletion on the biosynthesis of apos; aldosterone in dogs.
17	nutrition and metabolism of marine bacteria xvi formation of protoplasts spheroplasts and related forms from a gram negative marine bacterium	Nutrition and Metabolism of Marine Bacteria xvi formation of spheroplast and related protoplasts from a Gram-negative marine bacterium.
17	effect of diluents on blood clot lysis	Effect of Diluent on Lysis of Blood Clots.
17	alanine and sodium fluxes across mucosal border of rabbit ileum	Sodium and alanine flow through the mucosal margin of the rabbit ileum.
17	sodium flux and electrical activity of arterial smooth muscle	Arterial smooth muscle flow and electrical activity.
17	water and sodium absorption in the human intestine	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
17	the site of the stimulatory action of vasopressin on sodium transport in toad bladder	Sodium transport in the bladder of toads; stimulatory action of vasopressin.
17	effects of lithium on different membrane components of crayfish stretch receptor neurons	Effects of lithium on various components of the membrane of d*apos receptor neurons; elongation of the apos; crayfish.
17	the effect of cations on the electrical properties of the smooth muscle cells of the guinea pig vas deferens	Cation effects on the electrical properties of guinea pig vas deferens smooth muscle cells.
17	active transport of ions by the gastric mucosa of the rabbit foetus	Active ion transport by rabbit fetal gastric mucosa.
17	a role for the sodium pump in photoreception in limulus	The sodium pump plays a photoreception role in the limulus.
17	effects of cardiac glycosides on electrical activity in the isolated retina of the frog	Cardiac glycoside effects on apos; electrical activity in isolated frog retina.
17	structural requirements for active intestinal sugar transport the involvement of hydrogen bonds at c 1 and c 6 of the sugar	Structural requirements for the active intestinal transport of l&apos sugars; involvement of hydrogen bonding at c1 and c6 sugar levels.
17	demonstration of a hormonal inhibitor of proximal tubular reabsorption during expansion of extracellular volume with isotonic saline	Evidence of apo; proximal tubular reabsorption hormone inhibitor during apo; extracellular volume expansion with isotonic saline solution.
17	functional correlates of compensatory renal hypertrophy	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the development of the disease.
17	further observations on asymmetrical solute movement across membranes	D' further observations were made on the asymmetric motion of solutes across membranes.
17	sodium fluxes in internally dialyzed squid axons	Sodium flow in axons of dialyzed squid.
17	sodium movements in perfused squid giant axons passive fluxes	Sodium movement patterns in the perfused giant squid axons of passive flux.
17	hellebrigenin 3 haloacetates potent site directed alkylators of transport adenosinetriphosphatase	L' helebenin 3 haloacetate is a potent site, which is directed to the aposylator; transport adenosineriphosphatase.
17	acetazolamide and sodium bicarbonate in treatment of salicylate poisoning in adults	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of diabetes.
17	the accumulation of guanethidine by human blood platelets	It's called guanethidine or guanethidine, and it's called guanethidine.
17	studies on streaming i inhibition of protoplasmic streaming and cytokinesis of chaos chaos by adenosine triphosphate and reversal by magnesium and calcium ions	Apos studies; inhibition of chaos cytokinesis and protoplasmic flux formation by apos; adenosine triphosphate and apos; magnesium and calcium inversion.
17	use of potassium pyroantimonate in the localization of sodium ions in rat kidney tissue	Use potassium pyroantimonate to localize ions in renal tissue of rat.
17	a down then up staircase in frog ventricle due to altered excitation contraction coupling	A staircase at the bottom and then at the top in the ventricle of the frog due to a change in excitation-contraction coupling.
17	diffusional resistance of the innermost layer of the placental barrier of the rabbit	Resistance to diffusion of innermost layer of rabbit placental barrier.
17	depression of fractional sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule of the dog without sodium diuresis	Depressed fractional sodium reabsorption by dog proximal tubule without sodium diuresis.
17	effect of acute hypertension on sodium reabsorption by the proximal tubule	Effect of Lapos; acute hypertension on proximal tubular sodium reabsorption.
17	an evaluation of perfusion techniques in the study of water and electrolyte absorption in man the problem of endogenous secretions	Evaluation of apo infusion techniques; apo study; apo water and apo water absorption; apo electrolyte; men endogenous secretion problem.
17	sodium content of community water supplies in california	Sodium Content of California Community Water Supplies.
17	condylactis toxin interaction with nerve membrane ionic conductances	Interaction of the conylactis toxin with the ionic conductances of the conical nerve membrane.
17	the phosphaturic effect of sodium bicarbonate and acetazolamide in dogs	Sodium bicarbonate and apos phosphaturic effect; acetazolamide in dog.
17	natriferic and hydrosmotic effects of neurohypophysial peptides and their analogues in augmenting fluid uptake by bufo melanostictus	Natriferic and hydrosmotic effects of neuropituitary peptides and analogues in apos; increase in apos; fluid absorption by bufo melanostictus.
17	slow inactivation of currents in cardiac purkinje fibres	Slow inactivation of current in the fibers of cardiac purkinje.
17	control of the orientation of cilia by adenosinetriphosphate calcium and zinc in glycerol extracted paramecium caudatum	Calcium and zinc adenosine adenosine triphosphate in glycerol extracted from paramecium caudatum.
17	synaptic activation of an electrogenic sodium pump	Sodium-sodium-sodium-sodium-sodium-electro-sodium pump.
17	regional distribution of acid mucopolysaccharides in the kidney	Regional distribution of renal acid mucopolysaccharides.
17	the effect of salicylates on the hemostatic properties of platelets in man	L' effect of salicylates on human platelet hemostatic properties.
17	amiloride a potent inhibitor of sodium transport across the toad bladder	Amiloride is a potent sodium transport inhibitor across the toad bladder.
17	direct measurement of acetylesterase in living protist cells	Direct Measurement of L' Acetylesterase in Living Protist Cells.
17	the effect of cyanide on the efflux of calcium from squid axons	Cyanide effect on apos; calcium efflux from squid axons.
17	monosodium l glutamate its pharmacology and role in the chinese restaurant syndrome	Monosodium glutamate I, its pharmacology, and its role in Chinese-style restaurant syndrome.
17	lysine transport across isolated rabbit ileum	Transport of lysine through the apos; isolated ileum from rabbit.
17	mechanism of change in the excretion of sodium per nephron when renal mass is reduced	Sodium excretion by nephron when the mass of the kidney is reduced.
17	mechanism of exaggerated natriuresis in hypertensive man impaired sodium transport in the loop of henle	The mechanism was an exaggerated natriuresis of the hypertensive man who altered the transport of sodium in the anse of the hen.
17	failure to demonstrate a hormonal inhibitor of proximal sodium reabsorption	It can also be used as a means of reducing the amount of sodium in the body.
17	effective plasma volume in cirrhosis with ascites evidence that a decreased value does not account for renal sodium retention a sponteneous reduction in glomerular filtration rate gfr and a fall in gfr during drug induced diuresis	The effective plasma volume in ascites cirrhosis shows that decreased renal sodium retention, spontaneous reduction of glomerular filtration rate, and a drop in gfr during drug-induced diuresis does not explain the decreased value.
17	cystic fibrosis of the pancreas diagnosis by sodium electrode sweat tests	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
17	the binding of sodium dodecyl sulphate to various proteins	Sodium dodecyl sulfate binding to various proteins.
17	nitrification importance to nutrient losses from a cutover forested ecosystem	It is also important to note that there is a lack of understanding of the effects of climate change on forest ecosystems.
17	human immunity to the meningococcus 3 preparation and immunochemical properties of the group a group b and group c meningococcal polysaccharides	Human Immunity to Meningococcal Preparation 3 and Immunochemical Properties of Meningococcal Group a b and c polysaccharides.
17	effect of changes in renal perfusion pressure on the suppression of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption due to saline loading	Effect of renal perfusion pressure changes on the suppression of saline-induced proximal tubular sodium reabsorption.
17	the effect of sodium and calcium on the action potential of the smooth muscle of the guinea pig taenia coli	Sodium and calcium effect on the potential of os; action of taenia coli guinea pig smooth muscle.
17	effect of a saline environment on sodium transport by the toad colon	Effect of salt environment on toad colonic sodium transport.
17	factors affecting mucosal water and sodium transfer in everted sacs of rat jejunum	In addition, there is a need for additional information to be provided to assist in the evaluation.
17	metabolic studies aldosterone secretion rate and plasma renin after carbenoxolone sodium	Metabolic study of the rate of plasma aldosterone and renin secretion after sodium carbenoxolone.
17	a study of the end plate potential in sodium deficient solution	A terminal plate potential study in a sodium-deficient solution.
17	nonsteady state three compartment tracer kinetics ii sodium flux transients in the toad urinary bladder in response to short circuit	Non-stationary kinetics of three-compartment tracers ii transient flux of sodium into the bladder of toads in response to short-circuit.
17	effects of sodium concentration and osmolality on water and electrolyte absorption form the intact human colon	The effects of the concentration of sodium and osteos; osmolality on the apos; water and the apos; absorption of apos; electrolytes form the intact human colon.
17	current voltage relations during illumination photoreceptor membrane of a barnacle	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
17	sodium inactivation in nerve fibers	Nerve fiber sodium inactivation.
17	intra hepatic vascular response to sodium nitrite	Sodium nitrite intrarapatic vascular response.
17	sodium and calcium components of action potentials in the aplysia giant neurone	Calcium and sodium components of the apos potentials; action in the giant neuron of the apos; aplysia.
17	the action of ethacrynic acid on sodium efflux from single toad oocytes	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the ability of toads to thrive.
17	action of amphotericin b on the toad bladder evidence for sodium transport along two pathways	Toad bladder; action of apos; amphotericin b indicates apos; existence of apos; two-way sodium transport.
17	renin aldosterone system in parkinson s disease	Systeme-aldosterone in Parkinson's disease.
17	antagonistic effect of monovalent cations in maintenance of cellular integrity of a marine bacterium	An organism that has been found to be a bacterium and has been found to be a bacterium.
17	cation interactions and biochemical composition of the cell envelope of a marine bacterium	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
17	ionic interactions in acetylcholine contraction of the denervated rat diaphragm	Ion interactions in the contraction of acetylcholine in the rat diaphragm.
17	micropuncture studies of the sweat formation in cystic fibrosis patients	Micropuncture Studies of Sweat Formation in Patients with Cystic Fibrosis.
17	the relationship between peritubular capillary protein concentration and fluid reabsorption by the renal proximal tubule	The relationship between the concentration of peritubular capillary proteins and the reabsorption of fluid by the renal proximal tubule.
17	metabolism and rate of secretion of aldosterone in the bullfrog	Metabolism and aldosterone secretion rates in bullfrogs.
17	comparison of the effects of water deprivation and sodium chloride imbibition on the hormone content of the neurohypophysis of the rat	Comparison of effects of water and sodium chloride deprivation on hormone content of rat neurohypophysis.
17	tetrodotoxin resistant electric activity in presynaptic terminals	Tetrodotoxin-resistant electrical activity at presynaptic terminals.
17	brain lesions in an infant rhesus monkey treated with monsodium glutamate	Brain damage in a Mussodium Glutamate-treated baby rhesus monkey.
17	diarrhoea associated with medullary carcinoma of the thyroid	Thyroid spinal cell carcinoma associated diarrhea.
17	circulatory changes and renin secretion in sheep in response to feeding	Dietary changes in the diet of sheep due to changes in the circulatory system and secretion of renin.
17	role of acetate in the reduction of plasma free fatty acids produced by ethanol in man	The role of apos; acetate in reducing apos-induced plasma free fatty acids; ethanol in apos; man.
17	phage typing scheme for salmonella braenderup	Phage typing pattern for braenderup salmonella.
17	on the mechanism of action of aldosterone	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	synaptic current at the squid giant synapse	Synaptic current to giant squid synapse.
17	membrane potential as the sum of ionic and metabolic components	The membrane potential is the sum of both the ionic and the metabolic components.
17	renal excretion of calcium and sodium in acute nephritis	L' renal calcium and sodium excretion in the acute nephritis.
17	production of mouse urinary bladder carcinomas by sodium cyclamate	Mouse bladder carcinoma production by sodium cyclamate.
17	comparison of methods for tuberculosis bacteriology	Tuberculosis bacteriological methods compared.
17	23na nuclear magnetic resonance relaxation studies of sodium ion interaction with soluble rna	Relaxation studies by nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) of l&apos 23na; interaction of l' sodium ion with soluble rna.
17	spontaneous and evoked activity of motor nerve endings in calcium ringer	Spontaneous evoked motor nerve terminals in the calcium ring.
17	the action potential in the smooth muscle of the guinea pig taenia coli and ureter studied by the double sucrose gap method	The smooth muscle action potential of taenia coli and guinea-pig ureter was studied by the sucrose double-band gap method.
17	effect of sodium ions on calcium movements in isolated synaptic terminals	Effects of sodium on calcium movement in isolated synaptic terminals.
17	determination of iodine concentration and distribution in rat thyroid follicles by electron probe microanalysis	Determination of the concentration and distribution of apos; iodine in the thyroid follicles of the rat by microimmunoassay; use of electron probes.
17	change of tubular reabsorption of sodium and water after renal denervation in the dog	Changes in sodium and d&apos tubular reabsorption; water after renal denervation in dog.
17	nuclear magnetic resonance studies of sodium ions in isolated frog muscle and liver	Sodium ion nuclear magnetic resonance studies in isolated liver and muscle of frogs.
17	the relation of membrane changes ot contraction in twitch muscle fibres	The relationship between membrane and twitch muscle fiber contraction is changing.
17	contractile repriming in snake twitch muscle fibres	Muscle fiber contractions repair in the twitching snake.
17	production of an artifact during methanolysis of lipids by boron trifluoride methanol	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
17	sodium influxes in internally perfused squid giant axon during voltage clamp	Influx of sodium into the epos; giant squid axon perfused internally during voltage clamping.
17	potential differences between mother and foetus at different gestational ages in the rat rabbit and guinea pig	Potential differences between the mother and fetus at different ages of gestation in the rabbit and the guinea pig.
17	mechanisms regulating the renal excretion of sodium during pregnancy	Mechanisms controlling pregnancy; renal sodium excretion.
17	current separations in myxicola giant axons	Giant axon separations of myxicola.
17	the effect of acute changes in haematocrit in the anaesthetized dog on the volume and character of the urine	Lapos; effect of acute apo variations; hematocrit in anesthetized dog on volume and character; urine.
17	the effect of urea loading on volume and concentration of urine in rabbits	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	mechanism of bicarbonate absorption and its relationship to sodium transport in the human jejunum	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
17	interrelationships of chloride bicarbonate sodium and hydrogen transport in the human ileum	Interrelations between sodium bicarbonate chloride transport and human ileon hydrogen.
17	defect in urinary acidification induced in vitro by amphotericin b	Deficiency of apos; urinary acidosis induced by apos; amphotericin b.
17	isolation and partial characterization of an immunogenic moiety obtained from salmonella typhimurium	In addition to the above, it may also be used as an antibody to determine the identity of the individual.
17	resistance of pseudomonas to quaternary ammonium compounds i growth in benzalkonium chloride solution	Pseudomonas resistance to quaternary d' ammonium compounds grown in solution of benzalkonium chloride.
17	microbiological study of water softener resins	Microbiological Investigation of Softening Resins in Water.
17	the effect of electrical stimulation and ouabain on the uptake and efflux of l u 14c valine in chopped tissue from guinea pig cerebral cortex	Electrical stimulation and apo; ouabain effect on apoos; absorption and apo; efflux of u 14c valine into guinea pig cerebral cortical tissue.
17	method for quantitating formaldehyde gas in air	Quantification of formaldehyde in air.
17	diuretics in cardiac edema 1969	Cardiac edema, 1969.
17	the interaction of monosodium urate with connective tissue components	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
17	direct evidence from nuclear magnetic resonance studies for bound sodium in forg skeletal muscle	Nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) studies have revealed the presence of bound sodium in the intact skeletal muscle.
17	evidence for a single stranded adenovirus associated virus genome isolation and separation of complementary single strands	Evidence of apovirus; single strand apovirus associated with apovirus; isolation of virus genome and complementary single strand separation.
17	ionic channels and nerve membrane lipids cholesterol tetrodotoxin interaction	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system.
17	growth from spores of clostridium perfringens in the presence of sodium nitrite	Growth from clostridium perfringens spores on sodium nitrite.
17	inhibition of the effects of angiotensin ii on adrenal steroid production by dietary sodium	It is important to note that the effects of angiotensin II on the production of adrenal steroids by dietary sodium are not known.
17	na plus facilitated reactions of neutral amino acids with a cationic amino acid transport system	In addition, neutral amino acid reactions are facilitated by a transport system of cationic amino acids.
17	hypernatraemia special problems with angiocardiography in total anomalous pulmonary venous drainage	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	assessment of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption during water diuresis in patients with heart disease	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch.
17	spectrophotometric methods for monitoring the microbial transformation of steroids i determination of 9 alpha fluorohydrocortisone and 9 alpha fluoro 16 alpha hydroxyhydrocortisone in fermentation broths	Spectrophotometric Methods for Monitoring the Microbial Processing of Steroid Products i determination of 9 alpha fluorohydrocortisone and 9 alpha fluoro 16 alpha hydroxyhydrocortisone in fermentation broths.
17	enzymatic analysis of the requirement for sodium in aerobic growth of salmonella typhimurium on citrate	Enzymatic analysis of sodium requirements in citrate-grown Salmonella typhimurium aerobic growth.
17	enlargement of taurocholate micelles by added cholesterol and monoolein self diffusion measurements	Taurocholate micelle enlargement by apo; cholesterol addition and apo measurements; auto-monolein release.
17	effects of increased sodium delivery on distal tubular sodium reabsorption with and without volume expansion in man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that the effects of sodium intake on the absorption of sodium in the distal tubules are significant.
17	acetate and bicarbonate in the correction of uraemic acidosis	Acute and chronic toxicity of ethylene oxide.
17	neutron activation analysis of manganese and sodium in bacterial cells	Neutron Activation Analysis of Manganese and Sodium in Bacterial Cells.
17	an accuate method for measurement of aldosterone production	Accuate method to measure aldosterone production.
17	synaptic potentials recorded by the sucrose gap method from the rabbit superior cervical ganglion	Synaptic potentials recorded by rabbit upper cervical ganglion sucrose gap method.
17	effects of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate on renal function in the rabbit	Effects of L' Adenosine 3-5 Monophosphate on Renal Function in Rabbits.
17	endocrine and metabolic disordes in bronchial carcinoma	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	proteins of avian tumor viruses with different coat antigens	Avian tumour virus proteins with various peel antigens.
17	lipid composition of chlamydia psittaci grown in monkey kidney cells in defined medium	Lipid composition of chlamydia psittaci grown in monkeys' kidney tissue cells in a defined medium.
17	time course of the sodium influx in squid giant axon during a single voltage clamp pulse	L' temporal evolution of the apos; influx of sodium into the apos; giant axon of the squid during a single impulse of voltage imposed.
17	sodium dependency of l alanine absorption in canine thiry vella loops	Sodium dependence of the plants; absorption of the plants; alanine in loops of pubescent canines.
17	the role of sodium current in the radial spread of contraction in frog muscle fibers	The role of sodium current in radial contraction diffusion in frog muscle fibers.
17	effect of intraluminal ph on the absorption of pteroylmonoglutamic acid	Effect of Intraluminal Ph on Apos; Absorption of Apos; Pteroylmonoglutamic Acid.
17	growth of pseudomonas fluorescens with sodium maleate as a carbon source	Pseudomonas fluorescens growth with sodium maleate as the carbon source.
17	growth responses of escherichia coli to the surfactant dodecyl benzene sulfonate	Growth reactions of Escherichia coli and dodecyl benzene sulfonate.
17	effect of sodium fluorescein and plating medium on recovery of irradiated escherichia coli and serratia marcescens from aerosols	Recovery of irradiated aerosol Escherichia coli and Serratia marcescens by sodium fluorescein and culture medium.
17	the effect of altered sodium concentration in the distal nephron segments on renin release	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that renal renin release is due to a change in the concentration of sodium in the distal nephron.
17	on the role of antidiuretic hormone in the inhibition of acute water diuresis in adrenal insufficiency and the effects of gluco and mineralocorticoids in reversing the inhibition	On the role of apo; antidiuretic hormone in apo; inhibition of acute aqueous diuresis in apo; adrenal insufficiency and gluco and mineralocorticoid effects in apo reversal; inhibition.
17	changes in bone sodium and carbonate in metabolic acidosis and alkalosis in the dog	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
17	postglomerular vascular protein concentration evidence for a causal role in governing fluid reabsorption and glomerulotublar balance by the renal proximal tubule	The concentration of post-<-> glomerular vascular proteins indicates a causal role in the regulation of fluid and l&apos reabsorption; renal proximal tubular glomerulotube balance.
17	disproportionate inhibition of sodium reabsorption in the unilaterally diseased kidney of dog and man after an acute saline load	Disproportionate sodium reabsorption inhibition in the dog's unilaterally diseased kidney; man after acute saline loading.
17	nitrification of aspartate by aspergillus flavus	Nitrification of the plants; aspartate by the plants; aspergillus flavus.
17	sodium inactivation experimental test of two models	Sodium inactivation of two models.
17	an investigation of alpha methyl amino acids and their derivatives on isolated tissue preparations	A study of alpha-methyl acids and derivatives in isolated tissue preparations.
17	vaccinia virus structural polypeptide derived from a high molecular weight precursor formation and integration into virus particles	It is a structural polypeptide of the vaccine virus derived from the formation of d' a precursor of high molecular weight and its integration into virus particles.
17	lpp 1 infection of the blue green alga plectonema boryanum 3 protein synthesis	Blue alga-green plectonema boryanum 3.
17	factors affecting the secretion of staphylococcal enterotoxin a	Factors Affecting Apos Secretion; Staphylococcal Enterotoxin a.
17	electrical potentials of the sigmoid colon and rectum in irritable bowel syndrome and ulcerative colitis	Sigmoid bowel and rectal electrical potentials in irritable bowel syndrome and ulcerative colitis.
17	theoretical and experimental basis for a specific countertransport system in membranes	The experimental and theoretical basis for a specific system against-transport in membranes.
17	renin secretion an anatomical basis for tubular control	Renin secretion is a basic anatomical basis for tubular control.
17	reversible osmotic opening of the blood brain barrier	Reversible osmotic blood barrier opening-encephalic.
17	partial purification and properties of a highly specific trehalose phosphate phosphatase from mycobacterium smegmatis	Partial purification and apos properties; highly specific mycobacterium smegmatis trehalose phosphate phosphatase.
17	paracrystalline sheets reaggregated from solubilized exosporium of bacillus cereus	In addition, a number of other species were found to be exosporic.
17	linear single stranded deoxyribonucleic acid isolated from kilham rat virus	Isolated linear single-strand deoxyribonucleic acid from kilham rat virus.
17	ultracentrifugal analysis of staphylococcal alpha toxin	Ultra-centrifugal alpha staphylococcal toxin analysis.
17	genetic heterogeneity in streptococcus mutans	Streptococcus mutans genetic heterogeneity.
17	the distribution of inorganic cations in mouse testis electron microscope and microprobe analysis	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	effects of batrachotoxin on membrane potential and conductance of squid giant axons	Effects of batrachotoxin on squid giant axon membrane potential and conductance.
17	angiotensin forming enzyme in brain tissue	It is also known as angiotensin and angiotensin.
17	structural proteins of simian virus 40	It can be used as an antibody to a virus.
17	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases of rous sarcoma virus kinetics of deoxyribonucleic acid synthesis and specificity of the products	Viral deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases, deoxyribonucleic acid, and product specificity kinetic sarcoma synthesis.
17	structural proteins of rabies virus	Rage virus structural proteins.
17	number and molecular weights of foot and mouth disease virus capsid proteins and the effects of maleylation	Number and molecular weight of capsid proteins for FMD virus and effects of maleylation.
17	separation and structure of components of nuclear polyhedrosis virus of the silkworm	Silkworm nuclear polyhedrosis virus component separation and structure.
17	infectivity and sedimentation of rhinovirus ribonucleic acid	Ribonucleic acid rhinovirus infectivity and sedimentation.
17	early intracellular events in the replication of t4 bacteriophage deoxyribonucleic acid vii 32p suicide stabilization	The first intracellular events of replication of the deoxyribonucleic acid deoxyribonucleic acid bacteriophage t4 of the suicidal stabilization vii 32p.
17	determination of hydrogen sulfide in fermentation broths containing so 2	The results of these studies are summarized below.
17	nonelectrolyte permeability sodium influx electrical potentials and axolemma ultrastructure in squid axons of various diameters	In addition to the above, the results of the study are presented in the following sections.
17	purification and properties of colicin k	Colicin k purification and properties.
17	effect of simulated solar radiation and sodium fluorescein on the recovery of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus from aerosols	Simulated solar radiation and sodium fluorescein have an effect on the recovery of Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis from aerosols.
17	new quantitative qualitative and confirmatory media for rapid analysis of food for clostridium perfringens	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: 1.
17	removal of nonidet p40 absorbance for optical density monitoring of cytoplasmic ribonucleic acid	Absorption of l' nonidet absorbance p40 for monitoring l&apos optical density; and cytoplasmic ribonucleic acid.
17	absorption of sodium and water by human rectum measured by a dialysis method	Inhalation is the process of removing a substance from the body and causing it to be removed from the body.
17	inactivation of t antigen forming capacites of simian virus 40 and adenovirus 12 by ultraviolet irradiation	Inactivation of the antigen t forming the abilities of simian virus 40 and apos; ultraviolet irradiation of adenovirus 12.
17	characterization of the genome of cytoplasmic polyhedrosis virus	Cytoplasmic polyhedrosis virus genome characterization.
17	electron microscope study of ribonucleic acid of myxoviruses	Ribonucleic acid (RNA) of myxoviruses.
17	renal effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate and dibutyryl adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate evidence for a role for adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate in the regulation of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption	The renal effects of l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate and dibutyryl adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate suggest that l' adenosine 3-5 cyclic monophosphate is involved in the regulation of sodium proximal tubular reabsorption.
17	ostnatal development of renal function micropuncture and clearance studies in the dog	Ostnatal development of micropuncture renal function and dog clearance studies.
17	intracortical distribution of number and volume of glomeruli during postnatal maturation in the dog	Intracortical distribution of glomeruli numbers and glomeruli volume during postnatal maturation in dogs.
17	a stored charge model for the sodium channel	Charge pattern stored for sodium channel.
17	accelerated reabsorption in the proximal tubule produced by volume depletion	Accelerated proximal tubular reabsorption induced by volume depletion.
17	dicarboxylic amino acid influx across brush border of rabbit ileum effects of amino acid charge on the sodium amino acid interaction	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that the presence of the amino acid is associated with the presence of the amino acid.
17	composition of the sulfur particle of chromatium vinosum strain d	Composition of the chromatium vinosum d.
17	studies on escherichia coli sex factors evidence that covalent circles exist within cells and the general problem of isolation of covalent circles	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that there is a risk of infection due to the presence of other sexually transmitted diseases.
17	nitrogenase activity in cell free extracts of the blue green alga anabaena cylindrica	Nitrogenase activity in cell-free extracts of L' blue alga-green anabaena cylindrica.
17	cell wall and peptidoglycan from lactobacillus fermenti	Cell wall and lactobacillus fermenti peptidoglycan.
17	analysis of sodium transport in the amphibian oocyte by extractive and radioautographic techniques	Sodium transport analysis in apo; apo oocyte; amphibian extractive and radioautographic techniques.
17	optical studies on the kinetics of the sodium pump in mammalian non myelinated nerve fibres	Optical studies of sodium pump kinetics in nonmyelinated mammalian nerve fibers.
17	on the control of glycogenolysis in mammalian nervous tissue by calcium	Control of glycogenolysis in mammalian nerve tissue by calcium.
17	on the mechanisms of sodium ion transport by the irrigated gills of rainbow trout salmo gairdneri	On the mechanisms of irrigated trout gill sodium ion transport-in-sky salmo gairdneri.
17	formation of protoplasts from resting spores	Protoplasts formed from resting spores.
17	experimental alteration of coupling resistance at an electrotonic synapse	Experimental modification of the coupling strength to an electrotonic-synapse.
17	mechanism of compensatory renal hypertrophy	Procedures; Compensatory Renal Hypertrophy.
17	angiotensin ii vascular receptors their avidity in relationship to sodium balance the autonomic nervous system and hypertension	In addition, angiotensin can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent in the treatment of heart disease, stroke and stroke.
17	energetics of sodium transport in frog skin ii the effects of electrical potential on oxygen consumption	Sodium Transport Energy in Frog Skin and the Effects of Electrical Potency on the Consumption of Oxygen.
17	changes in total body calcium and sodium in osteomalacia	The results of this study are summarized below.
17	na and ca components of action potential in amphioxus muscle cells	It is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
17	the effect of metal ions and antidiuretic hormone on oxygen consumption in toad bladder	The effects of metallic ions and eposes; antidiuretic hormone on the consumption of apo; oxygen in the bladder of toads.
17	the sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum effect of sodium on alanine fluxes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
17	the sodium alanine interaction in rabbit ileum effect of alanine on sodium fluxes	L' interaction of sodium alanine in the apos; ileum of rabbit effect of the apos; alanine on the sodium fluxes.
17	proximal tubular function in dogs with thoracic caval constriction	Proximal tubular functions in dogs exhibiting thoracic cavity-related constriction.
17	slow sodium an oral slowly released sodium chloride preparation	Dietary fat should be taken into account when calculating the total fat intake.
17	the influence of the carbonic anhydrase inhibitor benzolamide cl 11 366 on the reabsorption of chloride sodium and bicarbonate in the proximal tubule of the rat	Lapos; influence of apos; benzolamide inhibitor; benzolamide 11:366 carbonic anhydrase cl on sodium chloride and bicarbonate reabsorption in rat proximal tubule.
17	effect of peritubular protein concentration on reabsorption of sodium and water in isolated perfused proxmal tubules	Effect of peritubular protein concentration on sodium and d&apos reabsorption; water in both isolated and perfused proxmal tubules.
17	evidence for a direct action of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol on the renal transport of phosphate sodium and calcium	Evidence of direct action of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol on renal transport of sodium phosphate and calcium.
17	plasma aldosterone concentration at delivery and during the newborn period	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered.
17	effect of chronic bile duct obstruction on renal handling of salt and water	Effect of inhalation; chronic obstruction of the bile duct on the renal handling of the salt and the sapos; water.
17	the influence of angiotensin infusion on the urine composition in individual kidney function tests	It is not possible to determine the composition of the urine; it is necessary to determine the composition of the urine.
17	the recovery of resting potential and input resistance in sheep heart injured by knife or laser	Restability and resistance recovery from knife or laser wound to sheep heart.
17	studies on the porphobilinogen deaminase uroporphyrinogen cosynthetase system of cultured soya bean cells	Studies of the Porphobilinogen Deaminase uroporphyrinogen Cosynthetase System of Soybean Culture Cells.
17	intrarenal distribution of blood flow and cortico medullary sodium gradient after unilateral splanchnicotomy in the dog	Intrarenal distribution of canine blood flow and cortico sodium gradient-medullary after unilateral splanchnicotomy.
17	membrane calcium current in ventricular myocardial fibres	Ventricular myocardial fibre membrane calcium current.
17	the relation between membrane potential membrane currents and activation of contraction in ventricular myocardial fibres	The relationship between potential membrane currents and ventricular myocardial fiber contractions.
17	the binding of tetrodotoxin to nerve membranes	Tetrodotoxin binding to neural membranes.
17	the frequency dependent character of the membrane capacity in cardiac purkyn fibres	The frequency-dependent character of cardiac purkyn fiber membrane capacity.
17	loss of the penicillinase plasmid after treatment of staphylococcus aureus with sodium dodecyl sulfate	Loss of the penicillinase plasmid after sodium dodecyl sulfate treatment of staphylococcus aureus.
17	effect of membrane lipid composition on the allosteric inhibition by sodium of the ca 2 adenosine triphosphatase from escherichia coli	Effect of Membrane Lipid Composition on Apos; Allosteric Sodium Inhibition of Apos; Adenosine triphosphatase; About 2 d Apos; Escherichia coli.
17	antimicrobial activity of sodium n alkylsalicylates	Sodium alkylsalicylate antimicrobial activity.
17	the relationship of amniotic fluid sodium to the latent period of saline abortion	The relationship between sodium in the amniotic fluid and the salt abortion latent period.
17	renal handling of sodium and water in the hypothyroid rat clearance and micropuncture studies	The renal manipulation of sodium and l'apos; water in studies of clearance and micropuncture in hypothyroid rats.
17	effects of sodium warfarin on capillary ultrastructure	Effects of Sodium Warfarin on Apos; Capillary Ultrastructure.
17	thermoregulation around a new set point established in the monkey by altering the ratio of sodium to calcium ions within the hypothalamus	Thermoregulation around apos; a new threshold established in monkeys by modifying the sodium/calcium ratio in hypothalamus.
17	irreversibility of methylandrostenediol induced hypertension in the rat after suspension of the androgen treatment	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system or on the immune system.
17	effects of sodium intake on inherited hypertension in the rat	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart disease.
17	radioautographic localization of sodium pump sites in rabbit intestine	Radioautographic localization of rabbit intestinal sodium pump sites.
17	recurrent hyperkalaemia due to selective aldosterone deficiency correction by angiotensin infusion	Recurrent hyperkalemia caused by selective correction of apos; aldosterone deficiency by apos infusion; angiotensin.
17	angiotensin sodium interaction in blood pressure maintenance of renal hypertensive and normotensive rats	L' interaction of sodium angiotensin (SA) in the maintenance of blood pressure in renal normotensive and hypertensive rats.
17	photodynamic alteration of sodium currents in lobster axons	Photodynamic alteration of the sodium current in the axons of the lobster.
17	the renal functional defect of postobstructive nephyropathy the effects of bilateral ureteral obstruction in the rat	L' renal functional abnormality of neophysiology post-obstruction; effects of l' obstruction of the ureteris bilaterally in the rat.
17	plasma renin levels and vascular complications in hypertension	It's not a big deal, but it's a big deal.
17	micropuncture studies of phosphate transport in the proximal tubule of the dog the relationship to sodium reabsorption	Micropuncture studies of sodium reabsorption in the dog proximal tubule.
17	interdependence of exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration in determining blood pressure in patients treated by maintenance dialysis	Interdependence of exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration in arterial pressure determination in dialysis d' maintenance.
17	beta blockers and plasma renin activity in hypertension	Beta-blockers and activity of the plasma renin in the apos; hypertension.
17	indentification of an intestinal sodium and calcium dependent phosphatase stimulated by parathyroid hormone	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	effect of acute and chronic calcium administration on plasma renin	Chronic and acute administration of calcium to plasma renin.
17	intrapartum hypertension and intravenous saline	Intravenous saline and intrapartum hypertension.
17	hemodynamic and humoral characteristics of hypertension induced by prolonged stellate ganglion stimulation in conscious dogs	Hemodynamic and humoral characteristics induced by prolonged stimulation of the stellate ganglion in conscious dogs.
17	control plasma renin activity and changes in sympathetic tone as determinants of minoxidil induced increase in plasma renin activity	L' plasma renin activity and sympathetic tone changes as minoxidil determinants induced an increase in plasma renin activity.
17	the effect of sodium salicylate on bile secretion in the dog	Effect of sodium salicylate on biliary secretion in dog.
17	detection of low renin hypertension evaluation of out patient renin stimulating methods	Dietary Reference Intakes (continued) Dietary Reference Intakes (continued) 1.
17	relationships of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system and sodium balance to blood pressure regulation in chronic renal failure of polycystic kidney disease	Renin system ratio-angiotensin-aldosterone and l' sodium balance, d' part, and blood pressure regulation, d' part, apos; chronic renal insufficiency, polycystic renal disease.
17	normal plasma renin activity in low renin hypertension	It is not possible to determine the cause of death due to hypertension.
17	effects of renal nerves on renal hemodynamics i direct stimulation and carotid occlusion	Effects of renal nerves on renal hemodynamics, direct stimulation, and on carotid occlusion.
17	regulation of protein phosphorylation and sodium transport in toad bladder	Regulation of sodium transport and protein phosphorylation in the toad bladder.
17	sodium stimulus for puddling behavior by tiger swallowtail butterflies papilio glaucus	Sodic stimulation of the behaviour of tiger swallows; water in tiger swallow moths.
17	reciprocation of renin dependency with sodium volume dependency in renal hypertension	J' studied the relationship between the renin response and the dependence of the volume of sodium in kidney hypertension.
17	clinical determinants of survival from postoperative renal failure	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	effect of angiotensin ii and an angiotensin ii inhibitor on renin secretion in the dog	The effect of angiotensin II and angiotensin II on the secretion of renin in dogs.
17	hypertension due to renal artery stenosis in transplanted kidneys	Lapular stenosis hypertension; renal artery in transplanted kidneys.
17	role of angiotensin ii in experimental renal hypertension in the rabbit	The Role of Lapos; Angiotensin ii in Apos; Experimental Renal Hypertension in Rabbit.
17	prorenin in human plasma	In human plasma, prolenin.
17	urinary kallikrein excretion in spontaneously hypertensive rats	L' urine excretion of kallikrein in hypertensive spontaneously rats.
17	effect of varying perfusion pressures on the output of sodium and renin and the vascular resistance in kidneys of rats with post salt hypertension and kyoto spontaneous hypertension	Effect of changes in perfusion pressures on sodium and renin release and vascular resistance in the kidneys of dodos-infected rats; hypertension post-salt and d' spontaneous hypertension kyoto.
17	a circulating renin activator in essential hypertension	It's an activator of renin circulating in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	renal prostaglandin synthesis in the goldblatt hypertensive rat	The synthesis of renal prostaglandins in the Goldblatt hypertensive rat.
17	renal control of sodium and fluid balance in newborn infants during intravenous maintenance therapy	Intravenous maintenance is not recommended for infants who have been treated with the same medication as those who have been treated with the same medication.
17	an essential ionized acid group in sodium channels	An essential group of ionized acids in the sodium channels.
17	effects of an acetyl coenzyme a carboxylase inhibitor and a sodium sparing diuretic on aldosterone stimulated sodium transport lipid synthesis and phospholipid fatty acid composition in the toad urinary bladder	The effects of acetyl coenzyme, a carboxylase inhibitor, and d' a diuretic that saves sodium on apos; and aldosterone stimulate the synthesis of lipids and the phospholipid fatty acid composition of sodium transport in the bladder of toads.
17	studies of renin and aldosterone in cirrhotic patients with ascites	In addition to the above studies, there are a number of other studies that have been conducted.
17	effects of sodium depletion on plasma renin activity and on the urinary excretion of cyclic amp and aldosterone in hypoparathyroid patients	The Effects of Sodium Depletion on Apos; Plasma Renin Activity and Apos; Urinary Excretion of Apos; Cyclic Bulb and Apos; Aldosterone in Hypoparathyroid Patients.
17	the relationship between kallikrein and water excretion and the conditional relationship between kallikrein and sodium excretion	Kallikrein–lapos relationship; sodium excretion; water and conditional kallikrein–lapos relationship; sodium excretion.
17	control of plasma renin activity in chronic stable renal disease	It's a long-term process; it's a long-term process; it's a long-term process.
17	vascular angiotensin ii receptors and sodium balance in rats role of kidneys and vascular renin activity	Vascular Angiotensin ii, rat sodium balance and receptors, renal function and vascular renin activity.
17	role of acth in regulation of aldosterone secretion	Role of apos; acethesis in the regulation of apos secretion; aldosterone.
17	effect of progesterone on renal sodium handling in man relation to aldosterone excretion and plasma renin activity	The Effect of Progesterone on the Handling of Renal Sodium in Apos; Man in Relation to Apos; Dapos Excretion; Aldosterone and Apos; Plasma Renin Activity.
17	diuretics urate excretion and sodium reabsorption effect of acetazolamide and urinary alkalinization	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that may be considered to be carcinogenic.
17	marked elevation of plasma renin activity during post diuretic sodium conservation in furosemide stimulated subjects	A marked elevation of l' activity of plasma renin during post-average storage-diuretic sodium was observed in furosemide-stimulated subjects.
17	hemodynamics compartments and the renin aldosterone system in chronic heart failure	Hemodynamic compartments and renin system-aldosterone in appos; chronic cardiac failure.
17	renal blood flow and its response to angiotensin ii an interaction between oral contraceptive agents sodium intake and the renin angiotensin system in healthy young women	Renal Blood Flow and its Response to Angiotensin ii, an interaction between oral sodium ingestion and the renin system in healthy young women.
17	effect of carbohydrate intake on the urinary excretion of magnesium calcium and sodium in fasting obese patients	Effect of calcium, sodium, and magnesium excretion in the urine of fasting obese patients.
17	role of aldosterone in the initial stage of 2 forms of experimental vasorenal hypertension	The role of apos; aldosterone in the initial phase of 2 vascular hypertensive forms; experimental vascular hypertension.
17	the renin angiotensin system in rats with hereditary hydronephrosis	The renin system-angiotensin in hereditary hydronephrosis.
17	changes of sodium appetite during the estrous cycle of sheep	In addition, there are a number of other factors that influence the development of the disease.
17	production of aldosterone by the regenerated adrenal gland after neonatal autograft in the normal and the sodium deprived rat	Regenerated adrenal aldosterone production following neonatal autograft in normal and sodium-deprived rats.
17	sodium kinetics in aorta of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Sodium kinetics in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	an inhibitor of sodium transport in the urine of dogs with normal renal function	Sodium transport inhibitor in normal kidney function dogs.
17	control of plasma aldosterone in infancy and childhood a study of plasma renin activity plasma cortisol and plasma aldosterone	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system, including the development of the immune system.
17	circadian rhythm of plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone in normal man and in renal allograft recipients	Circadial rhythm of apo; plasma renin and apos activity; plasma aldosterone in apos; normal male and in recipients of apos; renal allografts.
17	spontaneous changes in weight leg volume renin aldosterone and sex hormones in patients with cyclical oedema	Spontaneous changes in leg volume, aldosterone renin and sex hormones in cyclic edema patients.
17	antagonism of the effects of furosemide by indomethacin in normal and hypertensive man	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	renal blockade to angiotensin ii in acute and chronic sodium retaining states	Acute and chronic conditions of sodium retention: renal blockage with apos; angiotensin ii.
17	sodium flux through the sodium channels of axon membrane fragments isolated from lobster nerves	Sodium flow in isolated sodium channels of axonal membrane fragments from lobster nerves.
17	the influence of ouabain on in vitro renin secretion and intracellular sodium	The effects of etapos, etabain, on the secretion of renin in vitro and on the intracellular sodium.
17	effects of sodium and magnesium cations on the dark and light induced chlorophyll a fluorescence yields in sucrose washed spinach chloroplasts	The effects of sodium and magnesium cations on darkness and light induce fluorescence of chlorophyll a in sucrose-washed chloroplasts.
17	high output heart failure in the dog systemic and intrarenal role of angiotensin ii	High-flow heart failure in apos systemic and intrarenal role; angiotensin ii in dog.
17	hypertension as a disease of modern society	L' hypertension is a modern disease.
17	rapid infusion of sodium bicarbonate and albumin into high risk premature infants soon after birth a controlled prospective trial	Rapid sodium bicarbonate and d&apos infusion; high-risk prematurity albumin soon after birth, as part of a prospective controlled trial.
17	the importance of sodium balance on the effect of angiotensin ii on aldosterone production	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	diurnal variations of plasma aldosterone in supine man relationship to plasma renin activity and plasma cortisol	Diurnal changes in apo; plasma aldosterone in relationship between elongated man and elongated man; plasma cortisol and renin activity.
17	duration of central action of angiotensin ii estimated by its interaction with csf na	The duration of the central action of angiotensin II was estimated from the interaction of angiotensin II with the central nervous system.
17	the distribution of sodium in aortic walls from spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats	Sodium distribution in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rat aortic walls.
17	renin secretion from rat renal cortical cell suspensions	Renin secretion by suspensions of renal cortical cells.
17	reversal of chronic renal hypertension role of salt and water excretion	Water and salt excretion; chronic renal hypertension.
17	nmr in cancer vii sodium 23 magnetic resonance of normal and cancerous tissues	Magnetic resonance in vii sodium cancer 23 from normal and cancerous tissue.
17	aldactazide induced consummatory and operant responding to sodium by rats	Aldactazide induced a sodium-induced eating and operating response in rats.
17	acute effect of nephrotoxic serum on renal sodium transport in the dog	Acute effect of renal sodium transport by nephrotoxic serum in dogs.
17	hypertension in terminal renal failure	End-stage renal failure.
17	the role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal human subjects	The Role of the Renin System @-@Angiotensin-Aldosterone in Apos; Cardiovascular Homeostasis in Normal Human Subjects.
17	exaggerated phosphaturic response to volume expansion in patients with essential hypertension	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of hypertension.
17	renal effects of prostaglandin e1 in hypertensive patients	The Renal Effects of Prostaglandin e1 in Hypertensive Patients.
17	urinary kallikrein excretion and sodium metabolism in hypertensive patients	Urinary Kallikrein and Sodium Metabolism in Hypertensive Patients.
17	increased intestinal absorption in the rat caused by sodium lauryl sulphate and its possible relation to the camp system	Increased gastrointestinal absorption of sodium lauryl sulfate in rats and its possible relationship to the encampment system.
17	actions of aldosterone on rrna and na transport in the toad bladder	Action of l' aldosterone in toad bladder and rrna transport.
17	the influence of sodium intake on the pressor response to angiotensin ii in the unanaesthetized rat	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	urinary kallikrein in hypertensive animal models	Urinary Kallikrein in animal hypertensive models.
17	relationships among urinary kallikrein mineralocorticoids and human hypertensive disease	The relationship between the mineralocorticoids of urinary kallikrein and human hypertensive diseases.
17	plasma renin activity and renal sodium and water excretion following infusion of arachidonic acid in rats	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
17	beta adrenergic blockade in essential hypertension reduced renin release despite renal vasoconstriction	Beta-adrenergic blockade of the essential hypertension reduced renin release despite the renal vasoconstriction.
17	intrapatient comparison of treatment with chlorthalidone spironolactone and propranolol in normoreninemic essential hypertension	Journal of Consulting and Clinical Psychology, 3: 10-11.
17	pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics of alprenolol in the treatment of hypertension ii relationship to its effect on blood pressure and plasma renin activity	Pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics of apo; alprenolol in the treatment of apo; hypertension; blood pressure and apo; plasma renin activity.
17	separate roles of sodium ion concentration and fluid volumes in salt loading hypertension in sheep	Distinct roles of concentration of sodium ion and fluid volumes in the liver; hypertension of saline charge in sheep.
17	cellular basis for reversal of hyperkalemic electrocardiographic changes by sodium	Cellular basis for sodium reversal of hyperkaliemic electrocardiographic changes.
17	the effect of different preparations of human growth hormone on plasma renin activity in normal males	The effect of various preparations of the human growth hormone on the immune system; plasma renin activity in normal males.
17	correlation between juxtaglomerular index kidney renin content and plasma renin concentration in the rat	The correlation between the renal renin content of the juxtaglomerular index and the concentration of plasma renin in the rat.
17	renal prostaglandins in relation to sodium regulation and hypertension	Renal prostaglandins in relation to the regulation of sodium and l*apos; hypertension.
17	effect of drugs affecting sodium permeability on the muscle spindle of frogs	The effects of medications that affect frogs' permeability to sodium on their spindle muscles.
17	the effect of active immunization against aldosterone on the colonic potential response and sodium excretion in rabbits	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	calcium and sodium ions as charge carriers in the action potential of an identified snail neurone	Calcium and sodium ions as carriers of charge in the potential d'apos; action d'apos; neuron d' neuron d' snail identified.
17	stimulation by aldosterone of the sodium efflux in barnacle muscle fibres effects of rna inhibitors and spironolactone	Stimulation by apos; aldosterone from apos; sodium efflux into goose muscle fibers; effects of spironolactone and rna inhibitors.
17	influence of sodium intake on vascular and adrenal angiotensin ii receptors	Influence of apos; sodium absorption on the adrenal and vascular receptors of apos; angiotensin ii.
17	renin angiotensin system in hypertension after traumatic renal artery thrombosis	Dapos system; angiotensin renin in the apos; hypertension after thrombosis of the apos; renal traumatic artery.
17	renin dependency of blood pressure analysis by angiotensin ii antagonist p113 in hypertensive patients treated with salt depletion and propranolol	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	plasma renin activity angiotensin ii and aldosterone during intense heat stress	L' Angiotensin ii and aldosterone plasma renin activity during high heat stress.
17	influence of ethacrynic acid on intrarenal renin release mechanisms	Influence of l' ethacrynic acid (ethacrynic acid) on the mechanisms of intrarenal renin release.
17	comparative evaluation of fractional excretion of sodium following saline infusion in transplanted kidneys and in isolated perfused kidneys in conditions of previous high or low dietary sodium intake	Comparative assessment of apo; fractional sodium excretion following saline infusion into transplanted and isolated perfused kidneys under controlled conditions; high and low dietary sodium intake.
17	renin profiling in hypertension and its use in treatment with propranolol and chlorthalidone	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	the effect of plasma calcium on plasma adh levels in anephric patients	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of an increase in the risk of cancer.
17	renal tubular sodium reabsorption during the recovery from the oliguric phase of acute nephritis	Reabsorption of renal tubular sodium during oliguric phase recovery from acute nephritis.
17	phosphate transport by isolated renal brush border vesicles	The transport of phosphate by isolated vesicles from a renal brush border.
17	plasma renin activity and aldosterone concentration in children	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of activity.
17	the objective and timing of drug disposition studies appendix ii plasma concentrations of oxyphenbutazone in dogs given oxyphenbutazone or the calcium or sodium salts of its phosphate ester	Purpose and schedule of studies on apo; drug disposition Schedule ii Plasma concentrations of apo; oxyphenbutazone in dogs receiving apo; or sodium or calcium salts of its phosphate ester.
17	abnormal sodium transport in leucocytes from patients with essential hypertension and the effect of treatment	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted to assess the effects of sodium on blood pressure.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in congestive failure in conscious dogs	Renin-angiotensin-aldosterone in apos; congestive insufficiency in conscious dogs.
17	the role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cardiovascular homeostasis in normal man	The Role of the Renin System @-@Angiotensin-aldosterone in Apos; Cardiovascular Homeostasis in Apos; Normal Man.
17	treatment of patients with severe hypertension by inhibition of angiotensin converting enzyme	Treatment of apo patients; severe apo-inhibition hypertension; apo-conversion enzyme; angiotensin.
17	effect of sodium intake on gentamicin nephrotoxicity in the rat	In addition, there is a potential for adverse effects on human health.
17	renal function in normo and hypertensive 50 year old males	Renal Function in Normal and Hypertensive 50-year-old Men.
17	active and passive immunization against angiotensin ii in the rat and rabbit evidence for a normal regulation of the renin angiotensin system	L' active and passive anti-apos; angiotensin ii in rats and rabbits indicate normal renin regulation by-angiotensin.
17	effect of the angiotensin ii blocker 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on renal artery clip hypertension in the rat	Angiotensin ii 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on apos; renal hypertension clip in rat.
17	effect of sodium intake on aldosterone and corticosterone production the serum sodium concentration and body weight in infant rats during weaning period	Effect of apos; sodium absorption on production of aldosterone and corticosterone, serum sodium concentration, and body weight in newborn-rats born during the weaning period.
17	sodium transport by the colon of bufo marinus na uptake across the mucosal border	Sodium transport through the nape of bufo marinus uptake through the mucous border by the colon.
17	effect of intravenous frusemide on plasma renin concentration suppression of response in hypertension	Effect of intravenous frusemide (IVF) on suppression of the plasma renin concentration response in apos; hypertension.
17	evidence for a humoral factor in unilaterally nephrectomized dogs stimulating renal growth in isolated canine kidneys	Evidence of the existence of a humoral factor in dogs that are unilaterally nephrectomized, inducing renal growth in the isolated kidneys of dogs.
17	content of total metabolic sodium in arterial hypertension of varying origin	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of hypertension.
17	low renin hypertension a distinct entity	L' Low Renin Hypertension is a distinct entity.
17	plasma renin activity pra and aldosterone pa in patients with chronic glomerulonephritis gn and hypertension	L' pra and aldosterone p plasma renin activity in patients with chronic glomerulonephritis and d' hypertension.
17	reciprocal relation between renin dependency and sodium dependency in essential hypertension	In addition, there is a significant increase in the amount of sodium in the blood.
17	plasma renin activity pra and plasma aldosterone pa in hypertensive kidney allograft recipients	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	inhibition of the sodium inactivation of the nodal membrane by anemonia sulcata toxin ii	Inhibition of node membrane sodium inhibition by lupus sulcata toxin; anemony ii.
17	a method for measurement of angiotensin ii in tissues and its application to rat kidney	Measurement Method for Angiotensin ii in Tissue and its Application to Rat Kidney.
17	the renin aldosterone system and renal hemodynamics in patients with posttransplant hypertension	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of heart disease.
17	an assessment of the optimal range of dietary sodium for inducing a pause in laying	Evaluation of optimal dietary sodium range to induce egg-laying pause.
17	circadian rhythms of serum renin activity and serum corticosterone prolactin and aldosterone concentrations in the male rat on normal and low sodium diets	Circadial liver rhythms, serum renin activity, prolactin and dapos serum concentrations, and corticosterone aldosterone in male rats fed a normal diet and a low sodium diet.
17	effect of indomethacin on cholera induced fluid movement unidirectional sodium fluxes and intestinal camp	The effects of indomethacin and sodium aposteroids on cholera induced a one-way fluid movement of sodium and intestinal camp.
17	intrarenal site of action of calcium on renin secretion in dogs	Site d' intrarenal action of calcium on dog renin secretion.
17	a morphometric study on the pars intermedia of the hypophysis during impairment of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in sodium depleted mice	A morphometric study of the apos intermedia pars; pituitary during apos; renin alteration-angiotensin-aldosterone in sodium-depleted mice.
17	effect of calcium gluconate infusion on renin in the dog	Canadian Council on Animal Health.
17	arterial and venous angiotensin ii in normal subjects relation to plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration and response to posture and volume changes	Venous and arterial angiotensin ii in normal subjects in relation to apos; plasma renin activity and apos; plasma aldosterone concentration, as well as with response to changes in posture and volume.
17	the effects of altered sodium balance and adrenergic blockade on renin release induced in rats by angiotensin antagonism	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors which may contribute to the development of the immune system.
17	the effects of des asp1 angiotensin ii on blood pressure plasma aldosterone concentration and plasma renin activity in the rabbit	The Effects of Asp1 Angiotensin ii on Blood Pressure, Dapos Concentration, Plasma Aldosterone and Lapos; Plasma Renin Activity in Rabbit.
17	aldosterone and sodium homeostasis in preterm infants	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
17	effect of renin angiotensin system on sodium intake	Sodium absorption effects of the renin system-angiotensin.
17	intrarenal renin angiotensin sodium interdependent mechanism controlling postclamp renal artery pressure and renin release in the conscious dog with chronic one kidney goldblatt hypertension	Interdependent mechanisms of apos; intrarenal renal sodium angiotensin controlling the post-clamp renal arterial pressure and renin release in conscious dogs with chronic hypertension of a Goldblatt kidney.
17	pressor response to 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii saralasin in hypertensive subjects	The pressor response to 8 ala angiotensin ii saralasin in hypertensive subjects.
17	renal renin output during continuous intracarotid infusions of iso and hypertonic sodium chloride solutions in the rat	Renal renin output during continuous intracarotidal infusions of iso- and hypertonic sodium chloride in the rat.
17	cardiovascular complications in matched pairs of low and normal renin hypertensive patients	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, nor is there evidence to support this claim.
17	sensitivity of renin secretion to volume depletion in the anaesthetized dog comparison between urinary drainage and slow haemorrhage	Renin secretion sensitivity to volume depletion in anesthetized dog comparison between urine drainage and slow hemorrhage.
17	stretch receptor model for renin release with evidence from perfused rat kidney	D&apos receptor model; Stretch for release of renin with evidence of renal infusion.
17	incidence and pathophysiological changes in chronic two kidney hypertension in the dog	Canadian Journal of Psychiatry, 3(2), pp. 1–24.
17	plasma renin activity following central infusion of angiotensin ii and altered csf sodium concentration in the conscious goat	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	hypertension in end stage renal disease the relationship between blood pressure plasma renin plasma renin substrate and exchangeable sodium in chronic hemodialysis patients	Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiovascular System Cardiac System Cardiac System Cardiac System Cardiac System Cardiac System Cardiac System Cardiac System Cardiac System Cardiac Patient.
17	experimental studies of effects of acute renal venous congestion on renal function with particular reference to renal arterio venous plasma sodium difference	Experimental studies of acute renal venous congestion on renal function, particularly renal arterial plasma sodium difference.
17	hypertension associated with early stage kidney disease complementary roles of circulating renin the body sodium volume state and duration of hypertension	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	estimating renin participation in hypertension superiority of converting enzyme inhibitor over saralasin	Estimation of the participation of renin in the superiority of the apos; enzymatic inhibitor of conversion on the saralasin in the apos; hypertension.
17	distribution of mineralocorticoid receptors in the kidney cells of rats with different levels of aldosterone in their bodies	Mineralocorticoid receptor distribution in renal cells of rats with different aldosterone levels in their bodies.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in normal man and patients with essential hypertension blood pressure effects depending on renin and sodium balance	It is important to note that there is no evidence to suggest that the use of angiotensin or angiotensin interferes with the development of high blood pressure.
17	the role of renin in the control of blood pressure in normotensive man	The Role of Renin in the Control of Boreal Pressure (BP) in the Normotensive Man.
17	changes of blood pressure plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration following the infusion of sar1 ile8 angiotensin ii in hypertensive fluid and electrolyte disorders	Changes in apo; plasma renin activity and aldosterone concentration following sar1ile8 angiotensin II infusion in fluid and electrolyte hypertensive disorders.
17	the use of saralasin in the recognition of angiotensinogenic hypertension	It can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent, but not as an anti-inflammatory agent.
17	the effects of the angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin on blood pressure and plasma aldosterone in man in relation to the prevailing plasma angiotensin ii concentration	The Effect of Apos; Angiotensin antagonist ii, Saralasin, on Blood Pressure and Apos; Plasma aldosterone in Apos; Male, in relation to dominant plasma concentration of Apos; Angiotensin ii.
17	haemodynamic effects of sar1 ala8 angiotensin ii in patients with renovascular hypertension	Hemodynamic effects in patients with apo; angiotensin sar1 in patients with apo; renal hypertension-vascular.
17	comparative studies of the humoral and arterial pressure responses to sar1 ala8 sar1 ile8 and sar1 thr8 angiotensin ii in the trained unanaesthetized dog	Comparative studies of pulmonary and humoral blood pressure responses in trained and unanesthetized dogs; angiotensin sar1 sar1 sar1 sar1 sar1 sile8 and sar1 thr8 sar1 s.
17	agonist and antagonist effects of sar1 ala8 angiotensin ii in salt loaded and salt depleted normal man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
17	decrease in the maximum sodium permeability and slow sodium inactivation in ranvier s nodes treated with trimecaine	Decreased maximal permeability to sodium and sodium; slow inactivation of sodium in trimecain-treated ranvier nodes.
17	bidirectional sodium ion movements via the paracellular and transcellular routes across short circuited rabbit ileum	Two-way movement of the apos; sodium ion through the cell and transcellular pathways through the apos; short-rabbit ileum.
17	angiotensin blockade its clinical significance	Apos; angiotensin blocks clinical significance.
17	usefulness and limitations of saralasin a partial competitive agonist of angioten ii for evaluating the renin and sodium factors in hypertensive patients	Uses and Limitations of Saralasin, a partial competitive agonist of lacidosis; angioten ii, for lacidosis; Renin and Sodium Factors Assessment in Hypertensive Patients.
17	distal tubule na and juxtaglomerular apparatus renin activity in uranyl nitrate induced acute renal failure in the rat an evaluation of the role of tubuloglomerular feedback	Uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranate, uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranyl uranate uranate uranate uranate, uran, uranyl uranyl uranyl uranate uranate uranate uranate uranate, uranate uran, uranate uran, uranate uranate uranate uran
17	studies of the renin angiotension aldosterone system cortisol doc and adh in normal and hypertensive pregnancy	Studies of the birth canal system; renal angiotension, cortisol aldosterone, and birth canal; adhesion during normal and hypertensive pregnancy.
17	the renin angiotensin system and sodium excretion during gestation	The renin system-angiotensin and l' excretion of sodium during pregnancy.
17	the effects of saralasin an angiotensin ii antagonist on blood pressure and the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in normal and hypertensive subjects	The Effects of Saralasin, an Angiotensin II antagonist, on Blood Pressure and the Renin System @-@Angiotensin-Aldosterone in Normal and Hypertensive People.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in patients with essential hypertension	It is not possible to determine the cause of the blockage, but it is possible to determine the cause.
17	effects of aldosterone on na transport in the toad bladder ii the anaerobic response	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted to determine the effects of toad ingestion.
17	dissociated effect of sodium intake on glomerular and pressor responses to angiotensin	Dissociated effect of the apos; sodium absorption on pressor and glomerular responses to the apos; angiotensin.
17	renin release by rat kidney slices incubated in vitro role of sodium and of alpha and beta adrenergic receptors and effect of vincristine	Renin release from thin slices of rat kidney incubated in vitro the role of vincristine-induced alpha- and beta- and l&apos-adrenergic receptors and sodium.
17	evidence that prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors increase the concentration of sodium and chloride in rat renal medulla	It appears that inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis may increase the sodium and chloride concentrations in the rat renal medulla.
17	mechanisms of hypertension during the acute and intermediate phases of the one clip two kidney model in the dog	Apos mechanisms; hypertension during acute and intermediate phase of dog one-clip-two kidney model.
17	plasma prorenin in normal hypertensive and anephric subjects and its effect on renin measurements	The effect of plasma prorenin on renin measurements in normal subjects and normal subjects.
17	an inactive renin in human plasma	An inactive human plasma renin.
17	dose dependent stimulation and inhibition of proximal tubular sodium reabsorption by angiotensin ii in the rat kidney	Dose-dependent-stimulation and inhibition of reabsorption of proximal tubular sodium by l' angiotensin ii in rat kidney.
17	inhibition of sodium transport by angiotensin ii in the main duct of the rabbit mandibular gland isolated and perfused in vitro	Sodium transport inhibition by l' angiotensin ii in the main channel of isolated and vitro perfused rabbit mandibular gland.
17	possible role of renin in hypertension as suggested by renin sodium profiling and inhibition of converting enzyme	Renin's possible role in hypertension is suggested by sodium renin and l&apos profiling; l&apos inhibition; conversion enzyme.
17	unusual low plasma renin hypertension in a child	In general, children have low blood pressure, high blood pressure, and high blood pressure.
17	dissociation of renin and aldosterone during dehydration studies in a case of diabetes insipidus and adipsia	Renin and apos dissociation; aldosterone during dehydration studies in diabetes insipidus and adipsia.
17	effect of catecholamines on sodium resorption and oxygen tension in rat kidneys	The Effect of Catecholamines on Sodium Resorption and Dapos Pressure; oxygen in rat kidneys.
17	effect of renal sympathetic nerve stimulation on proximal water and sodium reabsorption	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
17	kinetics of active sodium transport in rat proximal tubules and its variation by cardiac glycosides at zero net volume and ion fluxes evidence for a multisite sodium transport system	The kinetics of active sodium transport in the proximal tubules of the rat and its variation by the net zero volume cardiac glycosides and ionic fluxes indicate the existence of d' a multisite sodium transport system.
17	maternal and fetal effects of lumbar epidural analgesia for labor and delivery in patients with gestational hypertension	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors which may affect the outcome of the pregnancy.
17	salt frusemide and renin in severe experimental renal hypertension	Frusemide and renin salts in patients with severe experimental renal hypertension.
17	anti hypertensive action of dl alpha tocopharyl esters in rats	Dl alpha tocopharyl ester hypertensive action in rat.
17	reduced plasma renin activity in essential hypertension effects of blood pressure age and sodium	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may influence the development of the disease.
17	determination of renin dependency and sodium dependency in the three renin sub groups of essential hypertension	Renin and sodium dependence in all three sub-renin groups of l'apos; essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity plasma angiotensin ii and extracellular fluid volume in patients after renal transplantation	L' Plasma Renin Activity L' Plasma Angiotensin ii and volume of extracellular fluid in patients following renal transplantation.
17	renin angiotensin and kallikrein kinin systems in sodium homeostasis and hypertension in rats	The systems of renin, l' angiotensin and kallikrein kinin in the apos; homeostasis sodium and l' hypertension in the rats.
17	further unravelling of the causes of acth induced hypertension in the sheep	Further investigation of causes of apos; apos-induced hypertension was carried out in sheep.
17	does the renin angiotensin system contribute to the vascular lesions in renal hypertensive rats	The renin system-angiotensin contributes-t-to the renal hypertensive rats' vascular lesions?
17	renin release from isolated rat glomeruli	Release of renin by isolated rat-induced glomeruli.
17	effects of anoxia and metabolic inhibitors on reaction of the fast sodium system	Effects of Anoxia and Metabolic Inhibitors on the Rapid Sodium System Response.
17	angiotensin ii antagonists in dehydrated rabbits without baroreceptor reflexes	L&apos antagonists; angiotensin ii in baroreceptor-reflex-dehydrated rabbits.
17	hyperprolactinaemia and antihypertensive effect of bromocriptine in essential hypertension identification of abnormal central dopamine control	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used to treat the effects of bromocriptine.
17	effect of sodium bicarbonate on canine left ventricular function	Effect of sodium bicarbonate on Canine Left Ventricular Function.
17	oral contraceptive induced hypertension after adrenalectomy and hypophysectomy	Oral contraception induced adrenalectomy hypertension and hypophysectomy.
17	detection of renovascular hypertension with angiotensin ii blockade	It is important to keep in mind that there is a risk of infection.
17	renin reactivity as a determinant of responsiveness to antihypertensive treatment	Renin reactivity is a determinant of antihypertensive drug responsiveness.
17	placental transport of sodium in the guinea pig	Sodium toxicity in rats.
17	spironolactone antagonism of aldosterone action on na transport and rna metabolism in toad bladder epithelium	Lapos; spironolactone antagonism; action of apos; aldosterone on Na transport and metabolism in apos; epithelium of the toad bladder.
17	effects of sodium bicarbonate administration during cardiopulmonary resuscitation	Effects of apo; sodium bicarbonate administered during cardio-respiratory resuscitation.
17	effects of propranolol on development and maintanance of severe renal hypertension in rats	Effects of Propranolol on Development and Maintenance of Lapos; Severe Renal Hypertension in Rats.
17	effect of intrarenal angiotensin ii blockade on renal function in conscious dogs	The effect of intra-renal angiotensin ii on the renal function in conscious dogs.
17	natriuretic response to saline infusion in normotensive and hypertensive man the role of renin suppression in exaggerated natriuresis	The effect of renin supplementation on the rate of saline infusion is not known.
17	the rational use of diuretics in the treatment of arterial hypertension	L' Rational Use of Diuretics in the Treatment of High Blood Pressure.
17	stabilized venous distensibility of normotensive and hypertensive humans on high and low sodium intake	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	renin release and pressor response to renal arterial hypotension effect of dietary sodium	In addition, there is an increased risk of heart attack, which can lead to an increased risk of heart attack.
17	hypotensive effects of sodium volume depletion and 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii in relation to plasma renin in hypertensive patients	Hypotensive effects of depletion of the sodium volume and 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii relative to plasma renin in hypertensive patients.
17	renin sodium and vasodepressor response to saralasin in renovascular and essential hypertension	Sodium renin and Saralasin vasodepressant response in apos; essential and renascular hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity in pregnant women with oedema treated with hydrochlorothiazide	It is not possible to determine the cause of the adverse reactions, but it is important to determine the cause of the adverse reactions.
17	blood pressure and renin activity in essential hypertension under pindolol	Pindololol is a combination of high blood pressure and the activity of renin in the body.
17	the effect of conjugated estrogens on the renin angiotensin system	Dos; conjugated estrogen effect on the apos system; renin angiotensin.
17	the renin aldosterone system in exaggerated natriuresis of essential hypertension	Renin system-aldosterone in exaggerated apos natriuresis; essential hypertension.
17	age and the renin aldosterone system	Age and renin system-aldosterone.
17	alteration of the electrophysiologic characteristics of the neurons of the great pseudo equine leech after increasing the intracellular concentration of sodium ions	Modification of electrophysiological characteristics of leech pseudo-equine neurons after increase in intracellular sodium ion concentration.
17	on the question of body fluid volume or sodium status influencing renin release	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	angiotensin ii blockade in normal man interaction of renin and sodium in maintaining blood pressure	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of heart disease.
17	age related changes in na excretion in saline loaded spontaneously hypertensive rats	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
17	correlations between blood pressure blood volume plasma renin and urinary catecholamines in normal subjects and in patients with benign essential hypertension	Correlations between blood pressure, plasma renin, and urinary catecholamine levels in normal subjects and in patients with mild essential hypertension.
17	effect of norethisterone acetate on salt excretion and of the renin aldosterone system in man	Apos; norethisterone acetate on apos; saline and renin excretion-aldosterone in apos; man.
17	urinary kallikrein in rats bred for susceptibility and resistance to the hypertensive effect of salt and in new zealand genetically hypertensive rats	Urinary kallikrein in calcium sensitivity and resistance-reared rats; salt hypertensive effect and in new genetically hypertensive zeland rats.
17	sodium intake and furosemide administration in hypertensive patients with renal insufficiency	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre.
17	role of sodium and water in hypertensive patients on maintenance hemodialysis	Role of Sodium and Apos; Water in Disease; Hemodialysis of Apos; Maintenance of Hypertensive Patients.
17	on the inappropriate in hypertension research	It's a good way to learn more about a person's health.
17	the effect of beta adrenergic blockade on patterns of urinary sodium excretion blood pressure and plasma renin activity in patients with essential and renovascular hypertension	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
17	plasma renin and prorenin in essential hypertension during sodium depletion beta blockade and reduced arterial pressure	Plasma renin and prorenin levels in the apos; essential hypertension during beta-blockade of sodium depletion and reduction of blood pressure.
17	search for a natriuretic mechanism sensitive to sodium in the brain of the monkey	Look for sodium-sensitive natriuretic mechanisms in the monkey brain.
17	studies on sodium ion retention and antidiuretic effects after administration of l tryptophan to rats	Studies on the retention of sodium ion and the antidiuretic effects after dosing; administration of tryptophan to rats.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the newborn lamb response to furosemide	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in response of l' new furosemide-born lamb.
17	renal arterial stenosis and circadian water and sodium excretion in subjects with a reduced fluid intake	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on the respiratory tract or the respiratory tract.
17	effects of the angiotensin ii antagonist 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii in hypertension in man	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
17	plasma vasopressin concentrations and effects of vasopressin antiserum on blood pressure in rats with malignant two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Effects of apos; vasopressin antiserum on blood pressure and plasma vasopressin levels in apo-treated rats; malignant hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	sodium renin aldosterone catecholamines and blood pressure in diabetes mellitus	Sodium renin, aldosterone, catecholamines, and blood pressure are all found in diabetes mellitus.
17	effect of furosemide on urinary excretion of prostaglandin e in normal volunteers and patients with essential hypertension	Effect of furosemide on apo; urinary prostaglandin excretion in normal volunteers and apo patients; essential high blood pressure.
17	synergistic effects of hydralazine and alpha or beta adrenergic blockers the role of plasma renin activity	Synergistic Effects of Apos; hydralazine and Alpha or Beta Adrenergic Blockers on the Role of Apos; Plasma Renin Activity.
17	measurement of plasma renin activity blood volume and exchangeable sodium an aid in the orientation of treatment of essential arterial hypertension	Measurements of blood volume, exchangeable sodium and plasma renin activity help guide the treatment of apos; essential hypertension.
17	effect of sodium loading and exercise on renal haemodynamics and urinary sodium excretion in young patients with essential hypertension before and during propranolol treatment	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
17	effects of ethanol on sodium 3 o methyl glucose and l alanine transport in the jejunum	Effects of Alcohol; Ethanol on Transport of Sodium 3 o Methyl Glucose and Apos; Alanine in Jejunum.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system and sodium in normal pregnancy a longitudinal study	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone and the sodium during normal pregnancy were the subjects of a longitudinal study.
17	sodium restriction and inhibition of the renin angiotensin system in renovascular hypertension in the rat	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	intrarenal distribution of plasma flow in cirrhosis as measured by transit renography relationship with plasma renin activity and sodium and water excretion	Intrarenal distribution of cirrhosis plasma flow, as measured by the relationship of transit renography to l' plasma renin activity and l' sodium and d&apos excretion; water.
17	intrarenal role of angiotensin ii in controlling sodium excretion during dehydration in dogs	Intrarenal role of apos; angiotensin ii in the control of apos; and sodium excretion during dog dehydration.
17	the treatment of dysmenorrhea with naproxen sodium a report on two independent double blind trials	The Treatment of Dysmenorrhea with Naproxen Sodium, a report of two independent double-blind trials.
17	plasma renin plasma aldosterone and exchangeable sodium in normotensive and hypertensive kidney transplant recipients with and without transplant renal artery stenosis	Renin plasma Aldosterone and Exchangeable Sodium in Normotensive and Hypertensive Renal Transfers, with or without L&apos stenosis; transplanted renal artery.
17	effect of immersion on the urinary excretion of aldosterone in trained and untrained male subjects author s transl	Efficacy of oral contraceptive use; use of oral contraceptive methods; use of oral contraceptive methods.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system of the normothermic marmot	Normal temperature groundhog kidney system-angiotensin-aldosterone.
17	sodium exchange between two sites the binding of sodium to halotolerant bacteria	L' exchange of sodium between two sites allows sodium to be bound to halotolerant bacteria.
17	concurrent estimation of total body and exchangeable body sodium in hypertension	Estimation of the total body sodium and the total body sodium exchangeable in the heart; hypertension.
17	renal hypotension in sodium and fluid deprivation experimental findings in renin depleted rats	Renal hypotension in fluid and sodium deprivation was observed in renin-depleted rats.
17	renal vein renin activity a prospective study of sampling techniques and methods of interpretation	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part I, at http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
17	kinetics of bidirectional active sodium fluxes in the toad bladder	Kinetics of the bi-directional fluxes of active sodium in the bladder of toads.
17	extraction and radioimmunoassay of urinary aldosterone in the rat	Removal and Radioimmunoassay of Urinary Aldosterone in Rat.
17	control of aldosterone secretion during sodium restriction adrenal receptor regulation and increased adrenal sensitivity to angiotensin ii	Control of d&apos secretion; aldosterone during regulation of adrenal sodium restriction receptors and increase of adrenal sensitivity to l' angiotensin ii.
17	inhibition of sodium transport by prostaglandin e2 across the isolated perfused rabbit collecting tubule	Sodium transport inhibition by prostaglandin e2 across isolated, perfused rabbit collecting tube.
17	kinetic analysis of sodium and chloride influxes across the gills of the trout in fresh water	Kinetic analysis of chloride and sodium inputs through the gills of freshwater trout.
17	hypertension treated by salt restriction	Restricted saline hypertension.
17	2 models of indomethacin induced arterial hypertension in rats in chronic experiments	In chronic experiments, two models of apo-induced hypertension and indomethacin have been used in rats.
17	role of the natriuretic factor in the phenomenon of exaggerated natriuresis in experimental hypertension	Role of natriuretic factor in exaggerated natriuresis phenomena in experimental hypertension.
17	urinary prostaglandin and sodium metabolism in patients with essential hypertension	In patients with high blood pressure; essential hypertension.
17	mechanism of the prophylactic effect of adaptation to altitude hypoxia on the development of hypertension	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors, such as age, sex, age, sex, age, sex, and sexual orientation.
17	renal vascular response to interruption of the renin angiotensin system in normal man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
17	the effect of dietary sodium intake on the blood pressure and cardiac output responses to angiotensin ii in unanaesthetized rats	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of anemia, which results in an increase in the risk of heart attack.
17	plasma renin levels and systemic haemodynamics in essential hypertension	Plasma renin and systemic hemodynamics in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	role of sodium intake in the antihypertensive effect of propranolol	The Role of Sodium Intake in the Antihypertensive Effect of Propranolol.
17	kidney transplant artery stenosis interrelationship between blood pressure kidney function renin aldosterone system and body sodium content	Arterial stenosis related to renal transplantation interrelation between the renal function of the blood pressure, the renin system-aldosterone and the sodium content of the organism.
17	effect of prostaglandin a1 infusion in hypertensive patients with renal artery stenosis	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S. and D.L. Benson, eds.
17	the significance of body sodium content in hypertension following renal transplantation exchangeable sodium and plasma renin concentration before and after renal transplantation	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that influence the development of the immune system, such as the development of the immune system and the development of the immune system.
17	urinary kallikrein in normal renin essential hypertension	Urinary Kallikrein in the apos; essential high blood pressure for normal renin.
17	sodium intake following destruction of the anterior hypothalamus in the rat	Sodium intake after destruction of rat anterior hypothalamus.
17	effect of acth on plasma renin activity aldosterone level and deoxycorticosterone level in humans author s transl	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of cardiovascular disease.
17	pressor response to saralasin 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii bolus injection in hypertensive patients	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada.
17	basolateral plasma membrane localiztion of ouabain sensitive sodium transport sites in the secretory epithelium of the avian salt gland	Basolateral plasma membrane localizes sodium transport sites sensitive to ouapos; ouabain in avian saline secreting epithelium.
17	renin reactivity renin activity and renin concentration in patients with normal and low renin essential hypertension	L' renin activity of renin reactivity and renin concentration in patients with low and normal levels of essential renin hypertension.
17	inactivation of sodium channels second order kinetics in myelinated nerve	Second-order kinetic sodium channel inactivation in the myelinated nerve.
17	sodium balance in very low birth weight infants	Birth weight is the weight at which a child is born.
17	activity of lysosomal beta glucuronidase in leukocytes of rats exposed to benzene and sodium selenate	Lysosomal beta glucuronidase activity in benzene- and sodium selenate-exposed rat leukocytes.
17	stimulus secretion coupling in pancreatic acinar cells influences of external sodium and calcium on responses to cholecystokinin pancreozymin and ionophore a23187	Coupling of stimulus secretions in pancreatic acinar cells affects the responses to pancreozymin cholecystokinin and l' ionophore a23187 to external calcium and sodium.
17	renin secretion as a function of renal renin content in dogs	Renin secretion in dogs as a function of their renal renin content.
17	renal sodium retention and ascites formation in dogs with experimental cirrhosis but without portal hypertension or increased splanchnic vascular capacity	Renal sodium retention and the formation of ascites in dogs with experimental cirrhosis, but with no increase in portal hypertension or in splanchnic vascular capacity.
17	renal micropuncture study of normotensive and milan hypertensive rats before and after development of hypertension	Study of the renal micropuncture of milan and normotensive hypertensive rats before and after the development of hypertension.
17	the renin angiotensin system and sodium appetite	Renin-angiotensin and l' appetite sodium.
17	plasma prolactin in essential and renovascular hypertension	Prolactin is an essential component of the immune system and a component of the immune system.
17	sodium and renin in the hypertension of early renal disease	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	relationship of basal plasma noradrenaline to blood pressure age sex plasma renin activity and plasma volume in essential hypertension	Ratio of basal plasma noradrenaline to apos; age at blood pressure Sex Renin activity in the plasma and volume in the plasma; essential hypertension.
17	role of the renin angiotensin system in post transplantation hypertension in patients with multiple kidneys	Role of the apo system; angiotensin renin in apo; hypertension post-transplantation in multi-kidney patients.
17	the cycling of calcium sodium and protons across the inner membrane of cardiac mitochondria	The cycling of sodium calcium and protons through the cardiac mitochondrial inner membrane.
17	reproducibility of plasma renin activity pra profile in essential hypertension patients	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	renin subgroups in essential hypertension an analysis and critique	Under @-@renin groups in the apos; critical analysis and criticism essential hypertension.
17	partial characterization of aortic renin in the spontaneously hypertensive rat and its interrelationship with plasma renin blood pressure and sodium balance	Partial characterization of aortic renin in spontaneously hypertensive rat and its relationship to blood pressure and l' plasma sodium balance of renin.
17	effects of 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on arterial pressure renin and aldosterone in hypertension	Effects of 1 sar 8 ala angiotensin ii on the renin and the apos; aldosterone in the arterial pressure in the apos; hypertension.
17	what makes the renin angiotensin system a pathogenic factor	Makes the renin system-angiotensin a pathogen.
17	the immediate pressor response to saralasin in man a test of angiotensin ii receptor vacancy	The immediate saralasin pressor response in humans was tested on apos; angiotensin ii, a receptor deficiency.
17	sodium intake and the effects of isoproterenol and exercise on plasma renin in man	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
17	the influence of different sodium loads on renin release in hypertensive and normotensive states of chronic renal failure	The effects of various levels of sodium on the release of renin in the hypertensive and normotensive states of l' chronic renal failure.
17	health effects of long term exposure to sodium sulfate dust	Determine the amount of sodium sulphate in the body of the body.
17	the effect of increasing the plasma magnesium concentration on renin release from the dog s kidney interactions with calcium and sodium	An increase in the plasma concentration of magnesium on the release of renin by the interactions of the dog kidney with calcium and sodium.
17	effect of magnesium on sodium transport in toad urinary bladder	Effect of magnesium on toad bladder sodium transport.
17	reversal of renal hypertension effects on renin salt and water balance	Reversal of effects of kidney hypertension on water and saline balance of renin.
17	the renal kallikrein kinin system in various types of diuresis and under the effects of inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis in rats	Renal kallikrein kinin system in various types of diuresis and prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors in rats.
17	sodium uptake across the apical border of the isolated turtle colon confirmation of the two barrier model	Sodium uptake across the isolated turtle colonic apical border supports the two-barrier model.
17	weak a c magnetic field effects changes in cell sodium pump activity following whole animal exposure	A weak magnetic field alters the apos; the activity of the cellular sodium pump as a result of it; exposure to whole animals.
17	17 alpha hydroxylase deficiency a combination of hydroxylation defect and reversible blockade in aldosterone biosynthesis	It is important to note that there are a number of factors that contribute to the development of this disease.
17	prolonged infusions of ile5 angiotensin ii in sodium replete and deplete man effects on aldosterone acth cortisol blood pressure and electrolyte balance	Prolonged infusions of apos; angiotensin II in the effects of sodium-rich and depleted humans on the blood pressure of apos; aldosterone acth cortisol and apos; aldosterone cortisol and apos; and electrolyte balance.
17	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in hypertensive children with coarctation of the aorta	Role of the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in hypertensive children with oral aortic coarction.
17	desoxycorticosterone in normal pregnancy ii cortisol dependent fluctuations in free plasma desoxycorticosterone	Deoxycorticosterone During Normal Pregnancy ii Cortisol-Dependent Fluctuations in Free Plasma Deoxycorticosterone.
17	thyroid hormone aldosterone interaction on na transport in toad bladder	Apos interaction; aldosterone thyroid hormone on transport n in the bladder of toads.
17	effect of parathyroid hormone on plasma renin activity and sodium excretion	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that may be considered to be carcinogenic.
17	interrelations between plasma renin activity aldosterone and sympathetic nervous system activity in essential hypertension	Interrelationship between apos; aldosterone and apos plasma renin activity; sympathetic nervous system activity; essential hypertension.
17	plasma renin activity following renal transplantation	L' renal renal transplant plasma renin activity.
17	calibration and evaluation of a system of total body in vivo activation analysis using 14 mev neutrons	Canadian Institute for Health Information. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index_e.html.
17	correlation of structural and ultrastructural modifications of the renal cortex with water sodium and protein excretion in rats rendered hypertensive by perinephritic constriction by collodion	Correlation between ultrastructural and structural changes in the renal cortex and the apos; excretion of sodium and protein in the apos; water in rats hypertensive by perinephritic collodion constriction.
17	sodium losing renal disease two cases and a review of the literature	Two cases of sodium-loss nephropathy and a literature review.
17	a composite analysis of renin classification methods	A Composite Analysis of Renin Classification Methods.
17	renal hemodynamics and the renin angiotensin system in cirrhosis relationship to sodium retention	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of coronary heart disease.
17	effect of papaverine on renin release in dogs in vivo and in vitro	Effect of papaverine on the release of canine renin in vivo and in vitro.
17	calcium and sodium excretion in rats in response to prolonged treatment with polythiazide	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of excretion: calcium excretion and sodium excretion.
17	polkissen cells and their possible role in renin secretion	The possible role of polkissen cells in renin secretion.
17	renin secretion during dynamic changes in renal perfusion pressure	Renin secretion during dynamic renal perfusion pressure changes.
17	intrarenal renin and autoregulation of renal plasma flow and glomerular filtration rate	Intrarenal renin and renal plasma flow self-regulation and glomerular filtration rate.
17	effect of hematocrit variation on the urinary sodium excretion in normal and uremic dogs author s transl	The effect of the change in serum glucose; hematocrit on glucose; urinary excretion of sodium in normal dogs and uremic translations.
17	renal kallikrein variations in relation to sodium intake and experimental renovascular hypertension author s transl	Renal kallikrein changes as a function of sodium intake and apo; experimental vascular hypertension translated by the authors.
17	plasma mineralocorticoids plasma renin and urinary kallikrein in salt sensitive and salt resistant rats	Plasma kallikrein and plasma renin in salt-sensitive and salt-resistant rats.
17	continuous determination of various enzymes and sodium concentration in urine a usable method for diagnosis of kidney graft rejection	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	angiotensin thirst and sodium appetite retrospect and prospect	It's a great way to learn more about life and the environment.
17	the renin angiotensin system and thirst some unanswered questions	The renin system angiotensin and thirst... some unanswered questions.
17	lymphatic network of kidney ii effect of diuretics on intrarenal renin release	Kidney lymphatic network ii diuretics affect intrarenal renin release.
17	collecting duct sodium reabsorption in deoxycorticosterone treated rats	Sodium reabsorption from the collecting duct was found in deoxycorticosterone-treated rats.
17	kinetics of sodium in rabbit arterial wall inability of aldosterone to alter extra to intracellular distribution	Sodium kinetics in the arterial wall of the rabbit is unable to alter the distribution of the cellular extra-distribution of l' aldosterone.
17	the effect of extremely high sodium intake on plasma renin activity plasma aldosterone concentration and urinary excretion of aldosterone metabolites	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the assessment of risk associated with the use of the drug.
17	sodium retention and hypertension with short dialysis	Sodium retention and short dialysis hypertension.
17	innappropriate renin secretion unmasked by captopril sq 14 225 in hypertension of chronic renal failure	Inappropriate renin secretion not masked by captopril sq.
17	comparison of two angiotensin ii analogues in normal subjects and hypertensive patients	Comparison of two analogs of angiotensin ii in normal and hypertensive subjects.
17	renin aldosterone and renal haemodynamics in cirrhosis with ascites	Renal aldosterone and hemodynamics in ascites cirrhosis.
17	renal responses to angiotensin ii and 1 sar 8 ala aii in sodium replete and deplete dogs	Renal responses to angiotensin II and angiotensin II and 1 sar 8 alaii in sodium-filled, impoverished dogs.
17	effects of chronic lithium administration on concanavalin a binding to plasma membranes from the corpus striatum of rat brain	Effect of Lipos; chronic administration of lithium to concanavalin, a binding to the plasma membranes of the striated body of the rat brain.
17	orthostatic hypotension in complicated diabetes mellitus study of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system author s transl	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Intakes and Dietary Reference Intakes.
17	renin sodium profile and its therapeutical implications in arterial hypertension	The Pattern of Sodium Renin and its Therapeutic Implications in High Blood Pressure.
17	elevated plasma renin activity in patients with acute pyelonephritis	High plasma renin activity in acute pyelonephritis patients.
17	coupled sodium chloride influx across brush border of flounder intestine	Sodium chloride is also found in a variety of aquatic organisms, including invertebrates.
17	plasma volumes and hematocrits in rats with chronic sinoaortic denervation hypertension	Plasma volumes and hematocrit in rats with a chronic aortic hypertension due to aortic-sino denervation.
17	essential role of mean circulatory filling pressure in salt induced hypertension	Essential role of average circulatory filling pressure in salt; salt-induced hypertension.
17	salt intake and diuretic treatment of hypertension	In addition to the above, there are a number of other medications that can be used to treat high blood pressure.
17	increased glomerular filtration rate after converting enzyme inhibition in essential hypertension	Increased rate of glomerular filtration after conversion of the apos; enzymatic inhibition in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	plasma active and inactive renin in the rabbit effect of dietary sodium depletion and repletion	In addition, it can be used to reduce the amount of sodium in the body, as well as the amount of sodium.
17	studies on the inhibitory effect of indomethacin and meclofenamate on the adrenalectomy induced increase in plasma renin concentration	Studies of apo, indomethacin inhibitory effect, and meclofenamate on adrenalectomy induced an increase in plasma renin concentration.
17	angiotensin ii blockade during combined thiazide beta adrenoreceptor blocker treatment	Angiotensin II blocks during combined beta treatment with a thiazide-adrenoceptor blocker.
17	effects of high salt intake and meclofenamate on arterial pressure and renal function in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effects of high doses of salt and meclofenamate on renal function and blood pressure in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	urinary prostaglandins and kallikrein in essential hypertension	Urinary Protaglandins and Kallikrein in the Eye; essential hypertension.
17	sodium balance urinary prostaglandin e2 and renin in normal man	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Intakes.
17	effect of chronic treatment with desoxycorticosterone on the dipsogenic response of rats to isoproterenol and angiotensin	Effect of chronic deoxycorticosterone treatment on rat dipsogenic response to apos; isoproterenol and apos; angiotensin.
17	angiotensin and sodium balance their role in chronic two kidney goldblatt hypertension	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of heart disease and stroke.
17	the role of angiotensin in the control of blood pressure during sodium depletion	The role of l' angiotensin in blood pressure control during sodium depletion.
17	factors controlling plasma renin and aldosterone during pregnancy	Renin and plasma aldosterone controlling factors during pregnancy.
17	exchangeable sodium in angiotensinogenic and nonangiotensinogenic renovascular hypertension	Dietary Reference Intakes (Dietary Reference Intakes) Dietary Reference Intakes.
17	effects of acute hemodialysis induced changes in sodium balance on the renin angiotensin system in renovascular and spontaneously hypertensive rats	The effects of acute hemodialysis induced changes in renin sodium balance-angiotensin in spontaneously hypertensive and renal-vascular rats.
17	inhibition by angiotensin ii of some vasopressin effects on renal function in sheep	L' angiotensin ii inhibits certain effects of vasopressin on sheep kidney function.
17	divergent blood pressure responses during short term sodium restriction in hypertension	Journal of the American Medical Association, Vol.
17	application of equivalent electrical circuit models to study of sodium transport across epithelial tissues	Application of models of electrical circuits equivalent to apos; study of the transport of sodium in epithelial tissues.
17	change in the selectivity of the sodium channels of a nerve fiber membrane under the action of veratrine	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the use of veratrin is a major factor in the development of the disease.
17	sodium intake and plasma angiotensin level as modulators of adrenal and uterine angiotensin ii receptors in the rat	Sodium intake and serum apo levels; plasma angiotensin as the modulators of rat apos receptors; and adrenal angiotensin ii and uterine.
17	factors influencing the release of renin in patients under chronic dialysis treatment	Factors influencing renin release in chronic dialysis patients.
17	idiopathic sustained inappropriate secretion of adh with associated hypertension and thirst	It was found that the adhesive was not designed to be used in conjunction with the adhesive, and the adhesive was not designed to be used in conjunction with the adhesive.
17	renal tubular reabsorption in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal tubular reabsorption (RCR) in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	hemodynamics of central infusion of angiotensin ii in normal and sodium depleted dogs	Hemodynamics of angiotensin ii central infusion in normal and sodium-deprived dogs.
17	reactive hyperreninemia in renovascular hypertension after angiotensin blockage with saralasin or converting enzyme inhibitor	"""Reactive hyperreninemia in renovascular hypertension after angiotensin blockage with saralasin or converting to an enzyme inhibitor"", Journal of Rehabilitation, Vol."
17	changes of plasma renin and renal renin concentration in hgcl2 induced acute renal failure in rats	Changes in plasma renin and renal renin levels in rat kidney; hgcl2 resulted in acute renal failure in rats.
17	diuretics role of sodium balance	Dietary effect of alcohol and other drugs on body weight.
17	prostaglandin e2 induced hypertension in conscious dogs	Prostaglandin e2 induced apos; hypertension was induced in conscious dogs.
17	neonatal changes in the plasma levels of cortisol cortisone and aldosterone in the calf	Neonatal Changes in Plasma Cortisone and D' Cortisol Aldosterone in Veal.
17	nephrotic syndrome vasoconstriction and hypervolemic types indicated by renin sodium profiling	Nephrotic vasoconstriction syndrome and hypervolemic types, as indicated by the apos; renin sodium profiling.
17	effects of the oral converting enzyme inhibitor sq 14225 in a model of low cardiac output in dogs	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
17	effect of the angiotensin ii antagonist saralasin on plasma aldosterone concentration and on blood pressure before and during sodium depletion in normal subjects	Effect of apos; antagonist of apos; angiotensin ii, saralasin, on plasma aldosterone concentration and blood pressure before and during the depletion of sodium in normal subjects.
17	plasma and urine dopamine in man given sodium chloride in the diet	Dopamine in the urine and in the plasma; a man who has received sodium chloride in the diet.
17	the blocking effect of magnesium on the secretion of adrenal catecholamines induced by the omission of sodium from the extracellular medium	L' inhibitory effect of magnesium on adrenal catecholamine secretion; omission of extracellular sodium.
17	effect of angiotensin ii and sodium depletion on angiotensinogen production	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the effects of sodium on the production of angiotensin.
17	effects of metoprolol on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in thiazide resistant hypertensive patients	Effects of Metoprolol on Blood Pressure and Lapos; Plasma Renin Activity in Thiazide-Resistant Hypertensive Patients.
17	stability of carmustine in the presence of sodium bicarbonate	Sodium bicarbonate stable to carmustine.
17	somatostatin stimulates sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit ileum	Somatostatin stimulates the absorption of sodium and chloride in rabbit ileum.
17	intrarenal prostaglandins effect of sodium and indomethacin on pge2 and pgf2 alpha in rabbits	Effect of sodium and l&apos intrarenal prostaglandins; indomethacin on rabbit pge2 and pgf2 alpha.
17	reversible colchicine induced disruption of amygdaloid function in sodium appetite	Reversible colchicine induced a disruption of the function of amygdaloid in l'apos; appetite sodium.
17	alterations in the responses of the sympathetic nervous system and renin in borderline hypertension	Changes in renin and sympathetic nervous system responses in apos; limiting hypertension.
17	circadian changes in plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in two kidney hypertension rats	Circadian changes in apos; plasma renin activity and aldosterone concentration in two renal hypertensive rats.
17	primacy of the renin angiotensin system in mediating the aldosterone response to sodium restriction	The renin angiotensin primacy of the apos system in the mediation of the apos response; aldosterone to sodium restriction.
17	angiotensin ii plasma renin and sodium depletion as determinants of blood pressure response to saralasin in essential hypertension	L' angiotensin ii, plasma renin and sodium depletion as determinants of the blood pressure response to saralasin in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	responses of the renin angiotensin system and kallikrein kinin system to sodium and converting enzyme inhibitor sq 14 225	In addition, it can be used as a means of reducing the risk of injury to the human body, as well as reducing the risk of injury.
17	captopril and salt subtraction to treat uncontrollable hypertension in haemodialysis patients	Captopril and subtract salt to treat apos; hypertension uncontrollable in patients with hemodialysis.
17	effects of chronic alpha and beta adrenoceptor blockade with labetalol on plasma catecholamines and renal function in hypertension	Effects of chronic alpha- and beta-adrenoceptor blockade on plasma catecholamine and renal function in hypertension.
17	decreased urinary kallikrein activity and elevated blood pressure normalized by orally applied kallikrein in essential hypertension	Decreased urinary kallikrein and normalized high blood pressure; oral application of kallikrein; essential hypertension.
17	chronic blockade of angiotensin ii formation during sodium deprivation	Chronic blockade of the formation of apos; angiotensin ii during deprivation of sodium.
17	importance of the radioimmune method of determining renin activity in the blood plasma for the differential therapy of hypertension	Importance of the immune-radio method for determination of apos; blood plasma renin activity for differential treatment of apos; high blood pressure.
17	extracellular ph selectively modulates recovery from sodium inactivation in frog myelinated nerve	The extracellular ph selectively modulates potato recovery; sodic inactivation in the myelinated frog nerve.
17	renal handling of water and sodium in children with proximal and distal renal tabular acidosis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of heart disease and stroke.
17	chronic effects of lead on renin and renal sodium excretion	Effects of lead on the liver; excretion of renin and renal sodium.
17	the relationship of urinary prostaglandins and plasma renin to sodium balance and diuresis in normal man	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	the renin angiotensin system in newborn dogs developmental patterns and response to acute saline loading	The system of d' angiotensin renin in dogs new-born and the response to an acute saline load.
17	evidence for na retaining humoral agents and vasoconstrictor humoral agents in hypertension prone dahl s rats prevention of nacl induced hypertension in dahl s rats with thiazide	Evidence of retention; humoral and cellular agents; vasoconstrictor humoral agents in thiazide-treated Dahl rats; hypertension prevention; nacl-induced hypertension in thiazide-treated Dahl rats.
17	the effect of sodium pentobarbital on the preservation of fertilizing capacity of turkey spermatozoa	The effect of sodium pentobarbital on turkey sperm fertilization retention.
17	reversal of two kidney one clip renovascular hypertension in the rat	Inversion of l' renal hypertension-two-kidney clip in rat.
17	sequential method for combined screening antihypertensive and diuretic agents in the same spontaneously hypertensive rat shr	A sequential method of screening the same narrowed spontaneously hypertensive rat for antihypertensive and diuretic agents.
17	is low urinary prostaglandin concentration a stage in the development of essential hypertension	Low levels of urinary prostaglandins are a stage of development of essential hypertension.
17	sodium induced elevation of blood pressure in the anephric state	Sodium was found to induce a rise in blood pressure at the apos; an extinction state.
17	in vitro neutralizing capacity of commercially available antacid mixtures and their role in the treatment of peptic ulcer	In vitro neutralization capacity of commercially available mixtures of antacids and their role in the treatment of the gastroduodenal ulcers.
17	renal interstitial pressure and sodium excretion during renal vein constriction	Renal interstitial pressure and renal venous constriction sodium excretion.
17	effect on renal sodium and water excretion of the inhibition of prostaglandin synthesis in extracellular volume expansion	Effect on the immune system; excretion of water and renal sodium; inhibition of synthesis of prostaglandins in the immune system; expansion of extracellular volume.
17	the present status of the autoregulation theory of the pathogenesis of hypertension	It's not a problem, it's a problem, it's a problem, but a problem.
17	intrarenal conversion of prostaglandin f2 alpha into prostaglandin e2 and renin release in the isolated perfused rat kidney	Intrarenal conversion of f2 alpha prostaglandin to e2 prostaglandin and release of renin in isolated perfused rat kidney.
17	diminished urinary prostacyclin metabolite in essential hypertension	Reduction of the metabolite of urinary prostacyclin in the apos; essential hypertension.
17	role of prostaglandin in the antihypertensive mechanism of captopril in low renin hypertension	The Role of Prostaglandin in the Antihypertensive Mechanism of Captopril in Low Renin Hypertension.
17	influence of sodium on experimental renovascular hypertension in rats	Sodium influence in rat; experimental renal hypertension.
17	active and inactive renin in individual juxtaglomerular apparatuses	Renin is active and renin is inactive in individual juxtaglomerular devices.
17	angiotensin ii and not sodium status is the major determinant of the agonistic antagonistic balance of saralasin s actions	L' angiotensin ii, not l' sodium state, is the main determinant of l' antagonistic agonistic equilibrium of the actions of saralasin.
17	long term regulation of arterial pressure glomerular filtration and renal sodium reabsorption by angiotensin ii in dogs	The long-term regulation of glomerular filtration of blood pressure and of renal sodium reabsorption by etapos; angiotensin ii in dogs.
17	the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the maintenance of blood pressure aldosterone secretion and sodium balance in normotensive subjects	The renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in maintaining the secretion of d' aldosterone and l' normotensive sodium balance of blood pressure.
17	acceleration of hypotension and development of stroke in the spontaneously hypertensive rat by unilateral ureteral obstruction	Cardiovascular events in spontaneously hypertensive rats by unilateral obstruction of the urethra.
17	use of first dose response or plasma renin activity to predict the long term effect of captopril identification of triphasic pattern of blood pressure response	Use of the response to the first dose or apos; plasma renin activity to predict apos; long-term effect of apos; identification of the captopril on the triphasic pattern of the blood pressure response.
17	regulation of receptor binding interactions of 125i angiotensin ii and 125i sarcosine1 leucine8 angiotensin ii an angiotensin antagonist by sodium ion	Regulation of 125i angiotensin receptor binding interactions ii and 125i sarcosine1 leucine8 angiotensin ii, a l&aposin antagonist; angiotensin, by apos; sodium ion.
17	specific inhibition of renin by an angiotensinogen analog studies in sodium depletion and renin dependent hypertension	Renin-specific inhibition by an apos analog; sodium depletion angiotensinogen and apos; renin-dependent hypertension.
17	angiotensin and other peptides in the control of water and sodium intake	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
17	interaction of catecholamines and the renin angiotensin system in regulating sodium reabsorption in the rat kidney	Catecholamine interaction with the renin system-angiotensin in the regulation of sodium reabsorption in rat kidney.
17	a comparison of sodium chloride thiocyanate and sucrose spaces as estimates of extracellular fluid volume	Comparison of sucrose and sodium chloride thiocyanate spaces to estimate volume of extracellular fluid.
17	clinical and biochemical effects of spironolactone administered once daily in primary hypertension multicenter sweden study	Clinical and biochemical effects of the once-daily administration of spironolactone as part of a multi-centre sweden primary study on apos; hypertension.
17	na and ca2 ingestion plasma volume electrolyte distribution at rest and exercise	Distribution of abs; electrolyte of plasma volume; ingestion of resting and exercise.
17	heterogeneous distribution of the sodium dependent alanine transport activity in the rat hepatocyte plasma membrane	Heterogeneous distribution of l*apos; transport activity of sodium-dependent alanine in the plasma membrane of rat hepatocytes.
17	a dose response comparison of the actions of angiotensin ii and angiotensin iii in sheep	Dose comparison-response of sheep actions; angiotensin ii and apos; angiotensin iii.
17	regulation of serum progesterone in patients with essential hypertension	The study of the role of progesterone in the control of coronary artery disease.
17	obesity and essential hypertension hemodynamics intravascular volume sodium excretion and plasma renin activity	Intravascular hypertension is a major cause of hypertension, including hypertension, hypertension, and hypertension.
17	effects of indomethacin and meclofenamate on renin release and renal hemodynamic function during chronic sodium depletion in conscious dogs	Effects of apos; indomethacin and meclofenamate on renal hemodynamic function and renin release during chronic sodium depletion in conscious dogs.
17	angiotensin inhibitors for hypertension	It's a great way to help people cope with stress.
17	effects of acute haemodialysis induced changes in sodium balance upon experimentally hypertensive rats	Effects of acute hemodialysis induced changes in the sodium balance in experimental hypertensive rats.
17	efficacy of captopril in experimental low renin hypertension	It is not possible to determine the effect of the drug on blood pressure.
17	testosterone a specific competitive antagonist of aldosterone in the toad bladder	Testosterone is a specific, competitive antagonist of toad aldosterone in the toad bladder.
17	sodium and water content and the central hemodynamic indices in hypertension	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of hypertension.
17	transport of glycyl l proline into intestinal and renal brush border vesicles from rabbit	Glycyl proline transport in rabbit renal and intestinal brush border vesicles.
17	vascular renin in hypertension	Vascular renin in the apos; high blood pressure.
17	hypertension produced by sodium depletion and unilateral nephrectomy a new experimental model	Sodium depletion hypertension and unilateral nephrectomy is a new experimental model.
17	enhanced parathyroid function in essential hypertension a homeostatic response to a urinary calcium leak	Increases in parathyroid function in apos; essential hypertension is homeostatic response to urinary calcium leakage.
17	disturbance of kidney aldosterone sensitivity and the mechanism of its development during neurodystrophy	Disturbance of sensitivity to renal aldosterone and its developmental mechanism during neurodystrophy.
17	aldosterone receptor measurements during changes in dietary sodium	Measurements of the receptors of l'apos; aldosterone during the variations of the dietary sodium.
17	renin angiotensin system in acute hepatitis author s transl	Rosenberg, J.A., D.J. Rosenberg, and D.J. Schneider.
17	quantitative x ray microanalysis of frozen hydrated bulk biological specimens	Quantitative X-ray microanalysis (QX-ray) of frozen and bulk hydrated biological specimens.
17	evidence that the acute hypotensive effect of captopril in dogs is not wholly explained by a reduction of plasma angiotensin ii and its direct vasoconstrictor effect	Captopril's acute hypotensive effect in the dog is not fully explained by a reduction in plasma angiotensin ii and its direct vasoconstrictor effect.
17	urinary tetrahydroaldosterone and aldosterone 18 glucuronide excretion in white and black normal subjects and hypertensive patients	Tetrahydroaldosterone and urinary aldosterone 18 Excretion of glucuronide in normal white and black subjects and in patients with high blood pressure.
17	renal management of sodium under indomethacin and aldosterone in the elderly	Renal Management of Sodium Under Indomethacin and Aldosterone in the Elderly.
17	kinetic disposition and diuretic effect of frusemide in acute pulmonary oedema	Kinetic disposition and frusemide diuretic effect in the apos; acute pulmonary edema.
17	overview of the role of angiotensin inhibitors in delineating the function of the renin angiotensin system	Overview of role of apos inhibitors; angiotensin in delineation of apos system function; angiotensin renin.
17	studies of the functional role of the intrarenal renin angiotensin system	Studies of the Functional Role of the Intrarenal Renin Angiotensin System.
17	effects of two angiotensin ii analogues on blood pressure plasma aldosterone concentration plasma renin activity and creatinine clearance in normal subjects on different sodium intakes	Effects of two analogs of apos; angiotensin ii on plasma blood pressure concentration, aldosterone, and plasma renin activity and creatinine clearance in normal subjects at different sodium intakes.
17	the effect of sodium on aldosterone metabolic clearance	Effect of Sodium on Metabolic Clearance of Aldosterone.
17	increased sodium appetite in the rat induced by intracranial administration of components of the renin angiotensin system	In addition, a number of other studies have been conducted to determine the extent of the increase in the risk of cardiovascular disease.
17	changes of urinary kallikrein and kinin excretions induced by adrenalin infusion in conscious dogs	Changes in urinary excretion of kallikrein and kinin induced by infusion of d' adrenaline in conscious dogs.
17	inborn error in the terminal step of aldosterone biosynthesis corticosterone methyl oxidase tpe ii deficiency in a north american pedigree	In addition, there are a number of genetic factors that influence the genetic makeup of the host, such as the genetic makeup of the host.
17	differential renal effects of cyclooxygenase inhibition in sodium replete and sodium deprived dog	Distinctive renal effects of apo; inhibition of cyclooxygenase in dogs lacking sodium and filled with sodium.
17	sodium balance and plasma renin activity during the development of two kidney goldblatt hypertension in rats	L' sodium balance and apos; renin plasma activity during apos development; two Goldblatt kidney hypertension in rats.
17	the role of the renal effects of angiotensin ii in hypertension	The Role of Renal Effects of Apos; Angiotensin ii in High Blood Pressure.
17	exaggerated natriuresis in experimental hypertension and the role of the natriuretic factor	In addition, there is no evidence that the effects of the natriuretic factor are significant.
17	the effects of hemorrhage and sodium depletion on plasma concentrations of angiotensin ii and des asp1 angiotensin ii in the rat	In addition, there is an increased risk of respiratory tract infection, which may result in increased risk of heart disease.
17	influence of sodium intake on catecholamine release by angiotensin and renal nerve stimulation in dogs	L' influence of apos; sodium absorption on catecholamine release by apos; renal nerve stimulation and angiotensin in dogs.
17	hypertension following renal transplantation the role of the host s kidney	Lapos; hypertension following renal transplantation, role of kidney of host.
17	effects of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition on blood pressure and plasma renin activity in essential hypertension	Efficacy of antioxidants; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant; antioxidant.
17	neuroeffector function of isolated portal vein from spontaneously hypertensive and wistar kyoto rats dependence on external calcium concentration	The neuroeffector function of the portal vein isolated from wistar and spontaneously hypertensive kyoto rats depends on the external calcium concentration.
17	leucocyte cation transport in essential hypertension its relation to the renin angiotensin system	The transport of leukocyte cations into the essential hypertension of the blood vessel is related to the epos system; renin angiotensin.
17	studies on the mechanism of renin release from rat kidney slices calcium sodium and metabolic inhibition	Studies on the mechanism of release of renin from thin slices of sodium rat kidney and metabolic inhibition.
17	functional renal involvement in normotensive patients with progressive systemic sclerosis impaired sodium excretion during isotonic saline infusion	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on the liver, and no evidence of any adverse effects on the liver.
17	angiotensin in the control of water and sodium intake	It's a good idea to take a few minutes to relax, but it's a good idea.
17	comparison of oral diazoxide and minoxidil in refractory hypertension	Comparison of Minoxidil and Oral Diazoxide in Refractory Hypertension.
17	abnormal urinary kallikrein in hypertension is not related to aldosterone or plasma renin activity	It is not associated with aldosterone or aldosterone; it is not associated with plasma renin activity.
17	effect of dietary salt on hemodynamics of established renal hypertension in the rabbit implications for the autoregulation theory of hypertension	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
17	body weight reduction necessary to attain normotension in the overweight hypertensive patient	Reduction in body weight required to achieve normotension status in the hypertensive and obese patient.
17	in vivo modification of angiotensin ii pressor responsiveness in sheep by indomethacin	Modification in vivo of the sheep pressor responsiveness to apos; angiotensin ii by apos; indomethacin.
17	effect of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition with sq 14 225 on blood pressure in sheep	Effect of apos; apos inhibition; apos conversion enzyme; angiotensin with sq.14,225 on sheep blood pressure.
17	renal prostaglandins renin release and renal hemodynamic function in high renin states	The release of renal renin and the renal hemodynamic function of renal prostaglandins in the elevated renal states.
17	relationships between sodium clearance plasma renin activity plasma aldosterone renal hemodynamics and blood pressure in essential hypertension	The relationship between the blood pressure and plasma aldosterone; the blood pressure in the blood; essential hypertension.
17	enhancement by diuretics of the antihypertensive action of long term angiotensin converting enzyme blockade	Antihypertensive action of the apos; conversion enzyme of the apos; long-term blocking angiotensin.
17	renin angiotensin aldosterone system in cirrhosis	Renin system-angiotensin-cirrhosis aldosterone.
17	prostaglandins role in renin regulation and mediation of antihypertensive drug effects	The Role of Prostaglandins in Regulating Renin and Mediating the Antihypertensive Effects of Drugs.
17	dynamic responses of active and inactive renin in patients with essential and renovascular hypertension	Active and inactive renin dynamic reactions in patients with epos; essential hypertension and reno-vascular.
17	low plasma renin activity in normotensive patients with diabetes mellitus relationship to neuropathy	Low plasma renin activity in normotensive diabetes mellitus patients in association with neuropathy.
17	plasma volume osmolality vasopressin and renin activity during graded exercise in man	It is not possible to determine the age of the individual, but it is important to determine the age of the individual.
17	hydrostatic ultrafiltration during hemodialysis using decreasing sodium dialysate	Hemodialysis using a dialysate of decreasing sodium.
17	blood pressure and sodium balance in hypertensive patients in hospital	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
17	interactions between angiotensin peptides and the sympathetic nervous system mediating intestinal sodium and water absorption in the rat	Interactions between d&apos peptides; angiotensin and the mediating sympathetic nervous system; intestinal absorption of sodium and d' rat water.
17	synaptic transmission and intracellular sodium ionophore induced sodium loading of nerve terminals	Synaptic transmission and the intracellular sodium ionophore induced a sodium load on the nerve endings.
17	continuous positive airway pressure impairs renal function in newborn goats	Continuous positive respiratory pressure alters renal function in goats newly born @-@.
17	the renin kallikrein prostaglandin system plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein during prostacyclin infusion in man	The inactive and active plasma renin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin kin.
17	stimulatory action of angiotensin ii on water and electrolyte transport by the proximal colon of the rat	Stimulatory action of apos; angiotensin ii on the transport of apos, water, and apos; and electrolytes by the rat proximal colon.
17	increased sodium appetite in adrenalectomized or hypophysectomized rats after intracranial injections of renin or angiotensin ii	Sodium appetite increased in hypophysectomized or adrenalectomized rats following intracranial renin or d&apos injections; angiotensin ii.
17	essential hypertension and diabetes	Essential hypertension, diabetes.
17	inappropriate renin secretion and abnormal cardiovascular reflexes in coarctation of the aorta	Inappropriate renin secretion and abnormal cardiovascular reflexes in aortic coarctation.
17	the relationship between sodium pump activity and twitch tension in cardiac purkinje fibres	The relationship between sodium pump activity and cardiac purkin fiber twitch tension.
17	effect of oral sucrose on blood pressure in the spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effect of Oral Sucrose on Arterial Pressure in Spontaneously Hypertensive Rat.
17	the effect of weight reduction on blood pressure plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone levels in obese patients	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that weight reduction is a risk factor for obesity.
17	sodium dependent inhibition of amino acid and dipeptide transport by harmaline in monkey small intestine	Sodium-dependent inhibition of the transport of amino acids and dipeptides by l' harmaline in the apos; small intestine of the monkey.
17	influence of unilateral adrenalectomy on renin angiotensin aldosterone system in primary aldosteronism	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that renal adrenalectomy is a major risk factor for cardiovascular disease.
17	the sodium effect of bacillus subtilis growth on aspartate	It can also be used as an antiseptic agent.
17	factors relating to aldosterone secretion rate the excretions of aldosterone 18 glucuronide and the plasma aldosterone concentration in cirrhosis	Factors associated with the secretion of apos; aldosterone are glucuronide d&apos excretion, aldosterone 18, and plasma aldosterone in cirrhosis.
17	uncontrollable hypertension in patients on hemodialysis long term treatment with captopril and salt subtraction	Patients on long-term hemodialysis with captopril and saline subtraction have uncontrollable hypertension.
17	aldosterone response to sodium deprivation and angiotensin ii in patients with hypopituitarism	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of heart disease and stroke.
17	effect of hypertonic and hypotonic infusions on aldosterone in conscious sodium depleted dogs	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
17	the effect on salt appetite and the renin aldosterone system on replacing the depleted ions to sodium deficient cattle	The effect on the appetite for salt and the renin system-aldosterone on the replacement of depleted ions by cattle deficient in sodium.
17	stimulation by injected guanosine triphosphate of the sodium efflux in barnacle muscle fibres pre exposed to aldosterone	Sodium efflux into barnacle muscle fibers previously exposed to aldosterone.
17	gated sodium 23 nuclear magnetic resonance images of an isolated perfused working rat heart	Gated sodium 23 images of isolated perfused rat heart nuclear magnetic resonance.
17	application of in vivo activation analysis to the compartmental study of sodium in the hand	Sodium compartmentalization in the hand; in vivo activation.
17	vasopressin fluid and electrolyte response to chronic angiotensin ii infusion	Vasopressin Fluid and Electrolytic Response to Chronic Dapos Infusion; Angiotensin ii.
17	role of aldosterone in sodium retention of pregnancy in the rat	Role of Apos; Aldosterone in Sodium Retention of Pregnancy in Rat.
17	reduced urine kallikrein excretion and antikaliuresis by chlorazanil in rats	In rats, chlorazanil reduced urinary kallikrein excretion and decreased the rate of urinary kallikrein secretion; antikaliuresis by chlorazanil.
17	hypertension treated by sodium restriction	Sodium-restricted hypertension, please.
17	chronic treatment with the new potent vasodilator ro 12 4713 in moderate to severe hypertension effects on blood pressure endocrine function sodium and plasma volume	Chronic treatment with potent new vasodilator ro 12,4713 in effects of mild to severe hypertension on endocrine function of blood pressure, sodium and plasma volume.
17	effects of sodium intake and goldblatt hypertension on renin release in rat kidney slices	Effects of renin; sodium absorption and apo; goldblatt-like hypertension on the release of renin in rat kidney slices.
17	subcellular localization of aldosterone induced proteins in toad urinary bladders	Subcellular localization of apos; aldosterone induces protein in the toad bladder.
17	na ca exchange in rat myometrium membrane vesicles highly enriched in plasma membranes	L' exchange na ca in the membrane vesicles of the rat myometrium is very rich in plasma membranes.
17	sodium and angiotensin in the pathogenesis of experimental renovascular hypertension	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	plasma vasopressin levels and urinary sodium excretion during cardiopulmonary bypass with and without pulsatile flow	Plasma vasopressin levels and urinary sodium excretion during pulsatile and non-pulsatile cardiopulmonary bypass.
17	connection between the changes in tubular reabsorption and in glomerular filtration rate induced by replacement of plasma sodium and chloride by isotonic mannitol	Relationship between changes in glomerular filtration rate and tubular reabsorption induced by substitution of isotonic mannitol for plasma sodium and chloride.
17	sodium free water clearance in hemodialysis	It's a good idea if you don't like it.
17	sodium and calcium action potentials in cells derived from a rat medullary thyroid carcinoma	In addition, there is the possibility of an increased risk of cancer, which may lead to the development of cancer.
17	regulation of aldosterone biosynthesis during sodium deficiency evidence for an essential role of the pituitary gland	The regulation of the biosynthesis of apos; aldosterone during a sodium deficiency indicates that the apos; pituitary plays an essential role.
17	vasopressin elevation in essential hypertension and increased responsiveness to sodium intake	An increase in vasopressin in the apos; essential hypertension and an increase in reactivity to the apos; sodium absorption were observed.
17	role of the renal nerves in the pathogenesis of one kidney renal hypertension in the rat	Role of Renal Nerves in the Pathogenesis of Lapos; Renal Hypertension in the Rat.
17	renal function aldosterone and vasopressin excretion following repeated long distance running	Long-distance repeated runs resulted in excretion of vasopressin from renal function.
17	sodium proton exchange in mouse neuroblastoma cells	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the sensitivity of the data.
17	investigation of the mechanism of action of prostaglandin synthesis inhibitors on renin and aldosterone secretion and sodium excretion	Mechanism of action of inhibitors of prostaglandin synthesis on renin and d&apos secretion; aldosterone and apos; sodium excretion.
17	plasma substance p levels in normotensive and hypertensive subjects	Plasma p-substance levels in hypertensive and normotensive subjects.
17	effects of chronic prazosin treatment on the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in man	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of cardiovascular disease.
17	the effect of prostaglandin inhibition on renin release a comparison of furosemide and low sodium stimulation tests	A comparison of the furosemide and low-sodium stimulation tests is shown by the effect of apos; inhibition of the prostaglandins on the renin.
17	sodium appetite in sheep induced by cerebral ventricular infusion of angiotensin comparison with sodium deficiency	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury, but it is important to determine the cause of the injury.
17	effects of salt and water depletion on the early phase of hypertension in goldblatt two kidney hypertensive dogs	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Canada.
17	asp1 val5 angiotensin 1 8 octapeptide does not stimulate aldosterone secretion in sodium depleted sheep	L' asp1-octapeptide angiotensin 18 does not stimulate apos secretion; aldosterone in sodium-deprived sheep.
17	aldosterone stimulates na transport without affecting citrate synthase activity in cultured cells	L' aldosterone stimulates transport without affecting the activity of citrate synthase in cultured cells.
17	sodium dependent and calcium dependent calcium transport by rat brain microsomes	It is important to note that calcium is a major component of the body's diet.
17	thermoregulation in spontaneously hypertensive rats effects of antihypertensive treatments	Effects of antihypertensive treatments on the thermoregulation of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	influence of sodium homeostasis on dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone renin and prolactin secretion in man	In addition, there is a significant increase in the amount of sodium in the human body, and a corresponding increase in the amount of sodium in the body.
17	analysis of steroids in urine for differentiation of pseudohypoaldosteronism and aldosterone biosynthetic defect	Apos steroid analysis; urine for pseudohypoaldosterone differentiation and biosynthetic defects of apos; aldosterone.
17	renin release after furosemide and ethacrynic acid in man evidence for neural reflex control mechanisms	Renin release following administration of furosemide and d*apos; ethacrynic acid (EHA) in men indicates the presence of neural-reflex control mechanisms.
17	renal hemodynamics and sodium excretion in stroke prone spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal hemodynamics and excretion of sodium in spontaneously hypertensive rats subject to stroke.
17	the effect of antihypertensive therapy on abnormal leucocyte sodium transport in essential hypertension	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	genetic markers in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Spontaneously hypertensive rats, genetic markers.
17	sodium status and the renin angiotensin aldosterone system in compensated liver disease	Sodium status and renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone in compensated liver.
17	changing sodium intake in children the minneapolis children s blood pressure study	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
17	severe hypertension hyperkalemia and renal tubular acidosis responding to dietary sodium restriction	Severe hypertension and sodium-restricted renal tubular acidosis.
17	angiotensin i ii and iii in sheep a model of angiotensin production and metabolism	In sheep, l' angiotensin iii and iii is a model of the production and metabolism of l' angiotensin.
17	a comparison of the effects of prostaglandins e2 and i2 on renal function and renin release in salt loaded and salt depleted anaesthetized dogs	Comparison of the effects of e2 and i2 prostaglandins on renal function and renin release in salt- and salt-anesthetized dogs.
17	the renin aldosterone profile in hypertension	In addition, there are no data available for this study.
17	angiotensin induced sodium excretion patterns in cirrhosis role of renal prostaglandins	In addition, there was a significant increase in the incidence of renal prostaglandin in rats.
17	light dependent delta ph and membrane potential changes in halobacterial vesicles coupled to sodium transport	Changes in the light- and membrane-dependent delta ph potential of sodium transport-coupled halobacterial vesicles.
17	pediatric aspects of essential hypertension	It's a good way to learn more about a person's health.
17	cardiovascular effects of chronic intraventricular administration of angiotensin ii in dogs	Cardiovascular effects of apos; chronic intraventricular administration of apos; and angiotensin II therapy in dogs.
17	dexamethasone hypertension in rats	Rat dexamethasone hypertension.
17	dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone secretion	Dopaminergic modification of apos; aldosterone secretion.
17	urinary excretion of calcium following an oral calcium loading test in healthy children	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
17	transfer of urea sodium and chloride across the perfused human placenta	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of infection.
17	amino acid dependent sodium transport in plasma membrane vesicles from rat liver	The amino acid-dependent transport of sodium in the plasma membrane vesicles of rat liver.
17	effects of acth on the zona glomerulosa of sodium loaded timolol maleate treated rats stereology and plasma hormone concentrations	Effects of apo; acth on glomerular area of rats treated with stereologically loaded sodium timol maleate and concentrations of apo; plasma hormones.
17	plasma cryoactivated renin and active renin in diabetes mellitus	Plasma cryoactivation of renin and renin was found to be active in diabetes mellitus.
17	reversible acute renal failure from combined triamterene and indomethacin a study in healthy subjects	Acute, reversible renal failure due to a combination of triamterene and d' indomethacin, studied in healthy subjects.
17	urine dopamine in normal and hypertensive pregnancies	Urinary Dopamine in Normal Pregnancy and Hypertensive Pregnancy.
17	hormonal contraception and hypertension	Hormonal contraceptive use and high blood pressure.
17	evidence for a raised concentration of a circulating sodium transport inhibitor in essential hypertension	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
17	long term effects of captopril on cellular sodium content and mechanical properties of aortic smooth muscle from spontaneously hypertensive rats	Long-term effects of captopril on the cellular sodium content and mechanical properties of the aortic smooth muscle of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	synthesis and migration of proteins and glycoproteins in juxtaglomerular cells of sodium deficient rats an ultrastructural radioautographic study	Protein and glycoprotein synthesis and migration in juxtaglomerular cells from sodium-deficient rats were studied by ultrastructural radioautography.
17	an increase in a circulating inhibitor of na k dependent atpase a possible link between salt intake and the development of essential hypertension	An increase in diabetes; circulating inhibitor; insulin-dependent apase, a possible link between apos; salt absorption and development; essential hypertension.
17	exaggerated fractional sodium excretion in hypertension with advanced renal disease the role of renal prostaglandin and kallikrein	Sodium excretion exaggerated fractionated in the apos; hypertension with renal disease advanced the role of prostaglandins renal and kallikreins.
17	effect of sodium intake on brain angiotensin converting enzyme activity in spontaneously hypertensive rat	Effect of sodium intake on the conversion of brain angiotensin to the enzyme activity in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	clonidine and lidamidine whr 1142 stimulate sodium and chloride absorption in the rabbit intestine	Clonidine and lidamidine whr 1142 stimulate the absorption of sodium and chloride in the intestines of rabbits.
17	acute hypertension in a nonhuman primate humoral and hemodynamic mechanisms	Acute hypertension in both the humoral and the hemodynamic mechanisms of a non-human primate.
17	physiological and pharmacological dialysate sodium concentrations	Sodium concentrations in pharmacological and physiological dialysates.
17	effect of av3v lesions on development of doca salt hypertension and vascular na pump activity	Effects of av3v lesions on the development of the apos; hypertension by the salt doca and the apos; activity of the na vascular pump.
17	effects of chronic sodium depletion on canine brain renin and cathepsin d activities	In addition, there is an increased risk of death due to the use of a combination of drugs.
17	the role of calcium in the control of renin release	The Role of Calcium in Controlling Renin Release.
17	abnormalities of sodium and h2o handling in chronic obstructive lung disease	Abnormalities in Sodium and H2O Handling in Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease.
17	responses of active and inactive plasma renin and changes in urinary kallikrein and plasma prekallikrein to various conditions in normal subjects	Active and inactive plasma renin and urinary kallikrein and plasma prkallikrein responses under various conditions in normal subjects.
17	determination of the equilibrium dissociation constants and number of glycine binding sites in several areas of the rat central nervous system using a sodium independent system	Determination of dissociation constants at apos; equilibrium and number of sites of glycine binding in several regions of the central nervous system of the rat using a sodium-independent system.
17	influence of the renin angiotensin system in the renal haemodynamic responses to modest renal nerve stimulation in the rat	L' influence of the l&apos system; renin angiotensin in rat renal hemodynamic responses to modest renal nerve stimulation.
17	sodium efflux in rabbit myocardium relationship to sodium calcium exchange	Sodium efflux in the myocardial relationship of rabbit to apos; exchange of sodium calcium.
17	inter relationship of sympathetic nervous system and renin angiotensin aldosterone system in three renin subgroups of borderline and persistent essential hypertension	Sympathetic nervous system to aldosterone system of apos; renin angiotensin in three under @-@apos renin groups; limiting and persistent essential hypertension.
17	a case of normoreninemic normotensive primary aldosteronism associated with essential hypertension and nephrocalcinosis	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of coronary heart disease.
17	sodium channel sodium pump and sodium calcium exchange activities in synaptosomal plasma membrane vesicles	Sodium pump of the sodium channel and activities of d' exchange of sodium calcium in the plasma membrane vesicles of the synaptosomal.
17	characteristics of calcium and sodium transport in the synaptosomes and subsynaptosomal structures of the brain of spontaneously hypertensive rats	Characteristics of sodium and calcium transport in synaptosomes and structures under-ynaptosomal in brain of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the effect of dietary sodium on the blood pressure response to dopamine infusion in the conscious rat	The effect of dietary sodium on the response of blood pressure to the infusion of dopamine in the conscious rat.
17	attenuated pressure natriuresis in hypertensive rats	Mild pressure Natriuresis in Hypertensive Rats.
17	volume and vasoconstriction in experimental renovascular hypertension	Journal of Infection and Immunity, Vol.
17	the role of urinary pge2 and renin angiotensin aldosterone system in the pathogenesis of essential hypertension	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
17	effects of a nonpressor analogue of vasopressin on plasma renin activity and salt and water excretion in water loaded anesthetized dogs	The effects of vasopressin, a non-pressurized analog of vasopressin, on apos, plasma renin activity, and excretion of apos, water in apos, and anesthetized dogs.
17	exchangeable sodium in rats with goldblatt two kidney one clip hypertension	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Intakes.
17	renal function and sympathetic activity during mental stress in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal function and l' mental stress sympathetic activity in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	whole body measurements of sodium turnover in offspring of patients with sustained essential hypertension	Sodium turnover rate in apo; whole organism in progeny of patients with apo; sustained essential hypertension.
17	formation and activation of renin in vivo	In vivo renin formation and activation.
17	plasma active and inactive renin and urinary kallikrein in normal subjects in response to hydrochlorothiazide spironolactone or aldosterone administration	In addition to the above, there is a need for additional information on the use of renin in normal subjects in response to apos; hydrochlorothiazide spironolactone or d' aldosterone.
17	gastric potential difference a reliable index of mucosal integrity	Difference in gastric potential is a reliable indicator of the mucosal integrity.
17	changes in the rate of dopamine synthesis in the posterior pituitary during dehydration and rehydration relationship to plasma sodium concentrations	Changes in dopamine synthesis rate in the posterior pituitary during the relationship between dehydration and rehydration and plasma sodium concentrations.
17	use of captopril to estimate renin angiotensin aldosterone activity in the pathophysiology of chronic heart failure	Use of captopril to estimate apos; apos activity; aldosterone from apos; renin angiotensin in apos pathophysiology; chronic cardiac failure.
17	calcium and renin release inhibition of low sodium induced renin secretion by high calcium concentration in rat kidney perfusion	Calcium and renin inhibition of renin secretion induced by a high concentration of calcium in the renal perfusion of the rat induced a low renin secretion.
17	hydroosmotic response of collecting tubules to adh or camp at reduced peritubular sodium	In addition to the above, there is a small amount of sodium that can be absorbed by the body.
17	evidence for coupled sodium hydrogen exchange in the rat superficial proximal convoluted tubule	Evidence of a coupled exchange of sodium hydrogen in the circumvented proximal superficial tubule of the rat.
17	study of sodium bromide in human volunteers with special emphasis on the endocrine system	Sodium bromide is a substance that can be used to treat a variety of chronic conditions.
17	the problem of sodium metabolism in chronic kidney failure	The Problem of Sodium Metabolism in Patients; Chronic Renal Failure.
17	sodium and chloride transport in the isolated intestine of the earthworm lumbricus terrestris l	Transport of sodium and chloride into the intestine isolated from earthworm Lumbricus terrestris l.
17	sodium retention in rats with cadmium induced hypertension	Sodium retention in cadmium-treated rats induced hypertension.
17	renal response to angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition	Reaction of the kidney to apos; inhibition of the apos; conversion enzyme of the apos; angiotensin.
17	catecholamines sodium and renin in unilateral renal hypertension in man	Sodium and renin catecholamines in the kidney; hypertension in the kidney.
17	trimethaphan induced hypotension effect on renal function	There was a hypotensive effect of trimethaphane on renal function.
17	transport of beta hydroxy beta methyl glutarate and beta hydroxbutyrate by renal brushborder membrane vesicles	Beta-hydroxy beta-methyl glutarate and beta-hydroxbutyrate transport through brush border membrane vesicles.
17	actions of angiotensin ii on the isolated spontaneously hypertensive rat kidney	L' action of l' angiotensin II on the isolated rat spontaneously hypertensive kidney was also demonstrated.
17	role of prostaglandins in the aldosterone response to acth in sodium depleted human subjects	Prostaglandins' role in the response of aldosterone to apos; acth in human subjects has diminished.
17	role of the renin angiotensin aldosterone and kallikrein kinin systems in the control of fluid and electrolyte metabolism renal function and arterial blood pressure	Role of Renin Systems-Angiotensin-aldosterone and Kallikrein-Kinine in the Control of Renal Function and Arterial Blood Pressure.
17	angiotensin production and metabolism in sheep	Production and metabolism of apos; and angiotensin in sheep.
17	the renin angiotensin system and hypertension	The Angiotensin Renin System and Lapses; High Blood Pressure.
17	modification of nerve membrane sodium channels by the insecticide pyrethroids	Nerve membrane sodium channel modification by the pyrethroid insecticide.
17	a method for determination of human urinary inactive kallikrein prekallikrein	Determination of inactive human kallikrein in urine.
17	hormones salt hypertension and the interstitium is the interstitium the missing link	Hormones are saline, hypertension and hypertension, and interstium is the apos; interstium is the missing link.
17	45ca fluxes in isolated toad bladder epithelial cells effects of agents which alter water or sodium transport	Fluxes of 45ca in isolated epithelial cells from the bladder of the toad affect the effects of agents that modify the transport of l' water or sodium.
17	effect of chronic and acute changes in sodium balance on the urinary excretion of prostaglandins e2 and f2 alpha in patients with essential hypertension	Effect of chronic and acute changes in apo; sodium balance on apo; urinary prostaglandin e2 and f2 alpha excretion in patients with apo; essential hypertension.
17	is the renin angiotensin aldosterone system involved in the sodium retention in the nephrotic syndrome	Sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome is implicated by the renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone.
17	effect of sodium concentration and plasma sugar concentration on hexose absorption by the rat jejunum in vivo further evidence of two transport mechanisms	Sodium concentration and plasma sugar concentration effects on apos; absorption of apos; hexose by rat jejunum in vivo confirm the existence of two transport mechanisms.
17	blood pressure plasma osmolarity and oedema in pregnancy	Blood pressure edema and plasma osmolality during pregnancy.
17	water and sodium excretion in unilaterally denervated normal and sodium depleted anesthetized rats before and after plasma volume repletion	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, and that it is not possible to conclude that there is a causal link between the effects of sodium on the immune system.
17	effect of forebrain lesions on response to chronic intraventricular angiotensin ii	Effect of Previous Brain Damage on Response to Chronic Intraventricular Angiotensin ii.
17	sodium retention and salt appetite following deoxycorticosterone in hamsters	Department of National Health and Welfare, Department of Health and Welfare.
17	estimating dietary sodium intake in individuals receiving a randomly fluctuating intake	Estimation of intake of dietary sodium by randomized individuals.
17	dietary sodium restriction for mild hypertension in general practice	Journal of Infectious Diseases 1996; 7(1): 7-11.
17	ultrastructure of the perfused rat epididymis effect of luminal sodium ion concentration	Health and Welfare Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
17	two techniques to improve adherence to dietary sodium restriction in the treatment of hypertension	Two techniques to improve appetite; adherence to dietary sodium restriction; hypertension.
17	transmembrane na and ca2 electrochemical gradients in cardiac muscle and their relationship to force development	Transmembrane n and ca2 cardiac muscle electrochemical gradients and their relation to force development.
17	enhancement of calcium current during digitalis inotropy in mammalian heart positive feed back regulation by intracellular calcium	Increased calcium current during the apos; inotropy of digitalin in the positive mammalian heart, versus-regulation by intracellular calcium.
17	dopaminergic modulation of aldosterone responsiveness to angiotensin ii with changes in sodium intake	Dopaminergic modulation of the reactivity of the apos; aldosterone to the apos; angiotensin ii with variations of the apos; absorption of sodium.
17	renal function in cystic fibrosis with special reference to the renal sodium handling	Renal Function in Cystic Fibrosis, especially in the Handling of Renal Sodium.
17	sodium balance during development of hypertension in the spontaneously hypertensive rat shr	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that high blood pressure may be associated with hypertension.
17	effects of dietary sodium on brain angiotensin ii receptors in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effects of Dietary Sodium on Lapos Receptors; Brain Angiotensin ii in Spontaneously Hypertensive Rats.
17	renal structural and functional changes and sodium balance in hypothyroid rats	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	respiration and sodium transport in rabbit urinary bladder	Respiration and rabbit bladder sodium transport.
17	molecular action of aldosterone	Molecular action of l-apos; aldosterone.
17	the effect of dialysate sodium concentration on body fluid compartment volume plasma renin activity and plasma aldosterone concentration in chronic hemodialysis patients	The effect of sodium dialysate concentration on renin plasma volume and aldosterone plasma volume in chronic hemodialysis patients.
17	effect of sodium gradient on calcium uptake by plasma membranes of the myometrium	The effect of the sodium gradient on myometrial plasma membrane calcium uptake.
17	role of renin angiotensin system in glucocorticoid hypertension in rats	The Role of the Apos System; Angiotensin Renin in Apos; Glucocorticoid Hypertension in Rats.
17	evidence that some mechanism other than the renin system causes sodium retention in nephrotic syndrome	The evidence suggests that a mechanism other than the renal system causes the retention of sodium in the nephrotic syndrome.
17	remodeling of the rat aortic endothelial layer during experimental hypertension changes in replication rate cell density and surface morphology	Endothelial layer remodeling of rat aorta during changes in apo; experimental hypertension in cell density of replication rate and surface morphology.
17	influence of sodium on the alpha 2 adrenergic receptor system of human platelets role for intraplatelet sodium in receptor binding	L' the influence of sodium on the human platelet alpha-2 adrenergic receptor system plays a role in the binding of intraplatelet sodium to the receptor.
17	prevention of malignant hypertension in salt loaded s dahl rats with the calcium antagonist nifedipine	Prevention of Lapos; Malignant Hypertension in Sahelian Rats with Lapos; Nifedipine Calcium Antagonist.
17	exchangeable sodium plasma renin activity and blood pressure changes during the development of 2 kidney 1 clip hypertension and after subsequent contralateral nephrectomy	L' exchangeable plasma sodium renin activity and changes in blood pressure during development of l' hypertension by 2 renal clips 1 and after a subsequent contralateral nephrectomy.
17	intracellular na and ca2 activities in aortic smooth muscle cells from spontaneously hypertensive rats	Intracellular Na and Ca2 activity in spontaneously hypertensive rat aortic smooth muscle cells.
17	effects of angiotensin ii on the zona glomerulosa of sodium loaded dexamethasone treated rats administered or not with maintenance doses of acth stereology and plasma hormone concentrations	Apos; angiotensin ii effects on the glomerular area of dexamethasone-treated rats with or without maintenance doses of apos; acth and plasma concentrations of apos; hormones.
17	rate of action of anemonia sulcata toxin ii on sodium channels in myelinated nerve fibres	Anemia is a disease of the nervous system caused by the presence of the toxin and by the presence of anemia.
17	effect of sodium intake on biosynthesis of renin	Sodium absorption on renin biosynthesis.
17	the role of the cellular sodium pump in human granulopoiesis in vitro	The Role of the Cellular Sodium Pump in Human Granulopoiesis in vitro.
17	chronology of the sodium hypothesis and hypertension	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre study.
17	dietary sodium and essential hypertension some myths hopes and truths	Food Sodium and Lapos; high blood pressure is essential to the development of certain myths of hope and truth.
17	the sodium currents of nerve under voltage clamp as heterogeneous kinetics a model that is consistent with possible kinetic behavior	Sodium currents under tension clamp as a heterogeneous kinetic model compatible with possible kinetic behavior.
17	sodium and chloride transport across the isolated rabbit ciliary body	Sodium chloride transport through the isolated ciliary body of the rabbit.
17	active and inactive renin release from rabbit kidney cortex slices effect of sodium concentration and of furosemide	Renin release by rabbit renal cortex, effect of sodium concentration and furosemide on thin slices of renal cortex.
17	sodium needs of infants and children with ileostomy	Sodium requirements for infants and ileostomized children.
17	the feedback regulation of angiotensinogen production by components of the renin angiotensin system	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: 1.
17	effects of renal sympathectomy on sodium and water excretion in stroke prone spontaneously hypertensive rats	Effect of renal sympathectomy on vascular function; excretion of sodium and water in spontaneously hypertensive rats who are prone to stroke.
17	contrasting renal effects of different antihypertensive agents in hypertensive rats with bilaterally constricted renal arteries	Comparison of the renal effects of different antihypertensives in hypertensive rats that have undergone bilateral constriction of the renal arteries.
17	interactions of cocaine and cocaine congeners with sodium channels	Cocaine and cocaine congener sodium channel interactions.
17	olfactory contributions to dehydration induced anorexia in weanling rats	Anorexia was induced by the olfactory contribution to dehydration in weaned rats.
17	sodium neural interactions in the development of spontaneous hypertension	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
17	plasma catecholamines and cardiovascular responses during converting enzyme inhibition in normotensive and hypertensive man	Cardiovascular responses during apo; inhibition of the conversion enzymes in the apo; normotensive and hypertensive man.
17	dietary sodium and renal alpha 2 adrenergic receptors in dahl hypertensive rats	Adrenergic receptors alpha 2 renal and dietary sodium in hypertensive dahl rats.
17	natriuresis and renal na k atpase activity in kidneys of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats	Renal na k atpase natriuresis and activity in normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rat kidneys.
17	the relation of genetics to essential hypertension a review	The Relationship Between Genetics and Essential High Blood Pressure.
17	estrogens and hypertension	He's got estrogen and high blood pressure.
17	effect of anteroventral third ventricle lesions on vascular sodium pump activity in two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Effect of preventral lesions of the third ventricle on the apos; activity of the vascular sodium pump in the apos; hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	stimulation of aldosterone biosynthesis by sodium sequestration role of angiotensin ii	Sodium sequestration of apos; aldosterone; angiotensin ii.
17	reduced ratio of active to total urinary kallikrein in essential hypertension	Active to total urinary kallikrein ratio reduced in apo; essential hypertension.
17	urinary prostaglandin e2 and kallikrein excretion in glucocorticoid hypertension in rats	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of coronary artery disease.
17	renal vasoconstrictive response to contrast medium the role of sodium balance and the renin angiotensin system	Renal vasoconstrictive response to contrast medium, role of the apos; balance of the sodium and the system of the apos; angiotensin renin.
17	relations between the renin angiotensin aldosterone system and urinary elimination of sodium study of healthy subjects in clinostatism and on a sodium free diet	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications/publications_e.html.
17	changes in plasma sodium concentration in women at the menopause	Changes in the concentration of sodium in the plasma of postmenopausal women.
17	pathologic effects in rodents exposed to sodium combustion products	Health Effects of Sodium Exposure to Sodium Combustion Products.
17	effect of sodium deficiency on beta melanocyte stimulating hormone stimulation of aldosterone in isolated rat adrenal cells	Sodium deficiency affects apo-stimulation of apo-aldosterone; apo-aldosterone; beta-enhancing hormone-melanocytes in isolated rat adrenal cells.
17	modulated anticonvulsant block of sodium channels in nerve and muscle	Anticonvulsant modulable sodium channel block in nerves and muscles.
17	changes of alanine sodium co transport during maturation of xenopus laevis oocytes	Changes in the transport of sodium alanine during the maturation of oocytes from xenopus laevis.
17	dopaminergic blockade of the renin angiotensin aldosterone system effect of high and low sodium intakes	Dopaminergic blockade of l' effect of renin system-angiotensin-aldosterone from low and high sodium intakes on renin system-aldosterone.
17	reversal of renovascular hypertension	Reproductive hypertension-vascular.
17	inhibition of guinea pig renal na k atpase by normotensive human plasma effects of a high sodium diet	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of diets, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
17	responses to furosemide in normotensive and hypertensive subjects	American Journal of Public Health, 3rd edition.
17	decrease of angiotensin sensitivity after bed rest and strongly sodium restricted diet in pregnancy	Decreased sensitivity to angiotensin following bed rest and a markedly reduced sodium diet during pregnancy.
17	interaction of renal beta 1 adrenoceptors and prostaglandins in reflex renin release	Renal beta-1 adrenoceptor interaction with prostaglandins in the release of reflex renin.
17	further observations of aldosterone response in barnacle muscle fibers	D' other observations of the response to aldosterone in the muscle fibers of the barnacle were made.
17	the renin angiotensin system and drinking in the euryhaline flounder platichthys flesus	The renin system angiotensin and drink from the pleatic euryhaline platichthys flesus platichthys platichthys flesus.
17	structural and functional studies of the adrenal zona glomerulosa in sodium depleted and sodium loaded sheep	Adrenal glomerularular zone structural and functional studies in sodium-depleted and sodium-loaded sheep.
17	metabolic regulation of apical sodium permeability in toad urinary bladder in the presence and absence of aldosterone	Metabolic regulation of the apical permeability to sodium in the bladder of toads in the presence and absence of aldosterone.
17	effects of tibalosine a new alpha adrenoceptor antagonist in essential hypertension	Tibalosin effects, a novel alpha-adrenoceptor antagonist, on apos; essential hypertension.
17	precursors of hypertension a review	The warning signs of high blood pressure were examined.
17	renal function in pregnant rats with two kidney goldblatt hypertension	Renal functions in Apos-affected pregnant rats; hypertension of two Goldblatt kidneys.
17	chemical renal medullectomy and experimental hypertension	Chemical renal and experimental hypertension.
17	aldosterone response to renin angiotensin acth hemorrhage and sodium depletion in a freshwater teleost catostomus macrocheilus	Dietary Reference Intakes (DRIs) in the United States and the United States, 1990–1999 and 1990–1994 and 1990–1996–1994 and 1990–1996–1996–1994 data.
17	defect in the sodium modulated tissue responsiveness to angiotensin ii in essential hypertension	Failure of sodium-modulated tissue reactivity to apos; angiotensin II reactivity in apos; essential hypertension.
17	comparison of sodium and urea as indicators of pulmonary vascular permeability	Sodium and urea were compared as indicators of pulmonary vascular permeability.
17	intracellular na and ca2 in aortic smooth muscle cells after enzymatic isolation in spontaneously hypertensive rats	Intracellular Ca2 and Na in aortic smooth muscle cells following enzyme isolation from spontaneously hypertensive rats.
17	the influence of cytoplasmic sodium concentration on the stoichiometry of the sodium pump	Sodium pumps are designed to be used as a catalyst for the formation of sodium ions.
17	canine neonatally induced coarctation hypertension in the second year variably hyperresponsive plasma renin activity	In the second year of the study, there was a significant increase in the number of cases of neonatal canine hypertension; plasma renin activity was found to be variable.
17	sodium chloride transport in the medullary thick ascending limb of henle s loop evidence for a sodium chloride cotransport system in plasma membrane vesicles	The transport of sodium chloride in the thick, medullary ascending limb of the hen loop indicates the existence of a system of cotransport of sodium chloride in the vesicles of the plasma membrane.
17	dogs with experimental cirrhosis of the liver but without intrahepatic hypertension do not retain sodium or form ascites	Dogs with experimental liver cirrhosis, but without intrahepatic hypertension, do not retain sodium and do not form ascites.
17	the effect of sodium intake on the blood pressure related to age and sex	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the risk of heart disease.
18	biometric study of spleen and liver weights in africans and europeans with special reference to endemic malaria	Biometric study of liver and spleen weights in Africans and Europeans, particularly with respect to endemic malaria.
18	spleens and holoendemic malaria in west new guinea	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
18	a study of the structure of splenic sinuses in man and in the albino rat with the light microscope and the electron microscope	Splenic sinus structure in male and albino rats under light and electron microscopy.
18	splenectomy in blood dyscrasia	Blood dyscrasia splenectomy.
18	intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen i reduced diphosphopyridine nucleotide cytochrome c reductase cytochrome c oxidase and succinic dehydrogenase in the rat and guinea pig	Intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen i reduced cytochrome c oxidase diphosphopyridine nucleotide c reductase and rat and guinea pig succinic dehydrogenase.
18	method for the study of antigenicity of homologous whole spleen cells in mice	This method is based on the results of a randomized controlled trial.
18	studies on the adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxins on antibody formation iii histologic response of the rabbit spleen to a single injection of a purified protein antigen	Apo studies; adjuvant action of bacterial endotoxins on protein formation; antibody iii histological response of rabbit spleen to single injection of apo; purified protein antigen.
18	studies on the runting syndrome in newborn mice	Mice Racing Syndrome Studies new-nées.
18	the cardio active principle in spleen	Cardio principle-active spleen.
18	intracellular localization of enzymes in spleen ii some properties and the distribution of ribonuclease in rat spleen	Intracellular enzyme localization in the spleen ii certain properties and ribonuclease distribution in the rat spleen.
18	the site of synthesis of the 19s gamma globulins in dysgammaglobulinemia	Nineteen-year-old gamma globulin synthesis site in dysgammaglobulinemia.
18	an action of 5 hydroxytryptamine on adrenaline receptors	A 5-hydroxytryptamine action on d' adrenaline receptors.
18	humoral aspects of the immune response to homografts ii relationship between the hemagglutinating and cytotoxic activities of certain isoimmune sera	Humoral Aspects of Immune Response to Homografts ii relationship between cytotoxic and hemagglutinating activities of certain isoimmune sera.
18	role of the thymus in immune ractions in rats i the immunologic response to bovine serum albumin antibody formation arthus reactivity and delayed hypersensitivity in rats thymectomized or splenectomized at various times after birth	The Role of Thymus in Immune Response in Rats The immunological response to antibody formation; bovine serum albumin; responsiveness to l' arthus and l' delayed hypersensitivity in thymectomized or splenectomized rats at various times after birth.
18	gamma globulin and antibody formation in vitro iii induction of secondary response at different intervals after the primary the role of secondary nodules in the preparation for the secondary response	Gamma globulin and d&apos formation; antibody in vitro iii secondary response induction at different intervals after primary the role of secondary nodules in secondary response preparation.
18	the role of liver and spleen in the metabolism of intravenously injected fat in rabbits	The Role of Liver and Spleen in Intravenous Fat Metabolism in Rabbits.
18	actions of bretylium and guanethidine on the uptake and release of 3h noradrenaline	Effects of Bretylium and Guanethidine on Apos; absorption and release of 3 h of noradrenaline.
18	plasma protein formation in vitro by tissues from mice infected with staphylococci	Plasma protein formation by staphylococcal infected mouse tissue in vitro.
18	passive transfer of transplantation immunity i tritiated lymphoid cells ii lymphoid cells in millipore chambers	In vitro fertilization is the process of fertilization, which can be carried out by fertilization or by fertilization.
18	homograft tolerance in mice use of urethan and sublethal irradiation	Mouse homografts are tolerant to both urethane and apo; sublethal irradiation.
18	immunological unresponsiveness to sensitization with simple chemical compounds a search for antibody absorbing depots of allergen	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to suggest that the immune system is not immune to sensitization with simple chemicals.
18	the lymphod tissues and immune responses of neonatally thymectomized mice bearing thymus tissue in millipore diffusion chambers	Lymphoid tissue and immune responses in new-born, thymectomized mice carrying thymus in millipore scattering chambers.
18	antibody plaque formation by normal mouse spleen cell cultures exposed in vitro to rna from immune mice	Formation of plaques; antibody by spleen cell cultures of normal mice exposed in vitro to immune mouse rna.
18	immunity and susceptibility toward cheek pouch transplants of a mouse leukemia	In addition, there is an increased risk of cervical cancer.
18	pigment deposition in viscera associated with prolonged chlorpromazine therapy	Long-term chlorpromazine therapy resulted in pigment deposition in the viscera.
18	spleen colony formation in anemic mice of genotype ww	Formation of spleen colonies in anemic ww-genotype mice.
18	culture of the cytopathic area surrounding virulent cells of bacillus anthracis in mouse spleen	Culture of the cytopathic region surrounding the virulent bacillus anthracis cells in the mouse spleen.
18	immune mechanisms in parabiosis intoxication	Parabiosis intoxication.
18	the regeneration of f1 host cell spleen and thymus at ectopic sites in f1 animals induced by implantation of parental spleen and thymus	Spleen and thymus regeneration of f1 cell; ectopic site host in f1 animals; implantation of the spleen and parental thymus.
18	production of immunological tolerance in mice after repeated injections of disrupted spleen cells	Immunological tolerance in mice following repeated injections of disturbed spleen cells.
18	major urinary protein complex of normal mice origin	Major protein complex urinary d' normal mouse origin.
18	long term isolation stress in rats	D&apos stress; long-term rat isolation.
18	malignant lymphomas following allogenic disease transition from an immunological to a neoplastic disorder	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
18	experimental runt disease in mice caused by salmonella typhimurium var copenhagen	Salmonella typhimurium var copenhagen experimental mouse disease; avorton.
18	transplantation tolerance induced in adult mice by protein overloading of donors	Tolerance to adult mouse transplantation induced by donor protein overload.
18	passive transfer of adjuvant arthritis by lymph node or spleen cells	Acute and chronic inflammation of the lymph nodes or the spleen.
18	congenital anomalies induced in hamster embryos with h 1 virus	Induced congenital abnormalities in embryos of hamster carriers of the h1 virus.
18	further studies of the stimulation of dna synthesis in cultures of spleen cell suspensions by homologous cells in inbred strains of mice and rats	D' other studies on stimulation of cell synthesis; DNA in mouse and rat inbred lines in spleen cell suspension cultures by homologous cells.
18	immunologic incompetence of immunologically runted animals	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the disease.
18	the differing survival of normal and sensitized spleen cells transferred to allogeneic hosts	Difference in survival between sensitized and normal spleen cells was transferred to allogeneic hosts.
18	studies on antigenicity the relationship between in vivo and in vitro enzymatic degradability of hapten polylysine conjugates and their antigenicities in guinea pigs	The relationship between the in vivo and in vitro enzymatic degradability of the polylysine conjugates d' haptene and their antigenicity in the guinea pig.
18	studies on the mechanism of action of riley virus 3 replication of riley s plasma enzyme elevating virus in vitro	Studies on the mechanism of riley virus 3 replication by riley plasma enzyme, riley virus 3 replication, and riley plasma enzyme increase the virus in vitro.
18	production of runt disease in tolerant mice by the injection of syngeneic lymphoid cells	Production of avorton in disease-tolerant mice; syngenic lymphoid cell injection.
18	cellular localization of immunoglobulins with different allotypic specificities in rabbit lymphoid tissues	Cellular localization of d' immunoglobulins with different specificities in lymphoid tissues of rabbits.
18	the interaction of donor and host lymphoid cells in the pathogenesis of renal cortical destruction induced by a local graft versus host reaction	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the immune system and to the development of the immune system.
18	in vitro studies on radiation lymphoid recovery of mouse spleen	In Vitro Lymphoid Recovery Studies by Irradiation of the Mouse Spleen.
18	antibody formation in vitro by separated spleen cells inhibition by actinomycin or chloramphenicol	In vitro antibody by inhibition of splenic cells separated by apos; actinomycin or chloramphenicol.
18	delta aminolevulinate dehydratase activity in mice with hereditary anemia	Dietary Reference Intakes for Dietary Reference Intakes.
18	the intracellular localization of pituitary thyrotropic hormone	Intracellular localization of the pituitary thyrotropic hormone.
18	the mechanism of the pressor responses to physostigmine in the rat and their modification by mebutamate and amylobarbitone	The mechanism of pressor responses to rat physostigmine and their modification by rat mebutamate and amylobarbitone.
18	spleen as a production site for erythropoietin	Erythropoietin production site.
18	antibody synthesizing cells appearance after secondary antigenic stimulation in vitro	An antibody synthesizing the apos; appearance of cells after in vitro secondary antigenic stimulation.
18	template activity of rna from antibody producing tissues	Apos model; production tissue rna activity; antibodies.
18	the release of specific bactericidal antibodies by endotoxin	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	correlation of succinate metabolism and virulence in salmonella typhimurium	Succinate metabolism correlates with virulence in Salmonella typhimurium.
18	primary macroglobulinemia death due to mesenteric vascular occlusion with gas in the portal venous system	Died of primary macroglobulinemia due to gas-filled mesenteric vascular occlusion in portal venous system.
18	humoral and cellular aspects of the immune response to the somatic antigen of salmonella enteritidis	Humoral and cellular aspects of immune response to somatic Salmonella enteritidis antigen.
18	homograft immunity in pregnancy the placental transfer of cytotoxic antibody in rabbits	Cytotoxic antibody placental transfer in rabbits is homograft immunity during pregnancy.
18	the survival of pasteurella pestis in materials preserved by solid carbon dioxide dry ice	The survival of pasteurella pestis in carbon dioxide-preserved, dry ice-covered materials.
18	an electron microscope study of lymphatic tissue in runt disease	An electronic microscopic study of the lymphatic tissue in the disease of l'apos; avorton.
18	hog cholera 3 investigation of the complement fixation test for the detection of the virus in swine tissue	Swine cholera research 3 on complement fixation testing for virus detection in swine tissue.
18	antibody synthesis at the cellular level antibody induced suppression of 19s and 7s antibody response	The synthesis of antibodies at the cellular level induced suppression of the response of antibodies 19s and 7s.
18	stimulation of nonspecific resistance to infection by a crude cell wall preparation from mycobacterium phlei	Non-specific resistance to apos stimulation; infection by rudimentary mycobacterium phlei cell wall preparation.
18	autoimmune disease in nzb bl mice 3 induction of membranous glomerulonephritis in young mice by the transplantation of spleen cells from old mice	Auto illness-immune in nzb bl 3 mice induction of d' membrane glomerulonephritis in young mice via splenic cell transplantation in aged mice.
18	antibody production by cells in tissue culture i morphological evolution of lymph node and spleen cells in culture	The results of this study are consistent with the findings of a recent study by the Canadian Cancer Society.
18	antibody production by cells in tissue culture ii qualitative and quantitative aspects of antibody production local hemolysis in gum by cells obtained from long term culture	Antibody production by tissue cultured cells ii qualitative and quantitative aspects of tissue production; local hemolytic antibody in gum from tissue cultured cells; long-term culture.
18	the effects of antigens and of phytohemagglutinin on rabbit spleen cell suspensions	Effects of phytohemagglutinin and antigens on cell suspensions of the rabbit spleen.
18	chronic infection of rodents by machupo virus	Chronic rodent infection with menupo virus.
18	heat labile antigens of salmonella enteritidis ii mouse protection studies	Salmonella enteritidis heat-labile antigens ii protective studies in mice.
18	metabolic characterization of the genus brucella v relationship of strain oxidation rate of i erythritol to strain virulence for guinea pigs	Metabolic characterization of the relationship between the genus and the rate of apos; oxidation of the apos; erythritol and virulence of the strain in guinea pigs.
18	homograft target cells contact destruction in vitro by immune macrophages	The target cell(s) of these homografts are destroyed by in vitro contact with immune macrophages.
18	granulocytosis promoting extract of mouse tumor tissue partial purification	Tumor tissue extract from partially purified mouse.
18	lymphoma growth in vivo electronic discrimination between tumor and stroma cells	Growth of lymphoma in vivo electron discrimination between the tumor cells and the cells of the stroma.
18	antibody synthesis initiated in vitro by paired explants of spleen and thymus	Antibody synthesis was initiated by matched thymus and spleen explants in vitro.
18	immunological competence alteration by whole body x irradiation and shielding of selected lymphoid tissues	Alteration of immunological competence by whole-body irradiation and by some lymphoid tissue shielding.
18	increased incidence of lymphoma after injections of mice with cells differing at weak histocompatibility loci	Increased post-apos lymphoma incidence; injection into mice of different cells at locus d' low histocompatibility.
18	immunization against rauscher mouse leukemia with tissue culture material	Immunization against leukemia in mice; use of equipment for tissue culture.
18	antagonistic effects of humoral isoantibodies on the in vitro cytotoxicity of immune lymphoid cells	Antagonistic effects of humoral isoantibodies on immune lymphoid cell cytotoxicity in vitro.
18	autoimmune disease in nzb bl mice i pathology and pathogenesis of a model system of spontaneous glomerulonephritis	Auto disease-immune in nzb mice bl bl bl o n pathology and pathogenesis; a spontaneous glomerulonephritis model system.
18	electron microscopy of listeria monocytogenes infected mouse spleen	Electron microscopy of Listeria monocytogenes virus infected the mouse spleen.
18	quantitative studies of the adoptive immunological memory in mice i an age dependent barrier to syngeneic transplantation	Quantitative studies of adoptive immune memory in mouse apo-dependent barrier; age of syngene transplant.
18	ontogeny of the immune response i the development of the follicular antigen trapping mechanism	It is important to recognize that the immune system is not immune to the immune system but rather to the immune system.
18	effect of pyridoxine deficiency on nucleic acid metabolism in the rat	Apos effect; pyridoxine deficiency on rat nucleic acid metabolism.
18	two cases of clostridial hepatitis	Clostridial hepatitis.
18	lysosomes in lymphoid tissue i the measurement of hydrolytic activities in whole homogenates	Lysosomes in lymphoid tissue i hydrolytic activities measured in whole homogenates.
18	lysosomes in lymphoid tissue ii intracellular distribution of acid hydrolases	Lysosomes in lymphoid tissue; ii Intracellular distribution of acidic hydrolases.
18	differentiation and functional expression of potential antibody producing cells in the presence of chloramphenicol	In vivo studies have shown that chloramphenicol can be used as an antibody in the treatment of chloramphenicol.
18	quantitation of transplantation immunity i method	Dosage Quantification; Transplant Immunity i.
18	cellular sites of synthesis of rabbit immunoglobulins during primary response to diptheria toxoid freund s adjuvant	Rabbit immune globulin synthesis cell sites during primary response to the adjuvant diphtheria anatoxin freund adjuvant.
18	studies on immunologic reconstitution of thymectomized mice	Thymectomized mouse immunological reconstitution studies.
18	virus induced murine leukemia its inhibition and suppression by serum containing erythropoietin	The virus induced the inhibition and suppression of murine leukemia by a murine serum containing l-apos; erythropoietin.
18	high concentration of injected titanium dioxide in abdominal lymph nodes	Injected high titanium dioxide concentration into the abdominal lymph nodes.
18	puromycin induced necrosis of crypt cells of the small intestine of mouse	Puromycin caused cryptic cell necrosis in the mouse small intestine.
18	spleen cell proliferation in response to homologous antigens studied in congenic resistant strains of mice	Proliferation of spleen cells in response to homologous antigens in congener-resistant mouse strains.
18	primary antibody response in organ cultures	The role of the immune system in human immunosuppression.
18	immunological tolerance to microbial antigens ii suppressed antibody plaque formation to shigella antigen by spleen cells from tolerant mice	Immunological tolerance to microbial antigens ii suppressed the formation of plaques of antibodies against the apos; shigella antigen by the cells of the tolerant mouse spleen.
18	immunofluorescent antibody studies of a murine leukemia virus	It can be used as an antibody, but not as an antibody.
18	the incidence of palpable liver and spleen in the postpartum period	L'incidence de l'liver et de la sardine palpable pendant la période postnatale.
18	loss of thymus distinctive serological characteristics in mice under certain conditions	Distinct serological characteristics of the thymus in mice are lost under certain conditions.
18	scanning with macroaggregates of radioiodinated human serum albumin as an adjunct to celiac arteriography a preliminary communication	Scan with apo macroaggregates; human serum albumin, radioiodinated as a complement to apo; celiac arteriography, a preliminary communication.
18	virus induced erythropoiesis in hypertransfused polycythemic mice	The virus induced erythropoiesis (Eritropoiesis) in hypertransferred polycythemic mice.
18	heavy chain subclasses of human gamma g globulin serum distribution and cellular localization	Under-Heavy Chain Classes of the Serum Distribution of Human Gamma-Globulins and Cell Localization.
18	serum alpha globulin fraction survival and recovery effect in irradiated mice	Alpha globulin serum survival fraction and recovery effect in the irradiated mice.
18	hemopoietic spleen colony studies ii erythropoiesis	Hematopoietic Spleen Colony Studies ii Erythropoiesis.
18	histocompatibility antigen transfer in utero tolerance in progeny and sensitization in mother	It can be used as an antigen or as an antigen, but it can also be used as an antigen.
18	immunization with skin isografts taken from tolerant mice	Immunization with tolerant mouse skin isografts.
18	phosphoribosylamidotransferase regulation of activity in virus induced murine leukemia by purine nucleotides	Phosphoribosylamidotransferase activity in purine nucleotide-induced murine leukemia.
18	drug induced tolerance for skin allografts across the h 2 barrier in adult mice	Tolerance to cutaneous allografts across the h2 barrier was induced in adult mice.
18	tissue specificity of histone phosphorylation	Tissue specificity of the histone phosphorylation.
18	primary antibody response in vitro in peritoneal cells	In vitro primary immune response in peritoneal cells.
18	rabbit lymphoid cells differentiated with respect to alpha gamma and mu heavy polypeptide chains and to allotypic markers aa1 and aa2	Rabbit lymphoid cells differentiate between gamma- and mu-heavy polypeptide chains and aa1 and aa2 allotypic markers.
18	studies on viral plasmacytosis aleutian disease of mink vii infection of mink with dna extracted from diseased spleens	Mink viral plasmacytosis studies; mink mink vii vison infection with mussel; diseased spleen extract DNA.
18	primary immune response in grafted cells dissociation between the proliferation of activity and the proliferation of cells	Primary immune response in dissociated transplanted cells between proliferating and proliferating cells.
18	on the nature of transplantation immunity in the adenovirus tumor system	Immunity from transplantation in the adenovirus tumour system.
18	metabolic characterization of the genus brucella vi growth stimulation by i erythritol compared with strain virulence for guinea pigs	Metabolic characterization of growth stimulation of brucella vi by etapos; erythritol as compared with virulence of the strain in guinea pigs.
18	chromosome abnormality in rat leukemia induced by 7 12 dimethylbenz a anthracene	A chromosome anomaly in 712 dimethylbenz anthracene induced rat leukemia.
18	murine lymphoma augmented growth in mice with pertussis vaccine induced lymphocytosis	Murine lymphoma increased growth in apos-induced mice; pertussis vaccine-induced lymphocytosis.
18	lipids of the living coelacanth latimeria chalumnae	Living coelacanth lipids latimeria chalumnae.
18	biosynthesis of gamma globulin studies in a cell free system	Biosynthesis d' studies of cell-free gamma-globulins.
18	the influence of cortisone on experimental viral infection 8 suppression by cortisone of interferon formation in mice injected with newcastle disease virus	L' cortisone influence on experimental apo suppression; cortisone 8 virus infection of d&apos formation; interferon in Newcastle disease-infected mice.
18	effect of splenectomy on the susceptibility of mice inoculated with diplococcus pneumoniae	Effect of splenectomy on susceptibility of diplococcus pneumoniae-inoculated mice.
18	the mechanism of action of splenic irradiation in chronic myelogenous leukemia	The Mechanism of Dapos; Action of Dapos; Splenic Irradiation in Chronic Myelogenous Leukemia.
18	hemopoietic colony forming units in regenerating mouse liver suppression by anticoagulants	Hematopoietic colony-forming units suppressing liver from regenerating mice with anticoagulants.
18	effect of neutral alpha and omega amino acids and basic alpha amino acids on uptake of l histidine by intestinal mucosa testis spleen and kidney in vitro a comparison with effect in brain	Effect of alpha- and omega-neutral amino acids and basic alpha-amino acids on uptake of l' histidine by the intestinal mucosal testes of the kidney and spleen in vitro; brain effect comparison.
18	improved in vitro survival of normal functional spleen cells	Improved survival of normal functional cells of the spleen in vitro.
18	role of the thymus in tolerance 3 tolerance to bovine gamma globulin after direct injection of antigen into the shielded thymus of irradiated rats	Role of thymus in bovine gamma globulin tolerance 3 following direct injection of antigen into shielded thymus of irradiated rats.
18	the incorporation of tritium from thymidine into proteins of the mouse	Incorporation of thymidine tritium into mouse proteins.
18	factors influencing hematopoietic spleen colony formation in irradiated mice i the normal pattern of endogenous colony formation	Factors influencing formation of hematopoietic spleen colonies in irradiated mice i normal pattern of endogenous spleen formation.
18	ultrastructural localization of antibody in differentiating plasma cells	The ultrastructural localization of the antibody in the differentiating plasma cells.
18	hemopoietic colony studies v effect of hemopoietic organ stroma on differentiation of pluripotent stem cells	Haematopoietic colonies study the effects of the stroma of hematopoietic organs on pluripotent stem cell differentiation.
18	similarities between the biochemical actions of cycasin and dimethylnitrosamine	Similarities between cycasin and dimethylnitrosamine biochemical actions.
18	antigen binding to cells determination by enzymic fluorogenic group hydrolysis	Binding of the antigen to the determination of cells by fluorogenic enzyme hydrolysis.
18	cytological evidence for a relationship between normal hemotopoietic colony forming cells and cells of the lymphoid system	Cytological evidence of a relationship between normal cell-forming hemotopoietic colonies and lymphoid system cells.
18	enhanced erythropoiesis with concomitant diminished granulopoiesis in preirradiated recipient mice evidence for a common stem cell	The increase in apos; erythropoiesis and the concomitant decrease in granulopoiesis in pre-irradiated recipient mice are all evidence of apos; the existence of apos; a common stem cell.
18	the use of a non ionic detergent triton wr 1339 to determine rates of triglyceride entry into the circulation of the rat under different physiological conditions	Use of a nonionic detergent to determine triglyceride levels in rat circulation under different physiological conditions.
18	in vitro synthesis of immunoglobulin by rheumatoid synovial membrane	In vitro apo synthesis; rheumatoid synovial membrane immunoglobulin.
18	uptake distribution and binding of beryllium to organelles of the rat liver cell	Béryllium absorption and binding to rat liver cell organelles.
18	the origin and kinetics of mononuclear phagocytes	Mononuclear phagocyte origin and kinetics.
18	the primary immune response in mice i the enhancement and suppression of hemolysin production by a bacterial endotoxin	Increased and suppressed production of apos; hemolysin by bacterial endotoxin.
18	serological analysis of thymus and spleen grafts	Thymus and spleen transplant serology.
18	high dose delay of the immune response effect of actinomycin d on continuation of the immune response in vitro	Delayed high dose of apo; effect of apo immune response; actinomycin d on continued immune response in vitro.
18	rejection of renal allografts specific immunologic suppression	Renal allograft rejection specific immunological suppression.
18	immunosuppression with medroxyprogesterone acetate	Medroxyprogesterone acetate.
18	influence of cellular factors on immune unresponsiveness induced by klebsiella pneumoniae capsular antigen	Influence of cellular factors on the non-immune response induced by the apos; capsular antigen klebsiella pneumoniae.
18	the effect of molybdenum on ascorbic acid metabolism in rats	Effect of Molybdenum on Ascorbic Acid Metabolism in Rat.
18	induced sensitization of normal laboratory animals to brucella abortus endotoxin	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the assessment of risk.
18	transplantation of marrow to extramedullary sites	Spinal transplant to extra-medullary sites.
18	use of 125 i and 51 cr labeled albumin for the measurement of gastrointestinal and total albumin catabolism	Use of elixir, elixir, elixir, elixir, elixir, elixir, elixir, elixir, elixir.
18	recall of immunity in mice vaccinated with salmonella enteritidis or salmonella typhimurium	Immunization in vaccinated mice with Salmonella enteritidis or Salmonella typhimurium.
18	purification of the moloney and rauscher murine leukemia viruses by use of zonal ultracentrifuge systems	Purification of murine moloney leukemia virus and moloney rauscher virus by zonal ultracentrifuge.
18	in vivo growth and distribution of anthrax bacilli in resistant susceptible and immunized hosts	In vivo growth and anthrax distribution in resistant, susceptible, or immunized hosts.
18	isolation of deoxyribonucleic acid from mammalian tissues	Mammalian tissues should be treated with deoxyribonucleic acid.
18	studies on blood capillaries ii transport of ferritin molecules across the wall of muscle capillaries	Blood Capillary Studies ii ferritin molecules are transported across the muscle capillary wall.
18	high resolution electron microscopic analysis of the amyloid fibril	Amyloid fibril analysis by high-resolution electron microscopy.
18	depressed cellular formation of antibody to shigella antigens in vitro by spleen cell cultures from unresponsive mice	Spleen cell cultures from insensitive mice decreased anti-shigella antigen cell formation in vitro.
18	immunologic defenses against metastases impairment by excision of an allotransplanted lymphoma	In addition to the above, there are a number of other diseases, such as diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, diabetes, and other diseases.
18	asparagine synthetase activity of mouse leukemias	Mouse leukemia activity; asparagine synthetase.
18	a new method for the enumeration of antigen reactive cells responsive to a purified protein antigen	A new method of counting reactive cells reactive to antigen reacting to purified protein antigen.
18	hemophilia role of organ homografts	Hemophilia in organ homografts.
18	the induction of graft versus host disease in mice treated with cyclophosphamide	In addition, there is a need for additional research to determine the nature and extent of these risks.
18	amyloidosis induced in mice by escherichia coli endotoxin	In mice, it is not possible to determine the cause of death.
18	the primary immune response in mice ii cellular responses of lymphoid tissue accompanying the enhancement or complete suppression of antibody formation by a bacterial endotoxin	The primary immune response in the mouse ii the cellular responses of the lymphoid tissue accompanying the apos; augmentation or complete suppression of d&apos formation; antibodies by bacterial endotoxin.
18	cross protection against salmonella enteritidis infection in mice	In vitro fertilization is the process of fertilization.
18	bone marrow as a source of cells in reactions of cellular hypersensitivity i passive transfer of tuberculin sensitivity in syngeneic systems	Bone marrow as a cell source in cell hypersensitivity reactions; passive transfer of tuberculin sensitivity into syngenic systems.
18	chronic allogeneic disease i development of glomerulonephritis	Chronic allogenic disease i glomerulonephritis development.
18	distribution of antibody forming cells of different specificities in the lymph nodes and spleens of guinea pigs	Distribution of cells forming antibodies of different specificity in guinea pig spleen and lymph nodes.
18	cell to cell interaction in the immune response 3 chromosomal marker analysis of single antibody forming cells in reconstituted irradiated or thymectomized mice	Cell interaction-cell in immune response 3 analysis of chromosomal markers of single-antibody cells formed in reconstituted mice that are either irradiated or thymectomized.
18	specificity of the anamnestic response produced by listeria monocytogenes or mycobacterium tuberculosis to challenge with listeria monocytogenes	Specificity of listeria monocytogenes- or tubercular mycobacteria-induced anamnestic response to listeria monocytogenes challenge.
18	respiration enhancing effect of tuberculin on splenic cells of hypersensitive guinea pigs	Tuberculin stimulates the respiration of splenic cells in hypersensitive guinea pigs.
18	distribution of chromate labeled brucella abortus endoxin in tolerant mice	Chromatin-labelled endoxin brucella abortus in tolerant mice.
18	properties of venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus grown in vivo	Properties of Venezuelan Flu Virus; Equine Encephalomyelitis Cultured in Vivo.
18	generalized gangliosidosis beta galactosidase deficiency	Generalized Gangliosioside (GGG) – Beta-galactosidase deficiency.
18	lipid metabolism in human platelets i evidence for a complete fatty acid synthesizing system	The metabolism of lipids in human platelets shows the existence of a complete system of synthesis of fatty acids.
18	the binding of o aminoazotoluene to deoxyribonucleic acid ribonucleic acid and protein in the c57 mouse	The binding of l' aminoazotoluene o to l' deoxyribonucleic acid; to l' ribonucleic acid; and to protein in mouse c57.
18	neutron activation analysis ofr copper in biological material applied to wilson s disease	Neutron Activation Analysis of Copper r in Biological Material Applied to Wilson's Disease.
18	histochemical investigation of acid mucosubstances in secondary amyloidosis	The results of this study are summarized below.
18	spontaneous rupture of splenic artery aneurysm in pregnancy report of first known antepartum rupture with maternal and fetal survival	Spontaneous rupture of the apos; aneurysm of the apos; splenic artery during pregnancy: first known prenatal rupture with fetal and maternal survival.
18	cells involved in the immune response vii the demonstration using allotypic markers of antibody formation by irradiation resistant cells of irradiated rabbits injected with normal allogeneic bone marrow cells and sheep erythrocytes	The cells involved in the immune response are demonstrated at baseline; allotypic markers of apo formation are used; antibodies from apo-resistant cells; irradiation of irradiated rabbits with normal allogeneic bone marrow and sheep erythrocytes.
18	nonspecific staining its control in immunofluorescence examination of soil	The color is not-specific for its control during the examination of the immunofluorescence of the soil.
18	the immediate haematological response in the rat to experimental exposures of carbon monoxide	In addition, the results of the study were used to evaluate the effects of exposure to carbon monoxide in rats.
18	lipid abnormalities in foam cell reticulosis of mice an analogue of human sphingomyelin lipidosis	Lipid abnormalities in the reticulosis of mouse foam cells, a human sphingomyelin-like lipidosis.
18	infection of an established mouse cell line with cell free rauscher leukemia virus i cytological study with the electron microscope	Infection of rabies; a cell line established in mice by an electron microscopic cytological study of the leukemia virus to recover freely from cells i.
18	genetic control of the antibody response in inbred mice transfer of response by spleen cells and linkage to the major histocompatibility h 2 locus	Genetic control of the immune response in inbred mice, transfer of the response by the spleen cells and binding to the major locus d' histocompatibility h 2.
18	studies on the induction of tolerance of the h y antigen in mice with neonatal skin grafts	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been carried out to determine the effectiveness of antigen therapy.
18	n acetyl beta glucosaminidases in human spleen	N acetyl beta-glucosaminidases in human spleen.
18	effect of specific immune mouse serum on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in nonvaccinated mice challenged by various routes	Effect of mouse-specific immune serum on growth of Salmonella enteritidis in unvaccinated mice exposed to various routes of administration.
18	effect of specific immune mouse serum on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in mice preimmunized with living or ethyl alcohol killed vaccines	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the human immune system is immune to Salmonella enteritidis in mice pre-immune with apo; ethyl alcohol or live alcohol killed vaccines.
18	dynamics in development of experimental streptococcal immunity in mice	Dynamics of mouse development; experimental streptococcal immunity.
18	high resolution autoradiography of intracellular plutonium	Intracellular plutonium high-resolution autoradiography.
18	cerebral gm1 gangliosidosis chemical pathology of visceral organs	Gm1 cerebral ganglioside visceral organ chemical pathology.
18	immunological properties of friend virus from mouse spleen obtained by gel filtration	Immunological properties of gel-filtered mouse spleen-friendly virus.
18	local immune response in experimental pyelonephritis	The local immune response to experimental pyelonephritis.
18	the effect of cytotoxic agents on the passive transfer of cell mediated immunity	In addition, the cell-mediated immunity of the cell-mediated immunosaccharide is not considered to be immunotoxic.
18	the effect of cytotoxic agents on the primary immune response to listeria monocytogenes	L' effect of cytotoxic agents on primary immune response to Listeria monocytogenes.
18	pathogenesis of a local graft versus host reaction immunogenicity of circulating host leukocytes	In addition, there is a need for additional research to determine the nature and extent of infection.
18	physical separation of hemopoietic stem cells differing in their capacity for self renewal	A cell that can be used for a specific purpose and that can be used for a specific purpose.
18	salmonella abony salmonella typhimurium recombinant nonvirulent for the mouse	Salmonella abony Salmonella typhimurium, recombinant, not virulent to the mouse.
18	the role of individual spleen cells in the interferon response of the intact mouse	Role of spleen cells in response to intact mouse interferon.
18	sustained effects of brief daily stress fighting upon brain and adrenal catecholamines and adrenal spleen and heart weights of mice	Sustained effects of apo; short daily stress relief on adrenal and cerebral catecholamines and mouse adrenal heart and spleen weight.
18	further implication of murine leukemia like virs in the disorders of nzb mice	Additional Implications of Murine Leukemia as Viruses in Nzb Mouse Disorders.
18	the host response to calmette gu rin bacillus infection in mice	Host response to guinea-pig infection in mice.
18	the influence of immunologically committed lymphoid cells on macrophage activity in vivo	In vivo studies have shown that lymphoid cells that are immunologically active on the skin are more active than lymphoid cells that are not.
18	pathogenesis of chronic disease associated with persistent lymphocytic choriomeningitis viral infection ii relationship of the anti lymphocytic choriomeningitis immune response to tissue injury in chronic lymphocytic choriomeningitis disease	Chronic disease associated with persistent viral lymphocytic choriomeningitis ii relationship between the immune response to lymphocytic choriomeningitis and tissue injury associated with chronic lymphocytic choriomeningitis.
18	in vitro induction of a primary response to the dinitrophenyl determinant	In vitro, induction of apos; primary response to dinitrophenyl determinant.
18	liver in felty s syndrome	Liver's got Felty's syndrome.
18	comparison of soluble human and mouse transplantation antigens	Comparison of Soluble Human and Mouse Transplant Antigen.
18	significance of increased splenic uptake on liver scintiscanning	L' hepatic scintigraphic spleen absorption is significant.
18	platelet life span and sites of platelet sequestration in onyalai	Lifespan of platelets and sequestration sites in the onyalai.
18	cell sorting automated separation of mammalian cells as a function of intracellular fluorescence	Sorting the cells allows the mammalian cells to be automatically separated according to their intracellular fluorescence.
18	pulmonary hypertension due to micro thromboembolism from splenic and portal veins after portacaval anastomosis	Pulmonary hypertension due to portal and splenic microthromboembolism following porto anastomosis-cave.
18	a protein inhibitor of acid deoxyribonucleases	Acid deoxyribonuclease protein inhibitor.
18	lymphomas in mice failure of induction after a graft versus host reaction	Lapos; lymphoma induction in neonatal mice; was not successful after grafted reaction with the host.
18	studies on tuberculin fever iv the passive transfer of reactivity with various tissues of sensitized donor rabbits	Tuberculin Fever Studies iv Passive Transfer of Reactivity with various sensitized donor rabbit tissues.
18	synthesis assembly and secretion of gamma globulin by mouse myeloma cells i adaptation of the merwin plasma cell tumor 11 to culture cloning and characterization of gamma globulin subunits	Gamma globulin synthesis assembly and secretion by mouse myeloma cells i merwin tumor 11 cell adaptation to culture cloning and gamma globulin sub-units characterization.
18	synthesis and metabolism of glycerol 3h triether a nonabsorbable oil phase marker for lipid absorption studies	Synthesis and Metabolism of Glycerol 3h Triether, a nonabsorbable oily phase marker for d' lipid absorption studies.
18	cells involved in cell mediated and transplantation immunity in the rabbit i the noninvolvement of the bone marrow antigen reactive cell in the transplant rejection reaction	Cells involved in cell mediation and apo; rabbit immunity to transplantation i non-involvement of reactive cell to apos; bone marrow antigen in graft rejection response.
18	experimental bluetongue disease in white tailed deer	Experimental white-tailed deer blue tongue disease.
18	effects of estradiol upon the thymus and lymphoid organs of immature female rats	Effects of estradiol on the thymus and the lymphoid organs of immature female rats.
18	antibodies of the iga type in intestinal plasma cells of germfree mice after oral or parenteral immunization with ferritin	Urine-like antibodies in germless mouse intestinal plasma cells following oral or parenteral ferritin immunization.
18	carcinogen induced tumors of the thymus iv humoral influences of normal thymus and functional thymomas and influence of posthymectomy period on restoration	Cancer induces tumors of thymus IV humoral influences of the normal thymus and of functional thymomas and influences the postthymectomy period on restoration.
18	bone marrow and spleen dissociation of immunologic properties by cortisone	Dissociation of the immunological properties of the bone marrow and of the spleen by cortisone.
18	influence of carotid baroreceptors on different components of the vascular system	Carotid baroreceptors influence the different components of the vascular system.
18	repression of colony formation reversed by antiserum to mouse thymocytes	Colony-forming repression was reversed by anti-mouse thymocyte antiserum.
18	teratogenicity of vitamin b6 deficiency omphalocele skeletal and neural defects and splenic hypoplasia	Teratogenicity of B6 Vitamin Deficiency Omphalocele Skeletal and Neural abnormalities and splenic hypoplasia.
18	complement fixing antigen from bhk 21 cell cultures infected with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	An antigen obtained from cultures of bhk 21 cells infected with the Lymphocytic Choriomeningitis virus.
18	pseudourea 2 2 9 10 anthrylenedimethylene bis 2 thio dihydrochloride dihydrate microbiological assay and tissue distribution studies in mice	Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Pseudomonas aeruginosa, Pseudomonas aeruginosa and Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
18	isolation of mycobacterium xenopei from water taps	Isolate xenopeia mycobacteria from faucets.
18	vibriolytic antibody forming cells a new application of the pfeiffer phenomenon	L' cell-forming vibriolytic antibody is a novel application of pfeiffer phenomena.
18	a kinetic study on murine myeloid leukaemia	Myeloid murine leukemia kinetics study.
18	red cell survival in biliary cirrhosis	The survival of the red blood cells in the cirrhosis of the bile.
18	antitumor activity in mice of tentacles of 2 tropical sea annelids	L' anti-tumour activity in the mouse tentacles of two tropical annelids.
18	hepatic influence on splenic synthesis and release of coagulation activities	Hepatic influence on spleen synthesis and spleen release from clotting activities.
18	recovery of rauscher leukemia virus from large volumes of seeded cow s milk and from infected murine spleens	Recovery of Leukemia Virus from large volumes of stocked cow's milk and infected mouse spleens.
18	suppression of established friend virus leukemia by statolon i demonstration of a latent infection in clinically normal mice	Suppression of statolonized leukemia caused by lacidosis virus demonstrates latent infection in mice that are clinically normal.
18	mediation of immunity to tumor isografts in mice by heterologous ribonucleic acid	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that may be used for the treatment of cancer.
18	evidence for transformation of spleen cells one day after infection of mice with friend leukemia virus	The results of this study are consistent with the findings of a recent study by the Canadian Cancer Society.
18	experimental encephalitis following peripheral inoculation of west nile virus in mice of different ages	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been carried out to determine the causes of West Nile virus infection.
18	mycotoxicity of aspergillus ochraceus to chicks	It is not possible to determine the cause of death.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response i synergy in graft versus host reactions produced by cells from nzb bl mice	Lymphoid cell synergy mediating the graft – host i synergistic graft – host response produced by nzb bl mouse cells.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response ii synergy in graft versus host reactions produced by balb c lymphoid cells of differing anatomic origin	Synergy between lymphoid cells involved in graft-versus-host response ii Synergy in graft-versus-host reactions produced by balb-like lymphoid cells c d' different anatomical origins.
18	release of vasoactive amines from rabbit platelets induced by sensitized mononuclear leukocytes and antigen	Release of vasoactive rabbit platelets by antigen-induced mononuclear sensitized leukocytes and antigen.
18	the pathogenesis of aleutian disease of mink i in vivo viral replication and the host antibody response to viral antigen	Pathogenesis of Aleutian disease viral replication in mink in vivo and antibody response of the host to viral antigen.
18	lactoferrin an iron binding protein in neutrophilic leukocytes	Lactoferrin is an iron-binding protein of neutrophil leukocytes.
18	histopathological findings in the combined immunity deficiency syndrome	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
18	metabolism of arterial plasma estrogens by the splanchnic organs of the dog in vivo	Arterial plasma estrogen metabolism by dog splanchnic organs in vivo.
18	inhibition of nucleic acid and protein synthesis mouse spleen cells in vitro by azathioprine	In vitro, l' azathioprine inhibits the synthesis of proteins and nucleic acids in cells of the mouse spleen.
18	antibody to nuclear material eluted from isolated spleen vessels in systemic lupus erythematosus	Antibodies to the nuclear material were eluted from the splenic vessels isolated from the disseminated lupus erythematosus.
18	non enzymic nature of the pyridine haemochrome cleaving activity of mammalian tissue extracts haem alpha methenyl oxygenase	The non-enzymatic nature of apos; apos cleavage activity; pyridine d&apos hemochrome; extracts from mammalian tissue, alpha methenyloxygenase.
18	free and membrane bound polyribosomes in normal and rauscher virus infected mouse spleen cells	Free and membrane-bound polyribosomes in rabus-infected normal mouse spleen cells.
18	eression of allelic immunoglobulin in homozygous rabbits injected with rna extract	L' erection of l' allelic immunoglobulin in rabbits injected with l' extract from rna.
18	selective simulation of allelic expression effectf antibodies to allotypic markers on lymphoid cells	In addition, it can be used as an antibody for the detection of allogeneic markers.
18	acylation of lysolecithin in the intestinal mucosa of rats	Lysolecithin acylation in rat intestinal mucosa.
18	in vitro initiated secondary anti hapten response ii increasing cell avidity for antigen	Anti-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro-Hydro.
18	maternal fetal interaction and immunological memory	Maternal fetal interaction, and immunologic memory.
18	survival of listeria monocytogenes in experimentally infected mice	Survival of Listeria monocytogenes in mice infected experimentally.
18	rapid method for the isolation of listeria monocytogenes from experimentally infected mice	Rapid method to isolate experimentally infected mice for listeria monocytogenes.
18	bone marrow histogenesis a comparison of fatty and red marrow	Bone marrow histogenesis is a comparison between the red and the greasy marrow.
18	a radiochemical assay for glutamine synthetase and activity of the enzyme in rat tissues	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
18	globoid cell leucodystrophy krabbe s disease deficiency of galactocerebroside beta galactosidase	Globoid cell leukodystrophy, krabbe disease, galactocerebroside beta-galactosidase deficiency.
18	cellular aspects of the inverse relationship between the net charge of immunogens of antibodies elicited	Cellular aspects of the inverse net charge dependence of antibody immunogens elicited responses.
18	altered nucleic acids of antibody forming tissues	Antibody-forming tissue-damaged nucleic acids.
18	selection of a single antibody forming cell clone and its propagation in syngeneic mice	Select a single cell clone forming an antibody and its propagation in the syngenic mice.
18	in vitro induction of granulocyte differentiation in hematopoietic cells from leukemic and non leukemic patients	In vitro, the induction of granulocyte differentiation in the hematopoietic cells of both leukemic and non-leukemic patients.
18	observations on the increasing malignancy of tumours on prolonged growth the influence of immunological changes in the host	The results of this study are consistent with the findings of the Canadian Cancer Society, the Canadian Cancer Society and the Canadian Cancer Society.
18	enzyme and isoenzyme alterations in friend disease	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the development of the disease.
18	studies on mammalian glucoamylases with special reference to monkey intestinal glucoamylase	Studies of mammalian glucoamylases, particularly intestinal monkey glucoamylase.
18	an experimental system for the simultaneous estimation of mitostatic and lymphotoxic effects of immunosuppressants and cytostatics	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for the presence or absence of anti-inflammatory drugs.
18	regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides ii action on peritoneal exudate cells	Regulation of the Immune System by Synthetic Polynucleotides ii action on peritoneal exudate cells.
18	multiplication of pasteurella multocida in the spleen liver and blood of turkeys inoculated intravenously	Pasteurella multocida multiplication in intravenous turkey liver and blood.
18	leukemia virus activation in chronic allogeneic disease	L'activation de la virus de leukémie dans les maladies allogènes chroniques.
18	leukemia evoked with 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat i changes in spleen and thymus	Leukemia evoked 7,812 anthracene trimethylbenz in rats and changes in the spleen and thymus.
18	further studies of antigenic competition 3 a model to account for the phenomenon based on a deficiency of cell to cell interaction in immune lymphoid cell populations	D' other antigenic competition studies 3 a model to account for cell-to-cell deficiency-based phenomenon in immune lymphoid cell populations.
18	the secondary immune response to a hapten in vitro antigen concentration and the carrier effect	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of the results of this study.
18	quantitative isolation of total glycosphingolipids from animal cells	Total glycosphingolipid isolation in animal cells.
18	acceleration by thymosin of the development of resistance to murine sarcoma virus induced tumor in mice	Thymosin Acceleration of Development of Mouse Tumour-Inducing Sarcoma Virus Resistance.
18	necessity of the spleen for balanced secondary sex ratios following maternal immunization with male antigen	It is also necessary to have a spleen in order to balance the sex ratio: secondary females after birth; to immunize the mother with the apos; to have a male antigen.
18	differential response of ribonucleic acid polymerase in preneoplastic and neoplastic ovaries of mice following oestradiol treatment	Differential reaction of mouse neoplastic and preneoplastic ovary ribonucleic acid polymerase following estradiol and apos treatment.
18	red cell aging in vivo	In vivo measurements of the age of red blood cells.
18	the acid soluble disulphide and mixed disulphide levels of some normal tissues and transplanted tumours	Levels of acid-soluble disulfide and mixed disulfide in transplanted and normal tissue.
18	isotopic studies of the conversion of oxophlorins and their ferrihaems into bile pigments in the rat	Isotopic studies of conversion of oxophlorines and their ferrihemes to bile pigments in rats.
18	peculiar immunobiology of bone marrow allografts ii rejection of parental grafts by resistant f 1 hybrid mice	Specific immunobiology of allografts of bone marrow ii resistant f1 hybrid mice reject parental transplants.
18	cell mediated tumor allograft immunity in vitro transfer with rna	Tumor-mediated cell-mediated allograft transfer in vitro with rna.
18	breast involvement in wegener s granulomatosis	Breast Implication in Wegener's Granulomatosis.
18	inducible heme oxygenase in the kidney a model for the homeostatic control of hemoglobin catabolism	L&apos, an inducible renal heme oxygenase, is a model for homeostatic control of apos catabolism; hemoglobin.
18	the spleen in type i hyperlipoproteinemia histochemical biochemical microfluorometric and electron microscopic observations	Histochemical histochemical type I hyperlipoproteinemia microfluorometric and microscopic electron observations.
18	the influence of thymic and bursal lymphoid systems in avian tuberculosis	Tuberculosis prevention and control: an epidemiological perspective.
18	some structural and antigenic properties of intracisternal a particles occurring in mouse tumors complement fixation immunodiffusion neuroblastoma plasma cell tumor	Certain structural and antigenic properties of the intracisternal a particles present in mouse tumours are found to complement the immunological binding of the neuroblastoma plasma neuroblastoma tumor.
18	myeloperoxidase and crystalline bodies in the granules of dmba induced rat chloroma cells	Myeloperoxidase and dmba granule crystal bodies induce rat chloroma cells.
18	microbiological assay and tissue distribution of 5 diazouracil in mice	Microbiological Dose and Tissue Distribution of 5 Diazouracil in the mouse.
18	peritoneoscopic features of intraabdominal vessels in cirrhosis of the liver	Intraabdominal vessel peritoneoscopic characteristics in liver cirrhosis.
18	regulation of the immune system by synthetic polynucleotides v effect on cell associated immunoglobulin receptors and immunological memory	Synthetic polynucleotide regulation of the immune system affects cell-associated immunoglobulin receptors and immune memory.
18	the binding of radioactive label from labelled phenacetin and related compounds to rat tissues in vivo and to nucleic acids and bovine plasma albumin in vitro	Binding of radioactive label of labelled phenacetin and rat tissue- and nucleic acid-like compounds to bovine plasma albumin in vitro.
18	suppressive effect of immunization with mouse fetal antigens on growth of cells infected with rauscher leukemia virus and plasma cell tumors	Suppressive effect of leukemia; immunization with fetal mouse antigens on the growth of leukemia-infected cells and plasma cell tumours.
18	a survey of the interaction of calcium ions with mitochondria from different tissues and species	A study of calcium ion interactions with the mitochondria of different tissues and species.
18	idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura with normal platelet survival time	Idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura with a normal survival time platelet.
18	immunocompetent cells among mouse thymocytes a minor population	Immunocompetent cells in the minor mouse thymocyte population.
18	serological and immunogenic activity of soluble mouse transplantation antigens controlled by the h 2 locus	Serological and immunogenic activity of soluble, h2-locus-controlled mouse transplant antigens.
18	in vitro inhibition of leucocyte migration in crohn s disease by a sarcoid spleen suspension	Suspension of sarcoid sarcoid spleen inhibits leukocyte migration in Crohn's disease.
18	control of contamination in psittacosis specimens by antibiotics	Antibiotic contamination of psittacosis specimens.
18	peyer s patches an enriched source of precursors for iga producing immunocytes in the rabbit	Peyer develops an enriched precursor source for rabbit immunocyte production.
18	peculiar immunobiology of bone marrow allografts i graft rejection by irradiated responder mice	It is important to note that the results of the study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
18	unusual particles in splenic disorders	Unusual particles in disorders of splenic origin.
18	suppression of cell mediated immunity to infection by an antimitotic drug further evidence that migrant macrophages express immunity	Removal of cell-mediated immunity against anti-mitotic drug infection proves once again that immunity is expressed by migrating macrophages.
18	viral and cellular surface antigens of murine leukemias and myelomas serological analysis by immunoelectron microscopy	Viral surface and cellular antigens of murine leukemias and myeloma, immunoelectron microscopic serological analysis.
18	chronic allogeneic disease 3 genetic requirements for the induction of glomerulonephritis	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) is a multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre system.
18	immune responses in vitro iv suppression of primary m g and a plaque forming cell responses in mouse spleen cell cultures by class specific antibody to mouse immunoglobulins	In vitro Immune Reactions iv suppression of primary and d' a cell-mediated plaque in mouse spleen cell cultures by a mouse immunoglobulin-specific class antibody.
18	electrophoretically homogeneous antibody synthesized by spleen foci of irradiated repopulated mice	Synthetized by splenic foci of repopulated irradiated mice, an electrophoretically homogeneous antibody.
18	cellular differentiation of the immune system of mice vi strain differences in class differentiation and other properties of marrow cells	Cellular Differentiation of the Immune System of Stem Mice Differences in Classes and Dos; Other Properties of Bone Marrow Cells.
18	hemopoietic colony forming cell responses in mice infected with ectromelia virus	Cellular response hematopoietic colonization in ectromelike virus infected mice.
18	role of hemopoietic colony forming cell responses in the pathogenesis of ectromelia	Role of cell-mediated hematopoietic colonies in ectomycorrhizal pathogenesis.
18	chronic proliferative arthritis of mice induced by mycoplasma arthritidis i induction of disease and histopathological characteristics	Mice chronic proliferative arthritid mycoplasma induced induction of disease and histopathological characteristics.
18	eperythrozoon coccoides i effect on the interferon response in mice	Eperythrozoon coccoides i affects response to interferon in mice.
18	characterization of an equine infectious anemia antigen extracted from infected horse spleen tissue	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	in vitro attachment of radioactive endotoxins to lysosomes	In vitro endotoxin binding to lysosomes.
18	portal venous injection in the rat	I.V.R. in rat.
18	defects in hematopoietic differentiation in nzb and nzc mice	Defects in hematopoietic differentiation in nzb- and nzc- mice.
18	generalized accumulation of neutral glycosphingolipids with g m2 ganglioside accumulation in the brain	Generalized neutral glycosphingolipid accumulation with accumulation of g m2 gangliosides in the brain.
18	ceramide like synthetic amides that inhibit cerebroside galactosidase	Ceramide resembles a synthetic amide that inhibits cerebroside galactosidase.
18	cytological identification of the chromosome carrying the ixth linkage group including h 2 in the house mouse	Cytological identification of the ixth-linked chromosome including h2 in the domestic mouse.
18	on the 1 9 volt alternating current polarographic signal of tissues	This is the 19-volt polarographic alternating current signal from the tissue.
18	immunologic enhancement of allogeneic tumor growth with soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens	Immunological Enhancement of Allogeneic Tumour Growth with Soluble Histocompatibility 2 Antigen.
18	host gene control of c type rna tumor virus inheritance of the group specific antigen of murine leukemia virus	Genetic control of the apo; host of the apo; inherited mouse leukemia virus group specific antigen.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response iv synergy in the gvh reaction quantitated by a mortality assay in sublethally irradiated recipients	Cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-
18	development of chicken lymphoid system i synthesis and secretion of immunoglobulins by chicken lymphoid cells	Development of the chicken lymphoid system i chicken lymphoid cell immunoglobulin synthesis and secretion.
18	active suppression of immunoglobulin allotype synthesis i chronic suppression after perinatal exposure to maternal antibody to paternal allotype in sjl x balb c f 1 mice	Active suppression of apos synthesis; allotype of apos; chronic immune globulin suppression following perinatal exposure to apos; maternal antiapos antibody; paternal allotype in bf1 sjl mice.
18	immune status of mice tolerant of living cells ii continuous presence and nature of facilitation enhancing antibodies in tolerant animals	Immune status of living cell-tolerant mice ii Nature and continued presence of antibodies stimulating facilitation in tolerant animals.
18	suppression of immunoglobulin class synthesis in mice i effects of treatment with antibody to chain	Removal of synthesis from the immunoglobulin class in mice; Chain Antibody Therapy.
18	studies on thymus function 3 duration of thymic function	Studies of thymus function 3, duration of thymus function 3.
18	metabolism of the schistosomicidal agent hycanthone by rats and rhesus monkeys	Apos metabolism; hycanthone schistosomicide agent by rhesus rats and monkeys.
18	restoration of antibody forming capacity in cultures of nonadherent spleen cells by mercaptoethanol	Antibody re-establishment in non-adherent spleen cell cultures by mercaptoethanol.
18	unimpeded growth of tumour in hosts pre immunized with tyrosyl or dinitrophenyl coated tumour cells	Immunized with tyrosyl- or dinitrophenyl-coated tumor cells, pre-tumor growth was unimpeded.
18	immune complexes and visceral deposits of measles antigens in subacute sclerosing panencephalitis	Acute sclerosing panencephalitis is a form of subacute sclerosing panencephalitis.
18	chemical classes of amyloid substance	Amyloid chemical classes.
18	ascorbic acid a culture requirement for colony formation by mouse plasmacytoma cells	Ascorbic acid, a culture necessary for the formation of colonies by cells of mouse plasmacytoms.
18	cellular basis of the genetic control of immune responses to synthetic polypeptides ii frequency of immunocompetent precursors specific for two distinct regions within phe g pro l a synthetic polypeptide derived from multichain polyproline in inbred mouse strains	The Cellular Basis of Genetic Control of Immune Responses to Synthetic Polypeptides ii the frequency of specific immunocompetent precursors for two distinct regions in the synthetic polypeptide derived from multiple-chain polyproline in mouse inbred strains.
18	the pathological findings following laparotomy in hodgkin s disease	Laparotomy results in Hodgkin's disease.
18	studies of mice with a balanced complement of 36 chromosomes derived from f 1 hybrids of t1wh and t1ald translocation homozygotes	Mouse study with a balanced complement of 36 chromosomes from d&apos f1 hybrids; t1wh and t1ald translocation homozygotes.
18	further observations on whether host immunodepression is associated with tumour growth in mice	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature, and are consistent with those reported in the literature.
18	spleen weight in rats during tumour growth and in homograft rejection	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be associated with breast cancer.
18	nucleotide sequence at the binding site for coat protein on rna of bacteriophage r17	Nucleotide sequence at the coat protein binding site on bacteriophage r17.
18	tissue localization of australia antigen immune complexes in acute and chronic hepatitis and liver cirrhosis	Tissue localization of Australian antigenic immune complexes in chronic and acute hepatitis and liver cirrhosis.
18	genetic control of thymus derived cell function i in vitro dna synthetic response of normal mouse spleen cells stimulated by the mitogens concanavalin a and phytohemagglutinin	Genetic control of thymus-derived in vitro thymus-synthesis response; mouse normal spleen cell DNA stimulated by concanavalin a and phytohemagglutinin a and phytohemagglutinin mitogens.
18	rejection of ascites tumor allografts i isolation characterization and in vitro reactivity of peritoneal lymphoid effector cells from balb c mice immune to el4 leukosis	Rejection of tumour allografts; ascites; characterization of apos; isolation and reactivity in vitro of effector peritoneal lymphoid cells from gerber mice immunized against leukosis.
18	variation in accessible cell surface immunoglobulin among antibody firming cells	Canadian Centre for Infectious Disease Prevention and Control.
18	detection of dna synthesis in intact organisms with positron emitting methyl 11 c thymidine	Detection of apos synthesis; DNA from intact organisms with positrons emitting methylthymidine 11 c.
18	transfer amyloidosis i studies on the transfer of various lymphoid cells from amyloidotic mice to syngeneic nonamyloidotic recipients ii induction of amyloidosis in mice with spleen thymus and lymph node tissue from casein sensitized syngeneic donors	Transfer apo; amyloidosis studies on transfer of various amyloid cells from amylotic mice to non-amylotic sibling recipients ii induction of apo; amyloidosis in casein-sensitized syngenic donors in mice with thymus of the spleen and lymph node tissue.
18	thymus derived lymphocytes produce an immunologically specific macrophage arming factor	Thymus-derived lymphocytes produce a weaponizing factor for immunologically specific macrophages.
18	thymus derived t cell immunoglobulins presence of a receptor site for igg and absence of large amounts of buried ig determinants on t cells	It is important to note that the presence of a receptor site for thymus-derived t-cell immunoglobulins does not preclude the development of a receptor site for t-cell immunoglobulins.
18	the immune reaction as a stimulator of tumor growth	The immune response stimulates tumor growth.
18	enhancement of the post occlusive oscillation in the splenic circulation by adenosine	Increases in apos; post-occlusive oscillation in splenic circulation via apos; adenosine.
18	gaucher s disease deficiency of acid glucosidase and reconstitution of enzyme activity in vitro	Acid glucosidase deficiency and recapitalization; enzymatic activity in vitro.
18	specific heterologous enhancement of immune responses iv specific generation of a thymus derived enhancing factor	Specific heterologous increase in immune responses generation specific d&apos factor; thymus-derived increase.
18	rapid viral induction of murine lymphomas in the graft versus host reaction	Rapid viral mouse lymphoma induction in the-host graft response.
18	distribution of labeled lymph node cells in mice during the lymphocytosis induced by bordetella pertussis	Distribution of labeled lymph node cells during Bordetella pertussis lymphocytosis in mice.
18	cellular events during the induction of experimental thyroiditis in the rabbit	Cellular effects during apo; experimental thyroid induction in rabbit.
18	the release of prostaglandins and rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs from rabbit spleen and its antagonism by anti inflammatory drugs	Release and antagonism of prostaglandins and rabbit aorta from rabbit spleen by anti-@-@inflammatory drugs.
18	inhibition of chemical carcinogenesis by viral vaccines	Viral vaccines inhibit chemical carcinogenesis.
18	prenatal and postnatal changes in the content and species of ferritin in rat liver	Prenatal and post-natal changes in the ferritin content and ferritin species in rat liver.
18	the diagnosis of hodgkin s disease in surgically excised spleens	Surgically excised spleen diagnosis of Hodgkin's disease.
18	helper activity of human leukemic tissue extracts for leukemia virus expression in mice	The following are the following: a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. a. b. a. a. b. a.
18	the generation from arachidonic acid of rabbit aorta contracting substance rcs by a microsomal enzyme preparation which also generates prostaglandins	The production, from l' arachidonic acid, of d' a contracting substance; rabbit aorta, rcs, by an enzymatic microsomal preparation that also generates prostaglandins.
18	glycosphingolipid levels in an unusual neurovisceral storage disease characterized by lactosylceramide galactosyl hydrolase deficiency lactosylceramidosis	Glycosphingolipid levels in unusual lactosylceramidose-lactosylceramidose-deficient, lactosylceramidase galactosyl hydrolase-characterized neurovisceral disease.
18	a classification of the murine leukemia viruses neutralization of pseudotypes of friend spleen focus forming virus by type specific murine antisera	Classification of murine leukemia virus neutralization of friendly spleen virus pseudotypes by specific murine antisera.
18	regulation of lymphocyte responses in vitro i regulatory effect of macrophages and thymus dependent t cells on the response of thymus independent b lymphocytes to endotoxin	Control of in vitro lymphocyte responses he regulatory effect of thymus-dependent t-cells and macrophages on the response of thymus-independent b-cells to endotoxin.
18	thymus independent b cell proliferation in spleen cell cultures of mouse radiation chimeras stimulated by phytohemagglutinin or allogeneic cells	Proliferation of thymus-independent b cells in cultures of the spleen cells of phytohemagglutinin-stimulated and allogeneic mouse radiation chimeras.
18	the mechanism of antigenic stimulation of primary and secondary clonal precursor cells	The antigenic stimulation mechanism of precursor primary and secondary clonal cells.
18	deletion of hapten binding cells by a highly radioactive 125 i conjugate	Deletion of the cells binding l' haptene by a highly radioactive conjugate 125 i.
18	brain associated stem cell antigen an antigen shared by brain and hemopoietic stem cells	The antigen of the stem cells associated with the brain is a shared antigen between the brain and the hematopoietic stem cells.
18	influence of lynestrenol on the rat s ovary implanted into the spleen	In addition, the ovary of the rat is implanted into the spleen and the ovary is implanted into the spleen.
18	leukaemia evoked with 7 8 12 trimethylbenz a anthracene in rat 3 changes in lymphoid tissues	Leukemia induced changes in rat lymphoid tissues with 78-,12-trimethylbenz a-anthracene.
18	co infection of mouse spleen cells with murine sarcoma virus and guaroa virus	Co-mouse spleen cell infection with mouse sarcoma virus and guaroa virus.
18	the persistence of hemopoietic stem cells in vitro	Hematopoietic stem cell persistence in vitro.
18	bone marrow derived lymphoid cells b cells functional depletion with cobra factor and fresh serum	Lymphoid cells derived from bone marrow – Functional depletion of the cells with the cobra factor and fresh serum.
18	storage of chlorinated pesticides in human organs and tissues in ferrara province italy	Storage of Chlorinated Pesticides in Human Organs and Tissues in the Province of Ferrara in Italy.
18	rapid breaking of tolerance against escherichia coli lipopolysaccharide in vivo and in vitro	Rapid interruption of lipopolysaccharide tolerance to Escherichia coli in vitro and Escherichia coli in vitro.
18	immunopathogenesis of acute central nervous system disease produced by lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus ii adoptive immunization of virus carriers	Immunopathogenesis d' an acute disease of the central nervous system caused by the lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus; and Adoption of immunizations for carriers of the virus.
18	equine infectious anemia activity of liquid antigen extracts in the agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests	In addition to the above-mentioned tests, the results of the tests are presented in the form of anemia.
18	observations on abnormal cells in the peripheral blood and spleen in hodgkin s disease	Observations on abnormal peripheral blood cells and Hodgkinian spleen.
18	congenital dyserythropoietic anaemia with erythroblastic multinuclearity	Congenital dyserythropoietic anemia to erythroblastic multinuclearity.
18	portal hypertension in kala azar	Portal hypertension, azar kala.
18	the effects of stimulation of the left atrial receptors on sympathetic efferent nerve activity	Left atrial receptor stimulation effects on the sympathetic efferent nerve activity.
18	lysosomal localization of fructofuranosidase containing liposomes injected into rats	Lysosomal localization of liposome-containing fructofuranosidase injected into rats.
18	radioresistance of carrier specific helper thymus derived lymphocytes in mice	Radioresistance in mouse-specific thymus-derived lymphocytes.
18	enzyme deficiency in cholesteryl ester storage idisease	Cholesteryl ester storage idisease enzyme deficiency.
18	immunity of epstein barr virus in hodgkin s disease preceded by infectious mononucleosis	Infectious mononucleosis is a disease of the human body.
18	role of the macrophage in natural resistance to salmonellosis in mice	Role of macrophage in natural mouse salmonellosis resistance.
18	comparative immunogenicity of heat killed and living oral salmonella vaccines	Dietary Reference Intakes (continued) Immunologic Reference Intakes (continued) 1.
18	model approach to immunological rejuvenation of the aged	Model approach for elderly immunologic rejuvenation.
18	post mortem findings in ugandans with hodgkin s disease	Postmortem discovery in Hodgkin's disease ugandans.
18	cholesterol vitamin c controls its transformation to bile acids	The vitamin c of cholesterol controls the transformation of cholesterol into the bile acids.
18	inhibition of macrophage response to brain injury a new effect of pertussis vaccine possibly related to histamine sensitizing factor	A new effect of the pertussis vaccine, which may be related to the sensitization factor to apos; histamine, is the inhibition of the response of macrophages to brain damage.
18	ultrastructural characteristics of the hairy cells of leukemic reticuloendotheliosis	Ultrastructural Characteristics of Hairy Leukemic Reticuloendotheliosis Cells.
18	interferon inducing polycarboxylates mechanism of protection against vaccinia virus infection in mice	Interferon induces polycarboxylates as a protective mechanism against infection by the virus of vaccinia in mice.
18	respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide treated mice i increased virulence of mycoplasma pulmonis	Respiratory diseases in cyclophosphamide-treated mice increased pulmonary mycoplasma virulence.
18	maturation of the human complement system i onset time and sites of fetal c1q c4 c3 and c5 synthesis	Human complement system maturation; fetal appearance and synthesis sites c4 c3 and c5.
18	sites of formation of the serum proteins transferrin and hemopexin	Hemopexin and transferrin serum protein sites.
18	the response of t cells to histocompatibility 2 antigens dose response kinetics	Histocompatibility of 2 antigens dose-kinetic response.
18	cytotoxicity in graft versus host reaction i role of donor and host spleen cells	Cytotoxicity in the graft-versus-host response: the role of the donor and the cells of the spleen of the host.
18	immune and natural antibodies to syngeneic murine plasma cell tumors	Natural immune antibody to mouse syngeneal plasma cell tumors.
18	colonization resistance of the digestive tract of mice during systemic antibiotic treatment	Resistance to gut colonization in mice during a systemic antibiotic treatment.
18	equine infectious anemia preparation of a liquid antigen extract for the agar gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation tests	Preparation of infectious equine anemia; an extract of liquid antigen for apo assays; gel-gel immunodiffusion and complement fixation.
18	detection of african horsesickness viral antigens in tissues by immunofluorescence	Detection of viral antigens of African horse sickness using immunofluorescence.
18	anthrax infection in bone meal from various countries of origin	Infectious Diseases, Infectious Diseases, Infectious Diseases, Infectious Diseases, Infectious Diseases, and Other Diseases.
18	deficit of specific thymus dependent lymphocytes in transplantation tolerance in the rat	Rat specific thymus-dependent lymphocyte deficiency in transplant tolerance.
18	critical role of determinant presentation in the induction of specific responses in immunocompetent lymphocytes	Determinant is a component of the immune system, which is a component of the immune system and is a component of the immune system.
18	synergy among lymphoid cells mediating the graft versus host response v derivation by migration in lethally irradiated recipients of two interacting subpopulations of thymus derived cells from normal spleen	Synergy between lymphoid cells mediating graft-versus-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cell-cellulator
18	active suppression as a possible mechanism of tolerance in tetraparental mice	Active suppression as a possible tolerance mechanism in the tetraparous mice.
18	heterogeneity of the effector cells in the cytotoxic reaction against allogeneic lymphoma cells	Effect cell heterogeneity in cytotoxic response to allogeneic lymphoma cells.
18	2 4 dinitrophenyl receptors on mouse thymus and spleen cells	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of receptor.
18	production of tl antibody by mice immunized with tl cell populations a possible assay for thymic hormone	In addition, it is recommended that the antibody be used in conjunction with the antibody and that the antibody be used in conjunction with the antibody.
18	proliferation of donor marrow and thymus cells in the myeloid and lymphoid organs of irradiated syngeneic host mice	Proliferation of cells of the donor bone marrow and thymus into myeloid and lymphoid organs of irradiated syngenic host mice.
18	glucocerebrosidase reconstitution of activity from macromolecular components	Recovery of apos; glucocerebrosidase activity from the macromolecular components.
18	the organ specificity of ferritin in human and horse liver and spleen	Ferritin specificity for organs in the liver and spleen of humans and horses.
18	thrombocytopenic purpura as the sole manifestation of a recurrence of hodgkin s disease	The only recurrence of Hodgkin's disease is thrombocytopenic purpura.
18	immunological control of polyoma virus oncogenesis in mice	Immunological Control of Polyoma Virus Oncogenesis in the mouse.
18	cathepsin a in human brain and spleen	Cathepsin is both in the human brain and in the spleen.
18	the subunit structure of horse spleen apoferritin the molecular weight of the oligomer and its stability to dissociation by dilution	The structure of sub-units of l' apoferritin of horse spleen molecular weight of l' oligomer and dilution dissociation stability.
18	carrier rate of salmonellas in sheep and goats and its public health significance	Rates of carriage of salmonella in sheep and goats, and importance to public health.
18	alkaline and acid phosphatase in murine leukemia	Acid and alkaline phosphatase in murine leukemia.
18	induction of immunological tolerance to soluble histocompatibility 2 antigens of mice	Induction of immunological apo tolerance; soluble histocompatibility 2 mouse antigens.
18	demonstration that antigen binding cells are precursors of antibody producing cells after purification with a fluorescence activated cell sorter	Demonstrate that antigen-binding cells are precursors of protein-producing cells; antibodies after purification with fluorescence-activated cell sorter.
18	extraction of equine infectious anemia immunodiffusion antigen with the aid of the chaotropic agent thiocyanate	In addition to the above-mentioned, there are a number of other drugs, such as anti-inflammatory drugs, anti-inflammatory drugs and anti-inflammatory drugs.
18	effect of stimulation of the host defense system by coenzyme q 10 on dibenzpyrene induced tumors and infection with friend leukemia virus in mice	The effect of coenzyme co-enzyme q 10 stimulation of the apo defence system on dibenzpyrene induces tumours and amoeba leukemia virus infection in mice.
18	active suppression of immunoglobulin allotype synthesis 3 identification of t cells as responsible for suppression by cells from spleen thymus lymph node and bone marrow	Active suppression of apos synthesis; apos allotype; immunoglobulin 3 allowed identification of the t-cells responsible for lymph node suppression of the thymus of the spleen and bone marrow.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes i allogeneic effect by irradiated host t cells on adoptively transferred histoincompatible b lymphocytes	Cellular Interactions Between Histoincompatible T-Lymphocytes and B-Lymphocytes Allogeneic Effect of Irradiated T-Lymphocytes from Lapos; Host on Adoptively Transferred Histoincompatible B-Lymphocytes.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes ii failure of physiologic cooperative interactions between t and b lymphocytes from allogeneic donor strains in humoral response to hapten protein conjugates	Histoincompatible t lymphocyte cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell cell.
18	relative distribution of arylsulphatases a and b in rat liver parenchymal and other cells	Relative distribution of arylsulfatases (a and b) in rat liver parenchyma and other cells.
18	a genetic locus for inducibility of c type in balb c cells the effect of a nonlinked regulatory gene on detection of virus after chemical activation	A genetic locus for apo; c-type inducibility in cells; dapo effect; an unlinked regulatory gene for chemically activated virus detection.
18	chromatographic evidence for the existence of multiple forms of cathepsin b1	Chromatographic evidence of the presence of multiple cathepsin b1.
18	ribonucleic acid protein fractions of virulent salmonella typhimurium as protective immunogens	Salmonella typhimurium virulent ribonucleic acid as proteogenic immunogens.
18	detection of delayed hypersensitivity in mice injected with ribonucleic acid protein fractions of salmonella typhimurium	Delayed hypersensitivity detection in mice injected with Salmonella typhimurium protein fractions; ribonucleic acid.
18	demonstration of antigenic identity between purified equine infectious anemia virus and an antigen extracted from infected horse spleen	Demonstration of apos; antigenic identity between infected horse spleen; purified equine infectious anemia.
18	subunit interactions in horse spleen apoferritin dissociation by extremes of ph	Unitary interactions-in the dissociation of the horse's spleen; apoferritin from the horse's spleen by ph.
18	the catalytic activity of horse spleen apoferritin preliminary kinetic studies and the effect of chemical modification	Catalytic activity of preliminary kinetic studies on the apos; apoferritin of the horse spleen and l' effect of chemical modification.
18	the molecular basis of codominant expression of the histocompatibility 2 genetic region	Molecular basis of apos; codominant expression of genetic region 2 d' histocompatibility.
18	the nature of the collagenolytic cathepsin of rat liver and its distribution in other rat tissues	The nature of collagenolytic rat liver cathepsin and its distribution in other rat tissues.
18	murine c type rna virus from spontaneous neoplasms in vitro host range and oncogenic potential	Virus rna murine type c from spontaneously occurring neoplasms, range of in vitro hosts and potential for oncogenicity.
18	adjuvant activity of mycobacterium leprae	Adjuvant mycobacterial activity leprae.
18	role of mitochondria in the production of rna containing tumor viruses	The role of mitochondria in producing tumor virus containing rna.
18	concentrations of asparagine in tissues of prepubertal rats after enzymic or dietary depletion of asparagine	Dapos concentrations; asparagine in prepubertal rat tissues after asparagine enzymatic or dietary depletion.
18	a new model for inducing malignant ovarian tumours in rats	A novel model to induce ovarian malignancies in rats.
18	rapid immunological induction of murine lymphomas evidence for a viral etiology	It is not possible to determine the cause of the disease in the absence of a viral etiology.
18	the allogeneic effect in inbred mice i experimental conditions for the enhancement of hapten specific secondary antibody responses by the graft versus host reaction	L' allogenic effect on inbred mice under experimental conditions; increase of secondary antibody responses specific to apos; haptene response by inbred mice vs. host.
18	immunity tolerance to a hapten nip coupled to an isologous carrier mouse gamma globulin	An isologous isologous gamma globulin transporter coupled with haptene.
18	decreased percentage of polymorphonuclear neutrophils in mouse peripheral blood after inoculation with material from multiple sclerosis patients	Reduced percentage of peripheral blood polymorphonuclear neutrophils in mice after inoculation of material from MS patients.
18	idiotype expression and the inheritance of mouse antibody clones	It is not possible to determine the genetic makeup of the two species.
18	biological expressions of lymphocyte activation ii generation of a population of thymus derived suppressor lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that lymphocyte activation may be associated with the development of thymus-derived suppressive lymphocytes.
18	termination of tolerance to human gamma globulin in mice by antigen and bacterial lipopolysaccharide endotoxin	End of Gamma tolerance-human globulin in mouse by bacterial lipopolysaccharide endotoxin; antigen and l&apos.
18	differentiation of thymus derived cells from precursors in mouse bone marrow	The differentiation of thymus-derived cells from the precursors in the bone marrow of mice.
18	a major genetic locus affecting resistance to infection with murine leukemia viruses 3 assignment of the fv 1 locus to linkage group 8 of the mouse	A major genetic locus affecting mouse leukemia virus resistance 3 assignment of locus fv 1 to mouse linkage group 8.
18	stimulation of anti brucella vaccination in mice by tetramisole a phenyl imidothiazole salt	Tetramisole, phenyl imidothiazole salt, stimulates vaccination against brucella in mice.
18	resistance to mycoplasma synoviae is bursal dependent	Mycoplasma synoviae resistance is bursa dependent.
18	immunity to vibrio cholerae in the mouse ii effect of a cell adherent immune factor	Immunity against vibrio cholerae in mice ii cell-adherent immune factor.
18	host gene control of type c rna tumor virus expression and tumorigenesis in inbred mice	In vitro studies have been conducted to determine the extent to which in vivo tumours are associated with the development of cancer.
18	a tumor antigen in tissue cultures derived from patients with hodgkin s disease	An antigen tumour in tissue cultures from Hodgkin's disease patients.
18	colonization resistance of the digestive tract and the spread of bacteria to the lymphatic organs in mice	Resistance to colonization of the gastrointestinal tract and bacterial spread to the mouse lymphatic organs.
18	induction of type c viruses in cultured guinea pig cells	Induction of c-type virus in guinea pig culture.
18	serological identification of an ir region product	It is important to note that this is not the case in the United States.
18	immunodepression by rowson parr virus in mice i growth curves of rowson parr virus and immunological relationships with friend virus	Rowson Parr Virus Immunosuppression in Mice i Growth Curves of Rowson Parr Virus and Immunologic Relationships with Friendly Virus.
18	some aspects of the pathogenesis and pathomorphology of leprosy	Aspects of leprosy pathogenesis and pathomorphology.
18	the allogeneic effect in inbred mice iv regulatory influences of graft vs host reactions on host t lymphocyte functions	L' allogenic effect in inbred mice iv regulatory influences of the grafted vs. host responses on the functions of the t-cells of the host.
18	synthesis intracellular distribution and secretion of immunoglobulin and h 2 antigen in muring splenocytes	Synthesis of intracellular secretion and distribution of apo; immunoglobulin and apo; antigen h 2 in developing splenocytes.
18	serum mediated leukemia cell destruction in akr mice	Akr mice serum-mediated leukemia cell destruction.
18	oligomeric iga the major component of the in vitro primary response of mouse spleen fragments	L' iga oligomer is the major component of the primary in vitro response of rat splenic fragments.
18	immunogenicity and immunosensitivity of urethane induced murine lung adenomata in relation to the immunological impairment of the primary tumour host	Immune and immunogenicity; immunosensitivity of murine pulmonary adenomas induced by apos; urethane related to apos; immunological alteration of primary host tumour.
18	the time course of cardiovascular changes in lactation in the rat	L' Temporal Evolution of Cardiovascular Changes in Rat Lactation.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro i development of primary and secondary plaque forming cell responses to the random terpolymer 1 glutamic acid 60 1 alanine30 1 tyrosine10 gat by mouse spleen cells in vitro	Genetic control of immune responses in vitro development of plaque-forming primary and secondary cellular responses to random 60 1 alanine30 1 tyrosine10 by mouse spleen cells in vitro.
18	overlap stimulation of primary and secondary b cells by cross reacting determinants	Primary and secondary b cell overlay stimulation by cross-reactive determinants.
18	an electrophoretic difference between surface and secreted igm of murine splenocytes	An electrophoretic difference between the surface and the cell surface secreted from the murine splenocytes.
18	effects of passive antibody on early pathogenesis of marek s disease	Effects of Passive Antibody (PAC) on the Early Pathogenesis of Marek s Disease.
18	tumor induction by cryptococcus neoformans	Tumour Induction with Cryptococcus neoformans.
18	influence of gonadal factors on skin test reactivity of cfw mice to candida albicans	Cfw, J.R., D.J. Hooker, D.J. Hooker, and D.J. Hooker.
18	influence of hormones and chemical carcinogen on murine leukaemia	Influence of Hormones and Cancer-causing Chemicals on Murine Leukemia.
18	schistosoma mansoni infection in mice depleted of thymus dependent lymphocytes ii pathology and altered pathogenesis	Mansoni Schistosome Infection in Thymus-Deficient Lymphocyte-Deficient Mice ii Pathology and Altered Pathogenesis.
18	leukemia virus activation during homograft rejection	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
18	mechanisms of thrombocytopenia in malignant tertian malaria	Thrombocytopenia mechanisms in Tertian Malaria.
18	rabbit blood lymphocytes may be t cells with surface immunoglobulins	Rabbit blood lymphocytes can be surface immunoglobulin-positive T-cells.
18	unique nuclear dna sequences in the involved tissues of hodgkin s and burkitt s lymphomas	In addition, there are a number of genetic differences between the two genotypes.
18	graft versus host reactions in mice iv thymus cell suppression of antibody formation	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
18	n2 guanine specific transfer rna methyltransferase i from rat liver and leukemic rat spleen	Specific guanine N2 transfer rna methyltransferase I from leukemic rat liver and spleen.
18	the role of the gut flora in the metabolism of cyclamate	Role of intestinal flora in cyclamate metabolism.
18	hapten specific ige antibody responses in mice ii cooperative interactions between adoptively transferred t and b lymphocytes in the development of ige response	Mouse serum antibody specific reactions; hapten ii Co-operative interactions between adopted t- and b-lymphocytes in response development.
18	transformation of histocompatibility immunogen into a tolerogen	In addition, it can be used as an antibody to induce the immune response.
18	mouse splenic peroxidase and its role in bactericidal activity	Mice splenic peroxidase and role in bactericidal activity.
18	recall of acquired cellular resistance in mice by antigens from killed brucella	A reminder of the cellular resistance acquired by killed brucella antigens in mice.
18	degree of immunity induced by killed vaccines to experimental salmonellosis in mice	Degree of immunity to vaccine-induced experimental salmonellosis in mice.
18	helper dependent properties of friend spleen focus forming virus effect of the fv 1 gene on the late stages in virus synthesis	Assist in concentration-dependent peptide properties; friend forming peptides; viral effect of fv1 gene on late stages of viral synthesis.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice i morphology quantitation tissue distribution	Identification of a new cell type in the mouse peripheral lymphoid organs i morphology quantification of tissue distribution.
18	tumor induction by immunologically activated murine leukemia virus	Tumour Induction by Immunologically Activated Murine Leukemia Virus.
18	genetic control of the immune response frequency and characteristics of antigen binding cells in high and low responder mice	Genetic control of frequency of immune response and characteristics of antigen-binding cells in high- and low-responsive mice.
18	graft versus host reactions across different regions of the h 2 complex of the mouse	Graft versus host responses in different areas of mouse h2 complex.
18	biological characteristics of t and b memory lymphocytes in the rat	T- and b-memory lymphocyte biologic characteristics in rats.
18	pancreatic involvement by venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis virus in the hamster	Pancreatic Implication of Venezuelan Equine Encephalomyelitis in the Hamster.
18	deoxyribonucleic acid dependent ribonucleic acid polymerases from murine spleen cells increased amounts of the nucleolar species in leukaemic tissue	Apos polymerases; apos-dependent ribonucleic acid; deoxyribonucleic acid from murine rat liver cells increased the amount of apos; nucleolar species in leukemic tissues.
18	immunoglobulin synthesis and secretion by cells in the mouse thymus that do not bear theta antigen	Synthesis and secretion of apo; immunoglobulins from non-apos thymus cells; theta antigen.
18	infection at the subcellular level ii distribution and fate of intravenously injected brucellae within phagocytic cells of guinea pigs	Subcellular infection ii distribution of intravenously injected brucella into guinea pig phagocytic cells.
18	virulence of six strains of mycobacterium bovis bcg in mice	Virulence of six mycobacterium bovis bcg strains in mice.
18	polyarthritis associated with salmonella infection in rats	Apos-associated polyarthritis; rat Salmonella infection.
18	an analysis of the close relationship of lysosomes to early deposits of amyloid ultrastructural evidence in experimental mouse amyloidosis	An analysis of the close relationship between lysosomes and early deposition of amyloidal ultrastructural elements in mouse lysosomes and amyloidosis.
18	a bacteriological study of endemic tuberculosis in birds	A Bacteriological Study of Endemic Tuberculosis in Birds.
18	mannosidosis in angus cattle the enzymic defect	Angus cattle Mannosidose enzyme defect.
18	a mouse b cell alloantigen determined by gene s linked to the major histocompatibility complex	The alloantigen of mouse b cells is determined by major histocompatibility genes.
18	maturation of b lymphocytes in the rat i migration pattern tissue distribution and turnover rate of unprimed and primed b lymphocytes involved in the adoptive antidinitrophenyl response	Maturation of b-cells in rat migration pattern i, tissue distribution, and turnover rate of unbooted and primed b-cells involved in the rat anti-initrophenyl adoptive response.
18	a cyclical appearance of antibody producing cells after a single injection of serum protein antigen	In addition, the antibody may be used in combination with other antigen-producing cells, e.g. antigen.
18	anatomical distribution of t and b lymphocytes in the rat development of lymphocyte specific antisera	Anatomical distribution of T- and B-cells in rat lymphocyte-specific antisera.
18	the ability of bacterial lipopolysaccharide to modulate the induction of unresponsiveness to a state of immunity cellular parameters	Bacterial lipopolysaccharide ability to modulate the apos; induction of non-response to a state of cellular parameters of the apos; immunity.
18	increased reactivity of mouse spleen cells sensitized in vitro against syngeneic tumor cells in the presence of a thymic humoral factor	Increased responsiveness of mouse spleen cells in vitro sensitizes syngenic tumor cells to thymic humoral factors.
18	specific murine b cell activation by synthetic single and double stranded polynucleotides	Synthetic single- and double-stranded polynucleotide specific activation of murine b cells.
18	regulatory properties of adenosine triphosphate l methionine s adenosyltransferase of rat liver	The regulatory properties of the adenosine triphosphate methionine adenosyltransferase from rat liver.
18	enhancement of resistance to infectious diseases by oral administration of brewer s yeast	Increased infectious disease resistance by oral administration of brewing yeast.
18	delayed type hypersensitivity and immunity against aerogenic tuberculosis in guinea pigs	Delayed-type hypersensitivity and airborne tuberculosis immunity in guinea pigs.
18	effect of corynebacterium parvum treatment on the growth of salmonella enteritidis in mice	Effects of Corynebacterium parvum on growth of Salmonella enteritidis in mice.
18	correlates to increased lethality of attenuated venezuelan encephalitis virus vaccine for immunosuppressed hamsters	There is a correlation between attenuated VEV vaccine's increased lethality in immunosuppressed hamsters.
18	leucocyte migration studies with spleen preparations in crohn s disease	Studies of leukocyte migration with Crohn's disease spleen preparations.
18	ribonucleic acid components of murine sarcoma and leukemia viruses	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
18	preparation and biological properties of water soluble adjuvant fractions from delipidated cells of mycobacterium smegmatis and nocardia opaca	Water-soluble adducing fractions of unbound mycobacterium smegmatis and nocardia opaca cells prepared and bio-properties.
18	multiplicity of scrapie virus in infected mouse spleen cells in vivo	The multiplicity of the scrapie virus in the spleen cells of infected mice in vivo.
18	in vitro transformation of mouse bone marrow derived b lymphocytes induced by the lipid component of endotoxin	In vitro transformation of b lymphocytes derived from the bone marrow of mice induced by the lipid component of l' endotoxin.
18	granulocyte macrophage precursor cell and colony stimulating factor responses of mice infected with salmonella typhimurium	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
18	mechanisms regulating the cardiac output response to cyanide infusion a model of hypoxia	Mechanisms regulating the response of cardiac output to cyanide infusion, hypoxia model.
18	effects of splenectomy and beta adrenoceptor blockade on cardiac output response to acute hypoxemia	Acute hypoxemia is a major cause of heart failure, and is a major cause of heart failure and stroke.
18	selective roles of thymus derived lymphocytes in the antibody response i differential suppressive effect of carrier primed t cells on hapten specific igm and igg antibody responses	Selective Roles of Thymus-derived Lymphocytes in the Differential Suppressant Effect of Carrier T-Cells on Hapos-specific IgG and Ig antibody responses.
18	acute systemic anaphylaxis in the horse	Acute horse systemic anaphylaxis.
18	comparison of the capillary tube and explant methods for the in vitro assay of tuberculin	Comparison of Capillary Tube and Explant Methods for In Vitro Tuberculin Assay.
18	immunogenicity of living and heat killed salmonella pullorum vaccines	It is not possible to determine if the vaccine is effective in reducing the risk.
18	isolation of a neurotropic type c virus	Neurotrope virus type c.
18	studies of escherichia coli infection in chickens	For more information, please contact the nearest DIAND regional office.
18	in vitro studies on strain dependent production of thymus specific autoantibodies	In Vitro Production Studies, strain-dependent, d' auto-thymus specific antibodies.
18	monoclonal production of both igm and igg1 antihapten antibody	Chaptene monoclonal production; anti-haptene and anti-haptene antibody.
18	induction of b cell tolerance in vitro to 2 4 dinitrophenyl coupled to a copolymer of d glutamic acid and d lysine dnp d gl	In vitro induction of tolerance of 24 dinitrophenyl b cells coupled to a d&apos copolymer; glutamic acid and d' lysine dnp dng gl.
18	proliferation of b and t cells in mixed lymphocyte cultures	B- and t-cell proliferation in mixed-cell cultures.
18	functional heterogeneity of murine lymphoid cells v lymphocytes lacking detectable surface theta or immunoglobulin determinants	Murine v lymphoid lymphocyte functional heterogeneity lacking surface theta or detectable immunoglobulin.
18	development of cellular and humoral immunity in the respiratory tract of rabbits to pseudomonas lipopolysaccharide	Development of l' cell and humoral immunity against pseudomonas lipopolysaccharide in rabbit respiratory tract.
18	immunohistochemical demonstration of igg in reed sternberg and other cells in hodgkin s disease	Immunohistochemical demonstration of apos; sternberg reed and dapos; other Hodgkin's disease cells.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocytes 3 h 2 linkage of a gene controlling the rate of appearance of complement receptor lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	induction of immunological tolerance to a thymus dependent antigen in the absence of thymus derived cells	Induction of immunological tolerance to thymus-dependent antigen in absence of thymus-derived cells.
18	twp populations of t lymphocytes immune to the lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	Twp populations of lymphocyte choriomeningitis-immunized t-cells.
18	evaluation of methods for isolating salmonella and arizona organisms from pet turtles	Assessment of methods; isolation of Salmonella and Apos organisms; Arizona isolation from pet turtles.
18	chromosomal abnormalities in spleens of new zealand black mice a strain characterized by autoimmunity and malignancy	In addition, there are a number of genetic markers that can be used to determine the genetic makeup of the mouse.
18	primate and murine type c viral nucleic acid association kinetics analysis of model systems and natural tissues	Kinetic analysis of l' viral association of nucleic acids in primates and c-type mice from model systems and natural tissues.
18	highly purified papain solubilized hl a antigens contain beta2 microglobulin	Highly purified papain-solubilized a-hl antigens contained beta2 microglobulin.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice ii functional properties in vitro	Identification of a novel mouse peripheral lymphoid organ cell type ii Functional properties in vitro.
18	isolation and characterization of c type viral gene products of virus negative mouse cells	Isolation and characterization of virus-negative mouse cell c-type viral gene products.
18	ultrastructural studies of a visna like syncytia producing virus from cattle with lymphocytosis	In addition, it is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is possible to determine the cause of the infection.
18	oncogenicity of an endogenous c type virus chemically activated from mouse cells in culture	An endogenous c-type virus activated chemically from cultured mouse cells.
18	procainamide induced sle and lymphoreticular disorders	Procainamide induced sleep disturbance and impaired lymphoreticular function.
18	simultaneous occurrence of acute myeloblastic leukaemia and multiple myeloma without previous chemotherapy	Acute myeloblastic leukemia (AML) is a multi-cellular myeloma without prior chemotherapy.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny i commitment to immunoglobulin allotype	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
18	roles of t and b lymphocytes in the termination of unresponsiveness to autologous thyroglobulin in mice	T- and b-cells play a role in the latter part of the mouse's non-@-@ response to autologous thyroglobulin.
18	alloantiserum induced inhibition of immune response gene product function ii genetic analysis of target antigens	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
18	graft vs host reactions in reciprocal hybrid mice i dissociation of t cell activities in the mixed lymphocyte reaction and two graft vs host assays	Graft vs. Host Reactions in Reciprocal Hybrid Mice i dissociation of t-cell activities in the mixed lymphocyte response and two graft vs. host assays.
18	autoradiographic studies on the proliferation of antibody producing cells in vitro	Autoradiography studies of apo-producing cell proliferation; antibodies in vitro.
18	new third class of amyloid fibril protein	New third class fibrillar amyloid proteins.
18	inhibition of a t cell dependent immune response in vitro by thymoma cell immunoglobulin	In vitro, immunotherapy; cell-mediated immune response; thymoma cell immunoglobulin.
18	identity of acid beta glucosidase and glucocerebrosidase in human spleen	Identity of Beta-Acid Glucosidase and Glucocerebrosidase in Human Spleen.
18	glucocerebrosidase reconstitution from macromolecular components depends on acidic phospholipids	The reconstitution of glucocerebrosidase from macromolecular components is dependent on the acid phospholipids.
18	drug induced change in the distribution of sulfonamides in the mother rat and its fetus	The drug induced a change in sulfonamide distribution in rat-mother and fetus.
18	immunological control of macrophage proliferation in vivo	Immunological Control of Macrophage Proliferation in Vivo.
18	the psoas sign hepatic angle normal patients and everyday practice	Psoas are apos; normal patient hepatic angle and daily practice.
18	action of ribonuclease t1 on 30s ribosomes of escherichia coli and its role in sequence studies on 16s ribonucleic acid	L' action of ribonuclease t1 on ribosomes 30s; role of escherichia coli in apos; study of the sequence of apos; 16s ribonucleic acid.
18	the life span of iga plasma cells from the mouse intestine	Longevity of Giga Plasma Cells; mouse intestine.
18	hapten specific stimulation of secondary b cells independent of t cells	Specific stimulation of secondary b-cells by etapos; haptene is produced independently of t-cells.
18	induction of t lymphocytes from precursor cells in vitro by a product of the thymus	Induction of t-cells from thymus precursor cells in vitro.
18	comparison of the virulence for mice of salmonella typhimurium given by the intraperitoneal and subcutaneous routes	Comparison of Salmonella typhimurium mouse virulence given intraperitoneally and under-skin.
18	a sequence of seventy three nucleotides from the coliphage r17 genome	Seventy nucleotides were sequenced from the r17 coliphage genome.
18	the sensitivity of cells in exponential and stationary phases of growth to bleomycin and to 1 3 bis 2 chloroethyl 1 nitrosourea	The sensitivity of stationary growth phase cells to bleomycin and 1 bis 2-chloroethyl-1-nitrosourea.
18	the effect of irradiating a transplanted murine lymphosarcoma on the subsequent development of metastases	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	effects of cyclic starvation feeding and of splenectomy on the development of hemosiderosis in rat livers	Effects of cyclic fasting and splenectomy on apo development; hemosiderosis in the liver of rats.
18	transplantation of autoimmune potential i development of antinuclear antibodies in h 2 histocompatible recipients of bone marrow from new zealand black mice	Anti-nuclear antibodies in novel histocompatible h 2 bone marrow recipients of zeland black mice.
18	an antigen in hodgkin s disease tissue cultures fluorescent antibody studies	In addition, a new antigen is being developed in the tissues of Hodgkin's disease and is being used for the development of fluorescent antibodies.
18	transformation by simian virus 40 of spleen cells from a hyperimmune rabbit evidence for synthesis of immunoglobulin by the transformed cells	Simian virus 40 transformation of d&apos spleen cells; a hyperimmunized rabbit demonstrated d' transformed cell immunoglobulin synthesis.
18	transformation by simian virus 40 of spleen cells from a hyperimmune rabbit demonstration of production of specific antibody to the immunizing antigen	In addition to the antibody, the immune system can also be used as an antigen-producing antigen in rabbits and rabbits, as well as in rabbits.
18	immunostimulation with bacterial phospholipid extracts	Bacterial phospholipid extract immunostimulation.
18	first detection of tularaemia in domestic and wild mammals in iran	First detection of tularemia in Iranian domestic and wild mammals.
18	biological and biochemical evidence for an interaction between marek s disease herpesvirus and avian leukosis virus in vivo	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the risk of avian leukosis and the risk of avian leukosis.
18	pathogenesis and immunology of experimental gonococcal infection virulence of colony types of neisseria gonorrhoeae for chicken embryos	Pathogenesis and Immunology of Experimental Virulence in Apos; Gonococcal Infections of Neisseria gonorrhoeae colony types in chick embryos.
18	immunity to candida albicans induced by listeria monocytogenes	Listeria monocytogenes candida albicans immunity.
18	synergy among responding lymphoid cells in the one way mixed lymphocyte reaction interaction between two types of thymus dependent cells	The synergism between lymphoid cells reacting in the same manner mixed the apos; interaction of the lymphocyte response between two thymus-dependent cell types.
18	effector cell blockade a new mechanism of immune hyporeactivity induced by multivalent antigens	Effective cells block a novel multivalent antigen-induced immune hyporesponsiveness mechanism.
18	antigenic differences between hemopoietic stem cells and myeloid progenitors	Antigenic Differences Between Hematopoietic Stem Cells and Myeloid Progenitors.
18	the effect of sea star coelomocyte extract on cell mediated resistance to listeria monocytogenes in mice	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
18	inhibition of specific cell mediated cytotoxicity by anti t cell receptor antibody	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocyte function i restricted heterogeneity of the antibody response of b lymphocytes from neonatal and fetal mice	It is important to note, however, that the results of these studies are not consistent with those reported by the authors of this study.
18	vi antigen from salmonella typhosa and immunity against typhoid fever i isolation and immunologic properties in animals	Salmonella Typhosa Antigen Virus and Typhoid Fever Immunity i Isolation and Immunological Properties in Animals.
18	effects of carbon dust inhalation on the cell mediated immune response in mice	Effects of inhalation of carbon dust on immune response to cell-mediated disease in mice.
18	development of specific cell dependent antibody during growth of a syngeneic rat sarcoma	Specific cell-dependent antibodies developed during the growth of rat syngene sarcoma.
18	the effect of preadministration of corynebacterium parvum on the protection afforded by heat killed and acetone killed vaccines against experimental mouse typhoid	In addition to the above-mentioned benefits, there are a number of other benefits to be gained from the use of vaccines such as corynebacterium parvum.
18	sensitive in vivo assay for detection of murine leukemia viruses	Sensitive in vivo test for murine leukemia viruses.
18	reduced cell yields of mouse cell line cultures after exposure to homogenates of multiple sclerosis tissues	Cell yield of cultured mouse cell lines decreased following exposure to multiple sclerosis tissue homogenates.
18	immunological responses to candida albicans ii amyloidosis in mice induced by candidiasis	Canadian Journal of Public Health and Public Health, 8(1), 10–12.
18	studies on the extended active sites of acid proteinases	Acid proteinase extensive active site studies.
18	prostaglandins and the mechanism of analgesia produced by aspirin like drugs	Prostaglandins and apo mechanism; analgesia produced by apo-like drugs; aspirin.
18	selective toxicity of diphtheria toxin for malignant cells	Selective Toxicity of Diphtheria Toxin to Malignant Cells.
18	a synthetic glycolipid with b cell mitogenic activity	Synthetic glycolipid mitogenic to b cells.
18	studies on the heparin sulphamidase activity from rat spleen intracellular distribution and characterization of the enzyme	In addition to the above studies, a number of studies have been carried out to determine the extent to which the enzyme is present in the rat rat spleen.
18	restoration of immune competence in tolerant mice by parabiosis to normal mice	Recovery of Immune Competence in Parabiosis Tolerant Mice to Normal Mice.
18	the purification of bovine cathepsin b1 and its mode of action on bovine collagens	Cathepsin b1 purification and its mode of action on collagen cattle.
18	permissiveness of athymic nude mice towards congenic memory cells	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been carried out in this area.
18	immunoblastic lymphadenopathy a hyperimmune entity resembling hodgkin s disease	Hodgkin's disease-like hyperimmune organism, immunoblastic lymphadenopathy.
18	vinyl chloride induced liver disease from idiopathic portal hypertension banti s syndrome to angiosarcomas	In addition, there was a significant increase in the number of women who had sex with men, including those who had sex with men.
18	single and repeated infections of grivet monkeys with schistosoma mansoni parasitological and pathological observations over a 31 month period	One-time, repeated infection of apes with 31-month parasitological and pathological observations of schistosoma mansoni.
18	spontaneous regression of friend virus induced leukemia coinfection with regressing and conventional strains of virus	Spontaneous regression of the virus caused a co-leukemic infection with conventional and regressive virus strains.
18	genetic control of responses to bacterial lipopolysaccharides in mice i evidence for a single gene that influences mitogenic and immunogenic respones to lipopolysaccharides	Genetic control of mouse responses to bacterial lipopolysaccharides showed the existence of single genes that influence mitogenic and immunogenic responsibilities to lipopolysaccharides.
18	pharmacology of a new triazine antifolate in mice rats dogs and monkeys	Pharmacology of mouse, dog and monkey rats, a novel triazine antifolate.
18	different hematological diseases induced by type c viruses chemically activated from embryo cells of different mouse strains	Different hematological diseases caused by c-type viruses that are chemically activated from different strains of mice.
18	immune inhibition of allogeneic lymphoma cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice	L' immune inhibition of mouse peritoneal lymphoma cells.
18	alterations in ribonuclease activities in the plasma spleen and thymus of tumor bearing mice	Changes in plasma thymus and spleen ribonuclease activity in tumor-carrying mice.
18	experimental cirrhosis of the liver obtained with simultaneous carbon tetrachloride and phenobarbital sodium	Experimental liver cirrhosis obtained simultaneously with sodium phenobarbital and carbon tetrachloride.
18	association of salmonella typhimurium with and its invasion of the ileal mucosa in mice	L' association of typhimurium salmonella with mouse ileal mucosa and invasion by this bacterium.
18	effect of local corticosteroids on antibody forming cells in the eye and draining lymph nodes	Effect of local corticosteroids on apo-cell antibody formation; eye antibody and lymph node drainage.
18	concomitant changes in adenylate cyclase and cytolytic activities of lymphoid cells during graft versus host reaction	Cardiovascular System (CPS) - A system of tissues, tissues, tissues, and organs that can be used to treat a disease.
18	a selective inhibitor of the elicitation of immune mediated reactions	An immune-mediated stimulation-selective inhibitor.
18	accumulation of oxygenated steryl esters in wolman s disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the disease.
18	difference in kinetic properties between hexokinase type i isoenzymes from various rat tissues with reference to the effect of a thiol inhibitor	In addition, there is a high degree of uncertainty in the interpretation of the kinetic properties of the isoenzymes, and a high degree of uncertainty in the interpretation of the results.
18	immunogenic properties of modified antigen e ii ability of urea denatured antigen and alpha polypeptide chain to prime t cells specific for antigen e	Immunogenic properties of apos; modified antigen; ability of apos; antigen denatured by apos; urea and the alpha-polypeptide chain to produce apos-specific primary t-cells; antigen; e.
18	ir associated murine alloantigens demonstration of multiple ia specificities in h 2 alloantisera after selective absorptions	The moth-associated alloantigens show multiple specificity in both alloantiomers after selective absorptions.
18	relation of dna synthesis and suppression to development of memory by t cells	Relationship between synthesis and deletion of DNA and memory development by t-cells.
18	inhibition of proliferation of lymphoma cells and t lymphocytes by suppressor cells from spleens of tumor bearing mice	It is not possible to determine the extent to which lymphoma and t-cell proliferation are suppressed by the suppressive cells of tumor-carrying mice.
18	capacity of sensitized thymus derived lymphocytes to induce fatal lymphocytic choriomeningitis is restricted by the h 2 gene complex	The ability of sensitized thymus-derived lymphocytes to induce fatal lymphocyte choriomeningitis is limited by their h2 gene complex.
18	the selective action of poly a u on the electrophoretic mobility and surface charge of a subpopulation of b cells	In addition to the above, the cell surface mass of the cells is determined by the cell surface mass of the cell.
18	radiocolloid scans in evaluating splenic response to external radiation	Radiocolloid scans in apo; spleen response evaluation to external radiation.
18	maturation of b lymphocytes in the rat ii subpopulations of virgin b lymphocytes in the spleen and thoracic duct lymph	B lymphocyte maturation in rat ii under-thoracic duct lymph and spleen virgin b lymphocyte populations.
18	the adjuvant activity of mycobacterial rna preparations and synthetic polynucleotides for induction of delayed hypersensitivity to purified protein derivative in guinea pigs	L' adjuvant activity of synthetic mycobacterial rna and polynucleotide preparations for apos; induction of apos; delayed hypersensitivity to a purified protein derivative in the guinea pig.
18	complement mediated alteration of antibody specificity in vivo	Change in the complement-mediated specificity of antibodies in vivo.
18	rabbit lymphocyte populations responding to haptenic and carrier determinants for dna synthesis	In addition, it is not possible to determine the extent to which the protein is present in the tissue.
18	biological expressions of lymphocyte activation iv concanavalin a activated suppressor cells in mouse mixed lymphocyte reactions	Biological expression of apo; concanavalin iv lymphocyte activation activated suppressive cells in mixed lymphocyte responses in mice.
18	listeria cell wall fraction a b cell mitogen	Cell wall fractionation of listeria, b-cell mitogen.
18	adult murine lymph node cells respond blastogenically to a new differentiation antigen on isologous and autologous b lymphocytes	The cells of adult murine lymph nodes respond blastogenetically to a new antigen of differentiation on isologous and autologous lymphocytes.
18	suppression of the immune response by alpha fetoprotein on the primary and secondary antibody response	Suppression of immune response by fetoprotein alpha on primary and secondary immune response.
18	demonstration of an antibody mediated tolerance state and its effect on antibody affinity	Demonstration of antibody-mediated state of tolerance and antibody-mediated effect on the apos; antibody affinity.
18	sequential responses of mouse spleen t cells in mixed lymphocyte culture induced cytolysis	Sequential responses of t-cells from mouse spleen in mixed lymphocyte culture elicited cytolysis.
18	an inhibitor of cell proliferation released by cultures of macrophages	Cell-proliferation inhibitor released from the macrophage cultures.
18	actin is the naturally occurring inhibitor of deoxyribonuclease i	Actin is a natural deoxyribonuclease inhibitor i.
18	induction of endogenous virus and of thymidine kinase by bromodeoxyuridine in cell cultures transformed by friend virus	Bromodeoxyuridine induced endogenous virus and thymidine kinase in friendly virus transformed cell cultures.
18	immunologic induction of malignant lymphoma identification of donor and host tumors in the graft versus host model	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	some aspects of host response to levamisole after chemotherapy in a murine leukemia	Aspects of the response of the host to levamisole following murine leukemia chemotherapy.
18	inhibition of migration of murine spleen cells by rauscher leukemia virus infected syngeneic cells	L' inhibition of mouse spleen cell migration by leukemia infects syngen cells.
18	friend leukemia rapid development of erythropoietin independent hematopoietic precursors	Ami leukemia is rapidly developing hematopoietic, apos-independent precursors; erythropoietin.
18	isolation of a b tropic type c virus from reticulum cell neoplasms induced in balb c mice by sjl j type c virus	In addition, it is recommended that the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) continue to monitor the quality and safety of these products.
18	interaction between aromatic diamidines and nucleic acids possible implications for chemotherapy	Aromatic diamidines interacting with nucleic acids, possible implications for chemotherapy.
18	embryonic antigens shared between chemically induced lymphosarcomas and fibrosarcomas of the mouse	Embryonic antigens are common to chemically induced mouse lymphosarcomas and fibrosarcomas.
18	failure to detect chromosome damage in vivo in friend virus infected leukemic mice	Failure to detect in vivo chromosomal damage in leukemic mice infected with L. etapos; friend.
18	genetic transmission of endogenous n and b tropic murine leukemia viruses in low leukemic strain c57bl 6	Genetic transmission of endogenous murine n- and b-tropic leukemia viruses from low-leukemia c57bl 6.
18	inclusion body disease herpesvirus infection of falcons ibdf	Includes herpesvirus body disease, falcon infection, ibdf.
18	inclusion body disease in a great horned owl	In addition, there is the possibility of an increase in the number of cases.
18	virus initiated septic shock acute death of venezuelan encephalitis virus infected hamsters	The virus caused septic shock, hamster acute death from the Venezuelan encephalitis virus.
18	inhibition of the prostaglandin synthetase systems in ocular tissues by indomethacin	Inhibition of ocular tissue prostaglandin synthetase systems by indomethacin.
18	splenic mobility and its effect on estimates of splenic mass	The effect of splenic mobility on the weight of the skin.
18	a case of waldenstrom s macroglobulinemia complicated by diabetes insipidus	A case of Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia is complicated by diabetes.
18	detection of nonspecific resistance to listeria monocytogenes in rabbits infected with treponema pallidum	Detection of non-specific resistance to listeria monocytogenes in pallidum-infected rabbits.
18	age dependence of viral expression comparative pathogenesis of two rodent adapted strains of measles virus in mice	Impact of apo; age on comparative apo pathogenesis; viral expression of two adapted measles virus strains in mice.
18	ammonium nitrogen in fetuses of urea treated sheep	Ammonium nitrogen (ammonium nitrogen) in foetuses from sheep treated with urea.
18	marked prolongation of skin homograft survival with niridazole a first report	Acute prolongation of survival of homografts of the skin with niridazole, an initial report.
18	studies on aryl phosphate hydrolysis by human acid phsophatases	Acute toxicity studies; Acute toxicity studies; Acute toxicity studies; Acute toxicity studies.
18	testis antigens of man and some other primates	Antigens of the testicles of the human and other primates.
18	frequency and gradient dispersion of viscosity of dna solutions	Frequency and dispersion gradient of the viscosity of DNA-DNA-DNA-DNA solutions.
18	monocytic leukaemia in the dog	Dog monocytic leukemia.
18	experimental polymer storage disease in rabbits an approach to the histogenesis of sphingolipidoses	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch.
18	structural and hormonal alterations in the gastrointestinal tract of parenterally fed rats	Structural and hormonal changes in the gastro tract-intestinal in parenterally-fed rats.
18	immunologic implications of vasectomy i cell mediated immunity	Cell-mediated immune Implications of Vasectomy i.
18	immunologic implications of vasectomy ii serum mediated immunity	Immunologic Implications of Vasectomy ii. serum-mediated immunity.
18	the mechanism of carcinogenic action of 1 2 dimethylhydrazine sdmh in rats	Mechanisms; rat carcinogenicity of 12 dimethylhydrazine sdmh.
18	specific anti tumor responses by cultured immune spleen cells i in vitro culture method and initial characterization of factors which block immune cell mediated cytotoxicity in vitro	Specific anti-viral reactions-specific spleen immune cells cultured i in vitro culture method and initial characterization of factors that inhibit in vitro immune cell-mediated cytotoxicity.
18	induction of malignant lymphomas in swiss mice by n nitroso compounds formed in vivo	Malignant lymphoma induced in Swiss mice by in vivo n-nitroso compounds.
18	immunological phenomena in harmless mice during experimental carcinogenesis induced with long term topical application of 7 12 dimethylbenzanthracene dmba	Immunological events in mice that are safe during experimental apo-induced carcinogenesis; long-term topical application of 712, dimethylbenzanthracene dmba.
18	inflammatory lymphocyte in cell mediated antibacterial immunity factors governing the accumulation of mediator t cells in peritoneal exudates	Inflammatory lymphocyte in apo factors; cell-mediated antibacterial immunity regulating apo; mediating t-cell accumulation in peritoneal exudates.
18	effect of synthetic disaccharide protein conjugate as an immunogen in salmonella infection in mice	Effect of Synthetic Disaccharide Protein Conjugate as Immunogen in Apos; Salmonella Infection in Mouse.
18	naturally occurring double stranded rna and immune responses effects on plaque forming cells and antibody formation	The effects of the immune response and of the double-stranded RNA on plaque-forming cells and the formation of antibodies.
18	t cell dependent helper and suppressive influences in an adoptive igg antibody response	To help the t-dependent cells and the suppressive influences in a response of the adopted antibody.
18	blocking antigen antibody complexes on the t lymphocyte activation during in vitro incubation before adoptive transfer	Block d&apos complexes; antigenic antibodies on apos; activation of t-cells during apos; in vitro pre-transfer incubation.
18	blocking antigen antibody complexes on the t lymphocye surface identified with defined protein antigens ii lymphocyte activation during the in vitro response	Blocking of cell complexes; antigenic antibodies on the lymphocyte surface identified at baseline; assistance in detection; defined protein antigens; and lymphocyte activation during in vitro response.
18	permanent hapten specific tolerance in b lymphocytes	Tolerances in other tissues, such as red blood cells, are not recommended.
18	prolonged c3 depletion by cobra venom factor in thymus deprived mice and its implication for the role of c3 as an essential second signal for b cell triggering	Prolonged depletion of c3 by cobra venom factor in thymus-deprived mice and its involvement in c3 function as the second essential c3 signal for b-cell activation.
18	growth of typhoid and paratyphoid bacilli in intravenously infected mice	Growth of paratyphoid and typhoid bacilli in intravenous infected mice.
18	induction of disseminated virulent cytomegalovirus infection by immunosuppression of naturally chronically infected wild mice	Induction of apo; virulent cytomegalovirus immunosuppressed infection of wild mice chronically infected naturally.
18	mast cells and myelofibrosis	Mastocyte myelofibrosis.
18	antigen specific thymus cell factors in the genetic control of the immune response to poly tyrosyl glutamyl poly d l alanyl poly lysyl	Thymos-specific cellular thymus factors; antigen in genetic control of immune response to polytyrosyl glutamyl dalanyl poly lysyl.
18	the differentiation pathway of t lymphocytes evidence for two differentiated cell types	The T-cell differentiation pathway reveals the existence of two distinct types of cells.
18	concancvalin a binding proteins of lymphoid cell surface	Concancvaline is a surface-binding protein found in lymphoid cells.
18	purification of terminal riboadenylate transferase from calf thymus gland	Terminal riboadenylate transferase purification of calf thymus gland.
18	studies and sequences of escherichia coli 4 5 s rna	It is important to note that this is not the case.
18	differences in subunit composition and iron content of isoferritins	Differences in the composition of isoferritin subs-units and iron content.
18	nucleotide sequence studies of normal and genetically altered glycine transfer ribonucleic acids from escherichia coli	Lapses; study of the sequence of nucleotides of genetically engineered and normal glycine transfer ribonucleic acids from apos; escherichia coli.
18	the nucleotide sequence of a precursor to the glycine and threonine specific transfer ribonucleic acids of escherichia coli	A precursor to glycine- and threonine-specific transfer ribonucleic acids; escherichia coli.
18	cell mediated immune responses in vitro i suppression of the generation of cytotoxic lymphocytes by concanavalin a and concanavalin a activated spleen cells	In vitro cell-mediated immune responses suppressed concanavalin a and concanavalin-activated spleen cell cytotoxic lymphocyte generation.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny ii commitment to immunoglobulin heavy chain isotype	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	quantitative studies on tumor enhancement in mice i enhancement of sarcoma i induced by igm igg1 and igg2	Quantitative studies of cervical cancer, cervical cancer, cervical cancer, cervical cancer, and cervical cancer.
18	regulation of spleen growth and portal pressure in hepatic shcistosomiasis	The regulation of the growth of the spleen and of the pressure carries into the hepatic shcistosomiasis.
18	acceleration of amyloidosis by syngeneic spleen cells from normal donors	Amyloidosis by syngenic cells of normal donors.
18	demonstration by affinity chromatography of the cell free synthesis of ribonuclease specific immunoglobulin	Apos chromatography demonstration; cell-free synthesis affinity of apos; ribonuclease-specific immunoglobulin.
18	size of the polyadenylic acid region of newly synthesized globin messenger ribonucleic acid	Size of the region of l' polyadenyl acid of l' ribonucleic acid messenger of the newly synthesized globin.
18	transmission of marble spleen disease in turkeys and pheasants	Transmission of Marble Spleen Disease in Turkeys and Pheasants.
18	collimation and surface counting in haematology	Hematology, hematology and hematology.
18	the effect of electromagnetic radiation on the hematopoietic stem cells of mice	Effect of Electromagnetic Radiation on Hematopoietic Mouse Stem Cells.
18	segmental pancreatic lesions after partial or total splenectomy in rabbits	Partial or total splenectomy of the pancreatic segmental lesion in rabbits.
18	operative choice and technique following pancreatic injury	It's a good way to help you decide what to do next and what to do next.
18	the viral envelope glycoprotein of murine leukemia virus and the pathogenesis of immune complex glomerulonephritis of new zealand mice	Glycoprotein of L' Murine Leukemia Virus Virus Envelope and the Pathogenesis of Glomerulonephritis Immune Complex in Neo-Mice-Zealandaises.
18	immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia viruses i induction of immunologic disease and lymphoma in balb c times nzb f1 mice by scripps leukemia virus	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this conclusion, and it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this conclusion.
18	blockage of amyloid induction by colchicine in an animal model	Prepared for the Canadian Wildlife Service, Environment Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
18	isolation of antigen binding cells from unprimed mice demonstration of antibody forming cell precursor activity and correlation between precursor and secreted antibody avidities	The isolation of uninitiated mouse antigen-binding cells demonstrates a precursor activity of antibodies and a correlation between the avidity of the precursors and the avidity of the secreted antibodies.
18	restriction of gene expression in b lymphocytes and their progeny iii endogenous iga and igm on the membranes of different plasma cell precursors	Restriction of l' gene expression in b-cells and their progeny, iii iga and igm endogenous cells on the membranes of different plasma cell precursors.
18	regulatory mechanisms in cell mediated immune responses i regulation of mixed lymphocyte reactions by alloantigen activated thymus derived lymphocytes	Cell-mediated immune response regulatory mechanisms i regulation of allogene-activated thymus-derived lymphocyte-mediated mixed lymphocyte reactions.
18	molecular relationship between private and public h 2 antigens as determined by antigen redistribution method	The molecular relationship between the public and the private h2 antigens was determined by the method of redistribution of the antigens.
18	in vitro studies on allotype suppression iii compounds of antiallyotype serum active in release from allotype suppression	In vitro suppression studies of allotype iii anti-allyotype serum compounds active in the release of allotype d&apos suppression.
18	the role of macrophages in the generation of t helper cells ii the genetic control of the macrophage t cell interaction for helper cell induction with soluble antigens	Role of macrophages in auxiliary t cell generation ii genetic control of apo; interaction of macrophage t cells for apo; induction of auxiliary cells with soluble antigens.
18	the lipoprotein of the outer membrane of escherichia coli a b lymphocyte mitogen	External membrane lipoprotein d'apos; lymphocyte mitogenic escherichia coli b.
18	feedback induction of suppressor t cell activity	Induction of retrospective apo; activity of suppressive t-cells.
18	no evidence for particles encapsulating rna instructed dna polymerase and high molecular weight virus related rna in herpesvirus induced tumours of non human primates	There is no evidence of the presence of the encapsulating particles of the well-designed DNA polymerase chain reaction and the high molecular weight virus-related rna in tumours induced by apo; herpesviruses in non-human primates.
18	abdominal lavage in blunt trauma	Blunt trauma abdominal lavage.
18	heterogeneity in tissue ferritins displayed by gel electrofocusing	Gel electrofocalization demonstrated tissue ferritin heterogeneity.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes viii in vivo cooperative responses between lymphocytes are controlled by genes in the k end of the h 2 complex	Cellular interactions between histoincompatible t-cells and b viii lymphocytes in vivo are mediated by genes located at the apos; k-terminus of the h2 complex.
18	effect of nonspecific stimulation on the defense mechanisms of inbred mice	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of stimulation.
18	preventive effect of hapten reactive thymus derived helper lymphocytes on the tolerance induction in hapten specific precursors of antibody forming cells	Antibody-forming cells are those that are not reactive; they are those that are not reactive; they are those that are reactive; they are those that are reactive; they are those that are reactive; they are those that are reactive.
18	antibiotic combinations in the treatment of experimental staphylococcus aureus infection	It's not a good idea, but it's a good idea.
18	depressed immune response in the magnesium deficient rat	In the case of the magnesium-deficient rat, the immune response decreased.
18	accumulation of gold in various organs of mice injected with gold thioglucose	The results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
18	release of prostaglandin by mitogen and antigen stimulated leukocytes in culture	Prostaglandin release from mitogen and l&apos stimulates cultured leukocytes.
18	dna synthesis in tumor bearing rats	Synthesis of tumour-carrying rat DNA.
18	treatment of an established graft versus host reaction in akr mice by adoptive immunotherapy	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is possible to determine the cause of infection.
18	graft versus leukemia without fatal graft versus host disease in akr mice	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection.
18	an experimental model for evaluation of factors in tumor escape from immunological attack	An experimental model for apo; factor evaluation in apo; escape of the tumor of apo; immunological attack.
18	benzo alpha pyrene effects on mouse epithelial cells in culture	Effects of benzo-alpha-pyrene on epithelial cells in cultured mice.
18	selection for high immunogenicity in drug resistant sublines of murine lymphomas demonstrated by plaque assay	Selecting drug resistant murine lymphoma lines for high immunogenicity in sub-drug resistant lines as demonstrated by the plaque test.
18	genetical control of b cell responses iii requirement for functional mitogenicity of the antigen in thymus independent specific responses	Genetic control of b iii cell responses requires apo functional apo mitogenicity; antigen in thymus-independent specific responses.
18	x linked b lymphocyte immune defect in cba hn mice i studies of the function and composition of spleen cells	L' spleen cell composition and function in cba hn mice revealed x-linked b-cell immunodeficiency in these mice.
18	identification of a novel cell type in peripheral lymphoid organs of mice iv identification and distribution in mouse spleen	Identification of a novel mouse peripheral lymphoid organ cell type iv identification and distribution in mouse spleen.
18	functional heterogeneity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus specfic t lymphocytes i identification of effector amd memory subsets	Lymphocytic Choriomeningitis virus t-cell functional heterogeneity i identification of under-effector memory sets amd.
18	evidence for the clonal abortion theory of b lymphocyte tolerance	The results of this study are consistent with the findings of other studies.
18	the characterization fo the b cell repertoire specific for the 2 4 dinitrophenyl and 2 4 6 trinitrophenyl determinants in neonatal balb c mice	Characterization of dinitrophenyl 2,4- and trinitrophenyl-specific b-cell repertoire in neonatal balb mice.
18	t cell migration into allografts	Allograft t-cell migration.
18	the in vitro induction of immunological tolerance in the b lymphocyte by oligovalent thymus dependent antigens	Thymus-dependent oligovalent antigens induced immunological tolerance in b-lymphocyte in vitro.
18	tolerance induction in b lymphocytes but thymus dependent antigens t cells may abrogate b cell tolerance induction by prevent an antibody response	Induction of tolerance in b-cells, but thymus-dependent t-antigen drugs can reverse tolerance in b-cells by preventing an immune response.
18	clonal dominance i restricted nature of the igm antibody response to group a streptococcal carbohydrate in mice	Clonal dominance i limited the nature of the antibody response of mice to streptococcal carbohydrate.
18	functional subclasses of t lymphocytes bearing different ly antigens i the generation of functionally distinct t cell subclasses is a differentiative process independent of antigen	Sub--functional classes of t-cells carrying different antigens The generation of sub-functionally distinct t-cells is an antigen-independent differential process.
18	h 2 compatability requirement for t cell mediated lysis of target cells infected with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus different cytotoxic t cell specificities are associated with structures coded for in h 2k or h 2d	L' h2 compatibility requirement for t-cell-mediated lysis of lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus infected target cells is associated with different cytotoxic specificities of t-cell in h2k or h2d-coded structures.
18	dissociation between mitogenicity and immunogenicity of tnp lipopolysaccharide a t independent antigen	The tnp lipopolysaccharide, an independent t-antigen, dissociates from mitogenicity and immunogenicity.
18	pathobiological relationships between mycobacterium leprae and its primitive host	Pathobiological relationships between leprae mycobacterium and primitive host.
18	cell surface antigen induced by friend murine leukemia virus is also in the virion	The friendly murine leukemia virus-induced cell surface antigen is also present in the virion.
18	reticuloendotheliosis virus nucleic acid sequences in cellular dna	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection.
18	type c rna virus gene expression in human tissue	Human tissue gene expression of cna-like virus.
18	clinical staging of malignant lymphoma in patients suspected to have hepato splenic schistosomiasis	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may contribute to the development of the disease.
18	ontogeny of mouse t lymphocyte function	Cardiovascular System (CPSS) - A multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre, multi-centre study.
18	development of b lymphocytes 1 2	Lymphocyte development.
18	ontogeny of b lymphocyte function with respect to the heterogeneity of antibody affinity 1 2	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support it.
18	casein induced experimental amyloidosis v the response of lymphoid organs to t and b mitogens	Casein induced experimental amyloidosis v lymphoid organ response to mitogens t and b.
18	marek s disease in immunosuppressed chickens growth of a transplantable lymphoma and development of the disease by natural exposure	Marek's disease in immunocompromised chickens has resulted in the development of immune-compromised insect growth, transplantable lymphoma, and natural exposure.
18	inhibitory effect of interferon on multiplication of friend leukemia cells in vivo	It can also be used as a tool to reduce the risk of leukemia.
18	transplantation behavior of allotransplantable tumor lines derived from immunologically modified hosts	Transplantation Behaviour of Allotransplantable Cancer Lines Derived from Immunologically Modified Hosts.
18	immunopotentiation with bcg dimensions of a specific antitumor response	Immunopotentiation with dimensions bcg d' specific anti-tumor response.
18	inhibition of bovine leukemia virus release	Inhibition of Bovine Leukemia Virus Release.
18	spontaneous delayed splenic rupture case report of a five year interval between trauma and diagnosis	Delayed spontaneous rupture of the spleen: five-year interval between diagnosis and trauma.
18	immunologic mimicry between mouse tissue and enterobacterial common antigen	Immunological mimicry between the tissues of mice and the common antigen of enterobacteria.
18	localization of a protein antigen in the chicken spleen effect of various manipulative procedures on the morphogenesis of the germinal centre	Localization of apos, a protein antigen in chick spleen, effects of various manipulations on germ-centre morphogenesis.
18	the antagonistic action of cyclic gmp and cyclic amp on proliferation of b and t lymphocytes	L' cyclic gmp and l&apos antagonist; cyclic ampoule on b and t lymphocyte proliferation.
18	the control of immune response in vitro by ca2 ii the ca2 dependent period during mitogenic stimulation	The control of the immune response in vitro by ca2ii was found to be the ca2-dependent period during mitogenic stimulation.
18	binding of normal human igg to myelin sheaths glia and neurons	Normal human igg binding to the myelin sheath occurs by neurons and glial cells.
18	the relation between the t cells responsible for cell mediated cytotoxic killing of mastocytoma cells and the helper cell effect	The relationship between t-cells responsible for cell-mediated cytotoxic mastocytoma destruction and l' effect of auxiliary cells.
18	delayed hypersensitivity and acquired cellular resistance in guinea pigs infected with listeria monocytogenes	In Listeria monocytogenes infected guinea pigs, hypersensitivity was delayed and cell resistance was acquired.
18	genital herpesvirus hominis infection in mice i development of an experimental model	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is important to determine the cause of infection.
18	defense mechanisms against infectious bovine rhinotracheitis virus inhibition of virus infection by murine macrophages	In addition to the above, there are a number of other infectious diseases, such as rabies, rabies, measles, measles, measles, measles, measles, measles, measles, measles, measles, measles, measles, and other infectious diseases.
18	studies on the mechanism of macrophage mediated cytotoxicity	Macrophage-mediated cytotoxicity mechanistic studies.
18	cell mediated immunity in the uremic rat	Uremic rat cell-mediated immunity.
18	immunological abnormalities in splenic atrophy	Spleen atrophy and immunological abnormalities.
18	splenectomy for haematological cytopenias in patients with malignant lymphomas	Splenectomy for hematological cytopenia in malignant lymphoma patients.
18	atypical spherocytosis a disease of spleen as well as of red blood cells	Atypical spherocytosis is spleen and red blood cell disease.
18	observations on the induction of bone in soft tissues	Observations on soft-tissue bone induction.
18	release of colony stimulating activity from thymus derived lymphocytes	Thymus-derived lymphocyte colony-stimulating activity.
18	alloimmune cytotoxic t cells evidence that they recognize serologically defined antigens and bear clonally restricted receptors	Alloimmune cytotoxic t-cells show that they recognize antigens that are serologically defined and that they have restricted clonal receptors.
18	a limited number of globin genes in human dna	A limited number of genes from globin in human DNA.
18	activation of t and b lymphocytes in vitro ii biological and biochemical properties of an allogeneic effect factor aef active in triggering specific b lymphocytes	In Vitro Activation of T- and B-Lymphocytes ii Biochemical and Biological properties of Dapos; a Dapos factor; allogenic effect active in the elicitation of specific b-cells.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro 3 tolerogenic properties of the terpolymer l glutamic acid 60 l alanine30 l tyrosine10 gat for spleen cells from nonresponder h 2s and h 2q mice	Genetic control of in vitro immune responses 3 l*apos tolerant properties; 60 l* alanine30 l*tyrosine10 gat terpolymer glutamic acid for non-responding h2s and h2q mouse spleen cells.
18	genetic control of immune responses in vitro iv conditions for cooperative interactions between nonresponder parental b cells and primed responder plus nonresponder f1 t cells in the development of an antibody response under ir gene control in vitro	Genetic control of in vitro immune responses in vivo conditions; co-operative interactions between non-responding parent cells and more non-responding response t cells initiated in apo development; gene-regulated immune response in vitro.
18	cell to cell interaction in the immune response x t cell dependent suppression in tolerant mice	Cell-to-cell interaction x cell-dependent suppression in immune response in tolerant mice.
18	selective roles of thymus derived lymphocytes in the antibody response ii preferential suppression of high affinity antibody forming cells by carrier primed suppressor t cells	Selective Roles of Thymus-derived Lymphocytes in the Antibody Response ii preferential suppression of high affinity antibody-forming cells by carrier-initiated t-suppressor cells.
18	separable populations of activated thymus derived lymphocytes identified in two assays for cell mediated immunity to murine tumor allografts	Separable thymus-derived lymphocyte populations were identified in two cell-mediated immunity assays to murine tumor allograft.
18	cell interactions between histoincompatible t and b lymphocytes vi cooperative responses between lymphocytes derived from mouse donor strains differing at genes in the s and d regions of the h 2 complex	Cell interactions between histoincompatible t-lymphocytes and co-operative b-lymphocyte responses between genetically different mouse donor strain-derived lymphocytes in the h2 complex s and d regions.
18	enhancement of tumor growth by graft versus host reaction	Tumour growth increased by graft-versus-host response.
18	cellular immunity against rous sarcomas of chickens preferential reactivity against autochthonous target cells as determined by lymphocyte adherence and cytotoxicity tests in vitro	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the immune system is not immune to the immune system, and that the immune system is immune to the immune system.
18	induction of increased calcium uptake in mouse t lymphocytes by concanavalin a and its modulation by cyclic nucleotides	In addition, there is a need for additional studies to determine the extent to which the effects of concanavalin have been observed in the mouse lymphocytes.
18	thymic regeneration after lethal irradiation evidence for an intra thymic radioresistant t cell precursor	Regeneration of thymus following lethal irradiation has revealed the presence of apos; a precursor of thymic cells resistant to intrathymic radiation.
18	effect of cortisone on the disappearance kinetics and tissue localization of soluble immune complexes	Effect of cortisone on tissue localization and disappearance kinetics of soluble immune complexes.
18	antibody mediated suppression of grafted lymphoma iii evaluation of the role of thymic function non thymus derived lymphocytes macrophages platelets and polymorphonuclear leukocytes in syngeneic and allogeneic hosts	Antibody suppresses grafted lymphoma iii evaluation of the role of thymic cell function in non-thymus-derived platelets and polymorphonuclear leukocytes (PCL) in allogeneic and syngenetic hosts.
18	the role of macrophages in the production of lymphokines by t and b lymphocytes	Role of macrophages in lymphokine production by t-cells and b-cells.
18	the frequency of phosphorylcholine specific b cells in conventional and germfree balb c mice	Phosphorylcholine-specific b-cell frequencies in traditional and germless bb c mice.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses i the effect of cell number on the response	Cellular cooperation during antibody responses-haptene in vivo i l' effect of number of cells on response.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses ii the effect of in vivo and in vitro x irradiation on t and b cells	Cellular cooperation during antibody responses-haptene in vivo ii l&apos effect; x-radiation in vivo and in vitro on t- and b-cells.
18	cellular cooperation during in vivo anti hapten antibody responses iii the helper cell activity of activated thymocytes of spleen cells treated with anti theta serum and of spleen cells from anti thymocyte serum treated or adult thymectomized donors	Cellular cooperation during antibody responses to apos; hapten in vivo iii lapos; activity of thymocyte-activated thymocyte auxiliary cells from antitheta serum-treated and adult thymocyte-treated and spleen-treated donors.
18	amyloid fibril protein related to immunoglobulin lambda chains	Amyloid fibrillar protein linked to the lamda chains of immunoglobulin.
18	comparison of scrapie and transmissible mink encephalopathy in hamsters ii clinical signs pathology and pathogenesis	Comparison of Scrapie and Lapos; Transmissible Mink Encephalopathy in Hamsters ii Clinical Signs Pathology and Pathogenesis.
18	host control of endogenous murine leukemia virus gene expression concentrations of viral proteins in high and low leukemia mouse strains	Mild leukemia is a sexually transmitted disease characterized by the presence of a small number of sexually transmitted infections (STIs) and a number of sexually transmitted infections (STIs) associated with the disease.
18	type c viral expression in primate tissues	Viral expression of type c in the tissues of primates.
18	lymphomas clinical stages	Clinical lymphoma stages.
18	influence of dietary protein restriction on immune competence i effect on the capacity of cells from various lymphoid organs to induce graft vs host reactions	L' influence of restriction of food proteins on immune competence affects the capacity of the cells of various lymphoid organs; induce reactions to graft-host.
18	heterogeneity of the balb c antiphosphorylcholine antibody response at the precursor cell level	Antiphosphorylcholine c antibody response heterogeneity in precursor cells.
18	relationship between fc receptors antigen binding sites on t and b cells and h 2 complex associated determinants	Relationship of fc receptor binding sites to t- and b-cell antigen and determinants associated with h2 complex.
18	genetic regulation of the antibody response to h 2db alloantigens in mice i differences in activation of helper t cells in c57bl 10 and balb c congenic strains	Genetic regulation of immune response to alloantigen h 2db in mice; helper cell activation in congenic strains c57bl 10 and balb c.
18	rosette forming ability of thymus derived lymphocytes in humoral and cell mediated immunity ii helper cell activity	Thymus-derived lymphocytes are able to form rosettes in the apos; humoral immunity and apos; cell-mediated immunity ii helps apos; cell activity.
18	extracardiac abnormalities in infants with congenital heart disease	In addition to the above, there are a number of other conditions.
18	evidence for identity or close association of the fc receptor of b lymphocytes and alloantigens determined by the ir region of the h 2 complex	Evidence of the identity or identity; close association of b lymphocyte and alloantigen fc receptor determined by the h2 complex ir region.
18	immunological studies in the postsplenectomy syndrome	Immunological Studies on Post-Plenectomy Syndrome.
18	islet cell tumors in childhood	Cervical cancer is a major cause of death.
18	failure of lymphocytes to reexpress antigen receptors after brief interaction with a tolerogenic d amino acid copolymer	Lymphocytes are not able to re-express receptors; antigens after a brief interaction with a d-copolymer of tolerant amino acids.
18	generation of cytotoxic t lymphocytes in vitro i response of normal and immune mouse spleen cells in mixed leukocyte cultures	In vitro production of cytotoxic t-cells i response of spleen cells from normal and immune mice in mixed cultures of leukocytes.
18	generation of cytotoxic t lymphocytes in vitro ii effect of repeated exposure to alloantigens on the cytotoxic activity of long term mixed leukocyte cultures	Cytotoxic lymphocyte generation in vitro ecosis; repeated alloantigen exposure to apos; cytotoxic activity in long-term mixed leukocyte cultures.
18	evaluation of carbon 11 labelled phenylglycine and phenylalanine for pancreas scintigraphy	Evaluation of 11C-labelled pancreatic scintigraphy phenylglycine and phenylalanine.
18	incorporation of a 131 iodine deoxycytidine monophosphate protamine complex into the dna of tumor bearing rats following partial synchronization with hydroxyurea	Incorporation of d' a 131-iodine-deoxycytidine-monophosphate-protamine complex in apos; DNA from tumor-carrying rats after partial synchronization with apos; hydroxyurea.
18	enzymatic synthesis of oligonucleotides of defined sequence addition of short blocks of nucleotide residues to oligonucleotide primers	Apos enzyme synthesis; apos oligonucleotides; defined sequential addition of short nucleotide residue blocks to oligonucleotide primers.
18	determination of the 3 terminal nucleotide of dna fragments	Terminal nucleotide 3 determination of DNA DNA fragments.
18	rna directed dna synthesis by the dna polymerase of rous sarcoma virus structural and functional identification of 4s primer rna in uninfected cells	The site-directed synthesis of sarcoma virus DNA polymerase chain reaction (SARV) leads to the synthesis of sarcoma virus DNA; structural and functional identification of sarcoma; and the initiation of 4 s rna rs in uninfected cells.
18	human myeloma marrow cells in immunologically deficient mice	Cells of human myeloma spinal cord in mice that are immunologically deficient.
18	rb86 uptake of various organs of the spontaneously hypertensive rats a preliminary note	A preliminary note is rb86 uptake by various organs from spontaneously hypertensive rats.
18	protection of a he mice by a friend virus pseudotype against challenge with friend virus	It is also possible to protect a mouse by using a pseudotype of a friendly virus against provocation by a friendly virus.
18	combination chemotherapy of rauscher leukemia and ascites tumors by narcissus alkaloid with standard drugs and effect on cellular immunity	Combinations of leukemia chemotherapy and osteos tumors; ascites by a narcissistic alkaloid with standard leukemia medications and effects on cell immunity.
18	separation of mouse spleen haematopoietic cell fractions for transplantation purposes in lethally irradiated mice	Separation of fractions of haematopoietic cells from the spleen of mice for transplantation in fatally irradiated mice.
18	isolation of a low molecular weight serum component antigenically related to an amyloid fibril protein of unknown origin	D&apos isolation; a low-molecular-weight serum component related antigenically to an amyloid fibrillar protein d' origin unknown.
18	evolutionary relationship between immunoglobulins and transplantation antigens	Immune globulin–transplant antigen evolutionary relationships.
18	elevated cyclic amp levels in mouse lymphoid tissue after stimulation by cholera enterotoxin in vitro 38468	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk factors.
18	influence of rofenaid 40 feed medication on an experimental salmonella infection in chickens	Effect of chloroquine on the development of chloroquine.
18	selective thymic localization of murine leukemia virus related antigens in c57bl ka mice after inoculation with radiation virus	Selective thymic localization of antigens related to murine leukemia virus in c57bl ka mice after radiotherapy.
18	immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumours iv direct cellular cytolysis of 51cr labelled target cells in vitro and analysis of blocking factors which modulate cytotoxicity	Murin sarcoma virus immunity induced tumors iv direct cell cytolysis of 51cr-labelled target cells in vitro and l' cytotoxicity-modifying blocking factors.
18	studies on mouse moloney virus induced tumours i the detection of p30 as a cytotoxic target on murine moloney leukaemic spleen cells and on an in vitro moloney sarcoma line by antibody mediated cytotoxicity	Mouse moloney virus studies induced tumours i detection of p30 as a cytotoxic target on murine moloney leukemic spleen cells and moloney sarcoma in vitro by antibody-mediated cytotoxicity.
18	correction of a murine mammary tumor virus associated immunological depression by selective immunosuppression with cytosine arabinoside	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
18	resistance to infection with nocardia asteroides	Apos resistance; nocardia asteroides.
18	inhibition and enhancement of friend leukemia virus by pyran copolymer	Pyran copolymer inhibits and increases amic leukemia virus.
18	mouse pancreas involvement in murine hepatitis virus infection	Infection with hepatitis C virus; hepatitis C; hepatitis C; hepatitis C.
18	hemolytic anemia induced by murine erythroblastosis virus possible mechanisms of hemolysis and effects of an interferon inducer	Hemolytic anemia caused by the virus of the apos; murine erythroblastosis possible mechanisms of the apos; hemolysis and the effects of apos; an inducer of apos; interferon.
18	target cell of the polycythemia inducing friend virus studies with myleran	Target cell of polycythemia leading to studies of apos virus; mylerian friend.
18	lymphoproliferative disease in a cotton top marmoset after inoculation with infectious mononucleosis derived epstein barr virus	"""Lymphoproliferative disease in a cotton top marmoset after inoculation with infectious mononucleosis derived from epstein barr. virus"", Am J Obstet Gynecol, Vol."
18	immunosuppression in vitro induced by leukemia virus infected splenocytes 38544	Immunosuppression in vitro by Leukemia Virus 38544 infected splenocytes.
18	murine leukaemia virus expression in the akr following thymectomy	A person who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS or has been diagnosed with HIV.
18	relationship of infectious murine leukemia virus and virus related antigens in genetic crosses between akr and the fv 1 compatible strain c57l	Infectious murine leukemia virus and virus-associated antigens in genetic crosses between akr and fv1-compatible strain c57l.
18	studies on the role of the host immune response in recovery from friend virus leukemia ii cell mediated immunity	Studies investigating the role of the immune response of the host in immune recovery; cell-mediated immunity to friendly viral leukemia ii.
18	the immune response to infection with vaccinia virus in mice i infection and the production of antibody neutralizing cell associated and cell free virus	In addition, the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) is working with the Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) to develop a national immunization strategy.
18	immunopathology of mouse hepatitis virus type 3 infection iii clinical and virologic observation of a persistent viral infection	Infection with hepatitis C; Infection with hepatitis C; Infection with hepatitis C; Infection with hepatitis C; Infection with hepatitis C. Infection with hepatitis C. Infection with hepatitis C. Infection with hepatitis C.
18	properties of cell lines derived from tumors induced by friend virus in balb c and balb c h 2b mice	Properties of Friendly Virus Tumour Derived Cell Lines in Berb c and Berb c h 2b mice.
18	a quantitative comparison between in vivo and in vitro derived friend leukemia virus	Quantitative Comparison Between Friendly Leukemia Virus in Vivo and Derived Virus in Vitro.
18	coenzyme q deficiency in mice following infection with friend leukemia virus	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is possible to determine the cause of death.
18	enhanced mononuclear phagocytic activity during trypanosoma cruzi infection in mice	In mice infected with the trypanosome cruzi, there was an increase in the number of cells; mononuclear phagocytic activity.
18	effects of newcastle disease virus ndv on infection of adult mice with the thogoto like ar 126 arbovirus	Newcastle disease virus ndv effects on apos; adult mice infected with ar 126 arbovirus thogoto.
18	mechanism of immunologic resistance to herpes simplex virus 1 hsv 1 infection	Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases 1.
18	diversity of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus variation due to replication of the virus in the mouse	Variation of Lymphocytic Choriomeningitis Virus due to mouse replication.
18	protection of mice against friend leukemia by active and passive immunization with isolated viral glycoprotein and its antiserum respectively author s transl	Mice should be protected against both active and passive leukemia by the use of an isolated viral glycoprotein and its antiserum.
18	activity of dna dependent rna polymerases a and b in spleen nuclei of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Apos-dependent rna polymerase activity; DNA a and b in leukemia-infected mouse spleen nuclei.
18	deoxyribonucleic acid dependent ribonucleic acid polymerases from spleen of uninfected and rauscher murine leukemia virus infected nih swiss mice	Apos-dependent deoxyribonucleic acid; ribonucleic acid polymerases of mouse nih swiss spleen infected with murine leukemia virus, uninfected or infected by rauscher.
18	induction of endogenous and of spleen focus forming viruses during dimethylsulfoxide induced differentiation of mouse erythroleukemia cells transformed by spleen focus forming virus	The induction of splenic foci-forming viruses and endogenous viruses during dimethylsulfoxide-induced differentiation of splenic foci-transforming mouse erythroleukemia cells.
18	adaptation to tissue culture of the murine leukemia asl1 a high producer of tl thymus leukemia antigen	Tissue culture adaptation for murine asl1 leukemia, a major producer of antigen-induced thymic leukemia.
18	the comparative sensitivity of sheep and chicken embryos to bluetongue virus and observations on viraemia in experimentally infected sheep	Comparison of sheep and chick embryo sensitivity to bluetongue virus and observations of viraemia in experimentally infected sheep.
18	cytopathogenic xc assay for bone marrow from mice infected with murine leukemia viruses	Cytopathogenic xc Trial for Bone Marrow of mice Infected with Murine Leukemia Viruses.
18	combined phytohaemagglutinin and dianhydrodulcitol treatment of lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection in mice	Combination therapy with phytohemagglutinin and lanhydrodulcitol in mice; lymphocytic infection with choriomeningitis virus.
18	a live vaccine against tick borne encephalitis integrated studies h histopathology of mice peripherally immunized with e5 14 virus and challenged with virulent virus	A live vaccine against ticks-borne encephalitis has been studied in integrated histopathological studies in mice immunized at the periphery with the virus e5-14 and exposed to a virulent virus.
18	isolation of friend leukemia virus resistant line from non inbred mouse colony	Isolate a colony of outbreeding mice from the amicus leukemia virus.
18	effect of rifamycin and tilorone derivatives on friend virus leukemia in mice	The Effect of Rifamycin and Tilorone Derivatives on Leukemia from L. etapos, a mouse friend.
18	herpes simplex virus infection in guinea pigs an animal model for studying latent and recurrent herpes simplex virus infection	Infection with the virus of lapos; herpes simplex in guinea pig, animal model for lapos; study of lapos; recurrent latent infection with the virus of lapos; herpes simplex.
18	erythropoietin independent erythroid colony formation in vitro by hemopoietic cells of mice infected with friend virus	Formation of l&apos-independent erythroid colonies; erythropoietin in vitro by infected mouse hematopoietic cells; friend.
18	transient impaired cell mediated tumor immunity after acute infection with lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus	Acute lymphocyte choriomeningitis infection results in a transient, cell-mediated, tumour-mediated immunity.
18	granulocytic stem cells in friend leukemia	Stem cells that are granulocytic in the presence of friendly leukemia.
18	tumor colony formation by friend virus infected cells in immunosuppressed mice	The formation of tumour colonies by virus-infected cells; friendly in immunocompromised mice.
18	diffusion chamber hematopoiesis in marrow and spleen cells from mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus rlv a	Hematopoietic diffusion chamber in rlv a. rausseus leukemia virus infected mouse pith and spleen cells.
18	cell medicated cytotoxicity against ectromelia virus infected target cells iii role of the h 2 gene complex	Drug Cytotoxicity of Cells against Target Cells Infected with Ectromelia Virus iii Role of the H2 Gene Complex.
18	cell mediated immunity to moloney sarcoma virus in mice ii analysis of antigenic specificities involved in t lymphocyte mediated in vivo rejection of murine sarcoma virus induced tumors	Molloney sarcoma virus cell-mediated immunity in mice ii analyses the antigenic specificities involved in lymphocyte t by etapos; intermediate for murine sarcoma virus in vivo tumour rejection.
18	target cell dependent t cell mediated lysis of vaccinia virus infected cells	T-cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated cell-mediated disease.
18	strain dependent expression of endogenous mouse tropic leukemia viruses in chemically induced murine leukemias	An endogenous virus strain-dependent expression of the tropical leukemia of mice in chemically induced murine leukemias.
18	immunological studies with hamster cells transformed by cytomegalovirus and herpes simplex virus type 1	Immunological studies on cytomegalovirus and l&apos virus-transformed hamster cells; type 1 herpes simplex.
18	response of marmosets to experimental infection with epstein barr virus	Mosquito reaction to epstein barr virus; experimental infection.
18	continuous replication of friend virus complex spleen focus forming virus lymphatic leukemia inducing virus in mouse embryo fibroblasts retention of leukemogenicity and loss of immunosuppressive properties	Continuous replication of virus-induced viral viral lymphatic leukemia from the amicus complex virus in mouse fibroblasts maintains leukemogenicity and the loss of immunosuppressive properties.
18	the role of the spleen and immunity in the metastatic pattern of a murine reticulum cell sarcoma	The Role of Spleen and Apos; Immunity in the Metastatic Profile of Mouse Reticulum Cells.
18	characterization of an early cytotoxicity inducing factor in sera of japanese quails after inoculation with rous sarcoma virus	Characterization of Japanese quail serum cytotoxicity; dose factor; early induction of cytotoxicity after sarcoma virus inoculation.
18	the relation between the proliferative activity and the differentiation pattern of bone marrow cells from rauscher leukemia virus infected balb c mice	The relationship between proliferative activity and the pattern of bone marrow cell differentiation in Balb c mice infected with Raw Leukemia Virus.
18	splenocyte plaque assay for the detection of murine leukemia virus	Mouse leukemia virus testing on splenocytes.
18	stimulation of erythropoietic differentiation in balb c mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Stimulation of erythropoietic differentiation in c-bob leukemia virus infected mice.
18	reversal of leukemia virus induced immunosuppression in vitro by peritoneal macrophages	In vitro immunosuppression by the peritoneal macrophages was induced by inversion of the leukemia virus.
18	in vitro granulocytic stem cell clonogenic capacity of marrow and spleen cells from mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Clonogenic capacity of granulocyte stem cells in vitro from bone marrow and splenic cells from leukemia-infected mice.
18	the innate resistance of cba mice to endogenous murine leukaemia virus infection	Inborn cba mouse resistance to murine leukemia virus endogenous infection.
18	neuropathological effects of persistent infection of mice by mouse hepatitis virus	Injury is a serious, life-threatening, life-threatening, and life-threatening illness.
18	physiopathology of human and virus induced murine leukemias	Mosquito- and virus-induced leukemia pathology.
18	immune response to rauscher virus induced leukemia in dba mice i role of cellular and humoral immunity in spontaneous regression	The immune response induced leukemia in the mouse as a function of cell and humoral immunity in spontaneous regression.
18	mixed lymphocyte tumor cell interaction in a murine sarcoma virus moloney induced tumor system comparison between lymphoproliferation and lymphocyte cytotoxicity	Interaction between mixed lymphocyte tumour cells in a mouse sarcoma virus-induced tumour system; comparison of lymphoproliferation and lymphocyte cytotoxicity.
18	changes in hemopoiesis during the course of acute lcm virus infection in mice	Acute infection with the Lcm virus in mice; hemopoiesis during apos; acute infection with the Lcm virus.
18	replication of murine leukemia virus in bone marrow derived lymphocytes	Murine leukemia virus replication in bone marrow-derived lymphocytes.
18	interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes ii infections of b and t cells with friend virus complex indiffusion chambers and in vitro effect of polyclonal mitogens	Mucocyte-isolated interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with b- and t-cell infections with dolipid chambers; complex apo-viral indialization and in vitro effect of polyclonal mitogens.
18	interactions of murine leukemia virus mulv with isolated lymphocytes iii alterations of splenic b and t cells in friend virus infected mice	Murine leukemia virus mulv interactions with isolated iii splenic cell alterations b and t in mouse infected with the friendly virus.
18	analysis of the humoral immune response to influenza virus in vitro	An analysis of the human immune response to the influenza virus in vitro.
18	mitogen induction of murine c type viruses i analysis of lymphoid cell subpopulations	Mitogen-induced murine virus type c i analysis of under-lymphoid cell populations.
18	cytotoxic t cells in the peritoneal cavity of mice infected with ectromelia virus	Cytotoxic t-cells in peritoneal cavity of ectromelike virus infected mice.
18	mechanisms of genetic resistance to friend virus leukemia iii susceptibility of mitogen responsive lymphocytes mediated by t cells	Mechanisms of Genetic Resistance to Friendly Viral Leukemia susceptibility of T-cell-mediated mitogen-sensitive lymphocytes.
18	modification of hemopoietic stem cells of balb c mice by rauscher leukemia virus	Balb c mouse hematopoietic stem cell modification by leukemia reuser virus.
18	type c rna viruses and leukemogenesis relation of type c virus infectivity and leukemogenesis induced by nitrosourea compounds in mice	Infectivity of virus type c and leukemogenesis induced by the compounds of nitrosourea in mice.
18	lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus induced immunosuppression a virus induced macrophage defect	In addition, there was a significant increase in the incidence of lymphocytic choriomeningitis in the United States.
18	histochemical study of the activity of several enzymes in the process of immunogenesis in monkeys orally infected with viruses of the tick borne encephalitis complex	Histochemical study of apo; enzyme activity in apo process; immunogenesis in monkeys infected orally with tick-borne viruses; encephalitis.
18	effects of rauscher leukemia virus infection on balb c mouse embryos	Effects of apo; leukemia infection on embryos of balb c.
18	immune reactivity in the moloney strain of murine sarcoma virus oncogenesis requirement of thymus derived lymphocytes for in vivo protection	Immunoreactivity of the murine sarcoma moloney strain requires apos; oncogenesis of thymus-derived lymphocytes for protection in vivo.
18	immunosuppression by moloney leukemia virus lack of correlation between virus replication and the immunosuppressive effect	Immunosuppression by the virus of the molar leukemia, lack of correlation between the replication of the virus and l' immunosuppressive effect.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against murine cells infected with 6 94 virus a parainfluenza type 1 isolate from multiple sclerosis brain tissue	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against 6,94-virus infected murine cells, a type 1 parainfluenza isolate from MS brain tissue.
18	comparison of guinea pig cytomegalovirus and guinea pig herpes like virus pathogenesis and persistence in experimentally infected animals	Comparison of the cytomegalovirus of guinea pig and the herpes of guinea pig such as the pathogenesis of the virus and persistence in experimentally infected animals.
18	studies on viremia and antibody formation in ducklings and goslings after experimental infection with lednice yaba 1 virus	Viremia and egg-forming studies; duckling and goslings antibody; experimental lednice yaba virus infection 1.
18	quantitation of friend spleen focus forming virus by a nine day 59fe assay	It is not possible to determine the concentration of the virus; it is not necessary to determine the concentration of the virus.
18	cell mediated immunity to sendai virus infection in mice	It can be used as an anti-infective agent for the treatment of viral infections.
18	transmission of murine leukemia virus scripps from parent to progeny mice a comparison of assay systems	Murine leukemia virus transmission (scripps) from mother to offspring of mouse; comparison of d&apos systems; test.
18	friend spleen focus forming virus production in vitro by a nonerythroid cell line	Focused virus-forming friend in vitro by non-@-@ erythroid cell line.
18	the fv 2r resistance gene in mice its effect on spleen colony formation by friend virus transformed cells	In mice, the resistance gene fv 2r has an effect on the formation of splenic colonies by the friendly virus, which has transformed the cells.
18	growth of a transplantable lymphoma and its modification in mice infected with the inducing virus	It can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent and can be used as an anti-inflammatory agent.
18	biological and biochemical properties of soluble tumor specific transplantation antigen of a simian virus 40 induced neoplasm	Neoplasm was induced by the biological and biochemical properties of the transplant antigen specific to the soluble tumour of apos; simian virus 40.
18	rauscher leukemia virus related sequences in human dna presence in some tissues of some patients with hemotopoietic neoplasias and absence in dna from other tissues	Leukemia virus-related sequelae in the presence of apo; human DNA in some hemotopoietic neoplastic patients and absence of apo; DNA in other tissues.
18	role of macrophages in hepatitis induced by herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2 in mice	Role of macrophages in mouse hepatitis due to type 1 and 2 herpes simplex viruses.
18	cellular immunity in chronic theiler s virus central nervous system infection	Cervical insect repellent is a type of insect repellent that can be used to treat infections.
18	two functionally distinct anti tumor effector cells isolated from primary murine sarcoma virus induced tumors	Two functionally distinct cells acting against the tumor effectors, isolated from the primary virus of murine sarcoma, induce tumors.
18	effect of friend leukemia virus on megakaryocytes and platelets in mice	Effect of Friendly Leukemia Virus on Megakaryocytes and Mouse Platelets.
18	action of different cell types in influenza antibody production 5 keeping the immunologic memory to influenza virus a serotype by b and t lymphocytes	Influenza-like viruses, such as influenza A, influenza A, influenza A, influenza A, influenza A, and influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A. Influenza A.
18	replication of herpes simplex virus in mouse spleen cell cultures stimulated by lipopolysaccharide	Replication of the virus of l'apos; herpes simplex in lipopolysaccharide-stimulated cultures of rat spleen cells.
18	pathogenesis of cytomegalovirus infection distribution of viral products immune complexes and autoimmunity during latent murine infection	It is not possible to determine the cause of the infection, but it is important to determine the cause of the infection and the cause of the infection.
18	expression of endogenous murine leukemia viruses during the course of a protracted immunological disorder	A person who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS and who has been diagnosed with HIV/AIDS.
18	mechanisms of suppression of cytotoxic t cell responses in murine lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus infection	Mechanisms to suppress cytotoxic responses of t cells in mouse lymphocyte choriomeningitis virus infection.
18	immunofluorescence and histologic studies of virus induced murine lymphocytic leukemias	Histological and immunofluorescent studies of the virus-induced murine lymphocyte leukemia virus were performed.
18	genetic control of antinuclear antibodies in mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus	Genetic Control of Antinuclear Antibody in Leukemia Virus-Affected mice.
18	viral growth in splenic megakaryocytes of mice experimentally infected with mouse hepatitis virus mhv 2	Viral Growth in Splenic Megakaryocytes of Experimentally Infected Mouse Virus; Mouse Hepatitis mhv 2.
18	nasoencephalopathy of mice infected intrananasally with a mouse hepatitis virus jhm strain	Nasencephalopathic infection of intranasally infected mice with mouse hepatitis jhm.
18	changes in the cholesterol and phospholipid content of mouse spleen after raucscher leukemia virus infection	Changes in mouse spleen cholesterol and phospholipid levels after apo; infection with leukemia virus.
18	expression of an antigen associated with gross virus on the surfaces of murine cells producing an oncornavirus from the radioleukemia of c57bl 6 mice	A macroscopic virus-associated antigen on murine cell surfaces producing oncornavirus from c57bl 6 mouse radiolukemia.
18	biosynthesis of subviral oncogenic particles virosomes in mitochondria of rous sarcoma and rauscher murine leukemia cells	Biosynthesis of oncogenic particle virosomes under-viral in rat sarcoma cell mitochondria and mouse leukemia rauscher.
18	cytotoxic t cells specific for influenza virus infected target cells	Cytotoxic t-cells specific to influenza-infected target cells.
18	effects of lymphocytes from marek s disease infected chickens on mitogen responses of syngeneic normal chicken spleen cells	The effects of Marek disease-infected chicken lymphocytes on mitogenic responses of normal splenic cells of syngenic chickens were studied.
18	the cytotoxicity of specifically sensitized lymphocytes from mouse strains of varying h 2 specificities on lcm virus infected l cells	Cytotoxicity of specifically sensitized mouse strains with variable h2 specificity to lcm-infected lcm cells.
18	splenic erythroid response to friend polycythemia virus time course in vitro after infection in vivo	Splenic erythroid reaction to apo; in vitro evolution of polycythemia virus after apo; in vivo infection.
18	immunopathogenicity and oncogenicity of murine leukemia virus iii quantitation of spontaneous virus expression	Immunopathogenicity and Oncogenicity of Murine Leukemia Virus iii Quantification of Apos; Spontaneous Viral Expression.
18	naturally occurring mouse hepatitis virus infection in the nude mouse	Natural infection with L. etapos virus; hepatitis in naked mouse.
18	leucocyte migration inhibition test as an index of immunological response to measles virus i effect of the environment and measles virus on migration of monkey leucocytes	Dapos testing; inhibition of leukocyte migration as a disease; index of immune response to measles virus; environmental and measles virus effects on monkey leukocyte migration.
18	the immunodepressive effect of friend virus iii effects on spleen t cells	Influenza-like immunosuppressive effect of the virus on the t-cells of the spleen.
18	virus expression in different tissues of normal and tumor bearing mice inoculated with a murine leukemia virus	Viral expression in different normal and tumour-carrying mouse tissues inoculated with murine leukemia virus.
18	lymphocytic choriomeningitis in laboratory personnel exposed to hamsters inadvertently infected with lcm virus	Lymphocytic Choriomeningitis in laboratory personnel who are inadvertently exposed to lcm-infected hamsters.
18	effect of silica on the pathogenic distinction between herpes simplex virus type 1 and 2 hepatitis in mice	Effect of Silica on Pathogenic Distinction between Type 1 and Type 2 HSPs in mice.
18	general immunocompetence of rats bearing avian sarcoma virus induced intracranial tumors	The results of the study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
18	cellular immunity to murine sarcoma virus induced tumors as measured by macrophage migration inhibition assays	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that the immune system is immune to the virus.
18	immunosuppression by spleen cells from moloney leukemia iii evidence for a suppressor cell that is not the leukemic virus producing cell	The immune suppression by the cells of the spleen of molar leukemia indicates the existence of a suppressive cell that is not the cell that produces the leukemic virus.
18	role of friend associated lymphatic leukemia virus in immunization against friend leukemia complex	The Role of the Lymphatic Leukemia Virus Associated with a Friend in the System; Immunization against the Friendly Leukemia Complex.
18	specifically immune mouse t cells can destroy h 2 compatible murine target cells infected with herpes simplex virus types 1 or 2	Specially immunized mouse t-cells can destroy type 1 or 2 herpes simplex virus-infected compatible h2 mouse target cells.
18	age distribution and serological reactivity of viral antigen in brains of mice infected congenitally with lmc virus	In mice, the virus was found to be associated with an increased risk of transmission of the virus in the brain.
18	in vitro mitogenic stimulation of murine spleen cells by herpes simplex virus	Mitogenic stimulation of mouse spleen cells in vitro by the mouse virus; herpes simplex.
18	cell mediated cytotoxic response to cells bearing marek s disease tumor associated surface antigen in chickens infected with marek s disease virus	Cell-mediated cytotoxic reactivity to cells carrying the surface antigen associated with Marek disease tumour in Marek disease virus infected chickens.
18	specificity studies on cytotoxic thymus derived lymphocytes reactive with influenza virus infected cells evidence for dual recognition of h 2 and viral hemagglutinin antigens	Specificity studies on thymus-derived cytotoxic lymphocytes reacting with L. influenzae virus-infected cells demonstrated the double recognition of h2 and the viral hemagglutinin antigens.
18	failure of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus rlv a to develop splenic colonies	Failure of leukemia virus infected mice to develop spleen colonies.
18	the recovery of mice from influenza virus infection adoptive transfer of immunity with immune t lymphocytes	Recovery of HIV-infected mice; Influenza Adoption Transfer of Immunity; Immunity with Immune T-cells.
18	requirements for stimulation of t cell responses against virus infected cells nature of ectromelia virus infected cells capable of stimulating cytotoxic t cells in a secondary response in vitro	Requirements for the stimulation of t-cell responses to naturally infected ectromelike virus-infected cells capable of stimulating cytotoxic t-cell responses in a secondary in vitro response.
18	protective activity of secondary effector t cells generated in vitro against ectromelia virus infection in vivo	In vivo ectromelike infection with ectomycorrhizal virus and ectomycorrhizal insect infestation.
18	immunological tolerance to lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus in neonatally infected virus carrier mice evidence supporting a clonal inactivation mechanism	Lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus immunological tolerance in newly infected mice infected with the virus-ne, evidence to follow; support of apos; clonal mechanism d' inactivation.
18	effect of pseudotype on abelson virus and kirsten sarcoma virus induced leukemia	The effect of the pseudotype on the Abelson virus and the Kirsten sarcoma virus itself induced leukemia.
18	an analysis of the role of lymphatic leukemia virus in the immunodepression exerted by friend complex in leukaemia resistant c57bl 6 mice	An analysis of the role of the lymphatic leukemia virus in immune suppression by the human complex in leukemia-resistant c57bl 6 mice.
18	comparative study of b lymphocyte activity in the spleen of mice infected with viruses of the tick borne encephalitis complex	Comparative apo study; tick-borne b lymphocyte activity in infected mouse spleen; tick-transmitted encephalitis.
18	effect of phenylhydrazine pretreatment on splenectomized rauscher leukemia virus infected mice	Effect of pretreatment with phenylhydrazine on mice infected with the splenectomized russet leukemia virus.
18	suppressor cells in mice with murine mammary tumor virus induced mammary tumors i inhibition of mitogen induced lymphocyte stimulation	Suppressive cells of mice with apothecia; a murine mammary tumour induce inhibitory mammary tumours of mitogen-induced lymphocyte stimulation.
18	the reticuloendothelium as the target in a virus infection pichinde virus pathogenesis in two strains of hamsters	Reticuloendothelium as target in apovirus pathogenesis; pichinde infection in two hamster strains.
18	characteristics of the cellular rna in viral leukemia	Characteristics of Cellular Failure in Viral Leukemia.
18	the effect of rauscher murine leukemia virus infection on the hemopoietic system of balb c mice cell proliferation and cell loss	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
18	helper independent mink cell focus inducing strains of friend murine type c virus potential relationship to the origin of replication defective spleen focus forming virus	Assist independent mink cells to induce type c friendly murine virus strains in potential association with the apos; origin of the defective replication of the virus forming the foci of the defective spleen.
18	effect of mycobacterium tuberculosis bcg infection on the resistance of mice to ectromelia virus infection participation of interferon in enhanced resistance	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	innate cytotoxicity of cba mouse spleen cells to sendai virus infected l cells	The innate cytotoxicity of the cba mouse spleen cells to sentai virus infected l cells.
18	the detection of a spleen focus forming virus neoantigen by lymphocyte mediated cytolysis	The detection, by lymphocyte-mediated cytolysis, of a novel viral antigen that forms a focal point in the heart of the spleen.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma viruses 1 description of the reaction	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against avian sarcoma virus 1 transformed hamster cells.
18	cell mediated cytotoxicity against hamster cells transformed by avian sarcoma viruses 2 sensitivity of different subclones	Cell-mediated cytotoxicity against avian sarcoma 2 virus-transformed hamster cells under-clones.
18	in vitro studies on cellular immunity in mice infected with influenza virus	In vitro studies of influenza virus-infected mice; cellular immunity.
18	persistence and pathogenicity of defective friend spleen focus forming virus decreased transplantability of hemopoietic cells as a marker for preleukemic change	The study found that hematopoietic cell proliferation was associated with a number of factors, including age, sex, sex, age, sex, age, and gender.
18	effect of infection of mice with friend leukemia complex viruses on background antibody forming cell production in vitro	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support it.
18	murine leukemia cell hybrids the quantity of tl antigens expressed by parental and hybrid cells fails to correlate with their sensitivity to tl antibody and complement	In murine leukemic cell hybrids, the amount of tl-antigen expressed by parental cells and n&apos-hybrids is not correlated with their sensitivity to tl-antibody and complement.
18	the immunodepressive effect of friend virus iv effects on spleen b lymphocytes	It can also be used as an antibody or as an anti-inflammatory agent.
18	density gradient separation of spleen cell subpopulations from marek s disease virus infected chickens	Density gradient sub-spleen cell population separation in chickens infected with the Marek disease virus.
18	antibody induced loss of friend virus leukemia cell surface antigens occurs during progression of erythroleukemia in f1 mice	The antibody-induced loss of surface antigens from the leukemic cells of the human papillomavirus occurs during the progression of l' erythroleukemia in f1 mice.
18	radiation leukemia in c57bl 6 mice iii correlation of altered expression of terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase to induction of leukemia	In mice, there is a correlation between deoxynucleotidyl transferase expression and end-stage deoxynucleotidyl transferase; induction of leukemia.
18	activation of latent murine cytomegalovirus infection cocultivation cell transfer and the effect of immunosuppression	Activation of the cellular transfer of cocultivation of the cells; infection by latent mouse cytomegalovirus and effect of the apos; immunosuppression.
18	purification of rna directed dna polymerase from mouse spleen infected with rauscher leukemia virus	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
18	effect of methotrexate on the activity of dna dependent rna polymerases a and b in the spleen of mice infected with rauscher leukemia virus and on the development of virus induced leukemia	Effect of methotrexate on apos; apos-dependent rna polymerase activity; DNA a and b in spleen of mice infected with Russex Leukemia Virus and development of virus-induced leukemia.
18	rous sarcoma virus transformed avian cells express four different cell surface antigens that are distinguishable by a cell mediated cytotoxicity blocking test	Avian cells transformed by rous sarcoma virus express four different antigens from the cell surface that can be distinguished by a cell-mediated cytotoxicity blockade test.
18	suppression and enhancement of mitogen response in chickens infected with marek s disease virus and the herpesvirus of turkeys	In addition, it is recommended that the Marek virus be used in conjunction with the Marek virus, and that the Marek virus be used in conjunction with the Marek virus.
18	macrophage activation during experimental murine brucellosis a basis for chronic infection	The activation of macrophages during the experimental murine brucellosis is at the beginning; origin of d' chronic infections.
18	neuromorphological and immunofluorescence study of experimental infection caused by the attenuated strain of tick borne encephalitis virus	Neuromorphological and immunofluorescent study of lacidosis; experimental infection with attenuated lacid virus; tick-borne encephalitis.
18	a role for elevated h 2 antigen expression in resistance to neoplasia caused by radiation induced leukemia virus enhancement of effective tumor surveillance by killer lymphocytes	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
18	demonstration of marek s disease tumor associated surface antigen in chickens infected with nononcogenic marek s disease virus and herpesvirus of turkeys	Demonstration of non-cancerous mare disease surface antigens in herpes and turkey virus infected chickens.
18	characterization of phosphatidylthreonine in polyoma virus transformed fibroblasts	Phosphatidylthreonine characterization in polyoma virus-transformed fibroblasts transformed fibroblasts.
18	incapacity of hematopoietic stem cell deprived mice to produce tumor colonies induced by friend virus infected cells	L' inability of hematopoietic stem cells to produce friendly virus-infected tumour colonies deprives mice.
18	cell mediated immunity to antigens associated with murine sarcoma virus induced tumors augmentation of cytolytic t lymphocyte activity by successive specific and nonspecific stimulation in vitro	Cell-mediated immunity to mouse sarcoma virus-associated antigens has caused seizures; tumour increase in seizures; cytolytic t lymphocyte activity through nonspecific and specific in vitro stimulation.
18	suppression of in vitro antibody response by spleen cells of mice infected with friend associated lymphatic leukemia virus	The suppression of the antibody response in vitro by mouse spleen cells infected with a friend-associated lymphatic leukemia virus.
18	antigenic properties and molecular weights of murine leukemia virus binding proteins	Antigenic properties and molecular weights of the proteins binding the murine leukemia virus.
18	variations in expression of xenotropic murine leukemia virus genomes in lymphoid tissues of nzb mice	Changes in xenotropic murine leukemia virus genome expression in nzb mouse lymphoid tissue.
18	murine antibody dependent cellular cytotoxicity to herpes simplex virus infected target cells	In addition, there was no evidence of any adverse effects on the immune system or on the immune system.
18	friend erythroleukemia antigen a viral antigen specified by spleen focus forming virus and differentiation antigen controlled by the fv 2 locus	L' l&apos antigen; friendly erythroleukemia is a virus-specific antigen specified by the fv 2 locus.
18	listeria pneumonitis influence of route of immunization on resistance to airborne infection	Listeria pneumonitis influences airborne resistance immunization.
18	absence of ecotropic or recombinant murine leukaemia virus in preleukaemic and leukaemic x irradiated nzb mice	Absence of recombinant or ecotropic murine leukemia virus in irradiated preleukemic and leukemic nzb mice x.
18	the timing of the immune response in relation to virus growth determines the outcome of the lcm infection	The timing of the viral growth immune response determines the outcome of the infection.
18	effect of bordetella pertussis vaccine on the course of lymphocytic choriomeningitis lcm virus infection in suckling mice pretreated with dianhydrodulcitol dad	Effect of Bordetella pertussis vaccine on immune system development; lymphocyte choriomeningitis infection in dianhydrodulcitol-pretreated nursing mice.
18	changes in hemopoiesis of mice of the c3h strain following transplantation of gardner lymphosarcoma and infection with ldh virus i circulating blood	Changes in lymphosarcoma Gardner and l' hemopoietic strain c3h mice following transplantation; circulating blood ldhi virus infection.
18	antibody induced modulation of friend virus cell surface antigens decreases virus production by persistent erythroleukemia cells influence of the rfv 3 gene	The antibody-induced modulation of the surface antigens of the virus of l'apos; am decreases the production of virus by the persistent erythroleukemia cells, under the apos; influence of the rfv3 gene.
18	fv 2 locus controls expression of friend spleen focus forming virus specific sequences in normal and infected mice	The locus fv 2 controls l' expression of virus-specific sequences forming the spleen focus in infected and normal mice.
18	induction of virus specific and h 2 restricted cytotoxic t cells by uv inactivated murine cytomegalovirus	L' mouse inactivated cytotoxic t-cells and h2 cells induced by mouse cytomegalovirus; uv limited cytotoxic t-cell production.
18	quantitative changes in the cellular makeup of the spleen in mice infected with the rauscher leukemia virus and brucella abortus	Quantitative Changes in Spleen Cell Composition in Leukemia Rauscher and Brucella abortus-infected mice.
18	the role of the spleen in tumor growth kinetics of the murine b cell leukemia bcl1	Role of spleen in the kinetics of tumor growth in bcl1 murine b-cell leukemia.
18	expression of fv 4r allele in hematopoietic cells from g mice resistant to friend leukemia virus	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
18	further characterization of the polyoma virus y8e from a rauscher leukaemia virus producing mouse cell line and detection of partial sequence homology between polyoma virus y8edna and hamster papovavirus dna	Further characterization of the y8e polyoma virus from dapos; a mouse cell line that produces the leukemia virus and detects apo; partial sequence homology between the y8edna polyoma virus and apo; DNA from the hamster papovavirus.
18	pathogenicity of mengo virus to mice iii potentiation of infection by immunosuppressants	Meningococcal Infections Meningococcal Infections Meningococcal Infections Meningococcal Infections Meningococcal Infections Meningococcal Infections Meningococcal Infections M.
18	experimental infection of broiler and leghorn chickens with virulent and avirulent isolates of hemorrhagic enteritis virus	Experimental broiler and leghorn chicken infection with avirulent and virulent isolates of the apo virus; hemorrhagic enteritis.
18	inhibition of in vitro friend murine leukemia virus infection of lipopolysaccharide activated b cells with concanavalin a	In vitro infection of lipopolysaccharide-activated cells by murine leukemia virus with concanavalin a.
18	properties of dna dependent rna polymerase from spleens of mice infected with rauscher leukemic virus	Properties of cell-free rna polymerase; DNA from leukemic virus-infected mouse spleen.
18	characterization of a friend virus replicating target cell	A virus that replicates the target cell.
19	inactivations of oxytocin suggesting peptide denaturation	Inactivation of the apos; ocytocin, suggesting a peptide denaturation.
19	inheritance of a serum protein in swine	Heredity of pork serum protein.
19	porcine contagious pleuropneumonia i experimental transmission etiology and pathology	Contagious swine pleuropneumonia infection i experimental etiology of transmission and pathology.
19	porcine contagious pleuropneumonia ii studies of the pathogenicity of the etiological agent hemophilus pleuropneumoniae	Contagious swine pleuropneumonia ii pathogenicity studies; etiologic agent haemophilus pleuropneumoniae.
19	the presence of renin activity in blood vessel walls	The presence of apos; a renin activity in the walls of the blood vessels is an indication of the presence of apos; a renin activity.
19	studies on human antibodies ii distribution of genetic factors	Studies on the anti-anti-anti-anti-anti-anti-human anti-anti-body, the distribution of the distribution of the genetic factors.
19	parathion activation by livers of aquatic and terrestrial vertebrates	L' hepatic activation of parathion in terrestrial and aquatic vertebrates.
19	powassan virus summer infection cycle 1964	Powassan Virus, Cycle d'apos; Summer Illness 1964.
19	an attenuated mutant of japanese encephalitis virus	Mutant attenuated from Japanese lidos virus; encephalitis.
19	research on ascariasis immunity and immunodiagnosis	It's a very important part of the immune system.
19	allosteric properties of glutamate dehydrogenases from different sources	Allosteric glutamate dehydrogenase properties from different sources.
19	characteristics of clostridium perfringens strains associated with food and food borne disease	Characteristics of disease-associated clostridium perfringens; food and food origin.
19	chemically defined medium for some microaerophilic vibrios	Chemically defined for certain microaerophilic vibrios.
19	effect on the white rat uterus of a toxic substance isolated from fusarium	In addition to the above, there are a number of other toxic substances that may be present in the body.
19	serum fractions inhibitory to the growth of leptospires	Serum fractions inhibit leptospore growth.
19	thyrocalcitonin hypocalcemic hypophosphatemic principle of the thyroid gland	Thyroid Principle; Thyrocalcitonin hypocalcemic hypophosphatemia.
19	comparison of the bactericidal activity of different vertebrate sera	Comparison of apos; bactericidal activity of different sera of vertebrates.
19	inhibitors of histamine catabolism and the action of gastrin in the rat	Apos catabolism inhibitors; histamine and apos; gastrin action in rat.
19	hog cholera v demonstration of the antigen in swine tissues by the fluorescent antibody technique	Porcine Cholera demonstrates antigenesis in porcine tissue by fluorescent antibody technique.
19	the physiopathological changes in synovial fluid in arthritic swine	Physiopathological Changes in Synovial Fluid in Arthritis Pigs.
19	observations on a swine herd health program	Feedback on a healthy hog program.
19	bone density measurements in vivo improvement of x ray densitometry	In vivo measurements of bone density improve x-ray densitometry.
19	hog cholera iv detection of the virus in tissue culture preparations by the fluorescent antibody technique	Hog cholera iv Fluorescent antibody detection of virus in tissue culture preparations.
19	minor proteases in the stomach of the pig	In addition, there are a number of other diseases.
19	studies on human antibodies iv purification and properties of anti a and anti b obtained by absorption and elution from insoluble blood group substances	Human antibody studies iv purification and anti-a and b properties obtained from blood-group insoluble substances by absorption and elution.
19	characterization of the renin antirenin system	Renin antenin system characterization.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs ii the immune response	Immunologic studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs; and immune response.
19	thyrocalcitonin cytological localization by immunofluorescence	Cytological localization of thyrocalcitonin activity by immunofluorescence.
19	isolation of salmonellae by selective motility systems	Salmonella isolation by selective motility.
19	piglet birthweights and the order of farrowing	Birth weight and shoot order.
19	plaque formation by teschen disease virus and the effect of certain associated factors	In addition, there is a need for additional information to assist in the preparation of the kit.
19	studies on transmissible gastroenteritis of swine ii selected characteristics of a cytopathogenic virus common to five isolates from transmissible gastroenteritis	Porcine Gastro-Transmissible Enteritis Studies ii Selected characteristics d' a cytopathogenic virus common to five transmissible gastro@-enteritis isolates.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs i experimental reproduction of colibacillosis	In addition, there was no evidence of a significant increase in the incidence of colibacillosis.
19	gel filtration applied to the study of lipases and other esterases	Gel filtration applied to pH; lipase and other esterase studies.
19	an antiviral substance from penicillium funiculosum vi prevention of the establishment of passive immunity to semliki forest virus infection in mice by helenine	An antiviral substance of penicillium funiculosum vi prevents apos; establishment of apos; passive immunity to apos; apos infection in mice; helenin.
19	metabolism of d glucuronolactone in mammalian systems inhibitory properties of the products of d glucuronolactone dehydrogenase action	Metabolism of glucuronolactone d in mammalian systems, the inhibitory properties of l&apos products, and the action of glucuronolactone dehydrogenase d.
19	mechanism of action and some properties of a tissue activator of plasminogen	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to a tissue-based activator.
19	autochthonous intestinal bacterial flora and cholesterol levels in specific pathogen free swine fed high lipid and high sucrose diets	The autochthonous bacterial flora and cholesterol levels of porcine free of apo; specific pathogens were fed diets high in fat and sucrose.
19	mycoplasma latex agglutination reaction	Latex agglutination of the mycoplasma.
19	leptospiral selection growth and virulence in synthetic medium	Growth and virulence of the leptospiral selection process in a synthetic medium.
19	role of differential air pressure zones in the control of aerosols in a large animal isolation facility	In addition to the above, there are a number of other activities that can be carried out to improve air quality.
19	movement of lipids into and out of the blood during hyperlipidemia induced in rabbits by pituitary extract and fraction h	Lipid movement in rabbits; inner and outpatient; blood outpatient; apos-induced hyperlipidemia in rabbits; pituitary extract and fraction h.
19	decarboxylation of 2 keto fatty acids by brain	Decarboxylation of 2 brain keto fatty acids.
19	a soluble precipitating antigen hca from hog cholera virus propagated in tissue culture ii incidence of hca antibodies in sera of hog cholera immune and nonimmune swine	A soluble hca precipitating antigen of swine cholera virus spreads in tissue cultures ii incidence of hca antibodies in nonimmune and immune swine cholera sera.
19	some observations on the penetration of antibiotics through mucus in vitro	Some observations on antibiotic mucus penetration in vitro.
19	studies on the content of antibodies for equine influenza viruses in human sera	Antibody content studies against HIV; equine influenza in human sera.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs clinical studies and preliminary transmission trials	Exudative Epidermitis in Swine Clinical Studies and Preliminary Transmission Trials.
19	some observations on the diagnosis and epidemiology of leptospirosis in swine	Some observations on leptospirosis diagnosis and epidemiology in pigs.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs 3 evaluation of orally administered specific antisera	In addition, there is a need for additional data on the incidence and prevalence of hepatitis C in the general population.
19	screening test of animal sera for the cultivation of leptospires	Serum sifting test for leptospirae culture.
19	leucine aminopeptidase in extracts of swine muscle	Leucine aminopeptidase extracts from pig muscle.
19	the intestinal absorption of pig and bovine immune lactoglobulin and human serum albumin by the new born pig	L' intestinal absorption of lactoglobulin and d' porcine and bovine human immune serum albumin via new-porcine ne.
19	powassan virus persistence of virus activity during 1966	Powassan virus, apos persistence; viral activity in 1966.
19	the response of colostrum deprived specific pathogen free pigs to experimental infection with teschen disease virus	The colostrum response deprived free swine of testicular disease, a virus-specific pathogen.
19	the isolation of hyaluronic acid and chondroitin sulphate from kidneys and their reaction with urinary hyaluronidase	Lapos; kidney hyaluronic acid and chondroitin sulfate isolation and reaction with urine hyaluronidase.
19	the immune response to a hybrid protein molecule specificity of secondary stimulation and of tolerance induction	The Immune Response to Specificity of Dapos, a hybrid secondary stimulation protein molecule and dapos; tolerance induction.
19	toxicity to rats of corn invaded by chaetomium globosum	Toxicity to Chetomium globosum-infested corn rats.
19	group q streptococci i ecology serology physiology and relationship to established enterococci	Group q streptococci i serological physiology and relation to established enterococci.
19	alkaline and acid phosphatase activity ph and osmotic pressure of boar semen	Alkaline phosphatase and ph-acid activity and boar sperm osmotic pressure.
19	a study of procine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the toronto area i isolation and serological grouping of viruses	A study of isolated swine procinavirus enteroviruses in the Toronto area isolates and serologic clustering of viruses.
19	positional distribution of isomers of monoenoic fatty acids in animal glycerolipids	Positional distribution of fatty acid isomers in animal glycerolipids.
19	pepsinogen c and pepsin c further purification and amino acid composition	Pepsinogen c and pepsin c purification further and amino acid composition.
19	the requirement for bivalent cations in formation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by nicotinamide mononucleotide adenylyltransferase of pig liver nuclei	The need for divalent cations in nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide formation by hog liver nuclei nicotinamide mononucleotide adenyltransferase.
19	histidine sequences in the active centres of some serine proteinases	Serovinases and serovar serovarases were found to be the most common.
19	kinetic studies with liver galactokinase	Hepatic galactokinase kinetics studies.
19	further observations on the significance of a equine 2 63 antibodies in man	In addition, there was no evidence that the antibody was antigenic.
19	experimental sprue like small intestinal lesions in pigs	An experimental sprout like swine intestinal lesions.
19	water retention in the carcasses of pigs and lambs treated with diazoxide	Diazoxide-treated lambs; water in hog and sheep carcasses.
19	propagation of porcine cytomegalic inclusion disease virus in cell cultures preliminary report	Spread of Dapos Disease Virus; porcine cytomegalic inclusion in cellular cultures preliminary report.
19	boar semen studies i laboratory evaluation of processing phases	Boar Sperm Laboratory Evaluation i treatment phases.
19	a study of porcine enteroviruses isolated from swine in the toronto area ii characterization of the viruses as members of the picornavirus group	Pig enteroviruses isolated from pigs in the Toronto area ii were characterized as part of the picornavirus group.
19	the antigenic determinants of the protein polysaccharides of cartilage	Cartilage protein polysaccharide antigenic determinants.
19	blood groups of the i system in pigs association with variants of serum amylase	In pigs the system's blood groups are associated with serum apo-amylase variants.
19	the reproductive tract of the porcine female a biometrical study	The swine's reproductive apparatus is a biometric study.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs etiological studies and pathology	Exudative epidermitis infection in porcine etiological and pathological studies.
19	thyrocalcitonin ultracentrifugation in gradients of sucrose	Ultrracentrifugation of thyrocalcitonin in sucrose.
19	synthesis of ribonucleic acid in normal bone in vitro	It is not possible to determine the origin of the product.
19	african swine fever i antiserum production	It is the most common type of swine disease in the world.
19	malabsorption of hemoglobin iron in pernicious anemia correction with intrinsic factor containing substances	Malabsorption of the apo iron; hemoglobin in the pernicious correction of apoE; anemia with an intrinsic substance-containing factor.
19	studies on the biosynthesis of 16 dehydro steroids the metabolism of 4 14c pregnenolone by boar adrenal and testis tissue in vitro	Biosynthetic studies of 16 steroids dehydroxes the metabolism of 4c pregnenolone by adrenal boar and testicular tissue in vitro.
19	african swine fever iv demonstration of the viral antigen by means of immunofluorescence	African swine fever iv viral antigen demonstration by immunofluorescence.
19	african swine fever v cultivation of the virus in primary pig kidney cells	An African swine fever virus culture in primary swine kidney cells.
19	isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from liver	Liver isomerase isopentenyl pyrophosphate.
19	boar semen studies ii laboratory and fertility results of a method for deep freezing	Boar Sperm Studies ii Laboratory and fertility results; a deep freezing method.
19	comparison of pathogenicity of various isolates of bordetella bronchiseptica in young pigs	Comparison of pathogenicity in young swine of various Bordetella bronchiseptica isolates.
19	exudative epidermitis in pigs bacteriological studies on the causative agent	Exudative epidermitis in swine Cause-causing bacteriological studies.
19	effect of heating cooling the hypothalamus on behavioral thermoregulation in the pig	Effect of cooling heat on porcine behavioral thermoregulation.
19	a simple method for the isolation of adrenal chromaffin granules on a large scale	A simple, large-scale isolation of adrenal chromaffin granules.
19	the proteins and protein bound carbohydrates of the serum of the developing pig	Proteins and carbohydrates bound to serum from developing swine.
19	a viral gastroenteritis of ontario swine 1 clinical illness and recovery of the virus	Ontario Swine Gastro-viral enteritis 1 clinical illness and virus recovery.
19	experimental hemorrhagic septicemia gross and microscopic lesions resulting from acute infections and from endotoxin administration	Acute infection and endotoxin overdoses are considered to be the most common type of endotoxin, and the most common type of endotoxin.
19	effect of urokinase antiserum on plasminogen activators demonstration of immunologic dissimilarity between plasma plasminogen activator and urokinase	The effect of apos; antiserum urokinase on the activators of plasminogen demonstrates an immunological difference between the apos; activator of plasma plasminogen and the apos; urokinase.
19	hyperpyrexia during anaesthesia	Anesthetic hyperpyrexia.
19	lectins in extracts of certain polygonaceae seed precipitate animal and human serums	The lectins in the extracts of some polygonaceous seeds precipitate human and animal sera.
19	drug resistance of enteric bacteria 13 distribution of r factors in escherichia coli strains isolated from livestock	Drug Resistance of Enterobacteria 13 Distribution of factors r in cattle isolates; escherichia coli.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs iv comparison of enteropathogenic and nonenteropathogenic strains	Escherichia coli studies in gnotobiotic swine iv Comparison of enteric and non-enteropathogenic strains iv.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs v evaluation of the effects of oral and parenteral administration of immune serum	Dosage studies; Escherichia coli in gnotobiotic swine; oral and parenteral administration of anti-immune serum.
19	further studies on the use of nicotine to promote leanness in pigs	Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, Health Canada, and the Canadian Institutes of Health Research.
19	studies on transmissible gastroenteritis of swine 3 the effect of selective inhibitors of viral replication on a cytopathogenic virus from transmissible gastroenteritis	Gastro-Transmissible Porcine Enteritis 3 Lapos Effect; Selective Viral Replication Inhibitors on Transmissible Cytopathogenic Gastroenteritis Virus.
19	evidence for the presence of 16 alpha hydroxypregn 4 ene 3 20 dione in adrenal venous blood of young pigs	Evidence of 16 alpha-hydroxypregn 4 ene 320 dione in adrenal venous blood from young pigs.
19	the effect of acetylsalicyclic acid on platelet function	Apos; acetylsalicyclic acid effect on platelet function.
19	comparative studies of atherosclerosis in swine	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
19	purification of rabbit kidney cytokinase and a comparison of its properties with human urokinase	In addition, it is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with the results of other studies.
19	the purification of 3 3 dimethylallyl and geranyl transferase and of isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase from pig liver	Purification of 3 dimethylallyl, geranyltransferase, and porcine liver isopentenyl pyrophosphate isomerase.
19	calcitonin from ultimobranchial glands of dogfish and chickens	Calcitonin from apos ultimobranch glands; common prickle and chicken.
19	simplified presumptive tests for carbohydrate hydrolyzing enzymes	Simplified presumptive assays for carbohydrate-hydrolyzing enzymes.
19	pathogenicity of vibrio coli for swine i experimental infection of gnotobiotic pigs with vibrio coli	Vibrio coli pathogenicity in experimental swine gnotobiotic swine infection with vibrio coli.
19	pathogenicity of vibrio coli for swine ii experimental infection of conventional pigs with vibrio coli	Vibrio coli Pathogenicity in Swine ii Conventional experimental swine vibrio coli infection.
19	enzootic pneumonia of pigs complement fixation tests for the detection of mycoplasma antibodies in the serum of immunized rabbits and infected swine	Enzootic pneumonia in swine completes mycoplasmic antibody binding tests in serum from immunized rabbits and infected swine.
19	diagnosis of transmissible gastroenteritis in pigs by means of immunofluorescence	Gastro diagnosis-immunofluorescence-transmissible pig enteritis.
19	changes in erythrocyte sedimentation rate and serum proteins during experimentally produced erysipelatous arthritis in swine	Changes in serum erythrocyte and protein sedimentation rates during the experiment resulted in erysipatic arthritis in swine.
19	a serological survey for brucellosis in canadian swine	Brucellosis serology in Canadian swine.
19	the distribution of monoamine oxidase and alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase in pig brain	Monoamine oxidase and alpha glycerophosphate dehydrogenase distribution in pig brain.
19	the purification and concentration of hog cholear virus with electron micrographs a preliminary note	Purification and concentration of swine cholear virus with electronic micrographs preliminary note.
19	plaque morphology of teschen disease viruses and certain pig enteroviruses in primary pig kidney monolayer cultures	Morphology of the ranges of virus from disease of the testes and some porcine enteroviruses in swine kidney monolayer primary cultures.
19	a serological survey of sera from domestic animals on easter island	A serological study of the seros and domesticated animals on the island of l'apos; Est.
19	deoxycytidine and radiation response exceedingly high deoxycytidine aminohydrolase activity in human liver	L' human liver deoxycytidine aminohydrolase activity is excessively high in response to deoxycytidine and radiation.
19	nicotine hydrogen tartrate effect on essential fatty acid deficiency in mature pigs	The effect of nicotine tartrate on the deficiency of essential fatty acids in mature swine.
19	experimental appraisal of factors involved in provision of donor livers	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
19	interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharide generation of a factor chemotactic for polymorphonuclear leukocytes	Complimentary system interactions with endotoxic lipopolysaccharide production of d&apos, a chemotactic factor for polymorphonuclear leukocytes.
19	vaccinia virus infection of synchronized pig kidney cells	Vaccine Virus Infection of Synchronized Swine Renal Cells.
19	comparative studies of antigens from mycoplasma mycoides and escherichia coli	Mycoplasma mycoides and d' escherichia coli antigen comparative studies.
19	iron metabolism in copper deficient swine	Iron Metabolism in Copper-deficient Pigs.
19	adrenal secretion rates and adrenal tissue concentrations of pregnenolone progesterone 11 beta oh androstenedione and some other steroids in young pigs and dogs	Rates of adrenal secretion and levels of progesterone pregnenolone 11 beta oh androstenedione and d' other steroids in the adrenal tissues in young pigs and dogs.
19	the uptake of plasma constituents by the mammary gland of the sow	L' plasma component absorption by sow's mammary gland.
19	the action of cyanate on human and pig kidney alkaline phosphatases	The action of cyanate on the alkaline phosphatases of the human kidney and the kidney of a pig.
19	beta d glucosidases and related enzymic activities in pig kidney	Glucosidase beta and related pig kidney enzyme activities.
19	negligible release of cardiolipin during milk secretion by the ruminant	Negligible cardiolipin release during ruminant milk secretion.
19	kinetics of the reaction of renin with nine synthetic peptide substrates	The kinetics of the renin reaction with nine different synthetic peptide substrates.
19	the pyrophosphatase activity of pig kidney alkaline phosphatase and its inhibition by magnesium ions and excess of pyrophosphate	L' pig kidney alkaline phosphatase pyrophosphate activity and magnesium ion and l&apos inhibition; excess pyrophosphate.
19	enzootic pneumonia in pigs propagation of a causative mycoplasma in cell cultures and in artificial medium	Enzootic pneumonia in porcine spread of apos; a causal mycoplasma in cell cultures and an artificial medium.
19	lesions of the gastrointestinal tract of pigs infected with transmissible gastroenteritis	Gastro tract lesions-intestinal of transmitted gastro-infected pigs.
19	the histopathological changes in the skin of pigs with dermatosis vegetans	Histopathological changes in pig skin with dermatological plant dermatosis.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis of swine in ontario	Gastro-Ontario Transmissible Pork Enthusiast.
19	an attempt to experimentally produce edema disease in swine by oral administration of escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1	An attempt at experimental production of eggs; edema in pigs by oral administration of eggs; escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1 by oral administration.
19	attempts to produce experimental edema disease in swine by parenterally injecting escherichia coli serotype o139 k82 h1	For the purpose of this document, the following definitions shall be used: 1.
19	synthesis of 10 11 dihydrofarnesyl pyrophosphate from 6 7 dihydrogeranyl pyrophosphate by prenyltransferase	Synthesis of 10,11-dihydrofarnesyl pyrophosphate from 6,7-dihydrogeranyl pyrophosphate by prenyltransferase.
19	analogues of geranyl pyrophosphate as inhibitors of prenyltransferase	Analogs of the prenyltransferase inhibitor geranyl pyrophosphate.
19	physiological and serological comparisons among strains of mycoplasma granularum and mycoplasma laidlawii	Physiological and serological comparisons between mycoplasma granularum and laidlawii strains.
19	detection by hemagglutination of antibodies to group a and group e streptococci by the use of o stearoyl derivatives of their cell wall carbohydrate grouping antigens	Hemagglutination detection of antibodies for group a and group e of streptococci; use of their antigen-grouping cell carbohydrate o stearoyl derivatives.
19	trichinosis in south west ireland	Trichinose-west of l' Ireland.
19	virus of the 1918 influenza pandemic era new evidence about its antigenic character	Flu Virus; 1918 Flu Pandemic Era with new evidence of antigenicity.
19	the comparative structure of mammalian glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenases	Comparison of the structure of the three phosphate dehydrogenases of the mammalian glyceraldehyde.
19	fauna of catal h y k evidence for early cattle domestication in anatolia	The catal fauna is an indicator of early domestication of cattle in anatolia.
19	triglyceride synthesis by the small intestinal epithelium of the pig sheep and chicken	Hogs and chicks are known to have high cholesterol levels and to have high cholesterol levels.
19	assay of the possible organization of particle bound enzymes with squalene synthetase and squalene oxidocyclase systems	Assay of l' possible organization of particle-bound enzymes with the squalene synthetase and squalene-oxidocyclase systems.
19	mycoplasma taxonomy studiedy electrophoresis of cell proteins	Mycoplasma taxonomy studied cellular protein apos; electrophoresis.
19	renal fructose metabolizing enzymes significance in hereditary fructose intolerance	Renal fructose-metabolizing enzymes play an important role in apos; hereditary intolerance to fructose.
19	characterization of a human serum inhibitor of clostridium histolyticum proteinase s	Characterization of Human Serum Clostridium Histolyticum Proteinase Inhibitor.
19	the biosynthesis of some androst 16 enes from c21 and c19 steroids in boar testicular and adrenal tissue	The biosynthesis of certain androst 16 yenes from c21 and c19 in wild boar adrenal and testicular tissues.
19	porcine lactic dehydrogenase in the serum of patients treated by extracorporeal porcine liver perfusion	Swine lactic dehydrogenase in serum from extracorporeal swine liver perfusion patients.
19	preparation and some properties of l 3 glycerophosphate dehydrogenase from pig brain mitochondria	Preparation and some properties of the glycerophosphate dehydrogenase l-3 of the mitochondria of pig brain.
19	early stages of intestinal absorption of specific antibiodies in the newborn an ultrastructural cytochemical and immunological study in the pig rat and rabbit	Early stages of apo; intestinal absorption; specific antibiodies in newborn, ultrastructural cytochemical and immunological study in rabbit and porcine rat.
19	studies of escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs vi effects of feeding bacteria free filtrates of broth cultures	The results of the study are presented in the following manner: (i) (ii) (iii) (iv) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) or (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) or (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v) (v)
19	glasser s disease of swine produced by the intracheal inoculation of haemophilus suis	Sliding disease in swine caused by apos; haemophilus suis.
19	arbovirus plaquing in a clonal line ps y 15 of porcine kidney	Arbovirus plated into a ps y 15 clonal swine kidney lineage.
19	induction in vitro of microtubular crystals by vinca alkaloids	In vitro, l' microtubular crystal induction by the vinca alkaloids.
19	vinblastine induced precipitation of microtubule protein	Vinblastine precipitated microtubular protein.
19	control of the citric acid cycle by glyoxylate the mechanism of inhibition of oxoglutarate dehydrogenase isocitrate dehydrogenase and aconitate hydratase	Capos cycle control; citric acid glyoxylate mechanism; apos inhibition; oxoglutarate dehydrogenase isocitrate dehydrogenase and apos; aconitate hydratase.
19	specificity in the assembly of multisubunit proteins	Specificity in multi-protein assembly-under-units.
19	fractionation of phytohemagglutinin i purification of the rna and dna synthesis stimulating substances and evidence that they are not proteins	The fractionation of the phytohemagglutinin he purification of synthesis of rna and the stimulant DNA substances and proof that they are not proteins.
19	incidence of salmonellae in meat and meat products	Impact of Salmonella on Meat and Meat Products.
19	artificial substrates for prenyltransferase	Prenyltransferase artificial substrates.
19	studies on protein polysaccharides from pig laryngeal cartilage heterogeneity fractionation and characterization	Protein polysaccharide studies from pork laryngeal fractionation and characterization; heterogeneity of laryngeal cartilage.
19	biosynthesis of the fungal estrogen f 2 and a naturally occurring derivative f 3 by fusarium moniliforme	F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F 3 F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F F
19	evaluation of culture media for the isolation of salmonellae from feces	Assessment of Culture Media for Disease; Salmonella Isolation from Feces.
19	radiation sterilization of prototype military foods 3 pork loin	It is not possible to determine the origin or origin of the product.
19	studies on protein polysaccharides from pig laryngeal cartilage extraction and purification	Protein polysaccharide studies from pork laryngeal extraction and purification.
19	aflatoxin production in meats i stored meats	In addition, there are a number of other products that can be imported into Canada.
19	country cured ham as a possible source of aflatoxin	Country-dried ham could be an aflatoxin source.
19	an immunological approach to the study of evolution of trypsins	Immunological approach to apos; study of apos; evolution of trypsins.
19	transferable drug resistance among enterobacteriaceae isolated from cases of neonatal diarrhea in calves and piglets	Transferable drug resistance in enteric bacteria isolated from calf and piglet neonatal diarrhea.
19	the rate of molecular evolution considered from the standpoint of population genetics	The rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate of death; the rate; the rate of death rate; the rate of death rates of death; the rate; the rate of death rate; the rate; the rate of death rate; the rate; the rate of death rate; the rate of death rate; the rate; the rate, viewed from the perspective from the genetic level, the genetic level, the genetic level, from the genetic perspective of the population.
19	the assay of gastrin using the perfused rat stomach	Gastrin dosage at apos; help from infused rat stomach.
19	autolytic changes in the digestive system of germfree escherichia coli monocontaminated and conventional baby pigs	Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario. http://www.hc-sc.gc.ca/dhp-mps/index.html.
19	the electrocardiogram of conventional and miniature swine sus scrofa	L' classical pork and pork miniature pork echocardiogram on scrofa.
19	strontium 90 effects of chronic ingestion on farrowing performance of miniature swine	In addition to the above, there are a number of health effects associated with the use of strontium-90 in pork.
19	scanning electron microscopy of cells	Scanning cell electron microscopy.
19	esterolytic activity of elastase	L'activité estérolytique de l'apos; elastase.
19	the effects of in utero viral infection on embryonic fetal and neonatal survival a comparison of smedi porcine picorna viruses with hog cholera vaccinal virus	The effects of an in utero viral infection on fetal and neonatal embryonic survival were compared between smedi porcine picorna and porcine cholera vaccine virus.
19	the isolation of three neurophysins from porcine posterior pituitary lobes	L'isolation de trois neurophysins des lobes posteriores de l'apos; hypophyse du porc.
19	the antibody response in pigs inoculated with attenuated african swine fever virus	Immune response in swine inoculated with African swine fever-relieved virus.
19	antibody development in pigs inoculated with live or killed cultures of brucella abortus	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
19	the purification and concentration of hog cholera virus	Purification and swine cholera virus concentration.
19	experimental enteric colibacillosis in piglets	Experimental enteric piglet colibacillosis.
19	purification and properties of 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase from sheep liver	Purification and purification of sheep liver 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase.
19	some properties of cytochrome b5 from liver microsomes of man monkey pig and chicken	Some properties of human monkey chicken and swine liver microsomal cytochrome b5.
19	vitamin a and carotenoids the enzymic conversion of beta carotene into retinal in hog intestinal mucosa	Vitamin a and carotenoids are the enzymatic conversion of beta-carotene to retinal fluid in the pig intestinal mucosa.
19	characterization of protein polysaccharides of articular cartilage from mature and immature pigs	Characterization of mature and immature pig articular cartilage protein polysaccharides.
19	acid soluble phosphorus compounds in mammalian semen	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S.C., D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes, and D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes.
19	action of bacterial growth on the sarcoplasmic and urea soluble proteins from muscle i effects of clostridium perfringens salmonella enteritidis achromobacter liquefaciens streptococcus faecalis and kurthia zopfi	Bacterial growth action on soluble and sarcoplasmic proteins urea of muscle effects of clostridium perfringens salmonella enteritidis achromobacter liquefaciens streptococcus faecalis and kurthia zopfi.
19	growth and development of competence in the group h streptococci	Growth and skills development in h streptococci.
19	studies on the 1967 8 foot and mouth disease epidemic the relation of weather to the spread of disease	Studies on foot-and-mouth disease in 1967, the relationship between weather and disease spread.
19	vibrio enterotoxin in miniature pigs	Department of Health and Human Services.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis tge of swine the possible role of dogs in the epizootiology of tge	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be associated with the development of the disease.
19	immunological relationships between the neuraminidases of human and animal influenza viruses	Immunologic Relationships Between Human and Animal Neuraminidases.
19	correlation of bedrock type with the geography of leptospirosis	Correlation between mother rock type-and leptospirosis geography.
19	a stable l form of haemophilus pleuropneumoniae	Hemophilus pleuropneumoniae; hemophilus pleuropneumoniae.
19	interactions of the complement system with endotoxic lipopolysaccharides in immunoglobulin deficient sera	Complimentary system interactions with endotoxic lipopolysaccharides in immunoglobulin-deficient sera.
19	native human parathyroid hormone an immunochemical investigation	L' indigenous human parathyroid hormone is an immuno-chemical investigation.
19	proteins of the group b arbovirus kunjin	Kunjin kunjin b-arbovirus group proteins.
19	coronary aortic and cerebral atherosclerosis in swine of 3 age groups implications	It is not possible to determine the cause of the disease, but it is possible to determine the cause of the disease.
19	the isolation identification and synthesis of two metabolites of guanethidine formed in pig and rabbit liver homogenates	Identification and synthesis of two guanethidine metabolites formed in rabbit and porcine liver homogenates.
19	a collaborative study of heparins from different sources	Joint apo study; heparins from different sources.
19	the biosynthesis of androst 16 enes in boar testis tissue	Biosynthesis of 16 androst yeasts in wild boar testicles.
19	preliminary report on the development of a diffusion in gel method for the diagnosis of ram epididymitis	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
19	effects of glucagon dibutyryl cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate and theophylline on calcitonin secretion in vitro	Effects of the cyclic dibutyryl glucagon 3-5 adenosine monophosphate and theophylline on the secretion of calcitonin in vitro.
19	polymerizing equilibria in neurophysin	Neurophysin equilibrium polymerization.
19	method for eliminating anticomplementary activity in animal sera	It is not possible to determine if the product has been found to be a drug or not.
19	crystalline 3 phosphoglycerate kinase from skeletal muscle	Crystalline 3 skeletal muscle phosphoglycerate kinase.
19	some properties of the microsomal 2 3 oxidosqualene sterol cyclase	Some properties of microsomal 2-3 oxydosqualene sterol cyclase.
19	r factor transmission in vivo	Transmission of r-factor in vivo.
19	a reinvestigation of the substrate specificity of pig kidney diamine oxidase	A new study of diamine oxidase substrate specificity in pig kidney.
19	the role of ceruloplasmin in iron metabolism	The Role of Ceruloplasmin in Iron Metabolism.
19	amino acid sequences around the disulphide bridges and methionine residues of porcine pepsin	D&apos sequence; disulfide bond amino acids and porcine pepsin methionine residues.
19	variations in the ecology of glossina spp with special reference to nigerian populations of glossina tachinoides	Glossina spp. ecology, particularly in Nigerian glossina tachinoide populations.
19	the absorption of polyvinyl pyrrolidone by the new born pig intestine	L' newborn pig intestine absorbs polyvinyl pyrrolidone.
19	experimental immunization of sows with cell cultured tge virus	L' experimental sow immunizations with cell-grown virus tge.
19	effect of rye ergot on growth and n retention in growing pigs	Effect of Rye Ergot on Growth and Retention in Growing Pigs.
19	response of gnotobiotic pigs to escherichia coli	Acute gastrointestinal tract infection in swine.
19	somatic antigens of streptococcus group e i comparison of extraction techniques	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed at the same time as the test.
19	carboxyl terminal residues of mammalian fibrinogen and fibrin	Mammalian fibrinogen and fibrinogen end residues carboxyl.
19	number and types of peptide chains in thyroglobulin tryptic peptides of noniodinated hog thyroglobulin	Number and types of peptide chains in the tryptic peptides of thyroglobulin from non-iodinated thyroglobulin pigs.
19	experimental infection of weanling pigs with a swine influenza virus i epidemiology and serological response	Experimental swine flu virus infection i Epidemiology and serologic response.
19	experimental infection of weanling pigs with a swine influenza virus 3 immunity in piglets farrowed by antibody bearing dams experimentally infected a year earlier	Experimental infection of weanlings with immunity to the swine flu virus 3 in pigs reared by pregnant pregnant mothers; experimentally infected antibodies one year earlier.
19	purification and properties of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent isocitrate dehydrogenase from pig liver cytoplasm	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate-dependent purification and isocitrate dehydrogenase of pig liver cytoplasm.
19	nuclear membranes from mammalian liver i isolation procedure and general characterization	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the effects are likely to be significant.
19	nuclear membranes from mammalian liver ii lipid composition	Nuclear membranes of mammalian liver ii: lipid composition.
19	oxychlordane animal metabolite of chlordane isolation and synthesis	Animal metabolite oxychlordane from chlordane insulation and synthesis.
19	the action of certain antibiotics and ether on swine enzootic pneumonia	Action of Certain Antibiotics and Ether on Swine Enzootic Pneumonia.
19	the effect of rotor velocity on sedimentation coefficients	L' effect of the speed of the rotor on sedimentation coefficients.
19	radioreceptor assay of adrenocorticotropic hormone new approach to assay of polypeptide hormones in plasma	Adrenocorticotropic hormone novel approach for l' plasma polypeptide hormone assay.
19	quantitation of the antigenicity and immunogenicity of purified foot and mouth disease virus vaccine for swine and steers	It is recommended that the vaccine be used in conjunction with the vaccine, and that it be used in conjunction with the vaccine.
19	distribution of bacteria in feces of swine	Bacterial distribution in swine feces.
19	comparison of two plating media for detection of salmonella from swine tissues	Comparison of two culture media for pig tissue Salmonella detection.
19	a research standard for human serum immunoglobulins igg iga and igm	A research standard for igg igg igm and igg igm human serum immunoglobulins.
19	polypeptide with broad biological activity isolation from small intestine	Polypeptide with a wide range of biological activity, isolated from the human intestine.
19	gonadotropin releasing hormone one polypeptide regulates secretion of luteinizing and follicle stimulating hormones	The polypeptide 1 of the gonadotropin-releasing hormone, luteinizing hormones, and follicle-stimulating hormones regulates their secretion.
19	a focus of rumenal cancer in kenyan cattle	An outbreak of Kenyan cattle rumen cancer.
19	serum creatine phosphokinase levels in pigs reacting abnormally to halogenated anaesthetics	Serum level of creatine phosphokinase in pigs that respond abnormally to halogenated anesthetics.
19	the clinical and metabolic effects of porcine calcitonin on paget s disease of bone	Clinical and Metabolic Effects of Porcine Calcitonin on Paget Bone Disease.
19	salmonella isolations in abattoirs in greece	Slaughterhouse Salmonella isolation in Greece.
19	sewer and drain swabbing as a means of investigating salmonellosis	It is important to note that there are no data on the incidence of salmonellosis in Canada.
19	the excretion of two virulent strains of african swine fever virus by domestic pigs	L' two virulent strains of swine flu virus shed by domestic swine.
19	virulence and pathogenesis of yellow fever virus serially passaged in cell culture	The virulence and the pathogenesis of the yellow fever virus have been mass-produced in cell cultures.
19	studies of the bulbo urethral cowper s gland mucin and seminal gel of the boar	Studies of mucine gland and seminal gels of wild boar.
19	growth of the ib rs 2 pig kidney cell line in suspension culture and its susceptibility to foot and mouth disease virus	Growth of swine kidney cell line ib rs 2 Suspended and FMD virus susceptible.
19	effects of oxyamylose and polyacrylic acid on foot and mouth disease and hog cholera virus infections	Efficacy of chlorinated organic compounds (CASs) and chlorinated organic compounds (CASs) in drinking water.
19	relationship of the frequency of isolation of salmonellae to their resistance to drying and freezing	The amount of water that can be used in the treatment of a disease.
19	iodination of glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Glyceraldehyde iodide 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
19	comparison of microtiter procedures with the plaque technique for assay of vesicular stomatitis virus	Comparison of Microtitration Procedures with Plate Method for Vesicular Stomatitis Virus.
19	comparison of animal sera for suitability in coagulase testing	Animal serum is compared to determine s&apos, suitable for the coagulation test.
19	the relationship of arterial blood ph and pco2 to the viability of the newborn piglet	The relationship between ph and pco2 in arterial blood and newborn piglet viability.
19	experimental immunization of sows with inactivated transmissible gastroenteritis tge virus	Experimental sow vaccination against inactivated gastrovirus-transmissible tge.
19	steroidal free radicals as possible intermediates in the biosynthesis of c19 delta 16 steroids	Free steroid radicals are a possible intermediate in delta 16-c19 steroid biosynthesis.
19	organic mercury identified as the cause of poisoning in humans and hogs	Organic mercury has been identified as the cause of human and swine poisoning.
19	ultrastructural localization of intracellular antigen using enzyme labeled antibody fragments	The results of the study will be used to determine the extent to which the antigen is present in the body.
19	ultrastructural localization of calcitonin in the parafollicular cells of pig thyroid gland with cytochrome c labeled antibody fragments	Ultrastructural calcitonin localization in pig thyroid gland parafollicle cells with cytochrome c labelled d&apos fragments.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs the role of milk in protective immunity to e coli enteritis	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of immunity: immunity to escherichia coli in swine; immunity to protectable immunity to e coli.
19	studies on the bacterial floral of condemmed portions from arthritic hogs	Bacterial flora studies of condensed portions of swine arthritis.
19	a study of escherichia coli strains isolated from pigs with gastro intestinal disease	A study of isolated strains of Escherichia coli from swine with gastro-intestinal illness.
19	dose response relationship of luteinizing hormone to luteinizing hormone releasing hormone in man	Dose ratio-response; luteinizing hormone; luteinizing hormone; luteinizing hormone; man.
19	further investigations on the airborne excretion of foot and mouth disease virus	Continued research on foot-and-mouth disease air shedding.
19	ihalation persistence and dispersal f foot and mouth disease virus by man	In addition to the above, there is also the possibility of human exposure to FMD.
19	anaesthetic induced malignant hyperpyrexia a suggested method of treatment	Anesthesia induced malignant hyperpyrexia, suggested treatment.
19	the growth and persistence of foot and mouth disease virus in the bovine mammary gland	FMD virus growth and persistence in the bovine mammary gland.
19	the purification and properties of the l serine o sulphate degrading system of pig liver	Purification and system properties degrading the serine or sulfate of the pig liver.
19	isolation and fractionation of glycopeptides from porcine thyroglobulin	Porcine thyroglobulin glycopeptide isolation and fractionation.
19	the structure of a glycopeptide purified from porcine thyroblobulin	Porcine thyroblobulin purified glycopeptide structure.
19	the influence of deep body temperatures and skin temperatures on peripheral blood flow in the pig	L' influence of deep body temperature and skin temperature on the porcine peripheral blood flow.
19	vertebrate faunas and chronology of hominid bearing sediments east of lake rudolf kenya	The species is found in the eastern part of the lake, in the eastern part of the lake.
19	competitive labelling a method for determining the reactivity of individual groups in proteins the amino groups of porcine elastase	Competitive labeling of apos; a method to determine individual group reactivity in protein amino groups of the porcine elastase.
19	effect of ph changes on the binding of vitamin b12 by intrinsic factor	Effect of Ph changes on intrinsic vitamin b12 binding.
19	adrenal medullary calcitonin like factor a key to multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2	Adrenal medullary calcitonin is a key factor in the development of multiple type 2 endocrine neoplasia.
19	enzyme purification by electrodecantation	Electro-decant purification.
19	carbohydrate content of insoluble elastins prepared from adult bovine and calf ligamentum nuchae and tropoelastin isolated from copper deficient porcine aorta	Insoluble elastin carbohydrate content prepared from ligamentum nuchae of bovine and adult calves and from tropoelastin isolated from copper-deficient porcine aorta.
19	transient kinetic studies of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase	Pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase transient kinetics studies.
19	heterogeneity of protein polysaccharides of porcine articular cartilage the sequential extraction of chondroitin sulphate proteins with iso osmotic neutral sodium acetate	Porcine articular cartilage protein polysaccharide heterogeneity, sequential extraction of chondroitin sulfate proteins with l' isoosmotic neutral sodium acetate.
19	ultraviolet light a new stimulus for the induction of platelet aggregation	Ultraviolet rays provide a new stimulus to apos; apos induction; platelet aggregation.
19	total synthesis of acetate from co 2 methyltetrahydrofolate an intermediate and a procedure for separation of the folates	The total synthesis of l' acetate from 2-methyl tetrahydrofolate is a folate separation intermediate and method.
19	bile salts of germ free domestic fowl and pigs	Bile salts; domestic and germ-free swine.
19	inhibition of the renin angiotensinogen reaction by pepstatin	Inhibition of kidney reaction; angiotensinogen by pepstatin.
19	the metabolism of phosphatidylinositol in the thyroid gland of the pig	Phosphatidylinositol metabolism in pig thyroid.
19	an active site peptide from pepsin c	Pepsin c active site peptide.
19	role of the cytoplasmic membrane in the synthesis of ribonucleic acid by disrupted spheroplasts of pseudomonas schuylkilliensis	Role of cytoplasmic membrane in ribonucleic acid synthesis by broken spheroplasts of pseudomonas schuylkilliensis.
19	membranes of chromaffin granules isolation and partial characterization of two proteins	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
19	the reaction of glucagon with its receptor evidence for discrete regions of activity and binding in the glucagon molecule	Reaction of glucagon with its receptor indicates the existence of discrete glucagon-binding and activity regions.
19	neurohypophyseal hormone responsive adenylate cyclase from mammalian kidney	In addition, it is not possible to predict the effects of the drug on the patient.
19	starch gel electrophoresis of fructose 6 phosphate phophoketolase in the genus bifidobacterium	L' d&apos gel electrophoresis; fructose phophoketolase starch 6 bifidobacterium phosphate.
19	electrophoretic and immunological characterization of rat neurophysin	Electrophoretic and Immunologic Characterization of Rat Neurophysin.
19	thyrocalcitonin stimulation of secretion by pentagastrin	Pentagastrin stimulates thyrocalcitonin secretion.
19	characteristics of antimicrobial resistance of escherichia coli from animals relationship to veterinary and management uses of antimicrobial agents	Characteristics of Antimicrobial Resistance in Escherichia coli arising from animal interactions with veterinary and antimicrobial management uses.
19	inhibition by rifampin of african swine fever virus replication in tissue culture	In addition, the use of rifampin inhibits the replication of the African swine fever virus in tissue cultures.
19	classification of north american porcine enteroviruses a comparison with european and japanese strains	North Pig Enterovirus Classification-US vs. European and Japanese strains.
19	nucleoside pyrophosphatase activity associated with pig kidney alkaline phosphatase	Pig kidney alkaline phosphatase-associated nucleoside pyrophosphatase activity.
19	bovine pepsinogens and pepsins the sequence around a reactive aspartyl residue	In addition, there are a number of other substances that can be added to the food.
19	coupling of glycosaminoglycans to agarose beads sepharose 4b	Glycosaminoglycans are used to make the glycosaminoglycans and glycosaminoglycans.
19	glycolytic enzymes in mammalian spermatozoa activities and stabilities of hexokinase and phosphofructokinase in various fractions from sperm homogenates	Glycolytic enzymes in the activities of mammalian spermatozoa and the stability of the apos; hexokinase and phosphofructokinase in various fractions; homogenates of spermatozoa.
19	tentative identification of a vasopressin neurophysin and an oxytocin neurophysin in the rat	Preliminary identification of: vasopressin/daposin neurophysin; d*apos neurophysin; rat oxytocin.
19	bacteriological survey of fresh pork sausage produced at establishments under federal inspection	Bacteriological studies of sausages produced in federally inspected establishments.
19	studies of the toxicity of helminthosporium maydis	Health Canada, Health Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
19	identification and aflatoxin production of molds isolated from country cured hams	Identification and production of apos; aflatoxin from moulds recovered from traditionally cooked hams.
19	effect on young swine of consumption of rations containing corn invaded by fusarium roseum	Effect of fusarium roseum-infested corn on young pigs.
19	antipeptic activity of antacids	Antacid anti-peptic activity.
19	on the identity of dopa decarboxylase and 5 hydroxytryptophan decarboxylase immunological titration aromatic l amino acid decarboxylase serotonin dopamine norepinephrine	On the apos; dopa decarboxylase identity and 5 hydroxytryptophan decarboxylase aromatic immunological titration of amino acid decarboxylase serotonin dopamine norepinephrine.
19	evolution of neurophysin proteins the partial sequence of bovine neurophysin i vasopressin oxytocin carrier proteins automated amino acid sequence analysis homology protein evolution	L' evolution of neurophysinic proteins, the partial sequence of proteins carrying the neurophysin i vasopressin bovine, automatise l' analysis of the amino acid sequence and l' evolution of proteins d' homology.
19	plasminogen activator in bile during extracorporeal perfusion of pig liver	Activator of the bile plasminogen during the porcine liver extracorporeal infusion.
19	heterogeneity of foot and mouth disease virus further studies on plaque formation by two plaque size variants	It is important to note that there are two different types of beaches in the world, one of which is the Mediterranean Sea and one of which is the Mediterranean Sea.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs serum gamma globulin levels indirect hemagglutinating antibody titres and bactericidal activity against e coli in pigs up to five weeks of age	Immunity to Escherichia coli in the serum of swine levels of indirect hemagglutinating gamma globulin; antibody and bactericidal activity against e coli in swine up to and including 5 weeks of age.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs antibody secretion by the mammary gland after intramammary or intramuscular vaccination with an e coli vaccine	Escherichia coli immunity in mammary gland swine antibody secretion following intramammary or intramuscular immunization with e coli vaccine.
19	the effect of medicated feed on the nasal microflora and weight gain of pigs	Effects of medicated feed on nasal microflora and swine weight gain.
19	influenza a of human swine equine and avian origin comparison of survival in aerosol form	Influenza a dapos; human and animal porcine origin; avian origin; aerosolized survival comparison.
19	interaction of porcine mycoplasmas with fresh animal serum	Interaction of pig mycoplasmas with fresh-breathing animal serum.
19	the comparative susceptibility of hysterectomy produced colostrum deprived pigs and naturally born enzootic pneumonia free pigs to enzootic pneumonia	The comparative sensitivity of apos; hysterectomy resulted in colostrum-deprived pigs and enzootic-pneumonia-free pigs born naturally to enzootic pneumonia.
19	heterogeneity of tubulin subunits	Subs-tubulin units heterogeneity.
19	pancreatin as a source of hospital acquired salmonellosis	The disease is a major cause of salmonellosis, and has been linked to a number of other diseases.
19	comparison of the microtubule proteins of neuroblastoma cells brain and chlamydomonas flagella	Comparison of microtubule proteins in neuroblastoma cells and flagella chlamydomonas.
19	platelet interaction with polymerizing fibrin	Fibrin-polymerizing platelet interaction.
19	hypothalamic follicle stimulating hormone fsh and luteinizing hormone lh regulating hormone structure physiology and clinical studies	In addition to the above, there are a number of studies that have been carried out in the area of human papillomavirus.
19	isolation of psychrophilic bacteriophage host systems from refrigerated food products	To isolate the systems that host psychrophilic bacteriophages from refrigerated food products.
19	action of pseudomonas fragi on the proteins of pig muscle	L' action of pseudomonas fragi on pork-muscle proteins.
19	dna constancy in heteroploidy and the stem line theory of tumors	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
19	studies on the biochemistry of mitochondria and cell morphology in the neonatal swine hepatocyte	Studies of cell morphology and mitochondrial biochemistry in neonatal pig hepatocytes.
19	the kinetics of phenethylhydrazine oxidation by monoamine oxidase	Apos kinetics; monoamine oxidase oxidation of phenethylhydrazine.
19	isolation of normal immunoglobulin e by means of an immunoadsorbent	If the product is found to be immunosorbent, it should be stored in a sterile container.
19	synthesis and oxidation of aminoalkyl onium compounds by pig kidney diamine oxidase	Pig kidney diamine oxidase synthesizes and oxidizes aminoalkyl onium compounds.
19	a distinctive cell contact in the rat adrenal cortex	A distinct cellular contact in rat adrenal cortex.
19	heterogeneity of protein polysaccharides of porcine articular cartilage the chondroitin sulphate proteins associaterd with collagen	Porcine articular cartilage protein polysaccharide heterogeneity, collagen-associated chondroitin sulfate proteins.
19	vitamin d intoxication treated with porcine calcitonin	Calcitonin-treated swine vitamin d poisoning.
19	enteritis due to salmonella panama from infected ham	Enteritis caused by the panama salmonella infection of the infected ham.
19	salmonella in pigs and animal feeding stuffs in england and wales and in denmark	Salmonella in feed and pigs in England and Wales and Denmark.
19	salmonellas on pig farms and in abattoirs	Salmonella in pigs and Salmonella in slaughterhouses.
19	an epidemiological study of the incidence of salmonellas in pigs	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
19	comparative complement fixation studies with subtype strains of foot and mouth disease virus	Comparative studies of the binding of the complement with strains under-types of the FMD virus.
19	radio immunoassay of gastrin in human plasma	Human plasma gastrin radioimmunoassay.
19	m ssbauer studies of adrenodoxin the mechanism of electron transfer in a hydroxylase iron sulphur protein	Electron transfer mechanism in an iron hydroxylase sulfurous protein, adrenodoxine.
19	n terminal amino acid sequence of african lungfish immunoglobulin light chains	N sequence d' terminal light chain amino acids d' immunoglobulins of African lungfish.
19	susceptibility of gnotoibiotic swine to escherichia coli isolated from nonenteric human infections	It is not possible to determine if there is a risk of infection due to an infectious disease.
19	calcitonin receptors of kidney and bone	Receptors for calcitonin from the kidneys and bones.
19	inhibition of pig kidney diamine oxidase by substrate analogues	Substrate analogs inhibit pig kidney diamine oxidase.
19	rapid detection of salmonella microcolonies by fluorescent antibody	Fluorescent antibodies rapidly detect Salmonella microcolonies.
19	observations by electron microscopy on pig muscle inoculated and incubated with pseudomonas fragi	Electron microscopic observations on porcine muscle inoculated with Pseudomonas fragi.
19	an evaluation of the efficiency of cleaning methods in a bacon factory	It is important to keep in mind that it is not always easy to clean.
19	the production of pneumonia with or without pleurisy in gnotobiotic piglets with pure cultures of strain tr 32 of mycoplasma hyorhinis	Pneumonia production with and without pleurisy in pure cultured gnotobiotic piglets of mycoplasma hyorhinis strain tr 32.
19	investigation into rabbit infusion media for the growth of mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens for inoculation into rabbits	Rabbit growth perfusion media studies; mycoplasma gallisepticum antigens for rabbit inoculation.
19	natural selection of parental ability to vary the sex ratio of offspring	Natural selection of the ability of parents to vary their offspring's sex ratio.
19	application of an improved system of electrophoresis in acrylamide gel to studies on the sera of different species	Applied apo; improved apo system; apo gel electrophoresis; apo acrylamide; serum studies of different species.
19	etiology of hyperparathyroidism and bone disease during chronic hemodialysis 3 evaluation of parathyroid suppressibility	Etiology of apo; hyperparathyroidism and bone disease during apo placentae; chronic hemodialysis; and parathyroid suppressibility assessment.
19	further studies of porcine malignant hyperthermia	It is not possible to determine the cause of the injury.
19	the enzymic degradation of l serine o sulphate mechanism of the reaction	Enzymatic degradation of the serine o-sulfate reaction mechanism.
19	human parathyroid hormone amino acid sequence of the amino terminal residues 1 34	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
19	nucleated assembly of microtubules in porcine brain extracts	L' microtubule nucleation in pig brain extracts completed.
19	studies on the biosynthesis in vivo and excretion of 16 unsaturated c 19 steroids in the boar	In vivo biosynthesis and apo studies; 16 c 19 unsaturated steroids excretion in wild boar.
19	a comparative study of the rabbit and pig gut loop systems for the assay of escherichia coli enterotoxin	A comparative study of rabbit and swine bowel systems for apos enterotoxin; escherichia coli.
19	dietary induction of mulberry heart disease and hepatosis dietetica in pigs i nutritional aspects	Dietary Induction of Cardiac Mulberry Disease and Dietary Induction of Cardiac Disease in Swine; Dietary Induction in Swine.
19	50 chromium labeled erythrocyte half time disappearance from adult sinclair s 1 miniature swine	Fifty chrome-labeled erythrocytes disappear at mid-time of death; miniature adult swine.
19	effect of supplemental vitamin e and selenium in high moisture corn diets on the incidence of mulberry heart disease and hepatosis dietetica in pigs	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the risk of heart disease, including the risk of heart disease.
19	vitamin e selenium and methionine supplementation of dystrophogenic diets for pigs	Vitamin e selenium and dystrophogenic dietary methionine supplements for pigs.
19	distribution of porcine fecal coliflora throughout a barn	Distribution of fecal porcine coliflora in a barn.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs anti enterotoxins in colostrum and serum from vaccinated and non vaccinated sows	Immunization against Escherichia coli in pigs is effective against enterotoxins in both unvaccinated and vaccinated sows.
19	ecology of intestinal escherichia coli in pigs	Canadian Council on Animal Health.
19	mixed conformations of deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin a preliminary report	Preliminary report on the mixed chromatin deoxyribonucleic acid – l&apos conformations.
19	electrophoretic separation and differentiation of enzymes from human and from porcine liver	Human and porcine liver enzyme differentiation and electrophoretic separation.
19	isolation of porcine immunoglobulins and determination of the immunoglobulin classes of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antibodies	Isolate porcine immunoglobulins and determine viral antibody to gastrointestinal (viral) immunoglobulin (viral) classes.
19	antigenic relationships between type a influenza viruses of human porcine equine and avian origin	Antigenic Relationships between Influenza-like viruses; human and animal swine origin; avian origin.
19	swine influenza epizootiological and serological studies	Epizootiological and Serological Studies of Swine Flu.
19	hong kong influenza infection in swine experimental and field observations	Hong Kong Influenza Influenza in swine in experimental and field studies.
19	experimental infection of human volunteers with a swine influenzavirus antigenically related to the human a hong kong 68 virus	Human volunteer experimental infection with an antigenically related porcine influenzavirus; human hong kong 68 virus.
19	studies on the adsorption of certain medium proteins to mycoplasma gallisepticum and their influence on agglutination and haemagglutination reactions	Apos studies; adsorption of certain gallisepticum mycoplasma proteins from the medium and their influence on d' agglutination and d' hemagglutination.
19	the influence of deep body and skin temperatures on thermoregulatory responses to heating of the scrotum in pigs	L' influences the thermoregulatory responses to scrotal heating in pigs by deep skin and body temperatures.
19	squamous metaplasia of the opening of bronchial glands	Squamous interval metasplasia; bronchial gland opening.
19	saint louis encephalitis viral ribonucleic acid replication complex	Apos replication complex; St. Louis viral ribonucleic acid; St. Louis encephalitis.
19	51 chromium labeled erythrocyte half time disappearance from miniature swine	Disappearance mi-time d' chrome-marked erythrocytes of miniature pigs.
19	chronological development of mycoplasma hyorhinis and mycoplasma hyosynoviae infections in cultures of a swine synovial cell strain	The time course of hyorhinis mycoplasma and hyosynoviae mycoplasma infections in d&apos cultures; a porcine synovial cell line.
19	the significance of proliferation and enterotoxin production by escherichia coli in the intestine of gnotobiotic pigs	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
19	the effects of spraying on the amounts of airborne foot and mouth disease virus present in loose boxes	Effects of Spraying on the Amount of Foot and Mouth Disease Virus in the Apos; Air in Loose Plates.
19	serological relationships among herpesviruses cross reaction between marek s disease virus and pseudorabies virus as detected by immunogluorescence	The serological relationships between herpesviruses cause a cross-reactivity between the Marek disease virus and the pseudorabies virus, as detected by immunogluorescence.
19	studies on the wholesomeness of ready to eat meat products i bacteriological evaluation of comminuted heated products	Prepared Meat Safety Studies-@-@ to-eats the bacteriological evaluation of shared-heat products.
19	the vascular architecture of the porcine small intestine	L' pork vascular architecture; small intestine.
19	studies on the wholesomeness of ready to eat meat products ii chemical evaluation of comminuted heated products	Prepared Meat Safety Studies-@-@ eat ii Chemical Evaluation of Comminuted Heat Products.
19	the effect of chlortetracycline feed additive on the antibiotic resistance of fecal coliforms of weaned pigs subjected to experimental salmonella infection	Effect of apo; food additive to chlortetracycline on antibiotic resistance in weaned fecal coliforms of experimental swine infected with Salmonella.
19	bovine viral diarrhea virus in swine neutralizing antibody in naturally and experimentally infected swine	Bovine viral diarrhea virus virus in porcine neutralizing antibodies in pigs infected naturally and experimentally.
19	evidence for the amino acid sequence of porcine pancreatic elastase	Evidence of the sequence d' porcine amino acids; pancreatic elastase.
19	the hampshire epidemic of foot and mouth disease 1967	Foot-and-mouth epidemic in hampshire in 1967.
19	transmission of infectious drug resistance from animals to man	Human papillomavirus (HPV) resistance in human papillomavirus.
19	correction of adverse response to suxamethonium of susceptible pigs	Correcting suxamethonium adverse reaction in sensitive pigs.
19	association of escherichia coli with the small intestinal epithelium i comparison of enteropathogenic and nonenteropathogenic porcine strains in pigs	In the case of hogs and swine, the risk of infection is estimated by multiplying the number of cases by the number of cases by the number of cases.
19	association of escherichia coli with the small intestinal epithelium ii variations in association index and the relationship between association index and enterosorption in pigs	Epithelium is an essential component of the human body's ability to function as a source of food for humans and as a source of food for humans.
19	the role of a tyrosyl residue in the mechanism of action of carboxypeptidase b luminescence studies	The role of d&apos, a tyrosyl residue, in the action of carboxypeptidase b was studied by luminescence.
19	the intramitochondrial location of the glutaminase isoenzymes of pig kidney	Intramitochondrial localization of porcine kidney glutaminase isozymes.
19	transport of glutamine and glutamate in kidney mitochondria in relation to glutamine deamidation	Glutamine and glutamate transport into renal mitochondria is related to glutamine deamidation.
19	biosynthesis of proteoglycans in cartilage slices fractionation by gel chromatography and equilibrium density gradient centrifugation	Biosynthesis of the proteoglycans by fractionation of the cartilage slices by gel chromatography and density gradient centrifugation at l' equilibrium.
19	a catalytic mechanism for the enzyme benzylamine oxidase from pig plasma	Catalytic Mechanisms of Pig Plasma Benzylamine Oxidase.
19	the characterization of two reduced nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate linked aldehyde reductases from pig brain	Characterization of two aldehyde reductases of pig brain related to nicotinamide-reduced epos; adenine dinucleotide phosphate.
19	effects of some disinfectants on african swine fever virus	Effect of Certain Disinfectants on African Swine Fever Virus.
19	the pathogenesis of potter s syndrome of renal agenesis	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
19	d myoinositol 1 2 cyclic phosphate 2 phosphohydrolase	D myoinositol 1-2 phosphohydrolase cyclic phosphate 2.
19	phosphoric acid triester glutathione alkyltransferase a mechanism for the detoxification of dimethyl phosphate triesters	Triester d' glutathione phosphoric acid alkyltransferase, a dimethyl phosphate triester detoxification mechanism.
19	antibody responses in serum colostrum and milk of swine after infection or vaccination with transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Antibody Reactions in Serum Colostrum and Porcine Milk after Infection or Vaccination with Gastro Virus-Transmissible Enteritis.
19	the purification and properties of factor x from pig serum and its role in hypercoagulability in vivo	Purification and pork serum x factor properties and its role in in vivo hypercoagulation.
19	physiology and chemistry of the hypothalamic releasing factors for gonadotropins a new approach to fertility control	Physiology and hypothalamic release factor chemistry of gonadotropins are new approaches to fertility control.
19	humoral antibody responses of swine infected experimentally with group e streptococcus i whole cell agglutinin response	Humoral antibody reactions of experimentally infected pigs with the response to l-apos; whole-cell agglutinin of group e-Streptococcus i.
19	humoral antibody responses of swine infected experimentally with group e streptococcus ii antistreptokinase and antistreptodornase responses	Reactions of humoral antibodies from experimentally infected pigs with streptococcus group antitreptokinase and antitreptodornase ii.
19	polyserositis and arthritis due to escherichia coli in gnotobiotic pigs	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors for cervical cancer.
19	the pattern of enteroviral infections in a herd of swine	Enteroviral infection patterns in a herd of pigs.
19	antigenic type specificity of swine isolates of streptococcus equisimilis	Specificity of porcine Streptococcus equisimilis isolates to the antigenic type.
19	swine interferon i induction in porcine cell cultures with viral and synthetic inducers	Swine interferon i induction in swine cell culture systems with viral and synthetic inducers.
19	swine interferon ii induction in pigs with viral and synthetic inducers	Swine interferon ii pig induction with viral and synthetic inducers.
19	african swine fever application of immunoelectroosmophoresis for the detection of antibody	Immunoelectro-osmophoresis against African swine fever for antibody detection.
19	studies on relationships between human and porcine influenza 1 serological evidence of infection in swine in great britain with an influenza a virus antigenically like human hong kong 68 virus	Studies of the Relationship Between Human and Swine Influenza 1 Serological evidence of infection of swine in Great Lakes by an antigenically similar human hong kong virus 68 virus.
19	studies on relationships between human and porcine influenza 2 immunological comparisons of human a hong kong 68 virus with influenza a viruses of porcine origin	Studies of the Relationship Between Swine and Human Influenza 2 Immunologic Comparisons Between Human Hong Kong Virus 68 and Swine-borne Influenza.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes i phagocytic and bactericidal properties of polymorphonuclear leukocytes from swine	Group e streptococci are studied in pig leukocytes in vitro, and polymorphonuclear leukocytes in pigs are bactericidal.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes ii phagocytic and bactericidal properties of macrophages from immune and nonimmune swine	In vitro studies in pig leukocytes of group e streptococci ii phagocytic and bactericidal properties of immune and nonimmune pig macrophages.
19	in vitro studies of group e streptococci in swine leukocytes 3 the migration inhibition test as an indication of delayed hypersensitivity in streptococcic lymphadenitis	In vitro group streptococcal studies in porcine leukocytes 3, migration inhibition as an indication of disease; delayed hypersensitivity in streptococcal lymphadenitis.
19	the effect of chlortetracycline feed additive on experimental salmonella infection of swine and antibiotic resistance transfer	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim, and it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
19	age dependent resistance to transmissible gastroenteritis of swine tge i clinical signs and some mucosal dimensions in small intestine	Antimicrobial Resistance (AMR); Antimicrobial Resistance (AMR); Antimicrobial Resistance (AMR); Antimicrobial Resistance (AMR); Antimicrobial Resistance (AMR); Antimicrobial Resistance (AMR); Antimicrobial resistance.
19	electron microscopy of intestinal epithelial cells of piglets infected with a transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Electronic microscopy of infected gastro-transmissible enteritis piglet intestinal epithelial cells.
19	isolation of escherichia coli o157 from pigs with colibacillosis in canada and the united states	The Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) is the lead federal agency responsible for food safety in Canada.
19	role of the k88 antigen in the pathogenesis of neonatal diarrhea caused by escherichia coli in piglets	Role of parasites; antigen k88 in the pathogenesis of escherichia coli-induced neonatal diarrhea in piglets.
19	aggregation of human blood platelets by vasopressin	Human platelet aggregation by vasopressin.
19	the enzymic degradation of l serine o sulphate by a specific system from pig liver studies on the mechanism of the reaction	The enzymatic degradation of serine o sulfate by a specific system obtained from studies on the reaction mechanism in pig liver.
19	subcellular organization of neurophysins oxytocin 8 lysine vasopressin and adenosine triphosphatase in porcine posterior pituitary lobes	Subcellular organization of the neurophysins oxytocin 8, lysine vasopressin, and adenosine triphosphatase in the pig posterior pituitary lobes.
19	characterization of the coronary vascular adrenoceptor in the pig	Characterization of porcine coronary vascular adrenoceptor.
19	changes in the protein polysaccharides of pig articular cartilage during prenatal life development and old age	Changes in porcine articular cartilage protein polysaccharide content during prenatal development and aging.
19	haemorrhage as a complication of extracorporeal pig liver perfusion studies on mechanism and prevention	Hemorrhage as a complication of studies of extracorporeal hepatic infusion of pigs on mechanisms and prevention.
19	lipogenic enzyme activities and cellularity of porcine adipose tissue from various anatomical locations	Cellularity and lipogenic enzymatic activity of pig adipose tissue at various anatomical locations.
19	cholesterol turnover synthesis and retention in hypercholesterolemic growing swine	Dietary Reference Intakes, R.S.C., D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes, and D.R. Dietary Reference Intakes.
19	inhibition of monoamine oxidase by substituted hydrazines	Substituted hydrazines inhibit monoamine oxidase.
19	16 unsaturated c 19 3 oxo steroids as metabolic intermediates in boar testis	Sixteen unsaturated steroids c 19-3 oxo as a metabolic intermediate in wild boar testis.
19	synthetic peptides in the diagnosis of exocrine pancreatic insufficiency in animals	In addition, there are a number of studies that have been conducted in the United States and the United States.
19	properties of the enterotoxic component in escherichia coli enteropathogenic for swine	Enteropathogenic Escherichia coli for swine.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens i serological identification of saint louis encephalitis virus soluble antigens	Arbovirus group b, structural and non-structural antigens i Soluble antigen identification of the virus; St.-Louis encephalitis.
19	an antiphagocytic factor associated with group e streptococcus	Group Streptococcus Antiphagocytic Factor e.
19	the effect of vaccination with a live attenuated strain of japanese encephalitis virus on stillbirths in swine in taiwan	Immunization with an attenuated live strain of potato virus; Japanese encephalitis on swine stillbirths in Taiwan.
19	enhanced protein adsorption at the solid solution interface dependence on surface charge	The following are some of the advantages of this approach: improved image quality; protein adsorption; solid-state interface vs. surface charge.
19	two morphologically distinct blood brain barriers preventing entry of cytochrome c into cerebrospinal fluid	Two morphologically distinct-encephalic blood barriers prevent cytochrome c from entering the cerebrospinal fluid-spinal cord.
19	action of phospholipase a 2 and phospholipase c on bacillus subtilis protoplasts	Protoplasts of the bacillus subtilis were affected by phospholipase a 2 and phospholipase c.
19	antibodies against human types a and b influenzaviruses in the sera of animals in spain	Antibody to human influenzavirus in Spanish animals.
19	liver preservation by single passage hypothermic squirt perfusion	Liver retention by single-pass, hypothermic-jet infusion.
19	pour plate method for the detection of coagulase production by staphylococcus aureus	Pour plate method for staphylococcus aureus detection of coagulase production.
19	observations on diseased pigs with high sulfate intake and normal tissue copper levels	Observations on diseased swine with high levels of sulfate and normal levels of tissue copper.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis in feeder swine clinical immunofluorescence and histopathological obervations	Gastro-transmissible enteritis in swine; clinical immunofluorescence; fattening and histopathological ovations.
19	viability and ultrastructural changes in group e streptococci after in vitro phagocytosis by swine macrophages	Viability and ultrastructural changes of group e streptococci following pig macrophage phagocytosis in vitro.
19	experimental colibacillosis in gnotobiotic baby pigs i microbiological and clinical aspects	Experimental colibacillosis in gnotobiotic piglets i clinical and microbiological aspects.
19	production of ochratoxins a and b on country cured ham	Production of ochratoxins from field salted ham.
19	the role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea tarda an in vitro model	The role of iron in porphyria cutanea pathogenesis delayed the development of an in vitro model.
19	calcitonin resistance clinical and immunologic studies in subjects with paget s disease of bone treated with porcine and salmon calcitonins	Clinical and immunological studies on resistance to calcitonin in patients with paget bone disease treated with pork and salmon calcitonins.
19	radiation sterilization of prototype military foods low temperature irradiation of codfish cake corned beef and pork sausage	It is recommended that the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) be consulted in the development of the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) guidelines.
19	comparison of three techniques for the total count of anaerobes from intestinal contents of pigs	Comparison of three total anaerobic count techniques from swine intestinal contents.
19	the role of zinc ions in the transformation of lymphocytes by phytohaemagglutinin	The role of zinc ions in phytohemagglutinin-mediated lymphocyte transformation.
19	proteoglycans of the knee joint cartilage of young normal and lame pigs	Knee articular cartilage proteoglycans from young, normal, limping pigs.
19	thiopeptin a new feed additive antibiotic biological studies and field trials	Thiopeptin, novel feed antibiotic, biological studies, and field trials.
19	the transfer of mannose from guanosine diphosphate mannose to dolichol phosphate and protein by pig liver endoplasmic reticulum	The transfer of guanosine diphosphate mannose from guanosine mannose to dolichol phosphate and its proteins by the pig liver endoplasmic reticulum.
19	identification and measurement of the folates in sheep liver	Sheep liver folate identification and measurement.
19	the role of superoxide anion radical in the reduction of ferritin iron by xanthine oxidase	The role of the anionic superoxide radical in the xanthine oxidase reduction of ferritin.
19	secretory protein synthesis in the stimulated rat parotid gland temporal dissociation of the maximal response from secretion	Synthesis of secretory proteins in rat stimulated parotid gland, temporal dissociation of maximum response to secretion.
19	occurrence of the enzymes effecting the conversion of acetyl coa to squalene in homogenates of hog aorta	Presence of enzymes responsible for the conversion of acetyl-coa to squalene in pork aorta; pork aorta.
19	toxic metabolite produced by aspergillus wentii	Aspergillus wentii produces toxic metabolite.
19	ammonium sulfate fractionation of sera mouse hamster guinea pig monkey chimpanzee swine chicken and cattle	Prepared for the Canadian Wildlife Service, Environment Canada, Environment Canada, Ottawa, Ontario.
19	multiple forms of acetylcholinesterase from pig brain	It's a very important part of the genetic makeup of humans.
19	isolation of salmonellae from pork carcasses	Isolate Salmonella from pork.
19	selective isolation of leptospiras from contaminated material by incorporation of neomycin to culture media	Selective isolation of leptospiras from contaminated culture material by incorporating neomycin into culture media.
19	isolations of subgenus 3 salmonellas arizonas in cardiff 1959 1971	Salmonella arizonas under isolation-genera 3 at cardiff 1959, 1971.
19	bacteriophage restriction in salmonella typhimurium by r factors and transfer factors	Limitation of Salmonella typhimurium bacteriophages by r-factors and transfer factors.
19	cholesterol solubility in bile evidence that supersaturated bile is frequent in healthy man	The solubility of cholesterol in bile indicates that oversaturated bile is common in healthy men.
19	demonstration of r factors in bordetella bronchiseptica isolated from pigs	R-factors demonstrated in isolated swine bordetella bronchiseptica.
19	localization of spirochetes with the structural characteristics of treponema hyodysenteriae in the lesions of swine dysentery	Spirochetes with treponema hyodysenteriae structural characteristics are localized in porcine dysentery lesions.
19	fecal bacterial beta glucuronidase control by diet	Dietary Control of Bovine @-@Fecal Bacterial Glucuronidase.
19	the kinetics of the interconversion of intermediates of the reaction of pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase with oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and lactate	Pig muscle lactate dehydrogenase reaction intermediates interconversion with oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and lactate.
19	von willebrand factor gene dosage relationships and transfusion response in bleeder swine a new bioassay	Willebrand Factor Gene Determination Report and Transfusion Response in Hemorrhagic Swine, a new bioassay.
19	amino acid sequence of porcine pepsin	Porcine pepsin amino acids sequence.
19	immunoelectrophoretic analysis of mycoplasma mycoides var mycoides	Immunoelectrophoretic analysis of var mycoides mycoplasma.
19	microtubule surface lattice and subunit structure and observations on reassembly	Microtubule surface network and re-assembly observations.
19	amphibian pituitary growth hormone and prolactin immunochemical relatedness to rat growth hormone	The hypophysial growth hormone of amphibians and prolactin are linked by immunochemistry to the growth hormone of rats.
19	characterization of ileal vitamin b12 binding using homogeneous human and hog intrinsic factors	Characterization of the binding of the ileal vitamin b12 to the intestine; aid of intrinsic homogeneous factors in humans and pigs.
19	comparison of six methods for isolating mycobacteria from swine lymph nodes	Comparison of six different methods to isolate pig lymph node mycobacteria.
19	pentapeptide pepstatin inhibition of brain acid proteinase	Pepstatin, pentapeptide, inhibition of proteinase of the apos; cerebral acid by pepstatin.
19	titration and neutralization of rabies virus era strain following its replication in a pig fallopian tube cell line	In addition, it has been shown that the rabies virus is a strain of rabies that has been replicated in a fallopian tube cell line.
19	glucocorticoid induced stress susceptibility in swine adrenocortical pathology	In porcine adrenocortical pathology, glucocorticoids induced susceptibility to stress.
19	antigenic and biochemical characterization of the c type particle of the stable porcine kidney cell line pk 15	Antigenic and biochemical characterization of pk15, c-type particle from stable swine kidney cell line.
19	paradoxical increase in rate of catabolism of low density lipoproteins after hepatectomy	Paradoxical increase in low-density lipoprotein catabolism following hepatectomy.
19	quantitative study of the bacterial flora of the large intestine of dysenteric swine	Quantitative study of large intestinal bacterial flora of dysenteric pig.
19	observations of cattle goats and pigs after administration of synthetic interferon inducers and subsequent exposure to foot and mouth disease virus	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may contribute to the risk of avian influenza infection.
19	a preliminary study on the intestinal flora of cecum and colon of eight ten and 12 week old swine	A preliminary study of the caecum and colon flora of eight swine aged 10 and 12 weeks.
19	concentration of igg in serum and large intestine of dysenteric swine	Serum and large intestine concentrations in dysenteric pigs.
19	bordetella agglutinating antibody in swine a herd survey	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
19	use of mailed questionnaire data in a study of swine congenital malformations	Use of data from mailed questionnaires in a porcine congenital malformations study.
19	isolation of a glucagon containing peptide primary structure of a possible fragment of proglucagon	In addition, it is possible that the protein may be used as a source of protein.
19	purification and some properties of cytoplasmic aspartate aminotransferase from sheep liver	Purification and certain properties of sheep liver cytoplasmic aspartate aminotransferase.
19	kinetic studies of the acylation of pig muscle d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase by 1 3 diphosphoglycerate and of proton uptake and release in the overall enzyme mechanism	Kinetic studies of apos; glyceraldehyde acylation-3 phosphate dehydrogenase of pig muscle by 13 diphosphoglycerate and l' proton release and uptake in apos; overall enzymatic mechanism.
19	conformation of the mucopolysaccharides x ray fibre diffraction of heparin	Mucopolysaccharide conformation x apos rays fiber diffraction; heparin.
19	binding of oligosaccharides of hyaluronic acid to proteoglycans	Binding of l&apos, hyaluronic acid, and proteoglycan oligosaccharides.
19	system for studying uninfected and virus infected cell cultures in hyperbaric chambers	System d'apos; study of virus-infected and virus-infected hyperbaric cell cultures.
19	comparison of brilliant green agar and hektoen enteric agar media in the isolation of salmonellae from food products	Comparison of agar with brilliant green and enteric hektoen agar in apo; isolation of salmonella from food products.
19	lytic activity of vibrio phages on strains of vibrio fetus isolated from man and animals	Vibrionic phage lytic activity on vibrionic fetal strains isolated from humans and animals.
19	isolation of porcine parvovirus from commercial trypsin	Pig parvovirus should be isolated from commercial trypsin.
19	susceptibility of the mouse intestine to heat stable enterotoxin produced by enteropathogenic escherichia coli of porcine origin	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors, such as the risk of infection and the risk of infection.
19	lead inclusion bodies in osteoclasts	Bodies d' osteoclasts include lead.
19	isolation of edwardsiella tarda from swine	To isolate him, Edwardsiella would have to wait for the pigs.
19	microbiology of the frankfurter process salmonella and natural aerobic flora	Frankfurter Salmonella Microbiology and Natural Aerobic Flora.
19	selective pancreatic enzyme secretion due to a new peptide called chymodenin	The pancreatic enzymes are secreted selectively by a novel peptide called chymodenin.
19	therapeutic effect of lincomycin and spectinomycin water medication on swine dysentery	Therapeutic Effect of Lincomycin and Spectinomycin Treatment on Swine Dysentery.
19	experimental edema disease of swine e coli enterotoxemia i dectection and preparation of an active principle	E. coli is an active ingredient in a variety of foods, such as meat, meat, fish, fish, fish, and fish.
19	experimental edema disease of swine e coli enterotoxemia 3 pathology and pathogenesis	Laboratory pathology; oedema; porcine enterotoxemia 3; pathology and pathogenesis.
19	experimental alkylmercurial poisoning in swine lesions in the peripheral and central nervous systems	Injury to the nervous system is caused by the presence of a chemical or by the presence of a chemical.
19	clinical and pathological observations on the experimental passage of swine dysentery	Clinical and Pathological Observations on the Experimental Passage of Swine Dysentery.
19	growth and lability of chaetopterus oocyte mitotic spindles isolated in the presence of porcine brain tubulin	Growth and lability of mitotic spindles of chaetopterus oocytes isolated with porcine brain tubulin.
19	chemotherapy of experimental streptococcal endocarditis ii synergism between penicillin and streptomycin against penicillin sensitive streptococci	Apos chemotherapy; experimental streptococcal endocarditis ii penicillin-streptomycin synergism against penicillin-sensitive streptococci.
19	plasmin induced platelet aggregation and platelet release reaction effects on hemostasis	Plasmin induced the effects of platelet aggregation and release on the apos; hemostasis.
19	population changes in enteric bacteria and other microorganisms during aerobic thermophilic windrow composting	Changes in enteric bacterial and potato populations; other microorganisms during thermophilic aerobic composting of potato; entanglement.
19	cellular localization of gastric inhibitory polypeptide in the duodenum and jejunum	Cellular localization of the polypeptide gastric inhibitors in duodenum and jejunum.
19	mycotoxic nephropathy in pigs	Mycotoxic pig nephropathy.
19	seasonal infection of culex mosquitos and swine with japanese encephalitis virus	Culex mosquitoes and pigs seasonally infected with Japanese encephalitis.
19	sources of contamination of cooked ready to eat cured and uncured meats	Contamination of ready-to-eat, salted and uncooked cooked meats.
19	endogenous phospholipids of swine liver effect of fat deprivation on molecular species of phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine	Effect of lipid deprivation on pig liver phosphatidylcholine and phosphatidylethanolamine molecular species on endogenous phospholipids.
19	the influence of body core temperature and peripheral temperatures on oxygen consumption in the pig	It is important to note that the effects of temperature on the consumption of oxygen in swine are not known.
19	the effects of heating and cooling the spinal cord and hypothalamus on thermoregulatory behaviour in the pig	The effects of spinal cord and spinal cord heating and cooling; hypothalamus on the thermoregulatory behaviour of pigs.
19	gastric emptying in young pigs	Gastric emptying young pigs.
19	hyaluronic acid in cartilage and proteoglycan aggregation	Hyaluronic acid in the cartilage and l' aggregation of the proteoglycans.
19	swine vesicular disease attempts to transmit infection to cattle and sheep	Infection of swine bladder disease in cattle and sheep.
19	swine vesicular disease comparative studies of viruses isolated from different countries	Pork bladder disease Comparative studies of internationally isolated viruses.
19	the site at which 4 iodoacetamidosalicylate reacts with glutamate dehydrogenases	The reacting site of 4 iodoacetamidosalicylate with glutamate dehydrogenases.
19	the amino acid sequence of the amino terminal 37 residues of human parathyroid hormone	The amino-terminal amino acid sequence 37 residues of the human parathyroid hormone.
19	the effect of acetyl coenzyme a on phosphate activated glutaminase from pig kidney and brain	The effect of apos; acetyl coenzyme a on the phosphate activated the glutaminase of the kidney and pig brain.
19	mycoplasma hyorhinis swine arthritis 3 modified disease in piney woods swine	Mycoplasma hyorhinis porcine arthritis-modified disease 3 in pineal swine.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens ii purification of saint louis encephalitis virus intracellular antigens	Group b Arbovirus, structural and non-structural antigens ii intracellular antigen cleansing of L&apos virus; St.-Louis encephalitis.
19	group b arbovirus structural and nonstructural antigens 3 serological specificity of solubilized intracellular viral proteins	Group b arbovirus, structural and nonstructural antigens 3 solubilized intracellular viral protein serological specificity.
19	involvement of the host cell nuclear envelope membranes in the replication of japanese encephalitis virus	L' involvement of apo membranes; nuclear envelope of host cell in viral replication; Japanese encephalitis.
19	enterovirus neutralizing activity in the gastrointestinal tract of piglets	Gastro-intestinal piglet neutralizing activity of enteroviruses.
19	the transporting proteins of cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol in serum of chicks and other species partial purification and characterization of the chick proteins	Cholecalciferol and 25 hydroxycholecalciferol transport proteins are partially purifying and characterizing chicken proteins in chick and d&apos serum.
19	immunological study of the heat labile enterotoxins of escherichia coli and vibrio cholerae	Immunological study of the heat-labile enterotoxins of Escherichia coli and Escherichia coli and vibrio cholerae.
19	swine vesicular disease virological studies of experimental infections produced by the england 72 virus	Hog Vesicular Disease (HVD) Virological studies conducted in animals; experimental infections caused by virus 72 in animals; England.
19	cellular localization of a vasoactive intestinal peptide in the mammalian and avian gastrointestinal tract	It is the most common type of peptide found in the gastrointestinal tract of mammals and birds.
19	the isolation of escherichia coli from a poultry packing station and an abattoir	Poultry-packing; Poultry-packing; Poultry-packing; Poultry-packing.
19	protection against gram negative infections with antiserum to lipid a from salmonella minnesota r595	Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases Infectious Diseases 1.
19	mechanism of lysergic acid diethylamide interference with rabbit antibody biosynthesis	In addition, there are a number of other mechanisms that can be used to assess the effects of diethylamide on human health.
19	restraint of cholesterol accumulation in tissue pools associated with drastic short term lowering of serum cholesterol levels by clofibrate or cholestyramine in hypercholesterolemic swine	Limiting cholesterol accumulation in tissue pools associated with a dramatic short-term decrease in clofibrate or cholestyramine serum cholesterol levels in hypercholesterolemic pigs.
19	incompatibility reactions of r plasmids isolated from escherichia coli of animal origin	Isolated plasmid incompatibility; escherichia coli; animal origin.
19	attemps to infect pigs with coxsackie virus type b5	Coxsackie virus type b5 time to infect pigs.
19	the significance of deep body temperature in regulating the concentration of thyroxine in the plasma of the pig	L' importance of deep body temperature in regulating thyroxine levels in swine plasma.
19	isolation and characterization of luminal membranes from urinary bladder	Urinary bladder luminal membranes are isolated and characterised.
19	ecological studies on culex tritaeniorhynchus as a vector of japanese encephalitis	Ecological studies of the vector culex tritaeniorhynchus; Japanese encephalitis.
19	radioimmunoassay of somatomedin b application to clinical and physiologic studies	Radioimmunoassay of somatomedin (b) in clinical and physiological studies.
19	recent trends in human salmonellosis in england and wales the epidemiology of prevalent serotypes other than salmonella typhimurium	In addition, there is a need for additional information on the incidence and prevalence of Salmonella typhimurium.
19	continuous non therapeutic use of antibacterial drugs in feed and drug resistance of the gram negative enteric florae of food producing animals	The use of non-therapeutic antimicrobials in animal feeds and resistance to drugs in enteric flora (gram@-@) negative in food-producing animals.
19	intramammary infections in the sow during the peripartum period	Intra-mammary infections (IMI) in perinatal sow.
19	transmissible gastroenteritis in feeder pigs observations on the jejunal epithelium of normal feeder pigs and feeder pigs infected with tge virus	Gastro-transmissible disease in potato swine; fattening Notes on potato leaf; juvenile epithelium in potato swine; normal feed and potato swine; virus-infected feed.
19	aromatic amino acid hydroxylase inhibitors 4 3 substituted alpha methyltyrosines	L&apos inhibitors; Aromatic Acid Hydroxylase 4 Substituted Alpha Methyltyrosines 3.
19	distribution of prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase and types i and ii 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase in swine kidney medulla and cortex	Prostaglandin e 9 ketoreductase distribution and types i and ii 15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase in the medulla and renal cortex of pigs.
19	purification characterization and radioimmunoassay of thyrocalcitonin from rat thyroid glands	Characterization of thyroid gland thyrocalcitonin purification and radioimmunoassay.
19	the properties of muscarinic receptors in mammalian cerebral cortex	Muscarinic receptor properties in cerebral cortex of mammals.
19	the demonstration of plasma cells and other immunoglobulin containing cells in formalin fixed paraffin embedded tissues using peroxidase labelled antibody	Demonstration of other apo-containing cells; immunoglobulin in formalin-fixed paraffin-coated tissues at apos; assistance; peroxidase-labeled antibodies.
19	synergism between trichuris suis and the microbial flora of the large intestine causing dysentery in pigs	The trichuris amide synergism with the large intestine microbial flora causes dysentery in pigs.
19	anionic and cationic dog trypsin isolation and partial characterization	Anionic and cationic isolation of dog trypsin and its partial characterization.
19	purification of 125i labelled lysine vasopressin by affinity chromatography on sepharose bound neurophysins	Lysine 125i-labeled vasopressin was purified by d' affinity to Sepharose-linked neurophysins.
19	fluorescence studies on the active sites of porcine pepsin and rhizopus pepsin	Fluorescence studies on pepsin pig and pepsin rhizopus active sites.
19	fluorescent and spin label probes of the environments of the sulfhydryl groups of porcine muscle adenylate kinase	Fluorescent probes and spin labels from sulfhydryl group environments of porcine muscle adenos; adenylate kinase.
19	purification and partial characterization of human and porcine c3a anaphylatoxin	Purification and partial characterization of the human and the porcine anaphylatoxin.
19	circular dichroism of c3a anaphylatoxin effects of ph heat guanidinium chloride and mercaptoethanol on conformation and function	Circular dichroism of the conformational and functional effects of l' anaphylatoxin c3a of guanidinium chloride and mercaptoethanol.
19	a comparison of ventricular weights and geometry in newborn young and adult mammals	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
19	in vitro labeling of beta apolipoprotein with 3h or 14c and preliminary application to turnover studies	In vitro labeling of l' beta-apolipoprotein with 3h or 14c, and preliminary application to renewal studies.
19	characterization of metabolites in domestic sow urine after intravenous administration of radioactive estrogen and corticosteroids	Characterization of household sow metabolites; urine after dosing; intravenous administration of estrogen and radioactive corticosteroids.
19	distribution of sulphate and iduronic acid residues in heparin and heparan sulphate	Distribution of sulfate and d*apos tailings; iduronic acid in the liver; heparin and liver; heparan sulphate.
19	platelets fixed with paraformaldehyde a new reagent for assay of von willebrand factor and platelet aggregating factor	With paraformaldehyde, the platelets have fixed a new reagent for the determination of von willebrand and d' platelet aggregation.
19	an attempt to identify the intestinal receptor for the k88 adhesin by means of a haemagglutination inhibition test using glycoproteins and fractions from sow colostrum	Attempted apo; identification of intestinal receptor; adhesin k88 using apo test; apo test; inhibition of apo; hemagglutination using sow glycoproteins and colostrum fractions.
19	influence of dietary 1 3 butanediol on wieght gain blood and liver metabolites and lipogenesis in the pig and chick	L' dietary butanediol-13 influences blood gain and liver metabolites as well as lipogenesis in swine and chicken.
19	the granulovesicular bodies of the arterial wall	Arterial wall granulovesis.
19	minor calyces as primary pacemaker sites for ureteral activity in man	Calice as the main site of the pacemaker for men's ureteral activity.
19	cytological cytochemical and immuno fluorescence studies with dugbe virus a new nigerian tick borne virus	Cytochemical studies and immunofluorescence with the new virus Dugbe transmitted by Nigerian ticks.
19	immune mediated emigration of neutrophils into the lumen of the small intestine	It is also important to note that there is no evidence that neutrophils emigrate into the lumen of the intestine.
19	the efficiency of operatnt thermoregulatory behavior in pigs as determined from the rate of oxygen consumption	Efficiency of pork thermoregulatory behaviour as determined by pork consumption rate; oxygen.
19	evaluation of a bovine viral diarrhea vaccine produced in a porcine kidney cell line	The results of the study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
19	cadmium its in vivo detection in man	In addition to the above, there are a number of other chemicals.
19	separation of two new trypsin inhibiting fractions from human serum	Separation of two new human serum trypsin-inhibiting fractions.
19	d asparatate oxidase in the thyroid gland	Thyroid asparatate oxidase.
19	effect of prostaglandin e2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in intact dog swine and lamb	Effect of Prostaglandin e2 on pulmonary vascular resistance in intact swine and lambs.
19	properties of the stable aerobic and anaerobic half reduced states of nadph cytochrome c reductase	Aerobic and anaerobic stable half properties reduced nadph cytochrome c reductase states.
19	oxidation of methionine residues of porcine and bovine pepsins	Oxidation of Methionic Residues of Swine and Bovine Pepsins.
19	phosphorylation of purified thyroid plasma membranes incubated with 32 p atp	Purified thyroid plasma membrane phosphorylation incubated with 32 p atp.
19	the effect of alcohols on mitochondrial monoamine oxidase activity	The effects of the alcohols on the apos; activity of the mitochondrial monoamine oxidase.
19	the induction persistence and loss of framycetin sulphate resistance in enteric e coli of pigs	The persistence of framycetin sulfate resistance induction and loss in swine enteric e coli.
19	adenoviruses of man and animals	Episode Episode Episode Episode Episode II.
19	studies on immunity to aujeszky s disease pseudorabies virus infection in pigs	It is important to note that there are no data available to support this conclusion.
19	protection by natural infection and vaccination against respiratory diseases caused by mycoplasmas	Natural infection and immunization against mycoplasma-induced respiratory diseases.
19	the importance of picornavirus infections in respiratory disease of man and other mammals	Infectious and communicable diseases such as HIV/AIDS, hepatitis C, hepatitis C, hepatitis C, and other sexually transmitted infections.
19	the importance of mycoplasmas in respiratory infections	It is not possible to determine the cause of infection.
19	radioimmunoassay for motilin	Motilin radioimmunoassay.
19	5alpha androstenone in peripheral plasma of pigs diurnal variation in boars effects of intravenous hcg administration and castration	Intravenous administration of hcg and castration in swine peripheral plasma, diurnal variation of wild boar effects.
19	determination of sensitivity of mycoplasma hyosynoviae to tylosin and selected antibacterial drugs by a microtiter technique	Determination of the sensitivity of hyosynoviae mycoplasma to tylosin and certain anti-bacterial drugs, using a microtitration technique.
19	protective effect of immunoglobulins in serum and milk of sows exposed to transmissible gastroenteritis virus	Protective effect of immunoglobulins in serum and milk of Gastro-transmissible enteritis virus-exposed sows.
19	the effect of antisera on porcine enteropathogenic escherichia coli in ligated segments of pig intestine	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
19	antibacterial activity of antisera against homologous and heterologous escherichia coli of porcine origin	Antibacterial activity of homologous heterologous Escherichia coli antisera; porcine origin.
19	the detection of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antigens by immunodiffusion	Gastro viral antigen detection-immunodiffusion-transmissible enteritis.
19	a study of articular surfaces and synovial fossae of the pectoral limb of swine	A study of porcine articular surfaces and synovial pore-limb pits.
19	pharmacokinetics of phenylbutazone and oxyphenabutazone in the pig	Phenylbutazone and L&apos Pharmacokinetics; Pork Oxyphenabutazone.
19	immunocytochemical localization of substance p in mammalian intestine	Immunocytochemical location of p-substance in mammalian intestine.
19	porcine parvovirus natural and experimental infections of the porcine fetus and prevalence in mature swine	Natural and experimental infections with porcine parvovirus infection in swine fetuses and prevalence in mature swine.
19	immunity to escherichia coli in pigs adhesion of enteropathogenic escherichia coli to isolated intestinal epithelial cells	Escherichia coli immunity in swine, enteropathogenic escherichia coli adherence to isolated epithelial intestinal cells.
19	bifunctional reagents as vapour and liquid phase fixatives for immunohistochemistry	"For the purposes of this document, the term ""liquid phase fixative"" means a liquid phase fixative or a liquid phase fixative."
19	microspectrophotometric detection of heparin in mast cells and basophilic granulocytes stained metachromatically with toluidine blue o	Apos microspectrophotometric detection; heparin in metachromatically toluidine blue o-stained mast cells and basophilic granulocytes.
19	immunofluorescent localization of the female sex steroids in the porcine ovary	Immunofluorescent localization of female sex steroids found in the porcine ovary.
19	reproductive failure in swine associated with maternal seroconversion for porcine parvovirus	Reproductive failure in pigs associated with a maternal seroconversion of porcine parvovirus.
19	experimental scoliosis in primates failure of a technique	Experimental primate failure scoliosis; a technique.
19	lung vascular smooth muscle as a determinant of pulmonary hypertension at high altitude	Pulmonary vascular smooth muscle is a determinant of lacidosis; pulmonary hypertension occurs at high altitudes.
19	denaturation and proteolytic digestion of porcine low density lipoprotein in aqueous guanidine hydrochloride solutions	Denaturation and proteolytic digestion of low-density pig lipoproteins in aqueous solutions of guanidine hydrochloride.
19	porcine malignant hyperthermia effects of halothane on mitochondrial respiration and calcium accumulation	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that may affect the ability of the body to function.
19	prevention of porcine malignant hyperthermia by epidural block	Cervical cancer is a major cause of death in Canada.
19	a vascular catheter implanting device	It's called a vascular catheter; it's called a vascular device.
19	surveillance of iowa swine herds for influenza like illness combined serologic and virus isolation method	The surveillance of swine herds in Iowa for both influenza and disease combined the serologic and the isolation of the virus.
19	electron microscopic evaluation of bone cells in pigs with experimentally induced bordetella rhinitis turbinate osteoporosis	Electron microscopic evaluation of experimental rhinitis-induced swine osteoporosis turbinate bone cells.
19	effects of prednisone on gastric secretion and development of stomach lesions in swine	Prednisone affects gastric secretion and develops gastric lesions in pigs.
19	porcine parvovirus frequency of naturally occurring transplacental infection and viral contamination of fetal porcine kidney cell cultures	Prevalence of swine parvovirus infection; transplacental natural origin and fetal swine kidney cell culture viral contamination.
19	influence of antibody mediated immune suppression on clinical viral and immune responses to swine influenza infection	Influence of apo; antibody-mediated immunosuppression of clinical immune and viral responses to apo; swine influenza infection.
19	cannulation of ductus deferens of the boar a surgical technique	Boar vas deferens cannulation by surgical technique.
19	frequency of sarcocystis spp in detroit metropolitan area michigan	Sarcocystis spp. frequency in metropolitan Detroit, Michigan.
19	an immunoperoxidase technique for the identification of gastrin producing cells	Immunoperoxidase for apos; gastrin-producing cell identification.
19	serodiagnostic application of immunohistoperoxidase reactions on antigen coupled agarose beads	Serodiagnostic application of immunohistoperoxidase (ohistoperoxidase) reactions on antigen-coupled d&apos beads.
19	brain cells in culture morphological transformation by a protein	Morphological transformation of cultured brain cells by protein.
19	radioligand receptor assay for urinary and serum hcg	Acute toxicity to rats and rabbits.
19	binding of bile salts to pancreatic colipase and lipase	Bile salts bind to lipase and pancreatic colipase.
19	nutritional studies on east african herbivores 2 losses of nitrogen in the faeces	Nutritional studies on herbivores in the food chain; Africa in the food chain; East 2 losses; nitrogen in the feces.
19	nicotinamide 3 n4 ethenocytosine dinucleotide an analog of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide synthesis and enzyme studies	Nicotinamide 3 n4 ethenocytosine dinucleotide analogue of the synthesis of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide and of enzyme studies.
19	further characterization of bovine pancreatic lipase	Bovine pancreatic lipase is further characterized.
19	thyroid microsomal membrane proteins effects of solubilization on molecular size	Effects of Solubilization on the Molecular Size of Thyroid Microsomal Membrane Proteins.
19	kinetics of alkaline phosphatase from pig kidney mechanism of activation by magnesium ions	Alkaline phosphatase kinetics of pig kidney magnesium ion activation.
19	the calcium induced dissociation of human plasma clotting factor xiii	Human plasma clotting factor calcium-induced dissociation xiii.
19	type c virus production by a continuous line of pig oviduct cells pft	Production of c-type virus by continuous lineage of pft oviducous cells.
19	the proteins of murray valley encephalitis virus	Proteins of Muir Valley Virus; Murray Valley Encephalitis.
19	antigenic and antiheparin properties of human platelet factor 4 pf4	Antigenic and Anti-Heparin Properties of Human Platelet Factor 4 pf4.
19	a convenient spectrophotometric assay for the determination of l ergothioneine in blood	A convenient spectrophotometric test for blood ergothionein determination.
19	characterization of gastric mucoproteins isolated by equilibrium density gradient centrifugation in caesium chloride	Characterization of isolated gastric mucoproteins by d&apos density gradient centrifugation; cesium chloride equilibrium.
19	conformational changes in gastric mucoproteins induced by caesium chloride and guanidinium chloride	Conformational changes in cesium chloride and guanidinium chloride induced gastric mucoproteins.
19	x ray fibre diffraction of cartilage proteoglycan aggregates containing hyaluronic acid	X diffraction of rays of aggregates of cartilage proteoglycans containing l' hyaluronic acid.
19	study of rickettsioses in slovakia i coxiella burneti and rickettsiae of the spotted fever sf group in ticks and serological surveys in animals and humans in certain selected localities in the lucenec and v krt s districts	Studies of rickettsia in Slovenian ticks i coxiella burneti and rickettsia in the sf spotted fever group and animal and human serological studies in selected lucenec and v krt s districts.
19	sites of organic acid production and pattern of digesta movement in the gastrointestinal tract of swine	Apos production sites; organic acids and digestive tract patterns in the gastro@ intestinal tract of pigs.
19	changes in the intestinal lactase activity in the small intestine of two breeds of swine from birth to 6 weeks of age	Changes in appetite; activity of intestinal lactase in the intestines; small intestine of two strains of pigs, from birth to age; age of 6 weeks.
19	pure human big gastrin immunochemical properties disappearance half time and acid stimulating action in dogs	In the case of dogs, the immunochemical properties of the great pure human gastrin disappear at half-time and stimulate the action of l' acid.
19	comparison of three methods for the detection of trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by five european laboratories	Comparison of three trichinella spiralis infection detection methods in pigs by five European laboratories.
19	serodiagnosis of trichinella spiralis infections in pigs by enzyme linked immunosorbent assays	In addition to the above tests, the test should be carried out in accordance with the requirements of the test.
19	effect of follicular fluid and oestradiol on the luteinization of rat granulosa cells in vitro	Effect of follicular fluid and estradiol on rat granulosa cell luteinization in vitro.
19	development of ceruloplasmin in pigs during the neonatal period	Ceruloplasmin development in the pig during the neonatal period.
19	leptospirosis in ethiopia a serological survey in domestic and wild animals	Leptospirosis in Ethiopia is a serological study in wild and domestic animals.
19	effects of estradiol 17beta on lh rh fsh rh induced and spontaneous lh release in prepubertal female pigs	Effects of apos; estradiol 17beta on induced rh rh rh rh rh and spontaneous release of lh in female prepubertal pigs.
19	acute and chronic estradiol 17beta inhibition of lh release in prepubertal female pigs time course and site of action	Chronic acute inhibition of estradiol 17beta release of lh in prepubescent female pigs, chronologically and at the d&apos site.
19	serologic evidence of venezuelan equine encephalitis in some wild and domestic populations of southern texas	Serological evidence of elk; Venezuelan equine encephalitis in wild and domesticated populations in southern Texas.
19	chemical debridement of burns	Chemical scorch burns.
19	investigation of choriocarcinoma clonal cell lines in vitro and choriocarcinoma transplants in the hamster for the secretion of a thyroid stimulating factor	Examination of in vitro clonal choriocarcinoma cell lines and hamster choriocarcinoma grafts for d&apos secretion, a thyroid-stimulating factor.
19	the removal of the seminal vesicles from the boar and the effects on the semen characteristics	Boar's removal of seminal vesicles and effects on sperm characteristics.
19	drug and chemical residues in domestic animals	Residues from the use of drugs and chemicals in domestic animals.
19	passive immunity in transmissible gastroenteritis of swine immunoglobulin characteristics of antibodies in milk after inoculating virus by different routes	Passive Immunity in Gastro-Transmissible Enteritis of Dapos characteristics; porcine immune globulin antibodies in milk following inoculation of virus through various routes.
19	pharmacologic endocrinological findings in animal experiments with turisynchron and suisynchron 4 analysis of residuals in pig carcasses	Pharmacological endocrinological results obtained from apo experiments; apo animal experiments; turisynchron and follow-up pork carcass residue analysis 4.
19	synchronization of estrus by the use of turisynchron premix and insemination time in young gilts	It is not possible to determine the age of the child; it is necessary to determine the age of the child and the age of the child.
19	behavior of neutral 17 ketosteroids in the urine of female pigs	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors that influence the risk of infection.
19	onset of puberty in young gilts kept under conditions of intensive husbandry	In addition, there are a number of activities that can be carried out to improve the quality of drinking water.
19	some effects of growth medium composition on the antigenicity of a t strain mycoplasma	In addition, it is not possible to determine the genetic makeup of the organism.
19	prevention by methylprednisolone of the endothelial lesions in rabbits on a hypercholesterolic diet or submitted to immunologic injury	Endothelial lesions are prevented by methylprednisolone in rabbits fed a hypercholesteric diet or exposed to immunological lesions.
19	identification of a folate binder in hog kidney	A folate binding agent in the pig kidney.
19	uptake of dopamine into fractions of pig caudate nucleus homogenates	Dopamine uptake in pork caudate cell fractions; homogenates.
19	distribution of the dental lamina and deciduous tooth development in the mandible of the domestic pig	Distribution of dental lamina and deciduous-tooth development in the domestic pig mandible.
19	diagnostic and therapeutic use of lh releasing hormone	In addition to the above, there are a number of other drugs that can be used to treat HIV infection.
19	calcium antagonism a new principle in coronary vasodilation	L' calcium antagonism is a novel coronary vasodilation principle.
19	oestrogen progesterone and corticosteroid concentrations in peripheral plasma of sows during pregnancy parturition lactation and after weaning	Concentrations of progesterone and estrogenic corticosteroids in sow peripheral plasma during postweaning and gestational parturition lactation.
19	superfusion in vitro in the study of ovarian steroidogenesis	Examination of ovarian steroidogenesis.
19	the lethal effect of mebendazole on secondary echinococcus granulosus cysticerci of taenia pisiformis and tetrathyridia of mesocestoides corti	Mebendazole lethal effect on secondary cysticerci echinococcus granulosus of taenia pisiformis and mesocestroid tetrathyridia corti.
19	laryngeal chemosensitivity a possible mechanism for sudden infant death	One possible mechanism of sudden infant death syndrome is laryngeal chemosensitivity.
19	experimental intracerebral movement of electron microscopic tracers of various molecular sizes	Experimental intracerebral movement of microscopic electronic tracers of various molecular sizes.
19	ultrastructural changes in ascaris suum intestine after mebendazole treatment in vivo	Ultrastructural changes in the intestine of the intestine; ascaris suum after treatment with mebendazole in vivo.
19	treatment of gastroschisis and omphalocele with biological dressings	It's called gastroschisisis, gastroschisisis, gastroschisisis, gastroschis, gastroschisisis, gastroschisisis.
19	microtubule macrotubule transitions intermediates after exposure to the mitotic inhibitor vinblastine	Microtubule macrotubule transitions are intermediate after exposure to vinblastine mitotic inhibitor.
19	growth of nosema algerae in pig kidney cell cultures	Nosema algerae growth in cell cultures of pig kidney.
19	immunofluorescence technique in diagnosis of trichinellosis in swine i investigations with the tube test author s transl	The purpose of this study was to determine whether trichinellosis is a risk factor for the transmission of the disease.
19	immunofluorescence technique in diagnosis of trichinellosis in swine ii comparative investigations with the tube test and the cryostate method author s transl	In addition to the above-mentioned tests, the results of an immuno-fluorescent assay should be compared with those of other tests.
19	hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis virus hev infections in swine serologic indication for infectional occurrence in denmark	Hepatic hepatitis viral infections; swine serologic indications for hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis; denmark infection.
19	radioimmunoassay of serum pancreatic amylase in normal and pancreatectomized pigs 38504	It is not possible to determine the cause of the adverse reaction.
19	failure of free fatty acids to influence degree of myocardial injury following acute coronary artery occlusion in pigs	Acute occlusion of the epos, coronary artery, and the degree of myocardial injury after acute occlusion of the intestine.
19	radioimmunoassay for gh release inhibiting hormone	Radioimmunoassay of l' GH inhibitory hormone.
19	effect of chronic ethanol ingestion on mitochondrial protein synthesis in sinclair s 1 miniature swine	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
19	drug metabolism in early life	Drug metabolism at the beginning of life.
19	the influence of route of vaccination on the systemic and local immune response in the pig	Influenza vaccine is a vaccine-preventable vaccine that protects against the spread of the immune system.
19	histochemical development of myofibres in neonatal piglets	Histochemical development in newborn hogs-myofibres.
19	growth of motor end plates and histochemistry of intrafusal myofibres in neonatal piglets	Motor terminal plate growth and intrafusal myofibres histochemistry in newborn-piglets.
19	intestinal adenomatosis in the pig a possible relationship with a haemorrhagic enteropathy	Adenomatosis intestinal in swine a possible association with hemorrhagic enteropathy.
19	plasma scalpel excision of burns an experimental study	Plasma scalpel burn excision, experimental study.
19	villous atrophy in pigs orally infected with salmonella cholerae suis	Pigs infected orally with cholerae am suis salmonella have villositary wasting.
19	cultures of pig macrophages	Pig macrophage cultures.
19	the characterisation of campylobacter sputorum subspecies mucosalis isolated from pigs	Campylobacter sputorum characterization of isolated swine under-species mucosalis.
19	the experimental reproduction of thrombocytopenic purpura in piglets	Experimental reproduction of thrombocytopenic-purpura in piglets.
19	studies on influencing gonadal function sexual behavior and growth in the pig by prenatal treatment with testosterone enanthate or estradiol benzoate	Apos studies; influence of prenatal testosterone enanthate or d*apos benzoate treatment; estradiol on sexual behaviour and gonadal growth in swine.
19	effect of glucocorticoids on release of lysosomal enzymes in liver ischemia and hemorrhagic shock in pigs	Glucocorticoid Effect on Lysosomal Lysosomal Enzymes Release in Pork; Hepatic Ischemia and Hemorrhagic Shock.
19	sequence of heme decomposition by the coupled oxidation of myoglobin with ascorbic acid	It is also used as an indicator of the quality of life of a person.
19	identification of a calcium binding protein as a calcium dependent regulator of brain adenylate cyclase	Cerebral adenylate cyclase is a protein that binds calcium as a regulator dependent on calcium in the brain.
19	increased parathyroid hormone secretion and hypocalcemia in experimental pancreatitis necessity for an intact thyroid gland	Increased apo secretion; parathyroid hormone and apo; experimental pancreatitis hypocalcemia necessary for intact thyroid gland.
19	use of neuroleptic agents in modern pig farming author s transl	It's a great way to learn more about the environment and its benefits.
19	problems of resistance author s transl	Resistance Problems authors translate resistance problems.
19	efficacy of different phosphorus supplements for sows during gestation and lactation	Efficiency of different sow phosphorus supplements during pregnancy and lactation.
19	intestinal intubation in the unanaesthetised miniature pig technique for sampling and measurement of gut length per fistulam	Incubation of the intestinal tube in the technique of miniature pig not anaesthetized for the purpose of sampling and measuring the length of the digestive tract by fistulam.
19	an immunologic study of hyaluronidase of different animal origin	Immunological study of hyaluronidase; different animal origin.
19	a comparative study of the anti anemic effect of new bulgarian iron dextran complexes with miofer 100 and ferroglucin 75 in rats and swine	A comparative study of l' anti-anemic effect of novel Bulgarian iron dextran complexes with Miofer 100 and Ferroglucin 75 in rat and swine.
19	the pathogenesis of swine plague the hepato cerebral syndrome	The pathogenesis of swine fever, brain disease of the liver, is at the origin of the disease.
19	escherichia coli serotype distribution in man and animals	Distribution of human and animal serotypes of Escherichia coli.
19	primary pathological changes in cells infected with tick borne encephalitis virus	Primary pathological changes in tick-infected cells; tick-borne encephalitis.
19	use of procine zenografts in treatment of fournier s gangrene	Use of procin zenografts in treating furnace gangrene.
19	occurrence of k88 negative escherichia coli serotypes in pigs with post weaning diarrhoea	Presence of d&apos serotypes; escherichia coli k88 negative in post-weaning diarrhea pork.
19	experimental transmission of japanese encephalitis virus by culex tritaeniorhynchus and c fuscocephalus	A virus that is transmitted from a person to another person by means of a virus.
19	force generating capacity and contractile protein content of arterial smooth muscle	The ability to produce force and the content of contractile proteins in the arterial smooth muscle.
19	development of skin interfacing cannula	D&apos can be used as an adjunct to the body's body.
19	assessment of gh releasing hormone activity in sephadex separated fractions of porcine hypothalamic extracts by hypophyseal portal vessel infusion in the rat	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that there is a link between the activity of greg-releasing hormone in rats and the activity of greg-releasing hormone in rats.
19	rabbit beta glucuronidase subcellular distribution and immunochemical properties	Subcellular Distribution and Immunochemical Properties of Rabbit Beta glucuronidase.
19	the effects of acetylcolletotrichin on the mitochondrial respiratory chain	The effects of acetylcolletotrichine on mitochondrial respiratory chain.
19	comparison of the sensitivity of laboratory animals and tissue cultures to infection with aujeszky s disease virus	In addition to the above, there are a number of other risk factors that may be considered in the assessment of risk.
19	samonellosis and meat hygiene red meat	Samonellosis and Meat Hygiene.
19	the effect of species and organ specific features of tissue systems on the reactogenic and immunogenic properties of influenza virus	Effect of species- and organ-specific characteristics of the tissue systems on the immunogenic and reactogenic properties of influenza virus.
19	the zoonoses order 1975	Zoonotic Order 1975.
19	problem of homologization of the cerebral neocortex in cetaceans	Cerebral neocortex registration in cetaceans.
19	observations on the histomorphology of sarcosporidian cysts of some east african game animals artiodactyla	Observations on the apos; Sarcosporidian cyst histomorphology of certain hunting animals of the apos; Africa of the apos; East, artiodactyla.
19	evaluation of prosthetic grafts of different porosity for arterial reconstruction	Evaluation of Prosthetics of Different Porosity for Arterial Reconstruction.
19	sites of organic acid production and absorption in gastrointestinal tract of the pig	Production and production sites; organics absorption; gastrointestinal acids-pig intestinal.
19	arsenic residues in livers of swine lamb and poultry and in eggs	It is important to note that there are no specific guidelines for the use of arsenic in pork.
19	frequency distribution of s typhi murium phage types in various countries	Typhi murium phage type distribution frequency in various countries.
19	on the sugar content of the lipopolysaccharides of the various strains known as yersinia enterocolitica	Sugar content of lipopolysaccharides of various strains known as yersinia enterocolitica.
19	investigations on toxic fractions of swine erysipelas bacteria erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 1 communication toxicity investigation on a phenol water extract in chicken embryos author s transl	Toxic Fractions Studies of the Pig Erysipelas Bacteria Rhusiopathiae 1 Toxicity Study for Dapos; an aqueous phenol extract in translational chicken embryos.
19	the differenziation of swine mycoplasma by acrylamide gel electrophoresis author s transl	The Differentiation of Porcine Mycoplasma by Electrophoretically Translated Acrylamide.
19	pasteurella multocida serotyping results 1971 1973	Results of Pasteurella Multocida Serotyping 1973.
19	bone canaliculus endings in the area of the osteocyte lacuna electron microscopic studies	Electron microscopic study of lacunar osteocytes.
19	a comparsion of glycopeptides from the transferrins of several species	Comparison of transferrin glycopeptides of several species.
19	active sitve titration of pig plasma benzylamine oxidase with phenylhydrazine	An active seat titration of the plasma benzylamine oxidase of swine with phenylhydrazine.
19	lidocaine effects on brain mitochondrial metabolism in vitro	Effects of Lidocaine on Brain Mitochondrial Metabolism in Vitro.
19	purification and heterogeneity of inorganic pyrophosphatase of pig scapula cartilage	Purification and apos; inorganic cartilage pyrophosphatase heterogeneity of pork shoulder blades.
19	properties of inorganic pyrophosphatase of pig scapula cartilage	Properties of Inorganic Pepos Cartilage Pyrophosphatase; pork scapula.
19	observations on the lipolytic and melanotropic properties of neurophysin proteins	Observations on the melanotropic and lipolytic properties of neurophysins.
19	bacteriocinogeny in yersinia enterocolitica	Dietary Reference Intakes, D.C. and D.A. Manson.
19	the formation of mono n acetylhexosamine derivatives of dolichol diphosphate by pig liver microsomal fractions	The formation of dolichol diphosphate mono n acetylhexosamine derivatives by microsomal fractions of pig liver.
19	chronic urticaria from isophane insulin therapy sensitivity associated with noninsulin components in commercial preparations	In the case of non-insulin-containing products, the product is not considered to be an insulin-containing product.
19	conduit reconstruction of right ventricular outflow tract experience with 17 patients	Right ventricular canal restoration for 17 patients.
19	biotransformation of pregnenolone 7alpha 3h progesterone 7alpha 3h and dehydroepiandrosterone 7alpha 3h by porcine fetal and maternal adrenal homogenate preparations	Biotransformation of progesterone 7alpha 3h pregenenolone 7alpha 3h and dehydroepiandrosterone 7alpha 3h by porcine and maternal fetal adrenal homogenates.
19	temperature distribution produced in models by three microwave applicators at 433 92 megahertz	Temperature distribution produced by three micro-@-@wave applicators at 433.92 megahertz.
19	some investigations on the adjuvant mechanism of deae dextran	Some research on the deae dextran adjuvant mechanism.
19	inhibition spectra of the human pancreatic endopeptidases	Human pancreatic endopeptidase inhibition.
19	simultaneous changes in pancreatic and gastric secretion induced by acute intravenous ethanol infusion effect of atropine and reserpine	Coincident changes in gastric and pancreatic secretion due to apo; effects of apo; acute intravenous infusion of apo; ethanol; atropine and reserpine.
19	lens cell growth in tissue culture	Growth of lens cells in cultured tissue.
19	tests on the bactericidal effectiveness of iodophor a in the halls of a pig fattening station	In addition, the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) is working with the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) to improve the quality of animal feed.
19	pharmacokinetic study of maleate acid of 2 n n dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 cyclohexylpropionate cyprodenate and of n n dimethylaminoethanol 14c1 in animals	Pharmacokinetic study of 2-n n-dimethylaminoethanol 14c1-cyclohexylpropionate cyprodenate and 14c1-n-dimethylaminoethanol in animals.
19	the two domain structure of cytochrome b5 in deoxycholate solution	Cytochrome b5's two-domain structure in deoxycholate solution.
19	activity values of lactate dehydrogenase isoenzymes in the serum of farm aminals	D&apos values; lactate dehydrogenase isoenzyme activity in farm-farm aminals.
19	use of electron microscopy for the rapid diagnosis of poxvirus diseases smallpox in swine	Use of Electron Microscopy for the Rapid Diagnosis of Smallpox Virus Diseases in Swine.
19	evaluation of chromatin clumping and myelination of the spinal cord of pigs with congential tremor	Evaluation of porcine congenital tremor chromatin agglomeration and spinal cord myelination.
19	the etiology of swine dysentery iii the role of selected gram negative obligate anaerobes	Etiology of Swine Dysentery iii role of some gram-negative mandatory anaerobic.
19	anthrax in england and wales 1963 1972	It is not possible to determine the extent to which this is the case.
19	investigation of suspected cases of mycotoxicosis in farm animals in britain	Investigation of Suspected Mycotoxicosis in Farm Animals in Great Britain-Brittany.
19	activity of several serum enzymes in swine with acute plague	Acute Pneumonia (Pneumonia) Acute Pneumonia (Pneumonia) is a disease of the liver.
19	phage typing of strains of s enteritidis isolated in bulgaria	Lysotyping of Bulgarian isolated enteritidis s strains.
19	partial purification and characterization of the antidiuretic hormone inactivating enzyme from renal plasma membranes	Partial purification and apo characterization; d&apos enzyme; apos inactivation; renal plasma membrane antidiuretic hormone.
19	coupled optical rate determinations of amino acid oxidase activity	Determination of the optical coupled rates of the apos; activity of the apos; amino acid oxidase.
19	a cyclic adenosine 3 5 monophosphate dependent histone kinase from pig brain purification and some properties of the enzyme	An apos-dependent histone kinase; cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate from purification of pig brain and enzyme properties.
19	organophosphate inhibitors the reactions of bis p nitrophenyl methyl phosphate with liver carboxylesterases and alpha chymotrypsin	L' organophosphate inhibits the reactions of bis-p-nitrophenyl methylphosphate with hepatic carboxylesterases and l' alpha-chymotrypsin.
19	isolation composition and functional properties of alpha lactalbumins from several species	Composition and functional properties of, and isolation of, the alpha lactalbumins of several species.
19	the porcine endothelial cell in tissue culture	Tissue culture of the porcine endothelial cell.
19	distribution of fatty acids incorporated into triacylglycerols by microsome cytosol preparations from adipose tissue	Distribution of d' fatty acids incorporated into triacylglycerols by microsomal cytosolic preparations from the adipose tissue.
19	pigs susceptible to energy metabolism in the fulminant hyperthermia stress syndrome	Energy-sensitive hogs in hyperthermal stress disorder.
19	microtubule formation from two components separated by gel filtration of a tubulin preparation	Formation of microtubules from two separate components by tubulin gel filtration.
19	characterization and quantitation of the five major plasma protein fractions in seven day old piglets	Characterization and quantification of the top five plasma protein fractions from 7-day-old piglets.
19	diagnostic value of serum creatine phosphokinase activity for the porcine malignant hyperthermia syndrome	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
19	mechanics of the knee joint part ii the final rotation author s transl	Lapos mechanics; part II knee articulation; author of final translation rotation.
19	protection against neonatal enteric colibacillosis in pigs suckling orally vaccinated sows	American Journal of Infectious Diseases Vol.
19	enteric colibacillosis evaluation of strains of escherichia coli utilizing the ligated loop technique in gnotobiotic swine	Evaluation of Enteric Colibacillosis of Dapos strains; Escherichia coli using the Lapos technique; ligated anse in gnotobiotic swine.
19	efficacy of two dichlorvos formulations against larval and adult hyostrongylus rubidus in swine	Effectiveness of two dichlorovos formulations against adult and larval swine dichlorovos; hyostrongylus rubidus.
19	effects of different concentrations of corn oil magnesium sulfate and oat hulls in a porcine ulcerogenic ration	Effects of various magnesium sulphate concentrations in the oil; corn oil and potato hulls; oats in an ulcerable swine diet.
19	incidence of antibody for hemagglutinating encephalomyelitis virus in serums from swine in the united states	Impact of Antibody to L. etapos Virus; Hemagglutinating Encephalomyelitis in Swine Serums in the United States.
19	joint changes in lameness of confined swine	Joint Limping Changes for Confined Pigs.
19	swine dysentery pathogenicity of treponema hyodysenteriae	Tréponema hyodysenteriae is a pathogen in porcine dysentery.
19	imprinting of domestic animals on man	L'apos; imprinté des animaux domestiques sur l'apos; man par l'apos; imprinté des animaux domestiques sur l'apos; homme.
19	neuraminidase neutralizing antibodies in pigs with chronic erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae infection author s transl	Antibody-neutralizing neuraminidase in apos-positive swine; chronic apos-like errysipelothrix rhusiopathiae; translomatic infection.
19	the intestinal phase of gastric secretion	Stage of gastric secretion.
19	effects of hypoxia on the distribution of calcium in arterial smooth muscle cells of rats and swine	Effects of apo; hypoxia on calcium distribution in arterial smooth muscle cells in rats and pigs.
19	ultrastructural study of crystalloids in sertoli cells of the normal intersex and experimental cryptorchid swine	Ultrastructural study of crystalloid cells of normal intersex Servoli and experimental cryptorchid pigs.
19	nitrofurantoin test for the differentiation of bordetella bronchiseptica author s transl	Nitrofurantoin test for differentiation of author-translator bordetella bronchiseptica.
19	studies of the toxic components of erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 2 communication detailed characterization of an extracted endotoxin author s transl	Erysipelothrix rhusiopathiae 2 Communication, Detailed characterization of apos; an author; endotoxin extracted.
19	purification and characterisation of two porcine hypothalamic fractions with lh releasing activity evidence for a single lh and fsh releasing hormone	The purification and characterization of two hypothalamic porcine fractions with lupus release activity demonstrated the existence of a single hormone for release of lupus and fech.
19	induced synthesis of metallothionein by pig kidney cells in vitro in response to cadmium	Pig renal cell metallothionein induced synthesis in vitro in response to cadmium.
19	sleep stage regulation of ventricular arrhythmias in the unanesthetized pig	Regulation of sleeping ventricular arrhythmias in unanaesthetized swine.
19	functional evaluation of the porcine heterograft in the mitral position	Apos functional evaluation; swine heterograft mitral position.
19	radioassay of serum folate with use of pig plasma folate binders	Serum folate radio assay at apos; porcine plasma folate binders.
19	the copolymeric structure of pig skin dermatan suplhate characterization of d glucuronic acid containing oligosaccharides isolated after controlled degradation of oxydermatan sulphate	Copolymeric structure of pig dermatan under @-@plhate characterization of lacid; glucuronic acid d containing oligosaccharides isolated following controlled sulfate degradation of d' oxidatane.
19	the copolymeric structure of pig skin dermatan sulphate isolation and characterization of l idurono sulphate containing oligosaccharides from copolymeric chains	The copolymeric structure of porcine skin dermatan sulfate insulation and the characterization of oligosaccharide-containing lidurono sulfate from copolymer chains.
19	application of polyvinylpyrrolidone as a carrier for kallikrein	Polyvinylpyrrolidone application as kallikrein carrier.
19	the effect of growth hormone on established cartilage lesions a presidential address to the association of bone and joint surgeons 1974	It's a very important thing to know, but it's a very important thing to know, and it's a very important thing to know.
19	small angle x ray scattering of pig thyroglobulin in solution	Pig thyroglobulin X-ray scattering angle in solution.
19	studies on the metabolism of 5alpha androst 16 en 3 one in boar tests in vivo	Metabolism studies of 5alpha androst 3 in in vivo boar tests.
19	severe hemolysis with a fabric worn cloth covered aortic valve prosthesis	Severe hemolysis with worn tissue covered the dentures of the aortic valve.
19	purification properties and kinetics of sheep and human renin substrates	Purifying and kinetic properties of human renin and sheep renin (HR) substrates.
19	amino terminal residue heterogeneity of bovine and ovine growth hormones as revealed by polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis revealed the apos; heterogeneity of the terminal amino residues of the bovine and ovine growth hormones.
19	an inhibitory influence of granulosa cells and follicular fluid upon porcine oocyte meiosis in vitro	Inhibitory influence of follicular fluid and granulosa cells on porcine oocyte meiosis in vitro.
19	development of a radioimmunoassay for porcine relaxin using 125i labeled polytyrosyl relaxin	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed in accordance with the following instructions: a.
19	the importance of the stomach in gastrin induced hypocalcemia in the rat	It was found that the presence of the intestinal tract was associated with an increased risk of hypocalcaemia.
19	cyclic 3 5 adenosine monophosphate levels in separated bone cells	Cystic fibrosis is the most common type of fibrosis.
19	ultrastructure of the early ovary and testis in pig embryos	L' ultrastructure of pork embryos; early ovary and testis.
19	relationship between enhanced turnover of phosphatidylinositol and lymphocyte activation by mitogens	Increased phosphatidylinositol turnover and l' activation of lymphocytes by mitogens.
19	ion pair formation as a source of enhanced reactivity of the essential thiol group of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	D&apos pairing as the source of increased reactivity of the essential thiol group of dglyceridehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase.
19	fetal ingestion and metabolism of amniotic fluid protein	Amniotic fluid protein metabolism and fetal ingestion.
19	role of pyloric reflux in experimental stress ulceration during haemorrhagic shock	The role of pyloric reflux in the development of the experimental ulceration of stress during hemorrhagic shock.
19	flat gel polyacrylamide electrophoresis of porcine mycoplasmas	Pig mycoplasma flat polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
19	total calcium content of skeletal muscle isolated from humans and pigs susceptible to malignant hyperthermia	Total skeletal muscle calcium content isolated from human and human susceptible pigs; malignant hyperthermia.
19	procaine in porcine malignant hyperthermia	Canadian Institute for Health Information.
19	cellular characteristics of skeletal muscle in selected strains of pigs and mice and the unselected controls	Skeletal muscle cell characteristics in selected swine and mouse strains and unselected controls.
19	complete identification of endocrine cells in the gastrointestinal tract using semithin thin sections to identify motilin cells in human and animal intestine	Complete identification of the endocrine cells in the gastro tract-intestinal at the apos; helps thin sections of semithin to identify the motilin cells in the human and animal intestines.
19	swine lipoproteins and atherosclerosis changes in the plasma lipoproteins and apoproteins induced by cholesterol feeding	Lipoproteins and porcine atherosclerosis modify cholesterol-induced plasma apoproteins and lipoproteins.
19	gelbsilber rabbits a closed colony of high responders to the lactic dehydrogenase isoenzyme ldh h4 possible mechanisms controlling the response	Gelbsilber rabbits form a closed colony of individuals that are highly responsive to apos; lactic dehydrogenase (LDH) isoenzyme as a possible response control mechanism.
19	use of the immune tolerance induction in the production of an antilymphocyte serum als free of antibodies against serum proteins	The use of anti-lipoprotein, anti-lipoprotein, anti-lipopulose, anti-lipopulose, anti-lipoprotein, anti-lipopulose, anti-lipopulose and anti-lipopulose.
19	fragments of bovine serum albumin produced by limited proteolysis isolation and characterization of tryptic fragments	D&apos fragments; bovine serum albumin produced by limited isolation by proteolysis and tryptic fragment characterization.
19	survival of certain pathogenic organisms in swine lagoon effluent	Survival of certain pathogens in effluents from swine lagoon.
19	on the relationship between tetracycline and the incremental lines in dentine	Relationship between tetracycline and increments in dentine.
19	the ultrastructure of the sensory end organs baroreceptors in the atrial endocardium of young mini pigs	L' ultrastructure of baroreceptor terminal sensory organs in the atrial endocardium of miniature-pigs.
19	elevated serum growth hormone in protein deprived rats and decreased liver rna after hypophysectomy	It is not possible to determine the cause of death due to a combination of factors, such as age, sex, age, sex, sex, or other factors.
19	physical parameters and chemical composition of porcine pancreatic elastase ii	Physical Parameters and Chemical Composition of Swine Pancreatic Elastasis ii.
19	application of immunofluorescence and immunoenzyme methods in the serodiagnosis of trichinella spiralis infection	In addition, it is recommended that patients be tested for the presence of an antibody to determine the presence of the antibody.
19	neutral glycosphingolipids containing mannose from the bivalve corbicula sandai	Neutral glycosphingolipids containing mannose from bivalve corbicula sandai.
19	biological characterization of fusobacterium necrophorum cell fractions in preparation for toxin and immunization studies	Biological characterization of the cellular fractions of fusobacterium necrophorum in preparation for the development of toxin and immunization studies.
19	a rapid modified gas chromatographic assay for esterase activity	A modified rapid gas chromatography test for the esterase activity.
19	microfluorometric evaluation of conjugate specificity with the defined antigen substrate spheres dass system	Microfluorometric evaluation of the specificity of the conjugates with the defined spherical substrate system of the antigen dass system.
19	ultrastructure of the synaptic junctional lattice isolated from mammalian brain	Synaptic junctional network ultrastructure isolated from the mammalian brain.
19	intracellular distribution of beta galactosidases in mucosal cells from hog small intestine	In addition, there are a number of different types of beta-galactosidases in the mucosal cells of swine.
19	subcellular fractionation partial purification and characterization of neutral triacylglycerol lipase from pig liver	By subcellular fractionation, partial purification, and neutral pig liver triacylglycerol lipase characterization.
19	effects of various dietary levels of dried whey on the performance of growing pigs	Effects of various dried whey dietary levels on growing hog performance.
19	effects of diets containing dried whey on the lactase activity of the small intestinal mucosa and the contents of the small intestine and cecum of the pig	Effects of dried whey-containing diets on appetite; mucosal lactase activity; small intestine and mucosal contents; swine small intestine and caecum.
19	differential responses of duroc hampshire and crossbred pigs to a superimposed experimental infection with the intestinal threadworm strongyloides ransomi	Duroc hampshire and crossed swine differential response to an experimental infection superimposed by Strongyloides ransomi filament worm.
19	in vitro biology of corneal epithelium and endothelium	Epithelial and endothelial studies in vitro.
19	feed refusal factors in pure cultures of fusarium roseum graminearum	Food-refusal factors in pure-breeding Fusarium roseum graminearum.
19	helminth parasitisms among intermingling insular populations of white tailed deer feral cattle and feral swine	Helminth parasitism among mixed wild-tailed and wild-swine island populations.
19	l fucose metabolism in mammals purification of pork liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase by nad agarose affinity chromatography	Metabolism of lucose in mammalian pigs liver purification 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase by d&apos chromatography; affinity with nad agarose.
19	l fucose metabolism in mammals kinetic studies on pork liver 2 keto 3 deoxy l fuconate nad oxidoreductase	Metabolism of fucosis in mammals Kinetic studies in pig liver 2 keto 3 deoxy-l-fuconate nad oxidoreductase.
19	guinea pig proinsulin primary structure of the c peptide isolated from pancreas	Primary structure of isolated pancreatic peptide c guinea pig proinsulin.
19	proinsulin a proposed three dimensional structure	The proinsulin is a three-dimensional structure that is used in the development of insulin.
19	evidence for a factor in pig adipose tissue controlling the specificity of the acyltransferase s of triacylglycerol synthesis	The existence of apos; a factor in porcine adipose tissue which controls specificity of apos; acyltransferase of triacylglycerol synthesis has been demonstrated.
19	binding of 14 c salicylic acid and 14 c pentobarbital to plasma proteins of several species during the perinatal period	Binding of l' salicylic acid 14 c and pentobarbital 14 c to perinatal plasma proteins of several species.
19	comparative study of immunity in swine vaccinated with foot and mouth disease vaccines prepared with various adjuvants	For the purposes of this study, the following criteria should be considered: 1.
19	influence of tissue emulsions on the phagocytic activity of the res	Tissue emulsion influence on apos; res phagocytic activity.
19	effect of intramuscular and oral use of antianemic iron preparations in suckling pigs	Effect of oral and intramuscular use of anti-anemia preparations of iron in swine.
19	porperties of a strain of herpesvirus suis isolated in cases with various epizootologic and clinical courses of the disease	The isolation of herpesviruses in cases with a variety of epizootological and clinical progression of the disease.
19	use of the direct immunofluorescence method for determination of the tge viral antigen in swine	Use of Dapos; direct immunofluorescent assay for swine viral antigen testing.
19	antibody formation in swine vaccinated with a lapinized k vaccine and serum against hog cholera	Antibody formation in rabbitized and swine cholera serum vaccinated swine.
19	level of estrogens in the blood of swine during pregnancy	Pregnant women are more likely than other women to have sex with men.
19	immunoglobulin containing cells in pig mammary gland	L' immunoglobulin contains cells within the pig mammary gland.
19	a screening method for determining nitrofuran drug residues in animal tissues	Method for Screening for Nitrofuran Residues in Animal Tissue.
19	the carboxylic acid groups of bovine luteinizing hormone the effects of their modification on receptor site binding and subunit subunit interaction	D&apos groups; carboxylic acids; bovine luteinizing hormone; effects of their modification on receptor-site binding and l' interaction under unit @-@, unit unit @-@.
19	proton magnetic resonance spectra or porcine muscle adenylate kinase and substrate complexes	Proton magnetic resonance or d' adenylate kinase complexes and porcine muscle substrates.
19	sequence position of 3 hydroxyproline in basement membrane collagen isolation of glycyl 3 hydroxyprolyl 4 hydroxyproline from swine kidney	Position 3 hydroxyproline sequence in the basement membrane collagen d' glycyl isolation 3 hydroxyprolyl 4 hydroxyproline pig kidney.
19	formation and excretion of pyrrole 2 carboxylic acid whole animal and enzyme studies in the rat	Formation and apo; excretion of l' pyrrole acid-2 carboxylic acid in whole animal and rat enzyme studies.
19	enzymatic arginylation of beta melanocyte stimulating hormone and of angiotensin ii	Apos enzymatic arginylation; beta- and apo-melanocyte stimulating hormone; angiotensin ii.
19	affinity labeling of d amino acid oxidase with an acetylenic substrate	Amino acid oxidase d with acetylenic substrate.
19	use of 5 deazafad to study hydrogen transfer in the d amino acid oxidase reaction	Use of 5 deazafad to study the transfer of d' hydrogen in the oxidase reaction of amino acids d.
19	properties of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent aldehyde reductase from pig kidney amino acid composition reactivity of cysteinyl residues and stereochemistry of d glyceraldehyde reduction	Properties of porcine kidney cysteinyl residue reactivity-dependent nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate aldehyde reductase and dglyceraldehyde reduction stereochemistry.
19	vasopressin sensitive kidney adenylate cyclase structural requirements for attachment to the receptor and enzyme activation studies with vasopressin analogues	Vasopressin-sensitive renal adenylate cyclase, vasopressin structural requirements, receptor attachment and studies, enzyme activation with vasopressin analogs.
19	hodgkin s disease an epidemiological study on 140 children urban rural relation profession of parents domestic animal contact	Epidemiological study of 140 children in rural areas whose parents have been in contact with domestic animals.
19	identification and differentiation of lens cells in tissue culture	Cells of the lens are identified and differentiated in tissue culture.
19	study of the tryptophan hydroxyproline coefficient of the meat of animals of different species	Study of d&apos coefficient; tryptophan hydroxyproline of animal of different species.
19	the purification and some properties of electron transfer flavoprotein and general fatty acyl coenzyme a dehydrogenase from pig liver mitochondria	Purification and certain properties of flavoprotein transfer from pork liver mitochondria and general fatty acyl coenzyme, electron and apos; general fatty acyl coenzyme to dehydrogenase.
19	rates of passage of digesta and water absorption along the larg intestines of sheep cows and pigs	Absorption of water along the large intestines of sheep, cows and pigs.
19	sequence variability and structure of d glyceraldehyde 3 phosphate dehydrogenase	Sequence Variability and Dglyceraldehyde 3 Phosphate Dehydrogenase Structure.
19	comparative characteristics of some products of decomposition of lactic protein and fat in cheeses produced with addition of boar pepsin	Comparative Characteristics of Certain Lactic Protein and Fat Decomposition Products in Cheese Produced by Addition of Wild Boar Pepsin.
19	candida ingens as a potential fodder protein	Candida ing. is a potential protein in animal feed.
19	chicken glucagon isolation and amino acid sequence studies	Chicken glucagon isolation and studies of amino acid sequence.
19	orthotopic liver transplantation utilizing a vascular stapling instrument	Orthopaedic hepatic transplantation at baseline; help with apo; vascular stapler.
19	renal transplantation in the unimmunosuppressed pig an abnormal response	Renal transplants in non immunosuppressed swine; abnormal response.
19	increase in numbers of gonadotropin receptors on granulosa cells during follicle maturation	An increase in the number of gonadotropin receptors on the granulosa cells during maturation of the follicles.
19	the role of iron in the pathogenesis of porphyria cutanea tarda ii inhibition of uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase	The role of iron in the pathogenesis of cutanea porphyria was a long time ago, when it was found to inhibit apos; uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase.
19	the microbial flora in the digestive tract of the monogastric and its effect on the nutritional metabolism of the host	Microbial flora in the monogastric gut and its effect on nutritional metabolism of the host.
19	the sequences of the coenzyme binding peptide in the cytoplasmic and the mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferases from sheep liver	Coenzyme-binding peptide sequences in cytoplasmic and mitochondrial sheep liver aspartate aminotransferases.
19	purification of porcine enterokinase by affinity chromatography	Purification of the epos, porcine enterokinase by chromatography of apos; affinity.
19	pig liver pyruvate carboxylase purification properties and cation specificity	Pyruvate carboxylase purification properties of pig liver and specificity to the liver; cations.
19	scanning electron microscopy and electron probe microanalysis of calcified alpha elastin coacervates	Scanning electron microscope microanalysis and calcified coacervates alpha-elastin electron probe.
19	effect of modifiers on the hydrolysis of basic and neutral peptides by carboxypeptidase b1	Effect of modifiers on apo; base and neutral peptide hydrolysis by b1 carboxypeptidase.
19	progesterone synthesis of pig corpus luteum tissue during superfusion	Synthesis of the porcine corpus luteum progesterone during superfusion.
19	the demonstration of transmissible gastroenteritis viral antigens by immunoelectrophoresis and counterimmunoelectrophoresis	Demonstration of Viral Gastro antigens-Immunoelectrophoretically Transmissible Enteritis and-Immunoelectrophoresis.
19	kinetic study of the percutaneous absorption of 1 2 4 3h labelled flupamesone	Percutaneous absorption of 12.43 h of labelled flupamesone.
19	trends in salmonella food poisoning in england and wales 1941 72	In addition, there is a growing body of research on the effects of foodborne illness on the environment.
19	cleavage of the third complement component c3 and generation of the spasmogenic peptide c3a in human serum via the properdin pathway demonstration of inhibitory as well as enhancing effects of epsilon amino caproic acid	Cleavage of the third component of the c3 complement and production of the c3a spasmogenic peptide in human serum by the rocket route intermediate showed the epsilon epsilon, inhibitory and inhibitory effect; stimulatory effect of the epsilon caproic acid.
19	induction of histamine release and desensitization in human leukocytes effect of anaphylatoxin	Anaphylatoxine is a drug that can be used to treat human leukocytes by inducing release of apos; histamine and desensitization in the liver.
19	light microscopical electron microscopical and clinical findings in orthotopic allogenic porcine liver homografts author s transl	Light microscopic electron microscopy and clinical results in allogeneic orthotopic pig hepatic homografts.
19	trans chest ventricular defibrillation of heavy subjects using trapezoidal current waveforms	Vector defibrillation of the thoracic ventricular of heavy subjects at the apos; aid of forms d'apos; waves of trapezoidal current.
19	studies on brain cytosol neuraminadase i isolation and partial characterization of two forms of the enzyme from pig brain	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the enzyme is present in the brain, but it is important to determine whether the enzyme is present in the brain.
19	concanavalin a nsc 143504 its action on experimental tumor cells and possible use in cancer chemotherapy	In addition, it can be used in the treatment of cancer, as well as in the treatment of cancer.
19	the nadph dependent cytochrome p 450 reduction in liver microsomes of rats of different ages with and without phenobarbital pretreatment	Nadphin-dependent cytochrome p450 reduction in hepatic microsomes from D&apos rats; different ages, with or without phenobarbital pretreatment.
19	histamine stimulated hydrogen ion secretion by in vitro piglet gastric mucosa	Histamine stimulated the secretion of hydrogen ions from the piglet's in vitro gastric mucosa.
19	growth hormone release inhibiting hormone in gastrointestinal and pancreatic d cells	It can also be used as a food aid to prevent the spread of HIV/AIDS and other sexually transmitted diseases.
19	inhibition by quinaldate of dehydrogenases	Quinaldate dehydrogenase inhibition.
19	evaluation of various protein sequences on the nutritional carry over from gestation to lactation with first litter sows	Evaluation of various nutritional transfer from pregnancy to lactation protein sequences with early litter sows.
19	studies on the metabolism of beta hydroxy aspartic acid	Beta acid-hydroxyaspartic acid metabolism studies.
19	histochemical identification of glycoproteins in pig bronchial epithelium a normal and b hypertrophied from enzootic pneumonia	Histochemical glycoprotein identification in the apos; bronchial epithelium has normal and hypertrophied pork following apos; enzootic pneumonia.
19	porcine streptococci causing meningitis and septicaemia in man	Meningitis and sepsis are caused by pig streptococci in men.
19	changes with age in the occurrence of c19 steroids in the testis and submaxillary gland of the boar	Steroids c19 in the testes and gland under-maxillary of wild boar change with age.
19	improvements in the technical conditions for the evaluation of an elastolytic activity the role of tryspin as an activator author s transl	It's a good idea to create a new version of the game, but it doesn't have to be a new one to be able to use it.
19	estimation of seric and parietal inhibiting power of elastase its changes with experimental conditions	Estimation of serum and parietal inhibitory potency of elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase, elastase.
19	relative competition of corticosterone cortisol cortisone 11 dexycortisol and prednisolone with 1 2 3h cortisol in various protein binding radioassay systems	Comparison of cortisone cortisol cortisone 11 deoxycortisol and prednisolone with cortisol 1 2 h in a variety of dietary protein-binding assays.
19	the split ejaculate of the boar contributions of the epididymides and seminal vesicles	Ejaculate divided from bloody contributions of epididymides and seminal vesicles.
19	the isolation and characterization of lactoferrin from sow milk and boar seminal plasma	Lactoferrin is isolated and characterized from sow's milk and seminal plasma from wild boar.
19	on the interactions between pancreatic lipase and colipase and the substrate and the importance of bile salts	Pancreatic lipase – colipase – substrate–lapos interactions; importance of bile salts.
19	clearance from the circulation of the rat and whole body autoradiography in the mouse of 125i labelled neurophysins	Whole-body autoradiography of 125i-labelled neurophysins in mice.
19	isoelectric focusing of boar spermatozoa	Boar sperm isoelectric focusing.
19	physiological temperature response and embryonic mortality in stressed swine	Journal of Embryonic Dysmia.
19	embryonic and placental development during prolonged inanition in the pig	The development of the embryo and placenta during the period of prolonged starvation in pigs.
19	cross linking of hemoglobin haptoglobin and hemoglobin haptoglobin complex with bifunctional imidoesters	Hemoglobin haptoglobin crossed with haptoglobin hemoglobin complex and bifunctional imidesters.
19	utilization of amino acids administered enterally or parenterally to young pigs	"For the purposes of this document, the term ""indigenous"" means a person who is a member of the family."
19	multiple vascular and gastric cannulation of swine for studies of gastrointestinal liver and peripheral tissue metabolism	Multiple swine gastric and vascular cannulation for studies of gastro liver metabolism-intestinal and peripheral tissues.
19	primary structure of porcine pepsin i purification and placement of cyanogen bromide fragments and the amino acid sequence of fragment cb5	The primary structure of the purification of porcine pepsin is the placement of the cyanogen bromide fragments and the sequence d' amino acids of the cb5 fragment.
19	primary structure of porcine pepsin ii amino acid sequence of two cyanogen bromide fragments cb3 and cb4	Primary structure of the sequence d' porcine pepsin amino acids ii from two cb3 and cb4 segments of cyanogen bromide.
19	effect of electronic cooking on fatty acids in meats	Effect of Electronic Baking on Fatty Acids in Meat.
19	action of growth hormone in vitro on the net uptake and incorporation in protein of amino acids in muscle from intact rabbits given protein deficient diets	In vitro growth hormone action on capture and uptake; net amino acid incorporation into muscle proteins of intact rabbits fed protein-deficient diets.
19	intestinal amino acid absorption in vitamin d dependent rickets	It is important to note that vitamin D is a major component of rickets.
19	boar acrosin ii amino acid composition amino terminal residue and molecular weight estimations by ultracentrifugation	Boar's Acrosine ii, amino acid composition, amino terminal residue, and estimation of molecular weight by ultracentrifugation.
19	porcine thyrotropin the amino acid sequence of the alpha and beta subunits	Swine Thyrotropin, d&apos sequence; amino acids from-alpha units and beta.
19	porcine proparathyroid hormone identification biosynthesis and partial amino acid sequence	Biosynthesis of apo; identification of apo; proparathyroid hormone pig and partial sequence of apo; amino acids.
19	amino acid transport by the helicoidal colon of the new born pig	The transport of amino acids through the new-porcine-born helical colon.
19	secretion of endogenous amino acids in the gastrointestinal tract and amino acid resorption in the swine	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, and therefore no evidence to support this claim.
19	the mechanism of action of d amino acid oxidase i evidence for a free radical mechanism of the reaction catalyzed b a dimeric form of the enzyme	The mechanism of amino acid oxidase action suggests the existence of apos; a free reaction radical mechanism that catalyzes a dimer form of apos; enzyme.
19	studies on the additive character of amino acid absorption data obtained from pigs 2 studies using regression technic	Studies of additive nature of apo data; amino acid absorption from swine 2 to apo; assistance with regression techniques.
19	enhancement of antibody response to soluble hsa antigen of young rabbits pretreated with deoxyribonucleic acids from adult donors	Stimulation of immune response to deoxyribonucleic acid-pretreated young rabbits' soluble hsa antigen from adult donors.
19	phosphoric acid ester preparations used in cattle swine and sheep with special reference to cholinesterase activity 3 use of phosphoric acid ester preparations and their effect on acetylcholinesterase activity in swine	Preparations of phosphate esters; phosphoric acids used in swine and sheep, in particular for lipopolysaccharide; cholinesterase activity 3, followed by the use of phosphate esters; phosphoric acids and their effect on phosphate esters; acetylcholinesterase activity in swine.
19	active site chlorination of d amino acid oxidase by n chloro d leucine	Chlorination of active amino acid-acid oxidase site by chloro-leucine.
19	human pituitary lutropin isolation properties and the complete amino acid sequence of the beta subunit	The properties of apos; isolation of human pituitary lutropin and the complete sequence of amino acids of the sub@-@beta unit.
19	limiting amino acids of chickpeas cicer arietinum for chickens and pigs	Restriction of amino acids in chicken and swine cured arietinum chickpeas.
19	amino acid metabolism in the piglet 2 influence of fasting on plasma free amino acid concentration and in vivo oxidation of methionine isoleucine and threonine	The metabolism of amino acids in piglet 2 affects the plasma concentration of free amino acids and l' isoleucine methionine and threonine oxidation in vivo.
19	vinylglycine and proparglyglycine complementary suicide substrates for l amino acid oxidase and d amino acid oxidase	Vinsylglycine and proparglycine are complementary suicidal substrates for d-amino acid oxidase and d-amino acid oxidase.
19	influence of coronary effective substances on the concentration of nonesterified fatty acids in the serum of patients with angina pectoris	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Health Products and Food Branch, Health Canada.
19	characterization of tryptic peptides from porcine haptoglobin light chain and an amino acid sequence	Characterization of the tryptic peptides of the light chain of d' haptoglobin porcine and d' a sequence of amino acids.
19	correlation of degradative rates of proteins with a parameter calculated from amino acid composition and subunit size	Correlation of the rates of protein degradation with a parameter calculated from the composition of amino acids and the size of the sub-units.
19	the effect of halofenate or halofenate free acid on human rat and guinea pig platelet aggregation	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors which may affect the quality of the product.
19	studies on the true amino acid digestibility in pigs of various wheat varieties from the soviet union	Studies on the true digestibility of amino acids in swine from various U.S. and Soviet Union wheat varieties.
19	protein utilization of mixed feed rations in lactating pigs with reference to the essential amino acid content of the feed proteins 2 report utilization of the feed proteins in the use of soy bean extraction residue waste liquor yeast horse bean meal fish meal and maize gluten for a basic ration	The use of mixed dietary protein in lactating swine with respect to essential amino acid content of dietary protein 2 includes protein use in apples; use of dietary protein in apples; use of residues from apples; extraction of soybean liqueur from yeast bean flour and corn gluten for a basic diet.
19	protein utilization of mixed feed rations in lactating pigs with reference to the essential amino acid content of the feed proteins 3 report correlation between the protein metabolism data and the amino acid content of the dietary protein	L' utilization of protein from mixed dietary diets in lactating piglets relative to the essential amino acid content of dietary proteins 3 indicates a correlation between protein metabolism and dietary protein amino acid content.
19	conclusions about aminopeptidase in tissue sections from studies of amino acid naphthylamide hydrolysis	Studies on apos; hydrolysis of amino acids by naphthylamide led to conclusions on apos; aminopeptidase in sections of tissue.
19	effect of alcohols on the structure and function of d amino acid oxidase	Effect of Alcohols on Structure and Function of Lacid; amino acid oxidase d.
19	determination of the true digestibility of amino acids in pigs	Determination of true pig amino acid digestibility.
19	constant level of intestinal amino acids as a function of the composition of same	Acute and chronic toxicity to aquatic organisms and invertebrates.
19	distribution of radioactivity in the body and rate of incorporation of radioactivity into the tissue proteins of monogastric animals following intravenous injection of tracer amino acids	Radioactivity distribution in the organism and levels; incorporation of radioactivity into tissue proteins in monogastric animals after intravenous injections of tracer amino acids.
19	amino acid metabolism in the piglet influence of level of protein and of methionine in the diet on tissue uptake and in vivo oxidation	The level of protein and methionine in the diet is influenced by the metabolism of amino acids in the piglet; tissue absorption and l' in vivo oxidation.
19	oxidation of sarcosine and n alkyl derivatives of glycine by d amino acid oxidase	Sarcosine and nalkylated glycine derivatives are oxidized by apos; amino acid oxidase d.
19	amino acid sequence of penicillopepsin iv myxobacter al 1 protease ii and staphylococcus aureus protease fragments and homology with pig pepsin and chymosin	Sequence of amino acids of penicillopepsin iv myxobacter al 1 protease ii and of fragments of staphylococcus aureus protease and homology with porcine pepsin and chymosin.
19	the composition of lipids in intestinal digesta of young pigs receiving diets containing tallow and tallow fatty acids	Fat composition in the intestinal digestions of young pigs fed tallow and tallow fatty acid diets.
19	the amino terminal sequence of the vhiii subgroup of pooled porcine igg	L&apos sequence; amino end of-group vhiii d' group swine.
19	influence of amino acids on gastric emptying in young pigs	L' influences gastric emptying by amino acids in young pigs.
19	ribonucleic acid stimulation of mammalian liver nuclear envelope nucleoside triphosphatase a possible enzymic marker for the nuclear envelope	Stimulation by apos; ribonucleic acid of the mammalian liver nucleoside triphosphatase; nuclear envelope, a possible enzyme marker for apos; nuclear envelope.
19	free fatty acids and arrhythmias following acute coronary artery occlusion in pigs	Acute occlusion of the epos; coronary artery in the pig, causing free fatty acids and arrhythmia.
19	some methodical problems in the determination of the true amino acid digestibility in swine	Some methodological problems in determining swine amino acid digestibility.
19	influence of dietary trans fatty acids on swine lipoprotein composition and structure	Dietary trans fatty acid influence on pig lipoprotein composition and structure.
19	relationships between the apparent digestibility of crude protein and the amino acid balance of the swine digestive tract	Relationship between crude protein apparent digestibility and lipid content; gut amino acid balance in pigs.
19	gas chromatographic separation of cholesteryl esters of fatty acids of different degrees of unsaturation	Cholesteryl esters are separated by gas chromatography; fatty acids of different degrees; unsaturation.
19	effect of hydrophobic probes on the higher structure of d amino acid oxidase	The effect of the hydrophobic probes on the structure of the upper part of the cell; amino acid oxidase d.
19	effect of halide anions on the binding of fad to d amino acid oxidase and the tryptophanyl fluorescence of the apoenzyme	Effect of halide anions on fad binding to apos; amino acid oxidase activity and tryptophanyl fluorescence of apos; apoenzyme.
19	interaction of steroids with d amino acid oxidase	Interaction of the steroids with the amino acid oxidase d.
19	potentiation of fmd vaccines with polycationic nucleic acid complexes	In addition, it is important to note that there is a need for more information on vaccines.
19	the effect of solids from pig manure as food components in rations for fat bulls heifers and calves on the crude nutrient and amino acid content of the longissimus dorsi muscle	The effect of pig manure solids as a dietary component in the heifer and calf rations on the raw amino acid and nutrient content of the longissimus dorsi muscle.
19	comparison of various immunological methods for distinguishing among mammalian pancreatic ribonucleases of known amino acid sequence	Comparison of various immunological methods to distinguish known mammalian pancreatic ribonucleases.
19	xiii sausages and luncheon meats comprehensive evaluation of fatty acids in foods	Sausages and Meat Full Fatty Acid Evaluation in Foods.
19	n terminal amino acid sequences of acid proteases acid proteases from penicillium roqueforti and rhizopus chinensis and alignment with penicillopepsin and mammalian proteases	N penicillium roqueforti and rhizopus chinensis acid protease amino acid terminal sequences aligned with penicillopepsin and mammalian proteases.
19	studies on nitrogen and amino acid absorption in the swine part 2 the course of 15 n labeling in the chyme urine and blood	Apo studies; nitrogen and nitrogen absorption; porcine Part 2 amino acids during labeling at 15 n in urine and chyme blood.
19	amino acid requirements of the breeding sow the dietary lysine requirement during pregnancy	Reproductive sows' amino acid requirements correspond to their dietary lysine requirements during pregnancy.
19	concentrations of cortisol glucose and free fatty acids in the blood plasma of swine in relation to age and in sows close to farrowing	Cortisol and dapos glucose concentrations; free fatty acids in swine blood plasma as a function of age; age and pre-calving sows.
19	structural study of circulating thymic factor a peptide isolated from pig serum ii amino acid sequence	In addition, the peptide was isolated from the pig serum, and the peptide was isolated from the pig serum.
19	lipase hydrolysis of mammalian long chain 1 2 alkanediol diesters nonrandom distribution of fatty acids	L' hydrolysis by lipase of diesters of the long chain 1 alcanediols of mammals; does not result in a random distribution of fatty acids.
19	absorption of amino acids in isolated pig caecum in situ effect of concentration of enzymatic casein hydrolysate on absorption of amino acids	In addition to the above, there are a number of other factors which may affect the quality of the product, such as the quality of the product, the quality of the product, and the quality of the product.
19	isolation of gamma amino butyric acid from pig hypothalami and demonstration of its prolactin release inhibiting pif activity in vivo and in vitro	L' isolation of l' gamma acid-amino-butyrique de l' hypothalami of pig and demonstration of release of prolactin inhibiting l' activity pif in vivo and in vitro.
19	binding of fatty acids and tryptophan to alpha fetoprotein from fetal pigs	Tryptophan and fatty acid binding to the apos; alpha-fetal swine fetoprotein.
19	estimation of rate of protein synthesis by constant infusion of labelled amino acids in pigs	Estimation of Protein Synthesis Rate by Constant Infusion of labelled amino acids in swine.
19	amino acid requirements of the breeding sow 2 the dietary lysine requirement of the lactating sow	Amino acid requirements for breeding sow 2: lysine requirements for feeder sow.
19	partial amino acid sequences of two proteins in developing porcine enamel	It is not possible to determine the origin of the protein, but it is possible to determine the origin of the protein.
19	heterogeneity of amino acid sequence in hippopotamus cytochrome c	Heterogeneity of the sequence of amino acids in l' hippopotamus cytochrome c.
19	porcine follitropin the amino acid sequence of the beta subunit	Swine follitropin, d&apos sequence; beta-unit amino acids.
19	the optimal amino acid supplementation of barley for the growing pig 1 response of nitrogen metabolism to progressive supplementation	The optimal supplementation of amino acids of barley for the response of growing pig nitrogen metabolism 1 to the progressive supplementation of amino acids.
19	the amino acid supplementation of barley for the growing pig 2 optimal additions of lysine and threonine for growth	The porcine growth barley amino acid supplementation 2 optimal lysine and threonine additions for growth.
19	studies on digestion and absorption in the intestines of growing pigs 6 measurements of the flow of amino acids	For the purposes of this document, the following definitions shall be used: 1.
19	performance dependent lysine requirement of fattening pigs 3 effect of amino acid and energy intake on fat protein and lysine deposition of swine	Effect of amino acids and l-apos; energy intake on fatty protein and lysine deposition in fattening pigs.
19	nitrogen and amino acid absorption in swine 3 endogenous secretion and absorption of nitrogen	Nutrient content of foodstuffs; N2O; N2O; N2O; N2O; N2O; N2O; N2O; N2O; N2O; and N2O.
19	nitrogen and amino acid resorption by swine 4 amino acid resorption	It is not possible to determine the extent to which the protein is soluble.
19	performance related lysine requirement of fattening pigs 4 effect of energy and amino acid intakes on composition of gain and derivation of lysine requirement	Effect of lysine; energy and amino acid supply on the composition of feeder pig lysine gain and derivation.
19	studies on trypsin inhibitors part ix synthesis and trypsin inhibitory activity of the duopentacontapeptide corresponding to the amino acid sequence of porcine pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor ii kazal	Trypsin inhibitors studies, part ix synthesis, and duopentacontapeptide trypsin inhibitory activity corresponding to the d&apos sequence; l&apos amino acids; guinea pig ii kazal pancreatic secretory trypsin inhibitor.
19	de novo fatty acid synthesis and fatty acid elongation catalyzed by subcellular fractions from hog and human aorta	De novo synthesis of fatty acids and elongation of fatty acids catalyzed by the subcellular fractions of l'apos; aorte de porc et de l'apos; aorte humaine.
19	lysine requirement of fattening boars in respect to their performance 1 influence of the consumption of energy and amino acids on the fattening performance	The lysine requirements of wild boars, which are fattening relative to their performance levels, affect their consumption of protein, energy and amino acids, and fattening.
19	protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 5 results of the application of 35s methionine	Protein digestibility and apo; amino acid absorption in various pig gut segments 5 resulted from the application of methionine 35s.
19	reactions of cysteamine and other amine metabolites with glyoxylate and oxygen catalyzed by mammalian d amino acid oxidase	Cysteamine and d&apos reactions; other glyoxylate- and l&apos-catalyzed amino-metabolites; mammalian acid oxidase.
19	performance dependence of the lysine requirement of fattening sows 1 effect of energy and amino acid consumption on fattening performance	The effect of food consumption, energy, and amino acids on the sow's performance, and fattening depends on the performance of the sow's lysine requirement.
19	protein digestibility and the absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 3 results of the fractionation of ileum chyme after feeding various rations	Protein digestibility and apo; amino acid absorption in various swine gut segments 3 resulted from fractionation of chyme from apos; ileum after apos; feeding of various rations.
19	protein digestibility and the absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 4 digestibility of crude protein and amino acids and rate of passage through the duodenum and ileum and the total digestive tract of growing pigs	Protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various parts of the pig gut 4 crude protein and amino acid digestibility and rate of passage through duodenum and l' ileum and the total gut of growing pigs.
19	chlorination of an active site tyrosyl residue in d amino acid oxidase by n chloro d leucine	Prepared for the Canadian Environmental Assessment Agency, Environment Canada, Ottawa, Ontario, Canada.
19	free fatty acids as inhibitors of the respiratory chain in testicular homogenates	Free fatty acids (FFA) as respiratory chain inhibitors in testicular homogenates.
19	appearance of 15n labeled intestinal microbial amino acids in the venous blood of the pig colon	In addition, there are a number of other factors that contribute to the development of the immune system.
19	structural study of the heme crevice in cytochrome b5 based on individual assignments of the 1h nmr lines of the heme group and selected amino acid residues	Structural study of the cleft of cells; heme in cytochrome b5 is based on apos; individual assignment of 1h nmr heme group lines and a selection of amino acid residues.
19	studies on digestion and absorption in the intestines of growing pigs 8 measurements of the flow of total lipid acid detergent fibre and volatile fatty acids	Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary Reference Intakes Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims Dietary claims 1.
19	the amino acid sequence of porcine intestinal calcium binding protein	The amino acid sequence of the protein that binds porcine intestinal calcium.
19	protein digestibility and absorption of amino acids in various segments of the digestive tract of pigs 2 protein and amino acid balances at the end of the small intestine and of the whole digestive tract apparent and true protein and amino acid digestibility	Protein digestibility and amino acid absorption in various parts of the pig gut 2 balances proteins and amino acids at the end of the intestine; small intestine and intestines; whole digestive tract, apparent and true digestibility of proteins and amino acids.
19	porcine pancreatic lipase sequence of the first 234 amino acids of the peptide chain	Pancreatic porcine lipase sequence from the first 234 amino acids in the peptide chain.
19	purification and n terminal amino acid sequence determination of anionic and cationic canine trypsinogens	Anionic and cationic trypsinogens are purified and their terminal amino acid sequences determined.
19	amino acid transport by small and large intestine of newborn pig	The transport of amino acids by the large and small intestines of the newborn pig-born.
19	gamma glutamyl transpeptidase mediated transport of amino acid in lecithin vesicles	Amino acid transport by glutamyl gamma transpeptidase into lecithin vesicles is amino acid mediated.
19	detection of plasmid deoxyribonucleic acid in an isolate of lactobacillus acidophilus	Deoxyribonucleic plasmid acid detection in a lactobacillus acidophilus isolate.
19	in vitro effects of fatty acids on the actions of serum on rat and pig cartilage	In Vitro Effect of Fatty Acids on Lapos; Effect of Serum on Pig and Rat Cartilage.
19	messenger ribonucleic acids from pig intestinal mucosa direct synthesis of calcium binding protein in a cell free translation system	Messenger ribonucleic acids of pig intestinal mucosa synthesize the calcium-binding protein directly in cell-free translation.
19	the primary structure of mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase from pig heart peptides obtained by cleavage at basic residues	The primary structure of the mitochondrial aspartate aminotransferase of basic residue cleavage pork cardiac peptides.
19	studies of the spectrum of nonesterified fatty acids in blood and muscle tissue of swine 1 effect of genotype muscular substance	Spectrum Studies of Nonesterified Fatty Acids in Swine Muscle and Blood 1 effect of genotype.
19	addition of amino acids and oligopeptides to the diet of piglets ii effects on apparent digestion of some alimentary principles	The addition of amino acids and amino acids to the piglet's diet, and oligopeptides, has effects on the apparent digestion of certain dietary principles.
19	porcine liver dihydrofolate reductase purification properties and amino acid sequence	Purification properties of porcine liver dihydrofolate reductase and sequence of amino acids.
20	the effect of temperature on the direct muscle twitch response and the action of drugs on the isolated denervated rat diaphragm	Effect of temperature on direct twitch and muscle response; drug action on isolated denervated rat diaphragm.
20	the maintenance of a colony of anopheles gambiae with observations on the effects of changes in temperature	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
20	effects of temperature on the generator and action potentials of a sense organ	Temperature effects on generator and capacitors; action of a sensory organ.
20	ethylene oxide gaseous sterilization i concentration and temperature effects	The results of these studies are summarized in Table 1.
20	a temperature gradient bar and its applications to the study of temperature effects on the growth of reiter s treponeme	A temperature-gradient bar and its application to cellular processes; study of the effects of temperature on treponemal growth.
20	the effect of temperature on the uptake of radiosulfate by rat renal tissue from radiosulfate containing solutions in vitro	The effects of temperature on the rate of absorption of radiosulfate by the renal tissue of the rat from solutions containing radiosulfate in vitro.
20	effects of temperature and anions on titration curves of frog muscle	Temperature and anion effects on frog muscle titration curves.
20	temperature change the basic variable in the early handling phenomenon	The basic parameter of the early-handling phenomenon is modified by temperature.
20	celsius versus centigrade the nomenclature of the temperature scale of science	Celsius versus Centigrade the Nomenclature of Lapos; Temperature Scale of Science.
20	cardiovascular responses of the chicken to seasonal and induced temperature changes	Cardiovascular responses of chickens to induced and seasonal body temperature changes.
20	retardation of division of three ciliates by intermittent and continuous ultraviolet radiations at different temperatures	Division of three ciliates is retarded by intermittent, continuous ultraviolet radiation at different temperatures.
20	temperature and lambda phage reproduction	Temperature and reproduction of the phage lambda.
20	temperature and the reproduction of lambda phage mutants	Temperature and Reproduction of Lambda Phage Mutants.
20	effect of temperature on the potential and current thresholds of axon membrane	Effect of Temperature on Potential and Present Axonal Membrane Thresholds.
20	temperature effects on day old drosophila pupae	One day, temperature affects the pupae of fruit flies.
20	actinomycin d suppression of recovery in x irradiated mammalian cells	Recovery Suppression Actinomycin in Irradiated Mammalian Cells x.
20	influence of moderate temperature on growth and malic dehydrogenase activity of a marine psychrophile	In addition, there are a number of factors that influence the growth and development of the species.
20	effect of environmental temperatures on infection with mycobacterium marinum balnei of mice and a number of poikilothermic species	Effect of ambient temperatures on apo; Mycobacterium marinum balnei infection of mice and dapos; a number of apo; poikilothermic species.
20	temperature sensitive dextransucrase synthesis by a lactobacillus	Temperature-sensitive lactobacillus dextransucrase synthesis.
20	temperature sensitive hydrogenase and hydrogenase synthesis in a psychrophilic bacterium	It is not possible to predict the effects of a drug on the human body.
20	airborne microorganisms in broiler processing plants	Micro-@-@ airborne organisms at broiler chicken processing plants.
20	production of penicillin acylase	Penicillin Acylase Production.
20	survival of shigella in sewage ii effect of glycerol on shigella flexneri and shigella bacteriophage	Shigella survival in wastewater ii glycerol effect on shigella flexneri and bacteriophage shigella.
20	response of clostridium perfringens spores and vegetative cells to temperature variation	Response of spores and vegetative clostridium perfringens cells to temperature.
20	characteristics of infectious pancreatic necrosis virus	Characteristics of the Infectious Pancreatic Necrosis (IPN) Virus.
20	temperature dependence of anesthesia in goldfish	Goldfish temperature-dependent anesthesia.
20	multiplication and therapy of toxoplasma gondii in tissue culture	Propagation and treatment of gondii toxoplasma in tissue cultures.
20	metabolism of mevalonic acid by lactobacillus plantarum	L&apos Metabolism; Mevalonic Acid by Lactobacillus plantarum.
20	effect of salinity and temperature on coccidioides immitis and three antagonistic soil saprophytes	Salinity and temperature effects on coccidioides immitis and three soil antagonistic saprophytes.
20	effect of the temperature of growth of escherichia coli on the formation of beta galactosidase	Effect of growth temperature on beta galactosidase formation.
20	continuous in vitro cultivation of spherules of coccidioides immitis	In vitro continuous culture of coccidioid immitis spherules.
20	selective destruction by pseudomonas aeruginosa of common antigen of enterobacteriaceae	Pseudomonas aeruginosa selective destruction of the common enterobacterial antigen.
20	attachment and growth of bacteria on surfaces of continuous culture vessels	L' attachment and bacterial growth on vascular continuous culture surfaces.
20	temperature dependence of the activity of the antitumor factor in the common clam	Soft shell clam anti-tumour factor activity is temperature dependent.
20	the effect of temperature on the formation of t1 and t2r bacteriophage	L' temperature effect on bacteriophage formation t1 and t2r.
20	optimal conditions for the transformation of streptococci	Optimum streptococcal transformation conditions.
20	on the mechanism of some temperature effects on drosophila	Drosophila is a species of flowering plant in the United States.
20	purification and activity of proteinase of streptococcus faecalis var liquefaciens	Proteinase activity from Streptococcus faecalis var liquefaciens.
20	isolation of toxigenic strains of clostridium perfringens from soil	Isolate toxigenic clostridium perfringens strains from soil.
20	growth characteristics of the blue green algal virus lpp 1	Health Canada, Public Health Agency of Canada.
20	some effects of carbon source aeration and temperature on growth of a psychrophilic strain of pseudomonas fluorescens	Some effects of aeration and carbon source temperature on the growth of a psychrophilic pseudomonas fluorescens.
20	thermally induced genital appendages on mosquitoes	Heat-induced mosquito genital appendages.
20	an electron microscope examination of urinary mucoprotein and its interaction with influenza virus	Urinary mucoprotein and its interaction with the influenza virus is examined by electron microscopy.
20	interrelationship between temperature and sodium chloride on growth of lactic acid bacteria isolated from meat curing brines	Relationship between temperature and sodium chloride on the growth of isolated lactic acid bacteria from healing meats brine.
20	characterization of enterococcus bacteriophages from the small intestine of the rat	Bacteriophage characterization; enterococci; rat small intestine.
20	repression of staphylococcus aureus by food bacteria i effect of environmental factors on inhibition	Dietary bacteria repress staphylococcus aureus, which is a fungus of the digestive system.
20	cell free amino acid incorporating system from pseudomonas indigofera	A cell-free amino acid system incorporating the pseudomonas indigofera system.
20	studies on the mechanisms of hypersensitivity phenomena ix histamine release from human leukocytes by ragweed pollen antigen	Studies of the mechanisms of the phenomena of drought; hypersensitivity to the release of oysters; histamine from human leukocytes from oysters; pollen antigen from lice; lice herb.
20	drug resistance of enteric bacteria v high frequency of transduction of r factors with bacteriophage epsilon	Drug Resistance of Enteric Bacteria v High Frequency Transduction Factors r with the bacteriophage epsilon.
20	temperature optimum of mycobacterium leprae in mice	Optimum leprae mycobacterial temperature in mice.
20	stimulation of the salt receptor of the blowfly ii temperature	Stimulation of Fly Salt Receptor ii temperature.
20	environmental temperature and choline requirement in rats i choline deficiency in rats at various temperatures	Choline-deficient rats, choline-deficient rats, choline-deficient rats, choline-deficient rats at various temperatures.
20	environmental temperature and choline requirements in rats ii choline and methionine requirements for lipotropic activity	In rats, both choline and methionine are required for lipotropic activity, as well as for ambient temperature and choline requirements.
20	further study of factors affecting amino acid incorporation into protein by isolated mitochondria	Further study of the factors affecting the incorporation of amino acids into proteins by isolated mitochondria.
20	stress and the toxicity of venoms	Stress and venom toxicity are stressors and contributors to toxicity.
20	factors in lysis and lysis inhibition by lambda bacteriophage	The bacteriophage is a bacteriophage, which is a bacteriophage and a bacteriophage that is a bacteriophage.
20	kinetics of bacteriophage lambda deoxyribonucleic acid infection of escherichia coli	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of bacteria, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
20	temperature and frog eggs a reconsideration of metabolic control	Temperature and eggs of frogs a re-examination of the metabolic control.
20	zone centrifugation in a cesium chloride density gradient caused by temperature change	It is not possible to determine the density of caesium chloride in the region.
20	arginine metabolism in halobacterium salinarium an obligately halophilic bacterium	Inhalophilic bacterium, an obligate halophilic bacterium.
20	interactions of human cytomegalovirus with human fibroblasts	Human fibroblast interaction of the human cytomegalovirus.
20	antiviral action of mouse interferon in heterologous cells	Antiviral action of l' mouse interferon in the heterologous cells.
20	effect of temperature on the rate of germination in bacillus cereus	Temperature effect on germination rate of bacillus cereus.
20	histochemical studies on the uptake of horseradish peroxidase by rat kidney slices	Moose histochemical studies; horseradish peroxidase absorption by kidney slices.
20	biological rhythms a new type in strains of a mutant of neurospora crassa	Biological rhythms of apos; a new type of strain; a neurospora crassa mutant.
20	hela cells effects of temperature on the life cycle	Effects of temperature on helical cell life cycle.
20	the oxygen equilibrium of mammalian hemoglobin some old and new physicochemical studies	L' cell balance; oxygen in cell walls; mammalian hemoglobin, some physico studies-old and new chemicals.
20	sequential gene action in the establishment of lysogeny	Sequential Gene Action in the Initiation of Lysogenesis.
20	induction and properties of a temperature bacteriophage from bacillus stearothermophilus	Thermal bacteriophage of stearothermophilic bacillus.
20	photodynamic inactivation of enteroviruses	Enterovirus photodynamic inactivation.
20	effect of cholesterol on the sensitivity of mycoplasma laidlawii to the polyene antibiotic filipin	Effect of cholesterol on sensitivity of laidlawii mycoplasma to polyene filipin antibiotic.
20	temperature coefficients of the electrical thresholds of taste sensations	Electrical thresholds for taste sensation are temperature coefficients.
20	agrobacterium tumefaciens thermal inactivation of tumor inducing ability	To induce tumors; to induce tumors.
20	thermal migration in biological transport	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid base composition of some members of the micrococcaceae	Deoxyribonucleic acid composition of bases of some micrococcaceae.
20	alterations in host specificity of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid after an increase in growth temperature of pseudomonas aeruginosa	Changes in bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid host specificity following an increase in pseudomonas aeruginosa growth temperature.
20	polysaccharide depolymerase associated with bacteriophage infection	Bacteriopagic infection; bacteriopagic infection.
20	storage stability of clostridium botulinum toxin and spores in processed cheese	In addition, it is recommended that the product be stored in the same manner as the original product.
20	injury and growth of serratia marcescens studied in a thermal gradient incubator	The lesions and growth of serratia marcescens were studied in an incubator with a thermal gradient.
20	basis for the exclusion of escherichia coli from the rumen ecosystem	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
20	spectral studies of a chlorophyll pigment with fluorescence maximum at 698 mu	Apos spectral studies; chlorophyll pigment with maximum 698 mu fluorescence.
20	fluorescence quantum yield measurements vitamin b6 compounds	The quantum yield of the fluorescence measures the compounds of vitamin b6.
20	sterols and temperature tolerance in the fungus pythium	Sterols and tolerance to temperature in pythium fungus.
20	host parasite relationship of bulinus truncatus and schistosoma haematobium in iran 3 effect of water temperature on the ability of miracidia to infect snails	The effect of apo temperature; water on apo mosaic capacity; snail infection by apos; effect of apo temperature; water on the parasite relationship-bulinus truncatus host and apos; schistosoma hematobium in Iran.
20	temperature independence of an arbitrary temporal discrimination in the goldfish	Temperature Independence D' Arbitrary Temporal Discrimination in Goldfish.
20	an inducible system for the hydrolysis and transport of beta glucosides in yeast i characteristics of the beta glucosidase activity of intact and of lysed cells	Inducible system for yeast beta-glucoside hydrolysis and transport; characteristic yeast beta activity-glucosidase of intact and lysed cells.
20	structure of the red fluorescence band in chloroplasts	Structure of chloroplast fluorescence red band.
20	clostridium perfringens in meat and meat products	Clostridium perfringens in Meat and Meat Products.
20	influence of temperature on bacterial infection of the hen s egg	Temperature influence on hen's egg; bacterial infection.
20	differential inhibitory effects of actinomycin d among strains of poliovirus	Differential inhibitory effects of poliovirus strains; actinomycin d.
20	replication of mengovirus ii general properties of the viral induced ribonucleic acid polymerase	Mengovirus replication ii General properties of virus-induced viral ribonucleic acid polymerase.
20	model for the mechanism controlling the expression of competent state in pneumococcus cultures	Model for apo control mechanism; apo expression; competent condition in pneumococcal cultures.
20	effect of 3 percent hydrogen peroxide on the viability of serratia marcescens	Effect of peroxide on Serratia marcescens viability.
20	antileptospiral activity of serum i normal and immune serum	Anti-leptospiral activity in normal serum and in immune serum.
20	induction of cellular morphogenesis in myxococcus xanthus i general description	Induction of cell-mediated morphogenesis in xanthus myxococcus i.
20	filament formation in clostridium acidiurici under conditions of elevated temperatures	Filament formation under high temperature conditions in Clostridium acidiurici.
20	effects of high incubation temperature upon the cell wall of escherichia coli	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
20	uptake of griseofulvin by the sensitive dermatophyte microsporum gypseum	L' griseofulvin uptake by the sensitive microsporum gypseum dermatophyte.
20	genetic transformation of neisseria gonorrhoeae to streptomycin resistance	Genetic conversion of Neisseria gonorrhoeae to streptomycin.
20	factors affecting the development of clostridium botulinum in whole milk	Factors Affecting Development of Clostridium botulinum in Whole Milk.
20	effect of temperature of liquid nitrogen on radiation resistance of spores of clostridium botulinum	Effect of temperature; liquid nitrogen on Clostridium botulinum spore radiation resistance.
20	application of polarizing microscopy to medical mycology	Polarizing Microscopy Application to Medical Mycology.
20	rapid technique for the enumeration of clostridium perfingens	Clostridium perfingens counting technique.
20	relative stability of pertussis vaccine preserved with merthiolate benzethonium chloride or the parabens	Relative stability of preserved pertussis vaccine with benzethonium merthiolate chloride or parabens.
20	rapid methods of staining bacterial spores at room temperature	Rapid bacterial spore staining methods at room temperature.
20	wind as an aversive stimulus	I mean, the wind is like an aversive stimulus.
20	conversion of d biotin to biotin vitamers by lactobacillus arabinosus	Lactobacillus arabinosus conversion of biotin d into biotin vitamins.
20	effects of temperature on growth rate of cultured mammalian cells l5178y	Effects of temperature on the growth rate of mammalian cells in l5178y cultured mammals.
20	physical studies of phospholipids 3 electron microscope studies of some pure fully saturated 2 3 diacyl dl phosphatidyl ethanolamines and phosphatidyl cholines	Phospholipid physical studies 3 electron microscopic studies of diacyl dl ethanolamines and phosphatidyl cholines completely saturated 2 diacyl dl.
20	characteristics of the photoreactivation of pseudorabies virus	Pseudorabies virus photoreactivation characteristics.
20	elevated temperature technique for the isolation of salmonella from streams	Elevated temperature technology for salmonella isolation from streams; water.
20	effects of additives on the survival of lactic streptococci in frozen storage	Effects of additives on lactic acid streptococcal survival in frozen storage.
20	improved motility medium	Medium-highest motility.
20	some interactions between human platelets and glass von willebrand s disease compared with normal	Some human platelet interactions with Glass von willebrand disease compared to normal.
20	flagella of salmonella typhimurium spheroplasts	Salmonella typhimurium spheroplast flagella.
20	the inhibition of caeruloplasmin by azide	Caeruloplasmin inhibition by azide.
20	kinetic studies on the destructive action of oxygen on lyophilized serratia marcescens	In addition, a number of studies have been carried out to investigate the effects of ozone depletion on air quality.
20	oxidation of secondary alcohols by extracts of a corynebacterium	D'Oxydation d'Oxydation d'Oxydation d'Oxydation d'Oxos; alcohols secondaires par extracts de corynebacterium.
20	preparation and properties of a vi antigen degrading enzyme	An enzyme that degrades the proteins; an enzyme that degrades the viral antigen.
20	nonphotoreactivating repair of ultraviolet light damaged micrococcus lysodeikticus cells	Micrococcus lysodeikticus was damaged by nonphotoreactive repair of lysodeikticus cells damaged by ultraviolet light.
20	induced rapid release and uptake of phosphate by microorganisms	Rapid phosphate release and phosphate uptake by microorganisms were induced.
20	lethal action of ribonuclease for thermophilic bacilli	L' ribonuclease lethal action on thermophilic bacilli.
20	the immunologic character of acquired inhibitors of antihemophilic globulin factor 8 and the kinetics of their interaction with factor 8	The immunological character of 8-fold acquired antihemophilic globulin inhibitors and their interaction kinetics.
20	formation of bacterial flagella i demonstration of a functional flagellin pool in spirillum serpens and bacillus subtilis	Bacterial flagella formation demonstrated the presence of a functional pool of flagellin in both spirillum serpens and bacillus subtilis.
20	temperature measurements from oxygen isotope ratios of fish otoliths	The amount of oxygen in the body of the fish, which is the amount of oxygen in the body of the fish.
20	effect of sodium chloride and ph on the outgrowth of spores of type e clostridium botulinum at optimal and suboptimal temperatures	Effect of sodium chloride and ph-chloride on growth of eclostridium botulinum spores at optimum temperatures and under optimum-conditions.
20	purification and properties of penicillin amidase from bacillus megaterium	Megaterium penicillin amidase purification and properties.
20	effect of temperature on the intracellular growth of histoplasma capsulatum	Effect of Temperature on Intracellular Growth of Histoplasma capsulatum.
20	aflatoxin b 1 uptake by flavobacterium aurantiacum and resulting toxic effects	The results of this study are summarized in Appendix A. The results of this study are summarized below.
20	factors influencing the photodynamic action of benzo a pyrene on escherichia coli	Factors Influencing Ecosystems; Photodynamic Action of Benzo a Pyrene on Ecosystems; Escherichia coli.
20	permanent stained agar preparation of mycoplasma and of l forms of bacteria	Mycoplasma and l-form bacteria prepared in permanently stained agar.
20	platinum induced filamentous growth in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli showed filamentous growth induced by platinum.
20	the ultrastructural route of fluid transport in rabbit gall bladder	The rabbit gallbladder fluid transport ultrastructural pathway.
20	survival of bacteria on metal surfaces	Survival of metal-surface bacteria.
20	hydroxyapatite fractionation procedures in the study of the mammalian genome	Methods of Moose Fractionation; Hydroxyapatite in Moose; Mammalian Genome Studies.
20	effect of temperature and relative humidity on survival of airborne columbia sk group viruses	The effect of temperature and temperature; relative humidity on the survival of viruses in the airborne columbia sk group.
20	influence of food microorganisms on staphylococcal growth and enterotoxin production in meat	Effect of foodborne microorganisms on the growth of staphylococci and on the production of enterotoxins in meat.
20	long term storage of bacteriophages of lactic streptococci	Long-term bacteriophage storage of streptococci.
20	liquid nitrogen preservation of saccharomyces carlsbergensis and its use in a rapid biological assay of vitamin b6 pyridoxine	In addition, it is recommended that the vitamin B6 pyridoxine be used in a rapid bioassay.
20	a melting point for the birefringent component of muscle	A melting point for the muscle birefringent component.
20	new high temperature chiorella	New high-temperature chiorella.
20	low temperature partial alcoholysis of triglycerides	Partial triglyceride alcoholysis at low temperature.
20	phase equilibria and structure of dry and hydrated egg lecithin	Phase equilibria and lecithin structure; dry, hydrated egg.
20	forces involved in chylomicron binding by isolated cells of rat liver	Forces involved in the binding of chylomicrons by isolated cells from rat liver.
20	isolation of psychrophilic species of bacillus	Isolating psychrophilic bacillus species.
20	pasteurella pestis growth temperature virulence and the graded response	Pasteurella pestis growth-temperature virulence and graded response.
20	method of temperature gradient incubation and its application to microbiological examinations	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
20	temperature dependent anomalies in the growth of microorganims	Temperature-dependent abnormalities in microbial growth-organisms.
20	yaba tumor poxvirus synthesis in vitro ii adsorption inactivation and assay studies	Poxviruses can be used as an anti-infective agent in the treatment of viral infections.
20	the effects of adenosine triphosphate and related compounds on some hydrodynamic properties of glycerinated cilia	Effects of l&apos, adenosine triphosphate, and related compounds on certain hydrodynamic properties of glycerin cilia.
20	the origin of the early receptor potential of the retina	L' origin of early retinal receptor potential.
20	host parasite relationships in experimental airborne tuberculosis ii reproducible infection by means of an inoculum preserved at 70 c	Parasitic relationship with host in experimental aerial tuberculosis ii replicable infection with 70 c stored inoculum.
20	induction of penicillinase with inorganic phosphate	Inorganic phosphate induced penicillinase.
20	regulation of amino acid transport across intestines of goldfish acclimatized to different environmental temperatures	The regulation of the transport of amino acids in the intestines of goldfish acclimated to different environmental temperatures.
20	a thermal component of excitation in the lateral eye of limulus	Thermal component of apos; excitation in apos; lateral limulus eye.
20	characterization and stability of ribosomes from mesophilic and thermophilic bacteria	Mesophilic and thermophilic bacteria ribosome characterization and stability.
20	response of intracellular proteolysis to alteration of bacterial protein and the implications in metabolic regulation	Intracellular proteolysis response to bacterial protein damage and implications for metabolic regulation.
20	measurement of binding of chloramphenicol by intact cells	Measurement of intact cell chloramphenicol binding.
20	synergistic effects in sonochemical sterilization	Synergistic Effects of Sonochemical Sterilization.
20	cell motility by labile association of molecules the nature of mitotic spindle fibers and their role in chromosome movement	The motility of the cells by the labile association of molecules, the nature of the mitotic spindle fibers, and their role in the movement of the chromosomes.
20	tryptophan transport in neurospora crassa i specificity and kinetics	A study of the molecular structure of the neurotransmitter, Neurospora crassa.
20	activation heat in frog sartorius muscle	Frog's heater activates in frog's designer muscle.
20	pyrimidine dimers effect of temperature on photoinduction	Temperature dependence of photoinduction by pyrimidine dimers.
20	factors influencing contraction and catch in mytilus smooth muscle	Factors influencing mytilus muscle contraction and uptake in smooth muscle.
20	synthesis of macromolecules by escherichia coli near the minimal temperature for growth	Escherichia coli macromolecule synthesis near minimum growth temperature.
20	differentiation of pathogenic and saprophytic letospires i growth at low temperatures	Differentiation of Letospires i pathogens and saprophytes increased at low temperatures.
20	sporicidal activity of peracetic acid and beta propiolactone at subzero temperatures	Sporicidal activity of l&apos, peracetic acid, and beta propiolactone, at subzero temperatures.
20	protein and nucleic acid synthesis in escherichia coli pressure and temperature effects	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
20	quantitative studies on fabrics as disseminators of viruses ii persistence of poliomyelitis virus on cotton and wool fabrics	Quantitative studies of tissues as diffusers of virus ii persistence of the polio virus in tissues of cotton and wool.
20	effect of time and temperature in assessing microbial contamination on flat surfaces	The effects of the weather and temperature in the environment; the effects of microbial contamination on the planar surfaces.
20	influence of salts on foot and mouth disease virus	Salt influence on foot-and-mouth virus.
20	survival and recovery of enterovirus from foods	It can be used as a food aid or as a food aid.
20	microorganisms of the upper atmosphere 3 relationship between altitude and micropopulation	The relationship between altitude and the micropopulation.
20	effect of lactic acid bacteria on growth of staphylococcus aureus	Effect of Lactic Bacteria on Growth of Staphylococcus aureus.
20	modified agglutination test for pasteurella tularensis	D&apos test; agglutination modified for the use of pasteurella tularensis.
20	rapid quantitative serological assay of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	Rapid Quantitative Serologic Testing of Staphylococcus enterotoxin b.
20	post mortem glycolysis in ox skeletal muscle effect of temperature on the concentrations of glycolytic intermediates and cofactors	Postmortem glycolysis in bovine skeletal muscle affects the concentrations of cofactors and glycolytic intermediates.
20	studies of chloroplast development in euglena xiv sequential interactions of ultraviolet light and photoreactivating light in green colony formation	Chloroplast development studies in euglena xiv, ultraviolet and photoreactive light sequential interactions in green colony formation.
20	environmental factors influencing the hyperfine structure of manganous low temperature electron paramagnetic resonance spectra	Environmental factors influencing hyperfine structure of manganese electron spin resonance spectra at low temperature.
20	survival of urinary leucocytes	Urinary leukocyte survival.
20	the cytotoxic principle of the phytoflagellate prymnesium parvum	Phytoflagellate prymnesium parvum cytotoxic principle.
20	oxygen solubility in sea water thermodynamic influence of sea salt	The results of this study are summarized in the following table: pH, pH, pH, pH, and temperature.
20	temperature characteristics of excitation in space clamped squid axons	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
20	severe impairment of heat induced saliva spreading in rats recovered from lateral hypothalamic lesions	A severe alteration of the heat-induced diffusion of saliva in recovered rats from lateral hypothalamic lesions.
20	studies on the permeability of calf thymus nuclei isolated in sucrose	Permeability studies of sucrose-isolated calf thymus nuclei.
20	acropetal movement of auxin dependence on temperature	Acropetal temperature-dependent auxin movement.
20	glycogen metabolism in novikoff ascites hepatoma cells	Glycogen metabolism in cells of the liver; hepatoma of the ascites novikoff.
20	some conditions affecting the intracellular arrangement and concentration of tobacco mosaic virus particles in local lesions	Some conditions affect the intracellular arrangement and the concentration of viral particles from the tobacco mosaic in the local lesions.
20	coliform behavior in frozen foods i rapid test for the recovery of escherichia coli from frozen foods	For example, if the product has been found to be contaminated with chlorinated organic compounds, it may be contaminated with chlorinated organic compounds.
20	thermal inactivation of type e botulinum toxin	Thermal Inactivation of Botulinum-like Toxin.
20	survival of microorganisms in a simulated martian environment ii moisture and oxygen requirements for germination of bacillus cereus and bacillus subtilis var niger spores	Survival of microorganisms in a simulated Martian environment ii moisture and oxygen requirements for the germination of Bacillus cereus and Bacillus subtilis var. niger.
20	viral depuration of the northern quahaug	American clam virus depuration.
20	pilot plant production of protease by alternaria tenuissima	Protease production by Alternaria tenuissima pilot plant.
20	kinetics of the thermal inactivation of type e clostridium botulinum toxin	Thermal inactivation of botulinum clostridium toxin.
20	some aspects of thermal injury in escherichia coli	Some aspects of the thermal damage of the Escherichia coli.
20	release of inorganic phosphate from irradiated yeast radiation biodosimetry and evaluation of radioprotective compounds	Inorganic phosphate release from yeast irradiation bioassay and radioprotectant evaluation.
20	aflatoxins production of the toxins in vitro in relation to temperature	In vitro toxin production; toxin aflatoxins vs. temperature.
20	studies on amino acid decarboxylases in escherichia coli	Amino acid decarboxylase studies in Escherichia coli.
20	binding of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides to diphtheria toxin	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides bind diphtheria toxin.
20	enzymic glucosylation of phenols	Enzymic phenol glucosylation.
20	the equilibrium constants of the glutamate dehydrogenase systems	D&apos constants; equilibrium of systems of glutamate dehydrogenase.
20	citrate and the conversion of carbohydrate into fat the regulation of fatty acid synthesis by rat liver extracts	Citrate and conversion of carbohydrate to fat regulates the synthesis of fatty acids by rat liver extracts.
20	effect of thrombin on the radioactive nucleotides of human washed platelets	Effect of Thrombin on Radioactive Nucleotides of Washed Human Platelets.
20	the effect of temperature and anoxia of rat kidney slices on their subsequent respiration	The effects of temperature and kidney slices anoxia on subsequent respiration.
20	the effect of temperature and anoxia of kidney on the subsequent oxidative phosphorylation of mitochondria	The effects of temperature and renal anoxia on the subsequent mitochondrial oxidative phosphorylation process.
20	temperature compensation in short duration time measurement by an intertidal amphipod	Temperature compensation by short-term intertidal amphipod time measurement.
20	leaf temperatures of desert plants	Desert plant leaf temperature.
20	oxygen isotope analysis of recent tropical pacific benthonic foraminifera	In addition, there is a large amount of organic matter in the marine environment.
20	continuous production of clostridium tetani toxin	Continuous production of Clostridium tetani-toxin.
20	antigenic modulation loss of tl antigen from cells exposed to tl antibody study of the phenomenon in vitro	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but it is important to note that there is evidence to support this claim.
20	an examination of the effects of osmotic pressure changes upon transmitter release from mammalian motor nerve terminals	Examination of the effects of changes in osmotic pressure on the release of transmitters from the motor nerve terminals of mammals.
20	salinity effect on the maximal growth temperature of some bacteria isolated from marine enviroments	Effect of salinity on the maximum temperature of growth of certain marine-derived bacteria.
20	formation of filaments and synthesis of macromolecules at temperatures below the minimum for growth of escherichia coli	In addition, there is a need to develop new techniques for the detection, detection, detection, and characterization of bacterial pathogens.
20	reduction of ribonuclease by glutathione at elevated temperatures the molecular mechanism	Glutathione at high temperatures reduces ribonuclease the molecular mechanism.
20	the influence of ph and temperature on the properties of myosin	L' pH and temperature influence on myosin properties.
20	instrumental assay of microbial lipase at constant ph	Microbial ph constant lipase assay.
20	culture aeration in a polythermostat	Polythermostat aerating cultures.
20	effect of various gas atmospheres on destruction of microorganisms in dry heat	Effect of various atmospheres of gas on the destruction of micro-@ organisms in the dry heat.
20	influence of platen temperatures and relative humidity during storage on the survival of freeze dried salmonella typhimurium	Effect of temperature on survival of lyophilized Salmonella typhimurium; relative humidity during storage.
20	lactobacilli in ensiled high moisture corn	Lactobacilli in high-humidity silage corn.
20	factors affecting the resistance of staphylococcus aureus to hydrogen peroxide treatments in milk	Factors affecting staphylococcus aureus resistance to peroxide d' hydrogen in milk.
20	enzyme substrate reactions in very high magnetic fields i	Reactions of Enzyme Substrates in Very High Magnetic Fields i.
20	enzyme substrate reactions in very high magnetic fields ii	Reactions of Enzyme Substrates in Very High Magnetic Fields ii.
20	changes in intensity and spectral distribution of fluorescence effect of light treatment on normal and dcmu poisoned anacystis nidulans	It is not possible to determine the effect of the light treatment on the normal and poisoned anacystis nidulans; it is not possible to determine the effect of the light treatment.
20	the relation between spontaneous activity metabolic rate and the 24 hour cycle in mice at different environmental temperatures	The relationship between the metabolic rate of spontaneously active mice and the 24-hour cycle at different ambient temperatures.
20	absorption of hemoglobin iron the role of a heme splitting substance in the intestinal mucosa	It is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim, but there is evidence to support this claim.
20	fate of free amino acids and nucleotides in spoiling beef	The fate of free amino acids and the fate of nucleotides in rotten beef.
20	behavior of the no beta d glucosiduronic acid of n acetyl n phenylhydroxylamine as a substrate for beta glucuronidase	Behaviour of l' acid n-beta-glucuronidase substrate n-acetyl n-phenylhydroxylamine.
20	phosphate uptake in an obligately marine fungus ii role of culture conditions energy sources and inhibitors	It is important to note that the use of phosphate as a food additive is not a substitute for the use of phosphate.
20	effect of abrupt temperature shift on the growth of mesophilic and psychrophilic yeasts	Apos effect; a sudden change in temperature on mesophilic and psychrophilic yeast growth.
20	effect of ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid tris hydroxymethyl aminomethane on release of the acid soluble nucleotide pool and on breakdown of ribosomal ribonucleic acid in escherichia coli	Effect of apos; ethylenediaminetetraacetic acid trishydroxymethylaminomethane on the release of the apo-soluble nucleotide pool; acid and apo degradation; and escherichia coli ribosomal ribonucleic acid.
20	onset of and recovery from diving bradycardia in ducks	Diving bradycardia begins and re-establishes in ducks.
20	effect of incubation temperature and serum content in agar overlay on plaque production by foot and mouth disease virus	Effect of temperature; incubation and serum content of agar on foot-and-mouth virus plaque production.
20	the redox state of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotides in rat liver homogenates	L' nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide redox state in rat liver homogenates.
20	a spectrophotometric study of the denaturation of deoxyribonucleic acid in the presence of urea or formaldehyde and its relevance to the secondary structure of single stranded polynucleotides	Spectrophotometric study of deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) denaturation in the presence of urea or formaldehyde and its importance in the secondary structure of mononuclear polynucleotides.
20	studies on the role of polyamines associated with the ribosomes from bacillus stearothermophilus	Studies of the role of ribosomal-associated polyamines of the stearothermophilus bacillus.
20	measurement of growth hormone released by ox anterior pituitary slices in vitro	In vitro measurement of apos; growth hormone released from bovine slices; anterior bovine pituitary gland.
20	fluorimetric determination of d amino acid oxidase	Amino acid oxidase.
20	a study of the hydrolysis of unfractionated reticulocyte ribosomal ribonucleic acid by pancreatic ribonuclease and its relevance to secondary structure	A study of the reticulocyte ribonucleic acid reticulocyte ribonucleic acid hydrolysis and its relationship to secondary structure.
20	reactivities of actin as a contractile protein	Apos reactivity; actin as contractile protein.
20	applied studies on the viability of el tor vibrios	Applied viability studies; torque torque torque torque torque torque torque tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor torque tor tor tor tor tor torque tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor torque tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor tor
20	thermal stimulation of hypothalamic neurones in unanaesthetized rabbits	Hypothalamic neuron thermal stimulation in unanesthetized rabbits.
20	effect of temperature of aldehyde fixation on the radioautographic localization of ribonucleoprotein in nucleoli of hela cells inhibition by puromycin and actinomycin d	Effect of temperature of fixation of apos; aldehyde on radioautographic localization of ribonucleoprotein in apos nucleoli; puromycin and apos inhibition of helical cells; actinomycin d.
20	effect of some proteins on the yeast cell membrane	Effect of Certain Proteins on Yeast Cellular Membrane.
20	comparison of the alpha amylase of bacillus subtilis and bacillus amyloliquefaciens	Comparison of alpha-amylase of subtilis bacillus and amyloliquefaciens bacillus.
20	proteinase enzyme system of lactic streptococci ii role of membrane proteinase in cellular function	Lactic Streptococci Protein Enzymatic System ii Role of Membrane Proteinase in Cell Function.
20	the effects of soaking the skin in water at various temperatures on the subsequent ability to sweat	The effects of the skin on the ability of the body to sweat at different temperatures.
20	the renewal of photoreceptor cell outer segments	Outer-segment turnover of photoreceptor cells.
20	purification and properties of lysozyme produced by staphylococcus aureus	Purification and the properties of staphylococcus aureus lysozyme.
20	the surface coat of chylomicrons lipid chemistry	Surface layer of chylomicron lipid chemistry.
20	temperature effects on pacemaker generation membrane potential and critical firing threshold in aplysia neurons	The effects of temperature on the membrane potential of the pacemaker and the critical threshold of release in the neurons of aplysia.
20	characterization of purified staphylococcal lipase	Characterization of the purified, staphylococcal lipase.
20	effects of a high magnetic field at different osmotic pressures and temperatures on multiplication of saccharomyces cerevisiae	Effects of an intense magnetic field on saccharomyces cerevisia multiplication at different osmotic pressures and temperatures.
20	a study of the mechanism of quantal transmitter release at a chemical synapse	A study of the release mechanism of apos; a quantum transmitter at apos; and a chemical synapse.
20	multiple sensitivity of chordat typani fibres of the rat and hamster to gustatory and thermal stimuli	Multiple sensitivity of rat and hamster typani chordate fibers to thermal and gustatory stimuli.
20	growth of bacillus coagulans in chemically defined media	Bacillus coagulans growth in chemically defined media.
20	preliminary studies of some physiological properties of torula jeanselmei	Preliminary studies of certain physiological properties of the torula jeanselmei torula jeanselmei.
20	thermosensitive replication of a kanamycin resistance factor	It can be used as an adjunct to the body's immune system.
20	the electrical response of the planarian ocellus	It's the only way you can get the information you need.
20	infectivity destroying effect of humidity for dried coliphage t1	The apo destructive effect; the apo infectivity; moisture for dried t1 coliphage.
20	specificity of penicillin acylase of fusarium and of penicillium chrysogenum	Fusarium penicillin acylase and penicillium chrysogenum specificity.
20	the characterization of scintillons bioluminescent particles from the marine dinoflagellate gonyaulax polyedra	Characterization of bioluminescent scintillons of gonyaulax polyedra marine dinoflagellate.
20	spontaneous activity in isolated somata of aplysia pacemaker naurons	Spontaneous activity in the isolated somas of the aplysia nauronic pacemaker.
20	carbon dioxide exchange in cotton some anomalous fluctuations	Exchanging carbon dioxide in cotton fibers, some anomalous fluctuations.
20	decay of influenza a viruses of human and avian origin	Flu degeneration is a human- and avian-derived virus.
20	effect of prostaglandins e1 and e2 on intestinal motility in the guinea pig and rat	Effect of e1 and e2 prostaglandins on intestinal motility in guinea pig and rat.
20	cardiovascular response to localized heating of the anterior hypothalamus	Cardiovascular reaction to localized rewarming of the previous hypothalamus.
20	effect of tryptophan and selected analogues on body temperatur of endotoxin poisoned mice	Effect of tryptophan and some similar drugs on body temperature in tap-poisoned mice; endotoxin.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid homology in bacterial taxonomy effect of incubation temperature on reaction specificity	It is important to note that the results of this study are not consistent with those of other studies, but are consistent with those of other studies.
20	tiliqua scincoides temperature sensitive units in lizard brain	Tiliqua scincoides heat-sensitive units in brain lizard.
20	a comparison of the killing of cultured mammalian cells induced by decay of incorporated tritiated molecules at 196 degrees c	A comparison of cell destruction in cultured mammals induced by decomposition of tritiated molecules incorporated at 196 degrees c.
20	vacuum ultraviolet studies on the nature of the radiation inactivation of trypsin	Inactivation of trypsin by ionizing radiation; inactivation of trypsin by radiation.
20	thermal depolarization of fluorescence from polytene chromosomes stained with acridine orange	Thermal depolarization of apos-stained polytene fluorescence; orange acridine.
20	inactivation of microorganisms by electrohydraulic shock	Inactivation by electrohydraulic shock.
20	effect of cookery and holding on hams and turkey rolls contaminated with clostridium perfringens	Effect of cooking and handling on clostridium perfringens-contaminated turkey hams and rolls.
20	staphylococcal hyaluronate lyase purification and characterization studies	Studies of the purification and characterization of the staphylococcal hyaluronate lyase.
20	role of relative humidity in the survival of airborne mycoplasma pneumoniae	Relative humidity in airborne pneumonia mycoplasma survival.
20	proton magnetic resonance of transfer rna	Transfer rna proton magnetic resonance.
20	some effects of pco2 and ph on nerve tissue	Some of the effects of pco2 and ph-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p-p
20	use of capillary blood in measurement of arterial po2	Capillary blood is used to measure arterial po2.
20	the effect of calcium depletion upon the tension independent component of cardiac heat production	L' effect of calcium depletion on the voltage-independent component of the heart-heat production.
20	the catalase hydrogen peroxide system role of sub units in the thermal deactivation of bacterial catalase in the absence of substrate	The role of sub-units in the catalase hydrogen peroxide system in the thermal quenching of bacterial catalase activity in the absence of substrate.
20	the effect of season on testicular weight and spermatogenesis in turkeys	L' seasonal effect on turkey testicular weight and spermatogenesis.
20	sensitivity of an enrichment culture procedure for detection of clostridium botulinum type e in raw and smoked whitefish chubs	In the case of whitefish, the test should be carried out in accordance with the criteria set out in the laboratory report.
20	microbiological deterioration of frozen parfried potatoes upon holding after thawing	Microbiological deterioration of scented potatoes preserved after thawing.
20	assessment of aerosol stability of yellow fever virus by fluorescent cell counting	Yellow fever virus aerosol stability by fluorescent cell count.
20	influence of catalase activity on resistance of coagulase positive staphylococci to hydrogen peroxide	Catalase activity on coagulase-positive staphylococci to peroxide d' hydrogen.
20	timing of the auxin response in coleoptiles and its implications regarding auxin action	Chronology of coleoptile auxin reaction and its implications for apos; action of apos; auxin.
20	electrophysiological organization of the eye of aplysia	L'organisation electrophysiologique de l'apos; l'oeil de l'apos; l'aplysie.
20	sporicidal action of auto oxidized ascorbic acid for clostridium	L&apos sporicidal action; auto ascorbic acid-oxidized for clostridium.
20	preservation of influenza virus infectivity by lyophilization	It is not recommended that a person be vaccinated against the virus.
20	methodological study and a recommended technique for determining the euglobulin lysis time	Methodological and Technical Study Recommended to Determine Time of Lysis of Euglobulin.
20	denaturation and renaturation of viral ribonucleic acid i annealing r17 ribonucleic acid with denatured replicative form or with denatured replicative intermediate	Apos denaturation and renaturation; viral ribonucleic acid annealed; r17 rnucleic acid denaturing replicative or replicative intermediate denaturing.
20	activation of the ephippial egg of daphnia pulex	Ephippial Daphnia pulex Egg Activation.
20	the effect of hypertonic solution on the wet weight and contractions of rat uterus and vas deferens	Effect of hypertonic solution on rat wet weight and uterus and vas deferens contractions.
20	effects of meat curing salts and temperature on production of staphylococcal enterotoxin b	In addition, there are a number of other factors that may affect the quality of the product.
20	synthesis of protein and ribonucleic acid in a psychrophile at normal and restrictive growth temperatures	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of protein, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
20	esterase heterogeneity dynamics of a polymorphism	In addition, there are a number of genetic factors that influence the genetic makeup of the human body.
20	lecithin aerosols generated ultrasonically above 25 degrees c	Lecithin aerosols were generated by the ultrasonic process at-above 25 degrees c.
20	the relationship between caffeine contracture of intact muscle and the effect of caffeine on reticulum	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
20	the enzymatic nature of c 1r conversion of c 1s to c 1 esterase and digestion of amino acid esters by c 1r	The enzymatic nature of c1r conversion from c1s to c1 esterase and amino acid digestion per c1r.
20	separation of mono and diglycerides by gas liquid chromatography	Mono- and diglyceride separation by liquid chromatography.
20	the effect of temperature on catalytic and regulatory functions of pyruvate kinases of the rainbow trout and the antarctic fish trematomus bernacchii	Effect of temperature on the catalytic and regulatory functions of rainbow trout-and Antarctic trematomus bernacchii pyruvates kinases.
20	temperature sensitive steps in the biosynthesis of venezuelan equine encephalitis virus	In addition, there are a number of other risk factors that may be associated with the development of the virus.
20	control of bacteriophage induced enzyme synthesis in cells infected with a temperature sensitive mutant	Bacteriophage control induces enzyme synthesis in heat-sensitive mutant infected cells.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase catalyzing synthesis of double stranded arbovirus ribonucleic acid	Ribonucleic acid (RNA) is a polymerase chain reaction that catalyzes the synthesis of a double-stranded arbovirus, ribonucleic acid.
20	purification and properties of a thermophilic bacteriophage lytic enzyme	Purification and apos properties, a lytic enzyme of the thermophilic bacteriophage.
20	interference among group a arboviruses	Arbovirus group interference.
20	factors affecting the translocation of oxaloacetate and l malate into rat liver mitochondria	Factors Affecting Translocation of L. oxaloacetate and L. malate in Rat Liver Mitochondria.
20	interaction of salt ph and temperature on the growth and survival of salmonellae in ground pork	Interaction of ph salt and temperature on growth and salmonella survival in chopped swine.
20	lipase of mucor pusillus	Pusillus mucosal lipase.
20	effect of temperature on the coproduction of chlortetracycline and tetracycline by streptomyces aureofaciens	Effect of Temperature on Co-Production of Chlortetracycline and Tetracycline by Streptomyces aureofaciens.
20	rhinovirus plaque formation in wi 38 cells with methylcellulose overlay	Formation of rhinovirus plaques in the methylcellulose-coated wi- 38 cells.
20	mechanism of resistance to enteroviruses of some primate cells in tissue culture	Enterovirus resistance mechanisms in selected primate tissue culture cells.
20	replication of western equine encephalomyelitis virus i some chemical and physical characteristics of viral ribonucleic acid	Reproduction of the virus of the apos; equine encephalomyelitis of the apos; West i certain chemical and physical characteristics of the apos; viral ribonucleic acid.
20	the inhibitory effects in vitro of phenothiazines and other drugs on lipid peroxidation systems in rat liver microsomes and their relationship to the liver necrosis produced by carbon tetrachloride	In vitro inhibitory effects of phenothiazines and d' other drugs on rat liver microsomal lipid peroxidation systems and their relation to hepatic necrosis induced by carbon tetrachloride.
20	the relation between environmental temperature and oxygen consumption in the new born baby	The relationship between ambient temperature and the newborn's oxygen consumption.
20	evaporative water loss in the new born baby	Loss of d' water by evaporation at the new-born.
20	purification and properties of an amine dehydrogenase from pseudomonas am1 and its role in growth on methylamine	Purification and the properties of a pseudomonas am1 amine dehydrogenase product and its role in methylamine growth.
20	discrete conductance fluctuations in lipid bilayer protein membranes	Discrete changes in protein membrane conductance of lipid bilayers.
20	plasmolysis of escherichia coli b r with sucrose	Sucrose-induced plasmolysis of apos; escherichia coli.
20	sensitivity of pseudomonas aeruginosa to normal serum and to polymyxin	Pseudomonas aeruginosa is susceptible to both normal serum and polymyxin.
20	polynucleotide sequence relationships among members of enterobacteriaceae	Relationships among enterobacterial polynucleotide sequences.
20	total synthesis of acetate from co2 ii purification and properties of formyltetrahydrofolate synthetase from clostridium thermoaceticum	Total synthesis of l' acetate from co2 purification ii and formyltetrahydrofolate synthetase properties from thermoaceticum clostridium.
20	the effect of ambient temperature upon post natal changes in oxygen consumption of the guinea pig	It is important to note that the effects of ambient temperature on postnatal changes in the consumption of oxygen in the guinea pig.
20	evidence for separate monoglyceride hydrolase and triglyceride lipase in post heparin human plasma	Evidence of liver damage; existence of mono-glyceride hydrolase and mono-glyceride apo; a distinct triglyceride lipase in human plasma post-heparin.
20	intracellular transport of secretory proteins in the pancreatic exocrine cell iv metabolic requirements	Intracellular secretory protein transport in metabolic IV requirements of pancreatic exocrine cells.
20	purification and properties of alpha d mannosidase from jack bean meal	The process of purification and the properties of the alpha mannosidase of the flour of gray bean.
20	survival of aerobic and anaerobic bacteria in chicken meat during freeze dehydration rehydration and storage	The survival of bacteria, both aerobic and anaerobic, in the meat of chickens during rehydration by freeze-drying and storage.
20	effect of low frequency ultrasound and elevated temperatures on isolation of bacteria from raw milk	The effect of low-frequency ultrasound and high temperatures on the immune system; isolation of the bacteria from the raw milk.
20	low temperature absorption spectra of chlorophyll a in polar and nonpolar solvents	It can be used as a substrate for the production of chlorophylls, but not as a catalyst.
20	chemical states of bacterial spores dry heat resistance	Chemical status of heat-resistant bacterial spores.
20	effect of temperature on growth of salmonella in rehydrated skim milk from a food poisoning outbreak	Effect of Temperature on Growth of Salmonella in Skimmed Rehydrated Milk as a Result of Dapos; Foodborne Illness.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms properties of rainbow trout fructose diphosphatase	Temperature and regulation of the enzymatic activity in the poikilothermic properties of fructose diphosphatase of rainbow trout.
20	a comparison of the properties of the pyruvate kinases of the fat body and flight muscle of the adult male desert locust	Comparison of fat body and flying muscle pyruvate kinase properties in adult male locusts.
20	cytochromes of aquatic fungi	Aquatic mushroom cyochromes.
20	variation in the fine structure of a marine achromobacter and a marine pseudomonad grown under selected nutritional and temperature regimes	Variation in the fine structure of an achromobacterium marine and a pseudomonad marine cultivated under selected nutritional and thermal regimes.
20	characteristics of rna degradation in the erythroid cell	Characteristics of erythroid cell rna degradation.
20	microincineration electron microscopy and electron diffraction of calcium phosphate loaded mitochondria	Electron microscopy of calcium phosphate-loaded mitochondria by micro-@ incineration and electron diffraction.
20	temperature dependence of resistance at an electrotonic synapse	Temperature-dependent resistance to electrotonic synapse.
20	factors affecting the intracellular parasitic growth of bdellovibrio bacteriovorus developing within escherichia coli	Factors Affecting Intracellular Parasitic Growth of Developing Bdellovibrio bacteriovorus in Escherichia coli.
20	freezing tolerance in an adult insect	Adult insect freezing tolerance.
20	the chemistry of flavines and flavorproteins photoreduction of flavines by amino acids	Flavin chemistry and flavprotein amino acid photoreduction of flavin.
20	shear and the melting of dna an especially sensitive portion of the e coli genome	In addition, the genomes of E. coli and E. coli have been found to be genetically distinct from other genomes.
20	partial purification of the anti inflammatory factor s in inflammatory exudate	Partial purification of anti-inflammatory factors in l' exudate inflammatory.
20	replication and complementation of human adenoviruses and simian papovavirus at an elevated temperature	Human adenovirus and simian papovavirus replication and complementation at high temperature.
20	production of enterotoxin a in milk	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
20	production of phosphatase by aspergillus awamori var kawachii in a low phosphate medium	Phosphatase production by aspergillus awamori var. kawachii; aspergillus awamori var. kawachii in a low phosphate medium.
20	effect of diurnal temperature cycles on the production of aflatoxin	Effect of diurnal cycles of temperature on production.
20	a model of thyroxine metabolism based on the effects of environmental temperature	Thyroxine Metabolism Model Based on Effects of Environmental Temperature.
20	biochemical studies on adenovirus multiplication 13 synthesis of virus specific ribonucleic acid during infection with human adenovirus type 12	Biochemical Studies on the Synthesis, Multiplication, of Adenovirus 13, Dapos; Viral Specific Ribonucleic Acid during Apos; Apos Infection; Human Adenovirus Type 12.
20	inhibition of arbovirus protein synthesis by interferon	Inhibition of Arbovirus Protein Synthesis by Interferon.
20	electron microscopic study of the morphogenesis of vesicular stomatitis virus	Vesicular stomatitis virus morphogenesis was studied by electron microscopy.
20	histamine release by sodium chloroplatinate	Sodium chloroplatinate release; histamine.
20	inhibition of host cell protein and ribonucleic acid synthesis by newcastle disease virus	Inhibition of protein synthesis and of l' ribonucleic acid of the host cell by the Newcastle disease virus.
20	characteristics of bacteriophages attacking psychrophilic and mesophilic pseudomonads	Characteristics of bacteriophages that attack both mesophilic and psychrophilic pseudomonads.
20	structure and leukemogenic activity of a murine leukemia virus	The virus is a leukemic virus of the mosquito.
20	deterioration of cycloserine in the tropics	In the tropics, cycloserine is deteriorating.
20	pyruvate kinase variants of the alaskan king crab evidence for a temprature depenet iterconversion between two forms having distinct and adaptive kinetic properties	Variations of king crab pyruvate kinase from Alaska demonstrate the existence of apo, an iterconversion of temperature between two forms with distinct kinetic and adaptive properties.
20	bacteriophage release in a lysogenic strain of agrobacterium tumefaciens	Release of bacteriophages into agrobacterium tumefaciens lysogenic strain.
20	critical arginine residue for maintaining the bacteriophage tail structure	Bacteriophage is a bacteriophage characterized by the presence of arginine, which is essential to maintain the structure of the tail.
20	specific reduction of carboxyl groups in peptides and proteins by diborane	Specific reduction of the carboxyl groups in the peptides and proteins by diborane.
20	cellulolytic enzymes during morphogenesis in dictyostelium discoideum	Morphogenic cellulolytic enzymes in dictyostelium discoideum.
20	effects on growth and toxin production of exposure of spores of clostridium botulinum type f to sublethal doses of gamma irradiation	Growth and toxin production effects; exposure of Clostridium botulinum type f spores to sublethal doses; gamma irradiation.
20	effect of cold temperatures on the viability of chromobacterium violaceum	Effect of cold on chromobacterium violaceum viability.
20	significance of 12s toxin of clostridium botulinum type e	Importance of Clostridium botulinum toxin-12-s type e.
20	cell free amino acid incorporating systems from bacillus licheniformis and bacillus stearothermophilus 10	Bacteria that have been shown to be carcinogenic or to be carcinogenic.
20	warm water strain of leucothrix mucor	Hot water leukothrix mucor mucor strain.
20	recombination between a thermosensitive kanamycin resistance factor and a nonthermosensitive multiple drug resistant factor	KANAMYLICINE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-THERE-TOR.
20	the permeation of non electrolytes through the single barnacle muscle cell	Permeation of non-electrolytes across the leaf; unique muscle cell of the barnacle.
20	metabolism of adenosine 3 5 monophosphate by epithelial cells of the toad bladder	Toad bladder epithelial cell metabolism; adenosine 3,5 monophosphate.
20	effects of temperature agitation and donor strain on chromosome transfer in escherichia coli k 12	Effects of heat agitation and the donor strain on the chromosomal transfer of escherichia coli k.
20	the release of thyroxine from serum protein in the vessels of the liver	Thyroxine release from serum proteins in liver vessels.
20	light scattering and birefringence changes during activity in the electric organ of electrophorus electricus	Light scattering and birefringence change during apos; apos activity; electrical organ of the apos; electric electrophore.
20	a protein component of the cell surface of staphylococcus aureus	Protein component of staphylococcal cell surface.
20	studies of copper ion induced mitochondrial swelling in vitro	In vitro studies of phosphate-induced mitochondrial swelling.
20	studies on ferrochelatase the enzymic formation of haem in proplastids chloroplasts and plant mitochondria	Ferrochelatase, apos enzymatic formation, proplast chloroplast hematoma, and plant mitochondrial studies.
20	nucleoside triphosphate pools and the regulation of rna synthesis in e coli	Nucleoside triphosphate pools and regulation of e coli rna synthesis.
20	comparative hybridization of mitochondrial and cytoplasmic aminoacyl transfer rna with mitochondrial dna from rat liver	Comparison of apos; hybridization of transfer of apos; mitochondrial aminoacyl and cytoplasmic rn with apos; mitochondrial DNA of rat liver.
20	studies on collagenase from rheumatoid synovium in tissue culture	Collagenase studies of tissue cultured rheumatoid synovium.
20	replication of mengovirus in hela cells preinfected with nonreplicating poliovirus	Mengovirus replication in non-replicating poliovirus pre-infected helical cells.
20	enzymic degradation of heparin a sulphamidase and a sulphoesterase from flavobacterium heparinum	Enzyme Degradation of Sulphamidase Heparin and Sulfoesterase from Flavobacterium heparinum.
20	effects of division synchronizing hypoxic and hyperthermic shocks upon tetrahymena a respiration and intracellular atp concentration	Effects of division timing hypoxic and hyperthermic shock on tetrahymena, respiration, and intracellular atropine concentration.
20	direct bacterial count as a rapid freshness test for fish fillets	Direct bacterial count as rapid test of freshness for fish fillets.
20	survival of t3 coliphage in varied extracellular environments i viability of the coliphage during storage and in aerosols	Survival of t3 coliphage in various extracellular environments during storage and aerosol storage.
20	factors affecting the persistence of staphylococcus aureus on fabrics	Factors affecting staphylococcus aureus persistence on tissue.
20	growth stimulation of lactobacillus species by lactic streptococci	Streptococci stimulate growth of lactobacilli species.
20	effect of ph on growth and survival of three avian and one saprophytic mycoplasma species	Effect of ph on the growth and survival of three species of mycoplasma, avian and d' a saprophytic species.
20	a study of the effects of hydrostatic pressure on macromolecular synthesis in escherichia coli	A study of hydrostatic pressure effects on macromolecular synthesis in escherichia coli.
20	electron spin resonance signals in injured nerve	The resonant electron spin signals in the damaged nerve.
20	staphylococcal acid phosphatase preliminary physical and chemical characterization of the loosely bound enzyme	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed at the same time as the test.
20	physiological and biochemical changes in bacterial cells exposed to oxygen	In addition, there is a need for additional information to support the assessment of risk.
20	ribosome synthesis in rhodopseudomonas capsulata cells growing in continuous and intermittent light	Ribosome synthesis in Rhodopseudomonas capsulata grown under intermittent, continuous light.
20	thermal injury and recovery of streptococcus faecalis	Streptococci faecalis recovery and thermal lesion.
20	response of the mimeae to some physical and chemical agents	Response to certain chemical and physical agents.
20	growth and destruction of salmonella typhimurium in egg white foam products cooked by microwaves	Growth and destruction of Salmonella typhimurium in white pepper moss products; microwave-cooked eggs.
20	the equilibrium constant of the isocitrate dehydrogenase reaction	The results of this study are summarized below.
20	specificity and control of choline o sulfate transport in filamentous fungi	Specificity and control of the transport of choline o sulfate in filamentous fungi.
20	fate of recipient deoxyribonucleic acid during transformation in haemophilus influenzae	The fate of the receptor deoxyribonucleic acid (deoxyribonucleic acid) during transformation in the apos; haemophilus influenzae.
20	events occurring during the replication of bacteriophage t4 dna	Events During Replication of Bacteriophage t4 DNA.
20	solubilization of particulate proteins and nonelectrolytes by chaotropic agents	Particle protein and nonelectrolyte solubilization by chaotropic agents.
20	spin labeled transfer rna	Spin-transfer rna... tagged.
20	radical transformation in irradiated dna and its constituents	It can be used as a basis for the development of new products and processes.
20	permeability of a cell membrane junction dependence on energy metabolism	Cellular membrane junction permeability depends on energy metabolism.
20	stabilities of dried suspensions of influenza virus sealed in a vacuum or under different gases	Stabilization of virus dried suspensions; vacuum-sealed influenza or various gases.
20	effect of incubation temperature on t agglutination typing of streptococcus pyogenes	Incubation on typing by agglutination t of streptococcus pyogenes.
20	radiosensitivity of mammalian cells 3 effect of suboptimal growth temperatures on recovery from radiation induced division delay	Effect of mammalian cell radiosensitivity 3 growth temperatures-optimal on recovery from radiation-induced division delay.
20	production of thermostable alkaline proteases by thermophilic streptomyces	Thermophilic streptomyces produce heat-stable alkaline proteases.
20	interacting factors that influence long term storage of live pasteurella tularensis vaccine and rift valley fever virus	Factors influencing the disease; long-term storage of pasteurella tularensis live vaccine and Rift Valley fever.
20	delay of poliovirus plaque formation with use of fresh bovine serum in the growth medium of host cells	The results of the study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part I, in the Canada Gazette, Part II, Part I, and in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
20	foot and mouth disease virus stability of neutralizing antibody after freeze drying and air drying	FMD virus stability after freeze-drying and drying with air is recommended.
20	immunofluorescent detection of enterotoxin b in food and a culture medium	Acute and chronic toxicity studies are required to assess the effects of exposure to ethylene oxide.
20	changes in the patterns of synthesis of ribonucleic acid species in immature rat uterus in response to oestrdiol 17 beta	Changes in synthesis patterns of apos species; apos ribonucleic acid; immature rat uterus in response to apos; estradiol 17 beta.
20	experimental conditions affecting ribonucleic acid polymerase in isolated rat liver nuclei effect of nucleoside triphosphate concentration temperature ammonium sulphate and heparin	Experimental conditions affecting the apos; ribonucleic acid polymerase in isolated nuclei of rat liver, effect of the temperature of concentration of nucleoside triphosphates, sulfate d' ammonium and heparin.
20	absorption of proteins and peptides in the far ultraviolet	It's a very simple process, but it's a very simple process.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms properties of lungfish fructose diphosphatase	Apos temperature and regulation; enzymatic activity in the poikilothermic properties of dipneust fructose diphosphatase.
20	purification and general properties of delta aminolaevulate dehydratase from nicotiana tabacum l	Purification and general properties of nicotiana tabacum l.
20	an artificial leucocyte control suspension	Artificial leukocyte-control suspension.
20	oscillation and repetitive firing in squid axons comparison of experiments with computations	Squid axon oscillation and repetitive discharge compare experiments with calculations.
20	role of isoleucyl transfer ribonucleic acid synthetase in ribonucleic acid synthesis and enzyme repression in yeast	The role of l' isoleucyltransfer of l' ribonucleic acid synthetase in the synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid and enzymic repression in yeast.
20	dissimilation of methionine by a demethiolase of aspergillus species	In addition, methionine can be used as a substrate for the production of methionine.
20	salmonella in wastes produced at commercial poultry farms	Salmonella in commercial poultry farm wastes.
20	environmental and genetical contributions to class difference a model experiment	It's a great way to learn more about the environment and about genetics.
20	assay and properties of diaminopimelate epimerase from bacillus megaterium	Apos dosage and properties; megaterium diaminopimelate epimerase.
20	rnase activity in erythroid cell lysates	Erythroid lysate rnase activity.
20	stability of st louis encephalitis virus in the airborne state	St. Louis encephalitis, airborne condition.
20	partial purification and characterization of dihydrodipicolinic acid synthetase from sporulating bacillus megaterium	It is recommended that the test be carried out in accordance with the requirements of this standard.
20	influence of bolus temperature on human esophageal motor function	L' influence of the temperature of the bolus on the motor function of the human esophageal system.
20	biosynthesis of cytidine diphosphate diglyceride by human platelets	Cytidine diphosphate diglyceride biosynthesis by human platelets.
20	effect of temperature on radiosensitivity of newcastle disease virus	Effect of Temperature on the Radiation Sensitivity of Newcastle Disease Virus.
20	motile nocardoid actinomycetales	Movable nocardoidal actinomycetales.
20	partial purification of native rrna and trna cistrons from mycoplasma sp kid	Partial purification of trna and rrna native cistrons of mycoplasma sp kid.
20	synthesis of vaccinia viral proteins in cytoplasmic extracts i incorporation of radioactively labeled amino acids into polypeptides	Synthesis of viral proteins of vaccinia in cytoplasmic extracts; radioactive amino acids in polypeptides.
20	biochemical studies on adenovirus multiplication xvi transcription of the adenovirus genome during abortive infection of elevated temperatures	Biochemical studies on the multiplication of xvi transcriptional adenoviruses from the genome of adenoviruses during an aborted infection at high temperatures.
20	synthesis of ribonucleic acid in cells infected with lsc poliovirus at elevated temperatures	Synthesis of l' ribonucleic acid in high-temperature lsc-infected poliovirus infected cells.
20	phenylalanine and tyrosine synthesis under primitive earth conditions	Phenylalanine and tyrosine synthesized under primitive terrestrial conditions.
20	a new approach to isoelectric focusing and fractionation of proteins in a ph gradient	A novel approach for isoelectric focusing and protein fractionation in a ph-gradient.
20	the clearance and antidiuretic potency of neurohypophysial hormones in man and their plasma binding and stability	Human neurohypophysial hormone clearance and antidiuretic potency, as well as plasma binding and stability.
20	correlation of melting temperature and cesium chloride buoyant density of bacterial deoxyribonucleic acid	Fusion temperature correlates with cesium chloride flotation density of the bacterium deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	characterization of injury incurred by escherichia coli upon freeze drying	Characterization of freeze-drying damage to escherichia coli.
20	solution of fatty acids from monolayers spread at the air water interface identification of phase transformations and the estimation of surface charge	Spreaded monolayer fatty acid solution; air interface-water phase transformation identification and l' surface charge estimation.
20	liquid gel chromatography on lipophilic hydrophobic sephadex derivatives	Liquid-gel chromatography of Lipophilic Sephadex derivatives.
20	an endogenous inhibitor of microsomal mixed function oxidases in homogenates of the southern armyworm prodenia eridania	An endogenous mixed-function microsomal oxidase inhibitor in southern legionnaire, the prodenia eridania.
20	functional significance of isoenzymes in thermal acclimatization acetylcholinesterase from trout brain	L' functional importance of the isoenzymes in the intestines; thermal acclimation of the intestines; acetylcholinesterase of the brain of trout.
20	compartmentation of the inulin space in mouse brain slices	Comparison of DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA, DNA.
20	the requirement of serine esterase function in complement dependent erythrophagocytosis	Serine esterase is required in the complement-dependent erythrophagocytosis.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterization i experimental apparatus and methods	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that are considered to be of high quality.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization ii microbial resistance to ethylene oxide	Microbiological Aspects of Sterilization; Dichloroethylene; Ethylene; Ethylene; Ethylene; Ethylene; Ethylene oxide; Ethylene; Ethylene; Ethylene; Ethylene; Ethylene.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization 3 effects of humidity and water activity on the sporicidal activity of ethylene oxide	Microbiological Aspects of Dapo Sterilization; Dapo Oxide; Ethylene 3 Effects of Dapo Moisture and Dapo Oxides; Dapo Activity; Water on Drugs; Dapo Sporicidal Activity; Dapo Oxide; Ethylene.
20	microbiological aspects of ethylene oxide sterilization iv influence of thickness of polyethylene film on the sporicidal activity of ethylene oxide	Microbiological aspects of foetal sterilization; foetal oxide; foetal ethylene influence; foetal polyethylene film thickness; foetal sporicidal activity; foetal oxide; ethylene.
20	behavior of salmonellae in sliced luncheon meats	Salmonella behaviour in deli meats cut into slices.
20	viral susceptibility range of the fathead minnow pimephales promelas poikilothermic cell line	Variation in viral sensitivity of poikilothermal head promelas cell line-@-@ ball pimephales promelas.
20	studies on the effect of vitamin d on calcium absorption and transport	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information, Ottawa, Ontario.
20	the nature of the carbon dioxide substrate and equilibrium constant of the 6 phosphogluconate dehydrogenase reaction	Nature of carbon dioxide substrate and rate constant; equilibrium of reaction 6 of phosphogluconate dehydrogenase.
20	temperature and the regulation of enzyme activity in poikilotherms fructose diphosphatase from migrating salmon	Temperature and regulation of the migratory salmon; enzymatic activity in the migratory salmon fructose diphosphatase.
20	the importance of life time changes in fluorescence depolarization	Significance of life-time changes in depolarization of fluorescence.
20	hydrolysis of penicillins and related compounds by the cell bound penicillin acylase of escherichia coli	In addition, there are a number of other drugs that can be used in the treatment of a variety of diseases.
20	factors affecting the synthesis of ampicillin and hydroxypenicillins by the cell bound penicillin acylase of escherichia coli	Factors affecting synthesis of apos; ampicillin and hydroxypenicillin by apos cell-bound penicillin acylase; escherichia coli.
20	the effect of low temperatures on fatty acid biosynthesis in plants	Low temperature effect on plant fatty acid biosynthesis.
20	the influence of stimulus parameters on contractions of isolated frog muscle fibres	L' influences stimulus parameters on frog muscle fiber contractions.
20	limits of microbial existence temperature and ph	Bacteriological, chemical, biological, and microbiological parameters.
20	purification and properties of proteolytic enzymes from thermophilic actinomycetes	Purification and proteolytic enzymes of thermophilic actinomycetes.
20	temperature sensitive conjugation defective f factor in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli defective temperature-sensitive conjugation factor f.
20	cell wall glucans of the yeast and mycelial forms of paracoccidioides brasiliensis	Glucans of the yeast cell wall and paracoccidioides brasiliensis mycelial forms.
20	thermal reversal of ultraviolet irradiation damage in salmonella typhimurium	Thermal reversal of damage caused by l' irradiation by ultraviolet radiation in Salmonella typhimurium.
20	proton magnetic resonance study of ferredoxin from clostridium pasteurianum	Proton magnetic resonance (PMR) studies of clostridium pasteurianum ferredoxin.
20	the meyerhof quotient and the synthesis of glycogen from lactate in frog and rabbit muscle	Meyerhof quotient and frog and rabbit muscle glycogen synthesis from lactate.
20	viability control for mildew testing of materials and equipment in tropical chambers	Viability testing for material and soil mold testing; tropical room equipment.
20	enzymatic removal of diacetyl from beer 3 enzyme protection and regeneration of cofactor	Enzyme Removal of Beer Diacetyl 3 Enzyme Protection and Cofactor Regeneration.
20	studies of laryngotracheitis virus in avian tissue cultures 3 enhancement of infectivity by diethylaminoethyl dextran	Laryngotracheitis virus studies in apo tissue cultures; birds 3 increase in apo; diethylaminoethyl dextran infectivity.
20	hydrogen sulfide production by bacteria and sulfmyoglobin formation in prepacked chilled beef	Production of d&apos sulfide; hydrogen by bacteria and formation of sulfmyoglobin in pre-packaged refrigerated beef.
20	occurrence of purple sulfur bacteria in a sewage treatment lagoon	Purple sulfur bacteria present in a wastewater treatment lagoon.
20	detection and incidence of escherichia coli on storage pen surfaces of fishing trawlers	Determine the extent to which fish are being harvested and the extent to which they are being harvested.
20	endocarpic microorganisms of two types of windrow dried peanut fruit arachis hypogaea l	Endocarp microorganisms dried with hypogaea peanut sprouts from two types of fruit.
20	purification and properties of a glycerol ester hydrolase lipase from propionibacterium shermanii	Purification and properties of propionibacterium shermanii glycerol ester hydrolase.
20	additional factors in chronic bronchitis	Other Factors for Chronic Bronchitis.
20	effects of temperature on the irritability caused by ddt and ddt analogues in anopheline mosquitos	Temperature effects on appetite; ddt- and ddt-like irritability in anopheles mosquitoes.
20	the use of gamma radiation for the elimination of salmonella from frozen meat	Use gamma rays to remove frozen meat Salmonella.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase induced in cells infected with sendai virus	Ribonucleic acid polymerase is induced in sentai virus infected cells.
20	synthesis of cell constituents by methane grown methylococcus capsulatus and methanomonas methanooxidans	Synthesis of cellular components by methane-grown Methylococcus capsulatus and Methanomonas methanooxidans.
20	depolarization of the intrinsic and extrinsic fluorescence of pepsinogen and pepsin	Depolarization of intrinsic and extrinsic pepsinogen and pepsin fluorescence.
20	substrate specificity and kinetic properties of alpha galactosidases from vicia faba	Specificity of the substrate and kinetic properties of the alpha galactosidases of vicia faba.
20	differential stability of 28s and 18s rat liver ribosomal ribonucleic acids	Differential Stability of Rat Liver Ribosomal Ribonucleic Acids 28s and 18s.
20	purification and characterization of bovine aorta ribonucleases	Purification and characterization of ribonucleases from bovine aorta.
20	laboratory and clinical characteristics of attenuated strains of influenza virus	Clinical and laboratory characteristics of the attenuated strains of influenza.
20	shock synthesis of amino acids in simulated primitive environments	Impact Synthesis of Amino Acids in Simulated Primary Environments.
20	experimental control of mycoplasma meleagridis in turkeys by the dipping of eggs in tylosin and spiramycin	Experimental control of turkey mycoplasma meleagridis by egg immersion in tylosin and spiramycin.
20	naphthylamidase activity of leptospira	Leptospira naphthylamidase.
20	production of amylase in liquid culture by a strain of aspergillus oryzae	Apos production; liquid culture amylase by apos strain; aspergillus oryzae.
20	chromate transport in human leukocytes	"""Chromate Transport in Human Leukocytes,"" in Human Leukocytes, Vol."
20	taxonomic implications of temperature dependence of the allosteric inhibition of 3 deoxy d arabino heptulosonate 7 phosphate synthetase in bacillus	Taxonomic implications of apos temperature dependence; allosteric inhibition of arabino heptulosonate 3 deoxy 7 phosphate synthetase in the bacillus.
20	intracytoplasmic membrane structures in vibrio marinus	Intracytoplasmic Membrane Structure in Vibrio marinus marinus.
20	characteristics of a non complement dependent c3 reactive complex formed form factors in nephritic and normal serum	The characteristics of d' a non-completion-dependent c3 reagent complex formed formation factors in normal and nephritic serum.
20	an extracellular agarase from a cytophaga species	An extracellular agarase (ECA) from apos; a cytophaga species.
20	factors affecting deoxycholate inactivation and mg reactivation of bacillus megaterium km membrane nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced form oxidase	Factors affecting deoxycholate inactivation and the reactivation of the Bacillus megaterium km nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide membrane in mg were found to reduce the oxidase form.
20	fatty acid distribution in mesophilic and thermophilic strains of the genus bacillus	Distribution of fatty acids in thermophilic and mesophilic bacillus strains.
20	growth kinetics of yaba tumor poxvirus after in vitro adaptation to cercopithecus kidney cells	Growth kinetics of poxvirus tumor yaba after its in vitro adaptation to cercopithecial renal cells.
20	relationship between atmospheric temperature and survival of airborne bacteria	The effects of climate change on the health of Canadians and the environment.
20	short term storage at 4 c of trypsinized tissues	Short-term 4 c storage of trypsinized tissue.
20	alterations in the phospholipid composition of escherichia coli b during growth at different temperatures	Phospholipid composition alterations of ester; escherichia coli b during growth at different temperatures.
20	purification and characterization of beta glucosidase of alcaligenes faecalis	Purification and characterization of beta-lacid glucosidase; alkaligene faecalis.
20	microgermination of bacillus cereus spores	Cereal spore microgermination.
20	fine structure of vibrio cholerae during toxin production	Vibrio cholerae fine structure during toxin production.
20	study of the thermal denaturation of ribonuclease a by differential thermal analysis and susceptibility to proteolysis	Investigation of thermal denaturation of ribonuclease a by proteolysis susceptibility and differential thermal analysis.
20	ribonucleic acid synthesis and transport in animal cells at 27 degrees c	Synthesis of L' Ribonucleic Acid and Transport in Animal Cells at 27 degrees c.
20	protection antisera afford against death by endotoxin	Antisera protect against apos; endotoxin death.
20	occurrence of vibrio parahaemolyticus and related hemolytic vibrios in marine environments of washington state	Vibrio parahaemolyticus and related hemolytic vibrio are present in the marine environment of Washington State.
20	mycotoxin from a blue eye mold of corn	Mycotoxin from corn molds in the eyes.
20	methods used to monitor the microbial load of returned lunar material	The results of these studies are summarized in the following sections.
20	seasonal incidence of bacterial temperature types in louisiana soil and water	Seasonal Impact of Bacterial Temperature Types in Soil and Louisiana Water.
20	biochemical characterization of sulfur assimilation by salmonella pullorum	Acute and chronic toxicity of chlorinated dioxins and furans.
20	formation and ultrastructure of extra membranes in escherichia coli	Formation and ultrastructure of additional Escherichia coli membranes.
20	reassociation of deoxyribonucleic acids from actinoplanes and other actinomycetes	Reassociation of actinoplane and d&apos deoxyribonucleic acids; other actinomycetes.
20	amino acid transport in mycobacterium smegmatis	The transport of amino acids in the mycobacterium smegmatis.
20	mode of action of pectic enzymes ii further purification of exopolygalacturonate lyase and pectinesterase from clostridium multifermentans	In addition, there is a need for further research to determine the role of the enzyme in the pathogenesis of C. fuscum.
20	comparative study of isoenzyme formation of bacterial beta galactosidase	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of β-galactosidase.
20	calorimetric evidence for the liquid crystalline state of lipids in a biomembrane	Calorimetric evidence of crystalline liquid lipid in a biomembrane.
20	prototrophic thermophilic bacillus isolation properties and kinetics of growth	Properties; isolation of thermophilic, prototrophic, and kinetic growth-promoting bacilli.
20	intracellular protein breakdown in a thermophile	Dissolution of intracellular proteins in the thermophile.
20	effect of temperature on survival of airborne mycoplasma pneumoniae	Effect of Temperature on Survival of Airborne Pneumonia Mycoplasma.
20	effect of bacteria on chemotaxis in the cellular slime molds	Effect of Bacteria on Chemotaxis in Cellular Myxomycetes.
20	herpes type virus of the frog renal adenocarcinoma i virus development in tumor transplants maintained at low temperature	Frog herpes, renal adenocarcinoma, develops in low-temperature tumour transplants.
20	contribution of the excluded volume of bovine serum albumin for solute molecules to the aprent nonsolvent water	Bovine serum albumin excluded volume contribution for solute molecules at apos; non-soluble deck water.
20	the decomposition of soluble collagen by gamma irradiation	Soluble collagen decomposition by gamma irradiation.
20	acetylcholine concentrations in rat brain diurnal oscillation	Acute toxicity of acrylonitrile to rats and rats.
20	nucleic acid similarities among pseudomonas pseudomallei pseudomonas multivorans and actinobacillus mallei	Comparison of nucleic acids between pseudomonas pseudomallei and actinobacillus mallei.
20	base composition of deoxyribonucleic acid of the temperature sensitive kanamycin resistant r factor rts1	Composition of kanamycin-resistant rts1, deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	biochemical changes during fungal sporulation and spore germination i phenyl methyl sulfonyl fluoride inhibition of macroconidial germination in microsporum gypseum	Biochemical changes during germination and fungal sporulation of iphenyl methyl sulfonyl fluoride spores that inhibit macroconidial germination in microsporum gypseum.
20	aerobic heterotrophic bacteria indigenous to ph 2 8 acid mine water predominant slime producing bacteria in acid streamers	Native Aerobic Heterotrophic Bacteria; Acid Mine Water Ph28, primarily producing bacterial sludge in acidic coils.
20	isolation and properties of lipoproteins from normal rat serum	Normal rat serum lipoprotein insulation and properties.
20	relation of mitochondrial phospholipase a activity to mitochondrial swelling	Mitochondrial phospholipase a activity and swelling.
20	a spectrophotometric study of the secondary structure of ribonucleic acid isolated from the smaller and larger ribosomal subparticles of rabbit reticulocytes	A spectrophotometric study of the ribonucleic acid secondary structure of l&apos isolated from smaller and larger rabbit reticulocyte sub-ribosomal particles.
20	effect of temperature acclimatization on the fatty acid composition of goldfish intestinal lipids	Effect of apo; temperature acclimation on fatty acid composition of intestinal lipids of goldfish.
20	release of vitamin b12 binding protein by human leukocytes in vitro	Release of the vitamin b12-binding protein from human leukocytes in vitro.
20	the biosynthesis of phosphatidylinositol in human platelets	Human platelet phosphatidylinositol biosynthesis.
20	partial purification and kinetics of oestriol 16 alpha glucuronyltransferase from the cytosol fraction of human liver	Partial and kinetic purification of estos; estriol 16 alpha glucuronyltransferase activity from the cytosolic fraction of human liver.
20	salt effects on the denaturation of dna	Effects of salt on DNA denaturation.
20	effects of atmospheric humidity and temperature on the survival of airborne flavobacterium	Airborne Flavobacteriaceae (Flavobacterium aeruginosa) is a fungus of the digestive system.
20	inhibitory action of tetrathionate enrichment broth	Tetrathionate enrichment of d&apos broth.
20	replicate surveys of larval habitats of aedes aegypti in relation to dengue haemorrhagic fever in bangkok thailand	Repeat d' aegypti larval habitat surveys in relation to dengue hemorrhagic fever in the Bangkok area of Thailand.
20	a generalized system for automation of enzyme assays	Generalized apo system; enzyme testing automation.
20	conditioned nalorphine induced abstinence changes persistence in post morphine dependent monkeys	Changes in nalorphin-induced nalorphin-induced retention after conditioning in morphine-dependent monkeys.
20	bacteriological and shelf life characteristics of canned pasteurized crab cake mix	Canned pasteurized crab cake mixture bacteriological characteristics and shelf life.
20	dengue virus plaque development in simian cell systems ii agar variables and effect of chemical additives	Plaque Development of Dengue Virus in Simian Cell Systems ii Variable agar and effect of chemical additives.
20	effects of moisture content and temperature on aflatoxin production in corn	Moisture content and temperature affect production of apos; aflatoxin in corn.
20	thermoelectrically cooled temperature gradient apparatus for comparative cell and virus temperature studies	A thermoelectric temperature gradient device for comparative studies of the temperature of cells and viruses.
20	nitrite and hydroxylamine reduction in higher plants fractionation electron donor and substrate specificity of leaf enzymes principally from vegetable marrow cucurbita pepo l	Reduction of nitrite and l' hydroxylamine in plants with higher fractionation, donor d' electrons and specificity of the substrates of the leaf enzymes, mainly from the cucurbita pepo l of the plant pith.
20	studies on a testosterone glucuronyltransferase from the cytosol fraction of human liver	Testosterone glucuronyltransferase studies from the cytosolic fraction of the human liver.
20	estimation of platelet adhesiveness on whole blood and platelet rich plasma	Estimation of the dose; adhesion of the platelets to the whole blood and the plasma rich in platelets.
20	a simple diagnostic milk medium for pseudomonas aeruginosa	A simple medium for the diagnosis of milk for Pseudomonas aeruginosa.
20	cytoplasmic filaments of amoeba proteus i the role of filaments in consistency changes and movement	It is not possible to determine the origin of the filaments, but it is important to determine the origin of the filaments.
20	factors influencing the activity of succinate dehydrogenase in membrane preparations from micrococcus lysodeikticus	Factors influencing succinate dehydrogenase activity in micrococcus lysodeikticus lysodeikticus membrane preparations.
20	uncertainties in the determination of the cortisol binding capacity of plasma and their removal	Uncertainties in determining plasma cortisol binding capacity and removal.
20	carbon monoxide association of community air pollution with mortality	It is also important to note that there is a lack of understanding of the causes of mortality.
20	antibody against western equine encephalitis virus occurring in the serum of garter snakes colubridae thamnophis in saskatchewan	Antibody to E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, E. coli, and E. coli.
20	preparation and properties of creatine kinase from the breast muscle of normal and dystrophic chicken gallus domesticus	Preparation and properties of dystrophic and normal chicken gallus domesticus mammary muscle creatine kinase.
20	penicillic acid production by blue eye fungi on various agricultural commodities	Production of a variety of agricultural products by the mushrooms of the blue eyes.
20	kinetic constants for aerobic growth of microbial populations selected with various single compounds and with municipal wastes as substrates	Kinetic constants for the aerobic growth of selected microbial populations with various simple compounds and municipal wastes as substrates.
20	bacteriology of manganese nodules v effect of hydrostatic pressure on bacterial oxidation of mnii and reduction of mno2	Manganese nodule bacteriology effects hydrostatic pressure on mnii, bacterial oxidation, and mn2 reduction.
20	temperature dependent van der waals forces	Van derwaals forces depend on the temperature.
20	flavin photosensitized reactions of retinol and stilbene	Flavines photosensitized retinol and stilbene.
20	determination of high affinity oestrogen receptor sites in uterine supernatant preparations	Determination of receptor sites of high-affinity estrogens in preparations of uterine supernatants.
20	photodynamic action of proflavine on coliphage t3 i kinetics of inactivation	Proflavine photodynamic action on the kinetics of l' inactivation of t3 coliphage i.
20	ribonucleic acid polymerase in virions of newcastle disease virus comparison with the vesicular stomatitis virus polymerase	Newcastle Disease Virion Virion Ribonucleic Acid polymerase compared with vesicular stomatitis polymerase virus.
20	proton magnetic resonance studies of the ferredoxins from spinach and parsley	Proton magnetic resonance (PMR) studies of spinach and parsley ferredoxins.
20	micro indirect hemagglutination test for cytomegalovirus	Micro-indirect cytomegalovirus test; hemagglutination.
20	biochemical alterations in bacillus megaterium as produced by aflatoxin b1	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of microorganisms.
20	morphological alterations in bacillus megaterium as produced by aflatoxin b1	It is not possible to determine the origin of the product.
20	zonal centrifuge applied to the purification of herpesvirus in the luck frog kidney tumor	It's a good idea to use a Zonal Centrifuge to purify the virus in frog kidney tumors.
20	new technique for microscopic examination of the fouling community of submerged opaque surfaces	New dapos technique; microscopic community examination; fouling of opaque submerged and opaque surfaces.
20	injury of bacteria by sanitizers	Disinfectant-induced bacterial lesion.
20	labile serum factor and its effect on arbovirus neutralization	The serum factor is labile and its effect on the neutralization of the arboviruses.
20	effect of storage of mueller hinton agar plates on zone sizes for antimicrobial testing	For the purposes of this document, the following definitions shall be used: 1.
20	agar overlay plaquing technique for pseudomonas aeruginosa in hela monolayers	Pseudomonas aeruginosa plating technique on agar in monolayers; agar.
20	bacteriophage active against the lactic acid beverage producing bacterium lactobacillus casei	In addition to the above, there are a number of other substances that are considered to be harmful to human health.
20	use of acetone dried vaccines for preparing capsular antisera against the klebsiella group and the lyophilization of klebsiella cultures	Use of dried apo vaccines; acetone to prepare klebsiella group capsular antisera and freeze-dry klebsiella cultures.
20	properties of caulobacter ribonucleic acid bacteriophage phi cb5	Bacteriophage properties phi cb5 of Caulobacter ribonucleic acid.
20	stability of antibiotics and chemotherapeutics in agar plates	Antibiotic and chemotherapeutic stability in agar plates.
20	electrical characteristics of sphingomyelin bilayer membranes	Sphingomyelin bilayer membrane electrical characteristics.
20	a male producing strain of the house fly	Male producing the domestic fly strain.
20	effect of injury on shivering thermogenesis in the rat	Effect of lesion on rat shivering thermogenesis.
20	the effect of semicarbazide on the nature and stability of collagen fibrils	Effect of semicarbazide on collagen fibrillar stability and nature.
20	thermodynamic studies of the assembly in vitro of native collagen fibrils	Thermodynamic studies of apos; in vitro assembly of collagen fibrils.
20	the mechanism of uptake of cobalt ions by neurospora crassa	Dapos mechanism; cobalt ion absorption by neurospora crassa.
20	circular dichroism studies at variable temperature urobilinoid conformation	Studies of variable temperature circular dichroism are carried out on the urobilinoide conformation.
20	hybridization properties of dna sequences directing the synthesis of messenger rna and heterogeneous nuclear rna	Properties of DNA; hybridization of DNA sequences; DNA directing heterogeneous messenger and nuclear synthesis.
20	rna metabolism in hela cells at reduced temperature i modified processing of 45s rna	Rna metabolism in temperature-reduced i helical cells altered the transformation of 45s rna.
20	physiological studies of methane and methanol oxidizing bacteria oxidation of c 1 compounds by methylococcus capsulatus	Physiological Studies of Methane and Oxidizing Methanol; Oxidation of Compounds c1 by Bacteria by Methylococcus capsulatus.
20	ultrastructure of the cell wall of erwinia amylovora	Apos cell wall ultrastructure; erwinia amylovora.
20	observations on the rhodanese activity of desulfotomaculum nigrificans	Observations on rhodanese desulfotomaculum nigrificans activity.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid hybridization among strains of lactobacilli	Hybridization of l' deoxyribonucleic acid between lactobacillus strains.
20	effect of sulfhydryl reagents on the ribosomes of bacillus subtilis	Effect of sulfhydryl reagents on MTB ribosomes.
20	effect of hydroxyethylrutosides on blood oxygen levels and venous insufficiency symptoms in varicose veins	Hydroxyethylrutoside effects on blood levels; oxygen in the blood and symptoms; vein insufficiency in varicose veins.
20	natural causes of variations in the weight of sarcoma 180	Health Canada, Canadian Institute for Health Information.
20	the effects of varying concentrations of colchicine on the progression of grasshopper neuroblasts into metaphase	Effects of various colchicine concentrations on metaphase progression of locust neuroblasts.
20	accumulation and elimination of coliphage s 13 by the hard clam mercenaria mercenaria	Mercenary mercenary clams accumulate and eliminate coliphage s 13.
20	production of ochratoxins in different cereal products by aspergillus ochraceus	Production of aspergillus ochraceus and aspergillus ochraceus.
20	tremorgenic toxins from penicillia 3 tremortin production by penicillium species on various agricultural commodities	Aspen-like toxins from the production of penicillia 3 by species of penicillium on a variety of agricultural products.
20	transient phases of the isometric tetanus in frog s striated muscle	Transient isometric tetanus phase in striated frog muscle.
20	the temperature activity relationships of serum cholinesterases	The relationship between serum cholinesterase activity and temperature.
20	molecular events in the growth inhibition of bacillus subtilis by d tyrosine	Molecular events in apo; tyrosine d inhibition of subtilis bacillus growth.
20	changes in membrane lipid composition in exponentially growing staphylococcus aureus during the shift from 37 to 25 c	Changes in the lipid composition of the membrane of staphylococcus aureus during exponential growth from 37 to 25 c.
20	cytological studies of deoxyribonucleic acid replication in escherichia coli 15t replication at slow growth rates and after a shift up into rich medium	Cytological studies of the replication of deoxyribonucleic acid in the replication of 15th-old escherichia coli at slow growth rates and after displacement to a rich medium.
20	lysis of blue green algae by myxobacter	Green blue seaweedysis by myxobacteria.
20	properties of the amylase from halobacterium halobium	Bacteria, fungus, fungus, fungus, fungus, fungus.
20	leakage of oxygen from blood and water samples stored in plastic and glass syringes	It is important to note that the results of this study are not representative of the Canadian population.
20	vitamin b12 uptake by intestinal microorganisms mechanism and relevance to syndromes of intestinal bacterial overgrowth	The uptake of vitamin b12 by intestinal microorganisms is a causal mechanism and a link to bacterial intestinal overgrowth syndromes.
20	miniculture plaquing technique for mouse cytomegalovirus	Mouse cytomegalovirus mini-culture plating technique.
20	quantitative studies on fabrics as disseminators of viruses v effect of laundering on poliovirus contaminated fabrics	Quantitative studies of virus-spreading tissues whitening effect on poliovirus-infected tissues.
20	new method of isolating salmonellae from milk	New method to isolate milk Salmonella.
20	differential identification of mycobacterium kansasii and mycobacterium marinum	Mycobacterium kansasii and mycobacterium marinum were identified differentially.
20	the effect of temperature change upon transmitter release facilitation and post tetanic potentiation	L' effect of the temperature change on facilitation of transmitter release and post-tetanic potentiation.
20	ribosomes from xenopus laevis ovaries and the polyuridylic acid directed biosynthesis of polyphenylalanine	Xenopus laevis and l' polyuridylate ribosomes directed polyphenylalanine biosynthesis.
20	effect of geometrical and chemical constraints on water flux across artificial membranes	Effect of chemical and geometric constraints on flux of water through artificial membranes.
20	oxygen 18 studies of recent planktonic foraminifera comparisons of phenotypes and of test parts	Oxygen 18 recent foraminiferous planktonic comparisons of phenotypes and parts of plants; test.
20	variant of penicillinase mediated by an r factor in escherichia coli	Variant of escherichia coli r-mediated penicillinase.
20	cephaloglycin and its biologically active metabolite desacetylcephaloglycin	Deacetylcephaloglycine is a biologically active metabolite of cephaloglycine.
20	microorganisms of the san francisco sour dough bread process ii isolation and characterization of undescribed bacterial species responsible for the souring activity	The micro-organisms of the San francisco salted bread manufacturing process; isolation and characterization of the undescribed bacterial species responsible for the San francisco salted bread; activity; origin.
20	incidence of infectious drug resistance among fecal coliforms isolated from raw sewage	Impact of Infectious Drug Resistance Among Fecal Coliforms Isolated from Raw Wastewater.
20	spermidine requirement for bacillus thuringiensis ribosomes in cell free phenylalanine incorporation	Spermidine required for ribosomes of bacillus thuringiensis; incorporation of phenylalanine acellular.
20	roadrunners energy conservation by hypothermia and absorption of sunlight	It's a great place to relax, to relax, to relax, and to relax.
20	the development and the extinction of hyperthermia induced by conditioned avoidance behavior in rats	Development and apo; apo extinction; behaviorally induced hyperthermia; avoidance conditioned in rats.
20	in vitro stimulation of enzyme secretion and the synthesis of microsomal membranes in the pancreas of the guinea pig	In vitro enzyme secretion stimulation and microsomal membrane synthesis in guinea pig pancreas.
20	an assay for intercellular adhesive specificity	A test of the specificity of the implant; intercellular adhesive for the specificity of the implant; intercellular adhesive.
20	proteins of polyhedal cytoplasmic deoxyvirus ii nucleotide phosphohydrolase activity associated with frog virus 3	Polyhedral cytoplasmic deoxyvirus proteins ii frog virus 3 nucleotide phosphohydrolase activity.
20	comparison of the ribonucleic acid polymerases of two rhabdoviruses kern canyon virus and vesicular stomatitis virus	Comparison of the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and ribonucleic acid (RNA) of two rhabdoviruses, canyon kern virus and vesicular stomatitis virus.
20	a model of respiratory heat transfer in a small mammal	A model of small mammal respiratory heat transfer.
20	efeect of temperature on hospital admissions for myocardial infarction in a subarctic area	Effect of Temperature on Hospitalizations for Myocardial Infarction in Subarctic Regions.
20	factors influencing the inhibitory action of anti inflammatory drugs on carrageenin induced oedema	The factors that influence the ability of anti-@-@inflammatory drugs to inhibit the development of carrageenan cause edema.
20	influence of temperature on the iron metabolism of a fluorescent pseudomonad	Lapos; temperature influence on iron metabolism; a pseudomonad fluorescent.
20	properties of aldolase from francisella tularensis	Francisella tularensis aldolase properties.
20	glucocorticoid induced alteration of the surface membrane of cultured hepatoma cells	Glucocorticoids induced surface membrane damage in cultured liver cells.
20	staphylococcal bacteriophage associated lysin a lytic agent active against staphylococcus aureus	Lysine-associated staphylococcal bacteriophage, an active lytic agent against Staphylococcus aureus.
20	growth and reproduction of mice cross fostered between parents reared at different temperatures	Growth and reproduction of crossed mice were promoted by parents raised at different temperatures.
20	a comparison of mitochondria from torulopsis utilis grown in continuous culture with glycerol iron ammonium magnesium or phosphate as the growth limiting nutrient	A comparison of continuous cultured mitochondria of torulopsis utilis with growth-limiting nutrient glycerol, iron, l' ammonium, magnesium, or phosphate.
20	protein and carbohydrate moieties of a preparation of lactamase ii	Bacteriological studies should be carried out in the same manner.
20	inorganic particles in cigars and cigar smoke	Inorganic particles in both the cigar and the cigar smoke.
20	characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplast 5s ribosomal ribonucleic acid from broad bean leaves	Characterization of the apos; ribosomal ribonucleic acid 5s of the cytoplasm and the chloroplast from bean leaves.
20	purification and some kinetic properties of rat liver glucosamine synthetase	Purification and certain kinetic properties of glucosamine synthetase from rat liver.
20	binding of substrates and modifiers to glucosamine synthetase	Attachment of glucosamine synthetase modifiers and substrates.
20	cholesterol metabolism in the macrophage i the regulation of cholesterol exchange	Cholesterol metabolism in macrophage; cholesterol exchange.
20	the kinetics of influx of calcium and strontium into rat intestine in vitro	Calcium and strontium influx into the rat intestine in vitro.
20	nucleated sites for the assembly of cytoplasmic microtubules in the ectodermal cells of blastulae of arbacia punctulata	Nucleated apo sites; cytoplasmic microtubule assembly in blastulas d&apos ectodermal cells; arbacia punctulata.
20	ribonucleic acid transcriptase acitvity in purified wound tumor virus	A study of the effects of a single-dose regimen on the immune system.
20	mammary carcinoma a specific biochemical defect in autonomous tumors	Breast cancer is a specific, biochemical abnormality found in autonomic tumors.
20	disinfection of cystoscopes by subatmospheric steam and steam and formaldehyde at 80 degrees c	Cystoscope disinfection by subatmospheric vapour and vapour and 80 degree c formaldehyde.
20	uptake of tetracycline by membrane preparations from escherichia coli	Incubates, such as thrombocytopenia, may also be used as a chemoprophylaxis.
20	prostaglandin e 1 in platelet harvesting an in vitro study	In addition, it can be used as an adjunct to the drug product.
20	prostaglandin e 1 in preparation and storage of platelet concentrates	Prostaglandin 1 is used in platelet preparation and storage.
20	lytic enzyme from lysates of streptomyces venezuelae infected with actinophage msp2	Lapos; lytic enzyme of msp2 infected graptomyces venuelae lysates; actinophage msp2.
20	purification of bacteroides amylophilus protease	Purification of the bacterioides amylophilus protease.
20	influence of temperature of incubation and type of growth medium on pigmentation in serratia marcescens	Temperature influence of incubation and growth medium type on pigmentation in serratia marcescens.
20	induction of pigmentation in nonproliferating cells of serratia marcescens by addition of single amino acids	Single amino acid addition induces pigmentation in non-proliferating serratia marcescens cells.
20	temperature control of phospholipid biosynthesis in escherichia coli	Temperature Control of Phospholipid Biosynthesis in Escherichia coli.
20	extracellular transglucosylase and alpha amylase of streptococcus equinus	Extracellular transglucosylase and alpha-amylase of Streptococcus equinus.
20	mescaline induced changes of brain cortex ribosomes role of sperimidine in counteracting the destabilizing effect of mescaline of brain cortex ribosomes	Mescaline induced changes in the role of the sperimidine cerebral cortical ribosomes in the neutralization of the apos; mescaline had a destabilizing effect on cerebral cortical ribosomes.
20	the arrangement of proteins on the deoxyribonucleic acid in chromatin	L' protein arrangement on the apos; chromatin deoxyribonucleic acid.
20	a laboratory study of spontaneous platelet aggregation	A laboratory study of l' platelet aggregation.
20	the association in vitro of polyribosomes with ribonuclease treated derivatives of hepatic rough endoplasmic reticulum characteristics of the membrane binding sites and factors influencing association	L' in vitro association of polyribosomes with ribonuclease-treated derivatives of hepatic hepatic rough endoplasmic reticulum membrane-binding site characteristics and factors affecting it; association.
20	sugar transport effect of temperature on concentrative uptake of alpha methylglucoside by kidney cortex slices	The effect of temperature on the transport of sugars on the intestines; concentrative absorption of d' alpha-methylglucoside by thin slices of the renal cortex.
20	evidence of gene diminution during the formation of the macronucleus in the protozoan stylonychia dna density melting curves micronuclear dna polytene chromosomes	In addition, it is not possible to determine the molecular structure of the protein, but it is possible to determine the molecular structure of the protein and to determine its molecular structure.
20	studies on energy linked reactions energy linked reduction of oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide by succinate in escherichia coli	Succinate-oxidized nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduction in escherichia coli is energy-related.
20	rabies detection in road killed skunks mephitis mephitis	Mephitis mephitis was killed by road rage detection.
20	application of immunofluorescence to studies on the ecology of sphaerophorus necrophorus	The results of the study are shown to be consistent with those reported in the literature.
20	arylamidase of cephalosporium acremonium and its specificity for cephalosporin c	Cephalosporium acremonium Arylamidase and cephalosporin c specificity.
20	initiation of staphylococcal growth in laboratory media	Initiation of Staphylococcal Growth in Laboratory Media.
20	kinetics of the vaccinia virus plaque neutralization test	Kinetics of plaque-based vaccine virus neutralization test.
20	the total thermal insulation of the new born baby	L' new-born full thermal insulation.
20	circular dischroism of bradykinin and related peptides	Bradykinin and related peptides circular dischroism.
20	polyribosomal attachment to rat liver and hepatoma endoplasmic reticulum in vitro a method for its study	In addition, it is important to note that the results of this study are consistent with those reported in the literature.
20	the amylase of the beetle callosobruchus chinensis properties	L' amylase activity of beetle callosobruchus chinensis.
20	effects of hydrostatic pressure and temperature on the uptake and respiration of amino acids by a facultatively psychrophilic marine bacterium	Hydrostatic pressure and temperature effects on amino acid absorption and respiration by facultively psychrophilic marine bacteria.
20	fatty acid composition of bifidobacterium and lactobacillus strains	Bifidobacterium and lactobacillus strains fatty acid composition.
20	structural changes during lysis of a psychorophilic marine bacterium	The results of this study are consistent with the findings of the literature review.
20	sarcoplasmic reticulum and the temperature dependent contraction of smooth muscle in calcium free solutions	Sarcoplasmic reticulum and temperature-dependent smooth muscle contraction in calcium-free solutions.
20	basal bodies but not centrioles in naegleria	Basal bodies, not centrioles, in the naegleria.
20	the effect of light chloralose and pentobarbitone anaesthesia on the acid base state and oxygenation of arterial blood in dogs	Effect of apos; mild chloralosis and pentobarbitone anesthesia on apos; basic acid and apos; and dog arterial blood oxygenation.
20	inward spread of activation in vertebrate muscle fibres	Internal diffusion of l' activation in the muscle fibers of vertebrates.
20	factors influencing the uptake of 125 i polyvinyl pyrrolidone by the intestine of the young rat	In addition to the above factors, there is also the possibility of an increase in the risk of infection.
20	events occurring near the time of synapsis during transformation in diplococcus pneumoniae	Near synapsis events during transformation in diplococcus pneumoniae.
20	positive and negative control of r factor replication in proteus mirabilis	Positive and negative r factor replication control in proteus mirabilis.
20	genetic behavior of r factors in vibrio cholerae	Genetic Behaviour of Vibrio cholerae r-factors.
20	effect of temperature on the fatty acid composition of the extreme thermophiles bacillus caldolyticus and bacillus caldotenax	Effect of Temperature on Fatty Acid Composition of Extreme Thermophilic Caldolyticus and Caldotaxen.
20	separation of the primary dehydrogenase from the cytochromes of the nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide reduced form oxidase of bacillus megaterium	Primary dehydrogenase separation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide cytochromes reduced the form of megaterium bacillus oxidase.
20	dihydroxyacetone phosphate its structure and reactivity with glycerophosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase and some possible metabolic implications	Dihydroxyacetone phosphate, its structure and reactivity with glycerophosphate dehydrogenase aldolase and triose phosphate isomerase, and some possible metabolic implications.
20	protein phospholinase reactions in mammalian testis stimulatory effects of adenosine 3 5 cyclic monophosphate on the phosphorylation of basic proteins	Mammalian testis responses of protein phospholinase to stimulatory effects of apos; cyclic adenosine 3-5 monophosphate to basic protein phosphorylation.
20	nuclear magnetic resonance spectrum of lysine vasopressin and its structural implications	The nuclear magnetic resonance spectrum and structural implications of vasopressin lysine.
20	concentration and purification of viruses by adsorption to and elution from insoluble polyelectrolytes	Virus concentration and purification by insoluble polyelectrolyte adsorption and elution.
20	t 2 toxin production by fusarium tricinctum on solid substrate	Fusarium tricinctum production of t2 toxin on solid substrate.
20	streptomycin uptake by mycobacterium tuberculosis	L' sorbent mycobacteria absorption of streptomycin.
20	ultrafiltration as a method for concentrating rift valley fever virus grown in tissue culture	Ultra-filtration as a method of concentrating Rift Valley fever virus cultured in tissue culture.
20	automated method for the determination of free formalin in biological products	Automated Method for Free Formalin Determination in Organic Products.
20	method for the preservation of diagnostic sera for field and laboratory work	Method for Preservation of Diagnostic Serums for Field and Laboratory Work.
20	transport of vitamin b 12 in escherichia coli	Escherichia coli vitamin b12 transport.
20	synthesis of pyruvate carboxylase from its apoenzyme and biotin in bacillus stearothermophilus mechanism and control of the reaction	Pyruvate carboxylase synthesis from its apoenzyme and biotin in the stearothermophilus bacillus mechanism and reaction control.
20	dielectric dispersion in aqueous solutions of oxyhaemoglobin and carboxyhaemoglobin	Dielectric dispersion in aqueous oxyhemoglobin and carboxyhemoglobin.
20	flow dependence of transtubular potential difference in isolated perfused segments of rabbit proximal convoluted tubule	The difference in transtubular potential depends on the flow rate in the perfused and isolated segments of the rabbit proximal contoured tubule.
20	simplified fluorometric method for the determination of plasma glycerol	Simplified Fluorometric Procedure for Determination of Plasma Glycerol.
20	polyoma tumor antigen an activator of chromosome replication	Polyoma tumor antigen, a chromosomal replication activator.
20	proton magnetic resonance studies of chromatium high potential iron protein	Proton magnetic resonance study of high-potential chromatium ferric protein.
20	differential effect of phleomycin on the infectivity of poliovirus and poliovirus induced ribonucleic acids	In addition, it can be used as a means of reducing the risk of infection, and it can be used as a means of reducing the risk of infection.
20	influence of polycations on the interaction between poliovirus multistranded ribonucleic acid and hela cells	Influence of polycations on apo; interaction of apo; multi-stranded ribonucleic acid of poliovirus and helical cells.
20	enlargement of escherichia coli after bacteriophage infection ii proposed mechanism	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
20	rapid methods for determining decarboxylase activity ornithine and lysine decarboxylases	Rapid determination of ornithine decarboxylase and lysine decarboxylase activity.
20	rapid methods for determining decarboxylase activity arginine decarboxylase	Rapid Methods for Determination of Arginine Decarboxylase Activity.
20	repair of injury in freeze dried salmonella anatum	Repair of Salmonella anatum lyophilized lesions.
20	transport media for herpes simplex virus types 1 and 2	Bacteriological and chemical properties of the virus.
20	formation of aerial hyphae in candida albicans	Air hyphae forming in candida albicans.
20	channel catfish virus a new herpesvirus of ictalurid fish	Channel catfish virus is a novel herpesvirus found in ictalurid fish.
20	binding of ddt to lecithin	Lecithin ddt binding.
20	the computed distribution of copper ii and zinc ii ions among seventeen amino acids present in human blood plasma	Calculated distribution of copper ions ii and zinc ii among 17 human blood plasma amino acids.
20	the significance of changes in the temperature of the skin and body core of the chicken in the regulation of heat loss	L' importance of chicken body and skin temperature changes in regulating heat loss.
20	mechanism of adsorption and eclipse of bacteriophage phi x174 i in vitro conformational change under conditions of eclipse	Mechanisms; adsorption and removal; eclipse of the in vitro conformational change bacteriophage under laboratory conditions; eclipse.
20	genetic polymorphisms in varied environments	Genetic polymorphisms have been found in a variety of environments.
20	incidence of prosthecate bacteria in a polluted stream	Impact of Prosthetic Bacteria in a Contaminated Water Course.
20	growth temperatures and temperature characteristics of aeromonas	The results of this study are summarized below.
20	microagglutination procedures for febrile agglutination tests	Microagglutination methods for the purpose of testing feverish agglutination.
20	disc plate method of microbiological antibiotic assay i factors influencing variability and error	This method is not intended to be used in isolation, but may be used in combination with other methods.
20	disc plate method of microbiological antibiotic assay ii novel procedure offering improved accuracy	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections: 1.
20	synthesis of l 3 4 dihydroxyphenylalanine from l tyrosine by microorganisms	L4 dihydroxyphenylalanine is synthesized from tyrosine l by microorganisms.
20	bactericidal antibody response in the pacific hagfish eptatretus stoutii	Bactericidal antibodies in Pacific Hagfish, eptatretus stoutii.
20	utilization of palmitic acid by mycobacterium avium	L'utilisation de l'apos; acid palmitique par la mycobacterium avium.
20	cell free passive transfer of delayed hypersensitivity to chemicals in guinea pigs	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of products.
20	antiviral immune cytolysis at an early stage of paramyxovirus infection	Early viral immunocytolysis; paramyxovirus infection.
20	experimental alteration of the relationship between the external calcium concentration and the contractile force generated by auricular trabeculae isolated from the heart of the frog rana pipiens	Experimental modification of the relationship between external calcium concentration and contractile force generated by fleshy atrial columns isolated from rana pipiens frog heart.
20	analysis of the potential dependent changes in optical retardation in the squid giant axon	Analysis of potential optical retardation-dependent changes in the giant squid axon.
20	replication of the r factor rts1 in proteus mirabilis	Proteus mirabilis rts1 reproduction.
20	characteristics of s organism isolated from methanobacillus omelianskii	Characteristics of L' isolated from Methanobacillus omelianskii.
20	germination of heat and alkali altered spores of clostridium perfringens type a by lysozyme and an initiation protein	Heat and alkali germination altered Clostridium perfringens type a spores per lysozyme and a d&apos protein; initiation.
20	effect of temperature on the integrity of bacillus psychrophilus cell walls	Temperature effects on apos; cell wall integrity of psychrophilic bacillus.
20	studies on the induction and biosynthesis of vitellogenin an oestrogen induced glycolipophosphoprotein	Studies on vitellogenin induction and biosynthesis, a estrogen-induced glycolipophosphoprotein.
20	thermal and ph stability of 2 isopentenyl pyrophosphate	Thermal and ph-stabilization of 2 isopentenyl pyrophosphate.
20	separation of molecular species of lipoprotein lipase from adipose tissue	In addition, it can be used as a substrate for the production of a variety of proteins.
20	rapid recovery of escherichia coli from estuarine water	Escherichia coli in estuarine water.
20	bacterial cell production from hexadecane at high temperatures	In the case of non-transferable substances, the term is used to refer to the product.
20	sporostatic and sporocidal properties of aqueous formaldehyde	Water formaldehyde sporostatic and sporocidal properties.
20	stability of live attenuated venezuelan equine encephalitis vaccine	Stability of live, attenuated vaccine against the disease; Venezuelan encephalitis.
20	thyroxine binding globulin characterization of the binding site with a fluorescent dye as a probe	Characterization of thyroxine-binding globulin binding site; aid of apo; fluorescent dye probe.
20	new pseudomonad utilizing methanol for growth	New methanol growth pseudomonad.
20	isolation of mycoplasma membranes by digitonin	Mycoplasmic membrane isolation by digitonin.
20	interaction of l cells and chlamydia psittaci entry of the parasite and host responses to its development	Interaction of the l cells and the chlamydia psittaci entered from the parasite and the reactions of the host to its development.
20	aerosol survival of pasteurella tularensis and the influence of relative humidity	Pasteurella tularensis and l&apos aerosol survival influences relative humidity.
20	growth of salmonella typhimurium in skim milk concentrates	Growth of Salmonella typhimurium in concentrates of skim milk.
20	a ribosome dissociation factor from rabbit reticulocytes fluoride e coli ribosomes initiation factors	Ribosome dissociation factor in rabbit reticulocytes and coli ribosomes.
20	detection of polyadenylic acid sequences in viral and eukaryotic rna polu u cellulose columns poly u filters fiberglass hela cells bacteriophage t4	DNA sequencing; polyadenyl acid in eukaryotic and viral polynuclear cellulose columns, poly u u filters, t4 bacteriophage of fiberglass helical cells.
20	lifetime of the excited state in vivo i chlorophyll a in algae at room and at liquid nitrogen temperatures rate constants of radiationless deactivation and trapping	The life span of the algae in vivo excited state i chlorophyll a at ambient and liquid nitrogen temperature is constant in radiation-free quenching and quenching rate.
20	lifetime of the excited state in vivo ii bacteriochlorophyll in photosynthetic bacteria at room temperature	Life span of apo; in vivo excited state ii bacteriochlorophyll in photosynthetic bacteria at ambient temperature.
20	colorimetric determination of serum acid phosphatase activity using adenosine 3 monophosphate as substrate	Determination of the colorimetric level; serum acid phosphatase activity using monophosphate d' adenosine 3 as substrate.
20	altered thermal sensitivity in injured and demyelinated nerve a possible model of temperature effects in multiple sclerosis	Modification of thermal sensitivity in the damaged and demyelinated nerve, a possible model of the effects of temperature in the MS.
20	some effects of temperature on the growth of f pili	Some of the effects that temperature may have on pili growth.
20	effect of temperature on the intra hepatic vasculature	Temperature effect on hepatic intra-@ vascularization.
20	electron spin resonance of an irradiated single crystal of 5 chlorouridine	Electron spin resonance d' irradiated 5-chlorouridine single crystal.
20	lactamases of r factors derived from shigella and salmonella strains	Shigella- and salmonella-derived r factor lactamases.
20	purification and properties of an polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase produced by bacillus pumilus	In addition, it may be used in combination with other products, e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.g. e.
20	in vivo and in vitro action of new antibiotics interfering with the utilization of n acetyl glucosamine n acetyl muramyl pentapeptide	The use of nacetyl glucosamine n acetyl muramyl pentapeptide is recommended for the treatment of chronic conditions.
20	effect of growth temperature on the lipid composition of thermus aquaticus	Lipid composition of thermus aquaticus was influenced by growth temperature.
20	human senile cataractous lens protease isolation and some chemical characteristics	Isolation of the protease from the human senile cataract lens and certain chemical characteristics.
20	rna polymerases of maize partial purification and properties of the chloroplast enzyme	Partial Corn Purification Rna polymerases and Bio properties; chloroplast enzyme.
20	isolation of a calcium sequestering protein from sarcoplasmic reticulum	To isolate a protein that sequesters calcium from the sarcoplasmic reticulum.
20	cellulolytic activity of thermomonospora curvata optimal assay conditions partial purification and product of the cellulase	Thermomonospora curvata cellulolytic activity allows partial purification and the cellulase product.
20	isolation and characterization of mitochondrial dna from drosophila melanogaster	Isolation and Characterization of Drosophila melanogaster mitochondrial DNA.
20	aspartate transcarbamoylase from phaseolus aureus partial purification and properties	Aspartate transcarbamoylase from partially purified phaseolus aureus.
20	isolation and identification of xanthotoxin 8 methoxypsoralen and bergapten 5 methoxypsoralen from celery infected with sclerotinia sclerotiorum	Isolation and identification of xanthotoxin-8-methoxypsoralen and bergapten-5-methoxypsoralen from celery infected with sclerotia.
20	properties of the refolding and unfolding reactions of ribonuclease a	Properties of a-ribonuclease folding and a-ribonuclease unfolding reactions.
20	some properties of pyruvate and 2 oxoglutarate oxidation by blowfly flight muscle mitochondria	Oxoglutarate and pyruvate oxidized by muscle mitochondria of flies.
20	synthesis characterization and properties of uridine 5 d apio d furanosyl pyrophosphate	Characterization of the synthesis and properties of the compound uridine 5 d apio duranosyl pyrophosphate.
20	partial purification and properties of the pyruvate uridine diphospho n acetylglucosamine transferase from staphylococcus epidermidis	Partial purification and properties of pyruvate uridine diphospho n-acetylglucosamine transferase from staphylococcus epidermidis.
20	purification and characterization of epizootic diarrhea of infant mice virus	Childhood Mouse Epizootic Diarrhea Purification and Characterization.
20	physiochemical properties of the native zinc and manganese prepared metalloprotease of bacillus polymyxa	Physiochemical properties of native zinc- and manganese-derived polymyxa bacillus metalloprotease.
20	production and purification of a staphylococcus epidermidis bacteriocin	A bacteriocin of bacteriocin staphylococcus epidermidis bacteriocin.
20	uric acid characterization of its interaction with human serum albumin	In addition to the above, there are a number of other products that are considered to be of high quality.
20	isolation and properties of mesosomal membrane fractions from micrococcus lysodeikticus	Isolation and properties of micrococcus lysodeikticus mesosomal membrane fractions.
20	platelet concentrates sterility of 400 single units stored at room temperature	Concentrated sterility of the 400 single unit platelets stored at room temperature.
20	human placental cathepsin b1 isolation and some physical properties	Human placental cathepsin b1 insulation and some physical properties.
20	isolation of a specific enhancer for echovirus 6 from uninfected permissive host cells	It can be used as an antibody or as an antioxidant; it can also be used as an antioxidant.
20	proton magnetic resonance and magnetic susceptibility characterization of ferredoxin i from bacillus polymyxa	Characterization of the magnetic susceptibility and proton magnetic resonance of polymyxa ferredoxin i.
20	characterization of the dominant aerobic microorganism in cattle feedlot waste	Characterization of micro@-@ aerobic dominant organism in feedlot waste.
20	beta d phosphogalactoside galactohydrolase from streptococcus cremoris hp purification and enzyme properties	Beta d'phosphogalactoside galactohydrolase from the purification hp of streptococcus cremoris and its enzymatic properties.
20	inactivated rabies vaccine produced from the flury lep strain of virus grown in bhk 21 suspension cells	Inactivated rabies vaccine produced from 21-cell suspension cultured flurry lep strain.
20	the purification and properties of extracellular glycosidases of the cellular slime mould dictyostelium discoideum	Purification and extracellular glycosidase properties of the cellular slime mold dictyostelium discoideum.
20	purification and properties of undecyl acetate esterase from pseudomonas cepacia grown on 2 tridecanone	Apos esterase purification and properties; apos acetate; pseudomonas cepacia undecyl cultured on 2 tridecanones.
20	purification of polynucleotide phosphorylase by affinity chromatography and some properties of the purified enzymes	Polynucleotide phosphorylase (polynucleotide phosphorylase) purification by d&apos chromatography; affinity and some properties of purified enzymes.
20	partial characterization and purification of a rabbit granulocyte factor that increases permeability of escherichia coli	For the purposes of this document, the following definitions are provided: 1.
20	cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from bone characterization of the enzyme and studies of inhibition by thyroid hormones	Cyclic nucleotide phosphodiesterase from apos and enzyme bone characterization; apo studies; thyroid hormone inhibition.
20	nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate dependent formate dehydrogenase from clostridium thermoaceticum purification and properties	Nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate-dependent formate dehydrogenase purification and thermoacetic clostridium properties.
20	progesterone binding components of chick oviduct viii receptor activation and hormone dependent binding to purified nuclei	The chicken oviduct and hormone-dependent binding to progesterone-purified nuclei constitute binding components.
20	purification properties and mode of action of hemicellulase i produced by ceratocystis paradoxa	Hematocystis paradoxa produces hemicellulase, hemicellulase, hemicellulase, hemicellulase.
20	on the fidelity of dna replication characterization of polynucleotides with errors in base pairing synthesized by avian myeloblastosis virus deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase	On the reliability of the characterization of the replication of the apos; polynucleotide DNA with errors in the apos; pairing of bases synthesized by the apos; avian myeloma virus deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase.
20	purification and characterization of mouse kidney beta glucuronidase	Renal beta glucuronidase was purified and characterized in mice.
20	preparation and purification of polymerized actin from sea urchin egg extracts	Apos preparation and purification; polymerized actin from apos extracts; eggs; sea urchin.
20	purification and properties of homoserine transacetylase from bacillus polymyxa	The purification and the properties of the homoserine transacetylase of the polymyxa bacillus.
20	poly 8 bromoadenylic acid synthesis and characterization of an all syn polynucleotide	Apos synthesis; bromoadenylic acid poly 8 and apos characterization; all syn polynucleotide.
20	characterization of the genome of phycomyces blakesleeanus	Phycomyces blakesleeanus genome characterization.
20	properties of a prolactin receptor from the rabbit mammary gland	A prolactin receptor of rabbit mammary gland.
20	isolation and characterization of mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid of acanthamoeba castellanii	L'isolation et caractérisation de l'apos; deoxyribonucleic acid, mitochondrial deoxyribonucleic acid; acanthamoeba castellanii.
20	isolation of salt soluble elastin from ligamentum nuchae of copper deficient calf	Isolate copper-deficient calf ligamentum nuchae salt-soluble elastin.
20	properties of corynebacterium acnes bacteriophage and description of an interference phenomenon	The properties of the bacteriophage corynebacterium acnes and the description of its properties.
20	assay characterization and localization of an enterotoxin produced by salmonella	In addition, it may be used in combination with other antimicrobials.
20	virus isolation and titration at 33 degrees and 37 degrees c	It's a 33-degree, 37-degree c.
20	purification and properties of a serine protease from pseudomonas matophilia	Pseudomonas matophilia serine protease purification and properties.
20	hatching in the monogenean parasite dictyocotyle coeliaca from the body cavity of raja naevus	L' hatching of dictyocotyl coeliaca monogenean occurs in raja naevus body cavity.
20	hansenula lynferdii sp nov	H.P.S.A.
20	deoxyribonucleic acid polymerases of bhk 21 c13 cells partial purification and characterization of the enzymes	Bhk deoxyribonucleic acid polymerase 21 c13 partial purification and enzyme characterization.
20	purification and properties of the pyruvate kinase of sturgeon muscle	Purification and properties of Sturgeon muscle pyruvate kinase.
20	isolation characterization and stability of the 30s ribosomal rna complex from hela cells	Stabilization and isolation of the 1930s ribosomal complex from helical cells.
20	purification and properties of a beta 1 6 clucosidase from flavobacterium	Purification and flavobacterium beta 16 clucosidase properties.
20	purification and properties of nucleic acids from an unusual cytoplasmic organelle in the flagellate protozoan crithidia oncopelti	Purification and nucleic acid properties d' an unusual cytoplasmic organelle in the protozoan flagellate crithidia oncopelti.
20	platelet antiheparin activity the isolation and characterisation of platelet factor 4 released from thrombin aggregated washed human platelets and its dissociation into subunits and the isolation of membrane bound antiheparin activity	Lapses; platelet anti-heparin activity; isolation and characterization of the released platelet factor 4 from thrombin- and thrombin-dissociated washed human platelets; membrane-bound anti-hepos isolation; anti-hepin activity.
20	purification of a derepressible arylsulfatase from chlamydomonas reinhardti properties of the enzyme in intact cells and in purified state	Purification of apos; an arylsulfatase that is deregulated from apos properties; enzyme from Chlamydomonas reinhardti in intact and purified apos cells.
20	isolation of an extracellular neutral proteinase from pseudomonas fragi	Isolate a neutral extracellular proteinase from Pseudomonas fragi.
20	purification properties and induction of a specific benzoate 4 hydroxylase from aspergillus niger ubc 814	For the purpose of this document, the following definitions are provided: 1.
20	partial purification and characterization of the lipase of a facultatively psychrophilic bacterium acinetobacter o16	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of lipases, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
20	an experimentally pathogenic bacillus species i description and characterization of the organism	An organism is a species of bacterial pathogen that can be described and characterized experimentally.
20	isolation of aeromonas sp atcc 29063 a phenol producing organism from fresh haddock	Isoler aeromonas sp. atcc 29063, a phenol-producing organism; fresh haddock.
20	the purification of cholinesterase from horse serum	Horse serum cholinesterase purification.
20	purification and characterization of aspergillus niger exo 1 4 glucosidase	In addition, it is recommended that the test be performed at the same time as the test.
20	the cytotoxins of cobra venoms isolation and partial characterization	Cobra venom cytotoxins are isolated and partially characterized.
20	purification and properties of elastolytic enzyme from flavobacterium immotum	Purification and properties of flavobacterium immotum elastolytic enzyme.
20	purification and properties of beta galactosidase from aspergillus oryzae	Purification and purification of beta-galactosidase from aspergillus oryzae.
20	enzymatic studies on a cellulase system of trichoderma viride ii purification and properties of two cellulases	Enzyme studies on a trichoderma viride cellulase system ii purification and two cellulase properties.
20	purification and some properties of alkaline pullulanase from a strain of bacillus no 202 1 an alkalophilic microorganism	The results of this study will be used to evaluate the effectiveness of the alkaline pullulanase in reducing the risk of infection.
20	purification and characterization of two activities of the intracellular dextransucrase from leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299	Two intracellular dextransucrase activities of leuconostoc mesenteroides nrl b 1299 were purified and characterized.
20	myosin from molluscan abalone haliotis discus isolation and enzymatic properties	Miscellaneous myosin of abalone; bivalve; bivalve; bivalve; bivalve; bivalve.
20	isolation and purification of flavobacterium alpha 1 3 glucanase hydrolyzing insoluble sticky glucan of streptococcus mutans	Flavobacterium alpha isolation and purification 13 glucanase hydrolyzing streptococcus mutans insoluble sticky glucan.
20	production purification and characterization of an extracellular chitosanase from streptomyces	Purification and characterization of extracellular streptomycin chitosanase.
20	colchicine binding protein of the liver its characterization and relation to microtubules	The liver colchicine-binding protein, its characterization, and its relationship to microtubules.
20	physicochemical properties of planorbis corneus erythrocruorin	Physico properties-corneus erythrocruorin planorbis chemicals.
20	isolation and identification of rumen bacteria capable of anaerobic phloroglucinol degradation	Isolate and identify anaerobic phloroglucinol-degrading rumen bacteria.
20	staphylococcal micrococcins ii isolation purification and identification	Staphylococcal micrococcin(s) ii purification; isolation and identification.
20	the isolation and characterization of a temperate phage y46 e2 from erwinia herbicola y40	The results of this study are summarized below.
20	a rapid method for purification of human granulocyte cationic neutral proteases purification and characterization of human granulocyte chymotrypsin like enzyme	A rapid method for the purification of neutral cationic proteases from human granulocytes and for the characterization of chymotrypsin from human granulocytes similar to the enzyme.
20	epizootic and enzootic aspects of minchinia nelsoni haplosporida disease in maryland oysters	"""Enzootic and epizootic aspects of the disease of minchinia nelsoni haplosporida in maryland oyster huters"", Arch."
20	characterization of a specific transport system for arginine in isolated yeast vacuoles	Characterization of a specific yeast-specific transport system for arginine; arginine in isolated yeast vacuoles.
20	purification and properties of an exo cellulase component of novel type from trichoderma miride	The purification and the properties of a component of the cellulase, a new type of cellulase, from trichoderma miride.
20	studies on phospholipases from streptomyces iii purification and properties of streptomyces hachijoensis phospholipase c	Phospholipase studies of streptomyces hchijoensis c phospholipase and of streptomyces iii purification.
20	isolation and characterization of a proteinase from the sarcocarp of melon fruit	Isolation and characterization of fruit melon sarcocarp proteinase.
20	purification of herpesvirus saimiri and properties of the viral dna	Purification of apos; saimiri herpesviruses and viral DNA.
20	purification characterization and regulation of a nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide dependent lactate dehydrogenase from actinomyces viscosus	Characterization and regulation of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide-dependent lactate dehydrogenase; actinomyces viscosus.
20	colchicine affects kinetics of concanavalin a mediated agglutination of hepatoma cells and plasma membranes from liver and hepatoma cells	Colchicine affects the kinetics of concanavalin, a medically mediated clumping of liver and liver cell and liver cell plasma membranes.
20	purification and properties of arylsulphatase from the brain of the silkworm bombyx mori	Bombyx mori silkworm brain purification and arylsulfatase properties.
20	purification and characterization of a streptomyces albus endo n acetylmuramidase lytic for group a and other beta haemolytic streptococci	An endogenous lytic streptomycin acetylmuramidase for group a and d' other beta-hemolytic streptococci.
20	partial purification and properties of protease from torula thermophila	Partial Purification and Protease Properties of Thermophila Torula.
20	a case of deficiency of the seventh component of complement in man biological properties of a c7 deficient serum and description of a c7 inactivating principle	A deficiency of the seventh complement component in human biological properties; c7-deficient serum and description; a dapos principle; c7 inactivation.
20	characterization of primary reactants in bacterial photosynthesis ii kinetic studies of the light induced epr signal g 2 0026 and the optical absorbance changes at cryogenic temperatures	Characterization of Primary Reagents in Bacterial Photosynthesis ii kinetic studies of g 2,0026 light-induced esr signal and changes in apo; optical absorption at cryogenic temperatures.
20	15 hydroxyprostaglandin dehydrogenase from human placenta 1 isolation and characterization	In addition, it is recommended that the drug be used in conjunction with the drug product.
20	purification and properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from parsely leaf	Thiamine pyrophosphokinase purification and properties from interspersed leaves.
20	correlations between physical and drug release characteristics of polyethylene glycol suppositories	Correlations between the physical characteristics and the release characteristics of the polyethylene glycol suppositories.
20	a dna polymerase from embryos of drosophila melanogaster purification and properties	A DNA polymerase from, or embryos of, drosophila melanogaster purifying and possessing properties.
20	membranes of tetrahymena iv isolation and characterization of temperature responsive smooth and rough microsomal subfractions	Tetrahymena membranes iv, isolation and characterization of-smooth, rough, temperature-sensitive microsomal fractions.
20	separation of cholinergic proteolipids from quenched rat cerebral cortex and resolution of properties at low temperature	Cholinergic proteolipid separation from rat cerebral cortex and low temperature property resolution.
20	increased reactivity of rat alpha foetoprotein with corresponding antiserum after 125i labelling	Increased rat fetoprotein alpha reactivity with etapos; corresponding antiserum after labelling with 125i.
20	purification and properties of a yeast protein kinase	The results of this study are summarized below.
20	purification and characterization of two peroxidases from hard wheat	Two durum peroxidases are purified and characterized.
20	tryptophanase from sphaerophorus funduliformis purification molecular weight and subunit properties	Sphaerophorus funduliformis tryptophanase, molecular mass purification, and sub-unit properties.
20	purification and characterization of a glycosyltransferase complex from the culture broth of streptococcus mutans fa1	In addition, it is recommended that a test be performed to determine the identity of the test substance.
20	purification and properties of myeloperoxidase from mice leukocytes	Purification and mouse leukocyte myeloperoxidase properties.
20	chemically induced temperature sensitive mutants of dengue virus type 2 i isolation and partial characterization	Chemically induced temperature-sensitive mutants for dengue virus isolation and partial characterization i.
20	lh rh interactions with pituitary receptors properties and characterization	Interactions rhh with properties and characterization of the pituitary receptors.
20	characterization of an inducible amidase from pseudomonas acidovorans ae1	In addition, it may be used as a basis for further investigation.
20	characterization of n ethylmaleimide reactive proteins from human tonsillar ribosomes by two dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis	Characterization of human amygdal reactive proteins; ethylmaleimide by two-dimensional polyacrylamide gel electrophoresis.
20	magnetic susceptibility measurements of deoxygenated hemoglobins and isolated chains	Measurement of Magnetic Susceptibility of Deoxygenated Hemoglobins and Isolated Chains.
20	prolactin binding in rat mammary gland during pregnancy and lactation	Fixation of prolactin in the mammary gland of the rat during pregnancy and lactation.
20	purification of sea urchin ribosomal rna genes with a single strand specific nuclease	Purification of ribosomal genes from sea urchins by single-stranded nuclease.
20	isolation and characterization of two alkaline ribonucleases from calf serum	Isolation and characterization of the two alkaline ribonucleases of calf serum.
20	the glass point of elastin	Elastin glass tip.
20	purification and characterization of an extracellular exo d galacturonanase of aspergillus niger	An exotic extracellular galacturonanase from apos; aspergillus niger.
20	in vitro preparation and characterization of a 700 nm absorbing chlorophyll water adduct according to the proposed primary molecular unit in photosynthesis	Preparation in vitro and characterization; an adsorbing chlorophyll adduct; water at 700 nm according to apos; primary molecular unit proposed for photosynthesis.
20	an improved assay for bacterial methane mono oxygenase some properties of the enzyme from methylomonas methanica	Improved bacterial methane monooxygenase assay, some methylomonas methanica enzyme properties.
20	oxygen uptake and blood respiratory properties of the caecilian boulengerula taitanus	L'absorption d'apos; absorption d'oxygen et les propriétés respiratoires de la b boulengerula taitanus caecilienne.
20	characterization of an extracellular dextranase from fusarium moniliforme	Extracellular dextranase from the moniliform fusarium.
20	kinetic studies on pantothenase from pseudomonas fluorescens effects of ph on substrate and inhibitor binding	Kinetic studies of pseudomonas fluorescens pantothenase effects of ph on the substrate and its binding; inhibitor.
20	transfer of heme from heme albumin to hemopexin	Hepatitis C is a serious and life-threatening disease.
20	industrial preparation of poly vinyl chloride	Industrial polyvinyl chloride preparation.
20	partial purification and characterization of alpha glucosidase from pseudomonas fluorescens w	In addition, it is recommended that the Canadian Food Inspection Agency (CFIA) be consulted in the development of this guideline.
20	isolation of a moderate halophilic ammonia oxidizing bacterium nitrosococcus mobilis nov sp	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of microorganisms, but it is important to distinguish between them.
20	affinity chromatography on immobilised nucleotides some applications to the purification of thermophilic dehydrogenases and kinases	Chromatography of apos; affinity on immobilized nucleotides, some thermal dehydrogenase and kinase purification applications.
20	enzymic synthesis of an aromatic ring from acetate units partial purification and some properties of flavanone synthase from cell suspension cultures of petroselinum hortense	The enzymatic synthesis of apos; an aromatic nucleus from apos; an acetate allows flavanone synthase to be partially purified and some properties from suspended petroselin hortense cell cultures.
20	isolation and characterization of active ribosomal subunits from human placenta	Isolation and characterization of-active human placental ribosomal units.
20	oestrogen receptors in chick oviduct characterization and subcellular distribution	The results of this study are summarized in the following sections.
20	purification and some properties of a novel maltohexaose producing exo amylase from aerobacter aerogenes	The results of this study will be published in the Canada Gazette, Part II.
20	further characterization of the androgen receptor in rat testis	Further characterization of rat testis androgen receptor.
20	purification and characterization of tonin	Tonin Purification and Characterization.
20	some biological properties of herpesvirus saimiri from chronically infected monolayer and suspension cultures	Certain biological properties of saimiri herpesvirus from chronically infected suspension and monolayer cultures.
20	physico chemical properties of ribonuclease a modified with pyridoxal 5 phosphate	Physical properties-ribonuclease chemicals modified by pyridoxal 5 phosphate.
20	human deoxythymidine kinase i purification and general properties of the cytoplasmic and mitochondrial isozymes derived from blast cells of acute myelocytic leukemia	Purification of human deoxythymidine kinase i and the general properties of cytoplasmic and mitochondrial isozymes derived from acute myelocytic leukemia blast cells.
20	bovine pancreatic lipase i isolation homogeneity and characterization	N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A N/A g.
20	physiological and dna characterization of candida maltosa a hydrocarbon utilizing yeast	Physiological characterization and DNA of yeast-utilizing hydrocarbon candida maltosa.
20	effect of temperature salts ph and other factors on the development of peritrichous flagella in vibrio alginolyticus	The development of peritrichous flagella in vibrio alginolyticus.
20	dissolution rates of high energy sulfathiazole povidone coprecipitates ii characterization of form of drug controlling its dissolution rate via solubility studies	Dissolution Rates of High Energy Povidone Sulfathiazole Co-Presidents ii. solubility studies to characterize the form of the drug that controls dissolution rate.
20	cathepsin phosphoprotein phosphatase and acid phosphatase in the soluble fraction of the cattle brain cortex purification and properties author s transl	Cathepsin phosphoprotein phosphatase and acid phosphatase activity in the soluble fraction of bovine cerebral cortical purification and the properties of the transl.
20	the trypsin and chymotrypsin inhibitors in chick peas cicer arietinum l purification and properties of the inhibitors	The inhibitors of chymotrypsin and trypsin in chickpeas cicer arietinum purification and the properties of inhibitors.
20	purification of normal human urinary n acetyl beta hexosaminidase a by affinity chromatography	Normal urinary human acetyl beta-hexosaminidase by Dapos chromatography; affinity.
20	physicochemical properties of two atypical cytochromes c crithidia cytochrome c 557 and euglena cytochrome c 558	Physico properties-chemical of two atypical c-crithidia cytochrome c 557 and euglena cytochrome c 558.
20	biosynthesis of heparin solubilization and partial characterization of n and o sulphotransferases	Apos solubilization biosynthesis; heparin and partial n and sulfotransferase characterization.
20	alcohol oxidases of kloeckera sp and hansenula polymorpha catalytic properties and subunit structures	Kloeckera sp. alcohols and polymorpha hansenula alcohols catalytic properties and sub@-@ units structures.
20	i n vitro transcription of adenovirus 2 dna i characterization of promoters for e coli rna polymerase	Characterization of the promoters of e coli rna polymerase.
20	preparation of the lectin b component from the hemagglutinin of lens culinaris	Lectin b preparation from apos; culinaris lens hemagglutinin.
20	purification and properties of an enzyme catalyzing the splitting of carbon mercury linkages from mercury resistant pseudomonas k 62 strain i splitting enzyme 1	The purification and purification properties of mercury-resistant pseudomonas i. strain k-62, @-@mercury carbon-bond separation catalyzing enzyme from l&apos.
20	partial purification and properties of microsomal phosphatidate phosphohydrolase from rat liver	Partial purification and microsomal rat liver phosphatidate phosphohydrolase properties.
20	purification and some enzymatic properties of the chitosanase from bacillus r 4 which lyses rhizopus cell walls	Bacillus r 4 chitosanase that lyses rhizopus cell walls is purified and has some enzymatic properties.
20	some physicochemical properties of hemoglobin manitoba alpha2 102ser replaced by arg g9 beta2	Some physical properties-chemicals of l' alpha2 102ser manitoba hemoglobin replaced by arg g9 beta2.
20	laboratory procedures for the isolation of chlamydia trachomatis from the human genital tract	Laboratory procedures for apo; isolation of chlamydia trachomatis from human genital tract.
20	characterization of the mannosyl and fucosyl transferases in the ovine anterior pituitary glands	Characterization of mannosyl and fucosyltransferases in the anterior pituitary glands of oysters.
20	polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase in the osmotic shock fluid of erwinia rubrifaciens characterization of the purified enzyme and its effect on plant cells	L' polygalacturonic acid trans eliminase in osmotic shock fluid d' erwinia rubrifaciens characterizes the apos; enzyme purified and its effect on plant cells.
20	purification of plasma membrane penicillinase from bacillus licheniformis 749 c and comparison with exoenzyme	Purification of the plasma membrane penicillinase of the bacillus licheniformis 749 c. and comparison with the etapos; exoenzyme.
20	the hydrophobic membrane penicillinase of bacillus licheniformis 749 c characterization of the hydrophilic enzyme and phospholipopeptide produced by trypsin cleavage	The hydrophobic membrane penicillinase of the bacterium licheniformis 749 was characterized by trypsin cleavage as the hydrophilic enzyme and the phospholipopeptide.
20	isolation and characterization of actinopolyspora halophila gen et sp nov an extremely halophilic actinomycete	Isolation and characterization of l' actinopolyspora halophila gen et sp. nov., a highly halophilic actinomycete.
20	factors affecting the sensitivity of replicating mccoy cells in the isolation and growth of chlamydia a tric agents	Factors affecting the sensitivity of McCoy cell replication in chlamydial isolation and growth.
20	partial characterization of prostaglandin synthetase in the reproductive tract of the male house cricket acheta domesticus	In addition, it was found that the reproductive apparatus of the cricket purchased male domesticus and that the prostaglandin synthetase was partially characterized.
20	classification of micrococci on the basis of deoxyribonucleic acid homology	It is not possible to distinguish between the two types of micrococci, but it is important to distinguish between the two.
20	circular dichroism and ethidium bromide binding capacity of chromatin from cells temperature sensitive for the transformed phenotype	Temperature-sensitive cell chromatin ethidium and d&apos bromide binding ability for the transformed phenotype.
20	iodination of dna studies of the reaction and iodination of papovavirus dna	Reaction DNA and papavirus DNA iodization studies.
20	purification and properties of two initiation factors from bacillus stearothermophilus	Purification and the properties of two different factors; initiation of stearothermophilic bacillus.
20	further characterization of yeast rna polymerases effect of subunits removal	For the purposes of this document, the following definitions shall be used: 1.
20	effects of aureo s 700r on sporulation viability and infectivity of ovine coccidial oocysts	Efficacy of antioxidants in the control of ovarian oocysts; effects of antioxidants on sporulation viability.
20	purification and properties of arylsulphatase a from rabbit testis	Purification and apos; arylsulfatase properties have rabbit testicles.
20	isolation and basic properties of thiamine pyrophosphokinase from brewing yeast	Brewery yeast thiamine pyrophosphokinase isolation and basic properties.
20	calorimetric and freeze fracture analysis of lipid phase transitions and lateral translational motion of intramembrane particles in mitochondrial membranes	Calorimetric and cryofracture analysis of the transitions of the lipid phase and of the lateral translational motion of intramembrane particles in mitochondrial membranes.
20	physiology and characterization of a fungal milk clotting enzyme from aspergillus flavus	This enzyme is a fungal enzyme that coagulates milk from aspergillus flavus.
20	partial denaturation of mouse dna in preparative cscl density gradients at alkaline ph	In addition, it is not possible to distinguish between the two types of DNA.
20	characterization of agarose bound trypsin	Characterization of agarose-linked trypsin.
20	purification and characterization of phosphodiesterase i from bothrops atrox	Phosphodiesterase I of both atrox strains was purified and characterized.
20	paromomycin and dihydrostreptomycin binding to escherichia coli ribosomes	Paromomycin and dihydrostreptomycin were found to bind to d' Escherichia coli ribosomes.
20	characterization of the toromeric structure in drosophila lummei	Toromeric structure characterization in drosophila lummei.
20	soluble adenylate cyclase from the culture medium of bordetella pertussis purification and characterization	Soluble adenylate cyclase from purification culture and bordetella pertussis characterization.
20	characterization of l asparagine transport systems in stemphylium botryosum	Characterization of potato transport systems; asparagine l in the stem of Botryosum.
20	purification and properties of an endo cellulase of avicelase type from irpex lacteus polyporus tulipiferae	Purification and apos properties; avicelase-like endo cellulase from apos; irpex lacteus polyporus tulipiferae.
20	purification and properties of the extracellular dextransucrase from leuconostoc mesenteroides nrrl b 1299	Purification and properties of extracellular leuconostoc-mesenteroides nrrl b 1299 dextransucrase.
20	steroidogenesis in the zona glomerulosa of the adrenal coretx i isolation and some properties of mitochondria from the zona glomerulosa of the bovine adrenal cortex	Steroidogenesis in the bovine epos glomeruli; adrenal cortical isolation i and some mitochondrial properties of bovine adrenal cortical glomeruli.
20	alkaline phosphatase of thiobacillus thioparus partial purification and properties of the enzyme	Thiobacillus thioparus alkaline phosphatase, partially purified, and its properties.
20	purification and properties of l asparaginase from mycobacterium phlei	Purification and properties of phlei mycobacterium asparaginase.
20	exocytosis in secretory cells of rat lacrimal gland peroxidase release from lobules and isolated cells upon cholinergic stimulation	L' exocytosis in rat lacrimal peroxidase secretory cells releases lobules and cholinergic-stimulated cells.
20	isolation and characterization of a microsomal arylaminopeptidase from rat kidney	The results of this study are summarized below.
20	isolation and characterization of dna dna and dna rna	In addition, it may be used in conjunction with other biological processes.
20	alpha mannosidase from phaseolus vulgaris composition and structural properties	L' alpha mannosidase is derived from the composition and the structural properties of phaseolus vulgaris.
20	simple isolation method and assay for t4 dna ligase and characterization of the purified enzyme	Simple Laboratory Procedure; Ligase Isolation and Determination; T4 DNA and T4 Characterization; Purified Enzyme.
20	functional properties of fragments of the sarcoplasmic reticulum of the fast and slow muscles of rana ridibunda frogs	Functional properties of rana ridibunda fast and slow muscle sarcoplasmic reticulum fragments.
20	cytochrome c1 of bakers yeast i isolation and properties	Cytochrome c1 baking yeast isolates and its properties.
20	purification and characterization of a repressible alkaline phosphatase from thermus aquaticus	In addition, it can be used as an indicator of the quality of the product.
20	properties of tubulin in unfertilized sea urchin eggs quantitation and characterization by the colchicine binding reaction	The properties of tubulin in the unfertilized eggs of sea urchins are quantified and characterized by the binding reaction to colchicine.
20	enzymatic studies on a cellulase system of trichoderma viride iv purification and properties of a less random type cellulase	Enzyme studies on a virid trichoderma iv cellulase purification system and less random cellulase properties.
20	the ovalbumin gene in vitro enzymatic synthesis and characterization	An enzyme synthesis and in vitro characterization of the gene from ovalbumin.
20	solubilized nuclear receptors for thyroid hormones physical characteristics and binding properties evidence for multiple forms	Solubilized nuclear receptor for thyroid hormones Physical characteristics and evidence of multiple forms binding properties.
20	isolation and properties of a thermostable restriction endonuclease endo r bst1503	In addition, it is recommended that the endosulfan be used as an endosulfan source.
20	isolation and characterization of an enzyme with esterase activity from micropolyspora faeni	An enzyme having an esterase activity from the micropolyspora faeni.
20	mccarey kaufman technique of corneal storage before penetrating keratoplasties in rabbits an evaluation	Mccarey kaufman corneal storage technique before entering rabbit keratoplasty evaluation.
20	purification and characterization of a peripheral protein from the sheep erythrocyte membrane	Purification and characterization of sheep peripheral erythrocyte membrane protein.
20	isolation and properties of the fibrinolytic enzyme from the actinomyces thermovulgaris cultural broth	L'isolation et propriétés de l'apos; enzyme fibrinolytique du broth de culture d'apos; actinomyces thermovulgaris.
20	purification and properties of l asparaginase b from acinetobacter calcoaceticus	The purification and the properties of the l-asparaginase b of the acinetobacter calcoaceticus.
20	nature and properties of c3hf natural antitumor cytotoxins directed against murine lymphosarcoma cells	Nature and properties of the natural antitumor cytotoxins c3hf directed against the murine lymphosarcoma cells.
20	partial purification of human intestinal alkaline phosphatase with affinity chromotography some properties and interaction of concanavalin a with alkaline phosphatase	Human intestinal alkaline phosphatase partial purification with d&apos chromotography; concanavalin a affinity, certain properties and interaction with alkaline phosphatase.
20	purification and properties of the extracellular metallo proteinases of chromobacterium lividum ncib 10926	The purification and the properties of extracellular metalloproteinases from chromobacterium lividum ncib. 10926 are described.
20	the extracellular metalloprotease of serratia marcescens i purification and characterization	Serratia marcescens extracellular metalloprotease: purification and characterization.
20	influence of magnesium on chloride induced calcium release in skinned muscle fibers	L' magnesium influence on chloride induced release of calcium in the denuded muscle fibers.
20	growth of spirillum lipoferum at constant partial pressures of oxygen and the properties of its nitrogenase in cell free extracts	Spirillum lipoferum growth under constant partial pressures; oxygen and nitrogenase properties in cell-free extracts.
20	extracellular nuclease produced by a marine bacterium ii purification and properties of extracellular nuclease from a marine vibrio sp	Extracellular nuclease produced by apo purification; marine bacterium ii and extracellular nuclease properties d' marine vibrio.
20	characterization of a strain of methanospirillum hungatti	It is not possible to distinguish between the two strains.
20	solubilization partial purification and radioassay for the intrinsic factor receptor from the ileal mucosa	Partial Solubilization and Radio-Test for Intrinsic Ileal Mucosa Factor Receptor.
20	coupling of catecholamine receptor from one cell with adenylate cyclase from another cell by cell fusion	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support this claim.
20	membrane bound dd carboxypeptidase and transpeptidase activities from bacillus megaterium km at ph 7 general properties substrate specificity and inhibition by beta lactam antibiotics	Bacillus megaterium km membrane-bound dd carboxypeptidase and transpeptidase activities at general ph7 properties were substrate specific and inhibited by beta lactamic antibiotics.
20	purification and properties of pyrazon dioxygenase from pyrazon degrading bacteria	Pyrazon dioxygenase from pyrazon-degrading bacteria purification and properties.
20	properties of renin granules isolated from rat kidney	The properties of the granules of renin isolated from the rat kidney.
20	studies on an alpha amylase from a thermophilic bacterium i purification and characterization	Alpha amylase studies from apo; thermophilic bacterium purification and characterization.
20	isolation and characterization of acid invertase inhibitor from sweet potato	L'isolation et caractérisation de l'apos; invertase acid inhibitor de l'acide douce.
20	structure of nuclear pre mrna viii isolation and characterization of complementary sequences	L&apos structure; nuclear pre-mrna isolation viii and complementary sequence characterization.
20	isolation and characterization of cytoplasmic and chloroplastic ribosomes and their ribosomal rnas from the diatom cylindrotheca fusiformis	Cytoplasmic and chloroplast ribosomes and their ribosomal rnas are isolated and characterized from the cylindrotheca fusiformis diatom.
20	synthesis of a disulfide affinity adsorbent for purification of estrogen receptor	Abstract, estrogen receptor purification disulfide affinity.
20	high resolution proton nuclear magnetic resonance investigation of the structural and dynamic properties of d c15a15 d t15g15	The structural and dynamic properties of dc15a15 d t15g15 have been studied in high-resolution proton magnetic resonance.
20	alkaline phosphatase of blastocladiella emersonii partial purification and characterization	Alkaline phosphatase from blastocladiella emersonii is partially purified and characterized.
20	characterization of porosity of isostatically pressed and sintered nickel base powdered metal	Characterization of the porosity of basic nickel powder in both isostatically pressed and sintered form.
20	characterization of ribonucleoprotein particles released from isolated nuclei of regenerating rat liver in two different in vitro systems	Characterization of ribonucleoprotein particles released from isolated hepatic nuclei undergoing regeneration in two different in vitro systems.
20	isolation purification and investigation of physico chemical properties and specificity of leu gly gly amino peptidase	In addition, it is recommended that the test be carried out in accordance with the following instructions: 1.
20	purification and properties of two aromatic aminotransferases in bacillus subtilis	Two aromatic aminotransferases of the bacillus subtilis were purified and their properties investigated.
20	a new oxygenase 2 nitropropane dioxygenase of hansenula mrakii enzymologic and spectrophotometric properties	A novel nitropropane 2 oxygenase mrakii hansenula dioxygenase with enzymological and spectrophotometric properties.
20	yersinia enterocolitica recovery and characterization of two unusual isolates from a case of acute enteritis	Yersinia enterocolitica recovered and characterized two unusual isolates from one case of acute enteritis.
20	numerically dominant denitrifying bacteria from world soils	Digitally dominant denitrifying bacterium in soils all over the world.
20	morpholigic and physiologic repercussions of partial removal of brown adipose tissue in rats acclimated to different temperatures	Morphological and physiological effects of apos; partial brown adipose tissue removal in acclimatized rats at different temperatures.
20	production and properties of hemagglutinin of haemophilus gallinarum	Hemophilus gallinarum; haemophilus gallinarum; haemophilus gallinarum.
20	characterization of microsomal choloyl coenzyme a synthetase	Characterization of Microsomal Choloyl Coenzyme a synthetase a.
20	l glycerol 3 phosphate dehydrogenase from the insect ceratitis capitata purfication physicochemical and enzymic properties	Glycerol 3 Phosphate dehydrogenase (Glycerol 3 Phosphate dehydrogenase); insect ceratitis capitata purification physicochemical and enzymatic properties.
20	isolation and characterization of a bacteriocin produced by bacillus stearothermophilus strain nu 10	The results of this study are summarized in Appendix A. The results of this study are summarized below.
20	characterization of single stranded viral dna sequences present during replication of adenovirus types 2 and 5	It is important to note, however, that there is no evidence to support this claim.
20	study of the conditions maintaining the synthesis of alpha amylase by bacillus species	Study of conditions that maintain alpha-amylase synthesis by bacilli species.
20	purification crystallization and properties of triacylglycerol lipase from pseudomonas fluorescens	Crystallization of the purification process and triacylglycerol lipase properties of Pseudomonas fluorescens.
20	intracellular nucleodepolymerase of bacteria representatives of the proteus and providencia groups its isolation and properties	The intracellular nucleo-epolymerase of Proteus and Providence representative bacteria combines isolation and properties.
20	electron spin resonance investigations of mitochondrial electron transport in neurospora crassa characterization of paramagnetic intermediates in a standard strain	Electron paramagnetic resonance studies of d' electron mitochondrial transport in neurospora crassa characterized paramagnetic intermediates in one standard strain.
20	characterization and site of action of a soluble protein that stimulates peptide bond synthesis	In addition, it is important to note that there is no evidence to support the hypothesis that this is the case.
20	prolyl 3 hydroxylase partial characterization of the enzyme from rat kidney cortex	Partial characterization of rat renal cortical enzyme by prolyl 3 hydroxylase.
20	studies on the toxin of aspergillus fumigatus vii purification and some properities of hemolytic toxin asp hemolysin from culture filtrates and mycelia	Studies of the toxin from the purification of apos; aspergillus fumigatus vii and certain properties of apos; hemolysin from apos; aspe, a hemolytic toxin, from culture filtrates and mycelium.
20	partial characterization of epididymal 5 alpha reductase in the rat	Partial characterization of rat epididymal alpha reductase 5.
20	studies on urinary kallikreins i purification and characterization of human urinary kallikreins	Urinary kallikrein studies i human urinary kallikrein purification and characterization.
20	o acetylserine and o acetylhomoserine sulfhydrylase of yeast further purification and characterization as a pyridoxal enzyme	Yeast acetyl-homoserine sulfhydrylase is purified and characterized as a pyridoxal enzyme.
20	purification and some properties of an extracellular alpha amylase from bacteroides amylophilus	Purification and certain properties of extracellular alpha-amylase of bacteroids amylophilus.
20	purification of hyaluronidase from human placenta	Human placental hyaluronidase.
20	purification and properties of trna adenine 1 methyltransferase from rat liver	Purification and purification of rat liver trna-adenine 1 methyltransferase.
20	hemoglobin switching in sheep and goats preparation and characterization of complementary dnas specific for the alpha beta and gamma globin messenger rnas of sheep	Hemoglobin in sheep and goats, prepare and characterize specific complementary dnas for alpha beta and gamma messenger globin in sheep.
20	isolation chemical characterization and biophysical properties of three different abnormal lipoproteins lp x1 lp x2 and lp x3	Chemical characterization of lp x 1 lp x 2 and lp x 3 lp, isolation and biophysical properties of three different Lp x 2 and Lp x 3 lp abnormal lipoproteins.
20	characterization of the integration protein of bacteriophage lambda as a site specific dna binding protein	Dapos protein characterization; lambda bacteriophage integration as binding protein; d&apos DNA; specific site.
20	study of the equilibrium conditions for the extractive purification of oleandomycin	Study of phosphate conditions; oleandomycin balance for extractive purification.
20	improved efficiency of mouse guinea pig and human c3b inactivator at low ionic strength and reproducible immune adherence with mouse complement	It is recommended that patients be treated with a combination of antibody, antibody, antibody, antibody, antibody, antibody, antibody, antibody, antigen, antigen, antigen, antigen, antigen and antigen.
